Having trouble finding something to watch on Amazon Instant Video? The retailer launched Monday an experimental browsing tool that lets users discover movies and TV shows based on their genre preferences or simply the mood they're in.

Movies and shows are divided up into categories, some of which bear the names of genres (i.e., "Comedy" and "Mystery/Thriller"), and others which are labeled by mood, such as "Feel-Good" and "Exciting." Users can toggle between TV shows and movies, and apply filters to show only videos that are available for free viewing to Prime subscribers, or ones that bear G or PG ratings.

It's pretty basic, but it sure beats the haphazard organization of Amazon's current Instant Video page, which mixes rows of new releases with bestsellers and personal recommendations.

The move is the latest in a series of investment's Amazon is making in its streaming video platform. Last week, the company inked a licensing agreement with A+E Networks to bring past seasons of shows from A&E, History, Lifetime and Bio to its streaming library  shows, it should be noted, that Netflix subscribers lost access to in the fall. Amazon claims its streaming Prime catalog now numbers more than 33,000, double what it was a year ago.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Associated Press is the latest news organization to experiment with trying to make money from Twitter by using its feed to advertise for other companies.

The AP announced Monday that it will share sponsored tweets from Samsung throughout this week for the International CES taking place in Las Vegas. The news service will let Samsung post two tweets per day to the AP's Twitter account, which has more than 1.5 million users, and each of these tweets will be labeled "SPONSORED TWEETS."

This marks the first time that the AP has sold advertising on its Twitter feed, and the company says it spent months developing guidelines to pave the way for this and other new media business models.

For this particular promotion, Samsung will provide the sponsored tweets and non-editorial staff at the AP will handle the publishing side. In this way, the company hopes to maintain a clear dividing line between its editorial and advertising operations on Twitter.

"We are thrilled to be taking this next step in social media," said Lou Ferrara, the AP managing editor overseeing its social media efforts, in a statement. "As an industry, we must be looking for new ways to develop revenues while providing good experiences for advertisers and consumers. At the same time, advertisers and audiences expect AP to do that without compromising its core mission of breaking news."

Other publishers have dabbled in Twitter ads, including The Atlantic, National Journal, The Times-Picayune and BreakingNews.com.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It looks like 2012 was a pretty good year for Apple's App Store.

Apple announced Monday that the App Store has now passed 40 billion downloads since launching in 2008, with nearly 20 billion apps downloaded in 2012. The company had a particularly strong holiday season, with 2 billion app downloads in December alone.

The App Store hit the 25 billion mark in March and passed 35 billion in October.

It has been an incredible year for the iOS developer community, said Eddy Cue, Apples senior vice president of Internet Software and Services, in a statement. Developers have made over $7 billion on the App Store, and we continue to invest in providing them with the best ecosystem so they can create the most innovative apps in the world.

Just as importantly, the company revealed that there are now more than 500 million active accounts in the App Store, showing the growth of Apple's user base.

In total, there are now 775,000 apps in Apple's App Store, with more than 300,000 apps specifically designed for iPad. That's up from 700,000 total apps in October, with about 250,000 iPad-specific apps at the time.
--------------------------------------------------------------
When it comes to college football, NASA astronaut Kevin Ford is Irish through and through. Ford will be rooting for Notre Dame all the way from space during the BCS Championship game against Alabama tonight.

Ford is currently living on the International Space Station, where he commands a six-man team, but tonight his heart will be with Notre Dame his alma mater when the team faces off with Alabama's Crimson Tide in Miami.

"The team's played great," Ford said in a recent interview with Notre Dame officials on NASA TV. "Obviously the defense is very special, and the offense is just really clicking. I'm looking forward to a great game on the seventh of January."

Ford has been living on the space station since October, when he blasted off aboard a Russian Soyuz rocket. He took charge of the space station's Expedition 34 crew a month later and will return to Earth in March. He is a native of Montpelier, Ind., and is a retired colonel in the U.S. Air Force.

Ford said he tried to keep up with Notre Dame's games while on his current spaceflight, but he admitted the timing of the games is a challenge. The space station runs on Greenwich Mean Time, so many of the football games last well into the wee hours of the morning for Ford.

SEE ALSO: Tour the Space Station (Video)

For tonight's championship game, though, Ford said he asked Mission Control for some post-game recovery time. That way, he can watch most of the game live during the overnight hours.

Astronauts can watch live television via a satellite communications system, Ford said.

"It's normally used for science data, but on weekends, if it's free, they'll let us get a little bit of TV," Ford added. "I've been able to follow the team and see a lot of the games."

The astronaut even has his favorite Notre Dame garb on the space station to support the team. During his interview, he pulled off his Expedition 34 sweatshirt to reveal a "Play Like a Champion Today" t-shirt just for the team. He also has a sign that reads "Explore Like a Champion Today" mounted over one of the space station's hatches, much like the iconic sign Notre Dame players touch on the way to the field at their home stadium.

But before Ford ever signed up for NASA's astronaut corps, he was a student at Notre Dame. He studied aerospace engineering and graduated with a bachelors of science degree in 1982. He even learned Russian along the way, something that happened to come in useful recently.

"I took a Russian class at Notre Dame," Ford said. "Never in my wildest dreams did I think I would fly someday in a Russian spacecraft with two cosmonauts, speaking only Russian."

This article originally published at Space.com here
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  Sharing photos and videos on your TV just got a little easier for AT&T U-Verse customers. The carrier announced two new U-Verse-enabled apps Monday, Twonky Beam and Pix & Flix, which allow U-verse customers to share photos and videos from their smartphones on their U-verse connected televisions.

For video, U-verse customers can now use Twonky Beam. Recently made available for Roku and Xbox 360 as well, the app lets you share a compatible video from your smartphone on your television with the simple swiping gesture.

Photos can be shared on the big screen using Pix & Flix. The app allows you to "throw" photos from your smartphone to your television for quick viewing, and once connected to your Facebook account, you can view photos from the social network on the big screen as well.

"TV is becoming a more interactive experience than ever, and that's reflected in the latest apps to hit our U-verse enabled platform," said Jeff Weber, President of Content and Advertising Sales, AT&T Home Solutions. "We're excited to work with more developers to deliver more second-screen apps to customers."

AT&T also announced a new video on demand subscription package for U-verse customers. Called the U-verse TV Screen Pack, the $5 a month service will give customers unlimited, instant playback of an extensive library of movies on U-verse TV, Uverse.com and on the U-verse app for tablets and smartphones.

Monday's announcements were made as part of AT&T's Developer Summit, an event being held by the carrier in Las Vegas alongside CES.

What do you think of the new U-verse apps? What apps would you like to see AT&T add support for in the future? Let us know your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  RC toys have traded in their bulky remote controls for the gadget in your pocket. Take the new line of smart toys from BeeWi, introduced this week at CES 2013. The company's new fighting helicopters, soccer-playing robots and four-wheelers all rely on iOS and Android devices for control.

Like another iPad-controlled device, Parrot's popular AR.Drone, the big-wheeled ScaraBee ($149.99) lets you steer via simple on-iPad (or iPhone) controls  it connects via ad-hoc Wi-Fi  and includes a camera so you can see what the toy sees. Unlike the Drone, ScaraBee only records up to one minute of VGA video. It does drive for 15 minutes on a charge. I took the bot for a quick test drive and found the controls simple, though not entirely intuitive. I assume I'd get better with practice. The company also introduced TankBee, which connects to mobile devices via Bluetooth.

BeeWi's RC helicopters, also controlled by iOS and Android devices, do have cameras, but only the infrared sort, which they use to see other helicopters and stationary targets  the latter of which can "shoot" back. Five hits and the $119 StingBee slowly loses altitude until it lands back on the ground. There's also a $69.99 version that cannot shoot or read infrared beams.

Perhaps the most entertaining new BeeWi toy is the little KickBee. Smaller than all the other robots, it comes with a tiny plastic ball. As with all the other BeeWi products, you can control it via a mobile device but, in this case, you'll want to make sure someone else also has one of the $54.99 robots so you can play a pickup game of soccer. Now imagine a field of these little guys, each one controlled by someone with a smartphone, working as teams to drive the rubber ball into a goal. Sounds like fun.

The company is also unveiling a set of iOS and Android device controlled Mini Coopers and a Fiat 500 toy later this year. Company officials told me they're also quite close to Windows Phone 8 versions of their remote control apps.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  If you shy away from fitness trackers because you don't like how they look on your body or hanging from your clothes, you might take a look at the new BodyMedia Core 2.

 

It was on display at the International CES where we got to take a look at the new device. Now, with the addition of some new accessories, it looks more like arm candy.

Gwen Smith with BodyMedia says the face of the new sensor is smaller, about the size of an iPod nano, with an optional strap that has heart rate sensors in it.

There are interchangeable faceplates to choose from as well so you literally dress your tracker to match your style. They've also added a black face and strap to appeal to a more masculine audience. The BodyMedia, like other fitness devices, lets you upload data right to its app or online software. It also integrates with other fitness apps like Runkeeper and My FitnessPal.

There's no price for the new Core 2 monitor yet, but expect it to run between $119 and $149 when it launches.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  Love photos but never seem to take the perfect one? Canon's PowerShot N wants to help via a new Creative Mode that will create five "artistic" photos of your original, mixing up the composition, color and lighting in a quest for the best possible picture.

Once you've got your masterpiece, the camera makes it easy to share it thanks to built-in Wi-Fi. Once you set up the Mobile Device Connect feature and download the companion app (iOS and Android) on your smartphone or tablet, you can easily relay pics and videos.

To help you get those difficult shots, the PowerShot N has shutter and zoom controls both on the top of the camera and the bottom of the lens. The tilting 2.8-inch touch LCD also features a touch shutter, letting you snap pics just by touching the screen.

Rounding out the specs: The CMOS image sensor captures images up to 12.1 megapixels as well as 1080p video. The optical zoom goes up to 8x. It's just 1.15 inches thick. There's also a power-saving ECO mode that will dim the screen and cut the screen timeout to 10 seconds.

The PowerShot N is coming in April for $299.99. It'll be available in white or black.
--------------------------------------------------------------
What will the car of the future look like? Will it drive itself and communicate with other vehicles in order to avoid traffic accidents? Will it be loaded with advanced sensors and have greatly reduced emissions compared to today's cars?

In the infographic below, the folks from InsuranceQuotes try to imagine the car of tomorrow, taking these and other likely possibilities into account. No matter which technologies are used, the car of the future is likely to be smarter, safer and more efficient. Check out how it compares to today's cars.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Mere hours after President Barack Obama put forth Chuck Hagel as his choice for Secretary of Defense, a pro-Israel group launched a website with the goal of scuttling the nomination.

The website, ChuckHagel.com, was launched by the Emergency Committee for Israel, and claims that Hagel "is not a responsible option" for the cabinet position.

The Emergency Committee for Israel is described on its website as "committed to mounting an active defense of the U.S.-Israel relationship by educating the public about the positions of political candidates on this important issue." The interest group, led by right-wing commentator and Weekly Standard Editor Bill Kristol, has already posted an anti-Hagel video to YouTube that knocks his stance on economic sanctions and military action against Iran.

Hagel, a former senator from Nebraska, has in previous comments said that military action against Iran would be ill-advised. He has been criticized by many conservatives and some liberals for those stances and for being, in their view, insufficiently supportive of Israel.

The brewing controversy over Hagel's nomination is leading some analysts to expect less than smooth sailing when the Senate votes on his nomination.

The committee also plans to buy ad placements on Google that will appear when users search for "Chuck Hagel," according to Yahoo.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Take a deep breath; Dec 21, 2012 is behind us. The Mayan calendar end-of-world debacle is over: zip, zilch, gone!

The silliness, anxiety and paranoia leading up to the predicted end of times was so bad that on Dec. 21st  the appointed doomsday  a worried citizen left a message on my office phone that accused me of skipping town to escape Armageddon.

If history is any example, the next cosmic doomsday prediction is always right around the corner. The Mayan blowout was just the latest in many centuries of bad calls by prognosticators who have the audacity to think they can divine the End of Everything.

So, to be a little preemptive, let's look at just three cosmic events that might start another pop culture panic. Thankfully these aren't born out of mythology, psychics and misinterpreted archeoastronomy. They are real events that will inevitably be embellished by the imaginations of modern day soothsayers.

Last September, the International Scientific Optical Network (ISON) near Kislovodsk, Russia, discovered comet C/2012 S1 (ISON). Though its closest approach to Earth is a year away, the celestial visitor is already billed as the "comet of the century." That's because it may be a first-time visitor to the solar system that will warm and then erupt with a lot of outgassing from pristine ices.

On Nov. 28, 2013, the comet will skim above the sun's surface at a distance slightly greater than the separation of the Earth and moon. Not doubt there will be pseudoscience predictions of the comet wreaking havoc by raising tides on the sun. The exact opposite will be the case. The sun's tidal pull could tear apart the comet into small pieces, as has been the case for previous sungrazer-class comets.

Comet ISON is due to pass within 37 million miles of Earth in January 2014. You can expect to see all types of outrageous claims that the object's feeble gravity will yank on Earth to trigger volcanoes and earthquakes.

Comet ISON has been compared with the Great Comet of 1680 (in above illustration) which, according to contemporary accounts, caused New Yorkers to be "overcome with terror at a sight in the heavens such as has seldom greeted human eyes." A day of fasting and humiliation was set-aside in order that "the wrath of God might be assuaged."

Likewise, soothsayers will quickly note that the comet will be at it brightest one month before Christmas 2013. "This comet, if it lives up to its billing, certainly could point to the glorious soon coming of the Lord Jesus Christ from heaven!" predicts one religious website.

The fact that the comet is anticipated to get as bright as the moon will only fuel religious and mystical speculation about its timing and significance as an omen. Chill out folks, it's just another 4-billion-year-old primeval chunk of ice from the solar system's deep freeze, the Oort cloud.

NASA keeps cataloging more Earth-threatening asteroids every year. But the asteroid Apophis, named after the Egyptian spirit of evil and destruction, is legendary because it will be a record-breaker.

On April, Friday the 13th of 2029 Apophis will skim below the orbits of communication satellites and briefly be a naked-eye object scooting over the mid-Atlantic ocean.

Earth's gravity will deflect the comet's trajectory. The worst-case scenario is that the chances of it striking Earth on its return on April 13, 2036 will increase to 1 in 5,500.

Apophis is the length of over three football fields. It packs enough kinetic energy to wipe out 10 million people with the power of 100,000 Hiroshima-sized atomic bombs. Even in this worst-case scenario, a direct hit would not obliterate all life on the planet. But it certainly would not be a good day for the human race.

People will get very squeamish over the possibility of Apophisgeddon despite the best low-probability collision estimate from astronomers. Parallels no doubt will be drawn to Biblical prophecy. This is especially true because the potentially destructive path of the asteroid crosses Middle East. South America and the west coast of Africa are also along the ground track.

Congress might even debate if steps should be taken to deflect the asteroid. But given that so many legislators are tone-deaf to global warming, don't expect any preemptive actions to be funded.

Like clockwork so-called planetary grand alignments have taken place in 1962, 1982 and 2000. This does not mean that the planets line up like pearls on a string. But they sort of gang up on one side of the sun within an angle of roughly 10 to 30 degrees  so the definition is a but mushy.

The uneventful year 1128 A.D. saw one of the tightest planetary alignments. The 1982 doomsday best-seller The Jupiter Effect spelled out an improbable chain of events that would be triggered by the planets' tug-of-war with the sun: Tides raised on the sun's surface would increase sunspot activity, build up the solar wind that would effect Earth's weather, and subsequently, Earth's spin rate, which would then trigger earthquakes.

No geological disasters happened in 1982 short of a 6.0 magnitude earthquake that killed 1,500 people in Dhamar, northern Yemen. In fact the celestial alignment allowed for NASA to pull off the Voyager 2 "grand tour" of the four outer gas giant planets from 1979 to 1989.

Jupiter contains more mass than all the other planets combined, and yet it is still less than 1% of the sun's mass. Therefore Jupiter's influence on the sun is inconsequential.

Alien astronomers could measure Jupiter's gravitational tug as an insignificant 270 mile-per-hour cyclic change in the sun's radial velocity over the planet's 12-year orbital period. Only if Jupiter was moved so close to the sun that its orbital period was measured in days, would some serious tidal effects be seen. This is observed with so-called "hot Jupiters," the exoplanet WASP-18 being the most extreme case.

Running an ephemeris forward in time, with the ease of throttling H.G. Wells' time machine, the next closest thing to a grand alignment comes in 2163 (shown above). Unless we have bombed ourselves back to pre-Columbian society by then, people in 2163 will be too science savvy to give this any thought. They will be bemused by historical accounts of the feared Jupiter Effect by their science-illiterate ancestors.

What's ironic is that any casual surfing of the Internet shows that a lot of people are preoccupied with doom and gloom based on mythology, psychics and patently flaky ideas. The real Earth-threats, such as global warming, seem to be too easily shrugged off as lacking solid scientific evidence. Go figure.

This article originally published at Discovery News here
--------------------------------------------------------------
If a kid's drawing is good enough for the fridge, then it's probably also worth making it into a sculpture that can be displayed on desks and shelves. For about $130, Crayon Creatures will create bespoke figurines based on your child's drawings.

Just launched last week, the company has already gained the attention of enthused parents worldwide. Crayon Creatures will take any 2D drawing, model it on a software and produce it using a 3D printer. As each figurine is personalized, the whole process can take up to three weeks start to finish.

The idea behind Crayon Creatures reminds us of Child's Own Studio, where a kid's hand-drawn character is made into a stuffed toy.

As the cost of 3D printers continues to drop, a lot of other similar concepts have popped up  and not just for children. As The Verge notes, a service called Printcraft lets Minecraft players turn their designs into 3D-printable files. Doodle3D is also another software that creates 3D versions of simple line drawings.

This article originally published at PSFK here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Cream and sugar can only do so much. If you really want to liven up your next cup of coffee, beyond the traditional boundaries of lactose and artificial sweeteners, consider one of these mugs.

They're called Creature Cups, and they're exactly what you'd hope they would be. Each mug is specially designed with a creepy surprise dwelling at the bottom: skulls, tarantulas, alligators and lobsters  the whole gang's there.

Fill one to the brim, hand it to a friend and wait for the scream. Just be sure you're standing outside the spit zone.

SEE ALSO: 12 Coffee Mugs for Tech Dads

For less scary surprises, there's also a similar line of mugs with adorable animal molds hiding below the surface  less "ahh!" and more "aww."

Check out the full Creature Cups set here. Sound like something you'd use? Tell us what you think about it below.

BONUS: 10 Things You Never Want to See in the Bathroom
--------------------------------------------------------------
Just every dad joke in the world crammed into one video.

Don't even bother shopping for a Father's Day present this year, just send your dad this video and then regret the next 53 days because this guy has found what seems to be every corny, obnoxious or clich joke around.

SEE ALSO: 'Bad Kids Jokes' Tumblr Is Funny for Adults

You will get a chuckle out of at least half. Don't try and stop it  let the laughter flow.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Grab tight hold of your cloche hats, high society wannabes, because Downton Abbey has returned to American television screens.

The third season of the Masterpiece period drama debuted this week on PBS and no amount of salty raspberry meringue pudding can satisfy fans' appetites for the show. Stick a butter knife in the week-long void left from waiting for a new episode with a little help from Tumblr.

SEE ALSO: 'Downton Abbey' Seasons 1 and 2 Explained in 5 Minutes

We scoured the Tumblings  pinkies up, of course  in search of the finest Downton Abbey Internet gems. The search produced googly eyes, nods to Arrested Development and enough wit to fill your teapot.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Milky Way hosts at least 17 billion Earth-size alien planets, and probably many more, a new study reveals.

Astronomers have determined that about 17% of stars in our galaxy harbor a roughly Earth-size exoplanet in a close orbit. Since there are 100 billion or so stars in the Milky Way, that works out to a minimum of 17 billion small, rocky alien worlds, or an Earth-size planet around one of every six stars.

And there are probably many more such planets orbiting at greater distances from their stars, some of which may even be "alien Earths" capable of supporting life as we know it.

The research team conducted an analysis of data collected by NASA's planet-hunting Kepler Space Telescope.

Kepler detects alien worlds by noting the telltale dips in brightness caused when planets cross the face of  or transit  their parent stars from the instrument's perspective. The telescope, which launched in March 2009, flagged more than 2,300 potential planets in its first 16 months of operation, more than 100 of which have been confirmed to date.

SEE ALSO: The Strangest Alien Planets (Gallery)

The research team wanted to know how complete and accurate Kepler's survey has been  that is, what percentage of its finds are real, and how many planets is it likely missing? So they came up with a simulation that mimicked the telescope's work, finding that about 90% of its detections are probably the real deal.

"There is a list of astrophysical configurations that can mimic planet signals, but altogether, they can only account for one-tenth of the huge number of Kepler candidates," team member Francois Fressin, of the Harvard-Smithsonian Center for Astrophysics (CfA), said in a statement. "All the other signals are bona-fide planets."

Fressin presented the results today at the annual meeting of the American Astronomical Society in Long Beach, Calif. The work has also been accepted for publication in The Astrophysical Journal.

Using information from both the actual and simulated Kepler surveys, the team calculated some estimates about how common different types of planets are thoughout the Milky Way.

They determined, for example, that 17% of stars have a planet 0.8 to 1.25 times the size of Earth in tight orbits, with periods of 85 days or less. About 25% of stars have a so-called "super-Earth" (worlds 1.25 to 2 times as big as our own) in an orbit of 150 days or less  the same percentage that hosts a "mini-Neptune" (a planet 2 to 4 times Earth's size) with an orbital period up to 250 days.

Big planets such as Saturn or Jupiter are far less common. Only 5% of stars harbor a gas giant with an orbital period of 400 days or less, researchers said.

Overall, the team found that about 50% of all stars in the Milky Way have a planet the size of Earth or larger in a tight orbit.

Further, stars don't have to be sun-like to host an Earth-size world. The team also determined that small and medium-size exoplanets are commonly found around red dwarfs as well, which are smaller and cooler than our star.

"Earths and super-Earths aren't picky," said co-author Guillermo Torres, also of the CfA. "We're finding them in all kinds of neighborhoods."

Kepler generally requires three planetary transits to flag a potential alien world. Since more tightly orbiting planets transit more frequently, the telescope's early findings have been biased toward close-in worlds. But as Kepler continues to operate, it should find more and more planets farther from their host stars  including, perhaps, Earth-size worlds in Earthlike orbits.

Image courtesy of C. Pulliam and D. Aguilar (CfA)

This article originally published at Space.com here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Echo  also known as the most irritating thing children have ever created  is a torturous game of cat and mouse, cat and mouse. The rules are easy: Speak. And then regret.

And if you want to be the most hated stranger alive, play the game with people on the street, like this group of pranksters, known on YouTube as LAHWF.

SEE ALSO: Proof That You Can't Trust (Fall) a Stranger

Step 1: Ask for directions. Step 2: Repeat directions. Step 3: Duck, because someone is going to clock you.

And on next week's edition of how to be the most annoying guy around, we'll show you how to play the "I'm not touching you" game.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Entrepreneurs are in for some big changes in 2013. That's the prediction of Ingrid Vanderveldt, Dell's "entrepreneur in residence" who works with the Dell Center for Entrepreneurs. Here are the rest of Vanderveldt's predictions for this year.

Alternative financing strategies: Most businesses are still bootstrapping, but are encouraged by alternative funding options as more borrowers and lenders are getting creative. Crowdfunding (i.e. Kickstarter), peer-to-peer lending sites and Dell Innovators Credit Fund are just a few examples of innovative funding tools increasingly available to business leaders. Scalable technology: With the explosion of big data (predicted to increase 43% over the next 10 years) and accelerated adoption of the cloud, more and more companies will look to technology as a strategic advantage to scaling successfully. As budgets remain tight, business owners will increasingly look to outside tech vendors to serve as advisers and will expect them to provide IT services and tailored recommendations to meet their specific business needs. The human capital problem: One key finding from Dells "Go Local" nine-city tour was that entrepreneurs struggle with accessing good talent. A lot can be gained by understanding how to maximize current and potential human capital within a business and extended entrepreneurial ecosystem. Online and in-person networking opportunities have never been so valuable. Entrepreneurs are getting younger: Blogging, launching apps, publishing magazines and creating social networks, kids like author Adora Svitak, 15, and app-builder Robert Nay, 16, have created empires before they hit college. In light of this growing trend, Dell will sponsor this years Clinton Global Initiative University (CGI U) and support millennial entrepreneurship at CGI U 2013, providing students with opportunities to learn about the multifaceted risks and opportunities involved with launching, running and growing a business. Social entrepreneurship: The concept of doing well by doing good has caught fire in a time where economic, social and environmental sustainability are more meaningful than ever. Strong focus on positive social and environmental impact has spurred contests, scholarships and even best business practices to be centered around the concept of giving to a global community.

This article originally published at BusinessNewsDaily here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Feeling queasy and in need of a scapegoat? A Facebook app from pharmaceutical company Help Remedies may be just the thing.

The app scans for mentions of flu symptoms and other related terms in the status updates of your Facebook friends as well as "suspicious check-ins" (think hospitals and pharmacies), helping you identify who may have given you the flu or who is most likely to.

The app is just for fun, but data from social networks including Facebook and Twitter has proven valuable to researchers tracking the geographical spread of viruses like H1N1.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  There's no shortage of Bluetooth speakers at the 2013 International Consumer Electronics Show in Las Vegas this week, but we're quite taken with the tiny-sized Pulse speaker and Rewind earbuds from Felt Audio.

The Pulse speaker ($99) piggybacks onto an iPhone case for easy carrying and can be plucked off and clipped onto something nearby. For example, when driving in a car and wanting to talk hands-free (with good audio), clip the small speaker onto the car visor or seat belt, so chatting is easy without a headset. The Pulse provides Bluetooth capabilities up to 40 feet, so you can use it in an office or at home to blast music too. (We gave it a listen and were impressed with the quality, especially from such a small device).

In addition, the speaker is great for those who use the treadmill  clip it to your sweatpants and attach Felt Audio's earbuds to the device to get rid of earbuds danging from a smartphone (audio will be redirected to the Bluetooth speaker). An accompanying earbud cartridge, with retractable earbuds, can tack on to the speaker, so it takes worrying about your smartphone out of the equation during a workout.

The company said it will be giving away free custom-made iPhone, iPad and iPod touch cases that Rewind earbuds and Pulse speaker to the first 5,000 purchasers, but it hasn't decided how much they will cost in the future.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  Real-time location-sharing app Glympse announced plans Monday to bring its app into Ford vehicles.

The first location-sharing app for Ford's SYNC in-car connectivity system, Ford drivers will now be able use voice commands to let friends, family, and colleagues know exactly where they are while driving.

"People typically share their location while in the car, and by integrating Glympse into Ford SYNC AppLink, we're providing drivers with a rich, real-time and hands-free way to share where they are," said Bryan Trussel, co-founder and CEO of Glympse.

To use Glympse, drivers will download the app onto their iPhones or Android devices, and then Bluetooth-pair or USB-connect that phone to a Ford SYNC AppLink-enabled vehicle.

Once connected, a driver can press the SYNC voice button on the steering wheel of the car and say "Send Glympse" while theyre on the road and share their location. Voice commands guide drivers through the location-sharing process, and send the car's exact location to a contact in their phones. Location details can also be posted on Facebook and Twitter.

The recipient of your Glympse can monitor where your vehicle is in real time on a map on a smartphone or the web. So, you can know exactly when your teenager will be home from a party, or keep track of your business partner whos stuck in traffic on the way to a big meeting.

A timer limits how long your location is visible. This lets you choose to share your location with your colleague for an hour while you're on your way to a meeting, but not continue sharing your location once the meeting is over and you're headed home.

"Glympse is a great example of how smartphone app integration with the car can help us make the driving experience more convenient for our customers, thus adding perceived value to their vehicle," said Julius Marchwicki, Ford SYNC AppLink program manager.

Glympse recently partnered with Mercedes-Benz to integrate the app into the new Mercedes-Benz Digital DriveStyle application

If you don't have a qualifying vehicle, you can still take advantage of Glympse, just in a different way. The app is available for Android, iPhone, Windows Phone and BlackBerry, and lets you share your location in real time  just without the integrated voice functionality available with the Ford Sync.

Not just for driving, the app can be used any time you need to track another person's location. For instance, a runner might use the app to share his location with a family member in case something happens while he's out training for a marathon.

Would you like to be able to share your location while driving with others? Let us know what you think in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Rep. Darrell Issa (R-Calif.), Chairman of the House Committee on Oversight and Government Reform, demanded an investigation of the Federal Trade Commission's role in sharing private information about the Commission's Google probe before the results of which were publicly announced, according to a letter obtained by Mashable.

Issa made the request in a Jan. 3 letter to FTC Investigator General Scott Wilson. Ongoing FTC investigations are legally private. However, information about the Google investigation was reported in several media outlets, among them Reuters, Politico and Bloomberg, well before the FTC made those details public Thursday.

The sources for those early reports were kept confidential. The FTC is legally prohibited from sharing investigation details with the media or public before a probe is complete.

When asked for comment, an FTC spokesperson told Mashable only that the Commission has "received the letter." Mashable has also reached out to Google for comment, and will update this post with any response.

"Throughout the process, nonpublic information about developments in the investigation has been inappropriately shared with the media," reads Issa's letter to Wilson.

"It is believed that the Commission may be contributing to, or is the source of, this information," continues the letter. "This is of concern because such leaks are prohibited by law and counterproductive to the investigative process. To determine whether the Commission, or its staff, has shared nonpublic information with the public or the press about the investigation of Google, I request the Office of Inspector General promptly investigate the matter."

Senators Ron Wyden (D-Ore.) and John Kerry (D-Mass.) have also previously claimed that details of the FTC's investigation to Google were inappropriately shared with the media.

SEE ALSO: Google Settles FTC Antitrust Case, Makes Minor Changes to Search and Ads

The FTC investigation of Google ended last week with the Commission clearing Google of anti-competitive behavior in regards to search. As a result of a separate investigation, Google voluntarily decided to license standards-essential mobile technology patents, allow advertisers to run cross-platform campaigns and allow websites to opt out of having their content scraped by search.

Across the Atlantic, the European Union's investigation of Google's search practices is still ongoing.

Issa's full letter to Wilson is embedded below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  Superzoom cameras  point-and-shoot models that have incredible magnification  have become a mini category unto themselves over the past couple of years, and Fujifim wants to be the big fish in that pond. With the FinePix SL1000, it takes the superzoom to a new level with an optical zoom that goes up to 50x.

A 24-1200mm lens has some serious zoom power, but it's only practical if the camera also has equally impressive image stabilization, and Fuji promises exactly that. The Fujinon zoom lens has a brand-new optical stabilization system that's said to reduce the blur for those extreme close-ups.

As most point-and-shoot owners know, sometimes it's irritating that the zoom control is built into the bezel around the shutter button, since you have to move your trigger finger off the zoom before you can actually snap the photo, which can ruin the shot at extreme magnification. The SL1000 addresses this problem by building a secondary zoom control on the lens barrel, letting a shooter keep a finger on the shutter.

You can also get even closer to your subject, albeit virtually, with the digital zoom, which can "intelligently" increase the zoom to 100x. Of course, if you're that far away, just write.

How does the lens get so much magnification? It's made up of 17 elements in 12 groups, Fuji says, and it also "combines aspherical and ED elements for reduced aberration and superior image quality." All that optical tech doesn't just help with zooming, either  for macro photography, it can supposedly snap clear pics of subjects as close as 0.39 inches. The aperture ranges from f2.9-5.6.

As a point-and-shoot, the SL1000 has does pretty well: The BSI-CMOS sensor can take photos up to 16 megapixels, with an ISO rating that goes as high as 12,800 for low-light situations. Autofocus is said to be as quick as 0.2 seconds, and it can shoot up to 10 photos per second at full resolution.

The camera also includes a 3-inch tilting LCD, manual controls and a bunch of Instagram-like filters to spice up your pics. It costs $399.95 and will be available in March.
--------------------------------------------------------------
On her first day back to work following a concussion and blood clot, Hillary Clinton's coworkers gave her a bit of a gag gift  a football helmet.

Clinton, 65, was presented with the helmet, along with a matching jersey, during a morning meeting. Both sport official State Department insignia.

The Secretary of State was away from Washington for about a month after suffering a stomach virus then a concussion which led to a blood clot near her brain. Clinton was hospitalized for three days at New York-Presbyterian Hospital Columbia when doctors first discovered the clot on Dec. 30.

SEE ALSO: Yes, Secretary Clinton Submitted Her Own 'Text From Hillary'
--------------------------------------------------------------
HTC's losing streak continued on Monday as its fourth-quarter profit fell 91% thanks to poor sales in the U.S. market.

The company posted a 4Q net profit of $34.4 million, its lowest since 2004, but still beating analysts' predictions of a $23 million net profit.

HTC's third-quarter profit had also fallen 79%; this is the company's fifth consecutive quarter with lower profits. The company is suffering a reverse in fortune that began in Q4 2011. Prior to that, HTC had several quarters of strong growth and record profits.

HTC's dwindling share of the smartphone market prompted the shortfall. The company's global share for the devices was 4% in the third quarter of 2012 vs. 10.3% for the comparable period in 2011, according to IDC. Competitors like Samsung (31.3%) and Apple (15%) stole HTC's market share.

Revenues for the quarter also fell 41% to $2 billion vs. the year-ago period.

HTC launched its Japan-only Butterfly smartphone in the fourth quarter. The model sports a 5-inch screen, which the company says will migrate to other models that are available in other countries. However, as Samsung and Nokia plan new smartphone launches in Q1, analysts predict a tough quarter.

Still, Chief Executive Peter Chou told The WSJ that he has reasons to be optimistic: "The worst for HTC has probably passed," Chou said. "2013 won't be too bad."
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  Chinese manufacturer Huawei announced at the 2013 International CES the Ascend D2 smartphone and the 6.1 inch-Ascend Mate smartphone-tablet hybrid.

The news comes just a few days after leaked images of the devices popped up online.

First up is the mammoth Ascend Mate  which will go up against the Samsung Galaxy Note II  features a quad-core 1.5GHz processor and a 4050mAH battery. The display has a resolution of 1280 x 720 pixels. Under the hood, the Ascend Mate runs Android 4.1.

It's also gargantuan at 6.1-inches.

Meanwhile, the Ascend D2 is Huawei's chance at taking on the superphone market. The Ascend D2 has a 5-inch full HD display with a resolution of 1920x1080 pixels. That gives it the same pixel density as the HTC's Droid DNA on Verizon.

Like it's bigger sibling, the Ascend D2 runs on Android 4.1 and has a quad-core 1.5GHz processor. In addition to a 13-megapixel backside illuminated camera and a 3000mAh battery, the Ascend D2 was built to be water resistent. Huawei demonstrated its ability to work under wet conditions by throwing water on the device during the press conference.

We don't have any word on price or country availability of these devices but it looks like Huawei will start shipping soon. With any luck, 2013 will be Huawei's year to break out into the mainstream.

Is a 6.1-inch smartphone too big or is it just the right size? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  Popular digital radio service iHeartRadio rolled out a new iPhone and PC update on Monday at the 2013 International CES, giving users a way to create stations based on moods and activities, such as working out or driving to work.

In addition to creating custom stations based on artists and songs or tuning in to its 1,500 live radio channels, users can now search through thousands of new options with a tool called Perfect For  as in, searching for music "perfect for" chilling out, cleaning the house and studying.

SEE ALSO: iHeartRadio Hits 10 Million Users Faster Than Facebook or Twitter

Here's how it works: After accessing the latest version of iHeartRadio on your iPhone or PC and selecting the new "Perfect For" tab, the platform presents a menu of moods and activities based on the day and time. This means users will see a different collection of stations in the morning  such as "perfect for" waking up  and might see "caffeinated country" later in the day. When a user picks a mood or activity, several genres or themes appear, including quirky ones such as "Took My Wife, Took My Dog: Country's Greatest Break-up Music" and "Skinny Jeans: Boys with Guitars."

More stations will be added each day, the company said.

iHeartRadio also introduced an alarm clock to compliment its previously launched Sleep Timer, which allows users to fall asleep and wake up to radio stations of their choice.

Although the "perfect for" feature is only available for the iPhone right now, iHeartRadio told Mashable it's working on making it available on other mobile and tablet devices soon.

"The feature will initially be available for iPhones and PCs, but when users sign in on these devices they can save 'Perfect For' channels in their 'My Stations' and access them via any device where iHeartRadio is available," said Brian Lakamp, president of digital at Clear Channel.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  What will laptops look like a year from now? Intel knows, and the chip manufacturer gave the world a sneak peek at CES 2013 today with its reference PC design for the next generation of Core processors.

The laptop, codenamed "North Cape," isn't a real product; it's a machine that Intel's built to both test and showcase the capabilities of the Fourth Generation of Core processors (codenamed "Haswell"). Haswell chips are scheduled for general release midyear.

Intel had a few of the reference laptops at its press conference here in Vegas, and we got a little hands-on time with them. It's an impressively light device  noticeably easier to hold than like-sized laptops of today like the Lenovo Yoga. The screen is 13.3 inches, but not all the time.

What's that, you ask? The screen size changes? Indeed it does: North Cape is also a convertible, with the monitor able to detach from the keyboard to become a tablet that's just 0.39 inch thick. However, the 13.3-inch screen runs almost to the edge of the bezel, not leaving much room for thumbs. But with the press of a button, the laptop scales the display down to an 11-inch size. That's new.

North Cape's biggest improvement over the previous generation of machines will be battery life. Intel says that the jump in battery life between the current Core 3 machines and Core 4 will be the largest in the company's history. The reference laptop is said to get up to 13 hours of battery life while docked (there are batteries in both the keyboard and tablet/monitor).

The extended battery life is a consequence of Intel's aggressive move to increase the efficiency of its chips as it changes the architecture. Chips in Ultrabooks that debuted last year consume about 17 watts, though Intel recently shrunk that down to 7 watts for some Core 3 designs, such as the Lenovo Yoga 11S. Haswell will bring it down even further.

Ports on the back include a pair of USB 3.0 ports, an HDMI jack and a proprietary power port.

How do you like the North Cape? And how much do you want that impressive battery performance? Share your reactions in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  Consumer-grade Pulse Oximeters (or Pulsometers) are nothing new, but turning your iPhone into one is something different. With the addition of a special fingertip reader, Masimo's new iSpO2 does exactly that.

The $249 device, introduced here at CES 2013, is Masimo's first consumer product and is so easy to use you might image you too could be a doctor. You plug the reader into any iPhone, iPod or iPad that still has a 30-pin port, connect the reader to the tip of your ring finger and the device and accompanying software does the rest.

Within a few moments, you get a live, graphic readout of your pulse rate, perfusion index and blood oxygenation. The app keeps track of all your readings, offering up graphs depicting your trends over time. You can even export the data in a CSV file.

The fingertip reader works, by the way, by shining LED lights through your fingertip. Sensors on the other side read a variety of light wavelengths to come up with your health stats.

What do all those readings mean? You probably have to be a doctor or have a medical book handy to really know. On the other hand, extreme athletes like bike racers might be able to use the iSpO2 to track their blood oxygenation levels.

What do you think? Would you pay almost $250 for your own home health measurement device? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Whether you're unemployed, underemployed or just looking for something a bit more interesting, Mashable Job Board is full of listings to take your career to the next level.

Since 2005, Mashable has been committed to bringing the top digital, social and tech news and resources to our readers. Over time, we've built a readership of 20 million people who are well versed in digital trends, social media and all the hottest technologies. So when the world's best companies are looking to fill open positions, they post them on the Mashable Job Board. New jobs are added every day, and many positions are exclusive  employers know that if they're going to find the right person for the job, they're going to find them reading Mashable.

Below, we've rounded up five recently posted jobs; check the Mashable Job Board daily for more open positions, and be sure to read our Job Search Series for tips on how to land your dream job.

"We're looking for a product manager with an expert UX background who can own the design direction at Contently. As a growing platform powering the next generation of the world's media companies, we have increasingly interesting design needs, primarily user experience/interaction design. We need you to own the process of addressing those needs, and help us crush it! You'll be working with our product team, who, aside from being amazing hackers, will constantly keep you up to date on hilarious shit on the Internet."

"Edelman Digital is in search of a senior-level digital and social media professional to join our Los Angeles team with experience in video games and gaming launches. This is an exciting opportunity to help shape the direction of some of the worlds biggest entertainment franchises."

"Edelman Digital is the world's first and largest global social agency. We leverage the industrys best talent, combining insight driven business strategy, creative problem solving and flawless execution. This leads to measurable results for our clients and tangible value for their stakeholders."

"Founded in 1956, Tai Ping Carpets is an international custom carpet and rug company that designs and manufactures floor coverings for luxurious and prestigious interiors. Based in Hong Kong, Tai Ping Carpets operates flagship showrooms in New York City and Paris, as well as proprietary factories, design studios, and showrooms in 100 countries."

"Tai Ping Carpets has an immediate opening in our New York office for a PR & Marketing Specialist. We seek a highly motivated communications and marketing professional for our growing, fast-paced communications team, responsible for coordinating global PR and communications activities, hospitality division PR management as well as marketing support. The position reports to the Digital Marketing Manager."

"We're looking for a Manager of Community Engagement & Content Strategy to join our ranks. An individual deeply ingrained in media culture, pull-not-push marketing and the dynamics of on- and off-line community-building. This individual will play a critical role at Ketchum, helping clients monitor and interact with enthusiast communities; playing an active role in business development; helping develop and evangelize a company-wide perspective on the use of emerging media; and building new content, products and services for the agency. In other words, the ideal candidate is someone who thrives on working in a highly visible, brain-bending, massively multitasking capacity at the cutting edge where communications and technology come together."

"Weber Shandwick leads the digital change for organizations around the world. We operate one of the largest digital and social media agency networks globally and work with some of the most iconic brands in the business. Weber Shandwicks Digital practice helps clients understand, apply and benefit from digital, social and emerging media in measurable ways. The group consists of more than 300 digital and social media specialists embedded in 34 offices around the world."

Check out these and other jobs on Mashable's Job Board. New positions are added every day, ranging from entry-level to C-suite positions.
--------------------------------------------------------------
New year, new job? In our new Dream Job series, Mashable will take you behind the scenes at five hot startups, and we'll give you the scoop on how to land a job there, what positions are available, what kind of people they're looking for and what the culture is like.

First up is Spotify, the digital music streaming service that launched in Sweden in 2008. The company has 700 employees across the globe, with 150 based in New York City. These Spotifiers work hard (and play hard) to supply a nearly endless stream of music to more than 20 million subscribers in 17 countries, and the platform's upcoming changes to music discovery will improve the user experience, and usher in a new era for the startup.

Mashable spoke with Alexandra Cohen, Technical Recruiter at Spotify, to get the low-down on how to score a job there.

The Openings: There are a number of open positions within the Tech, Product, Operations, Sales, Marketing and Analytics Teams. Spotify has offices all over the world and is headquartered in Stockholm, Sweden, and the Chelsea neighborhood of New York, where the company is doing most of its hiring. There are open sales positions in L.A., Chicago and the new San Francisco office (where there are also open positions in engineering and corporate roles). You can browse all open jobs here, and stay in the loop with frequent updates on the Spotify Jobs Facebook Page. Applicants can submit their resumes directly on the site or through third-party postings on LinkedIn, Github or Stack Overflow.





A selection of the open positions in Spotify's New York office

If you're applying for a tech position, and the Spotify team likes what they see on your resume, you'll be contacted for a phone or Skype interview with an engineer. Then you'll have a half-day of on-site interviews (three hourlong meetings with engineers, and lunch with an engineer). Depending on the position, you may have to complete a coding challenge at home before arriving onsite.

If you're applying to work on the business side, you can expect one or two phone interviews and two or three hours of onsite interviews.

The ideal candidate: "We are looking for motivated, passionate people who want to accept the mission of helping people find the right music for every moment."

 

Perks of the Job: "Private live concerts in the office, all new employees get to go to intro days in Stockholm, catered lunches on Fridays, fully stocked kitchen, ping pong and video games in the office, free concert tickets, gym membership and commuter discounts."

 



Company Culture: "It is a work hard, play hard type of environment filled with tons of energy (thanks to the constant supply of gourmet coffee and Red Bull) and a casual dress code. We have even tried to implement formal Fridays so employees have a chance to wear all their nice work clothes they used to wear at their old jobs."

Travel: "Since we are a global company, you may have the opportunity to visit the two main offices in Sweden, or travel to any of our other offices around the world."

The best part about working here is:

When I started working here, I was surprised by...
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  Robot dreams are built one-piece-at-a-time. That is if you're one of the many fans of LEGO's Mindstorms Robot Building Kits. Launched in 1998, the kid-friendly, DIY set has a legion of fans ranging from the enterprising 10-year-old, to University-level researchers. Now the popular robot playground is getting its biggest update in six years with the new LEGO Mindstorms EV3.

Unveiled at CES 2013, the new robot building kit, which coincides with Mindstorm's 15th anniversary, includes 601 LEGO pieces, sensors, programming software and, at its heart, a programmable "brick" that always sits, figuratively and literally, at the center of any LEGO Mindstorms project. It, along with virtually everything else in the kit, has been upgraded. For example, there's now more feedback on the black-and-white LCD screen.

Young robot builders can actually do all their programming on the brick. Running Linux, the brick (and therefore the robots you build) is also totally hackable. It also features a micro SD card slot for additional memory and a USB port for, well, LEGO doesn't know what people will do with it. However, since the Mindstorms EV3 brick does not include Wi-Fi, some robot builders might use it to add a Wi-Fi USB dongle.

As before, sensors plug directly into the brick, including the new IR robot eyes that react to interaction and can be used to follow the new remote control.

LEGO still provides powerful, object-based programming software that you run on your PC, but Mindstorms EV3 will also let young programmers control their robots via freely downloadable smart phone and tablet-based games and apps. We test-drove a prototype Android based app that let us control snake-like robot by moving the phone around. Tipping the phone back and forth controlled forward and backward movement, a shake make the bot shake and a forward thrust made the snakebot lunch forward and try to bite you (very entertaining)., In other words, young programmers will be able to use their smart device's innate capabilities, like the accelerometer , to create unique and entertaining interactions with their robot creations.

Most of the Mindstorms robot creations have undergone a makeover as well. The kits has always featured a humanoid "hero" robot, but the new Everstorm has a sleeker, more complex look. In fact all the robots are a tad more anthropomorphic and also more playful. LEGO execs tell us that children see robots not as objects, but as extensions of themselves, things with personalities, and the new looks are an outgrowth of that child-like perspective.

As always LEGO Mindstorms will come with lots of guidance to help young roboticists build their first robot, including a new iPad-based, interactive 3D-model building guide that LEGO created with Autodesk. It shows pieces in three dimensions, lets you spin them around and zoom in and out with your fingers and then can, via onscreen animations, show you exactly where each piece is supposed to go.

The kit, which includes instructions for building five different robots (you can download an additional 12 plans for free), ships this summer and will list for $349.99.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  LG announced that its high-end WRGB OLED TV is making its way to the United States.

Ever since HDTVs reached the majority of U.S. households, TV manufacturers have searched for new ways to get those big margins back on the models they sell. It didn't work with 3D, so now they're looking to new technologies to help them out. LG has high hopes for high prices in OLED displays, and it just set a big price on its 55-inch model.

The set will cost $12,000 when it becomes available in March this year. That's pretty steep  especially considering the set is a 1080p display and not one of the newer Ultra HD 4K TVs.

However, the OLED set brings to the table the technology's super-slim profile (it's extremely thin for a 55-inch set) as well as impressive brightness, which produces eye-popping color. We saw the set in the flesh at LG's press conference at CES 2013, and there's no question it produces an incredible picture.

Is it $12,000 of incredible, though? You tell us. Would you pay that much for a TV, even if it was the most lifelike picture ever? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Lionel Messi isn't just the world's greatest soccer player, he's also something of an interesting fashion case.

From the polka-dot suit he donned on Monday to accept his fourth Ballon d'Or to the floppy Beatles-esque haircut he rocked in his earlier days to his frequent resemblance of a teenage skater, the Argentine goal machine keeps us entertained with more than just his on-field heroics.

SEE ALSO: Messi's Year of Dominance: Watch All 91 Goals in One Epic Mashup

Buckle your Gucci seatbelt and take a ride through some of Messi's greatest fashion triumphs below.

1. The 'When You Score 91 Goals in a Calendar Year, You Can Wear Whatever You Damn Well Please' Look

Messi was resplendent in this reverse-dalmatian polka-dot number when accepting the Ballon d'Or on Monday, sparking plenty of chatter and snide comments on Twitter. But when you score goals at the record-setting rate he did in 2012, you've pretty much earned the right to do whatever you want. (Getty Images/AFP/Fabrice Coffrini)

In part because he stands just 5-foot-7, Messi often ends up looking like a well-built, hyper-focused middle schooler. He and his FC Barcelona teammates wore these T-shirts in 2011 to honor ailing teammate Eric Abidal, but no one pulled it off quite like Lionel. (Getty Images/AFP/Josep Lago)

This is what Messi wore to the pre-Ballon d'Or ceremony press conference for award nominees on Monday. We're not quite sure what's going on here  it's sort of a hybrid hoodie/outdoor-wear/knit deal, and he seems to sporting a deep-V white tee underneath. Whatever this is, it's safe to say the polka-dot suit he changed in to later was an upgrade. (Getty Images/Getty Images Sport/Christof Koepsel)

This was Messi's look at the 2010 World Cup in South Africa, calling to mind the style of four young Liverpool lads back in the 1960s. The Flea's on-field wizardry was all the more magical when he was flummoxing defenders with this shaggy 'do instead of the more conservative coif he sports today. (Getty Images/Getty Images Sport/Richard Heathcote)

5. The 'Straight Up Speedo' Look

Yes, we totally get that the Speedo is an accepted form of male swimming attire outside the United States. But for us here in the U.S., it's still a goofy way to roll  especially, for some reason, when you're Lionel Messi. This is our hero relaxing in Rio de Janeiro with then-girlfriend and now-wife Antonella Roccuzzo in 2010. (Getty Images/AFP)

6. The 'School You With My Eyes Closed' Look

Messi's fashion innovations extend to the pitch itself, too  here he finds a new way to wear his Barca colors. Or perhaps, for (arguably) the greatest player of all time, having full visibility just makes the game a little too easy. (Getty Images/AFP/Lluis Gene)

But Messi's outstanding fashion moments don't end here. For example, he also apparently loves wearing this one pair of ripped, acid-washed jeans.

Of course, while Messi has exerted four years of player-of-the-year dominance over rival Cristiano Ronaldo, this photo of a murse-wielding CR7 proves that Messi still does have some work to do when it comes to bizarre fashion choices.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Put on your interior designer hat, and pin the connected living room of your dreams! For Mashable's first Pinterest contest, we want you to create a board filled with things you want in your ultimate living room.

Create your "Connected Living Room" Pinterest board and "decorate" it with the coolest furnishings you can find online. Search out the most luxurious sofa or the most high-tech fireplace, and get to pinning! You could win one of three brand new gadgets, including the new 47" LG Google TV. (Full list of prizes below)

In addition to winning one of these prizes, your board could also be featured in a follow-up story on Mashable. We will also repin standout entry pins from Mashable's Pinterest account. Be sure to read the official contest rules here.

When building your board, be creative! Think of all the different elements that would make up your perfect living room (including decor, wall color and possibly even pets!). Make sure your board is public, and not set to secret. Click the image below, then complete the steps to enter.

The entry pins can be found on Mashable's Connected Living Room Pinterest Board.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Livio Connect introduced freemium pricing for app developers at the 2013 International CES in an effort to expand beyond music apps for 2013 and the future.

"Going freemium was an easy decision for us," Livio founder and CEO Jake Sigal said during a news conference at the show. "Our new model allows us to work with app developers of any and every size, at a price they can afford. As their automotive business grows, we participate in their success.

Sigal said the 2013 additions to the network will expand the in-vehicle infotainment offerings beyond music apps like Pandora and Spotify to include traffic, parking, weather and navigation.

Sigal said people want to be able to use apps in their car and, while vehicles today have infotainment, if it's not what you enjoy using, it's useless. "Consumers want to bring their phones into cars," he told Mashable, "we just want to find a safe way to bring that in."

When asked about the safety of using apps  and phones  in cars, Sigal said their job is to "provide the tools to allow OEMs to control the experience for the consumer while maintaining the branded presence of your favorite apps with your favorite buttons and favorite commands."

In other words, he said, "I don't expect to see Angry Birds anytime soon in the vehicle, and you might Facebook yourself into a tree if you're driving down the road but I think we're offering a safe way for OEM's to have control over safety."

Livio Connect also showed off the new FM Connect, which enables in-car FM radio listeners to gain an enhanced experience through a Bluetooth-connected smartphone.

What type of apps would you like to use in your car? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  If you struggle with editing videos, then an app called Magisto might be just what you're looking for.

Available for iOS and Android as well as on the web, the app takes your videos and edits them automatically, creating high-quality movies you can then turn around and share with friends or family, or upload to the web to share with the masses.

There are plenty of apps that help the average user create professional looking photos, but nothing has done that for video, said Oren Boiman, CEO of Magisto. He said, "We dove deep into the art of editing and production and given people the ability to truly tell their stories. We've fully automated and simplified an extremely sophisticated process to a few clicks, and believe this will solve for what's missing in social video today."

At CES 2013, Magisto announced a new group feature for sharing videos, video albums, and themes. The company also announced an updated algorithm for automatically editing videos, and completely overhauled its website design to make editing easier.

The updated algorithm uses artificial intelligence to analyze what's going on in your video and make edits in the right place. Magisto understands what's going in the video, picks the best parts of your video, and then edits them together to create the perfect completed project.

Users can choose from themes ranging from Gangnam Style to Warm & Fuzzy to set the tone for their finished product, and can add a title, special effects or soundtrack. Magisto's algorithm takes into account the theme you've chosen for your movie, and adjusts its editing style accordingly.

The Groups feature in the app allows you to select with whom you share your finished videos. For instance, you might drop a finished video of your child's birthday party in the Family group to share with your immediate family, and video of your last skiing adventure in a Ski Friends group containing just your friends who love hitting the slopes.

Magisto originally launched in late 2011, and was the winner of the 2012 CES Mobile Apps Showdown. The app plans to introduce additional features in the coming months, including collaborative storytelling where several users can contribute to the same finished movie, and support for TVs and other connected devices.

Magisto is part of a growing number of apps designed to edit videos on the fly. For instance, an app called Vyclone geo-locates videos shot on mobile phones, and auto-edits those clips together. Another app, Strum, edits 15-second video clips, adding a video filter and custom soundtrack to those clips based on a particular theme.

Would you use an app like Magisto to automatically edit your videos? Let us know what you think about the app in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Tommy Edison is blind but still enjoys using the photo editing and sharing app, Instagram.

"It's kinda fun for me, I've never had a camera before," he says in a YouTube video.

In the video, Edison explains how he uses Instagram to capture, edit, caption and share images he takes with Instagram. Even though he can't see the images, Edison says he's received some interesting comments on the ones he's posted.

Using the "accessibility" feature on his iPhone, Edison can make it so Siri reads aloud everything he touches  from apps to filters to sharing things on social networks. This makes iPhones accessible for visually impaired individuals. He captions the images by using speech recognition.

Not all of the images he takes turn out well, but commenters let him know what they're looking at in the comments. Plus, Edison seems to enjoy sharing snapshots of his daily life.

You can check out Edison's Instagram feed a blindfilmcritic.

In addition to being Instagram-savvy, Edison also has a YouTube channel in which he talks about "the fun parts of being blind" and explains how he cooks for himself and other things.

There are a number of other apps for blind people. One handy app can identify what denomination of currency you're holding, to prevent being ripped-off. Another app uses Foursquare data to help visually impaired people navigate the streets.
--------------------------------------------------------------
John McAfee has spent the last few weeks first as a fugitive, blogging about it  even from jail  and then getting caught because two reporters revealed his location when they uploaded a picture to gloat that they were with him. He was finally extradited to the U.S. before Christmas.

But if you thought his bizarre and crazy story was over, you were wrong. The founder of the eponymous antivirus company now claims that he spied on Belize authorities with laptops infected with malware and a bunch of women and men, hired to be his personal spies. Allegedly, this complex operation led him to uncover an international plan to smuggle terrorists into the U.S.

Unbelievable right? That might be because it's all a bunch of lies. In fact, practically everything McAfee wrote in his blog post is unverifiable.

And McAfee himself hasn't been exactly trustworthy since he went into hiding after the Belize police came looking to question him about his neighbors' death. For example, when two Vice reporters mistakenly uploaded a picture that revealed his location in Guatemala, McAfee said that actually he had forged that information himself, claiming he was safely hiding somewhere else. That turned out to be a lie.

His latest story started in May, when the Belize police raided McAfee's house, searching for drugs and firearms and arresting him for a few hours. In the end, no charges were brought against him but, according to McAfee, he didn't receive any apologies either. And that's when he decided to take the matter into his own hands and retaliate. "I had asked for a simple apology and had received none," he wrote in the post. "I was pissed. They had shot my dog, destroyed my property and stolen hundreds of thousands of dollars worth of things that I valued. They have still not been returned."

Revenge wasn't his only motive though, he himself isn't sure what his motive was. "Much of my life is a mystery to me. Suffice it to say: I just did it because I could."

McAfee explains that he bought the laptops, installed "invisible keystroke logging software" on them and started giving them away "to select people" like "government employees, police officers, Cabinet Minister's assistants, girlfriends of powerful men, boyfriends of powerful women." The malware was designed to record everything these people typed on the laptops and send it back to McAfee. This way, McAfee claims he found out people's passwords to their Facebook accounts, emails and any other private account they might have accessed.

For all this sophisticated spying enterprise to work, McAfee needed help. That's why he initially hired four people to monitor the text files containing the key logs that the computers were automatically sending back. Then, to take the spying to a whole another level, he hired 23 women and six men to be his "operatives."

"These men and women were given simple training on how to access and load software on someone's computer while they slept, or ate or made long phone calls etc," McAfee writes. Basically, they became his spy honey traps. And, according to him, they were pretty good at it too. So good, in fact, that eight of those 23 women ended up living with him to work closely with him. And one of them even tried to kill him because she was a double agent. McAfee doesn't bother explaining more about that though. Maybe in his next blog post.

 

McAfee goes on to claim another spying achievement thanks to his operatives, who were armed with "software, presents, a story, a seductive smile and a small voice recorder." Thanks to them he allegedly infiltrated two phone companies and tapped his targets' phones, listening to their calls.

SEE ALSO: John McAfee's Exploits Hurt the McAfee Brand, Study Says

What did all this spying lead to? Initially, nothing surprising: "uncountable numbers of sexual affairs  embarrassingly lurid and intimate chats," and, you know, the usual proof of human trafficking, which McAfee dismisses as "uninteresting old news."

That's not all, though. In what might be the most outlandish detail in an already bizarre story, McAfee then claims he discovered that many alleged male prostitutes being smuggled into the country and given Belize passports were actually Lebanese terrorists.

McAfee then vaguely describes an international plan to smuggle the prostitute/terrorists into the U.S. through Belize and Nicaragua. And in a made-for-tv cliffhanger, he also promises to give us more details about it soon. In the meantime, he will take "a well-earned vacation into the heartland of the Midwest," where he can blend with ranchers and cowboys who, according to McAfee, "are a sympathetic lot."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Lionel Messi, the Argentine scoring maestro who plays club soccer for Spanish powerhouse FC Barcelona, is poised to win his fourth straight Ballon d'Or trophy on Monday. That will recognize him yet again as the world's best human at playing its most popular sport. If he does take home the trophy, the lion's share of that credit will go to his record-breaking 91 goals scored in 2012  breaking a 40-year-old mark held by German goal factory Gerd Muller.

SEE ALSO: Michael Jordan or Kobe Bryant? YouTube Mashup Shows Uncanny Symmetry [VIDEO]



But which of Messi's 91 scoring strikes was the sweetest? Here, presented in one 10-minute supercut by YouTube user HeilRJ03 is the whole entire collection. The video is, of course, a hit with soccer fans the world over and been viewed more than 1.6 million times since being uploaded just before Christmas.

Check it out above to review Messi's historic year and hold your own during this week's watercooler sports talk. In the comments, let us know which goals impressed you most.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  Monster, the company that launched the super popular Beats by Dr. Dre headphone, announced on Monday it is getting into the gaming accessories market, and its first foray is a good one.

The company revealed at CES in Las Vegas a set of headphones in partnership with gaming developer EA Sports and its parent company Electronics Arts. The announcement was made with the help of Sugar Ray Leonard, Monster's gaming advocate.

"This was a natural branding extension for us... to deliver great quality for our consumers," said Chris Erb, VP of marketing for EA Sports.

The EA Sports MVP Carbon headphones ($269.95)  which will be available in black and white with an EA Sports logo on the sides  may be one of the many audio accessory companies marketing headphones to gamers these days, but the partnership with such a major gaming developer is rare.

SEE ALSO: 5 Big Trends You'll See at CES 2013

The headphones incorporate Monster's Gamebox mix amplifier and processor, which make it compatible with PCs, Xbox 360, PlayStation3, Wii and Wii U. It also features on-ear form factor and size, and foldable arms that make it easy to toss into a bag and go.

Gaming headphones are different than typical music-centric ones to help gamers differentiate between layers of sound, from background music to coins collected and ammunition fired.

 

The headphones will start shipping in February.

NFL player also welcomed Drew Brees to the stage as its new brand advocate for iSport, an in-ear headphone that doesn't actually go in your ear.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Audio giant Monster announced at the 2013 International Consumer Electronics Show in Las Vegas on Monday a Bluetooth-enabled speaker system called the Katana.

During a star-studded press conference, fetauring Tyson Beckford and NFL player Drew Brees, the company debuted the latest Bluetooth speaker to hit the event. Featuring AAC and apt-X, the device allows users to stream music throughout the home from tablets, laptops or MP3 players.

The company also unveiled a new line of headphones, as well as one for gaming with a partnership alongside EA Sports. It also revealed inspiration headbands, which allow users to attach spikes and feathers.

"I believe that in order to market in 2013 you have to have a combination of three elements  we call it a menage a trios," Monster CEO Noel Lee said during a press conference. "It's a fusion of fashion, entertainment/fashion and technology. We learned that from Beats. You will see this combination from us on steroids. This is the marketing that has to happen this year and beyond."
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  You know how it goes  you're camping and there's nowhere to charge your phone. Or maybe you're a university student who needs to plug in a laptop during class but you're too far away from an outlet on the wall. And let's not even get started with the airport, where outlets are almost always in use.

To put a plug in your pocket, portable power company Lilliputian launched at the 2013 International Consumer Electronics Show on Sunday a device called the Nectar, which can keep electronics running for about two weeks. Unlike typical backup batteries, it never needs to be plugged into a wall outlet. Plus, it eliminates the need to lug around cables and power adapters. Hello, business travelers.

SEE ALSO: Meet HAPIfork, the Smart Fork That Helps You Lose Weight

The $299 device  which will be sold exclusively at Brookstone starting in the summer  works with any device with a USB 2.0 (this means anything from a tablet and smartphone to digital cameras and Bluetooth headsets). But for the device to work, users must insert a Nectar power charge cardtridge ($10 each). When the power runs out, it can be tossed in a recycling bin and a new cartridge is needed. Although this is a setback  who wants to keep replenishing a cartridge stash  the overall concept trumps the setback.

In addition, the Nectar spokesperson said it will charge devices for about two weeks based on a typical charging session (about one hour to reach 100% power) one time each day, so the supply isn't unlimited during that time. But even still, this is a device we want with us on our next camping trip. Or next year at CES.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  If you thought chip makers only messed around with the insides of our gadgets, think again. Nvidia, the graphics-card and mobile-processor manufacturer, surprised a packed house at a nightclub at the Palms hotel in Vegas with Project Shield, a powerful Android game controller that packs the company's latest and greatest mobile chip, the Tegra 4.

Project Shield isn't a peripheral. It's a full game console unto itself, with a 5-inch retina display that folds up from the controls. It can connect to the Android ecosystem and Google Play store via Wi-Fi, and players can mirror what's onscreen to a TV either wirelessly or via HDMI.

It doesn't stop there. In addition to having access to Android's app catalog (including many Tegra-optimized games), Shield can access PC games from a computer on the network, then relay the gameplay to a TV. All the while, the user plays the game with the Shield.

The controller is packed with batteries for extended gameplay, a bass-reflex speaker for big sound and ports for HDMI and USB. The lid has an area for a custom tag.

There's no price or release date, and from the unveiling it's apparent the Shield isn't quite ready for prime time. While demo'ing the device, Nvidia CEO Jen-Hsun Huang failed to make an adequate PC link, although event staff were able to correct the problem after a few minutes. Huang also slipped at one point, saying the product was called "Project Thor," which he all but admitted was the name of another secret Nvidia project.

Still, the Shield is an impressive device, and it looks capable of taking the idea of mobile gaming to another level. What do you think of it? Share your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  Nvidia, the company that makes the mobile processors in many Android devices including the Google Nexus 7 tablet, today officially launched its next mobile chip, the Tegra 4.

The quad-core Tegra 4 is said to have six times the processing power of its predecessor, the Tegra 3. To show just how powerful the chip is, Nvidia CEO Jen-Hsun Huang demonstrated how a Tegra 4-powered devices could take photos with high dynamic range (HDR) in essentially real time, with no discernible delay between the multiple shots required to assemble the composite pics.

Huang also claimed the Tegra 4 had more processing power than even the iPad 4, which Mashable's own tests showed had an incredibly fast chip.

The Tegra 4 boasts similar energy efficiency as the Tegra 3 since it has the same architecture, with a fifth core that helps regulate energy use. With its power-efficient design, the Tegra 4 is said to enable up to 14 hours of video playback on smartphones.

The new Tegra is based on an ARM Cortex-A15 CPU design, and contains 72 individual Nvidia GeForce graphics cores. Huang demonstrated the chip's graphical powers by having a Tegra 4-powered device push 4K-resolution video to an Ultra HDTV.

One of the first Tegra 4-powered devices will actually be an Nvidia-designed and -made product, a handheld Android gaming controller called Project Shield. Now that the chip is official, expect more announcements from mobile manufacturers in the coming months.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Israeli elections are coming up on Jan. 22 and President Obama is tuning in to news station Shapam 95.5. At least, that's the conceit of this ad campaign for the radio station.

One, however, would think Obama had a better means of tuning in the station and that he wouldn't be listening on the front lawn of the White House with his dog Bo in tow. Another ad in the series from Y&R Israel (below) shows Iranian President Mahmoud Ahmadinejad listening to the station in his bathtub. Finally, there's Hezbollah leader Hassan Nasrallah, who is shown with his radio cradled next to his ear in his bombed-out office. All three ads contain the caption "When it's important to you to know what's really going on with the [Israeli] elections."
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  While there is no shortage of fitness devices on display here at the 2013 International CES, there is at least a new way to measure all the running, walking and calorie counting you do.

Omron's Activity Monitor tracks your activity and exercise data, and reveals your total calories burned throughout the day. It was shown Monday in a news conference at CES along with other new devices from Omron.

Randy Kellogg, vice president of marketing and product development at Omron HealthCare told Mashable these are designed to not be too complicated. He likens it to a set of training wheels. While people may eventually graduate to a Nike FuelBand or FitBit device, they can sometimes be too complicated for people who just want to get started.

"Everybody can walk 2,000 steps and track their activity," he said.

Consumers are looking for simple and social, according to Omron. Kellogg says women like to walk together, they like to share information so they added a social component through Ormonfitness.com.

The goal tracker helps you set targets and the monitor will let you know how much of what type of activity you need to do to reach those goals.

One feature we're not entirely sold on is an NFC communication tray (sold separately) that connects the tracker to your computer. It works with Mac and PC and wirelessly transfers the data so you can monitor your progress on omronfitness.com. We would much prefer to see a Bluetooth option which Kellogg says is an open option for the next version.

The Activity Monitor will cost $49.99 when it launches and the NFC tray will sell for $20.

Omron also introduced a Strapless Heart Rate Monitor, for those who don't like the feel of a chest strap when they work out. All your data, including target heart rate appears on a device you wear on your wrist. That will cost $149.99 and is expected to be out in the next month.

There's also a Tri-Axis USB Pedometer which will be available for around $45.

In the end, Kellogg says, it doesn't matter what kind of device you choose, as long as you get up and walk. It reduces stress and improves your health. You don't have to run a marathon, but you can find out how close you're getting to one.

What features do you look for in a fitness device? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Boy band One Direction, who won Most-Share Worthy Video at MTV's Video Music Awards for "What Makes You Beautiful," just unleashed a new music video to its legion of fans.

"Kiss You" arrived Monday after One Direction teased fans daily with a series of promo videos on YouTube. The buzz-building tactic  satisfying for some and annoying to others  has previously been employed by Matchbox 20, Britney Spears and other artists.

After its release, #KissYouOnVEVO became the top worldwide trending topic on Twitter.

SEE ALSO: One Direction Puts on Football Gear in Follow-Up to Viral Ad [PICS]

The video shows the X Factor UK alums dressed as sailors, skiers, surfers, prisoners and more. The teasers attracted nearly 8 million views on YouTube in five days.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  Panasonic today showed off a new vision of the second screen, introducing new ways your phone or tablet can interact with what you're watching on TV.

Part of the vision: a new accessory called the Touch Pen that lets you edit photos right on the screen, then immediately push them to a mobile device.

Last year Panasonic released Swipe and Share, a way to relay content from smartphone to TV and back; now it's launching version 2.0 of that software. Whereas before you could send content like a photo to your TV via a smartphone or tablet app, now you can interact with that content via the TV.

In the case of photos, you can actually edit them  which is where the Touch Pen comes in. Users can write notes or draw pictures on the screen with the Pen, assisted by a pull-down menu that appears when the pen touches the TV. Those edited pictures can then be pulled back down to any mobile device.

In addition Swipe and Share 2.0, Panasonic is enhancing its second-screen experience through partnerships with HSN, which has developed a app called Shop by Remote, which lets users get detailed product information and read customer reviews of whatever they're checking out on the channel.

Starting in the spring, Panasonic's 2013 smart TVs will also integrate YouTube's new second-screen experience, which lets you queue up YouTube videos for watching on TV as well as control the playback, all from your phone.

Finally, Panasonic has completely revamped the home screen of its smart TVs, putting all the different kinds of content (live TV, on-demand video, apps, etc.) all in one place. The interface features multiple user profiles, and it'll work with the TV's front-facing camera to recognize who's watching and call up their preferences.

How do you like Panasonic's new smart TV tricks and the Touch Pen: great stuff or meh? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  The Pantech Discover is on its way to AT&T. At CES Monday the carrier announced plans to start carrying the Android handset on January 11.

The 4.8-inch smartphone has a 1280x720 high-definition display, surround sound speakers, NFC functionality, and a 12.6-megapixel built-in digital camera capable of recording 1080p video at 30 frames per second. The phone will operate on AT&T's 4G LTE network.

Following in the footsteps of the Pantech Flex, which was released on AT&T in September, the phone will offer Pantech's Easy Experience mode, which makes interacting with Android easier for new users. Users can also opt to use the Standard Experience mode on the handset. Both modes  standard on the left and easy on the right  are shown in the photo below.

The Discover will also be the first smartphone from AT&T to come pre-loaded with AT&T's DriveMode application, an app that attempts to prevent texting and driving. Once set up, the app will auto-reply to messages that are sent while in a vehicle moving over 25mph, allowing drivers to let friends and family know theyre behind the wheel.

"AT&T is dedicated to educating customers about the dangers of texting while driving and providing real solutions to help prevent the behavior. With DriveMode pre-loaded on the Discover, we hope that users will be less likely to text and drive."

Calls that come while a user is driving can be automatically sent to voicemail. Users have the ability to turn that feature off, and can create an "allow list" of specific callers that will always get through while they're on the road.

The Pantech Discover will be available on January 11 for $49.99 with a new 2-year agreement.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Are tablets of today too fat and clunky for you? Meet PaperTab, a 10.7-inch tablet that's almost as thin  and flexible  as a sheet of paper.

Developed by Plastic Logic, PaperTab has a flexible touchscreen that lets users send files and emails and navigate through pages of documents using hand gestures. One can also combine several PaperTabs into one larger surface by placing them side by side, or share files by touching one tablet to another.

PaperTab is powered by an Intel i5 processor, which seems to be separate from the actual display and connected to the PaperTab with a thin data cable. We're unsure if this is the way the device is planned to work when finalized or it's just a prototype. We'll find out pretty soon, as Plastic Logic plans to reveal PaperTab to the press Tuesday at CES 2013.

"Plastic Logic's flexible plastic displays are completely transformational in terms of product interaction. They allow a natural human interaction with electronic paper, being lighter, thinner and more robust compared with todays standard glass-based displays," says Indro Mukerjee, CEO of Plastic Logic.

How do you like the idea of a flexible, paper-thin tablet? Share your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  When Apple debuted its Smart Cover for the iPad, which automatically shuts the tablet off when it's closed via magnets, many thought it was a brilliant idea. That apparently includes Philips, which brings the Smart Cover concept to its wireless Fidelio P8 speaker.

The P8 is built to deliver serious sound, with a pair of woofers and Philips' proprietary "wOOx" audio tech, which is said to make the bass pound even harder. But it impresses with how you silence it: Just fold its leather-like cover and the speaker goes into standby mode, killing the sound instantly.

The speaker also is equipped with a touch sensor, which shows how much juice is remaining in the lithium-ion battery  up to eight hours at full charge. It connects to your phone (or other source) via Bluetooth, but there's also an auxiliary input.

The P8 is coming in March for $199.99.

Would you like Philips' new speaker instead of a Jambox? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  Fans of surround sound detest the proliferation of single-speaker soundbars, but there's no question they're convenient. What if you could have the best of both worlds: a simple soundbar for your casual listening, but with removable surround speakers for when you want those immersive sound effects?

That's exactly what the Philips Fidelio soundbar is. At 46 inches long, it's one of the lengthier soundbars, but it gets a tad shorter when you detach the surround speakers from both sides. With the two speakers removed, the center unit retains the front, left and right channels. The surrounds are wireless, so no worries about tripping over cables.

Place on end tables or hung on your walls, the surround speakers have enough juice for about 10 hours of listening, and they start recharging the instant you put them back on the main unit.

SEE ALSO: 10 Smart Tips for Buying an HDTV

You can get the Fidelio soundbar with or without a separate subwoofer, which is also wireless (though obviously it, like the main unit, needs a power cord). Coming in May, they cost $799 with the sub (HTL9100) and $599 without (HTL7100). They're separate products, with different sound processing, so it'd be a bad idea to get the standalone unit and pair a sub later.

We love the idea of a soundbar that includes surrounds when you want 'em  perfect for apartments where space is limited.

How do you like the Fidelio soundbar? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Online music publication Pitchfork is launching Pitchfork Advance, a new content vertical allowing readers to listen to entire streams of new albums.

In line with the site's editorial vision, the albums will be carefully curated. For the inaugural week, Pitchfork will stream Fade by the New Jersey rock band Yo La Tengo and a reissue of Donuts by the late hip hop producer J Dilla.

Bands and record labels increasingly offer up streams of their albums in advance. Conventional wisdom suggests that in an age of rampant piracy, letting listeners sample music legitimately will curb illegal downloading, and in the case of rising acts, might even entice people to buy something that otherwise would have been off their radar.

Soundcloud and Bandcamp offer artists the opportunity to share music directly with their fans. For some a media partner offers increased visibility and legitimacy. NPR and AOL's Spinner, to name two, consistently offer sets of advance album streams.

With Pitchfork Advance, the site will try to offer an experience that exceeds the capabilities of other streaming platforms. Not unlike their series of Cover Stories, which explore the web as a storytelling platform, Pitchfork Advance hopes to turn album listening into a visual, interactive experience. "In most cases, the artwork we publish will come from the album's actual packaging, but there will be some other material that's created exclusively for Pitchfork Advance," said Pitchfork founder Ryan Schreiber. "We can do a lot more with this platform than just reproduce static images and text."

The Yo La Tengo stream, for example, is accompanied by a virtual "CD booklet" in the form of a stream of video loops.

"I've been surprised by the lack of innovation in digital album art over the last decade, especially because artists and labels are still designing elaborate packaging for physical releases," Schreiber said.

Though eventually the goal is for it to work on mobile, it's currently a desktop experience only. Perhaps this is most indicative of what Pitchfork wants you to do: Listen to albums, distraction-free.

The adherence to the album may seem old-school in the era of iTunes singles, but albums are still at the core of Pitchfork's world view. The site publishes five lengthy album reviews every weekday, and its yearly best albums list takes top billing amid its end-of-year coverage. Not surprisingly, many on Pitchfork staff are vinyl collectors - including Schreiber.

"Pitchfork Advance allows you to have an experience with the music that's immersive in the way that engaging with a vinyl LP would be," he said.

Does listening in advance help you decide to buy music? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  We love the Android-powered Samsung Galaxy Camera, but it is a point-and-shoot, so its ability to capture really eye-popping shots is limited. That's why we're excited the check out the Polaroid iM1836, the world's first Android-powered camera with an interchangeable lens, which makes its debut Monday at CES.

Built by Polaroid partner Sakar, the iM1836 runs Android 4.1 "Jelly Bean," theoretically making it capable of the same photo-sharing and editing tricks you can perform on the Galaxy Camera (or any Android 4.1 smartphone, really). It comes with a 10-30mm zoom lens, but of course you can swap that out for others. Polaroid says it's compatible with any Micro Four Thirds lens as long as you have an optional adapter.

The camera can take pictures up to 18 megapixels, and video up to 1080p. There's also an HDMI output for direct connection to a TV.

One big way Polaroid's Android camera differs from Samsung's: There's no option for a data plan. That means you'll be relying on either Wi-Fi or your smartphone to access the Internet, and it comes ready to tether (via Wi-Fi or Bluetooth).

The LCD touch screen in back measures 3.5 inches (quite a bit smaller than the Galaxy's beautiful 4.8-inch display) and it has a pop-up flash. Camera features include: auto blink detection, auto face exposure and panorama mode.

Coming in the first quarter of 2013, the iM1836 will cost $399.

We're eager to try out Polaroid's Android camera, though it has a tough act to follow in the Samsung Galaxy Camera. That device showcased Samsung's expertise in Android, with a beautiful interface for manual controls and many of the same picture-taking modes found on Samsung's smartphones.

What do you think? Is an Android camera with interchangeable lenses something you want? Or should the OS stick to point-and-shoots? Share your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  Charging your mobile device wirelessly via a chip embedded into a Starbucks table or resting it on a surface inside your car could become more commonplace in the next year or so, thanks to the latest backing of a larger effort to make wireless charging more a part of everyday life.

It was announced on Monday at the 2013 International Consumer Electronics Show in Las Vegas that 30 companies across the smartphone ecosystem are joining the Power Matters Alliance (PMA) organization, which consists of government leaders and major companies such as Starbucks, AT&T and Google working to get rid of cable-based charging plugs and embrace wireless power.

Smartphone case manufacturers such as Otterbox and chipset vendor Integrated Device Technology are among the new wave of companies backing the PMA, which was founded by Duracell's Powermat and its parent company Procter & Gamble and Powermat Technologies in March 2012.

SEE ALSO: Jay-Z Wants You to Put Your Phone Down to Charge It Up

"For wireless power to really transform our lives, a lot of things have to come together, from how companies make their products to public spaces deploying the right technology for charging," Daniel Schreiber, president of Powermat and Power Matters Alliance board member, told Mashable. "We are becoming so dependent on our mobile devices, and people want longer battery life. We want to tackle that issue, but we need manufacturers and companies to get on the same page."

With the most recent backing of Starbucks, Google and AT&T in October and existing support from Facebook, General Motors and Delta Airlines  which is already using wireless charging in its Sky Club lounges  more are looking to join in. In fact, after Starbucks announced it would introduce Duracell Powermat charging stations embedded into tables at 17 locations in Boston, PMA membership has skyrocketed, tripling in the past month alone.

"Eventually, we will reach a tipping point where it transforms from being cool to becoming an industry standard and expectation," Schreiber said.

Madison Square Garden has also embraced PMA wireless charging stations, as well as various salons, restaurants and airports across the U.S.

Among the new batch of companies joining include case makers Incipio and Skech, as well as APS Technologies, Diodes, Electric Power Research Institute (EPRI), Everpurse, Foxlink, IGRS China, Leyden Energy, Microsemi, Microtips Technology, Monolithic Power Systems, MxMedia, NXT health, NXP Semiconductors, ON Semiconductor, Silicon laboratories, Telegesis, TennRich International and World Fair International.

"Wireless cases will be important for promoting this lifestyle, and this is where accessory manufacturers come into play," Schreiber said. "Duracell also has portable batteries for wireless charging and there are WiCC wireless charging cards that are insertable and could become embeddable. This is the start of the future."

However, the PMA has had its share of competition from other groups such as Wireless Power Consortium, which supports the Qi standard. The WPC has backing from heavy hitters too, including hardware companies such as Samsung, Motorola and HTC. But the rapid member growth of the PMA from both small and large companies indicates we might see more wireless charging of this nature.

"It's really important to create an ecosystem we can all get behind," Schreiber said. "It hasn't happened yet, but it's our hope and expectation we will all get there."
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Internet's long communal nightmare may finally be ending. We now have hard data that proves rage comics are plummeting in popularity.

If you've never heard of rage comics, be thankful. The cartoons bubbled up out of imageboard 4chan in 2008 before spreading like a crudely drawn cancer to Reddit and humor sites 9GAG and FunnyJunk, then popular culture at large.

If you ever heard some use "le" or "derp" or "herp" or (shudder) "sexytime" in daily life, you can thank rage comics.

There are rage comic T-shirts. Teachers use them as instructional tools. You could even insert the images in Facebook chat.

The comics are essentially emoticons  a set of faces that represent common emotions and reactions  that users cobble together into stories using free "rage making" tools available online. That's not necessarily a recipe for intractable cultural sludge. In fact, there's something undeniably appealing about the creative democratization that rage comics represent, and there were some pretty funny examples of the form in its heyday.

Take this example of astounding banality that currently sits on top of the subreddit:

The problem? Since 2009, rage comics have had their very own home (r/fffffffuuuuuuuuuuuu) on Reddit, a site with the most ravenous hunger for new content on the planet. For three years Reddit's army of a half-million amateur cartoonists has worked nonstop, 24 hours a day, creating new comics at a breakneck speed.

Necessarily, what quality there was has plummeted over that time. If The Simpsons should have ended after, say, the twelfth season, rage comics should have died out after their twelfth week. Instead, they reproduced with the speed and ferocity of a bacterial colony.

But new data released by an r/fffffffuuuuuuuuuuuu moderator show the subreddit is in the midst of a long decline. From February to December of last year, visits to the subreddit dropped by more than half, from 2.2 million to 1 million. Pageviews have plummeted even more, from an astonishing 37 million in February to a relatively measly 8 million in December.

We aren't entirely sure why. It could be that a million people over the course of the last year just suddenly realized how awful rage comics had become. Or maybe, and more ominously, former rage comic aficionados have simply migrated elsewhere, to other forms of cheap, easy-to-produce entertainment.

Have you heard of animated GIFs, for instance? They're apparently all the rage nowadays.

This article originally published at The Daily Dot here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Addicted to browsing Reddit? You're not alone.

A new app called Reeddit, designed by coder Bernardo Baquero Stand, compiles all the goods from the social news site  links, images, comments  into one minimalist, read-only format for both web and mobile devices.

Reeddit lets you create a custom list of channels with up to three subreddits in each  similar to how you would customize a Twitter search using Tweetdeck.

SEE ALSO: 5 Fascinating Facts We Learned From Reddit Last Week

As of now Reeddit is "read-only," meaning users don't have the ability to upvote, downvote or leave comments on anything. Read more about it here.

Does this sound like something you'd use? Tell us what you think about it below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Roku has secured more channels for its smart TV boxes, bringing the streaming-entertainment company's offering to more than 700 channels since 2008.

Ahead of its appearance at CES in Las Vegas this week, Roku revealed Monday it has inked deals with a dozen video, gaming and music partners such as TWC TV, Blockbuster On Demand, FOX NOW, PBS, PBS KIDS, iHeartRadio and Big Fish Unlimited.

The biggest part of the news is for Time Warner Cable (TWC) subscribers. Later this quarter, TWC TV users can download an app that will provide them with 300 live TV channels directly from Roku. In effect, this turns into a second cable box.

This is similar to the deal Comcast's Xfinity and Verizon FiOS signed with the Xbox 360. It's also similar to what Cablevision offers its customers via its iOS and Kindle Fire Optimum Online app.

In effect, this is further blurring the line between content delivered over the air (OTA) and streamed over the top (OTT).

The channels will launch in the Roku Channel Store early this year.

Roku also announced new device partners for the Roku Streaming Stick, a product that allows people to easily update their existing smart TVs with Roku streaming content.

SEE ALSO: TV Shows and Movies With the Most-Engaged Fans on GetGlue

Nearly 5 million Roku players, which have streamed more than 1 billion hours of entertainment, have been sold in the U.S., Roku added.

Christina Warren contributed to the reporting in this article.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  2012 was a big year for Samsung, with a number of innovative product announcements and releases.

The company took the Android smartphone market by storm with the release of the Galaxy S III, and released the Galaxy Camera, a digital point-and-shoot camera that runs on Android.

So, what does the company have in store for 2013? You can bet there will be a ton of home theater products, including a number of televisions - maybe even a 4K TV, similar to the Ultra HD 4K TV shown off by Toshiba Sunday evening.

We could also potentially see a new smartphone or two, or even a new tablet.

Join Editor-in-Chief Lance Ulanoff and Reporter Emily Price at 2pm PT/ 5pm ET for a live blog documenting all the action.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  Samsung rolled out the world's largest 4K ultra-high definition TV (UHD TV) Monday at CES 2013, offering four times the resolution of 1080p high-definition displays.

Since there is hardly any 4K programming yet available, the Samsung UN85S9000 UHD TV uses a quad-core processor to upscale 1080p programs to its lofty resolution.

The UN85S9000 adds unique features such as voice interaction that lets you control it by speaking to it in complete sentences, and Smart View that lets you stream content from your mobile devices to the TV screen.

Perhaps the most remarkable feature announced for this product is its ability to link the TV with other Samsung smart home appliances. This feature will allow you to do gee-whiz things such as monitor your wash cycle (if you have a Samsung's smart home washing machine), or adjust your thermostat, all with an app that you can watch on screen without needing to pause the program you're viewing.

The TV helps you find programs with Samsung's S-recommendation lists, which the company says will let you browse through thumbnails of "suggested content."

Of course, those who might purchase this TV will be concerned about obsolescence of its internal processor and software, so Samsung included the smart evolution Connector, allowing users to upgrade as technology improves.

It's a highly capable TV with an impressive features list, but what was missing? Perhaps the most important thing: the availability date and a price.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  If you've ever argued over who watches what in your house, has Samsung got a TV for you. The company's 55-inch "Real" OLED TV is the first consumer television that literally lets two people watch two different shows simultaneously.

How does it do such a thing? With a special muti-view feature, which adapts 3D technology to display a different image to the viewer depending on whether they're sitting to the left or the right of the screen. And yes, both will be at full 1080p resolution.

The big catch, of course, is that each viewer has to wear special glasses to see the proper image, not to mention get the right sound. Samsung has developed a new kind of glasses that works with both 2D and 3D material, and includes a pair of headphones tuned to whichever "channel" you're watching.

No price or availability yet on the KN55F9500, and it only comes in the 55-inch size  large for an OLED set, which are known for their thinner profiles and brighter displays. This set is also one of the first to pack a quad-core processor, a 1.35GHz chip based on ARM's Cortex-A15 architecture.

What do you think of Samsung's multi-view TV? Just what you wanted, or a solution in search of a problem? Share your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  Today's phones and tablets often have quad-core processors that enable them to handle a multitude of tasks. As TVs become integrated more and more with mobile devices, it only makes sense that they get in on the quad-core action, too, and Samsung just debuted what it claims is the worlds first quad-core TV.

The LED/LCD model, the UN60F8000, is equipped with a 1.35GHz chip based on the ARM Cortex-A15 architecture. Besides making the set 3.6x as fast as last years dual-core TVs, the quad CPU enables it to handle all kinds of content, including material in the HEVC format, Samsung says.

The new set also has Samsung's new Smart Hub UI, which funnels the multitude of content it can access  including live TV, on-demand video and apps  into five app-like tiles. With Smart View, you can relay whatever youre watching on a Samsung phone or tablet to the TV and back.

The quad-core processor also helps with plenty of other features, including voice commands, the 2-megapixel front-facing camera, and a suite of picture enhancements such as "Micro Dimming Ultimate," which optimizes the LED backlight for the best contrast, and an improved de-jagging algorithm for smoother lines.

The quad-core TV (no price yet) is actually one of a pair, as Samsung's dual-view OLED set, which lets two people watch two different shows on the same TV simultaneously(!), boasts the same processor.

It was just a matter of time for TVs to get the same kind of processing as mobile devices, which bodes well for them providing a better experience in the coming years. Now Samsung (and others) just need to deliver on software.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  Samsung really wants to be the company to define the future of TV. And since the TV is now home to so much more than just shows, Samsung has revamped the user interface of its smart TVs to reflect today's connected and social world.

The Smart Hub UI  the TV's "home screen"  on all Samsung TVs going forward will be defined by five app-like tiles, each of which borrows heavily from mobile user interfaces:

On TV: For live TV, this tile will display six thumbnail images that represent programs the TV recommends based on viewing patterns. There'll be a yellow progress bar underneath each to see how far each show has progressed. Video On Demand: The place for services like Netflix and Hulu Plus. Enter a title (either via text or voice), and the TV will show you all the options you have for viewing it. My Content: Once your TV is connected to your home network, you'll be able to see all your personal content (video, music and photo) here, across devices. Social: Here you'll find feeds from Twitter, Facebook and other services, which you'll be able to use to quickly connect with the online conversation about what you're watching. Apps: Download and run Smart TV apps (weather, stocks, et cetera) via this tile, where a recommendation engine will suggest new ones. Samsung says there are "many" video apps to choose from.

Besides organizing your connected TV content into five buckets, Samsung's Smart Hub is designed to work with the new gesture and voice controls the company debuted in 2012. For example, the On Demand tile will respond to natural language like, "I feel like a little Game of Thrones right now."

Our favorite UI feature: You can perform a thumbs-up gesture to Like something on Facebook via the Social tile.

Samsung's improving the second-screen abilities of its TVs, too, enabling them to mirror content down to other devices, including iPads and iPhones. Samsung phones and tablets can also "mirror up" content to the TV.

Bought a Samsung TV last year and feel cheated out of this digital bonanza? You may remember that those TVs came with a spot for an "Evolution Kit" for hardware upgrades. Now we know what it's for  owners of 2012 Samsung TVs can upgrade to the new Smart Hub with the first Kit (model no. VG-SEK1000), coming in the first half of 2013 (no price announced).

How do you like Samsung's new take on the TV? Thumbs up or thumbs down? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  Now that Ultra High-Definition TVs  which have 4x the number of pixels as 1080p sets  are a real thing, the question remains: Does anything exist that can actually play the format? Samsung says yes, offering up a "premium" Blu-ray player capable of serving up Ultra HD video ... with a catch.

The catch is the video is actually upconverted from 1080p (or standard-def), not native 4K (the other term for Ultra HD). You can't really blame Samsung  since there isn't yet a consumer disc format for Ultra HD, there wasn't really a way to build a player that outputs 4K natively, at least not one that would be guaranteed to still work in a year.

The player (model no. BD-F7500) also includes built-in Wi-Fi, letting it play material wirelessly from any DLNA-connected device, or even connect with other Samsung smart appliances. What to check if your laundry's done from your Blu-ray player? Now you can do that.

Power all this future goodness is a 900MHz dual-core chipset, which also helps power Samsung S-Recommendation engine, which the company says is "like a good friend who knows your interests," recommending content from all the sources it can connect to.

Are you interested in a Ultra HD Blu-ray player that can only upconvert to the format? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  Sharp Electronics is trying to carve out a bigger piece of the super-sized HDTV market, unveiling 21 new 60-inch-and-above HDTVs at CES 2013.

The models range from a 60-inch HDTV to the World's biggest, a 90-inch, room-filling LED HDTV. To put that in perspective, that's 4 feet tall and almost 7 feet wide. It's approximately 5 inches deep. The TV joins Sharp's growing Aquos line of HDTVs. The 141-pound monster ... er ... TV will still be stretching a 1080p resolution over all that expansive screen real estate.

Sharp, though, isn't leaving the Ultra-HD market behind.

It also unveiled its first 4K Ultra HD display, a 60-inch Aquos TV that employs I-cubed Research Center's ICC Purios technology. Sharp also boasted during its press conference that the TV's picture quality has been certified by THX (apparently a first for 4K TVs). It's should be noted, however, that Toshiba's new 4K Ultra HD set is a whopping 84 inches.

Sharp offered no pricing details on the set, but said it should arrive in stores this summer.

Not every 4K announcement at CES 2013 is a big one. Sharp also announced a new 32-inch 4K business display based on yet another technology: IZGO. You can learn more about it here.

Like most HDTV manufacturers, Sharp is not leaving 1080 behind (how could they? There's still no content for 4K displays). Today it announced three new Sharp Aquos Quattron (RGB and Yellow) 3D LEDs ranging in size from a 60-inch model for $3999.99 to the 80-inch LC-80LE857 for $6,499.99.

All three models will feature Active 3D (that's the kind that requires special, synced 3D glasses) Smart TV Wi-Fi and Web-browsing capability. These new models will also support split-screen use, which means you can watch live TV on one side and browse the Web on the other.

Non-3D options will also available for all of these HDTVs, with prices ranging from $1,499.99 for the 60-inch model to $4,999.99 for an 80-inch HDTV. There are almost a dozen TVs in the Aquos line-up in a wide-range of pricing and feature options. Most of the new models will arrive sometime in Q1 of this year.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  The U.S. is going to get its first taste of Sharp Electonics's IGZO display technology. The tech giant announced today at CES 2013 that it's bringing next-gen LED displays to the American market in 2013.

IGZO, which stands for Indium Gallium Zinc Oxide, is actually a transparent, compound semi-conductor that Sharp says can replace the standard amorphous silicon material used for the active layer in thin-film transistors (TFTs) LED displays.

The new display technology, which was introduced in Japan last year (in smartphones), offers, according to Sharp, of number of benefits over traditional LCD displays:

To create the finished displays, which for now run from 4-to-32 inches diagonally, Sharp partnered with Corning Glass. The final LED business displays are 35mm thick. Sharp says that makes them the thinnest "in their class."

IGZO monitors, however, are just the tip of the iceberg. Sharp executives anticipate IGZO will end up in everything from phones to countertops. You can get a glimpse of those future applications in the video below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Iran is reportedly developing "intelligent software" that will allow government officials to control access to social media networks such as Facebook and Twitter, letting Iranians access those networks in a government-approved fashion.

The idea of the controlling software seems to be allowing Iranian citizens to use social media for government-approved purposes while prohibiting citizens from using it to spread messages of dissent or organize protests.

News of the software was first reported by a local Iranian outlet, then picked up by the Agence France-Presse.

"Smart control of social networks will not only avoid their disadvantages, but will also allow people to benefit from their useful aspects," police chief Esmaeil Ahmadi Moghadam told the 7Sobh daily as quoted by the AFP. "The designing of intelligent software to control social networking websites" is in the works, he added.

SEE ALSO: Facebook Diplomacy: 'Israel Loves Iran' Pages Take Off

Iran's "online police" have already been monitoring online communications since at least 2011. Iran's government has repeatedly blocked access to foreign services such as Gmail, YouTube, Facebook and Twitter, though many Iranians use Virtual Private Network (VPN) technology to breeze past the barrier and get online.

Twitter, among other networks, was a popular organizational and messaging tool during Iran's "Green Revolution" of 2009-2010.

Iran has also been working on a "national intranet" for several months. The idea? Cut ties with the global Internet as much as possible while still preserving the ability to use Internet-style communications for doing business within the country.

The United States, meanwhile, has been actively working to help Iranians get online.

Do governments have an interest in policing the Internet? Or should citizens be allowed unfettered access to the web? Share your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
This week's mid-season premiere of The Big Bang Theory, a sitcom about a group awesomely geeky friends, roped in a record-breaking 19.25 million viewers.

The show also tops the final 2012 scorecard (see infographic below) for scripted shows with the most activity  for live episodes and re-runs combined  on social entertainment platform GetGlue. Activity includes check-ins, likes, reviews and unlocking stickers.

For activity during episode premieres, fantasy drama Once Upon a Time reigned supreme in the rankings for scripted broadcast shows, while vampire drama True Blood had the most-active fans among scripted cable shows.

"We're always pleasantly surprised to see fan favorites such as Community, Fringe and Doctor Who ranking with ratings giants like Modern Family, True Blood and The Walking Dead," Kimber Myers, GetGlue's senior director of partnerships, tells Mashable.

"It demonstrates that GetGlue activity doesn't just reflect what's popular; it's also an indication of which shows have the most-engaged fan bases."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Sony launched its most successful console so far, PlayStation 2, in March 2000, selling more than 150 million units in nearly thirteen years of its existence. Now, having recently stopped selling PS2 in Japan, Sony has confirmed to the Guardian it will stop manufacturing the console altogether.

More than 1.5 billion games have been sold for PlayStation 2, and new games are still being developed for the console.

The console's successor, PlayStation 3, has been on the market since 2006, but only 70 million units have been sold to date. Sony is widely expected to launch a new version of PlayStation sometime in 2013.
--------------------------------------------------------------
One of the unfortunate facts of the digital age we live in is that items such as iPhones are likely candidates to be stolen. Everyone wants the latest smartphone, tablet, computer or gadget from companies like Apple. So, when an iPhone is lost, chances are there's someone else out there fiddling with it.

That's what happened to Nadav Nirenberg this past New Year's Eve. He lost his phone, and another scurrilous individual decided to keep it. How did Nirenberg know someone had his phone? He received an email alert notifying him that the person had been messaging women through OkCupid on it. That's when things got interesting.

Nirenberg created a fake OkCupid profile featuring a picture of a young, busty woman titled "Jennifer in BK." The fake woman, who he named Jennifer Gonzalez, then began messaging the unsuspecting thief.

The crook suggested the two meet, to which Nirenberg quickly agreed and requested that they meet at an address that just so happens to be Nirenberg's apartment. As for how he convinced the thief that he was a lady, Nirenberg said, "I used lots of winks and smiley faces so I would seem like a girl."

When the bandit showed up at Nirenberg's door, he was all decked out and ready for a date  even holding a bottle of wine. That's when Nirenberg tapped the man on the shoulder from behind, and brandished a hammer, before demanding the return of his phone. After a short exchange that involved Nirenberg giving the thief $20, the iPhone was recovered.

As successful as this story seems, we don't suggest trying it at home. A hammer's not liable to stop someone who's really keen on keeping a stolen object. That said, anyone who has ever had something stolen from them can certainly take a little slice of justice away from Nirenberg's experience.

This article originally published at Geekosystem here
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  Want to turn your laptop or desktop running Windows 8 into a touchscreen device? Accessory company Targus announced on Monday morning at the 2013 Consumer Electronics Show in Las Vegas a first-of-its kind technology that makes the most of the latest Windows operating system, without the need to splurge for a pricey new computer that touts the company's built-in touchscreen capabilities.

Windows 8  which launched in October and was designed for touch  allows users to swipe, slide and access a full collection of features via your finger. But because of the cost of new hardware, many Microsoft fans upgraded to Windows 8 without buying an expensive touch-screen PC. Now, the Targus Touch Pen aims to give anyone using Windows 8 on older hardware the touch experience, with the help of a stylus.

"Windows 8 is designed for touch, so if you have a current laptop and your device isn't capability for touch [sic], it lessens the value," Al Giazzon, VP of marketing and communications at Targus, told Mashable. "We put together a new product that turns current computers into a touchscreen device that supports Windows 8. It's easy to use, cheaper and is smaller than the size of your thumb."

Here's how it works: A small receiver attaches to the side of the laptop screen and communicates with the black Touch Pen via a cable that connects to a USB port, so your laptop thinks it has a touchscreen. The Touch Pen acts like your finger would on a touchscreen, and the screen is protected with the stylus' soft tip. (Note: It doesn't work with an actual finger because it doesn't use either capacitive or optical touch tech).

The Problem With Windows 8 SEE ALSO: | Windows 8 Is Bold and Powerful [REVIEW]

"Anything you can do with a touch-screen device, you can now do with a laptop or desktop," Giazzon said. "It also works with a laptop you bought years ago."

Even better, the Touch Pen doesn't require software or drivers, and only a one-time calibration is needed to set up the device and determine the measurements of the screen. It works with any computer with Windows 8 and monitors up to 17 inches (so larger all-in-ones are out). Meanwhile, the company said it patented the technology that simulates the touch experience with a stylus for Windows 8 devices, which may ward off other manufacturers looking to get into the space.

The Touch Pen will ship later this month and be available via Targus.com and various retailers, including Best Buy and Amazon.

What do you think of the Touch Pen? Let us know your thoughts in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Looking for tickets to President Barack Obama's inaugural ball or parade? You may be out of luck, thanks to a Ticketmaster email snafu.

Ticketmaster began selling tickets to the presidential inaugural ball and parade on Sunday following an e-mail invitation to customers  but they weren't supposed to be available until Monday morning, per earlier White House statements.

In a follow-up email to customers sent late Sunday, the company said the invitation to buy tickets was a misfire.

"During testing of our email system tonight, you may have inadvertently received an invitation to purchase tickets for 2013 Inauguration events, including the Inaugural Ball or the Inaugural Parade," read the follow-up from Ticketmaster. "Public tickets to these events were originally scheduled to go on sale tomorrow morning  you received the email tonight in error, and Ticketmaster takes responsibility for this mistake."

That email said "a significant number" of the available public tickets were gone, but Ticketmaster's website currently shows zero tickets available  meaning all the tickets are likely gone. It went on to say that tickets are "first-come, first-served" including "those sold tonight."

Translation: If you were waiting for Monday morning to snatch up your inaugural ball or parade tickets and didn't see the errant Sunday email, you're likely out of luck, beaten to the punch by those who checked their inboxes.

Mashable's Jeremy Cabalona, who managed to get inaugural ball and parade tickets on Sunday, said that the process was far from smooth. Instead, it involved a cat-and-mouse game of refreshing Ticketmaster's page in the hopes that it would switch from "sold out" to "available," which in his case it did after approximately three hours.

Sunday's first Ticketmaster email, the invitation to buy inaugural ball and parade tickets, said the following:

"The Presidential Inaugural Committee is pleased to offer you the opportunity to attend the Inaugural festivities. This email contains the information you'll need to join us here in Washington, D.C., for the official Inaugural events. This email contains specific information for your access to Inaugural tickets. Below, please find a link, your account number and account password for our secure ticketing website. You can access your tickets and input your address and billing information from the link."

Obama's inauguration ceremony is set for Jan. 21. Tickets for the ceremony itself are available through members of Congress.

Mashable has reached out to Ticketmaster and will update this post with any response. Did you lose out on tickets because of Ticketmaster's early email? Share in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Seoul, South Korea-based boy band completely dominated the Internet photo sharing sphere this past week, but not without a touching appearance from Dwayne "The Rock" Johnson.

The good folks over at Skylines sorted through 36,804,787 Twitter photos from the past week and compiled the most shared and retweeted. Check out the gallery above to see the top 10.

SEE ALSO: Library of Congress Has Now Archived 170 Billion Tweets

Any fun ones we missed? Share your favorite moments from the past week with us below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  At a private press event Sunday evening, Toshiba gave us a first look at its upcoming line of Ultra HD 4K TVs. The L9300 series is headlined by an 84-inch model (pictured above), but also includes a 58 and 65-inch set.

The 4K format gives you four times the pixel resolution of a standard 1080p Full-HD television, offering a picture at a 3,840 x 2,160 pixels.

Televisions in Toshiba's 4K series use its own CEVO 4K Quad + Dual Core Processor, which is what converts standard 1080p content to the 4K resolution without creating any artifacts in the process.

The processor makes it possible to take traditional 1080p content, for instance a Blu-ray disk, and then view that content at a near-4K resolution despite the fact that it was not originally created at that resolution. The processor also boosts the video's contrast.

The televisions in the series also take advantage of the Toshiba's new Cloud TV platform, which was also shown off Sunday evening. The Cloud TV platform gives users access to features such as Skype calling, personal messaging, a family event calendar and streaming news.

The L9300 series of Ultra HD 4K televisions is expected to ship this summer for a yet-to-be-announced price.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Why does it always seem that when there's no traffic, a stop light is too long and when there's tons of traffic, a stop light is too short?

Managing the flow of cars is a big challenge for many urban planners. Ozan Tonguz, a telecommunications researcher from Carnegie Mellon, has examined the way ants and termites navigate their own versions of gridlock to create Virtual Traffic Lights, an algorithm that helps control human traffic on busy streets.

SEE ALSO: See How Purchases Directly Impact Climate Change

It's called a "virtual" traffic lights because instead of the lights being at intersections, they're located in each car, on windshield. The algorithm uses information collected from GPS devices, short-range communicators and other sensors to manage whether a driver sees a green, yellow or red light on her windshield.

In simulations, the algorithm managed the flow of cars in a way similar to how insects manage themselves. In ant and terminte colonies, the large group always gets to go first.

"In such self-organizing biological systems, the colony can perform all the vital functions it needs (such as foraging, moving, adjusting to changing environmental conditions, protecting itself from predators, etc.) through the cooperation of the members of its colony," Tonguz explained in an email to DNews.

As soon as the biggest group cleared out, the next group was allowed to go.

Through the simulations, the scientists found that traffic drive time was reduced for urban commuters by 40-60%. The newest set of algorithms being tested will also take into account pedestrians and cyclists in the flow of traffic.

The project has already garnered $2 million in funding from private groups and the National Highway and Traffic Safety Administration since 2009. Large scale testing is slated to start this year, and if it becomes a reality, you'll have those pesky little ants on your sidewalk to thank for your shorter and less stressful commute.

This article originally published at Discovery News here
--------------------------------------------------------------
If VH1's logo on social networks looks different to you, it's because the TV network has given it a face-lift in a new multi-platform rebranding effort that was unveiled Monday.

The plus sign was added into the VH1 lettering, in part, to reflect changes in the digital world.

"10 years ago, no one had ever heard of Justin Bieber, Mark Zuckerberg just entered Harvard, iPhones were five years away and hashtags didn't exist," VH1 President Tom Calderone says. "Our world has clearly changed, so we want to reflect those cultural and technological changes in each of the many ways that consumers now touch the VH1 brand."

The new logo, for example, appears on the bottom right of this promo ad for The Jenny McCarthy Show, with the plus sign integrated separately into the ad art as well:

The plus sign is meant to mesh VH1's music, pop culture and nostalgia content together.

VH1 calls the plus sign a "tagmark" and says it represents the brand's "high-energy sensibility where everything is 'more'  more fun, more bold, and more exciting."

VH1 Creates Foursquare Locations for 'Mob Wives' SEE ALSO: 50 Top Tweets of 2012

The makeover comes after VH1 pulled in solid ratings, increasing primetime viewership by 14% in 2012, on the back of such shows as Mob Wives, Single Ladies and Love & Hip Hop Atlanta. New shows on tap include The Jenny McCarthy Show, Black Ink and Making Mr. Right as well as the return of Best Week Ever.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Quick: Think of watching a YouTube video. What kind of screen pops into your head? Chances are you thought of your laptop, desktop, smartphone or tablet before you imagined flopping down in front of a YouTube video on your widescreen TV in the den.

But that's an attitude YouTube is desparate to change  and TV makers are eager to help them out. A number of sets launching at CES 2013 this week in Las Vegas  including sets from Bang & Olufsen, LG, Panasonic and Sony  offer the video service's recently launched "send to TV" feature.

This lets you pair an Android phone with a TV on the same Wi-Fi network, and cue up videos using the YouTube app as your remote. Sony and Samsung apps on some recently-sold TVs already work with the feature, as do TV apps on Xbox 360, PlayStation 3, Wii and Wii U consoles. Google TV not required. (Controls in the iOS YouTube app are coming soon.)

And all of that is just the tip of the iceberg. During interviews at YouTube HQ in San Bruno, Calif., the company tried its best to convince Mashable that a Minority Report-style future  one where the majority of us will simply flick videos off our phone screens and have them appear on our TVs, without a second thought  was just around the corner.

"We're trying to build this infrastructure that scales everywhere from watching 1080p HD-quality video on your TV all the way down to using a dial-up modem in a developing country," says Shiva Rajaraman, YouTube director of product management. "We'd like to be all things video, and that means getting video into all places"  with your smartphone replacing your remote or your game controller.

It also means turning YouTube into more of a DVR. The company hopes to persuade you to treat YouTube as a primetime, evening watching experience, rather than something you use for cat videos at work.

In this effort, YouTube has a major ally  its audience. The service already experiences a boom in viewers every evening in every time zone in America. "We see traffic spike on the smartphone, tablet, and TV-connected UIs," says Rajaraman. "Prime time is prime time everywhere, for YouTube too."

Though YouTube doesn't offer any numbers, a big chunk of this primetime spike is likely to be second-screen watching. You've got the TV on in the background, but you just got reminded of the really cool video that got passed around the office.

So what do you do? Reach for the tablet, grab the laptop, pull the phone out of your pocket. Why? Because they seem like the best screens for the job.

If you're anything like me, you already have the ability to watch YouTube on your TV, along with Hulu Plus, Netflix and Amazon Prime. But you don't do it because experience has taught you the result is likely to suffer by comparison with those other services.

The big streaming companies offer a pretty consistent video experience. Load a movie on Netflix streaming, and you know it's going to seem somewhere between DVD and Blu-Ray quality.

Load a YouTube video on the big screen, and there's a chance the quality could appear somewhere between an 8-bit video game and a fuzzy LEGO art project. There's not a whole lot YouTube can do about that; it's the one truly democratic, worldwide video network. Quality of uploads is bound to be all over the map.

So how to overcome our wariness of using YouTube on the TV? During our conversations, I suggested the service start verifying accounts, Twitter-style  you get a tick next to your name if you consistently post videos that look great on a 42-inch screen, say. (Because as we know from experience, simply saying a video is HD when you upload it doesn't make it so.) You could also use the verification process to clamp down on one of YouTube's most terrible scourges: the vertical video.

The YouTube team demurred. They're leery of encouraging user behavior in that direct a manner. For example, there are plenty of times the service can see there's a problem with your video playing, and can make an educated guess as to why. There have been discussions behind the scenes about having a dialogue box pop up telling you, for example, that you might want to quit the 10 other programs you have running.

"We don't want to add to the confusion, or look like we're pointing fingers," says Andy Berkheimer, YouTube's head of engineering. "If you suggest the user take action and say it's something else's fault, you have to be sure." Having said that, he adds, "We've definitely identified a few scenarios where we can help people out."

Still, YouTube's focus is mostly on fixing its video service on the back end. An ongoing internal project code-named "Sliced Bread" has made the whole service a lot smarter about how it feeds video to you, chopping it up into slices much the same way regular internet content is divided into packets, and making a half-dozen other software and bandwidth adjustments on the fly.

"The goal is to get rid of the spinner," says Berkheimer, referring to the rotating series of dots that shows when a YouTube video is loading. The server software is "making decisions about next five to 10 seconds, asking: how do I provide highest quality with lowest risk of inducing a spinner?"

Getting a spinner, in fact, is the number one predictor of whether you're going to abandon your YouTube video and move on to something else. So if you've found that your videos have started playing more smoothly with fewer interruptions recently, thank sliced bread.

YouTube apps on Samsung and Sony sets sold within the last year will start updating themselves with improvements to the service, as they're now controlled by YouTube rather than the manufacturers. You'll also find that if you're watching a lot of videos on TV, the apps will know that and start offering more HD videos to you.

"If you only watch HD on your TV, you shouldn't have to go and toggle some settings switch in order to do that," says Rajaraman.

Ultimately, none of this matters unless the content creators start viewing their stuff as TV-ready. Which is why YouTube is encouraging the whole concept of Channels and Subscriptions. On both the user and creator side, the plan is to turn the millions of YouTube Channels  whichever ones float your boat  into must-see TV.

Developers are part of the bigger picture, too. The company is also releasing updates to its API with a mobile embeddable player, allowing more apps to take advantage of YouTube content. Ultimately, YouTube will rise or fall on what creators do with it. It isn't trying to be Hulu or Netflix; there are no major deals for movies or cable content on the horizon. Whether it can compete with those services for your TV-based attention is up to you.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Traditional television and YouTube have been at war for what seems like years now. So who's winning?

Neither. At least not yet. YouTube struggles with quality and regularity, while TV networks still scramble to decipher the Internet. Both must accept that they are really two different ecosystems, and people want both.

SEE ALSO: Inside YouTube's Plan to Dominate Your TV

YouTube has grown wildly in seven years thanks in large part to its openness. It's been a place for the users, by the users. But every tech company has to grow up and make money, and this is YouTube's moment. Many have speculated the video juggernaut could become Television 2.0, putting traditional media in danger.

But this battle for the future of video might not be so epic. We need to stop making either side feel like they need to compete for our attention.

Cable television is not going anywhere  at least not anytime soon. The majority of Americans are still watching television  an average of four hours and 39 minutes per day, according to Brian Stelter at the New York Times. The difference is how and when they watch it. Fewer people are tuning into shows as they air. Multi-tasking, mobile Millennials might not even watch an entire show on-demand.

This is why cable needs YouTube in the digital age. Most of the biggest moments in television  be they live, late night, morning talk shows, sketch comedy, reality television  are captured and shared online. They are the juicy pieces that carry the show from a traditional audience to social viewers. Most networks understand this is now critical, and will only grow in importance.

Rather than finding a solution to piracy, networks need to stop sweating over losing viewers to online video and find a way to make it work. If they don't find a way to quickly and easily distribute content online, someone else will.

YouTube itself plays nice by improving the TV experience for those who watch videos on a big screen.

Most networks have found success on YouTube by adding small segments before or during a show's airing. Showtime released episodes of Dexter and Homeland on YouTube in conjunction with its television premiere. The network has since made those videos private, but it's a step in the right direction.

Jimmy Kimmel goes as far as using YouTube to get users involved in the show, ultimately providing free programming and more viewership.

Some networks have attempted to bridge the digital gap by bringing YouTube shows to television. The most recent example would be Recipe Rehab's jump to ABC, while maintaining its presence online. A cooking show might be a rare example that actually works, because it's already a reference tool. People watching the show are more inclined to find the recipe online.

Television networks benefit from this portability because web shows can prove their following. Take The Annoying Orange, a series of viral videos that was picked up by Comedy Central. This was already a marketable franchise before Viacom risked a penny producing it for television.

YouTube is a valuable part of the news cycle, especially in 2012. The Weather Channel's continuous live stream of Hurricane Sandy coverage had 13 million views. Videos tagged "Obama" or "Romney" were watched 2.7 billion times. Felix Baumgartner's daredevil space jump was viewed live by 8 million people  beating Discovery Channel's live broadcast, which served 7.6 million people. As more people use YouTube, record numbers will continue to break. Traditional media simply cannot ignore online numbers anymore

Not every YouTube channel is a fit for television, but most online producers would still consider jumping to traditional media the ultimate success.

Many YouTube stars have relied on traditional media to jump-start their web-based career. When Billy Eichner does a segment on Conan, a simple plug brings hundreds of new viewers from TV to his online presence, including his YouTube channel. It can take a YouTube personality years to organically build a following large enough to make a living from.

There is and will continue to be great content made on YouTube. The best stuff is made by and for YouTubers. That's arguably YouTube's biggest strength  empowering people make their own content and decide what's worth watching.

In 2012, YouTube invested $100 million in 100 premium channels, leading many to believe it was taking on the traditional entertainment industry. Only 30 to 40% of those contracts are being renewed, but a larger question has yet to be answered.

Why would the company cannibalize its own user base?

Rather than serving as an amazing tool that allows users to make wonderful things, YouTube wants to be a part of content creation.

This competition within has sparked a trend in production studios, which the company supports in small partnership. These studios help manage and produce channels that have typically reached a significant amount of followers  usually people who work on YouTube channels full-time.

The YouTube Space, the company's most recent endeavor, is a physical studio area where YouTube creators can network, create content and rent equipment. It's a cool idea, except I have to live in Los Angeles to utilize it.

What used to be a platform that leveled the playing field is now investing in traditional media practices.

If YouTube does not accept itself as a platform, and allow video makers complete creative control, creatives may be less inclined to host videos on the site. Future generations are digital natives  if they don't like something online, they'll figure out how to make a better version. It's the same reason YouTube "disrupted" the television industry in the first place: more access, less rules.

This might explain why YouTube opened the exclusive Partner Program to everyone last year. In order to become a partner, you no longer have to be a celebrity or garner a million views  just enable your account and successfully monetize at least one of your videos. It's the least intrusive way to provide a solid platform and still make a profit.

Nearly every video on YouTube now has an ad before it, but the company managed to minimize ad time by implementing the "skip ad" feature. Users can skip ads on 65% of videos. This small act of consideration for user experience is how YouTube disrupted traditional media in the first place. Put users first.

The relationship between YouTube and television is vital. As devices and streaming become more accessible and more mobile, people will continue to find ways to view their favorite shows and create new content.
--------------------------------------------------------------
An Israeli filmmaker attracted the attention of the FBI when he posted an ad on Craigslist, looking for U.S. drone pilots. While doing some research for his short film about drone strikes, 5,000 Feet Is The Best, Omer Fast posted an anonymous ad looking to talk to pilots based at Creech Air Force Base, one of the main bases where pilots remotely operate the flying bots from ground control stations (see the picture below).

That's when the FBI called. "We were told to stop what we were doing and threatened in suggestive, spy-movie language," Fast told UK magazine Photoworks. The FBI was able to trace the ad back to Fast and his production team even though the ad was anonymous.

"I imagine it's probably quite a routine thing for them to do but it sure took us by surprise because they had to trace our phone number via the IP address used to publish an otherwise anonymous ad on Craigslist," Fast told The Verge.

SEE ALSO: Student Tweets Entire History of US Drone Strikes

The FBI's intervention didn't stop production, but it had some undesirable effects. "After the call, our contacts went dead," said Fast. In the end though, he was able to republish the ad and he didn't have any issues when he landed in the United States.

The 30-minute film is not intended to be a documentary. Although it is based on two interviews with a real drone operator, the film also casts an actor to depict the operator, telling his story with flashbacks and fictional scenes reproducing drone strikes.

Watch the video above to find out more about this story.

 


--------------------------------------------------------------
Japan's central law enforcement agency has collared a cat  but not just any cat.

This particular feline carried a memory card police say is the latest clue in a bizarre chase for a hacker who's used his stealthy computer skills to send anonymous bomb threats to schools, airlines and shopping malls.

Following hints sent to media outlets on New Year's Day, the cat carrying the card was found on an island near Tokyo, Agence France-Presse reported.

The card attached to its collar contained information that could have only been known by the creator of malware, dubbed the "remote control virus," that the hacker uses to remotely control other people's computers, Japan's National Police Agency (NPA) said.

For several months, Japanese police have been frustrated by a series of threatening messages posted to public forums and emailed to media organizations.

Joji Hamada of Symantec's Security Response blog wrote that the threats have included promises to kill shoppers in a mall, blow up a religious shrine and bomb a passenger jet.

The lack of an arrest, combined with one high-profile threat the hacker made against a school attended by Emperor Akihito's grandchildren, have caused the NPA much embarrassment.

In December, the NPA, similar to the FBI, announced a bounty of more than $34,000 for information leading to the hacker's capture. The agency called upon the public to be on the lookout for someone with knowledge of the C# programming language and an ability to conduct online activities anonymously.

However, as Wired News UK pointed out, since those skills are quite common among computer programmers, the public appeal did little to narrow down a list of potential suspects.

Symantec's analysis of the "remote control virus" showed that it wasn't anything special, other than being partly written in Japanese. The company noted that the infection rate was very low and that behavior-monitoring anti-virus software would block the malware.

This past fall, authorities told the public that they had confessions from four suspects in custody. But when the threatening messages continued without abatement, the police were embarrassed even further.

It turned out that the suspects' computers had indeed been infected with the "remote control virus," which let the operator remotely email and post threats from other people's computers, masking the authentic source of the malicious messages.

This article originally published at TechNewsDaily here
--------------------------------------------------------------
You can't go five minutes without seeing a new batch of iPhone 5 cases at the 2013 International CES conference in Las Vegas, but the Lego BrickCase has stolen our hearts. Who wouldn't want to use an iPhone with a giant dinosaur attached to the back that you built yourself?

SEE ALSO: This Bluetooth Fridge Will Stream Your Music

The $25 case by SmallWorks is a Lego building platform, allowing you to attach pieces to build whatever you like. We saw airplanes, cars and just colorful patterns stacked on the case, and immediately started to swoon.

Check out the gallery above and see for yourself. You're welcome.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Did NFL star Arian Foster just make Twitter avatars the new locker-room bulletin board?

"Bulletin-board material" is a staple of the sports cliche lexicon, right up there with "taking it one game at a time" and "giving 110%." It refers to when an upcoming opponent, or a media member  or pretty much anyone  says something disrespectful that can be used as motivation for a future matchup. The quote gets tacked up on the physical  or, more often, just metaphorical  locker-room bulletin board to be seen over and over again as fuel for the competitive fire.

Now, back to Arian Foster. The Houston Texans' star running back took exception to an article written by Boston Globe columnist Dan Shaughnessy. In the piece, Shaughnessy dismisses the Texans as playoff contenders, and characterizes the Patriots' matchup against them this Sunday as essentially a week off.

So Foster took a portion of the column and, with no fan fare, announcement or public comment, made it his Twitter avatar. Here's his avatar now:

Foster has long been among the most active, engaging and entertaining NFL players on Twitter, so it's no big surprise that he'd be the one to do something like this. Still, it's a pretty clever way to use Twitter, and provides a little bit of fun entertainment for fans during the week of hype before the game  much like when cornerback Richard Sherman changed his name on Twitter before another anticipated matchup earlier this season.

Do you find Foster's stunt entertaining, or is it a wrong move? Give us your take in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Filling out scholarship forms is easier when you don't have to write your basic information over and over again. "Personal for Education" is a web and mobile app that lets you store all of your basic information and populate online applications, making the process faster.

Personal.com can store and share all kinds of personal information  your birth certificate, passport, passwords, driver's license number and more. This new offering simplifies the college scholarship and financial-aid application process by saving students valuable time.

Personal, along with a small number of private companies, promised to help students and future students make use of their college information  from details about classes you've taken to federal financial aid (FAFSA) information.

Almost a year ago, the government announced the "My Data Button" initiative. On the government website, users would click a button to access all their student information. Now, the MyDataButton plan has been scratched, but students can still access their records and import them into Personal.

Here's how: First, users must request their personal information from the National Student Loan Database System website (the link is also available when you log into Personal). Once they receive that information, they can log into Personal and import the data. From there you can populate any form quickly with that information and avoid tedious typing.

Shane Green, Personal CEO and co-founder, uses the story of a college student named Alfredo. In a video, Alfredo explains his busy schedule  work, class, an internship plus school. Filling out numerous FAFSA and scholarship forms takes up much needed time. With Personal's data platform, he's able to upload his education data (downloaded from the Department of Education), and can insert it into numerous online forms by clicking the Personal button, which automatically populates all the correct fields. Another video shows the steps Alfredo takes to do this (this is a helpful how-to).

The service is free to use. The mobile apps are also free and available for iOS [iTunes link] and Android devices.

The other two private companies utilizing this release of data are Microsoft and a company called Parchment. Microsoft mimicked its HealthVault site to create the Lifelong Learning Record (LLR), a cloud-based storage solution for your personal education data. This is more for parents or students who want to keep a private, online record of their accomplishments. This could be used instead of putting poems and pictures in a box in the closet, or storing important achievements that can be used when applying for jobs.

Parchment allows students to build a digital record of their transcripts and achievements, and share those with colleges or employers. Students can see their chances of admission at various colleges once they upload their data.

Do you think Personal for Education would allow you to apply for more scholarships or save time? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The CES 2013 showroom opened for business Tuesday, and Vegas is buzzing with innovation, new gadgets and devices.

Ro Marley, the son of late reggae artist Bob Marley and head of audio and accessory company House of Marley, stepped away from the excitement to join Mashable for a Google+ Hangout.

Marley is attending CES to promote House of Marley's new line, including in-ear and on-ear headphones and Bluetooth-enabled audio systems that have been created with earth-friendly materials from the brand's exclusive upcycled fabric, REWIND. The products will be available later this year.

"We try to stay away from the trends," Marley said about his brand. "We try to deal with things that really resonate with our philosophies, and our giving-back principles. Our sustainable movement will continue to grow."

Check out the gallery above for images from the Hangout. You can watch the full conversation with Marley here.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  You're not seeing things: This TV from Samsung has a slight curve to it. The company claims it's the world's first curved OLED TV, and we don't doubt it.

What advantage does a curved TV have over flat panels? Samsung says the curves gives panoramic images such as nature scenes a more life-like viewing experience.

A curved panel would theoretically also make viewing angle less of an issue, since the curve would bend pixels slightly toward the user. That would be more of an advantage for LCD TVs, however, which tend to lose color saturation at off angles, than OLEDs, which don't.

Samsung's Curved OLED is just a concept right now, with no plans to bring it to market at the moment.

Do you think a TV with a slight curve would improve your picture? Share your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Humans often greet cold weather with grumbles and gripes, but us two-legged creatures could learn something from our best furry friends. Dogs skip the snow complaints, and lick Jack Frost's face. (Or, lift their leg on him.)

SEE ALSO: 12 Animals With Hangovers Worse Than Yours

Barking about the enjoyable side of snowfall might do little to persuade warm-weather worshippers. Instead, let's give the dogs a chance to show the wonderfulness of chilly temperatures and falling flakes. Grab a toboggan, and take a ride through the gallery to see 15 dogs pumped about winter.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Movie studio Paramount has teamed up with Qualcomm to create a new app for the upcoming film Star Trek Into Darkness. Announced at CES 2013, the app uses context-aware technologies to bring specific information to users at specific times.

When the app launches at the end of January, fans will be able to get special Star Trek Into Darkness content, such as videos, photos and wallpaper delivered directly to the mobile device.

That sort of functionality is standard fare for promotional apps for tentpole films. To kick things up a notch, the Star Trek Into Darkness app will also be able to unlock exclusive content and interactive features.

The first opportunity to unlock content will come during the second quarter of the Super Bowl during an airing of a Star Trek Into Darkness TV spot. The app will use audio recognition to deliver content to users watching the ad on Super Bowl Sunday.

Leading up to the release of the film, the app will continue to unlock new surprises and features. It will also use image scan functionality to interact with printed images and billboards for the film. Additionally, there are going to be location-based experiences within the app.

While using a smartphone app during a Super Bowl ad isn't totally new, this is the first time we've seen such a broad-based digital campaign built into a smartphone app.

Star Trek Into Darkness opens in theaters May 17, 2013. If you want to get notified of the Into Darkness app's availability, as well as enter a contest to win a VIP trip to the film's U.S. premiere, go to StarTrekMovie.com/CES.

What do you think of the way technology and entertainment are intersecting for film marketing? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Is there a director on this planet who's up to the monumental task  and the potential fan backlash  of helming the as-yet-untitled Star Wars Episode VII?

Or is the risk of disappointing rabid fans around the world, the legions who dressed up in character for the supposed Mayan apocalypse last month (such as the guy pictured above, at a rally in Kiev) just too great for any aspiring director to throw years of his or her life into the project?

The first Disney-produced episode in the Lucasfilm franchise is due in 2015. A great screenwriter, Michael Arendt (Toy Story 3, Little Miss Sunshine) has written a treatment that covers the brand new trilogy. But fans are starting to get a little nervous at the number of equally great directors that have ruled the project out.

The latest to join the "no thanks" list is also the first we know of to have turned down a direct request from Lucasfilm. Guillermo del Toro, the Mexican director behind the darkly brilliant child's nightmare Pan's Labyrinth and Hellboy, was the first choice of many Star Wars fans looking for something a little more Empire Strikes Back-ish than the prequel movies.

As revealed by indie blog The Playlist Monday, when del Toro's agent got the call, the director decided he was too busy  but added that he was very flattered to be asked.

He's a big fan himself, but "I think the fans deserve somebody that is just going to immerse themselves completely," he said.

Del Toro suggested that Brad Bird, who made his name over at Disney-owned Pixar, should direct the project, echoing many more fans' wishes. Many, many fan's wishes. Why? If you have to ask, watch this:

Bird, of course, has already ruled himself out. He laid a careful series of tweets informing us that he was directing a science fiction movie instead, 1952 with George Clooney. But he was flattered to be thought of, and told us he would be first in line to see Episode VII in 2015.

Other directors who've been flattered but unavailable include Steven Spielberg (it's "not his genre" and he's too close to Lucas) and J.J. Abrams (he prefers to keep working on the Star Trek series). Watchmen director Zack Snyder likes the idea but thinks another Star Wars is a "slippery slope," and Quentin Tarantino could "so care less" with Disney's name behind the project.

Why are so many big names turning down the opportunity to direct the next in a $4 billion series of live action films that changed movies forever, with built-in name recognition and audiences in the hundreds of millions? Try asking the last guy who signed up for the job, and who "totally immersed himself" in the franchise: George Lucas.

"Why would I make any more when everybody yells at you all the time and says what a terrible person you are?" Lucas asked the New York Times when announcing his retirement from Star Wars  indeed, from directing any major movie  back in January 2012.

The prequel trilogy was an enormous hit at the box office. The Phantom Menace alone made more money than the original, A New Hope. But the backlash from critics, and from many of the franchise's most rabid fans, has clearly taken its toll on Lucas.

And no wonder. I dare you to think of any other director who has been so frequently accused of "raping" his fans' "childhood." Never mind Darth Vader; there's definitely a Dark Side to Star Wars fandom.

On paper, the prequel trilogy should have been amazing. It had a clear story arc, a terrific list of actors at its disposal, and the best special effects team on the planet. It was a huge hit with kids. The trailers drove an older generation of fans into a frothing frenzy.

But the director's vision didn't sync up with their expectations. Scenes that seemed great in his head fell flat with audiences. What director is confident enough to stand up and say his or her vision will succeed, when there are significant odds that it won't?

For now, speculation seems to have settled on Matthew Vaughn, director of the gritty Layer Cake and the solid superhero flick that blended fact and fiction in the Cuban Missile Crisis, X-Men First Class. One of his actor friends let slip that Vaughn was in the running, and the director himself hasn't said one way or the other.

But Vaughn is currently signed up to direct another comic book adaptation, The Secret Service. And if Disney did have a deal with Vaughn, chances are the studio would have let us know by now. The speculation game isn't, as it turns out, great for the Star Wars brand.

The more major directors are asked in the media if they'd be interested, the more there's a chance they will politely refuse  and the more Episode VII will gain a reputation as a potentially toxic project.

If not Del Toro, Bird or Vaughn, then who is best for the job? Who could best withstand fan scrutiny? Give us your suggestion in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
T-Mobile announced 4G Connect Tuesday, a new program that gives customers a free 4G data connection with the purchase of select notebooks, tablets, and Ultrabooks.

With the program, customers will be able to access the web from their device, straight out of the box, for free. Every device comes with 200MB of data included for two years from the purchase date, with additional contract-free data available for purchase if and when they need it. 1GB of data, for instance, will be an additional $10.

'We're trying to really challenge the model of contracts - and provide a delightful, easy experience for customers," T-Mobile's Brad Duea told Mashable.

Traditionally, devices with built-in data have higher price tags at the store, and often require customers to sign a contract for data to be used on the device.

In this instance, data is available to anyone who purchases the product, regardless of whether they are a T-Mobile customer.

The first devices supporting the service include Windows 8 notebooks and Ultrabooks from Dell and HP, specifically the Dell Inspiron 14z and HP Pavillion dm1is. The HP computer is available at Target and on HP.com and the Dell computer is available at Dell.com.

In the future, T-Mobile plans to add additional units as well as partners such as Best Buy.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  T-Mobile originally launched its value plans in September 2011 and Tuesday it announced plans to move all of its devices to the Value plan model.

Most phones you purchase at a carrier are subsidized by that carrier. What that means is you might get a $600 phone for $200, with the carrier picking up the tab for the leftover $400 of the device's purchase price.

Were not a big fan of the subsidy model, T-Mobile's Brad Duea told Mashable. We think the value plan is a better model for the customer, because it's more transparent: heres the price for your device and for your service.

With the value plans, phones will be available for a low, out-of-pocket price, with T-Mobile covering the remaining cost of that device but asking you to pay it back over time through an interest-free loan of sorts.

Once your phone is paid off, then you're no longer under contract for that device. If you want to get a new phone, you can simply pay off your old one and be eligible for an upgrade.

T-Mobile isnt announcing when it will be at 100% on the plans.

Starting Jan. 9, customers will be able to purchase the LG Optimus L9 for $199.99 with no contract and score unlimited data, text and voice for $70 a month.
--------------------------------------------------------------
NBC and bakery franchise Sprinkles have concocted a tasty social media contest to promote 1600 Penn, a comedy premiering Jan. 10. The winner will get a year's supply of cupcakes.

Sprinkles has declared Jan. 10 as "Gilchrist Inauguration Day"  because of the show's main character Dale Gilchrist who plays the U.S. president  and will give away free 1600 Penn-branded cupcakes at 11 bakeries.

People who pick up a free cupcake can enter to win the year's supply of cupcakes by posting a photo of their cupcake on Instagram or Twitter using hashtag #1600Cupcakes.

"For those who don't live near a Sprinkles bakery we created a virtual cupcake so everyone could enjoy and share with their friends and have the chance to win Sprinkles cupcakes for a year," Sharon Allen, senior vice president of marketing strategy, tells Mashable.

The virtual cupcake will be shared on the show's Facebook, Twitter, Instagram and Tumblr profiles. People can use the photo of the virtual cupcake on Instagram and Twitter, too.

The contest goes live at 1:30 p.m. ET. Participating Sprinkles location are in New York City (60th and Lexington), Los Angeles (Beverly Hills and The Grove), Chicago, Dallas, Washington, D.C. (Georgetown), Houston, San Diego (La Jolla), Palo Alto, Newport Beach (Calif.) and Scottsdale (Ariz.).

SEE ALSO: 'Biggest Loser' Online Hub Gets Makeover for Season 14

1600 Penn stars Bill Pullman as President Gilchrist, Josh Gad as first son Skip and Jenna Elfman as first lady Emily. Gad and Elman are showing off the cupcakes in the above photo.

Meanwhile, NBC debuted the series' first episode online ahead Thursday's TV premiere.

NBC describes the show as such: "Whether it's entertaining foreign dignitaries, sneaking away for a night out, dealing with middle-school crushes or putting out fires, there is never a dull moment inside the Gilchrist White House."
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS - You may know that 50 Cent has his own line of headphones. What you may not realize is the rap superstar is also the majority owner and CEO of the company making them.

2013 marks 50s third CES, his second with his company SMS Audio, which manufacturers high-end headphones and earbuds. Unlike other artists who have their own line of audio products, 50 is a key decision maker in the company, and has control over every step of the process  from the audio quality of the headphones to their design and packaging.

One big business decision hes made is to partner with FeedAmerica, a charity that helps feed the underprivileged in the United States. Every set of headphones sold provides 250 meals through that program.

We caught up with 50 on the CES show floor and spoke to him for a few minutes about what 2013 has in store for his company. Check out the interview above, and let us know in the comments what you think his company should make next.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Among the Gang of Four in tech right now  Apple, Google, Facebook and Amazon  Amazon is the only business that revolves around content. The company's hardware products are basically buying machines. Amazon is dabbling with advertising as a potentially profitable side business, but that's not where it's heart is.

At bottom, Amazon really just wants to sell you stuff.

Despite this guiding principle, analysts expect Amazon to continue clashing with at least two of the three predominant ecosystems in 2013. Inevitably, in order to grow you just have to get into new areas that have already been colonized by someone else.

In 2013, that may mean the first-ever Amazon Phone. Such a device has been rumored for years at this point, but then again, so was an Amazon tablet. Like the Kindle Fire, an Amazon Phone would likely house an Android-based platform customized by Amazon (hence, "Amdroid") that would unify disparate apps like Kindle, the Amazon Appstore Amazon MP3, Amazon Instant Video and the Amazon shopping app. To sweeten the offer, Amazon could, as Sascha Segan at PC Magazine suggests, subsidize carriers' data plans.

As mentioned, an Amazon Phone would merely be the latest manifestation of the company's overall strategy, which is to make buying on the platform as easy as possible. While we often think of cardboard boxes when we talk of buying on Amazon, increasingly commerce means streams of data, as well.

Tablets and a possible phone are two ways of lengthening Amazon's reach, but the company is characteristically looking beyond the obvious and finding creative new platforms. One such (ahem) vehicle is Ford's SYNC AppLink, which has now been joined with Amazon's Cloud Player. So for $24.99 a year, you can store up to 250,000 songs in the cloud and use voice control in SyncAppLink to call up your favorite tunes while you're driving.

Like mobile computing, TV presents another fat target for increased colonization. Though Amazon's streaming video business appears to be a placeholder at the moment, rather than a serious Netflix competitor, it would be naive to think that CEO Jeff Bezos isn't burning calories thinking of a way to get Amazon on more TVs.

The company was rumored to have been thinking of buying Roku. Assuming that never comes to pass, an Amazon set-top box is certainly a possibility. Of course, developing a viable living room device is easier said than done. Among the Gang of Four, only Apple has managed to build a decent TV streaming device. Even the mighty Google failed to match that feat with its dead-on-arrival Nexus Q last year.

Amazon is clearly a new kind of beast. It's not a traditional retailer but one with the power to kill off traditional brick-and-mortar retailing. Its main business isn't hardware, but it's shown it can compete there, as well. It's not a media company, but has the power to push around the major book publishers.

Finally, Amazon possesses the cloud computing heft to be a backbone for many of the web's top sites, including Reddit, Airbnb and Netflix.

Noah Elkin of eMarketer points out that Amazon has become the back-end host for many web businesses, as well. "The cloud infrastructure is going to continue to be a bigger component of their business," says Elkin. "It seems like an outlier for what Amazon does." Indeed, Amazon's cloud business has become so prevalent that even competitors like Netflix rely on it, sometimes to their detriment.

With its stronghold on the retail business and the benefit of a relatively young, visionary CEO who puts growth ahead of quarterly profits, Amazon enjoys fairly unrestrained ambitions.

However, one area the company seems willing to cede is social networking. Perhaps Amazon has come to the same conclusion as Apple: that it doesn't pay to try to compete in social media. Of the Gang of Four, only one  Google  is competing in every major arena  advertising, hardware, media and social media. Perhaps Google is overreaching. A holiday 2012 survey by Baynote showed that two-thirds of consumers go directly to Amazon for price comparisons, rather than to Google. If Google continues to cede ground to Amazon and let the company become the online price checker of record, then Google+ will look like a misdirection of resources and Bezos will once again appear one step of ahead of the competition.
--------------------------------------------------------------
One category of mobile device will blow away all others in the pace of its growth, expanding 70% in each of the next three years and yielding a $135 billion market by the end of 2015. Vendors will move 142 million units of this device in 2013 and up to 402 million by 2015, project analysts at Barclays. That's more than three times the number of iPhones sold in 2012.

And, oh yeah, Apple doesn't make one of these.

It's called a phablet. As in, an extra-large phone that's almost as big as a tablet, combining aspects of both.

Phablet is the terrible name granted to this class of 5-inch and larger phones by a derisive press corps, which mocked one of the earliest and most visible examples of this trend, Samsung's 5.3-inch Galaxy Note. Then, surprising everyone but Samsung, the Note turned out to be a hit, selling 10 million units as of last summer.

Samsung recently rolled out the Galaxy Note II, which is a hair larger than the Galaxy Note and looks to be an even bigger hit, selling 5 million units in just the first three months since launch.

Subsequently, dozens of phone makers have announced their own phablets, including the consumer electronics giants of mainland China, ZTE and Huawei; Taiwan's HTC and Lenovo; Sony; American manufacturer Vizio; South Korea's LG; and even one Shenzhen, China, manufacturer called Zopo that is making phablets its primary focus. Not to mention a stream of cheap knock-offs from vendors with no brand at all.

So whats going on here? When analysts declare that "we expect 2013 to be the Year of the Phablet," have they lost their minds? Are phablets the netbooks of 2013, doomed to be produced in mass quantities but yielding a user experience so unsatisfying that the category eventually dies?

Quite the opposite, Id argue. In fact, Im willing to bet that Phablets are going to be the PCs of this decade. They will become the default computing device of most of the developing world, and a surprising proportion of those who live in rich countries will eventually sign on, as well. The reasons are pretty simple.

In Emerging Markets, Consumers Need One Device That Can Do Everything

We thought that device would be the phone, but given the popularity of tablets, it turns out that bigger really is better. For example phablets are taking over in India.

"Earlier I was using a smartphone and also had a tablet but later realised that a phablet was better as you can make calls and use it as a tablet as well," one student told the Times of India.

That pretty much sums it up: If your budget is limited, why deal with two different upgrade cycles and two different devices, when you can put all of your money into a single device? And now that device, which is probably your primary computer, has wireless data connectivity wherever you go. Low-end phablets are going for as little as 6,000 rupees ($110) in India.

Consumers in Rich Countries Dont Need Phones Anymore  They Demand Bigger Screens

U.S. journalists love to hold phablets up to their heads in order to prove how ridiculous they are as phones, but that misses the point: The fraction of time we spend using these devices for phone conversations continues to shrink.

In surveys, time spent on calls comes in fourth after web browsing, social media, music and gaming, and on average may represent as little as 10% of the two hours a day we spend on our "phones."

The latest phablets exemplify this trend. Sharp has created a ridiculously high-resolution touchscreen with a 5-inch diagonal that has the same resolution as high-end HD televisions with 64 times as much surface area.

For reference, these have a resolution of 440 pixels per inch, compared to the much-ballyhooed retina display in the iPhone 5, which has 326 pixels per inch. Thats a resolution so high that the average user probably cant even tell the difference. And yet these screens have made it into so many of the latest high-end phablets that Sharp can barely keep up with demand.

High-end phablets are starting to include processors and storage capacity that put them on par with low-end laptops. They can be full media centers capable of driving giant televisions and high-end sound systems. There is also some indication that screen size has become aspirational, as users seek to differentiate their devices from the endless litany of regular smartphones.

Having a Single Connected Device Is a Good Way to Reduce the Cost of Bandwidth

Users do not require any more convincing that tablets are great. In 2013, theyre going to buy more of them than laptop computers. The problem is that the carrier-centric nature of much wireless connectivity in rich countries locks users into high monthly fees for the privilege of accessing the cell network.

Thats probably one reason why phablets are taking off in Asia and other emerging markets, where pay-as-you-go plans and devices that accommodate multiple sim cards (to allow users to use more than one carrier) are more common. In either case, wireless bandwidth is still relatively expensive, so using a single device for most lightweight computing and connectivity makes sense.

The Idea That a Phablet Is Less Portable Is a Red Herring

Sure, many phablets are so large that they cant fit in your pocket, but thats a very male tech writer view of smartphones. Stashed in a purse or a bag, a phablet is no less portable than an e-reader or a small tablet, and users dont seem to have a problem toting those just about everywhere. Clearly, for millions of people, a phablet that eliminates the need for owning and carrying two separate devicesa phone and a tabletis a better solution.

Apple Could Be Forced to Follow Suit

At least one analyst, Topeka Capital Marketss Brian White, insists that Apple could come out with an iPhone with a bigger screen by this summer. That would fit the pattern set by the iPad Mini, in which other manufacturers produced what looked like a viable product categorythe 7-inch tabletand Apple decided it was a market opportunity worth pursuing.

Unlike netbooks, a faddish category which Apple famously ignored, phablets tend to be high-end devices that fit with Apples pattern of making best in class hardware that allows the company to maintain its high margins.

Apples strength has always been taking others good ideas and improving on them, anyway. It may sound absurd, but theres one way Apple could instantly dominate the market by creating the biggest phablet ever: upgrade the cellular radio in the iPad Mini LTE so that it can make calls.

This article originally published at Quartz here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Arrested Development fans, your wait is nearly over. The Bluths are set to return for their feverishly anticipated fourth season this May.

The cult favorite went off the air after three seasons, in 2006, but Netflix signed on in 2011 to host new episodes of the show after seeing its immense popularity with subscribers. Executive producer Ron Howard has since tweeted a photo of the new season's script and star Jason Bateman later shared photos from the writers' room. Bateman also shared photos from the set in August.

But Wednesday's news, revealed at a panel at the 2013 Television Critics Association Winter Press Tour, marks the most detailed to date. Season four will consist of 14 episodes, up from 10 as originally planned, and the entire batch will reportedly be released at once. Arrested Development fans will also have to get used a slightly different narrative approach  each episode is said to focus primarily on just one character, with only Michael Bluth, played by Bateman, appearing in all 14.

Arrested Development is Netflix's biggest name exclusively hosted series, but just one of several the company is using to try to shake up the television industry. Five other shows are set to premiere on Netflix this year as well, including House of Cards, produced by David Fincher and starring Kevin Spacey, and Derek, which Ricky Gervais writes and stars in.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Picking the perfect filter for your beloved Instagrams can be laborious. Is Lo-Fi too dark? Is Earlybird too hipster?

We'll save you the trouble with these nine fake filters no one should ever, ever use.

Got more fun filter ideas? Share them in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  Cross-country and international travel is expensive. Three or four trips to London, Paris or Taiwan a year and you're spending at least $16,000. What if you could spend that much and be in Europe and at home as often as you want? That's what Suitable Technologies' Beam Remote Presence System promises.

The roughly 5.5-foot-tall system is available now and on display at CES 2013. I got to take it for a drive and have to say, it's a pretty cool system.

Here's how it works. Beam connects to your network via a Wi-Fi or cellular broadband connection. It has a large LCD screen atop two slim bars and a rolling base. There's also a charging station. Beam usually starts there so it's fully charged when you're ready to travel.

If you're controlling Beam, your view is via your computer or laptop. You drive Beam with a joystick or, more commonly, the arrow keys on your keyboard, while Beam cruises along at up to 3 miles per hour. Your webcam beams your face to the Beam device, so your disembodied head looks like you're wherever your Beam is. It's like your own personal transporter, without the dangerous (and currently impossible) Star Trek hardware.

Controlling Beam is remarkably easy. I got a 30-second tutorial and was soon following someone around Beam's Palo Alto offices. The display helps guide you by showing directional overlays on top of the video feed that mimic the direction and driving directions you're sending to the remote presence device. Beam's two cameras show you what's ahead of you and what's at your feet.

When you're done with your remote meeting or making the rounds at a hospital, you simply drive Beam back to its charging station, spin around and back into the charging base.

I had a great time driving Beam around and meeting people at Suitable Technologies' offices. What would you do with a remote presence device? Let me know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
When the 4chan imageboard community helped make #cutforbieber a trending topic on Twitter and the subject of more than a half dozen news stories Monday, the world collectively gasped at the thought of Justin Bieber fans cutting themselves in response to a photo of the teenage heartthrob smoking marijuana. Yet underneath the shock and awe, 4chan's first prank of the year was about more than just cheap laughs.

Since its inception nine years ago, 4chan has become known as the Internet's sketchy male outhouse  a place where people can make crude jokes, show one another their penises, share their porn collections and shock one another with gory photos, all under the guise of anonymity.

The site retained its smutty charm in 2012, but its tradition of schemes and pranks at the expense of other websites and the mainstream media took on a new level of sophistication. In the past six months, 4chan users rigged TIME magazine's Person of the Year poll in favor of North Korean leader Kim Jong-un and made "Hitler Did Nothing Wrong" look like the most popular name for a new Mountain Dew flavor.

In recent years, 4chan has become best known as the site that spawned Anonymous, the hacktivist collective that spent 2012 cracking FBI databases, lending a helping hand to Syrians and seeking justice for a rape victim in Steubenville, Ohio.

But while Anonymous may have been spawned by 4chan, it no longer necessarily calls it home. Major Anonymous mouthpieces like the influential @YourAnonNews have shifted largely to Twitter or other sites. Anonymous has become a sociopolitical force. 4chan, meanwhile, has returned to its roots  with a twist.

While most 4chan stunts have been for the lulz, the sinister hoax at the expense of impressionable Beleibers is an example of the community's renewed obsession with manipulating the media into reporting on anything.

"I don't think it's at the children as it is the dum-dum tabloid media," Anonymous expert Cole Stryker told the Daily Dot. "I think Anonymous is going to revert back to this playfully dark mentality ... This stuff is way more fun than trying to bring down Tunisian government websites."

The latest scheme started as most have, on the site's random imageboard known as /b/, a place where users exchange foul language, violent images and sexual content freely. The mission was to make the #cutforbieber hashtag trend on Twitter worldwide with photos of bloodied arms in response to one of Bieber smoking marijuana, and "see if we can get some little girls to cut themselves."

Once the scheme got rolling, the users who started the original /b/ thread removed it from the site in an attempt to hide their tracks and trick media organizations into believing the Twitter hashtag appeared organically.

It's around that point where the scheming likely moved to a private room on Internet Relay Chat (IRC) and leadership roles were determined, said _js5, an IRC user who created the Java script used to game TIME magazine's Person of the Year poll in favor of Kim Jong-Un and spell "KJU GAS CHAMBERS" with the first letter of each candidate's name.

"The main hub of people working on the initiative will set goals and are very strict on following them," _js5 explained to the Daily Dot. _js5 also claims to have seen chatter about the scheme on the Internet after the photo of Bieber first leaked on Jan. 4. "The leadership will decide the next moves and leadership is determined by skill, and how much power that person holds. The more resources a person has, the more power they will have. Access to easy media, web servers, administration of chat channels are examples of this."

With the leadership established and the goal set, #cutforbieber went worldwide shortly after the 4chan thread was deleted. The result was gruesome. Photos of bloodied arms, a fake Facebook memorial page for a fan, and fake tweets from Bieber himself flooded Twitter, Buzzfeed reported.

#cutforbieber became the most popular hashtag on Twitter some time around 2:30 p.m. EST Monday.

"As much as I love laughing at mindless internet drones joining an initiative that trolls set forward this one is a little too dark for my taste," _js5 added.

Almost immediately after #cutforbieber was a success, 4chan tried to double down on its trolling by making #smoke4bieber a trending topic.

"Time to counter troll!!!!" an anonymous user wrote around 6 p.m. EST Monday. "We will now fuck with more kids by influencing them to smoke. It will still piss people off, and will make some stupid 12yr old smoke. At the end of the day, Bieber takes all the blame."

The effort proved to be futile due in part to a breakdown in leadership, said Jacob, a 4chan user.

"Once it reaches media attention, it gets picked up by outsiders of the community, and that's when it loses its leadership structure," Jacob added. _js5 has been no stranger to the effects of such leadership woes and its damaging effects.

After TIME magazine launched its prestigious Person of the Year poll on Nov. 26. users from Reddit, 4chan, and Internet Relay Chat (IRC) gamed the online poll using a Java script by _js5 to automate votes for the Korean leader.

The same script also enabled the group to to spell "KJU GAS CHAMBERS" with the first letter of each candidate's name and ultimately help Kim win Person of the Year Reader Poll, despite North Korea's government run news organization reporting the opposite. (TIME's coveted cover ultimately went to President Barack Obama.)

With the deed done, the leadership structure behind the Time prank fell apart. Other IRC users retaliated against _js5 for cooperating with the Daily Dot and for claiming ownership of the Java script by ordering pizzas to his home and dumping his personal information online.

So in the end, was #cut4bieber a success? Articles by Fox News, Daily Mail, Wired, The Telegraph and Buzzfeed all point to yes.

"I look at these pranks as a cultural antidote to the asinine celebrity industrial complex," Stryker said. "It's a way for people to take the piss out of powerful media entities that try to present themselves as authentic to their audiences."

And if #cut4bieber is any indication, 2013 is shaping up to be the year of the prank.

"Expect TIME magazine to get rigged again, and more people on Twitter to get trolled," _js5 said. "I predict the hoaxes to be more frequent. They gained a national spotlight recently in 2012 and people have gained a taste of what to expect."

This article originally published at The Daily Dot here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Pixar released a rain-soaked teaser video for The Blue Umbrella, an animated short that will be shown to theater-goers who attend Monsters University starting June 21.

In it, we see an animated blue umbrella eyeing a red one among a sea of black umbrellas. Despite the dreary weather, Pixar says the two colorful umbrella begin a relationship.

SEE ALSO: Disney Pixar's 'Monsters University' Gets Quirky College Website

"It is just another evening commute until the rain starts to fall, and the city comes alive to the sound of dripping rain pipes, whistling awnings and gurgling gutters," Pixar says. "And in the midst, two umbrellas  one blue, one not  fall eternally in love."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Nothing is a bigger middle finger to the haters than ... reading their mean comments on national television.

Looks like Jimmy Kimmel is offering some sort of digital catharsis to mistreated celebs everywhere by letting some of them read, out loud, the terrible things that are said about them on Twitter.

And then laugh it off (or if you are the all-mighty Anderson Cooper, just tell them to f- off).

It's like some sort of experiment in human psychology.

SEE ALSO: 50 Most Memorable Tweets of 2012

But nonetheless, this video provides something for all of us. A moment to shine for the haterade-drinkers or a lot of comic relief for the rest of us not-so-rude tweeters.

Have you ever tweeted something mean to a celebrity? 'Fess up in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  Walking the aisles of CES 2013? Watch out. It's a cauldron of microbes out there, and you can't be too careful.

Nitrozac and Snaggy of The Joy of Tech have some comic relief:

Comic illustration provided by The Joy of Tech. Published with permission; all rights reserved.
--------------------------------------------------------------
International CES 2013 officially opened its doors to the public on Tuesday, welcoming attendees to more than 1.85 square miles of vendor space and over 3,000 vendors. About 150,000 people are expected to rush through the cavernous grounds, taking a look at the latest in televisions, tablets, computers and more.

Check out Mashable Editor-in-Chief Lance Ulanoff as he takes you on a tour of the CES show floor. It's almost as good as being there in person  with the added benefit of not having to walk from North Hall to South Hall four times in one day!
--------------------------------------------------------------
We've been tracking our Mashable team members at CES 2013 in Las Vegas as they all dash across the convention center in pursuit of the newest tech trends. Outfitted with Nike+ Fuelbands, our reporters and editors have had their every move monitored. We've compiled the totals of the first three days of the challenge to show who's leading the overall competition.

The Mashable team's mileage at CES by the end of Tuesday, day three of the challenge:

Reporter Samantha Murphy beat video editor Evan Engel's previous single-day record of 5.59 miles, completing 5.85 miles on Tuesday. She was closely followed by tech editor Pete Pachal, who completed 5.72 miles. Both Pete and Samantha spent time at the Panasonic event, where they were introduced to the gigantic 20" 4K tablet.

Pete started the day by hanging out with Sony COO Phil Molyneux, and later stopped by Samsung to check out its new point-and-shoot cameras and pioneer curved OLED TV. He, along with lifestyle editor Andrea Smith and photo editor Nina Frazier, caught up with Ro Marley to talk sustainable tech.

Reporter Emily Price had an impressive 4.88 mile day that included an interview with 50 Cent and a stop at Verizon's keynote.

Evan, who covered 5.02 miles on Tuesday, still leads the group in the overall competition. He was also on the scene for the 50 Cent interview:

Photo editor Nina put in the longest hours on Tuesday, logging a new record of 16 hours and 20 minutes of activity in a single day. Check back tomorrow to find out how our contestants do on day four of the CES Challenge!
--------------------------------------------------------------
A rusty 48-year-old tower standing in the Atlantic Ocean may soon get a makeover for modern energy. The one-time lighthouse even may accommodate energy researchers and staff for overnight stays.

Officials at the U.S. Department of Energy want to retrofit the Chesapeake Light Tower  located 13 miles off Virginia Beach, Va.  for basic research into harvesting electricity from gigantic offshore wind turbines. The tower would be equipped with instruments for measuring the wind 100 meters (328 feet) above the surface of the sea, which is the typical height of ocean turbines.

Good measurements will encourage funding for offshore wind power, said Will Shaw, a researcher at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory who would lead the science team at the tower. Nobody has direct measurements of ocean-turbine-height wind right now, but that data would be important to potential investors seeking assurances that offshore wind is strong and will make lots of electricity.

The Department of Energy has given the National Renewable Energy Laboratory $3 million to assess the Chesapeake Light Tower and come up with a remodeling plan, said Jim Green of NREL, who would lead the remodeling. Green expects the $3 million will be more than enough for assessment, so some of it can go toward building, too. It is too early to say how much additional funding construction will need, he said.

It is still possible the assessment will find it too expensive to turn the Chesapeake Light Tower into a working,mid-ocean research lab, Green told TechNewsDaily. Officials hope to have the lab ready to go by 2014 or 2015, however.

Previously, the Coast Guard owned and maintained the aging offshore tower, Virginia Beach TV stationWVEC reported. It cost $50,000 for an inspection every other year, plus more for repairs.

If the plans go through, the new tools the Chesapeake Light Tower will get include a 328-foot-tall add-on for measuring conditions at that altitude. The 1960s-era structure also will get LIDAR, or light detection and ranging equipment, which will measure wind speeds by sending out laser beams and calculating how long it takes those beams to return to the equipment after they bounce off of dust particles and droplets of sea spray. Researchers are especially interested in testing the accuracy of buoy-borne LIDAR.

The Chesapeake Light Tower already has a helicopter landing pad and is able to accommodate people overnight. "It's a unique facility. There's nothing like it in U.S. waters," Shaw said.

In the further future, Shaw said the tower could make measurements for how much electricity might be harvested from the up-and-downmotion of waves, a potential source of non-polluting electricity that has been less well studied than offshore wind.

Shaw and two colleagues presented their plansonJan. 8 at the annual meeting of the American Meteorological Society in Austin, Texas.

This article originally published at TechNewsDaily here
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  Former U.S. President Bill Clinton joined Samsung on stage at 2013 International CES in Las Vegas to discuss the power of the Internet and the need to grow its infrastructure in the U.S.

President Clinton  the brand ambassador for the Samsung Hope for Children program, which will provide education to 2.5 million children  told attendees "technology can help overcome challenges that are not even economic."

"I've been backstage looking at all the new devices, and I was reminded that when I was president, the average cellphone weighed 5 pounds," Clinton said. "The day I took the oath of office, a grand total of 50 sites were on the Internet. More have been added since I started talking."

But he noted South Korea is now number one in the world for computer download speeds, and the U.S. has fallen to number 15.

"Our speeds are one-fourth of theirs, and we have fallen off the map," Clinton said. "Think about all the basic things we are taking for granted. If the screen went dark or the microphone failed ... if you get bored from my speech, you can get water  but I have spent time in part of the world where you can't do that. Mobile technology is doing so much now to lift the poor."

He said he is impressed by how much technology is affecting our lives, and how it can be used for the future. Although he said he no longer drives, someone recently told him to sit in his Ford car, and told its built-in infotainment system to provide directions to the nearest Chinese restaurant.

"I got a map about how to drive there, which I didn't know before," he said. "I keep thinking about this in terms of the future. If you look at what the Arab Spring did to use social networks ... and how social media has been used among my wife's leadership ... there is a lot we can do to overcome challenges."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Actor Edward Norton is fighting a less intense  yet worthwhile  battle than he did in Fight Club as part of the Mozilla Firefox Challenge, which pits him against other celebrities to raise the most money for their respective charities.

And they're using Norton's crowd-sourced fundraising platform CrowdRise to rake in the money. Each celebrity created a project to let people make small donations and win prizes.

Some $600,000 has been raised so far for these three project prizes alone: Jimmy Kimmel's offer to punch your friend in the stomach, Seth Rogen's signed ukulele and Will Ferrell's autographed "beautiful cow bell." Other celebrity projects come from Jason Bateman, Kristen Bell, Jordin Sparks, Danny Devito and more.

We caught up with Norton to discuss CrowdRise, the challenge and its quirky projects.

Your fundraising project for the Mozilla Firefox Challenge asks for a $29 donation to be entered to win an iChat with you. What details can you give us about the iChat?

The iChats have been popular and I'm not the only one who has used that incentive.

Paul Rudd's done a bunch of [iChats] ... I think he's usually naked for his.

I can't promise that, but mine have been great. It's actually been kind of mind-blowing how high-quality the conversations I've had with people have been. We've actually gotten great ideas for how to make CrowdRise better. Two of the people who won chats with us we wanted to hire.

What are your thoughts on Will Ferrell's cowbell?

Will's cowbell is by now legend. I wouldn't waste too much time on anyone who was like, "What's that? I don't get it." It's hard to think of a scenario in life not improved by its pleasing gong.

And Jimmy Kimmel's punches? Which friend of yours would you let Jimmy punch?

Kimmel is no Manny Pacquiao, but he's not Butterball either.

I wouldn't be afraid personally but I wouldn't let him hit my sister.

Do you have any fun stories to share with us about CrowdRise's adventures last year?

CrowdRise's growth is fairly astonishing. Just over two years ago it was four of us in a living room and so when I'm walking through the airport and see people wearing our T-shirts, let alone surf the site and see the numbers people are raising and the creativity they're bringing to the game, it's pretty amazing.

David Axelrod said he'd shave his famed mustache if he raised over $1 million for epilepsy research, and he did it. President Obama donated, which was a highlight.

We're thinking maybe we popped [Obama]'s crowdfunding cherry ... which is nice.

We were very inspired by all these projects: We're in the middle of our second year of the Mozilla Firefox Challenge, which has been amazing again. We love Mozilla because they're built on the same ethos that CrowdRise is ... that many people coming together can do great things to create a better society. They've put up $200,000 in prize money to drive grassroots fundraising for hundreds of charities and they're going to leverage their money many times over. Most people don't even realize that Mozilla is a non-profit foundation and that Firefox is a community-created browser created by over 40,000 volunteers who believe in free and open access to the Internet. We're big fans of what they do and the way they do it, and we love that they're helping us promote the power of the crowd.

How would you explain the platform to a friend who has never heard of it?

CrowdRise kicks ass because it gives a huge boost to people who believe that a little bit of effort by lots of people actually will change the world for the better. And those are my favorite people. Those are the people I like to hang out with and who inspire me. To people who have never heard of it I say CrowdRise is the best platform on the planet from which to support the charities and causes that you care about.

It's been successful because CrowdRise is doing much more than providing rudimentary engineering of collecting donations ... we're delivering a new game theory about how to leverage resources. And people have more fun hanging out with us.

 

What's next for CrowdRise and for yourself in 2013?

 

The plan is to continue to provide the most creative, fun and cost-efficient platform to raise money for charity and to keep trying to come up with new ways to engage people in the experience of contributing to collective social action. Crowdfunding is exploding and we're excited to be right in the middle of it.

I'm going to Germany to make another movie with Wes Anderson next week, which is about as much fun as you can have with your clothes on.

 

Photo by Pascal Le Segretain/Getty Images
--------------------------------------------------------------
A father in China perturbed by the amount of time his adult son spent playing online video games didn't ground the young man. He didn't take away his electronics. And he didn't try to reason with him.

Instead, he took what may be a much more logical approach: Hiring digital hit men in the form of other gamers to kill off all his son's characters, according to the BBC.

The son reportedly uncovered the truth after getting tired of other players targeting him then asking one why he was being singled out. The father said he was just trying to discourage his son from playing so much, he told local media, and the two have reportedly solved their differences since.

It's a different form of parenting, to be sure, but just the latest examples of parents who have sought to counteract technology's increasingly all-consuming spell over sons and daughters worldwide. This Christmas, a mother gained attention online after giving her 13-year-old son an iPhone for Christmas  but requiring him to sign a contract agreeing to how he would and wouldn't use the device first. In February, a father uploaded video of himself shooting his daughter's laptop several times and the clip went wildly viral online.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A pair of Dallas sports teams got into a pretty bizarre, petty spat on social media this week  a bit embarrassing for them but funny for the rest of us. And you'd better call up the burn ward, because "America's Team" just got put in check.

The tiff started when when the NFL Cowboys posted a since-deleted tweet to its 500,000 followers referencing pro hockey's extended lockout and reading: "Similarly in the category of nobody-caresthe NHL is back!"

The Stars, Big D's NHL franchise, were non-plussed with the Cowboys' unprovoked dis and fired back with their own Twitter post on Tuesday morning:

The post references Mike Modano, who wore the number 9 jersey for the Stars and led the team to the 1999 Stanley Cup title. It contrasts that achievement with Cowboys quarterback Tony Romo, who also wears number 9 but is well-known for bungling big games.

The Stars' rebuttal became a hit with many fans on Twitter with more than 14,000 retweets, and showed once again that standing up for oneself is often the best way to deal with a bully. The Cowboys soon backtracked, calling the post an accident, and apologized for the #shotsfired tweet:

Apology accepted, perhaps, but the Tony Romo dis is still live on the Stars' timeline. Well played, Dallas Stars, well played.

Do you think the Stars overreacted, or was it entertaining and appropriate? Give us your take in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It won't be long before students are playing video games at school.

A new interactive fitness game announced at International CES 2013 brings at-home fitness video games to school. DanceDance Revolution Classroom Edition was made with school physical education class in mind.

With the DanceDance Revolution games, users follow steps to dance choreography while listening to hit songs. Players hold a control that senses their movements or move on a mat, depending on the game console used. Players get points based on how close their moves matched-up to the ones on the screen. The fun calorie-burning game is played by both adults and children. This particular edition was made to bring that same idea to schools.

This latest classroom version lets as many as 48 students play at one time. Each student must have a wireless mat that features a smart card reader to tracks each student's individual progress. The idea is that while students move to the beat, teachers can see their progress including steps, body mass index (BMI) and caloric burn rate.

So far, the game has been launched at three schools located in Longwood, Fla., Gainesville, Ga., and Fresno, Texas, with assistance from KONAMI Digital Entertainment, Inc., which makes the game, and UnitedHealthcare, who it partnered with for this school edition.

Would you welcome DanceDance Revolution at your school? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
David Bowie, the 66-year-old rocker who released his first song in a decade this week, is on top of the music world again  at least on iTunes. His forthcoming The Next Day album has already claimed the top spot on 17 countries' iTunes Store Top 10 Albums charts.

The album is number one Wednesday in the United Kingdom, France, Germany, Austria, Belgium, Canada, Denmark, Finland, Greece, Iceland, Italy, Luxembourg, Netherlands, Portugal, Spain, Sweden and Switzerland.

MTV Reveals 13 Artists to Watch SEE ALSO: How Music Rules Twitter

The Next Day, which is scheduled for a March 12 release, is also in the top 10 lists in 5 other countries: the United States, Australia, Japan, New Zealand and Norway.

Apple publicly releases iTunes rankings for 22 countries, so Bowie is on every top 10 list.

Bowie's new song, "Where Are We Now?", tops the singles charts in 8 countries.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Global digital advertising spending broke $100 billion for the first time, according to eMarketer, which predicts the business will grow another 15.1% this year.

That figure compares to a market increase of 17.8% in 2012. The slowing growth rate appears to be a natural consequence of the maturation of the industry  the larger it gets, the harder it is to grow. While figures for the entire ad industry's growth in 2012 aren't in yet, Magna Global last June predicted that the ad business would expand 4.8% worldwide in 2012.

Digital advertising's stronger growth means it's taking up more of the overall business. eMarketer estimates that online advertising accounted for just under 20% of all advertising. This year, 21.7% of the advertising pie will be taken up by digital advertising. The double-digit growth is expected to decline steadily until 2016.

Not surprisingly, eMarketer found that the biggest growth is happening outside of so-called mature markets. In particular, digital ad spending grew 55.8% in the Middle East and Africa in 2012 and 38.4% in Eastern Europe compared to 21.5% and 13.9% for North America and Western Europe, respectively. While eMarketer doesn't break down ad spending by region, IAB last year estimated that the digital ad spend in the U.S. hit $31 billion in 2011.
--------------------------------------------------------------
In a rare display, 1,000 common dolphins stampeded off the coast of California, captivating onlookers on a whale-watching boat.

Footage of the stampede, captured by tour company Dolphin Safari, has attracted nearly 200,000 views since going online Sunday.

It features the dolphin pod swimming near a boat of whale-watchers who ooh and ahh at the breathtaking sight.

"The line of dolphins could be seen miles away churning up the water," Dolphin Safari wrote on the video's YouTube page. "The dolphins turned and stampeded directly over to the boat. Often this unusual behavior happens without warning or anything frightening them as was the case this time."

Dana Point, Calif., where the footage was taken, has the greatest density of oceanic dolphins per square mile "of anywhere in the world," according to Dolphin Safari.

What do you think of the dolphin stampede? Have you ever captured footage of animals in the wild? Tell us in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Some magic you just have to see to believe. Luckily, this video let's you in on the illusion to truly experience the hilarity of a well-crafted prank.

Magician and YouTube prankster Magic of Rahat stumped drive thru workers by pulling up to the window in a suit that camouflages him with the car seat. Watch as employees go through a variety of emotions, ranging from spooked to questioning their mental health.

SEE ALSO: How to Mystify Drive-Thru Employees

We highly recommend viewers not attempt the prank on the roads. 

 


--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  Running your electronics can get pricey. You already know about Vampire energy and how simply having your TV or DVR plugged in can cost you money. But do you have any idea how much it actually costs to run those devices?

A new gadget being shown at the International CES  MeterPlug  will not only tell you how much your new flat screen TV costs to run, it will send the data to your smartphone via Bluetooth.

Its a small plug that sits between the devices plug and the outlet or power strip. Once paired with your phone, it will tell you your current wattage and costs.

MeterPlug does this by finding the electric rates in your area based on the GPS in your phone. The accompanying free app, which runs on both iOS and Android, lets you turn a device on or off from your phone  welcome news for true couch potatoes.

Why do you need to know all this? When you can see which devices are running up your electric bill, you can make informed decisions about whether or not to leave them plugged in. A gaming system, for instance, thats only used by the kids on the weekend, might be unplugged or turned off on the power strip in order to save on electricity. Or you may learn its cheaper to run your dishwasher or laundry in the evening as opposed to during the day.

The MeterPlug also helps you save energy. It acts as a proximity sensor so if you leave the room for a period of time, it will turn the device off. Come back in and the device turns on.

You can plug only one device into each MeterPlug but theyre not terribly expensive. They cost around $60 each which youll hopefully make up in savings. They can be pre-ordered on Indiegogo now and are expected to ship in April.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  Scientists warn that Hurricane Sandy-sized storms are likely to become biannual and not once-in-a-lifetime events. In other words, it's time to get serious about dangerous weather and finding ways to track and react in real time. In this case, knowledge is power and safety.

Eaton, a company that's been making weather-ready gear for a long time (I have one of its hand-cranked radios at home), unveiled this week at CES 2013 a new set of weather emergency clock radios that could help you get out of the way of the next super storm before it's right on top of you.

The new ZoneGuard and ZoneGuard Plus are battery- and AC-powered weather radios that offer Weather Band, AM and FM frequencies. Most notably, they have an LED-based light on top that tells you if the weather situation is, for instance, safe (green) or red (dangerous) for up to 25 weather locations, based on county codes. They're small enough to sit on an end table, and they perform all the functions of standard clock radios.

The $99 version comes with two tiny, wireless remote modules that you can place in other rooms  additional remotes cost extra. These modules communicate with the base radio and will also alert you to dangerous weather emergencies. Both ZoneGuard radios will ship sometime in Q1.

 

Would you buy one of these radios for your area or do you trust your own weather instincts? Check out the video above and then let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Facebook may finally be over its 20-something phase.

The company's stock hit $30 a share on Wednesday for the first time since mid-July, after several consecutive days of hovering around the $29 mark. The stock opened at $29.63 a share and climbed above $30 in early trading, a gain of more than 3% on the day.

Facebook originally fell below $30 in late May, less than two weeks after the company IPO-ed at $38 a share, and briefly climbed back above it in late June before giving it up again. The stock eventually dipped to as low as $17.55 a share in early September, before rebounding on a pledge by CEO Mark Zuckerberg not to sell stock. It has gradually ticked up since then on the strength of the company's September quarter earnings report and the expiration of its stock lockup periods for employees.

The stock's surge this month has been fueled by analyst optimism for Facebook's revenue options and its strength on mobile as well as the overall momentum of the stock market following a deal by the U.S. Congress to avert the so-called fiscal cliff. The company also sent out invites Tuesday to a press event later this month to "come and see what we're building," fueling speculation about what will be announced.

Several analysts have put out positive forecasts for the company in recent weeks. JP Morgan analyst Doug Anmuth raised his price target on the stock last week to $35 from $29, noting that "marketer feedback on mobile and news feed ads has been very positive." Likewise, William Blair Analyst Ralph Schackart praised the potential of the Facebook ad exchange.

In the span of seven months, the discussion has shifted from whether Facebook can monetize its mobile users to counting the number of ways that it can. "Are the worst days behind it in that investors are aware it's a real business? Absolutely," Brian Wieser, a senior analyst at Pivotal Research Group, told Mashable.

Even so, the stock's roller coaster ride will likely continue as analysts and investors look to the company's upcoming earnings reports to decipher the progress and viability of Facebook's revenue-generation strategies.

"Investors are still going to be skeptical of Facebook and earnings are going to be important going forward," Kevin Pleines, an analyst with Birinyi Associates, said in an e-mail. "I think there is still a lot of uncertainly how well and consistently they can monetize their users and grow revenue."

While the $30 mark is a notable threshold, the real milestone continues to be the IPO price. If and when Facebook's stock returns to $38 a share, Pleines says the worst will really be over.
--------------------------------------------------------------
January is the perfect time to change yourself for the better. It's a new year and a brand new start, which is normally why we set ourselves up for failure by turning lifestyle changes into seeming doable goals.

If you've already strayed from the path, don't feel too bad. Rather than shooting for big changes, make small, feasible goals that eventually lead to victory.

SEE ALSO: 20 WTF New Year's Resolutions

In the meantime, here are 10 people to commiserate with your lack of will-power.
--------------------------------------------------------------
We've all seen (and some of us have been) that person on Facebook  the over-sharer. Some of us may be happy to divulge every intimate detail of our personal lives; others are more private.

Social networks for families (FamilyLeaf, MyFamily.com, Rootsy, Origami), neighbors (Nextdoor), and select groups of family and friends (Path), have bloomed in the past few years. A growing number of us, it seems, want a more intimate online sharing experience.

On FamilyLeaf, as with other social sites meant for small groups, users can share photos and messages with their connections on a secure network.

"Many of our most active users are turned off by Facebook's openness  and they use FamilyLeaf because it's meant only for family," Co-founder Ajay Mehta says.

Connecting to family on Facebook results in limited sharing between family members, however. The presence of younger members limit what their relatives can see. "There's a disconnect," says Mehta. "Older members of the family create Facebook accounts just for family members, but they can't understand the complexities, while younger people tend to restrict their family members' access to their Facebook, even if they accept them as 'friends' in the first place.

"The kind of content users share on both services is simply different, and users love FamilyLeaf because we all have memories, photo albums, and conversations that are meant to stay within the family."

The cofounder of FamilyLeaf, Wesley Zhao, says sites like this are important to his family relationship since Facebook is blocked in his native China. With FamilyLeaf, for the first time in years, his family in China were able to see updates and photos from his American branch of his family.

Other users tell Mashable they use the site for keeping in touch with ill loved ones, or sharing photos of children with extended family members, or sharing photos of special occasions with only a select group.

One FamilyLeaf user from Brazil said they used the site to share their six-year struggle of trying to get pregnant  and, ultimately, the news when they got pregnant. "We like that the site is private, and we can share what we want to without the fear of others seeing and judging." 

 

Keeping your close friends and family privy to your personal information isn't just for modesty and privacy's sake  it can be to protect your safety, too. There have been cases of burglary after people have overshared what goods they have in their homes on Facebook.

Are you a member of a small or niche social site? Why did you join? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  Felicia Day not only plays a geeky gaming developer on the hit online series The Guild, the writer, producer and actress is also a geek in real life.

This years CES 2013 Entertainment Matters Ambassador joined Mashable on the show floor to talk about the intersection of entertainment and tech, geek role models, the rise of nerdy board games, tiny wines and to share a few secrets.

Watch the video above for our complete, one-on-one interview.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Violent collisions in the NFL are getting more attention from players, journalists and medical professionals  and for good reason. We're just beginning to grasp the effects that repeated big hits can have on the brain, and a troubling series of violent deaths of current and former pros has only raised the stakes for trying to understand how to manage the damage players do to themselves and one another.

But what about tackle football at the youth level? Surely, slamming into one another over and over can't be good for growing bodies either, right?

Well, longtime helmet-maker Riddell may have just come up with an innovative solution to track and minimize the damage to young players' brains, according to ESPN.com.

SEE ALSO: Tiny Girl's Stunning Tackle Football Highlights Will Drop Your Jaw [VIDEO]

It's called the InSite Impact Response System, and it uses "sensors, data processing units and display monitors"  in the words of Riddell's official trademark filing  to track blows to the head and their impact on young athletes. In other words: fine-tuned tech and big data to provide definitive answers about when a player should be taken out or allowed to continue playing.

Sensors will be located in the helmet's cushiony interior liner, ESPN reports, and issue wireless alerts to coaches or training staff when a player sustains a hit that exceeds acceptable force measurements. Software will allow young gridiron stars  or, more likely, their coaches and parents  to track accumulated head shots over time, as well.

The technology is expected to be made available for purchase on Riddell's website this spring.

Do you think this can help make tackle football safer for young kids  or should they even be allowed to play at all? Give us your take in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Android users can vouch for the perks of large screens, custom widgets, and now, optimum rice cooking.

Google is expanding its free operating system to rice cookers, refrigerators and other home appliances. Adding the OS to more devices would be useful in helping Google and other manufacturers collect data, and also allow appliances to exchange information.

In the case of rice cookers, the device would be able to determine the type of rice and set cooking instructions. Other intelligent systems could signal an alert from a washing machine to your TV, letting you know when it's done. Check out the video above for more.

The International Data Corporation predicts the market for Internet-connected devices will reach $2 trillion in 2015, and Google is responding to the demand. Android-operating products made an appearance at CES in Las Vegas this week, including LG's Smart ThinQ Refrigerator, which can wirelessly connect and preheat LG's SmartOven.

Appliance makers operating on Android, like Samsung and Panasonic, have the ability to add their own features to the product. Panasonic already provides cloud-based services in Japan for its microwave oven and rice cooker, so users can search for recipes and program instructions using their smartphones.

Would you buy these smart home appliances? Do you think integrating operating systems is convenient for customers? Let us know your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Web surfers in the U.K. were treated Wednesday morning to a Google Doodle celebrating the 150th anniversary of the London Underground, that city's subway transit system.

The Doodle uses the famous map to spell the letters of its name. According to The Independent, the lines and names of the stops are accurate.

The Metropolitan Railway, as its known, opened on this day in 1863. The first journey took place between Paddington and Farringdon. At the time there were seven stations. Since then, 263 more stations have been added. Some 1.17 billion passenger rides took place across the system last year. The New York subway system delivered 1.64 billion rides in 2011

The oldest subway line in the U.S. started in 1897 in Boston. The New York subway system opened in 1904.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Did you get your influenza shots this season? If not, you might want to consider rushing to your local pharmacy as soon as possible after you see this disturbing chart from Google.org.

The non-profit arm of the search giant's empire has run an experiment every year since 2006 that has been remarkably accurate in predicting cases of flu in the U.S. It tracks sudden spikes in flu-based searches (people looking for flu remedies, for example) and places them on a map.

The results impressed the Centers for Disease Control, now a Google partner, since they tracked CDC data so precisely  before the CDC data had even been collated or released. Last year, one study called it an effective early warning system for emergency rooms. Here's the history:

Which is why we should be very concerned about this year's figures. According to Google, we're in the middle of the biggest flu season by far since its records began.

Check out the spike in flu-based searches nationwide in the chart below. It began in December, and isn't quitting yet.

For the first time this year, Google is breaking down results by city. So we can see, for example, that the flu appears to be far more serious in New York City than in San Francisco. (Check out the full Google flu trends site here.)

And if you're looking for the most flu-free spots in the U.S.? The Google map suggests you visit Connecticut, the only state in the union with "moderate" flu activity. (The vast majority of states are listed as "intense;" the others are all "high.")

In terms of cities, you'll want to head for Reno, or Berkeley, or Midvale, UT. (Then again, the negative effects of the journey might cancel out all positive effects of being at your destination.) We're not sure what those cities are doing right, but we're sure it involves a lot of hand sanitizer, hydration, and flu shots early in the season.

How are conditions where you are? Check the interactive embed below (click on "United States" and you'll see results for your area), and let us know how you're doing in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Google-owned Motorola Mobility filed a motion Tuesday with the U.S. International Trade Commission to withdraw two patents that were part of a patent-violation claim against Microsoft.

The search giant owns the two standards-essential patents, called "the H.264 patents," since acquiring Motorola last May. Dropping the claims means that Google is no longer stopping Microsoft from using video-compression technology on Xbox, according to All Things D.

Microsoft wants to license the H.264 patents, but refuses to comply with Google's proposed demands for compensation, which the software giant has said is not "anything remotely close to a reasonable price."

In a February blog post, Microsoft accused Motorola of breaching commitments that it and other companies had previously made to support industry standards, namely, "if they had any patents essential to the standards, they would make their patents available on fair and reasonable terms, and would not use them to block competitors from shipping their products."

Despite withdrawing two patents, Google is still contesting one that is not part of an industry standard, All Things D reported.

SEE ALSO: Google XPhone: Long on Mystery, Short on Details

Last week, Google settled a nearly two-year antitrust probe by the U.S. Federal Trade Commission. As part of the settlement, the company agreed to allow competitors access to license standard-essential patents for smartphones and tablets that it acquired after purchasing Motorola.

What do you think of Motorola Mobility's decision to withdraw the two patents? Discuss in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Google has introduced the ability to pan and zoom large photos on its social network, Google+.

Users can now use their mouse wheel to zoom in or out when watching high-resolution photos. Also, clicking and dragging will pan the photo in any direction.

The same can be done on touch-sensitive trackpads, such as the one on Apple's MacBook Pro.

The new feature, announced by Google's Dave Cohen on his Google+ profile, comes weeks after Google launched full-size backups for Android photos.

What do you think of this new feature? Tell us in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Inspired by one rather inventive trombone player, we decided to take a look over on YouTube to see whether other users were discovering, er, interesting uses for their GoPro cameras.

They've taken GoPros to pumpkins, to swords, to high school bands, to the front of a rollercoaster and even soared it near fireworks.

SEE ALSO: Action! 15 Jaw-Dropping Videos Shot on a GoPro

Take a look through the video gallery above for all this and more. Share in the comments below any weird, wacky and wonderful GoPro clips you've seen online.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Barista: "Morning! What can I get for you?"

Can you imagine a morning coffee shop exchange so infused with Internet delights? Ermahgerd errwesome, right?

T-shirt artist powerpig imagines a world where Starbucks becomes Sterberks and coffee snobs demand java named after the web's grouchiest feline.

SEE ALSO: Internet Feline Luminary Talks Big Data and Facebook Stock

What other memes should powerpig brew? McKayla Macchiato and Teas from Hillary? Share your punniest picks in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  What happens if you're sick and need a doctor, and there's no medical personnel close enough to you? Or if you just need a quick check of your ear or throat for possible infection, but don't want to miss a whole morning of work to get to the doctor?

We all know a trip to a doctor's office is usually not short and convenient, but 

HealthSpot is trying to change that, bringing access to doctors through the use of medical device kiosks.

Using digital technology and partnerships with doctors and hospitals, it's bringing virtual doctors to patients anytime, anywhere.

The walk-in kiosk was on display at the International CES, and I got a chance to get a tour, as well as a video conference with a board-certified medical doctor.

"HealthSpot has built a solution that merges technology with convenience in patient care. Our innovation utilizes todays technology combined with modern medicine to diagnose and treat patients in ways that are affordable, convenient and effective," HealthSpot CEO and founder Steve Cashman said.

The kiosks will be springing up in the coming year in pharmacies, grocery stores, college campuses and hospitals across the country.

Take a look at the video and let us know  would you use a medical kiosk for a quick diagnosis?
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Hobbit's Facebook page this week gave two big thumbs-up to a capella singer Peter Hollens and violinist Jun Sung Ahn for their cover of "Misty Mountains," the theme song from The Hobbit: An Unexpected Journey.

The page, which has 1.3 million Likes, posted the duo's YouTube video and named them "Hobbit Fans of the Week."

"It's every YouTuber's dream to have something like that happen," Hollens tells Mashable. "Allowing my art to be shown to people who don't know about me is the best gift anyone could give me."

His solo a capella version of "Misty Mountains" has also gained traction on Reddit's front page, and YouTube's Twitter account shared the video to its nearly 22 million followers.

This isn't Hollens' first crack at covering a song with help from a violinist. In September, he teamed up with Lindsey Stirling to tackle Game of Thrones title song.

Hollens and Stirling previously joined forces to cover of Skyrim's theme song.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Don't you hate it when you're planning to spend $47,000 for a four-night hotel stay in Washington, D.C., but you're afraid you'll be so busy with luxury that you'll forget to live-tweet the experience?

Finally, the Madison Hotel has you covered.

To honor, somehow, the luxurious experience of being one of the roughly 750,000 people who'll watch President Obama get sworn in for his second term, the hotel now offers a "Inaugural Town and Country" package.

That includes, in addition to a $5,000 gift certificate for clothes and a night in a different hotel, the exclusive services of a dedicated "social media butler."

According to a Madison press release, digital marketer Victoria Devine will "chronicle your Inaugural experience so your friends and family can follow your adventures on Twitter, Facebook, Instagram and Pinterest."

It adds that she will "post on all of your accounts so you dont have to fumble for your phone to catch that perfect Facebook profile picture!"

Devine told the Daily Dot that though she's never butlered before, she does have experience live-tweeting conferences for previous clients.

She noted that she hadn't worked out what, exactly, her services would be, like whether a Social Media Butler works every waking hour, or if she'll be required to come up with witty tweets on the spot.

"We haven't really figured out the details," she said. "I guess we're waiting to see if anyone buys it."

This article originally published at The Daily Dot here
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  There are entire companies based on cases that make your cellphone or tablet waterproof. But what if they were unnecessary? What if your gadgets could survive a dunk in the swimming pool without any kind of external protection?

That's the promise of HzO, a nano-coating that protects small electronics on the inside. The company says its WaterBlock technology defends against moisture at the molecular level, attaching to the circuits in device to repel any liquids. It doesn't add any weight and it doesn't affect performance, HzO claims.

The coating isn't a consumer product  HzO is something device makers would need to incorporate into their manufacturing processes. And they have. HzO, which also put its WaterBlock tech on display at last year's show, will soon appear in gadgets from NavELite, which makes backlit compasses, and Atelier, who will be putting it in a luxury TAG Heuer smartphone.

That's all well and good, but we'd like to see the coating  which protects against dives into even nasty beverages like beer and Powerade  come to Apple and Samsung devices. Like, now, please.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  Pebble got a ton of attention for its smart watch at CES this year. It wasnt the only smart watch company, however, to have a major announcement.

Originally announced at last years CES, Italian-based Im watch announced the next iteration its smart watch. Reminiscent of the iPod nano watches you may have seen walking around, the Im watch consists of a bulky square watch face with an even bulkier strap attached.

Identical in design to last years model, the watch is now running Android 2 the companys own custom version of the operating system specifically for the watch.

Connected to your phone via Bluetooth, the watch can be used to answer calls, receive text messages, and even interact with Facebook and Twitter. Im watchs version of Android is similar to that used on Amazons Kindle, in that you dont have access to the full Android Market.

Stocks, News, Weather, and even a custom Instagram app come pre-loaded on the device, and theres a Marketplace on the watch where you can find and add additional apps.

Were taking one of the Im watches home with us after the show, and will have a more thorough look at the gadget in the coming days.

Would you rather have a smart watch such as Im watch that looks like an iPod nano, or one that uses an e-ink display like Pebble? Let us know your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  No matter what you think, video gaming is not exercise. It's sitting on your butt, twitching your fingers over a dozen multi-colored buttons. You rarely break a sweat. I can tell you though, from personal experience, that if you ever get to try Intellect Motion, you will sweat and bounce around like never before.

Intellect Motion's prototype system, on display here at CES 2013, consists of a steel frame, bungee cords, a computer, some web cams and wearable sensors to put your game-playing butt to work. To test it, I had the Intellect Motion team strap me in (very tightly, I might add), and connect all the bungee cords to me (via the harness). Those cords keep you propped up, but also provide tension that you have to work against.

Once they powered up the game (any open-sourced one running on a PC should work), I had to move my body to run forward and twist to turn from side to side. This is more strenuous than it sounds. That's why they call it "Play for Health."

At $10,000, the system is not cheap. However, Intellect Motion execs told me the product  which is still in the design and funding phase  is intended for pro gaming centers and child care. Check out the video to watch the system  and me  in action.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Sure, iPhone cases protect your device, but with so many creative designs on the market, who's to say they can't double as modern-day art?

Unsurprisingly, colorful and creative new models of iPhone 5 cases are plentiful at the 2013 International CES Conference in Las Vegas, but manufacturer Rearth displayed its new line at the show in beautiful frames to highlight its rich designs.

SEE ALSO: Lego-Inspired iPhone 5 Cases Will Make You Geek Out

Although the cases are for sale and not the framed artwork, we are captivated by the concept. Wood-adorned cases were neatly hung within wood-based frames, while one with the image of Che Guevara was mounted within a framed picture of the Argentinian revolutionist.

Would you display iPhone cases on the wall of your home? What other tech is worthy of framing? Let us know your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It's a widescreen iPod! No, wait, it's a breakthrough Internet communications device with desktop-class email! Best of all, it comes with Cingular phone service and Googles groundbreaking maps!

It was six years ago Wednesday that Steve Jobs strode on stage at the Moscone Center in San Francisco to deliver the Macworld keynote that introduced us to Apple's latest product: something called the iPhone.

It's almost impossible to comprehend how much has changed in just six years. Jobs, alas, is no longer with us; his job has gone to the man whose visual voicemail was played at the keynote, Tim Cook. Apple no longer participates at Macworld. Oh, and the product Jobs introduced that day went on to lead a touchscreen smartphone revolution that has swept the entire planet.

Apple stock was at $87 that day, as Jobs proudly displayed on the iPhone's native Stocks app during the keynote. It surged to $92 by the end of the day. Six years later, it closed at $517  and that's more than $100 below its high water mark.

One of the oddest features of the keynote, from today's perspective, was the presence of Eric Schmidt, then CEO of Google and member of the Apple board. Schmidt ran to the stage to congratulate Jobs and joked that they should merge the companies into "AppleGoo." (His company had bought a startup called Android two years' previously, but the first Android smartphone was still just a twinkle in Schmidt's eye.)

"You can't think of the Internet without thinking of Google," Jobs gushed, as he enthused about the search function in the Safari app and the Maps app the companies had developed together. Four years later, Jobs would be threatening to wage "thermonuclear war" against Android and accusing Schmidt of stealing the idea. Five years later, the companies would be at loggerheads over Maps.

Looking at the keynote again now, and reading the press release Apple issued that day, you can see the company struggling to define the device in terms the public would understand. A hundred million clickwheel iPods  what we now think of as the "classic" iPod  had been sold at that point, so the first definition Jobs reached for was "widescreen iPod."

Watch the full keynote, below, and you'll notice the audience oohing and aahing at things we take for granted today, such as scrolling through your music on the touchscreen.

I happened to be in that audience, and can remember being wowed by the presentation. But I can also remember all the reasons I was skeptical. iPhone (it took the device some time to add a "the" before its name) had a maximum 8GB of memory at a time when the largest iPod was a tremendous 160GB.

All sorts of things were unproven until we could get our hands on one. The screen seemed like it would scratch really easily. Nobody knew how well the error correction would work (or, as it turned out, not work) on the touchscreen keyboard. It cost $599. Cingular, which had just been snapped up by AT&T, wasn't exactly the best cellphone provider in the known universe.

Would it really get as much as five hours of talk time? Would it really ship in June? Would the carrier really refrain from putting all sorts of layers of crap on top of the software, as they did on every single other phone out there?

Still, I, and every tech journalist I knew, were hoping it wasn't too good to be true. The smartphones we had then  yes, we called our Palms and BlackBerrys smartphones  were starting to lose their luster. The time was ripe for something new, especially something with a pinch-and-zoom Internet browser. And all that space for extra apps on the homescreen meant something. Maybe Apple would even let developers submit their own apps.

So happy sixth birthday, iPhone, you little prodigy. How far you've come in such a short space of time. And how little we can imagine where you'll be in another six years. But we're really looking forward to your 2019 keynote.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Redditor icheban has now rendered all of our doodles insignificant.

Using just an iPhone 4S, the app Brushes and a finger, icheban has created charming and fanciful paintings. Check out the gallery above to see some of the creations that include futuristic birds and whimsical cats with ice cream cones.

The video below is a time lapse showing how the artist created one of the images, which he says took about 90 minutes to produce.

And icheban also owns it on DrawSomething, but welcomes adding you as an opponent to prove his chops. Good luck winning that one, all other human beings.

SEE ALSO: Stunning Drawings Put Daniel Radcliffe, Actors in Non-Cartoon Scenes [PICS]

Follow the artist on Instagram (@icheban) to see more of his work.

What was your favorite painting? Share in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Still using your hand to answer your iPhone? Amateur.

This dude demonstrates the bossest way to pick up that ring-a-ling using a special quick-draw contraption. And, in the process of doing so, inadvertently competes for the Biggest Internet Winner.

SEE ALSO: 10 Spectacular Paintings You Won't Believe Were Made on an iPhone

Wigs. Trains. 1970s police TV show rolls. It's all there for your cocked eyebrow watching pleasure.

BONUS: 10 Ways to Instagram Your New iPhone
--------------------------------------------------------------
Several American banks, among them Bank of America, Citigroup, Wells Fargo and others, have been the target of cyberattacks in recent months. While no bank records or personally identifiable information have been stolen from any bank, customers have been complaining of slow or unusable online banking services.

The attacks are coming in the form of Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attacks launched by networked computers in data centers. That's a level above less sophisticated DDoS attacks, which are commonly orchestrated like this: First, hackers gain control of a commandable network of "bot" computers by spreading a virus that infects thousands of unsuspecting computer owners. Then, they turn those machines into weapons, pointing a great deal of bogus traffic at a particular website in the hopes of overloading and crashing the target server.

 

But where are these attacks coming from? Responsibility for many of them has been claimed by the Izz ad-Din al-Qassam Cyber Fighters, which say they're unaffiliated with any government. However, according to United States government officials cited in a recent New York Times report, Izz ad-Din al-Qassam is likely a front for Iran's cyberwarfare efforts.

That makes some degree of sense: Iran has reason to be retaliating in cyberspace after it was hit with U.S. and Israel-backed computer viruses. The Times report claims the attacks' sophistication identifies them as state-sponsored. And the group's name is a reference to Iran-funded Hamas. 

 

"There is no doubt within the U.S. government that Iran is behind these attacks," James A. Lewis, a computer security expert at the Center for Strategic and International Studies, told the Times.

 

But is Iran really the culprit here? Mashable reached out to several security experts for a second opinion.

Roel Schouwenberg, senior researcher at Kaspersky Labs (which identified several recent cyberattacks against Iran), didn't confirm or deny the attacks' origins. However, he doesn't believe the attacks are so complicated they must be the work of a government.

 

We can confirm that the attacks being reported are happening; however, the malware being used, known as ItsOKNoProblemBro, is far from sophisticated," wrote Schouwenberg in an e-mail. "It's really rather simple. Its also only one part of the puzzle but it seems to be effective, which is all that matters to the attackers. Going strictly by the publicly known technical details, we don't see enough evidence that would categorize this operation as something only a nation-state sponsored actor could pull off.

 

Claudio Guarnieri, security researcher at Rapid7, agreed the complexity of the attacks is "disputable" and doesn't necessarily mean a government is behind them.

 

"The malicious code involved is effective but very simple," wrote Guarnieri. "The link with state-sponsored entities could be justified by the fact that there is no direct gain for the attackers besides the disruption of the targets' operations. However, considering that there is no obvious evidence and that it could potentially be the work of generic cybercriminals, it's hard to confirm it.

 

Have you been affected by attacks on banking servers? Do you think Iran is behind these attacks? Share in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Researchers at a South African University are putting a modern twist on a way of life for sub-Saharan shack dwellers.

The iShack, or improved shack, is designed to improve living conditions with solar panels for power and electricity. The prototype shack, located in a settlement outside Stellenbosch, South Africa, stands out from the typical rusty metal and wood dwellings.

A photovoltaic panel sits on the roof to power three lights, a motion sensitive exterior light and a cellphone charger. The floor is made of bricks from a local landfill, and the back wall is built from clay and hay to regulate temperature.

In an area with limited resources, the extended roof overhang helps to collect water, and even the windows are strategically placed for improved air circulation. Check out the video, above, for more details.

More than 60% of Africa's sub-Saharan urban population live in slums. Residents sometimes have to wait years for water or power infrastructure to reach their area.

Each iShack costs around $660, and researchers at the University of Stellenbosch are looking to make it as user and cost-friendly as possible. The project will be tested over the next year thanks to a grant by the Bill and Melinda Gates Foundation, with up to 100 shacks built.

Do you think advancements like the iShack can make an impact in developing countries? Let us know your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Jack Lew, the current White House Chief of Staff, is being widely reported as President Barack Obama's pick for the next Secretary of the Treasury.

The Treasury Secretary, among other more important duties (saving the economy, for instance), gets the privledge of having his signature on every piece of U.S. currency issued during his or her tenure. Lew's signature, however, is  ahem  unique:

That image came from a White House memo which circulated more than a year ago and was confirmed by Ryan Lizza to be Lew's actual signature.

We're not really seeing "Jack," "Lew," or anything that might resemble characters in the English alphabet at all anywhere in there. But hey  it's worked for Lew so far.

So, assuming Lew is formally nominated by Obama, approved by the Senate and doesn't improve his John Hancock before starting as Treasury Secretary, we'll all be seeing a lot more of whatever this is. However, Lizza added Wednesday morning that Lew might get a first-class signature upgrade a la his soon-to-be predecessor:

For more about Lew's potential nomination, visit Bloomberg. Can you decipher Lew's signature?
--------------------------------------------------------------
Its mysterious origin dates back thousands of years. Lore of the fermented dairy drink's seemingly magical health benefits endured through the generations by word-of-mouth. Then, social media raised it to royalty.

Today, a company called Lifeway Foods makes close to $100 million annually selling kefir, a probiotic beverage often compared to yogurt.

"It took 2,000 years to bring this product into the mainstream through word-of-mouth," Lifeway's CEO Julie Smolyansky tells Mashable. "Social just multiplies that so much, so rapidly."

Smolyansky's parents founded the Chicago-based company in 1986. When her father died in 2002, she took over as CEO at just 27 years old. According to Smolyansky, many close family friends believed Lifeway would not endure with her at the helm.

Defying both those expectations amidst a recession that touched nearly every part of the U.S. economy, Lifeway's sales have increased from $12 million to $80 million since 2002. At a time when unemployment became a national issue, somehow a company selling an obscure yogurt drink grew from 70 to more than 300 employees.

Through good timing and by opportunistically embracing technology, Lifeway has been able to reach increasingly large audiences with its salubrious product and unique story.

The Smolyansky family slipped through a crease in the Iron Curtain and emigrated from the Ukraine in the 1970s. They settled in Chicago with notions of living The American Dream.

"They came to America because they were entrepreneurial, and that wasn't possible in the former Soviet Union," Smolyansky says.

The family opened a gourmet deli, stocking it with imported foods they would learn about from traveling to expos around the world. Julie Smolyansky calls her parents "the first foodies" because they carried products found in few other stores at that time, such as Nutella.

SEE ALSO: 10 Instagram Foodie Accounts to Make Your Mouth Water

While at a food show in Germany in 1985, Smolyansky's father, Michael Smolyansky, rediscovered a popular old-world beverage that had not yet made its way to America. The beverage was, of course, kefir. Being an engineer by trade, he decided to set up a factory to produce it in the U.S.

Kefir originated in the Caucasus Mountains, which range from the Black to Caspian Seas in Eurasia. Passed down by oral history, the recipe became popular in Russia during the late 19th century.

One makes it by adding kefir grains (which are not actually grains) to virtually any type of milk  even soy. The mixture should sit in the dark at a moderate temperature for about 24 hours. During that time it becomes fermented and slightly carbonated. Then, remove the grains (which can be reused) and consume the beverage as is, or let it sit for several more days, allowing it to further ferment and become more viscous and tart.

The resulting beverage contains live bacteria, which many believe are beneficial, particularly to one's digestive system. The name "kefir" comes from a Turkish word meaning "good feeling."

There is a mystique surrounding kefir. No one is 100% sure how the "grains" originated. One legend dictates the Prophet Muhammad gave the grains to the orthodox shepherds of the mountains, who then guarded the secret of the "magic" beverage. The grains themselves are a mix of bacteria and yeast that looks like the top of cauliflower.

Kefir grains are generally not used during mass production of the drink, but the producer can achieve a similar probiotic effect through a mixture of yeast and appropriate bacteria. Lifeway Foods does use kefir grains to grow cultures of bacteria, but cannot use the grain traditionally due to the large quantity the company produces daily. Lifeway's kefir also does not contain any alcohol.

Initially, Lifeway spread its message by being in the right place at the right time. The family had fled the U.S.S.R. to start a business in America around the culmination of the Cold War. Smolyansky said the news media loved to tell her family's story; at the time, the country was "fascinated" with all things Russia.

"At the same time, it was the perfect storm where health and natural foods were just starting to pick up," she says.

In lieu of a marketing budget, Lifeway used the media attention to spread its message about the health benefits of kefir.

When Smolyansky found out about social media, she thought it was perfect for Lifeway. Now the company could reach out to people and tell its story on its own terms. She quickly signed up for MySpace in 2008, Twitter early in 2009 and Facebook later that year.

"Everything that we do, we make sure that it's sharable," Smolyansky says. "We become a friend and a trusted source of information."

At first, she managed the accounts herself, but Smolyansky quickly realized it would be a full-time job. She began looking for a community manager in 2009, before there was a common term for the position. Today, Lifeway employs a community staff of five, but Smolyansky says she remains involved in the social media strategy.

"We want to do more and more of it," she says. "You have to be everywhere."

The company has since joined Instagram, and Smolyansky even assembled a Pinterest board to elucidate Lifeway's journey.

SEE ALSO: 5 Social Media Biz Strategies You'll See This Year

If her father was still around, Smolyansky believes he would have loved social media as much as she does.

"He would have been amazed. He was so fascinated with the Internet when it first launched," she says.

The elder Smolyansky even bought the URL for "Kefir.com," which now redirects you to Lifeway's official site. (Those shepherds are probably kicking themselves for letting that one slip through their fingers for the last 2,000 years.)

The company currently has more than 55,000 followers on Twitter and nearly 160,000 Likes on Facebook. Lifeway's social media clout is particularly impressive since kefir is a somewhat obscure product.

While we often think of the Internet as a space for what's fresh and new, kefir helps to show that it is actually a space where anything worthwhile can succeed, from the ancient to the avant-garde.

Photos via Flickr, rofi, Celine Massa and I Believe I Can Fry
--------------------------------------------------------------
LinkedIn on Wednesday announced it had passed an important milestone: 200 million members.

The business-oriented social network had reported in its last earnings call on Nov. 1 that it topped 187 million members and had been growing at a rate of 10 million to 15 million users per quarter last year. Launched in 2003, LinkedIn passed 100 million members in 2011.

LinkedIn's network compares with 1 billion-plus for Facebook, more than 500 million for Twitter and more than 500 million for Google Plus.

According to the company, 74 million users are based in the U.S., 11 million are in the U.K., 7 million are in Canada, 18 million are in India and 11 million are based in Brazil. LinkedIn's fastest-growing country is Turkey, followed by Colombia and Indonesia. Mobile growth is strongest in China, Brazil, Portugal, India and Italy, in that order. Finally, about two people join LinkedIn every second.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Streaming live on Mashable, Involver founder Rahim Fazal will answer questions from readers at 3 p.m. EST (12 p.m. PST) Thursday, Jan 10. As part of the Young Entrepreneur Councils #StartupLab initiative, a virtual mentorship program, Fazal will appear live via video chat broadcast on this site.

Entrepreneur and public speaker Rahim Fazal is the founder of Involver, the worlds largest social media marketing platform, used by more than 1 million companies and many Fortune 500 brands. Involver was recently acquired by Oracle.

While still in high school, Fazal co-founded a web hosting company and negotiated its sale for $1.5 million while taking his senior year final exams. He then started a web services platform business and eventually took it public, becoming one of the youngest directors of a publicly traded company in the United States.

Fazal completed his MBA at Canadas top management school, the Richard Ivey School of Business. Because of his achievements, he was the youngest student in the schools 80-year history accepted without a prerequisite university degree.

A frequent and popular speaker, Fazal's life-planning program, Gettin It, provides alternately hilarious and sobering education to youths on how to truly get what they want out of life.

Fazal was honored at The White House with an Empact 100 Award by Startup America and The Kauffman Foundation. He has been named one of the Top 30 Entrepreneurs Under 30 in America by Inc Magazine and one of the Top 25 Digital Thought-Leaders by iMedi.

#StartupLab is a free virtual mentorship program created by The Young Entrepreneur Council (YEC), an invite-only non-profit organization comprised of over 500 of Americas most successful young entrepreneurs who have, collectively, generated tens of thousands of jobs and hundreds of millions of dollars in revenue. #StartupLab offers millions of entrepreneurs, small business owners and startup founders the tactical advice they need to launch and grow new businesses via live, interactive video chats, educational content and mentorship opportunities  right on Facebook.

Check Mashable tomorrow afternoon at 3 p.m. EST (12 p.m. PST), when Fazal will answer questions from the audience live via video chat.

You can also sign up for an email reminder of the chat by visiting this registration page.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Dallas Mavericks owner and entrepreneurial icon Mark Cuban is in hot water with the NBA again, this time over some costly comments he made on Twitter.

The league fined Cuban $50,000 on Tuesday for a tweet he posted after his Mavericks lost at home to the lowly New Orleans Hornets on Saturday. Here is the tweet in question:

The $50,000 fine comes out to just over $367 per character for the 136-character tweet, but that's just chump change to Cuban, whose net worth tops $2 billion. It's the rough equivalent of a $1 fine for someone earning $40,000 per year.

Cuban is also no stranger to the NBA dinging him for cash since he bought the Mavericks in 2000. According to the Dallas Morning News, he's been docked a total of some $2 million in the 13 years since.

Cuban is exceptionally outspoken and candid on Twitter for a billionaire sports team owner, so it's not entirely surprising that his tweeting thumbs  rather than his sharp tongue  did him in this time.

But for all that trash talk, there's one team's fan base he says he won't mess with online  the Los Angeles Lakers.

There is more Twitter courage in Southern California than probably any other part of the world," Cuban said in November. I could say Kobe tied his shoe laces wrong and Id probably get death threats on Twitter.

What do you think about the NBA fining Mark Cuban for his tweet  Right? Wrong? Too much? Too little? Give us your take in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Viewers of Good Day Philadelphia got a surprise Wednesday morning when Mark Wahlberg stopped by to do the weather and traffic.

Wahlberg, who is promoting his upcoming movie Broken City, delivered the impromptu report on Fox affiliate WTXF. Looking ahead to the seven-day forecast, Wahlberg, joined by Broken City director Allen Hughes, pronounced Wednesday's 54 degrees "perfect golf weather." Wahlberg then slipped into a Philly accent for the traffic report: "Look at this congestion here. We're expecting 40- to 45-minute delays if you're coming east bound on the 676 here. You're going to have some serious problems. Why don't you stop and get yourself a hoagie?"

Wahlberg goofs amiably but he's a long way from topping Sacha Baron Cohen's local news cameo in Borat below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
If you think you have the right stuff to help colonize Mars, you'll soon get your chance to prove it.

The Netherlands-based nonprofit Mars One, which hopes to put the first boots on the Red Planet in 2023, released its basic astronaut requirements on Jan. 8, setting the stage for a televised global selection process that will begin later this year.

Mars One isn't zeroing in on scientists or former fighter pilots; anyone who is at least 18 years old can apply to become a Mars colony pioneer. The most important criteria, officials say, are intelligence, good mental and physical health and dedication to the project, as astronauts will undergo eight years of training before launch.

"Gone are the days when bravery and the number of hours flying a supersonic jet were the top criteria," Norbert Kraft, Mars One's chief medical director and a former NASA researcher, said in a statement. "Now, we are more concerned with how well each astronaut works and lives with the others, in the long journey from Earth to Mars and for a lifetime of challenges ahead."

Mars One plans to launch a series of robotic cargo missions between 2016 and 2021, which will build a habitable Red Planet outpost ahead of the arrival of the first four colonists in 2023. More settlers will arrive every two years after that. There are no plans to return the pioneers to Earth.

SEE ALSO: Mars One: 'Big Brother' on Mars?

The organization will fund most of its ambitious activities by staging a global reality-TV event that follows the colonization effort from astronaut selection through the settlers' first years on Mars.

Mars One, which transitioned from a private company to a nonprofit late last year, has already received a number of inquiries from prospective colonists, officials said.

"Well before the official Astronaut Selection Program, we received more than 1,000 emails from individuals who desire to go to Mars," Suzanne Flinkenflogel, Mars One's communications director, said in a statement. "We are working hard to launch our selection campaign as soon as possible, to open the doors to everyone who aspires to do something tremendous in their lifetime."

Final astronaut candidates will be selected after review by Mars One experts and a global TV event. Those chosen will be employed by Mars One during their Earth-based training and for the length of their time on the Red Planet, officials said.

This article originally published at Space.com here
--------------------------------------------------------------
With wedding season a mere five months away, the invitations will begin pouring in just in time to replace those Christmas cards.

And when they do, you'll first want to rip your hair out and then begin the tedious RSVP process.

But sometimes you just need to be able to say something a little bit more elegant than "attending" or "not attending." You need to express yourself, and what other better way than through the magic of memes.

SEE ALSO: Watch Nearly 4 Minutes Of Wedding Disasters

Redditor babywhiz has blessed us all with that opportunity with this compilation of the best RSVPs ever created.

So even if your high school BFF4eva sends you an invitation covered with butterflies and glitter and singing babies, feel free to email them back a meme of good ol' creepy Bill Clinton.

Or you can print it out and mail it back with the included postage so it seems more legit.

Which one is your favorite? Would you ever use these for your wedding? Share in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Windows Live Messenger will officially retire this March, Microsoft announced Tuesday in a mass email to the chat service's users.

On March 15, all users will be switched over to Skype, which the software giant acquired for $8.5 billion in October 2011.

"We are retiring the existing Messenger service globally ... and bringing the great features of Messenger and Skype together," Microsoft said, adding that Messenger will continue to be available in mainland China. Last November, Skype president Tony Bates confirmed in a blog post that Messenger would be shuttered in the first quarter of 2013.

The company also encouraged users to "update to Skype," and sign in using their Microsoft account (formerly known as a "Windows Live ID"), which includes an email address and password. All Messenger contacts will be included in Skype upon sign-in, the email said.

Those who are signed in to Messenger on desktop will see a banner notification to "upgrade," it added. When clicked, a pop-up window to install Skype will appear, and will automatically uninstall Messenger.

Until March 15, Messenger "will continue to work as you know it today," Microsoft said, but after that date, users won't be able to sign in, and will be prompted to switch to Skype.

Starting last November, Messenger users had the ability to talk to their contacts using Skype.

Last October, the VoIP service released a new version of its desktop client for Mac and Windows that included integration with Facebook and Microsoft accounts.

Messenger users, do you plan to switch over to Skype before March 15? What will you miss  if anything  about Windows Live Messenger? Tell us in the comments below.

[via The Next Web]
--------------------------------------------------------------
If you follow anybody remotely interested in politics on Twitter, you've probably seen a reference to "mint the coin" fly across your stream at some point this month. And if you've seen that reference, you might have some questions: What coin? Who's minting it? What's it for?

Here's the skinny: According to the Treasury, the government hit its Congressionally-approved spending limit on Dec. 31 of 2012. While raising the debt ceiling has traditionally been a mostly uncontroversial practice, many congressional Republicans are now refusing to raise the debt ceiling unless Democrats agree to spending cuts.

Raising the debt ceiling allows the federal government to pay back loans it already owes. If the debt ceiling is not raised, the government will default on those loans, potentially doing great damage to the still-fragile economy. The Treasury is keeping things afloat for a few weeks by use of "extraordinary measures," but a political agreement will likely soon be needed to avoid economic catastrophe.

If you're feeling at this point a bit of deja vu, that's perfectly normal: The situation is very much a repeat of a 2011 crisis. The debt ceiling was ultimately raised, but America's credit rating was downgraded by ratings agencies largely because a debate over raising it happened at all.

The political stand-off around the debt ceiling brings us to Mint the Coin. Mint the Coin started as a "are they joking or not?" style proposal among some leading politics and economics Twitterati, the most prominent of which is Business Insider's Joe Weisenthal, using #MintTheCoin.

The idea? Make use of a legal loophole which gives the Treasury Department the legal authority to mint platinum coins in whatever denomination it sees fit to create a $1 trillion (not a typo) coin (or a few coins in somewhat lesser amounts), deposit it at the Federal Reserve and then use that money to pay off bills. It would effectively sidestep Congress entirely, theoretically affording legislators and the president time to work on a longer-term solution.

A similar idea was floated in 2011 during the last major debt ceiling crisis, but failed to gain the traction of today's Mint the Coin campaign  speaking to Twitter's enhanced ability to galvanize movements.

Mint the Coin may sound like something too easy  or too ridiculous  to work. However, it has the approval of a former head of the U.S. mint and it has been hailed as a way to "avoid catastrophic economic developments and help head off government by blackmail" by Nobel Prize winner Paul Krugman.

On the other hand, it has been derided as "frivolous" by the Guardian's Heidi Moore, who along with others think it would invite economic disaster of its own (she also doubts it deserves the media attention it's been getting). Reuters' Felix Salmon believes it would "effectively mark the demise of the three-branch system of government" by allowing the executive to "steamroll" its legislative counterpart and is the product of minds focused on economics rather than politics.

SEE ALSO: Is Twitter Helping or Harming Political Journalism?

The White House petition to Mint the Coin, for whatever it's worth, has more than 7,000 signatures  though it needs at least 25,000 signatures to get a response from the administration.

Would the Obama administration actually mint a trillion dollar platinum coin? Probably not  but White House secretary Jay Carney was more or less forced by NBC's Chuck Todd on Wednesday to admit the government hasn't taken the plan off the table.

Should they Mint the Coin? Share in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Although moms may regulate cellphone use for their kids, they definitely love spending one-on-one time with their own smartphones.

An infographic from pregnancy app BabyBump shows that 93% of moms spent more time shopping on their cellphone in 2012 than in 2011, while 34% did more than half their shopping from their mobile device last year.

When it comes to what they bought, moms relied heavily on input and recommendations from other moms (58%).

And why shouldn't they turn to their smartphones? We've seen dozens of studies that suggest smartphones make parenting easier by lowering back-to-school stress to keeping parents organized and even acting as emergency kits.

More than 1,300 people were interviewed for this survey.

How often do you use your smartphone while shopping? Tell us in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Will this be the Scottie dog's last lap? Or will it be game over for the race car? Hasbro has invited fans of Monopoly to decide which iconic board-game piece will be replaced by a new token.

Using Facebook or Twitter, fans have until Feb. 5 to tell Hasbro if the battle ship, top hat, Scottie dog, race car, iron, wheelbarrow, thimble or shoe should go "to jail." They then have the option to the choose the replacement token from a diamond ring, toy robot, cat, guitar or helicopter.

Those interested can vote on Monopoly's Facebook Page or by using the Twitter hashtag, #tokenvote, to share their favorite token.

Monopoly was invented in the early 1900s by Elizabeth Magie, though the version we know today was popularized by Charles Darrow. According to Parker Brothers, Darrow's nieces originally suggested using charm bracelet charms as game pieces, thus the tokens were born. Six of the tokens were released in 1935, while the Scottie and wheelbarrow were released in the early 1950s; the lineup hasn't changed since.

After the votes are counted, Hasbro said it will discontinue the current version of Monopoly, and replace it with a version that includes the new token later in 2013. There will also be a special edition of the game with all the old and new tokens in a gold-colored box.

Which Monopoly token is your favorite? Let us know in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
We all know the dance, but this is an entirely different kind of moonwalk.

In this video, accomplished climber, high-liner and BASE jumper Dean Potter scales Cathedral Peak in Yosemite National Park before walking a tightrope between two jutting rock formations. All of this in front of a beautiful background of the rising full moon.

SEE ALSO: NASA May Give the Moon a Smaller Moon of Its Own

Photographer Michael Shaefer captured the scene from more than a mile away as part of National Geographic Explorer's "The Man Who Can Fly." Schaefer used GPS and an app called The Photographer's Ephemeris to predict where the moon would rise relative to his vantage point.

Have you seen a more amazing moon shot than this? Let us know in the comments section below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Panasonic has launched two new Toughpad tablets at the 2013 International CES show, one running Android and the other based on Windows 8 Pro.

The FZ-G1 (pictured above) runs Windows 8 Pro and is quite a powerful beast, with a 10-inch, 1,920x1,200 pixel display, a 1.9GHz Intel i5 processor, up to 8GB of RAM, a 128GB SSD, while the microSD slot is an option.

On the connectivity front, it packs USB 3.0 and 2.0 ports, wired LAN, Bluetooth, Wi-Fi and  optionally  a Verizon LTE or 3G chip.

The Android-based JT-B1 (pictured below) sports a 7-inch, 1,024x600 display, a 1.5GHz dual-core processor, 1GB of RAM and 16GB of storage memory, further expandable via microSD cards. It also has a 13-megapixel camera on the back and a 1.3-megapixel one on the front.

As far as connectivity goes, it comes with Bluetooth, Wi-Fi and an optional LTE+3G chip.

As is customary for Panasonic's Toughpad line of products, both tablets are resistant to drops, fluid ingress and extreme temperatures.

The difference in power is also reflected in the price, as the Toughpad FZ-G1 will cost $2,900 when it arrives in March, while its smaller Android brother comes in February and costs $1,300.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Pebble smart watch will start shipping to Kickstarter backers on Jan. 23, 2013.

Pebble broke Kickstarter records, raising over $10 million for its smartphone companion watch. Nearly 69,000 backers supported the project.

The announcement was made during Pebble's CES press conference. The company says will take 6 - 8 weeks to get the Pebble watches out to backers and ramp into full production.

This story is developing and we'll update as more details become available.
--------------------------------------------------------------
CBS's televised broadcast of the People's Choice Awards will also be aired on Xbox 360, Microsoft's gaming and entertainment-streaming console.

Xbox LIVE Gold subscribers in the United States can tune in and interact with the festivities starting at 8 p.m. EST with the red carpet event. The ceremony begins at 9 p.m. EST.

Using the console's controller, viewers will be able to answer polls and trivia questions and give their two cents about the red carpet shenanigans, the show and performances in real time.

The People's Choice Awards honors celebrities and their work in music, film and TV. Performers on tap include Christina Aguilera, Jason Aldean and Alicia Keys.

SEE ALSO: 'Walking Dead' Unveils New Poster and Teases Super Bowl Ad

Notable attendees are Jennifer Aniston, Ellen DeGeneres, Robert Downey Jr., Josh Hutcherson, Jennifer Lawrence, Chris O'Donnell, Marisa Tomei and The Wanted.

Xbox also offered streams last year for the presidential debates and Video Game Awards.

People have cast more than 400 million votes in the many People's Choice Awards categories via the show's website, Facebook app and Twitter.
--------------------------------------------------------------
That's the slogan of the forthcoming Wonderful Pistachios Super Bowl campaign featuring South Korean pop star Psy. The rapper achieved worldwide recognition last year for his music video "Gangnam Style," the first to hit 1 billion views on YouTube.

The spot doesn't air until Feb. 3, but Wonderful Pistachios is already trying to build buzz for the campaign, namely on Facebook, where a related photo sweepstakes will kick off this week.

Although some fans are enthusiastic, many took to the comments of Wonderful Pistachios' Facebook page to air their disappointment with the choice. Citing an anti-American rap song Psy produced in 2004, Tiffany Timmons Carter wrote, "This guy should get no endorsements. Having a song about killing Americans is disgusting and should not be tolerated."

"No you didn't!" wrote Tina Arkus Obert further down the thread. "I thought I loved wonderful pistachios! I now question your judgement [sic]."

This marks Psy's first appearance in a U.S. TV commercial.
--------------------------------------------------------------
If you think about it just enough, you can make a helicopter fly.

The Puzzlebox Orbit, which launched on Kickstarter last November and debuted Tuesday at the 2013 International CES conference in Las Vegas, is making waves with its brain-controlled helicopter toy. We saw it in person, and were tickled by the ease with which you could pilot the device.

From NeuroSky  the same company behind the quirky brain-controlled Necomimi Cat Ears  the helicopter can actually move up and down via brainwaves.

Here's how it works: By wearing a Bluetooth headpiece with sensors, the Puzzlebox Orbit converts brainwave data into flight commands. The helicopter shoots into the air when you concentrate hard, and can be lowered when you relax the mind. Infrared signals are transferred to an accompanying iOS or Android app to measure your level of concentration. Users can set up focus-goals on the app ahead of time, and the controls work once your concentration reaches those sweet spots.

The Puzzlebox Orbit also runs on an open-source platform, so developers can hack and personalize their experience.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A federal court has ruled that a Texas student who refuses to wear a school-mandated RFID tracking badge must at least wear an identification badge without a tracking chip or else change to a school without such a system.

John Jay High School in San Antonio, Texas began requiring students to wear badges with RFID tags to track students' on-campus movements at the beginning of the fall semester.

Andrea Hernandez, 15, refused to wear the badge on religious grounds, claiming it was the "mark of the beast," according to Wired. She was suspended for disobeying the new rule and later sued the district. A temporary injunction allowed her to continue her studies untracked.

However, a federal court this week overturned that injunction after Hernandez refused the district's offer to allow her to wear a chip-less identification badge.

The court found the deal was "reasonable" and "removed [Hernandez's] religious objection from legal scrutiny altogether." Hernandez must now either wear the badge or transfer to a school without the program.

The Rutherford Institute, which is representing Hernandez, is planning an appeal to the 5th U.S. Circuit Court of Appeals. Hernandez has been given until Jan. 18 to decide whether to don the badge or change schools.

Hernandez's district, the Northside Independent School District, has two high schools experimenting with RFID tracking to get better data on class attendance rates, to which education funding is directly tied. The district has over a dozen high schools, though some are specialized towards teaching skills for particular careers.

RFID chips use radio frequencies to transfer information between the chip and a receiver. They don't require line-of-sight, allowing them to be embedded within documents or even under skin. Thus, they're commonly used in new passports to track movement across borders and embedded into domestic pets for identification purposes.

The use of RFID tags to track humans, however, has been the focus of many debates over personal privacy. For that reason, it's interesting that Hernandez argued against wearing the tag on religious and not privacy grounds.

Should schools be able to track their students' movements around campus? Share your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
TaskRabbit is an e-commerce website where you'll find people to perform small tasks like removing decorations and pet sitting in exchange for money. And if you're aspiring comedian and illustrator Bryan Bruner, you'll also find a reason to quit smoking.

Bruner, 36, was hired through TaskRabbit in April to assemble some Ikea furniture at the home of the marketing director for Healthline, a website that provides tips on health topics ranging from addiction to pregnancy.

"We started chatting and I showed her some of my robot drawings and she said, 'These are really good,'" Bruner told the Daily Dot. "About three weeks later I got a call from her telling me to come to her office to talk about an idea."

The idea was to use Bruner's illustrations in a 21-page comic featuring robot Ash Bender on a journey to quit smoking. The only catch was that Bruner would also have to quit smoking himself.

"I was like, no, you guys are a pain in the butt to work with and I'm going to smoke even more now," Bruner recalled.

Bruner finally came around shortly after New Year's and has since been smoke-free for about a week. In order to cope with the withdrawal, Bruner is encouraging others to quit by tweeting photos of themselves via Instagram using the hashtag #smokingrobots. Bruner will be selecting photos from Twitter through the rest of the week and turning them into robot illustrations (like the one he did for the Daily Dot, below).

"I definitely feel more energetic even though I haven't done much," Bruner said. "Usually my house is a messy place but now it's like tweaker tight. Instead of just going outside and smoking a cigarette, I"m cleaning, mopping up. It's amazing when you fuck with the oxygen content in your blood, how much that changes you."

After 19 years worth of smoking and life, Bruner has changed a lot.

Bruner grew up in Las Vegas as a dirt bike riding, punk rock music loving teen who was "just trying to graduate high school."

"When you're the first born, it is already intense. You're the prototype," Bruner said. "My parents were really strict and I guess smoking was my sort of rebellion."

Bruner started smoking at the age of 17 and never looked back. After high school he moved to California to play college volleyball but ended up back in Vegas shortly after. He tried graphic art at a local Las Vegas college for about two semesters, but ultimately quit to become a construction worker, a foreman, and "the next thing you know, I'm running parts of a big company all before I was 30."

In 2008, Bruner sold his car and possessions and moved to New York to try his hand at stand-up comedy while staying on his manager's floor. While waiting for his sets, he would doodle to help fight the anxiety and panic attacks. Little did he know these doodles would ultimately help him quit smoking and probably save his life.

"[Smoking] was definitely not a smart decision," Bruner said. "I think, it's more of a testament to what these damn robots have done for me. They've gotten me through a really hard breakup, relationship, and helped me quit smoking. All these robots need to do is help me make $10 and I'll be happy."

This article originally published at The Daily Dot here
--------------------------------------------------------------
A word game app not developed by Zynga has topped the most-downloaded iPhone apps chart and looks like the first breakout hit of 2013.

Ruzzle, which was created by the Stockholm-based MAG Interactive, has topped AppData's chart of the top iOS apps and racked up 11 million users so far. According to MAG Interactive's Twitter stream, the growth has really picked up in the past few weeks:

MAG also notes on its site that "over 12 million players" have downloaded the app.

What's driving the growth is unclear. Ruzzle has been out since March 2012. As the Wall Street Journal's Digits blog notes, the game is "strikingly similar" to Zynga's Scramble With Friends, which came out almost exactly a year ago. Both games are a variation on Boggle, which challenge users to find words within a jumbled grid within a set amount of time. In the case of Ruzzle, the time limit is two minutes. Like Zynga's games, you can invite your Facebook friends to play with you.

According to AppData's chart, Scramble With Friends is not among the top 15 most-downloaded iOS apps. Ruzzle is also number five on AppData's list of Android apps. Scramble With Friends didn't crack the top 15 of that list, either.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  Samsung's massive 85-inch 4K Ultra HD TV is a thing of beauty. When you look at the screen, it's more like looking out a window  the images are that real. Even so, as we all watched Samsung introduce its latest line of cutting-edge electronics and appliances at CES 2013, we were all well aware that the on-screen video was specially prepared high-resolution footage, and 4K content has yet to arrive. Samsung promises that will change.

Tim Baxter, President Samsung Electronics, is optimistic, but suggested patience. "I think you'll see the content start to develop. It's not going to be an overnight proposition," he said.

It's a familiar tale. HDTV's still deliver higher resolution output than most TV networks broadcast. To get the full benefit of your 1080p screen, you need to watch a Blu-ray movie. And let's not forget that early HD wars between Blu-ray and HD DVD further slowed down the HD content transition.

While it's unlikely we'll see a replay of that scenario, Baxter does see parallels. He said, "When HDTVs first hit the market, there was no content available." The Samsung UN85S9000 UHD TV will face a similar situation when it's released.

In the meantime, Baxter said the 4K sets will upgrade your HD content to the 3820 x 2160 screen resolution of Ultra HD TV. Baxter said that will serve as a bridge until the new content arrives.

Samsung has yet to announce pricing and availability for the giant TV.

Baxter also talked to Mashable about the personalization of technology and Samsung's quad-core-processor-sporting Evolution Kit TV Upgrade module. He said pricing has still not been set for the kit. Watch the video above for the full interview.


--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  Of all the products on display at CES 2013, Samsung's dual-view OLED TV has the largest cool-to-perplexing ratio. Yes, it's incredible that two people can look at the same screen and watch totally different programs, but why would anyone ever want to do that?

Conflicts over what to watch on TV are often sorted in one of three ways:

So why have a dual-view TV? A couple of reasons: If one TV in the home is clearly "the best" screen, the second TV may not be the best option, and sometimes schedules simply don't permit watching things later. Also, if one screen is the only place where a device resides (say, a game console), it may be difficult to move to another room.

The gaming scenario is actually one of the best examples of a dual-view use case. Think two gamers playing together (or against each other) in a title like Call of Duty. Often this kind of scenario is handled with split-screens, but what if the two players could just don glasses to see their own full-screen POV  on the same screen?

That would be awesome, but it would be only as good as the technology allows. I took a brief eyes-on look at Samsung's dual-view TV at CES, and if it becomes a product, there's nothing to worry about on the execution.

Checking out two (count 'em!) 3D signals on the set, each looked super-sharp. Samsung says the TV is capable of delivering two separate views at full HD (1080p), and that definitely came across. The TV showed the hovering droplets of a slow-motion champagne uncorking (it was a demo reel) vividly.

You need to wear special glasses (see the pic below) to see one signal or the other (to the naked eye, the picture looks terribly ghosted). Pushing a button on the top, the glasses toggle between the two signals quickly. There was sometimes a slight delay for the audio to catch up, but nothing major.

The audio, however, was really terrible, but that's easily fixable with better earphones. The demo was a proof-of-concept, after all, and any final product would doubtless improve details like this. Though, for anyone who spent a lot of money on a great speaker system, relegating audio to glasses/headphones would really hurt.

Samsung's dual-view OLED set may seem like a silly idea at first glance, but I wouldn't complain about it becoming a real product. There would be the whole question of formatting and software support, but the benefits, especially for gaming, could be well worth it.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  Samsung unveiled at the 2013 International CES on Wednesday its latest processor for smartphones, the Exynos 5 Octa. The company says this new processor delivers twice the performance of its predecessor, Samsung's Exynos 4 Quad.

This means new phones from Samsung are going to be noticeably faster.

Announced by Dr. Stephen Woo, president of device solutions for Samsung, the processor includes two sets of four cores each. "It's also smart enough to save energy when running certain tasks, too," Woo said.

Samsung said it is focusing on three areas: processing, memory and display technology.

"There are more than 6 billion mobile devices in use and more than a half a billion smartphones sold. As users become more attached to devices, they become more sophisticated in their devices. They notice a difference in weight, size and form factor."

What is driving these advancements? Their components," Woo said to a packed room. "As a consumer you don't think about components often, but that is okay ... if you want to see where the real action is and where the industry is going, you have to pull back that layer to where the magic happens. We believe the right component DNA drives innovation and discovery."
--------------------------------------------------------------
What happens when your beloved brand runs into public relations trouble? A public scandal or major mishap, perhaps? If you're really in love with the brand, you'll stand by it, researchers say.

In fact, new research finds that people are more likely to defend that brand when they have a personal connection with it.

To prove this, Angela Y. Lee, a professor of marketing at the Kellogg School of Management, Monika Lisjak, a doctoral candidate at the Kellogg School, and Wendi L. Gardner, an associate professor of psychology at Northwestern University, examined the relationships people have with brands in a series of experiments.

The research consisted of four experiments involving both Starbucks and Facebook, which were chosen because of past controversies. The researchers wanted to know how willing people were to stick with a favorite brand even in tough times.

"If you believe that a brand is part of you, and you read something negative about it, how are you going to react?" asked Lee. "Are you going to stop using it? Or do you use it even more? A brand is very intangible  in a way, the brand goes even beyond the product itself or the actual object. So from a psychological perspective, it's interesting to consider the dynamic relationship between a consumer and the brands that they consume."

The researchers found that people were actually more likely to defend brands even after controversy. In particular researchers found that self-conscious, low self-esteem individuals were most likely to rate companies more favorably after critiques and controversy.

The only caveat to that research is that people rated brands less favorably after changing focus to other areas of their lives where they can affirm themselves.

"If Starbucks is part of you, and you read something negative about Starbucks, you feel attacked," said Lee. "But I now give you another way to feel good about yourself. Then, once that need is being satisfied, you may not feel that you need to defend Starbucks anymore."

This article originally published at BusinessNewsDaily here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Dust off that landline  household phones may be making a comeback with a new Kickstarter project.

The Home Phone, designed by French husband and wife team UrbanHello, is a smartphone for the whole family, allowing shared conversations with its automatic hands-free mode. When placed on a surface, the 360-degree loudspeaker activates, and its use reduces electromagnetic wave exposure by 99%.

You may not trade your iPhone in just yet, but the Home Phone's sleek, modern design and HD sound is a minimalist alternative to bulky, cordless home devices on the market.

"It's a device which is so beautiful it can be given to someone as a present just like a bouquet of flowers," Herve and Catherine Artus say on their Kickstarter page.

With a keypad hidden at the bottom and two discreet OLED displays at either end, it doesn't even look like a phone. Check out the video, above, for more.

UrbanHello's Kickstarter campaign launched Jan. 6 after winning the "Innovations Award" at CES 2013 in Las Vegas. After two days, the project has reached $23,152 of its $160,390 goal.

Backers have until Feb. 14 to fund the project and get their own Home Phone at a discounted price. Without the discount, it'll cost an estimated $169 when the product launches.

Don't remember how to use a landline? Like most house phones, the Home Phone charges on its base, and can be plugged into an existing phone line with its connector. The "new generation of home phones" also stores up to 20 contacts and displays caller ID on both screens.

Do you think this reinvention can save household phones? Let us know what you think in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Like most major sports these days, soccer fans, players and clubs have an active presence on Twitter. Stars use the network to connect with fans  and sometimes get in a bit of hot water. Fans use it to debate matchups and strategies  but have also found themselves arrested and even thrown in jail for getting too out of control. And clubs use the network to reward loyal followers, and keep up in the world of digital marketing.

The infographic below, which comes by way of the online-betting site Unibet, takes a deeper look at Twitter's soccer landscape. It delves into which players have the most Twitter followers (and how that relates to their financial value), which clubs have the most success attracting followers and, most interestingly, who the top stars do and don't follow online.

For the fuller picture, check out it out below. Then let us know what you think in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  There's no lack of speaker docks and Bluetooth-enabled speakers here at the International CES 2013, but I've been keeping my eye open for solutions for people who uprgaded to the iPhone 5. Short of having Apple's 30-pin-to-Lightning connector adapter  which doesn't work when my case is on my phone  many of the devices, speakers and chargers I used to use are now obsolete.

I'm told by many companies Apple hasn't yet approved a whole lot of devices, specifically the battery-pack cases I've been searching the halls for. But I did find one speaker dock that not only sounds good, it won't become useless to you each time you change your phone.

The Idapt S2 speaker system is a speaker dock that plays nicely with both Android and Apple devices. That's because it has two docking options, three ways to play your music, an alarm clock and for those who still listen, and an FM radio.

You can stream your music via Bluetooth or dock your device using one of their interchangeable connectors. The speaker comes with two of them; micro USB and either 30-pin or lightning, and you can purchase extras for additional devices. And it charges your device while it plays.

Watch the video as the Idapt rep shows me how it works.

Which connectors do you use most often? Would a system like this help you stay current?
--------------------------------------------------------------
On Aug. 12, 2009, President Obama awarded the Medal of Freedom to Stephen Hawking. "From his wheelchair he's led us on a journey to the farthest and strangest reaches of the cosmos," the president noted as he bestowed the award  the United States's highest civilian honor  on the physicist, cosmologist and author. "In so doing he has stirred our imagination and shown us the power of the human spirit here on Earth."

While at the White House to accept the award, Hawking gave a brief acceptance interview to mark the occasion, discussing curiosity and knowledge, exploration and discovery, limitation and ignoring it. Now, in honor of the professor's 71st birthday yesterday, the White House is sharing never-before-seen footage of that talk.

"The thrill of discovering something no one knew before is like nothing else I know," the professor says in the video below. His body may be challenged, Hawking notes; but his ailment  ALS, also known as Lou Gehrig's disease  has not limited him. "It has not prevented me from exploring the universe with my mind," Hawking says, "or having three wonderful children."

This article originally published at The Atlantic here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Robots have had the power to replace many things reserved for humans in the past, but could they ever replace stuffed animals?

Amanita Design is now taking pre-orders for a $30 plush robot, which you can cuddle up with instead of a teddy bear.

The stuffed toy is modeled after Josef, the main character of Machiniarium, the multi-platform adventure game.

SEE ALSO: 10 Amazing Robots We Met in 2012

The plush Josef comes with some perks  you can store your things inside its 25x10 centimeter trunk.

Do you think stuffed robots are the next big thing in toys for young kids? Let us know in the comments if you'd prefer youngsters stick to plush animals.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  Ever have the fire alarm battery start to annoyingly chirp in the middle of the night? Or how about a kids' toy randomly make noises throughout the day? A new concept allows you to turn off AA-batteries remotely via your iPhone or iPad to silence your things when needed.

Called the Tethercell, AA-batteries fit snugly in this small case, which features a computer chip on the back. Instead of popping in a standard battery, it goes into the Tethercell and is then inserted into whatever device you want to control. No matter how many AA batteries are required to run the device, only one Tethercell is needed.

After it's cozied in its battery compartment and the device is turned on, an accompanying app  Tetherboard  must be downloaded from the Apple App Store and synced via Bluetooth to the mobile device. The app features controls, as well as a warning feature to alert users when batteries are starting to get low.

SEE ALSO: Beyond Barrel Roll: 10 Hidden Google Tricks

Co-founder Trey Madhyastha told Mashable the concept came about when his child's toy started making noises in the middle of the night.

"It said, 'peek-a-boo, I see you' and freaked everyone out," he said. "Although Tethercell is intended for controlling toys now, we eventually see potential for it with fire alarm batteries and warning users when it's getting low to avoid that annoying chirping sound."

What electronic would you want to control remotely? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  Are we ready for self-driving cars? Google's got some competition on the road these days. Toyota introduced its Advanced Active Safety Research Vehicle at the 2013 International CES.

We got a chance to catch up with Jim Pisz, corporate manager of North American business strategy for Toyota to learn a little more about the car and why they're building it. As it turns out, while Toyota is on the road to developing an autonomous-driving car, they're really most interested in what they learn from the car.

Pisz says this Lexus-branded car is a research vehicle with a wide range of tech. That includes LIDAR, which is a group of lasers spinning 10 times per second, creating a 360 degree, birds-eye view of what's around the car. That works along with radar on the front and sides, high-def cameras and multiple GPS devices. The thing is literally bristling with tech. All this collective wizardry determines the car's exact location, as well as the location of vehicles and objects around it.

While the goal, he says, is for the car to recognize, process and react, Toyota believes an autonomous car is not a driverless car, at least initially and for the foreseeable future.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Verizon announced Wednesday that it expects to have activated nearly 10 million smartphones in the fourth quarter, making this its strongest quarter yet for smartphone sales.

The company revealed in an SEC filing that it expects smartphone activations to total 9.8 million for the quarter thanks in part to a "higher mix of Apple smartphones."

The announcement comes one day after AT&T said it sold a record 10 million smartphones in the quarter. It's like that sales for both carriers were helped by the launch of the iPhone 5, which was released in September.

It's important to note that the total number of activations may not perfectly translate to the total number of sales, as one can activate a contract on an old phone without buying that device from the carrier.

More details will likely come out when the companies release their quarterly earnings reports later this month. Verizon is scheduled to report its fourth-quarter earnings on Jan. 22 and AT&T is scheduled to report its earning on Jan. 24.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Walking Dead returns Feb. 18 after a mid-season hiatus. Fans got a taste of what's to come today when AMC teased the back half of season three with a new poster.

Emblazoned with the phrase "AN EYE FOR AN EYE," the poster hints at the impending battle between The Governor (and his minions) and Rick Grimes (and his fellow survivors).

SEE ALSO: 'The Walking Dead' Gets 'Dear Photograph' Treatment [PICS]

Meanwhile, actor Norman Reedus' Instagram account and the show's Twitter account this week also gave fans glimpses of The Walking Dead's Super Bowl ad, which will air Feb. 3.

BONUS: 'Walking Dead' Magazine Is Now on iPad, Nook and Kindle Fire
--------------------------------------------------------------
A Ryan Gosling "Hey Girl" meme reference slipped in among the barrage of tweets Warner Bros. Pictures sent this week to promote the Jan. 11 premiere of Gangster Squad.

The tweet says, "Hey girl," and links to this promo art, which features Gosling:

SEE ALSO: 200 Ryan Gosling-Themed Easter Eggs Hidden in New York City

Gangster Squad, which tells the story of the Los Angeles Police Deparment's efforts to fight a mafia boss in 1949, was originally set to hit theaters on Sept. 7. But Warner Bros. postponed its release and tweaked a gun scene because of the deadly Colorado shooting spree.

BONUS: Hey Girl, Foursquare Ryan Gosling Memes Should Be on Your Radar
--------------------------------------------------------------
Much controversy and mystery has surrounded Google's Eric Schmidt and former New Mexico Governor Bill Richardson's trip to North Korea. U.S. officials have criticized it, calling it ill-timed given the regime's allegedly illegal launch of a satellite last month. And ever since the first rumors about the trip came out, it hasn't been clear what its purpose was, with Richardson simply calling it a "private humanitarian trip."

For Google's executive chairman, it turns out the endeavor was all about Internet freedom.

Schmidt and Richardson told the Associated Press that they are in North Korea to urge regime officials to open up its citizen's access to the Internet and to cellphones. Richardson also said they're asking Pyongyang to halt their missile launches and nuclear tests as well as give a fair treatment to an American citizen detained in the country.

While it wasn't confirmed, the revelation of Schmidt's intentions comes as no surprise. Google has been a proponent of Internet freedom for a long time now, both in the United States (remember its strong stance against SOPA and PIPA?) and abroad (see Google and China's standoff over the communist's regime censorship practices.)

SEE ALSO: North Korea's Official Website Costs About $15

Schmidt himself has been a vocal supporter of Internet freedom and access. In fact, he has a book coming out titled The New Digital Age: Reshaping the Future of People, Nations and Business, written along with Google Ideas think tank director Jared Cohen. The book will explain how Internet access will change society for the better.

Schmidt and the American delegation hope to dissuade the regime led by the 29-year old Kim Jong-Un to ease up its strict rules on Internet access. Currently, the vast majority of North Koreans have no access to the general Internet, and can only enter the country's intranet, that allows them to visit only stare-run media and government-approved websites.

Schmidt's visit has already prompted rumors that indicate the regime might be willing to allow a freer access to the World Wide Web.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Will Ferrell apparently would be just as happy to have Funny Or Die get 5,000 Twitter followers, so he's understandably blown away that the number is actually 5 million.

Ferrell, who founded FOD with writing partner Adam McKay in late 2006, also offers his trademark random digressions (Singapore, Destiny's Child, Mega Man's archrival Dr. Wily), outrageously false claims (he introduces himself as the owner of the Dallas Mavericks) and professions of ignorance about Twitter (he thinks you physically mail out tweets.) However, one factoid in the video is true: Ferrell doesn't have an official Twitter account. However, there are lots of fake ones.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Smart fitness technology company Withing announced a new product at International CES 2013  the Smart Activity Tracker.

The little device can fit into your pocket or attach to the included belt clip or arm band.

Using Bluetooth and Bluetooth Smart technology, the tracker communicates with the Withings Health Mate app. The front of the tracker has a touch surface on which you can navigate from various screens. Simply press your finger to the back of the device to record your heart rate. This is the first time we've seen a pulse measurement on a tracking device. So in addition to monitoring your steps, distance, calories, strides and quality of sleep, you'll be able to read your heart rate during those activities.

As that information is recorded, it syncs to the app, so you can follow your progress in real time.

You can also use the tracker to get a bit of motivation if you're feeling sluggish: Set up smartphone alerts to let you know if you've been inactive for too long (a great idea if you work at a desk).

The Withings Smart Activity Tracker has a two-week battery life and an on-board micro USB port for recharging.

The information the tracker collects can be shared with your social networks and you might be inclined to share that data with a doctor, too.

The tracker and app are available for Android devices, iPhone 3GS, iPhone 4, iPhone 4S, iPhone 5, iPad and iTouch 4 and 5.

The tracker is yet to be released for sale and a price has not been set for it yet.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It could be so simple  you just leave your house and your Internet-connected T-shirt will tell your social networks where you are going.

At International CES 2013 on Tuesday, one of the creators of the Internet, Vint Cerf, gave a talk about the future of the connectivity and pondered just how far it would expand.

Cerf asked the audience, "What would happen if our clothes were Internet-enabled?" reported CNET.

"Can you imagine if you lost a sock? You could send out a search and sock No. 3117 would respond that it's under the couch in the living room," Cerf said to the audience, according to Computerworld.

Cerf, Google's chief Internet evangelist, determined this might be a bad idea:

"But maybe that's not a good idea because you could tell your wife you're at work but then she texts you to say your shirt says it's down at the bar."

We've already seen high-tech fashions come to life: a smartphone-charging trench coat; a wearable laptop carrier; or this T-shirt that has an LED screen and connects to your smartphone to access the Internet.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Jesse Draper is creator and host of The Valley Girl Show, through which she's become a spokesperson for startups and helped pioneer the way of new media content distribution. Formerly a Nickelodeon star, Draper is now CEO of Valley Girl, where she oversees the show and runs technology blog Lalawag.com.

Customer service can make or break businesses. Plenty of companies get it right, like Zappos. But even more companies get it wrong.

How many times have you repeated the same problem over and over to your TV service provider or phone company's customer service representative? They appear to have no way of tracking your initial complaint. And everyone has at some point emailed a complaint. Did said company respond? Probably not.

Zendesk has recently become the secret to everyone's customer service issues. With 300 customer service employees, the cloud-based help desk software startup helps companies provide the best possible customer service.

Its all about using technology to help keep customers happy, and its working. Today, more than 100 million people in 140 countries get their customer service through Zendesks 25,000-plus customers, which includes companies ranging from Gilt Groupe and Box.net, to Disney, GroupOn and Airbnb. Zendesk recently raised $60 million of new funding.

In an exclusive interview with Zendesks CEO, Mikkel Svane, we asked him what he thought was the secret to great customer service. He says its about building a relationship with your customers based on responsiveness.

"When somebody asks you something, make sure they get an answer quickly," he says. In addition, he mentions creating trust through honesty. He acknowledges that dealing with customers effectively can be a challenge, which is why they developed their technology in the first place.

"Like everybody whos ever spent time in a call center and a help desk knows, spending your entire day just dealing with customer issues and customer problems  people crying, people celebrating, people yelling at you  its really, really hard," he says.

More Video from the Valley Girl Show
--------------------------------------------------------------
One of the best parts of Oscar season is making your own predictions for who will win.

While you can interact with the official Oscars app, you can also take a moment and choose the winners in our poll below. After the winners are revealed on Feb. 24, we'll share how accurate Mashable reader predictions turned out to be.

Snubs | GIFs | 3 Kickstarter Films Get Nods SEE ALSO: Full List of Nominees

Cast your ballot below, telling us who you think will win these major categories.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Dougie, make room on the dancefloor for the Dookie Dance.

Al Roker's confession that he pooped his pants at the White House following gastric bypass surgery had the Internet talking a lot of crap this week. The Today weatherman shared his story on Dateline NBC, bluntly telling correspondent Nancy Snyderman "I pooped my pants."

SEE ALSO: Sammy Sosa's Kooky Pinterest Page Won the Internet Today

And when there's a mention of poop, a flood of Internet jokes, videos and memes will follow. Seriously, no amount of Imodium could stop it.

YouTube user Andrew Frederick flushes out a beat to the potty humor with "I Pooped in my Pants (The Dookie Dance)." It will certainly make a splash on the Internet. (Sorry.)
--------------------------------------------------------------
Amazon has launched AutoRip, a service that gives customers free MP3 versions of CDs they've purchased anytime since 1998.

Even better, customers who purchase a new CD will receive their digital copy before the actual, physical CD arrives at their doorstep.

"What would you say if you bought music CDs from a company 15 years ago, and then 15 years later that company licensed the rights from the record companies to give you the MP3 versions of those CDs ... and then to top it off, did that for you automatically and for free? Well, starting today, it's available to all of our customers  past, present, and future  at no cost," said Jeff Bezos, Amazon.com founder and CEO.

AutoRip currently has some 50,000 albums in its database, with more on the way. The quality of the ripped MP3 CDs is 256 Kbps.

Users will be able to play their music through a web-based player as well as any Cloud Player compatible device, including Android and iOS devices, Kindle Fire, Roku, Samsung Smart TVs and Sonos.

The service is now live, and users should be able to see a notification in their Cloud Player that AutoRip is operational.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Amazon announced Thursday morning that any customer who purchases a CD will receive a free digital copy of that album. The offer is valid not only on present and future purchases, but on any one of 50,000 CDs purchased from the retailer since 1998. Could the same offer soon be extended to movies and books?

The answer, unfortunately, is probably not.

The first issue is cost. Sarah Rotman Epps, a senior analyst at Forrester Research, says Amazon has sold so many books they couldn't feasibly afford to subsidize e-book copies of past (nor, for that matter, future) purchases; the number of CDs Amazon has sold is, by comparison, marginal. Plus, "publishers have learned the mistakes of music companies and aren't giving away their revenues so easily," says Epps. "If Amazon wanted to do something like this for books, publishers would make them pay through the nose." Although DVD and Blu-ray sales are also marginal compared to books, they constitute a substantially bigger market than CDs, and will remain that way.

But the second, and primary, reason is lack of competition. Amazon is fighting desperately to get consumers to think of its website  and not Apple's iTunes  as the go-to destination for music purchases. Over the past two years, Amazon has aggressively discounted popular album releases, going so far as to offer Lady Gaga's Born This Way album for $0.99 download when it was released in May 2011. The offer was so popular that Amazon's servers were stalled for most of the day.

However, it's possible that customers may one day be able to purchase physical and digital copies of books and movies in a single bundle. For a few extra dollars, you could, for example, purchase a hardback that has a validation code for an e-book copy on the back. Indeed, Epps says Forrester has made that recommendation to publishers many times. The firm's research shows that though readers enjoy the portability and convenience of e-books, many would prefer to engage with a print book at home. A studio-backed system called UltraViolet is advocating for a similar system for video, enabling consumers to get automatic access to digital, cloud-stored copies of any TV or movie purchased in hard form.

So what's holding them back? The entertainment industry is moving ahead, but publishers simply move more slowly.

What's perhaps more interesting about the announcement is just how far Amazon has shown it's willing to go to beat Apple. "Giving away products to customers is a dangerous game because there is no where to go from there, your margins are already squeezed so thinly," says Epps. "It's amazing shareholders have been so tolerant of thin margins on Amazon's performance, and moves like this don't help that."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Fortunately (unfortunately?), the world did not end in December, as those silly Mayans predicted. But that won't curb our appetite for apocalyptic games.

The folks over at gametoaid.org have launched another three-day game-a-thon for charity. Tune in to #Apocalyptathon, a live, nine-game spree benefiting Free The Children, a non-profit that builds schools in developing countries. All the games on the docket play on apocalyptic themes.

"If we reach our goal of $8,500, Free The Children will be able to build a schoolhouse in one of the countries that they work in," says Toby Zerner of GameToAid. "We'll let our viewers choose where."

Also, PRIZES. For every $5 donated, you'll be entered in a raffle to win copies of fan favorites like Borderlands and Super Meat Boy. The grand prize, which will be drawn at the 72-hour mark, is a shiny new Nintendo Wii-U.

GameToAid also added a referral program. Tell your friends about the fundraiser, and every $10 they donate gets you another raffle ticket.

The apocalyptic games on tap are:

As of this writing, GameToAid has raised $1,063.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Apple's recent change to its App Store policy will lock in screenshots of iOS app submissions after they've been approved, preventing scammers from replacing them with ones from more popular apps.

Before the update, app developers were able to change screenshots of their apps after they've been published in the App Store. While updating screenshots may be a legitimate way to reflect new iterations of an app, some developers combined names similar to other titles with screenshots taken directly from other apps to dupe customers into spending money on, essentially, fakes.

An example of this tactic is an app called "Mooncraft," which leads customers to believe that they are buying a version of the popular game, "Minecraft."

Developers will still be able to update screenshots for their apps, but only during updates.

"Beginning January 9, app screenshots will be locked in iTunes Connect once your app has been approved. New screenshots may be uploaded when you submit a binary for an update to an existing app or a new app," Apple announced on Wednesday.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The men's personal care product company Axe has teamed up with famed moonwalker Buzz Aldrin to send 22 people into space, and make sure they smell nice doing it.

On Jan. 9, the company kicked off its new Axe Apollo Space Academy, an online contest that promises to send 22 winners to the edge of space and back aboard a private spaceship. The winning space travelers will launch aboard a suborbital Lynx space plane built by the U.S. company XCOR Aerospace and operated by the tourism firm Space Expedition Curacao, Axe officials said.

"Space travel for everyone is the next frontier in the human experience," Buzz Aldrin, who became the second person ever to walk on the moon during NASA's 1969 Apollo 11 mission in 1969, said in a statement. "I'm thrilled that Axe is giving the young people of today such an extraordinary opportunity to experience some of what I've encountered in space."

The contest is open to men and women in more than 60 countries who sign up on the Axe Apollo Space Academy website (AXEApollo.com) and write about why they should be chosen to fly in space, while others will vote on the entries. The deadline to enter is Feb. 3.

The 22 winners will be selected during the Axe Global Space Camp in Orlando, Fla., which will feature competitive "space-simulation challenges," Axe officials said.

Winning space travelers will fly, one at a time, aboard Lynx space planes once Space Expedition Curacao begins operational flights. The reusable space planes are designed to fly two people  one pilot and a passenger  to an altitude of 62 miles (100 kilometers) during suborbital flights. The rocket plane is built to take off and land horizontally on a runway.

Space Expedition Curacao will oversee commercial Lynx flights from the Caribbean island of Curacao. Tickets for a flight are set at $95,000.

XCOR Aerospace is expected to begin the first test flights of a high-altitude Lynx design sometime later this year. The first passenger flights could begin in 2014.

Axe's deodorant body sprays are apparently known as Lynx in some parts of the world, so booking seats on a space plane with the same name was no giant leap, company officials explained.

"The Axe Apollo launch is the biggest and most ambitious in the Axe brand's 30-year history," Axe's global vice president Tomas Marcenaro said. "For the first time, we're simultaneously launching one global competition in over 60 countries offering millions of people the opportunity to win the most epic prize on Earth. A trip to space  yes, actual space."

This article originally published at Space.com here
--------------------------------------------------------------
A new breathing sensor system could be embedded in romper suits to help prevent Sudden Infant Death Syndrome (SIDS). Developed by researchers at the Fraunhofer Institute for Reliability and Microintegration IZM in Berlin, the system features a stretchable printed circuit board made of polyurethane.

The discreet circuit board fits to the contours of the body and alerts parents as soon as their child stops breathing. It's manufactured using routine industrial processes, meaning that it should be inexpensive if it eventually hits commercial shelves.

"The circuit board we have developed can be manufactured using routine industrial processes, meaning a high throughput and, consequently, good cost-efficiency," says IZM scientist Manuel Seckel. "Furthermore, components can be positioned on it just as precisely as on a standard board thanks to the stability of the stretchable substrate during processing. This stands in contrast to textile-based electronics, where one can expect an offset of up to five millimeters over a half-meter area."

This article originally published at PSFK here
--------------------------------------------------------------
The hottest moments in television normally get the GIF treatment within hours of airing. Previously, it's been fans who create the animated looping recaps, but brands are catching on to the appeal.

Cinemax's newest series, Banshee, premieres its first episode through a series of GIFs, served like chapters in a book.

They can also be viewed on the official Tumblr site, the Banshee GIF shop, created by New York agency Campfire. The GIF series is part of a creative partnership with BuzzFeed.

Viewers will have access to the "most intriguing and provocative moments" in the GIF shop, Cinemax said in a statement. The GIFs are categorized so that users can use them as reactions, such as "OMG," "LOL" or "WTF"  part of a larger trend that replaces emoticons in conversation with the animated format.

SEE ALSO: The 5 Most GIF-Worthy Shows on TV

Banshee, the latest work of True Blood creator Alan Ball, features an ex-con and master thief (Antony Starr, Rush) who assumes the identity of a sheriff in Banshee, Pa. Starr's character continues criminal activities, while being hunted by gangsters he betrayed years before.

The story has a free prequel comic, "Banshee Origins," which is available on iTunes. A website filled with more back-stories, interactive videos and other extras will launch in conjunction with the premiere. Viewers will be able to unlock more content as the season rolls out.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Playing sports has become a standard a rite of childhood passage for most kids, right up there with learning to tie a shoe and snagging that first kiss. But disturbing news events increasingly create anxiety for parents  how can you be sure a coach actually knows what they're doing? Or worse, what if they're actually a predator hidden behind a helpful, athletic facade?

The startup bookacoach aims to quell that anxiety for parents, keep kids safe and allow coaches to quickly and easily verify their credibility.

Bookacoach is a web app that allows kids and parents to book private lessons with coaches who have signed up with the service. To become a member of the site, however, coaches must undergo annual background checks, meaning you know you'll be leaving your kid in safe, responsible hands.

Its our mission and number one priority to become the safest place to find quality coaches, says co-founder and CEO Kevin MacCauley.

But bookacoach adds value beyond just background checks. Parents can schedule lessons and pay for them online, as well as post coach reviews to help families looking for instruction later on.

The site is currently free for coaches to use, but parents are charged a 10% transaction fee on lessons they book through the site. Bookacoach was originally founded in the fall of 2011 by MacCauley, Myles Grote and Marcus Gross, but just launched in late December with a formal announcement going out just this week. Since becoming live, the site has signed up more than 100 coaches from eight states, according to Grote.

Bookacoach is actually just one of a number of examples where technology is helping to bring new efficiency and safety to youth sports. The mobile app GameChanger lets coaches apply Moneyball style analytics to kids' basketball and baseball teams. Later this year, helmet-maker Riddell will introduce a product that tracks, measures and reports the blows kids' heads sustain in pee wee football.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Oakland, Calf.-based band GnarBoots hacked up a hairball of bizarre to create the music video for their tune, "Cats in Pajamas." Cats, pajamas  what could go wrong? So much.

The peculiar video looks like a scene out of a child's nightmare, or possibly a scene cut from Donnie Darko. Either way, it's something you won't forget.

SEE ALSO: Cats Get Their Own Social Network

To bleach your mind of that creepiness, here's an actual cat in pajamas:
--------------------------------------------------------------
In a hopeful sign for embattled telecom company Research in Motion, three top U.S. wireless carriers said they would support BlackBerry 10 products.

RIM's newest mobile operating system is slated to launch alongside two smartphones on Jan. 30, and the company's comeback depends on the success of BlackBerry 10.

Executives at Verizon, AT&T and T-Mobile told Reuters that they were looking forward to RIM's latest offering.

"We're hopeful it's going to be a good device," said Lowell McAdam, CEO of Verizon. "We'll carry it."

"We're extremely optimistic that it's going to be a successful product, and our business customers are extremely interested in it," he said.

"It's logical to expect our current [BlackBerry] customers will have the best BlackBerry devices to choose from in the future," he said.

In recent years, Apple's iOS and Google's Android platforms have eaten up BlackBerry's market share, resulting in lower subscriber numbers and lackluster sales for RIM. The company's struggles led it cut 5,000 jobs  that's 30% of its workforce  this past summer.

Photos of RIM's first phone that will run Blackberry 10 leaked online last month. The L-Series, codenamed BlackBerry London, bears a strong resemblance to Apple's iPhone 5.

Are you looking forward to the BlackBerry 10 OS, and its products? Tell us in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
'Booth babes' have been one of the more unfortunate features of tech trade shows for years. Women (we've never seen any male booth babes) chosen for their looks are paid to hang around a company's booth and attract the mostly male, mostly older attendees.

Sometimes the women are well paid, sometimes they get minimum wage, but their relationship to the product in question is usually gossamer-thin.

We've seen some fairly egregious examples over the years, but none more so than the one our tech reporter Emily Price stumbled upon at CES in Las Vegas Thursday. Four women dressed in body paint and little else were displayed at a company's booth, like sculptures.

The women looked straight ahead with bored expressions, and were not allowed to interact with attendees. The company's own Instagram feed described them as "fembots."

It was not immediately clear how this display was supposed to relate to the product in question, a hard drive. We won't give the company the satisfaction of mentioning their name, but we have reached out to them (and the CEA) for comment.

After Emily posted the picture on Twitter, it received more than 350 retweets  and many more outraged responses:

In the meantime, let us know in the comments what you think. It's 2013; is this an appropriate way to sell a tech product, or anything for that matter?
--------------------------------------------------------------
A team of Mashable writers, editors and photographers have spent the week barreling through the Las Vegas Convention Center that houses CES 2013. With new tech and gadgets being unveiled every minute, our staff has been racing against the clock to see as many products as they can. They have also been racing against each other as part of Mashable's CES Challenge.

All of our team members at CES are wearing Nike+ Fuelbands, allowing us to track their activity throughout the show. Here's how they stood at the end of Wednesday, the fourth day of the challenge:

Reporter Samantha Murphy clobbered the competition, racking up a formidable total of 8.01 miles over 16 active hours. If she makes it to tomorrow, there's a chance she could overtake Video Editor Evan Engel's lead in the overall contest. A busy day was to be expected, however, seeing as her daily activities included a speech from President Bill Clinton at a Samsung event and a concert by Ke$ha with iHeartRadio.

On day four, Editor-in-Chief Lance Ulanoff caught up with queen of the geeks Felicia Day to talk about entertainment and tech.

His star-studded day included an interview with Danny DeVito filmed by Evan. Lance also got a glimpse at the new Samsung Series 9, which is testing a pearly white model.

Emily Price got an 8 a.m. start on Wednesday, checking out Nokia's Lumia tour bus and Verizon's events with HTC and Samsung. Emily's lower total active time, for the record, reflects the fact that she received her FuelBand later than her East Coast-based team members.

By tomorrow, we'll know who the CES Challenge overall champion is. Will Samantha edge out Evan? Will Emily come from behind for a dramatic upset? Look for our post tomorrow announcing the winner!
--------------------------------------------------------------
Apple's rumored cheaper iPhone would cost anywhere from $99 to $149, according to a new report.

The device, which would debut in late 2013 "at the earliest," is part of an effort to attract more customers from developing markets, Bloomberg reported, citing an unnamed source. Among them, Apple is particularly eyeing China.

Last December, CEO Tim Cook said the country is "a very important market for us." At the time, Apple had sold more than 2 million units of the iPhone in China, setting a record for best first-weekend sales in the country.

A lower-cost version of the iPhone would also help Apple compete with Google's Android phones, which are available in a wide range of prices.

As one of the mobile market's pricier smartphones, the iPhone 5 starts at $199 for 16GB of storage with a two-year contract. There are also 32GB and 64GB models available for $299 and $399, respectively. In terms of its older phones, Apple now offers the 8GB iPhone 4 for free, while the 16GB iPhone 4S costs $99 (both requiring two-year contracts).

The company has been developing a more affordable phone since "at least" February 2011, Bloomberg said. It has spoken to one or more major U.S. wireless carriers about its plans, the newspaper added.

Earlier reports suggested that the lower-cost iPhone would look like a standard iPhone 5, but made with cheaper materials. Polycarbonate would replace the aluminum shell, and other components could be sourced from parts designed for older iPhones.

What do you think of the rumored cheaper iPhone's price range? Would you buy one? Tell us in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Chilly Gonzales has been many things over his 15+ years as a music professional. The thing you may know him for most, without even realizing it? He helped sell the first iPad.

In 2010, Apple approached Gonzales about using his song "Never Stop" in a run of commercials for the device that would become synonymous with tablet computing.

The way Gonzales tells it, "Never Stop" was barely available when Apple expressed interest in using it.

"The song had only been out on vinyl, and had only been bootlegged in a digital version for five or six days before it got on their radar," he says. "They didn't even have a proper MP3 of the song, just a rip that someone had done from the vinyl, analog into their computer. You had to really be on the ball to know that song existed, and they were on it within days."

An Apple commercial can be a career-defining moment for a lesser-known artist. But at worst, it can also mean a death knell. Who wants to be known as a one-hit wonder whose only hit  remember the Caesars?  was for a TV ad?

While he is appreciative of the project for its exposure, Gonzales considers it just another part of his diverse career, which includes work with Drake, Feist and Peaches.

"I realized that the album was never going to be at the top of my pyramid," he says. "The brand itself was the top of the pyramid, and albums can be a part of that as can performances, as can interviews, as can putting videos out on social media. But not one of those things is the product anymore. The product is your reputation."

SEE ALSO: Beck's New DIY Album Spawns Social Media Collaboration

He is, in a way, an artist perfectly suited for the social media era. He is obsessed with his brand not as a means to support and promote his music, but just as a part of it. Consider, for example, that in 2009 he embarked on a Guinness World Record breaking performance: He played piano for just over 27 hours.

This might not seem like a good idea for anyone, but for Gonzales the timing couldn't have been better.

"We were very early on the streaming bandwagon, because Ustream had just started up a few months before that project. We were one of the first people to do a multi-camera streaming event on Ustream," he says.

"I opened up my Twitter account scant days before ... and we ended up being the second-highest worldwide trend over those 24 hours."

Despite his myriad efforts across social platforms, he spends the most time on Twitter (and does so completely autonomously); he praises Twitter for its simplicity. In fact, it's the one platform he recommends to musicians trying to cut through the noise and reach an audience. "It's something you can do every day. It doesn't require a lot of maintenance," he says. "It's the minimum amount of effort and a maximum amount of marketing, disguised as access."

Gonzalez has always experienced both luck and risk. In 2004, ready to move away from his "conceptual electronic stuff and crazy concerts," he composed and released a record simply titled Solo Piano. Stylistically, it was at the polar opposite of his previous work as a producer and rapper. And yet it had something in common: It was not what anyone expected of him.

"It was a great success, in fact, bigger than any of the underground records I'd done," he says. "So instead of doing a second Solo Piano right away, which might've been a good way to cash in on that, I learned the counter-intuitive lesson, which is to keep taking risks, keep on moving forward, keep on being more and more like myself, and then wait for the right time."

The right time, it turned out, would be 2012. Solo Piano II came out in August. This time, the goal is to take piano music and bring it to the attention economy.

"I'm the guy that turned piano into the musical voice of the iPad. It's very encouraging to me that piano can be updated and brought into the present."

In this new era of his career, he'll make a series of simple videos showing off just his hands playing the keys. But he'll also take the stage for a performance in a bathrobe and slippers, referencing the signature absurdity from other parts of his music.

"A lot of people who play only the piano are at a disadvantage because they haven't put in the effort to connect with their generation," he says. "To me, that was the most important reason why I came out of music school and I turned my back on it. I wanted hot girls and hip-hop heads in my audience, and I worked my ass of to get to the point where they are."
--------------------------------------------------------------
The "combadge," a two-in-one device that's both a communicator and badge worn by Starfleet, has arrived three centuries early.

While it's not an exact replica of Star Trek's iconic gadget, the CommBadge functions in a similar way. The Bluetooth speakerphone, which works with iPhone and Android, helps users access their smartphone hands-free. Measuring 1.5 inches in diameters, the circular speaker can be clipped onto clothing, or left in a bag.

Why not just wear a Bluetooth headset? Commbadge's creators say it is designed so that "clean sound waves reach the user, but the sound waves that travel beyond a foot or so from the users ears are scrambled." In other words, it's a way to avoid looking "Bluetooth crazy."

The Commbadge also uses a "noise-canceling chipset" to minimize background noise, according to its Indiegogo page.

It can help users place and answer calls, send and receive text messages, as well as access Siri, Google Now and other intelligent personal assistants, among other tasks. Check out the video, above, for more.

Which do you prefer: the CommBadge or a Bluetooth headset? Tell us in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Federal agencies are facing substantial outlays to manage mobile computing devices as they shift from a culture of PCs and laptops to smartphones and tablets. But there is a silver lining. Agencies are likely to save money if they dont have to maintain their own systems to secure and support employee mobile devices. And vendors offer discounts for volume purchases of their software and services.

Providers of mobile device management toolsincluding Atlanta-based AirWatch, MobileIron of Mountain View, Calif., and Zenprise of Redwood City, Calif.charge between $3 and $4 per month for client software installed on an employees mobile phone or tablet. AirWatch is a supplier on the Veterans Affairs Departments initial $4.4 million mobile contract awarded in October.

That monthly fee may seem like small change until its applied somewhere like the Defense Department, where planners are looking to move every active-duty and reserve organization to mobile computing. Defenses workforce includes 1.4 million active-duty troops, 1.3 million National Guard and reserve personnel, and 800,000 civilian employeesthats 3.5 million people.

If everyone in the department needed a mobile devicethe Defense Information Systems Agency envisions widespread useat $3 a month the Pentagon would face an annual tab of $126 million, and at $4 a month the cost would be $168 million a year for the necessary software. VA could end up with a bill between $10 million and $14 million annually to provide mobile support to its workforce of 300,000.

Providers offer perpetual client licenses for about $50 apiece, which in the case of Defense would result in a one-time cost of $75 million, and at VA, the tab would be $15 million. Mobile device management vendors sell both cloud-based services and in-house network support.

Some companies, including AirWatch, do not charge annual maintenance fees for mobile services based in the cloud. But if an agency chooses to host the software itself annual maintenance and support fees could run about 20% of the contract cost. For Defense, annual support costs could range from $24 million to $32 million. Hardware and software charges to set up department servers average about $20,000, and about $30,000 for cloud-based service.

But large agencies shouldnt expect to pay list prices for mobile client licenses, software and services, according to AirWatch chairman Alan Dabbiere and Chandra Sekar, director of vertical product marketing for Zenprise. They say large-scale deployments would net substantial discounts.

The Pentagon could qualify for a 30% discount, based on volume, according to Bernie Skoch, a technology consultant and retired Air Force general who did a tour at DISA. While still a stiff bill, the department could make it up in savings generated from not having to develop its own systems, he says, such as expensive tactical command-and-control networks. Skoch says he has no doubt commercial smartphones and tablets will become a key part of tactical systems.

Warren Suss, president of Suss Consulting, says a Defensewide purchase of mobile management software will not be cheap. He says the smart approach would be to phase in tablets as the inventory of desktop PCs and laptops reach the end of their life cycle. The real savings, Suss and Skoch agree, would come from replacing tactical radios, which can cost $70,000 apiece. Commercial gear that costs $500 or less and requires a minimal monthly fee for client software can look like a bargain in comparison.

Vendors say they offer sophisticated software for securely managing and controlling smartphones and tablets, coupled with a private app store for users. Access to these apps, in most cases, is governed by role-based permissions set in an enterprises active directory.

Ojas Rege, vice president of strategy for MobileIron, says the companys system walls off the most sensitive apps from employees who are not authorized to use them, and even access to commercial apps is routed through its private app store. Zenprise mobile software allows users to access commercial app stores, but can detect and inhibit installation of apps forbidden by agency information technology managers.

AirWatch has built geolocation software into its mobility software, allowing IT managers to track where a mobile device is being used and to shut it down if it appears to have been stolen. The company also provides IT managers with what could be viewed as the nuclear deterrent of mobile computingthe ability to remotely and automatically wipe a smartphone or tablet of all data if an employee violates policies on commercial apps and security. This includes devices owned by employees. MobileIron and Zenprise offer similar features.

As agencies develop bring-your-own-device policies, Dabbiere says the Office of Management and Budget should offer guidance on who must pay for client software on personal devicesemployees or their agencies.

In January, the Health and Human Services Department released its mobile strategy, which expects employees to pay for mobility management software for their personally owned devices.

Despite the substantial cost of mobility management software, DISA has made it clear it must adopt new guidelines for mobile wireless computing, based on a cohesive enterprisewide strategy. DISA officials say Defense must embrace mobility management tools to ensure military users dont lag behind the private sector in secure mobile computing capability worldwide.

Photo courtesy of Flickr, US Embassy New Zealand

This article originally published at Nextgov here
--------------------------------------------------------------
As if spiders weren't creepy enough on their own, now you can wear one. High-tech fashion designer Anouk Wipprecht created an unsettling robotic spider dress, complete with animatronic arachnid limbs that jerk and twitch.

Teaming up with Austrian software developer and hacker, Daniel Schatzmayr, Wipprecht makes hexapods haute. The dress has six robotic legs on its shoulder pads which respond to nearby movement.

If anyone gets too close, the limbs move in closer to protect the wearer and keep strangers at bay (because everyone wants to snuggle up to someone decked out like an insect). Check out the video, above, for more.

The Dutch-based designer showcased her dress at Cafe Neu Romance, an international robot performance festival in Prague, in November 2012. On her bio page, Wipprecht describes herself as "part futuristic, part anime-meets-high fashion" and pushes the boundaries between the physical and psychological.

With the Spider Dress, Wipprecht explores the ideas of personal space, control and privacy. She describes it as a "cute little host creature" in her YouTube video, where warped voices set the track for the spider legs in action.

Her other out-of-the-ordinary designs include dresses with plastic tubes, fluids, inks and smart foils. The Daredroid is a cocktail-making robot dress, while Wipprecht's Intimacy line features dresses that become transparent based on the wearer's sensual interactions. The e-foils on Intimacy dresses respond to the person's heartbeat.

Do you think we'll be seeing more robo-dresses? What do you think about the relationship between technology and fashion? Let us know your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  Actor/Director Danny DeVito has been entertaining us for decades, from his early role as a mental patient in One Flew Over the Cuckoo's Nest to the irascible Louie De Palma on Taxi, to his current role as the somewhat-bent Frank Reynolds on FXs It's Always Sunny in Philadelphia. Whatever medium he's in  TV, Film, the stage  DeVito fully embraces it. He takes a similar approach to technology and social media, as he explained to Mashable in our interview with him on the floor of CES 2013.

The 68-year-old actor sat down with us after an entertaining chat on the Panasonic stage at CES 2013. He was there to promote the Blu-ray release of his film Hoffa, in which he starred and directed. DeVito explained that the technology "kicks ass" because it gives filmmakers the opportunity to go back in and make the movie "a little bit better."

An avid Twitter user (@DannyDeVito), DeVito has posted dozens of pictures of his bare foot in exotic and international locations. Each one is accompanied by the hashtag #TrollFoot, a reference to a live stage show from the "Its Always Sunny in Philadelphia" team.

DeVito told us he loves how Twitter lets him connect with other people, gives voice to different views and can act as a force for social good. Yes, he writes his own tweets.

While on stage, DeVito talked about shooting digitally and spending time editing his next movie in Final Cut. He's well aware of the benefits and pitfalls of the digitization of cinema, but when asked how he would combat movie piracy, DeVito suggested telling teens it's as dangerous for them as unprotected sex.

He told us his children encouraged him to get an iPhone and get on social media, but does not spend much time on Facebook. "I have a page, but I dont participate. Twitter is really easy."

When we asked DeVito what the Taxi cast would have done with Twitter if the social platform were around in the 1970s, he said he thought the late Andy Kaufman, who played Latka, would have loved it.

He also uses Apples Siri intelligent assistant software, but added, "Siri is a ball-breaker."

Check out the video above for the full interview.
--------------------------------------------------------------
UPDATE: Listen to the World Premiere of Destiny's Child's 'Nuclear' Right Now

Out of nowhere, Destiny's Child is back after splitting up in 2005.

Beyonc Knowles, Kelly Rowland and Michelle Williams have reunited to release Love Songs, a new album slated for a Jan. 29 release, Beyonce announced online Thursday.

"I AM SO PROUD TO ANNOUNCE THE FIRST ORIGINAL DESTINY'S CHILD MUSIC IN EIGHT YEARS!" Beyonce's statement with the above photo said.

Destiny's Child's Facebook page also shared the news with a link at which people can pre-order the new album for $9.99. Love Songs will feature a new song ("Nuclear") and the group's older romantic songs from 1997 to 2004.

Beyonce is scheduled to perform at the Super Bowl on Feb. 3. While details of her performance are unknown, it's possible that her Destiny's Child cohorts could join her.

SEE ALSO: Beyonce HBO Doc Will Feature Footage Captured on Her Laptop

Love Songs infuses recordings from six albums  four of the Destiny's Child's studio albums, one of Rowland's albums and one from the group's remix album:

Sony Music offshoots  Music World Entertainment, Columbia Records and Legacy Recordings  are in charge of unleashing Love Songs at the end of month.

BONUS: In February 2012, Beyonce and Jay-Z used another Tumblr blog to release the first pictures of Blue Ivy Carter:

Photo and thumbnail via Beyonce.com. Gallery photos courtesy Hello Blue Ivy Carter
--------------------------------------------------------------
Digg's new owners say they're only "about 1% done" building out their vision for the revamped content discovery application, but that doesn't mean they're going to put off monetization any longer.

In a post to its corporate blog on Thursday, Jake Levine, general manager of Digg, and Michael Young, CTO of Digg, unveiled the site's first ad product since its redesign, dubbed "Apps We Like."

It's a little different than your typical display ad. Developers are encouraged to submit an application to have their mobile apps considered for inclusion. If Digg's team think it's an app their users should know about, developers will then be invited to pay a flat fee to have their apps featured, beginning at $5,000 for a single day, Levine tells me.

Apps accepted into the program will be marked as "Sponsored," and appear on Digg's iPhone and iPad apps as well its homepage.

Quoting John Borthwick, CEO of Digg's parent company Betaworks, Levine and Young said it's critical for Digg to develop a revenue strategy that "align[s] to the grain of the product." Thus, instead of ad space to the highest bidder, they're hoping to advertise products their users will like and are thus more likely to engage with. This particular ad unit itself is unlikely to be a major money-maker, but it does indicate the kinds of revenue-generating features we can expect to see from Digg going forward.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Jesse Draper is creator and host of The Valley Girl Show, through which she's become a spokesperson for startups and helped pioneer the way of new media content distribution. Formerly a Nickelodeon star, Draper is now CEO of Valley Girl, where she oversees the show and runs technology blog Lalawag.com.

Kate Endress, co-founder and CEO of Ditto, has created a technology to take the pain out of trying on glasses. Ditto lets you sample your specs online using a credit card as a measuring stick.

To create the technology behind Ditto, Endress says she spent endless hours sitting in Lenscrafter's and optometrist offices studying people's "try-on" behavior. Ditto offers most designer brands of glasses including Vera Wang and Chloe. In addition, you can order prescription eyeglasses and receive them only four days later.

If you don't trust your own judgement, the company also offer stylists to help you pick out and try on glasses that would be appropriate for your head shape. (According to Endress, everyone seems to think they are the one person with the oddly shaped head.)

Endress' master plan for Ditto? "Over the next couple years I hope you see us trying to solve this for other categories."

More Video from the Valley Girl Show
--------------------------------------------------------------
The announcement this week that astronomers have found a potential alien world that could be the most Earth-like exoplanet yet is raising a big question: How will scientists confirm the existence of a true alien Earth?

While NASA's planet-hunting Kepler space telescope, which discovered the newfound Earth-like planet candidate KOI 172.2, is great for finding large exoplanets beyond the reaches of our sun, it is not our best bet for recognizing an Earth-twin circling a distant star.

In order to understand what an Earth-twin candidate really looks like, it takes a more refined approach than what Kepler can provide, at the moment.

Its a statistical mission, astronomer Natalie Batalha said of Kepler at the 221st meeting of the American Astronomical Society on Tuesday.

The Kepler mission is designed to find out how many possible exoplanets there could be in any given part of the galaxy. The space telescope launched in 2009 and stares unblinking at a single patch of the sky to scan for dips in light from stars, a telltale sign of an orbiting planet passing in front of the star. Kepler's observations can tell scientists where a planet is in relation to its home star, but the spacecraft has little to add about the composition and climate of the exoplanet in its view, researchers said.

But how can scientists study those important questions that need to be answered before a planet can be deemed an Earth-twin?

The Kepler mission is a starting point in the search for a true Earth-like planet, Nicolas Cowen a post-doctoral fellow in astronomy at Northwestern University in Evanston, Ill. told SPACE.com. Kepler just told us how big the telescope we have to build is.

There could be as many as 17 billion Earth-sized planets in the Milky Way galaxy alone, but that doesnt mean theyre easy to research once detected. Once planets of interest, like super-Earths such as the newly discovered object of interest KOI 172.02, are confirmed by Kepler, then other instruments can be used to investigate the specifics of the planet.

A ground-based telescope could be just the right tool for finding Earths twins, said Cowen. If the exoplanet in question is near enough to the Earth and in exactly the right position, researchers could aim a 33-foot dish toward the planet to optically observe its transit between the Earth and its home-star. After researchers have measured the radius of the planet and if a telescope can make direct observations of the planet in question, Cowen said, then it is just a matter of patience.

 

Cowen added that all it takes after a researcher knows the size and rotation of the planet is as much observation time as possible. Watching the way a planet rotates and taking measurements of the different colors that come in and out of view as the planet orbits its star gives researchers a sense of what might lie under the surface of the atmosphere.

Water, land and clouds reflect light in different ways, and by directly observing those reflections, astronomers like Cowen can start to see how an exoplanet might be an Earth twin.

Thats what would happen in an ideal world, Cowen said.

Those days of ideal research might not be as far off as some believe. Cowen thinks that it could only be a matter of time before astronomers are able to peer into the atmosphere of an exoplanet and see whats happening on the surface using a ground-based telescope.

In a presentation earlier this week, astronomer Ian Crossfield suggested that its likely that an Earth-sized planet in the habitable zone of an M-dwarf star  a type of star smaller and dimmer than the sun, but plentiful in the Milky Way  will be found within 31 parsecs of Earth, a relatively short distance in astronomical terms.

This is the first meeting where any of these ideas have even brought up, Cowen said. Its very exciting.

This article originally published at Space.com here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Facebook's reach just keeps getting wider.

According to social media analyst Vincenzo Cosenza's biannual World Map of Social Networks, Facebook is the leader in 127 of the 137 countries observed, the Los Angeles Times reports. Armenia, Latvia, Kyrgyzstan and Vietnam are among the 10 countries where Facebook now reigns supreme.

SEE ALSO: Facebook World Map Reveals Unexpected Trends Between Friends

The biggest recent growth area, according to Cosenza, is Asia, which now has 278 million Facebook users and boasts the social network's largest population. Europe now has fewer users than Asia, netting 251 million users total; North America has 243 million users; South America has 142 million users; Africa has 52 million users and the Oceania region has 15 million users.

The countries where non-Facebook networks still dominate? Russia, led by Kontakte and Odnoklassniki; China, lead by QZone; and Iran, led by Cloob.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Are all your family or roommates' laptops, phones, tablets, gaming consoles and other wireless devices clogging up the invisible pipes that make up your home Wi-Fi network? Good news: That network will soon be faster and support more bandwidth-intensive activity, including streaming high-definition video.

Federal Communications Chairman Julius Genachowski announced during CES Wednesday that the FCC is planning its biggest expansion of wireless spectrum for Wi-Fi in a decade. Specifically, the FCC is opening up to 195 megahertz of unlicensed spectrum in the 5 gigahertz band for high-speed, high-capacity Wi-Fi known as "Gigabit Wi-Fi."

The move, which will begin next month, will free up unlicensed spectrum for Gigabit Wi-Fi by approximately 35%. Making that spectrum available, argues the FCC in its statement about the plan, will provide for "higher data speeds and greater capacity."

Translation: those with technology that can make use of Gigabit Wi-Fi are about to see faster speeds and more capability to have multiple devices pulling down lots of data on their personal networks.

Homes aren't the only target of the FCC's upcoming Wi-Fi expansion: it also announced a "government-wide effort" to bolster speeds and lessen congestion at "airports, convention centers and large conference gatherings"  all locations where finding a decent Wi-Fi signal is often a headache.

 

"We all know the frustration of Wi-Fi congestion at conferences and airports," said Genachowski. "Today, the FCC is moving to bring increased speed and capacity to Wi-Fi networks by increasing the amount of unlicensed spectrum for Wi-Fi. As this spectrum comes on line, we expect it to relieve congested Wi-Fi networks at major hubs like convention centers and airports. It will also help in homes as tablets and smartphones proliferate and video use rises."

The FCC's move is the latest in its ongoing efforts to reform spectrum availability for an increasingly mobile world.

Do you want faster Wi-Fi in your home or other congested hubs? Share your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Looks like Jimmy Kimmel's new 11:35 p.m. time slot is getting in the way of Will Ferrell's and Ryan Gosling's QVC dreams. Their "Knife Guys" show  where they sell the latest and greatest in knives  was rudely interrupted by the talk show.

SEE ALSO: Celebrities Read Mean Tweets About Themselves (Round 3)

And it's all Kimmel's fault. He just couldn't check the sign-in sheet for Hollywood Boulevards El Capitan Theatre. Doesn't Kimmel get the weekly newsletter?

Sorry Kimmel, we'd rather watch Ferrell slice and dice Gosling's goodies than your monologue. Or you all can share that studio space and we're sure you'll see a spike in ratings.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  You may not have heard of Fitbug before, but the wearable fitness tracking device maker was one of the first companies in the now booming fit-tech space.

Launched in 2005, the UK company moved to the U.S. in 2010. Fitbug originally sold its product to companies and healthcare providers but now it's reaching out to the consumer market.

At International CES 2013 Fitbug announced three new products  the Fitbug Orb (activity tracker), Fitbug Wow (scale), and Fitbug Luv (blood pressure monitor). All of the devices are Bluetooth 4.0 enabled so you can receive all the data on one app.

Your personal data is also uploaded to the Fitbug cloud and accessible on your personal account on the website. As with most of the Fitbug products, users must buy a monthly service plan to access the cloud and have an account on the site. Pricing ranges depending on which device and plan your purchase.

Paul Landau, CEO of Fitbug, tells Mashable Fitbug's products offer users personalized health programs by tracking their progress in terms of weight, activity and blood pressure.

With the launch of the new Fitbug Orb, Landau said they've listened to user feedback and heard people complain about wearing the device. Like most pedometers, Fitbug attaches onto your waistband or pants pocket. When wearing a dress, women had no option but it to tuck it into their underwear, which was uncomfortable, he said.

The newest Fitbug Orb offers lots of wearable options. It comes with a lanyard and a safety clip, so you won't lose it. Plus a sleep band (it tracks sleep, too) and a key fob. Consumers can chose the other new wearable accessories such as the wristband ($14.99), belt clip ($9.99), or thin magnetic underwear clip ($9.99).

The Fitbug Orb retails for $49.99 which includes access to the Fitbug cloud for one year. After that, the cost to access the Fitbug cloud is $3.99 per month.

The blood pressure monitor, the Fitbug Luv, is currently going through FDA approval. Landau said he is hoping it will be approved some time around May or June. (Most of these devices don't go through FDA approval, but when something specifically gives users a diagnosis, it needs FDA approval). It will compete with the Withings blood pressure monitoring device that's already available. The Luv costs $119.99.

 

The Fitbug scale (the Wow) costs $79.99, or $119.99 if purchased bundled with the Fitbug Air. The Fitbug Air Bluetooth 4 wireless activity tracker was released this past fall. The Air ranges in cost from $29.99 for the device plus three months access to the Fitbug cloud, or can be purchased with 12 months of cloud access for $59.99. After the 12 months, the cost to access the Fitbug cloud is $3.99 per month.

Fitbug is currently working on integrating with MyFitnessPal and LoseIt.com. It is already integrated with MapMyFitness.

Have you tried the Fitbug products in the past? What do you think of these updated products? Tell us in the comments.

Andrea Smith conducted the interview for this report. Photos by Nina Frazier.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Companies trying to increase productivity should offer their employees more wellness programs, a new study finds.

Workers who ate healthful meals and exercised on a regular basis had better job performance and lower absenteeism, research from the Health Enhancement Research Organization (HERO), Brigham Young University and the Center for Health Research at Healthways shows.

Employees who eat healthy all day long were 25% more likely to have higher job performance, the study found, while those who eat five or more servings of fruit and vegetables at least four times a week were 20% more likely to be more productive.

In addition, employees who exercise for at least 30 minutes, three times a week, were 15% more likely to have higher job performance.

Overall, absenteeism was 27% lower for those workers who ate healthy and regularly exercised and that their job performance was 11% higher than their peers who were obese, the study found.

Overweight workers experienced lower job performance and higher absenteeism, compared to those employees who suffer from depression and other chronic diseases or conditions.

"This latest study investigating the link between employee health, performance and productivity reinforces the business case for employers to provide comprehensive, evidence-based health management programs for their work force," said Jerry Noyce, president and CEO of HERO.

Carter Coberley, vice president of Health Research and Outcomes at Healthways, said more and more employers are defining individual well-being through the performance and productivity of their work force.

"Well-being is gaining recognition as an important measure that relates both to the quality of life of individuals as well as to financial measures that are important to business and government leaders," Coberley said.

"Well-being can also serve as an important business success metric through its demonstrated relationship to employee absence and job performance as measured in multiple large employers," he added.

The study was based on data from three geographically dispersed U.S. companies, representing 20,114 employees who completed a work-related survey each year from 2008 through 2010. It was published in this month's Journal of Occupational and Environmental Medicine.

This article originally published at BusinessNewsDaily here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Gmail is one of the most popular and efficient email services out there. Launched in invite-only beta in 2004, Google's webmail service has greatly evolved over the past nine years with new designs, labs, apps and more.

SEE ALSO: Free Calling for Gmail Users Extended Through 2013

Even though Gmail is nearly all-encompassing for your email needs, there are still a few things that could make the service even better. We've compiled a short list of our wildest Gmail dreams in the gallery above.

What's on your Gmail wish list? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Google may have gotten off with a slap on the wrist in the United States for its search practices, but it doesn't look like it will get off so easily in Europe.

Joaqun Almunia, the European Union's competition chief, told the Financial Times Thursday he believes European regulators will demand Google change the way its own products are displayed in search or else face hefty fines for "diverting traffic" away from competitors' products.

"We are still investigating, but my conviction is [Google] are diverting traffic," Almunia told the Financial Times.

European regulators have been investigating for two years whether Google is taking advantage of its dominant position in online search to drive traffic to its other products, such as Google Maps or Google Flight Search.

"They are monetising this kind of business, the strong position they have in the general search market and this is not only a dominant position, I think - I fear - there is an abuse of this dominant position," added Almunia.

The U.S. Federal Trade Commission was conducting a similar investigation but ultimately decided Google's search behavior was legal, it announced last week. Google did, however, agree to change its patent licensing procedures and allow websites to opt-out of having their content scraped without hurting their Search Engine Optimization.

Europe is also conducting investigations of those subjects. Almunia told the Financial Times that Europe's decision regarding Google's practices of patent licensing and content scraping would "not be weaker" than that given by the FTC.

SEE ALSO: Google Settles FTC Antitrust Case, Makes Minor Changes to Search and Ads

Google, which on Dec. 18 was given a one-month ultimatum to come up with a solution to end the investigation by regulators, handles over 90% of search traffic in Europe. An announcement of the investigation's results is expected in the near future.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Once upon a time, a man named Brent Askwith killed a really big spider with bug spray. Then a gigantic worm crawled out of the spider's belly. And kept crawling out. And crawled out more. It just kept coming and coming. And it was so slimy, too. At first it looked like some disgusting perversion on the good ol' curly fry. Then it unfurled itself and started squirming around on the floor.

The whole situation was probably the grossest thing to ever happen after someone killed a spider. Luckily, it's on YouTube and we can all be grossed out together.

If you want to get into more weird stuff together, check out this video on how snake venom destroys your blood.
--------------------------------------------------------------
HBO's Girls has achieved what every TV show dreams of: A network of connected fans who love to share their opinions about the show, compare themselves to the lead characters  Are you a Hannah, Marnie, Jessa or Shoshana?  and tweet with the show's signature hashtag introduced before the season one premiere #mistakesGIRLSmake.

The HBO dramedy about four young friends figuring out life in New York City, now entering its second season, instantly drew comparisons to Sex and the City, its HBO Sunday night predecessor by more than a decade. Comparing and contrasting the two shows is fruit for many lively discussions (be they in high school cafeterias, sorority dining rooms or at happy hour counters).

But something major has changed since (the first time) Carrie Bradshaw graced the cable airwaves. Girls fans of today have a different bond with the show's characters than SATC fans could have imagined. They connect with the shows characters on their mobile phones while waiting for the bus and in their Twitter feeds while distracted at work.

HBO's marketing team has used social media to transform the show's four leading ladies from characters you watch for 30-minutes on TV (or perhaps, on your laptop using your parents' HBO Go account) to friends you see in your Instagram feed that make you giggle as you "double tap" your love.

While you could argue the entrance of all TV shows into the social networking space has changed the relationship of viewers and characters, HBO's VP of Social Media and Marketing Sabrina Caluori explains that Girls fans' own behavior has driven the show's marketing. The over-sharing phenomenon is a marketing team's bread and butter.

Caluori told Mashable, "We're totally inspired by the fan behavior." When we look at all the different social platforms that are out there, we look at what the fans are doing naturally. The GIF behavior on Tumblr was there long before we ever were, and in a way that felt really germane to that platform."

That GIF behavior ultimately fueled the creation of the "What Should We Call Girls" Tumblr blog, officially launched by HBO in December. The blog aggregates animated GIFs combining scenes and memorable quotations from the show. While HBO curates the blog, the GIFs are fan generated.

The energy of fans has kept the show's accounts active in the seven months since the season one finale.

"When we start work on a show we discuss whether it has a fan base that will stay engaged year round without trying to forcefeed people to sustain it," Caluori says. "With Girls, in addition to content around the show, it's such a lifestyle in and of itself. The community is about more than just the show, it's the music, the fashion, New York, the locations. Even though there was a finite number of episodes, you feel Girls all around you all the time."

Beyond the non-seasonal nature of its social accounts, HBO has made the Girls characters staples of its fans social media lives by integrating fans' own lives into its feeds. HBO will call for and subsequently share fans' resolutions and mistakes, using both the original #mistakesGIRLSmake and season two's #resolutionsGIRLSbreak. Likewise, HBO will call for favorite mistakes, quotations and hypothetical resolutions from the shows' characters. The hypothetical resolutions have also been at the heart of the show's paid marketing campaigns.

For the season two premiere Sunday, HBO won't be promoting hashtags on Twitter, but will be using the hashtag #resolutionsGIRLSbreak, which it's used throughout season two promotion, and the hashtag #GIRLSathon during the season one marathon, playing on HBO starting at 4 p.m. Sunday. (During the season one premiere, HBO promoted three different hashtags, #GIRLSnight, #mistakesGIRLSmake and #GIRLSonHBO.)

"Girls is a younger skewing show for HBO, and its fans are more adept at creating user-generated content," Caluori says. "It's a beautiful thing about working on Girls: When you have a creator that understands social media in the way Lena [Dunham] does, and she's encouraged us from day one, and really trusted us."

Though Girls has consistently produced social content during the off-season, it has a few new things in store for the season two premiere. On Thursday, HBO launched its first Pinterest account, for Girls, curated by the show's costume designer Jenn Rogein.

The show is also expanding its GetGlue presence, with custom badges for each episode, inspired by the "All Adventurous Women Do" cross-stitch in Hannah's apartment. Each week a new digital cross-stitch of a quote from that episode will be released, and one fan will be chosen at random to win a real, framed cross-stitch from Etsy artist Katie Kutthroat.

Girls has given away some fan-appropriate giveaways to its loyal social media followers leading up to the premiere, including blowouts from Drybar, spin classes at SoulCycle, and a year's rent and an apartment makeover from Urban Outfitters.

Has Girls' social marketing changed the way you relate to its characters? Let us know in the comments if your appreciate the immersive experience.

Image courtesy of HBO, 'Girls' episode 13 (season two, episode thre): Lena Dunham, Zosia Mamet, Jemima Kirke, Allison Williams, Photo by Jessica Miglio; GIF courtesy of Tumblr, 0livia-dunham
--------------------------------------------------------------
On a hopeful evening in August 2012, a roomful of NASA employees held their breath as they watched a rover named Curiosity attempt a landing that was no short of a miracle. After what they dubbed the "seven minutes of terror," the control room erupted with emotion as Curiosity's wheels safely touched the surface of Mars.

Curiosity rover will drive around the Gale Crater in a mission to determine if Mars could ever support microbial life. This information will serve as the foundation for possible manned missions to the Red Planet.

Curiosity  who has assumed a female personality on NASA's social networks  is different from the any other rover to ever land on Mars. For starters, Curiosity is 10 feet long, 7 feet tall and five times heavier than her predecessors Spirit and Opportunity, twin rovers that NASA launched in 2003. To put it in more tangible terms, Curiosity is about the same size as a car at 1,928 pounds.

No space is wasted on the $2.5 billion Curiosity rover. She is packed with a cutting-edge scientific payload that allows her to explore Mars like a human would. Here is a rundown of just some of the hardware that the rover uses on the mysterious Red Planet.

If you've kept up with the latest news about Curiosity's findings, you have probably seen the incredible, high-res images she has beamed from the Red Planet. The rover uses 17 different types of cameras to snap these images  in both black and white and color  and high-definition video.

The first camera the rover used was her Mars Decent Imager (MARDI), which was turned on as she completed her white-knuckle descent onto the Red Planet. The 2-megapixel wide-angle camera recorded a full-color, HD video of that landing so that we can relive those seven minutes whenever we want.

Next up on the rover is the Mars Hand Lens Imager, which captures extremely close-up images of things like soil, rocks and ice. Mounted on Curiosity's arm, this camera is so advanced that it can reveal details of materials that are smaller than the width of a human hair. Curiosity has also used this camera to snap incredible self portraits.

Built at about human-eye level, Curiosity's Mars Science Laboratory Mast Camera takes color photos and video of the rover's surroundings. Essentially, this camera sees what she "sees"  the Red Planet terrain or materials collected with the rover's arm, for example. This camera can take incredible 360-degree panoramic views of Mars by stitching together images slowly taken in a rotating circle.

Curiosity's suite of instruments, called Sample Analysis at Mars (SAM), analyzes material the rover collects using her arm. All of these tools are used to complete her ultimate mission of assessing carbon-based molecules  the building blocks of life  on the alien planet.

For this instrument, Curiosity will deliver powdered samples to one of two funnels on her "back" and then to small cups for processing inside the rover's "body." The entire box is about the size of a microwave oven and weighs about 88 pounds.

For studying Mars' atmosphere, Curiosity has a gas chromatograph, a mass spectrometer and a tunable laser spectrometer with combined capabilities to identify a wide range of organic compounds and determine the ratios of different isotopes of key elements. To identify materials in rocks and soils, Curiosity uses an on-board an X-ray diffraction and fluorescence instrument called CheMin.

The rover uses an instrument named ChemCam to vaporize thin layers of material from Martian rocks or soil targets up to 23 feet away. It took eight years for the U.S. Department of Energy's Los Alamos National Laboratory and France's national space and research agencies to build the ChemCam. And Curiosity didn't waste anytime before firing it. Using 30 pulses of laser for 10 seconds, Curiosity blasted her first fist-sized rock called "Coronation" in August.

The rover first used SAM in early November. NASA released the initial results of those findings at the first of December. Despite a rumor that turned out to be a major misunderstanding, those first soil samples did not contain an "earth-shaking" discovery. However, the data did show that Martian soil is a complex makeup of water, sulfur and chlorine-containing substances.

So Curiosity has all this fancy equipment, but how does she know what to use and when to use it? NASA released this handy 60-second video showing how the control center here on Earth sends commands to a rover that's about 140 million miles away.

To complete drives or tasks, NASA engineers send computer commands to the six-wheeled Curiosity the night before she is set to complete them. When it comes to driving, engineers have two options: specific commands (like "drive forward 10 feet") or they can write commands that allow the rover think on her own (such as "see that rock over there? Drive toward it.").

For the latter situation, the rover uses her hazcams  she has four pairs of these cameras  to get a 3D view of hazardous obstacles to avoid while driving. These cameras also help engineers plan where Curiosity will scoop up her next soil sample.

Just five months into her mission on Mars, the Curiosity rover has already made history. In September, her photos revealed an ancient streambed on Mars where water once flowed several billions of years ago. Curiosity Chief Scientist John Grotzinger noted that "a long-flowing stream can be a habitable environment."

In November, NASA scientists analyzed the rover's initial radiation measurements and found that levels at the Martian surface appear to be similar to those astronauts experience in low-Earth orbit. That means that astronauts would be able to survive this environment, putting us one step closer to putting a human on Mars.

The Curiosity mission has been such a success so far that NASA is now planning another robotic science rover that will launch in 2020. Mars Science Laboratory will use the same framework as Curiosity for the next rover's development and design.

"Curiosity's mission is producing an unprecedented volume of valuable science data," Grotzinger told Mashable in November. "Much of this will help us better glimpse the very ancient environments of Mars, that are regarded to have been the most habitable in the planet's history. We have only just started on this journey back in time."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Give your interviewer a firm handshake. Make eye contact. Answer each question succinctly. Have questions to ask the interviewer at the end.

You probably already know the interview essentials. But if you want to move from being a viable candidate to the hiring managers top choice, youll need to go well beyond the basics.

While the way you dress and present yourself is important, it will be the substance of your responses and interactions that leave the interviewer picturing you in the role  and, more importantly, being unable to imagine that anyone else could be a better fit.

Convey these four messages in your next interview, and youre sure to hit a home run.

Hiring managers want to hire people who have a history of getting things done. The logic goes that if you were successful in other jobs, then youre likely to be successful in this one. Truly, nothing says "hire me" better than a track record of achieving amazing results in past jobs.

So, your first task in the interview is to describe how indispensable you were in your previous position. You cant just say, "I was the best Junior Analyst theyd ever seen, and the place will never be the same now that Im gone"  you have to show the interviewer by providing specific examples of the actions you took and what results came because of them.

These are two of the four components of the S-T-A-R method for responding to interview questions. To use this method, set up the situation and the task that you were required to complete to provide the interviewer with background context (e.g., "In my last job as a Junior Analyst, it was my role to manage the invoicing process"), but spend the bulk of your time describing what you actually did (the action) and what you achieved (the result).

For example, "In one month, I streamlined the process, which saved my group 10 man-hours each month and reduced errors on invoices by 5%." Dont worry that someone else could have done it if they were in your position  they werent. It was your job, your actions, your results.

Unfortunately, success in one role does not necessarily translate to being a fit in another role  and to convince the interviewer that youll be able to hit the ground running and be awesome in the new job, you must explain how your skills translate. In particular, you want to highlight those skills that specifically address the issues that the hiring manager is facing.

To understand those issues, conduct industry research prior to the interview. Are there certain themes that come up again and again in job descriptions in your field, like being a shark at sales or a detail-oriented perfectionist? Also listen closely to what the interviewer is asking  often, she'll ask leading questions or share challenges that others before you have had in the role.

For example, say the interviewer asks, "We have tight deadlines and have to turn around our projects quickly. Can you work under time pressure?" Dont just say yes  give a response that showcases your skills and how theyd transfer, like: "Absolutely. In my last job, we often had short deadlines. I was great at managing these situations because I focused on consistent communication with the team, and used my organization skills to stay on top of everything we had going on." Then, provide a specific example.

Companies have interview guidelines designed to hire the most qualified employees based on experience and aptitude, but lets be honest: Often a big factor is likability. Hiring managers dont generally hire people that they dont connect or vibe with. Of course, they dont often say that  they cloak it in statements like, "Shes smart, but I just dont think that she is the right fit for the role." But the truth is, you wont get hired if youre not liked.

So to get the job, you must connect with the interviewer. We're not suggesting that you crack jokes or become buddies  but you should be confident and interact as if youre already working together, through eye contact, active listening, smiling and avoiding nervous laughter. Call it "relaxed formality." Its an interview, so dont get too comfortable, but try to be yourself and have a natural conversation.

Youre almost there! But, its not enough that youre capable of doing the job and would be pleasant to work with  you have to actually want the job. Hiring managers, after all, are looking for employees that really want to be there and will be part of the team for the long haul.

So, you want to show enthusiasm for the role. Not bouncy cheerleader "spirit," but the type of enthusiasm that comes from understanding what the role entails, how you can add value in the role based on your previous experiences and what new challenges it offers to you for growth and development.

Think, "One of the reasons Im so excited about this role is because it allows me to leverage my client management skills [your expertise] with larger clients on more complex deals [the new challenge]."

And, of course, youll want to follow up with a genuine, seal-the-deal thank-you note.

This article originally published at The Muse here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Humans talk funny. We invent words. We smash words together, tear them apart, abbreviate them one way, then another. Which is great and fun, if you're a human. Not so great if you are a machine or the kind of human who programs machines to understand language.

When IBM's famous artificial intelligence, Watson, he/she/it of Jeopardy-winning fame, was in development, its head researcher had a great idea. Humans created this repository of slang, The Urban Dictionary. For example, today on the site, we learn that 'healthy gas' is "the gas (fart) produced from a person who has eaten healthy foods like cabbage, beans, broccolli, grains or other high fiber, high carbohydrate foods."

Brown realized that this formalization of informal language might be a great way for Watson to understand the way real people communicate. So, he and his team, fed the whole thing into their AI.

But one problem. Informal language has a tendency to be dirty, nasty language. Its insults and cuss words, new names for gross old things, old names for gross new things, etc. And so, we learn from Fortune's Michal Lev-Ram, they had to delete all that human messiness from Watson's memory.

Watson couldn't distinguish between polite language and profanity  which the Urban Dictionary is full of. Watson picked up some bad habits from reading Wikipedia as well. In tests it even used the word "bullshit" in an answer to a researcher's query. Ultimately, Brown's 35-person team developed a filter to keep Watson from swearing and scraped the Urban Dictionary from its memory.

This article originally published at The Atlantic here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Perhaps a tablet will convince your fidgety tot to sit on the potty for longer. A new product for parents of children being potty trained features a mini toilet and an adjustable iPad docking station: the iPotty.

Debuted at the 2013 International CES, the colorful plastic training toilet raised questions about whether or not it would actually assist parents with the task of potty training their little ones.

At $40, the iPotty doesn't come with any specific apps, but parents can use apps made for toddlers to encourage them to sit on the potty for awhile.

The makers of the toilet don't want parents to worry about any damage to their tablet  the training potty comes with a clear cover to put over the iPad, as well as a splash guard for boys. The potty can also be disassembled for easy cleaning, CNET reported.

Do you think this would help with potty training? Tell us in the comments below. 

 

Image courtesy of CTA Digital
--------------------------------------------------------------
One of the most interesting bits of information to come out about soon-to-be-appointed Treasury Secretary Jacob Lew, is his nearly unbelievable, did-a-second-grader-just-scribble-that, signature.

The website mechanicalscribe.com has created a Jack Lew signature generator, so you can see how yours, or anyone else's signature would look in Lew style.

While the jury is out on what, if anything, this loopy signature reflects on his personality and decision making abilities, it is amusing to think that this squiggly jumble (or some tamed-down version of it) could appear on every piece of paper legal tender in the United States of America.

This article originally published at National Journal here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Hollywood rolled their egos out of bed before dawn on Thursday morning to hear the 2013 Oscar nominations.

This year's show hosts, Family Guy creator Seth MacFarlane and actress Emma Stone, helmed the announcement  complete with the drama of snubs, duhs and a Hitler joke. Since your eyeballs have already tired of reading words about Affleck, Tarantino and Dame Helen, we'll let GIFs breakdown the biggest moments. Specifically, Jennifer Lawrence GIFs.

The two-time Academy Award nominee has a serious talent for twisting her face into shapes perfect for GIF-fing. So, we'll let J-Law break it down in true Internet style.

Silver Linings Playbook Competing With Lincoln for Best Picture

Finding Out There's No Dinner and Drinks at the Oscars

Finding Out She's the Youngest Actress to Ever Snag Two Noms
--------------------------------------------------------------
Do you have any celebrity followers on Twitter? Would you like to get one?

West Wing alum and current Scandal star Joshua Malina will follow you on Twitter for a year if you'll donate $10 to Mazon, a Jewish hunger-fighting charity, in honor of his 47th birthday Jan. 17.

"A minimal kick-in gets you a heartfelt thank-you and a year's worth of being followed by me on Twitter," he says. "At least once a week, I will check in to your feed, and laugh gently to myself at something you've posted. Promise!"

He made the video above for his campaign on Causes.com, showing some gifts for the highest bidders, including a Scandal backpack given to the show's cast and crew for the holidays and a vintage Sports Night mug he's been using for several years.

SEE ALSO: Give To Charity This Holiday Season With These 5 Apps

In his Causes campaign, he guarantees he doesn't wish to dissuade you from getting him "quality leather goods or gag socks" for his birthday as well. Malina also acknowledges that the goal he set of raising $1 billion for the non-profit is quite lofty. So far, he's raised $6,098.

What do you think of Malina's charity technique? Should more celebrity users follow in his path? Let us know in the comments.

 

Image by Frederick M. Brown / Stringer / Getty Images Entertainment / Getty Images
--------------------------------------------------------------
Singer Justin Timberlake, who hasn't released new music since 2006, gave a sign of a possible comeback in a cryptic tweet that lists only a date and time.

The message to his 15 million followers has been retweeted more than 7,000 times, and people across the web are speculating what it means.

Among the rumors: 1) He may release a new song with Jay-Z and Timbaland. 2) He may announce a new 20-song album. 3) He may unleash a new track with Beyonce and Jay-Z.

Update: As planned, Timberlake unveiled something  a video of his thoughts and him walking into what appears to be a music studio:

Timberlake's last album, FutureSex/LoveSounds, came out in 2006, while the last single to feature him ("4 Minutes" with Madonna) was released in 2008. Listen to that bad boy below:
--------------------------------------------------------------
The daughter of Priceline's Negotiator, a.k.a. William Shatner, is none other than Big Bang Theory's Kaley Cuoco. Who knew?

In the ad above, Cuoco is given over, Kill Bill-style, to a martial artist master to learn the craft of negotiating. But things changed a lot over the 20 years Cuoco spent in the monastery. Now you can use Priceline on your smartphone and "you don't even have to bid." Perhaps the real surprise here is that Shatner, who was supposed to retire from Priceline ads last year and appeared to be killed off in ad, is back. Rather than coming back from the dead, though, this seems to be a flashback of sorts.

However, a press release from Priceline makes it clear that Shatner will be starring in more ads, so this isn't a changing of the guard as much as the introduction of a new character.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Sprinkled among the high-budget films nominated for Oscars this year are three with humble financial beginnings.

Inocente, Kings Point and Buzkashi Boys got monetary boosts from crowdfunding platform Kickstarter long before the Academy granted them nods at Thursday's nominations event.

The flicks raised more than $90,000 from 558 backers on Kickstarter. Those projects' creators are just a few of the filmmakers who have raked in $102.7 million in pledges since 2009.

"These are the fourth, fifth and sixth Kickstarter projects to be nominated for Oscars," said Kickstarter in a statement. "Incident in New Baghdad, Sun Come Up, and The Barber of Birmingham were all nominated in the past."

SEE ALSO: Filmmakers Have Earned $102.7 Million in Pledges on Kickstarter

Inocente and Kings Point earned nominations in Best Documentary (Short Subject), while Buzkashi Boys got a nod in Short Film (Live Action).

No Kickstarter project has won an Oscar, but the Kickstarter folks have their "fingers crossed" that one will win this year. Winners of the 85th Academy Awards will be revealed Feb. 24.

The nearly $103 million figure above comes from 891,979 people, who helped fund one of 8,567 independent films, features, documentaries, shorts, web series or other video projects.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A laptop bag might protect your computer from the elements but it could also act as a bullseye for muggers.

For students on late-night studying binges, schlepping their tech around campus might not be ideal. Drexel University in Philadelphia has an interesting solution to that problem. The university installed a MacBook vending machine in the library, reports VentureBeat. The machine dispenses out laptops on loan 24 hours a day. This way, students can access technology easily, and not worry about staying too late at the library and then having to carrying their laptops home.

To access the vending machine, students will need to use their university ID cards. Students can borrow the laptops for five hours at a time, and a late fee of $5 will be incurred if the student doesn't bring it back in time. The vending machine itself holds 12 MacBooks. While the laptops rest inside the machine, they are charged and their hard drives wiped clean.

Drexel University released a statement about the new machine on Wednesday.

Libraries are not only meant to house books, Dean of Drexel University Libraries Dr. Danuta A. Nitecki, said in a statement.

"This was a great opportunity to match a specific student need with library staff's ongoing exploration of cutting edge technologies. We expect the resulting initiative to improve the Drexel students academic experience," Nitecki said

We've seen MacBook and iPad vending machines before. Some offer gadgets and computers on loan while others sell them. Macys sells Apple products through a vending machine in select stores across the country.

While many university libraries offer laptop rentals, they usually are handled by staff. One benefit of using the vending machine is that no one needs to be working to loan a student a laptop.

Do you think vending machines that loan out tablets and computers should be in libraries across America? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  It seems iPhone owners aren't the only ones who forget to turn off light switches now and then.

WeMo announced the launch of a new product that now gives Android smartphone owners the ability to turn off their lights when they're gone  or just too relaxed to get up from a chair, like their iOS-using counterparts.

The Wi-Fi Light Switch (which is different than WeMo's product for iOS, called Switch) will let you Android-users control an entire bank of lights from the app. The WeMo Light Switch was demoed to Mashable at International CES 2013 in Las Vegas.

It works a lot like the WeMo Switch, but you install it like you would any light switch. You don't have to be home or logged into the same Wi-Fi network to make it work. And you can put as many Light Switches as you'd like in your house and all of them will connect to the app.

You can use WeMo's existing app for iOS devices or the upcoming Android app. The Android 4.0 app will launch in open public beta in February, with a final release in the summer. The WeMo Light Switch is expected to be available summer 2013.

The WeMo Light Switch will retail for $49.99.

What do you think about the Wemo Light Switch? Tell us in the comments.

Andrea Smith conducted the interview for this report. Photos by Nina Frazier.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Got a question for Fazal? Use the chat feature above to get it answered live.

Entrepreneur and public speaker Rahim Fazal is the founder of Involver, the worlds largest social media marketing platform, used by more than 1 million companies and many Fortune 500 brands. Involver was recently acquired by Oracle.

While still in high school, Fazal co-founded a web hosting company and negotiated its sale for $1.5 million while taking his senior year final exams. He then started a web services platform business and eventually took it public, becoming one of the youngest directors of a publicly traded company in the United States.

Fazal completed his MBA at Canadas top management school, the Richard Ivey School of Business. Because of his achievements, he was the youngest student in the schools 80-year history accepted without a prerequisite university degree.

A frequent and popular speaker, Fazal's life-planning program, Gettin It, provides alternately hilarious and sobering education to youths on how to truly get what they want out of life.

Fazal was honored at The White House with an Empact 100 Award by Startup America and The Kauffman Foundation. He has been named one of the Top 30 Entrepreneurs Under 30 in America by Inc Magazine and one of the Top 25 Digital Thought-Leaders by iMedi.

#StartupLab is a free virtual mentorship program created by The Young Entrepreneur Council (YEC), an invite-only non-profit organization comprised of over 500 of Americas most successful young entrepreneurs who have, collectively, generated tens of thousands of jobs and hundreds of millions of dollars in revenue. #StartupLab offers millions of entrepreneurs, small business owners and startup founders the tactical advice they need to launch and grow new businesses via live, interactive video chats, educational content and mentorship opportunities  right on Facebook.
--------------------------------------------------------------
As International CES 2013 draws to a close, Mashable's CES team members have racked our tired, sleep-deprived, Red-Bull-fueled brains to come up with a list of our favorite tech items from the event.

Whittling the list down wasn't easy. We saw smartphones, humongous Ultra HDTVs, smartphone cases, Bluetooth speaker systems, advanced gaming systems and accessories, 3D sensors and more.

Peruse the list in the gallery above and let us know what you think of our CES favorites.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Are you looking to make your next great career move in 2013? Mashable is here to help and proud to announce its 2013 Online Career Expos, a virtual series of nationwide events that will connect you with leading employers in live, engaging conversations.

By participating in these events, you will discover new career opportunities from employers who are eager to hire people like you with skills in business, design, development, marketing, social media and tech. You will chat directly with recruiters online and build your network by continuing your conversations with them weeks (and often, months) after the event.

I have to say this was the best recruiting event I've ever attended hands down! shared one job seeker who attended the October 2012 Mashable Online Career Expo: SF to LA.

The 2012 Career Expo events welcomed more than 50 employers and hundreds of job seekers. Based on the success of our series thus far, we will expand our reach and host nine virtual events nationwide in 2013  hitting the Northeast, Southeast, Midwest, Southwest and West Coast.

The first event will cover the Northeast (NY, DC, Boston and Philadelphia) and will take place on April 10. Registration for each event opens 10 weeks in advance, but sign up now to get on the early invite list for the events that interest you.

If you're an employer interested in getting involved, click here to learn more how to participate. Please note that space is limited so early employer registration is encouraged!
--------------------------------------------------------------
Now that we're more than a week into 2013, it feels safe to say the world did not end in December 2012. Planet Earth and human civilization aren't the only things that stubbornly refused to end last month. So did lots of apocalypse websites and forums.

Some of the survivors are clearly forums maintained by people still hoping to peddle their unsold copies of various "2012 OMG" products, while others appear to be from true believers so sincere you almost feel bad for them, ready to pick up the shattered pieces of a world that steadfastly refused to shatter. How rude.

The website Survive2012: Ancient Mayan Doomsday, Pole Shifts and Evolution exists mainly to sell copies of a book called Survive 2012, so it's no surprise that author and website owner Robert Best urges his readers to "give it another 6 months (at least)."

Apparently, he's also behind the still-popular 2012forum.com, which announced last November that the forum would shut down sometime between January and June 2013.

The Maya Calendar and 2012 forum is also still up, though as of press time, most of the threads had not had new comments for several weeks. The most recent comment was to a thread started on Dec. 20, the night before the non-apocalypse, by a gloater posting under the name "ToldYouSo."

Still, one determined 2012 believer responded, cheerfully suggesting that even if the end hasn't happened yet, it's bound to sooner or later:

The true believer behind 2012apocalypse.net apparently combines Mayan apocalypse stories with unique interpretations of Biblical prophecies and the works of Nostradamus, plus something about the Antichrist and terrorists with nukes. We can't pin it down more closely than that.

In addition to Mayan-exclusive forums, there were also post-apocalyptic threads on regular conspiracy sites. One gloating poster at AboveTopSecret.com started a thread asking "A question for 2012ers: will you admit you were wrong?" The answer appears to be no.

This article originally published at The Daily Dot here
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  Looking back, it was a little odd that Microsoft chose the Surface RT tablet as its showcase for Windows 8. After all, the device was created to run a version of Windows that runs on ARM-based processors instead of the usual x86 chips that had powered all Windows machines before it.

That inherently limited the Surface RT by preventing it from running legacy Windows apps. Windows 8 had to stand on its own, without the safety net of the classic desktop environment (it still exists on the device, it just can't run much of anything). That could be why the new operating system has apparently struggled to catch on.

That might change with the Surface Pro (starting at $899). This, of course, is the version of the tablet that packs an Intel Core i5 processor instead of the ARM-based Tegra 3. Thanks to that CPU, the Surface Pro can run apps designed for Windows 7 or even older versions of Windows. Photoshop, iTunes, you name it  you can do it on this machine.

Why would you want to, instead of, say, an Ultrabook or even a desktop PC? That's a question Microsoft has yet to answer adequately, although the Surface Pro makes a decent case. Microsoft was kind enough to let me check out one of the beefed-up Surfaces here in Vegas. No official release date yet, though the Microsoft has said the Pro will come about three months after the debut of the Surface RT. That would peg its release for late January.

Should you be thinking about getting one? Absolutely  as long as you looooove Windows 8. I spent about 45 minutes with Microsoft executives checking out the new Surface, and it's telling that we spent maybe one or two of those in the legacy desktop environment. For all its strengths as a traditional PC, the Surface Pro is at its core a tablet, and Windows 8 is all about tablets.

At first glance, the Surface Pro looks almost exactly like the Surface RT. It's the same screen size, the same angles  the same keyboard Touch Cover options. They could have called it the Surface Ditto.

But looking at the edge of the device, you start to notice the differences. The Pro is slightly thicker and noticeably heavier. It's got about half a pound on the Surface RT, which actually feels quite heavy when you compare to recent tablets such as the comparably sized Samsung Galaxy Note, or even the 800-pound tablet in the room, the iPad.

One of the first things you notice is the seam that seemingly separates the backside from the edges. It looks a little like the final piece of the tablet wasn't put on properly, but it's really how the tablet cools itself. As a Core-based device, the Surface Pro needs a cooling fan (it has two, actually), and Microsoft wanted heat to expel from the edge, letting you rest it in your lap as long as possible.

That's still kind of a challenge since the Surface Pro, like the Surface RT, isn't a laptop per se, although it plays one on TV. You need to extend a kickstand to get it to rest anywhere, which I better on tabletops than shins (although I have a colleague who swears that propping the Surface on his knees isn't so bad).

Once you turn it on, the most appreciable upgrade from the original Surface is the screen: The Surface Pro ups the resolution from 1,366 x 768 to full HD (1,920 x 1,080). The screen looks fantastic, and you can really appreciate the detail in both visual media and simple aspects of the UI, like the colored background.

As beautiful as the Surface Pro's screen is, it's a little ironic that just yesterday Panasonic unveiled a 4K Windows 8 tablet. And there have been plenty of full HD Windows 8 laptops and hybrids. The Surface is really just catching up here.

The Surface Pro includes an interesting extra: a stylus. Including the accessory makes some sense  you'll probably be in need of pen-like precision on this device much more often than on the Surface RT. Photoshop alone, for example, often needs you to stay on target.

In my time with the Surface Pro, I got a chance to use the stylus with Fresh Paint, a drawing app. Although the stylus isn't powered, it  and the Surface Pro's software  were tailored specifically to work with each other. The pen is useless on the Surface RT (or any other tablet).

If that sounds similar to the Samsung Galaxy Note, it is  in more ways than one. Microsoft even has its own version of "Air View," where the screen can detect the stylus hovering above it. Once it does, it knows to ignore any errant pen strokes on the screen that could have been caused by errant fingers. There's even a button on the stylus  Microsoft is really aping Samsung here.

At least it's good aping, and drawing with the pen is a pleasure. Doodling a face in Fresh Paint, I felt the screen had just the right amount of friction on the pen as I drew facial features. The stylus is pressure sensitive, too.

While the Surface RT was a tablet that brought to the tablet some PC features, Microsoft sees the Surface Pro more as a PC with some tablet features. That makes some sense, given that the Surface Pro is Core-based  Microsoft even bypassed Intel's Atom chips to build the full PC experience into this machine.

That machine may be heavy and have limited battery life, but that won't matter so much to the "prosumer" Windows crowd that Microsoft is courting here. Chances are, if you're opting for a Surface Pro, most of the time it's going to rest on your desk, jacked into another monitor and attached to either its Touch Cover or your own keyboard and mouse accessories.

That's because the Surface Pro will be your main PC. It's everything the Surface RT was, plus the productivity part of the equation that was missing. The question is: If you want that productivity, are you prepared to go all in on mobility  Windows 8's version of mobility  even at the cost of things like a built in keyboard?

Based on what I saw today, the Surface Pro is ready to take you to that future, where the gateway to your digital life is a slab of metal and glass that accompanies you almost everywhere, even though it'll spend most of its time nestled in a web of accessories. It certainly adds a whole new dimension of mobility to what people think of as a "PC." But is that what we want?

What say you? Are you interested in getting the Surface Pro? Tell us why or why not in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
After collecting data from Asteroid Apophis' distant Earth flyby yesterday, NASA confirms that the asteroid will not collide with the Earth in 2036.

The Slooh Space Camera caught a glimpse of the much-talked-about Apophis on Jan. 9 as it passed 9 million miles away from Earth. While the asteroid's size isn't that large  about three-and-a-half football fields  it's notable because it will come very close contact with Earth when it circles back around in 23 years.

When the asteroid was discovered in 2004, scientists initially calculated that it had a 2.7% chance of hitting Earth in 2029. While that scenario was eventually ruled out, a collision in 2036 still had a 1 in 250,000 chance. However, Apophis' Jan. 9 appearance gave scientists enough information to safely confirm that we would not, in fact, have a catastrophic run-in with the asteroid.

"The impact odds as they stand now are less than one in a million, which makes us comfortable saying we can effectively rule out an Earth impact in 2036," said Don Yeomans, manager of NASA's Near-Earth Object Program Office at JPL, in a press release. "Our interest in asteroid Apophis will essentially be for its scientific interest for the foreseeable future."

SEE ALSO: Huge Asteroid's Earth Flyby Caught on Video

Nevertheless, Apophis will still come extremely close to Earth. It will be just 19,400 miles away in 2029 and about 17,200 miles from Earth's surface in 2036. That's so close that some people in parts of the world will be able to see it in the sky with the naked eye.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Don't count the Nokia Lumia out just yet.

Nokia announced Thursday that it sold 4.4 million Lumia smartphones in the December quarter, more than it sold in each of the three previous quarters and nearly twice the number sold in the September quarter. A year ago, Nokia revealed that it had sold more than 1 million Lumias since the line of smartphones launched.

The announcement came as the company released preliminary earnings results for the quarter, in which it revealed the third consecutive quarter of profitability, thanks to lower operating costs and greater-than-expected device sales. Nokia now expects its Devices & Services segment to have an operating margin of between break even and 2%, compared to a previous estimate of negative 6%.

"We are pleased that Q4 2012 was a solid quarter where we exceeded expectations and delivered underlying profitability in Devices & Services and record underlying profitability in Nokia Siemens Networks," Nokia's CEO Stephen Elop said in a statement.

In total, Nokia sold 15.9 million smartphones for the quarter, though 9.3 million of those were Asha phones, which is a much cheaper device that is popular in Asia and Latin America.

Sales of the Lumia phone in particular were likely helped by discounts offered on certain models. Nokia slashed the price of the Lumia 900 in half last July, just three months after the device hit the U.S. market. Later in the year, Amazon cut the price of the Lumia 920 from $99 to $39 for those who signed up for a contract with AT&T.

The Lumia phones have been praised by many reviewers for its sleek design and unique user interface, but sales of the device have yet to approach the levels of the leading smartphones in the market. Samsung sold 30 million Galaxy S III smartphones worldwide in just five months last year and Apple is expected to sell 45-50 million iPhones in the December quarter.

Nokia's stock jumped nearly 20% in pre-market trading on the strength of these sales figures.
--------------------------------------------------------------
What could be more perplexing to a dog than a sour lemon? Another member of the citrus family.

Maymo, the adorably derpy beagle, is known for his extremely cute reactions to everyday objects like cabbage and water bottles.

SEE ALSO: This Is the Ultimate Dogshaming Video  No Bones About it

When given half an orange, Maymo does not know what to do with it  or himself. Watch as he goes head-to-head in an adorable battle with the world's most impossible-to-rhyme fruit.

BONUS: Puppies Aren't The Only Ones Who Hate Lemons
--------------------------------------------------------------
Hot on the heels of the nominations for the 85th Academy Awards, the Academy of Motion Picture Arts & Sciences have updated their award-winning Oscar companion app  this time with Facebook integration and Android support.

The app is designed to offer fans an inside look before, during and after Hollywood's biggest night. This is the third year that ABC and the Academy have worked together on the app and each year, the experience gets more refined and polished.

Before the Oscars, users can check the app to find out the latest Oscar news, watch interviews with insiders and access Oscar trivia. Users can also browse past winners, past red carpet fashions and famous Oscar video clips.

On Feb. 24  Oscar Sunday  the app turns into a second screen companion with the Oscar.com Backstage Pass. The Backstage Pass will let users access over a dozen live cameras placed throughout the Red Carpet and inside the Dolby Theatre. Fans can also access the press room and see interviews with stars after they win.

This year, the official Oscar app is also available on Android and for the Kindle Fire. This is a big deal, if only because it further solidifys Android's dominance in the mobile space.

In our tests, the app offers a similar experience across platforms, which is great news for Oscar fans, regardless of smartphone OS preference.

A staple of the Oscars app is the ability to create your own Oscar ballot. This year, the app ballot is more interactive than ever.

When you select your choice in the app, an image of the film or of an actor/director appears behind your choice. It's a subtle, but very cool effect.

The bigger news is that using Facebook, you can play along with your friends. The ballot will update in real-time so you can see how you rank against your Facebook friends as it happens on Oscar Sunday.

Fans can also share news and photos from the app directly to Twitter and Facebook, complete with the #Oscars hashtag.

You can download the Oscars app for iOS [iTunes link], Google Play [Google Play link] and Kindle Fire [Amazon link] now. The Oscars kick off at 7:00 p.m. EST on Feb. 24, 2013 on ABC.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Oscars host Seth MacFarlane and actress Emma Stone revealed the nominees for the 85th Academy Awards on Thursday at the Samuel Goldwyn Theater in Beverly Hills, Calif.

Winners will be announced Feb. 24 at the Dolby Theatre, as people watch at home on ABC.

SEE ALSO: Watch Seth MacFarlane Tell His Dad He's Hosting The Oscars

MacFarlane, who earned the hosting gig in October, is now only one of two Oscars hosts to ever participate in the nominations announcement. Charlton Heston did so in 1972.

Steven Spielberg's Lincoln leads the pack of nominees with 12 nods.

Which of these contenders are you most hoping takes home an Academy Awards statue? Tell us in the comments or play the Oscars' interactive ballot game to pick your favorites.

Nominees: Amour, Life of Pi, Argo, Lincoln, Beasts of the Southern Wild, Silver Linings Playbook, Django Unchained, Zero Dark Thirty, Les Misrables

Last year's winner: The Artist

Nominees: Michael Haneke (Amour), Benh Zeitlin (Beasts of the Southern Wild), Ang Lee (Life of Pi), Steven Spielberg (Lincoln), David O. Russell (Silver Linings Playbook)

Last year's winner: Michel Hazanavicius, The Artist

Nominees: Jessica Chastain (Zero Dark Thirty), Quvenzhan Wallis (Beasts of the Southern Wild), Jennifer Lawrence (Silver Linings Playbook), Naomi Watts (The Impossible), Emmanuelle Riva (Amour)

Last year's winner: Meryl Streep, The Iron Lady

Nominees: Amy Adams (The Master), Sally Field (Lincoln), Anne Hathaway (Les Misrables), Helen Hunt (The Sessions), Jacki Weaver (Silver Linings Playbook)

Last year's winner: Octavia Spencer, The Help

For a full list of nominees, click here.

Best Original Song

"Before My Time," Chasing Ice

"Pi's Lullaby," Life Of Pi

"Suddenly," Les Misrables

"Everybody Needs A Best Friend," Ted

"Skyfall," Skyfall

Best Original Screenplay

John Gatins, Flight

Mark Boal, Zero Dark Thirty

Quentin Tarantino, Django Unchained

Michael Haneke, Amour

Wes Anderson and Roman Coppola, Moonrise Kingdom

Best Adapted Screenplay

Chris Terrio, Argo

Lucy Alibar & Benh Zeitlin, Beasts of the Southern Wild

David Magee, Life of Pi

Tony Kushner, Lincoln

David O. Russell, Silver Linings Playbook

Best Documentary Feature

5 Broken Cameras

The Gatekeepers

How To Survive A Plague

The Invisible War

Searching For Sugar Man



Production Design

Sarah Greenwood (Production Design); Katie Spencer (Set Decoration), Anna Karenina

Dan Hennah (Production Design); Ra Vincent and Simon Bright (Set Decoration), The Hobbit

Eve Stewart (Production Design); Anna Lynch-Robinson (Set Decoration), Les Misrables

David Gropman (Production Design); Anna Pinnock (Set Decoration), Life of Pi

Rick Carter (Production Design); Jim Erickson (Set Decoration), Lincoln

Makeup And Hairstyling

Howard Berger, Peter Montagna and Martin Samuel, Hitchcock

Peter Swords King, Rick Findlater and Tami Lane, The Hobbit

Lisa Westcott and Julie Dartnell, Les Misrables

Film Editing

William Goldenberg, Argo

Tim Squyres, Life Of Pi

Michael Kahn, Lincoln

Jay Cassidy and Crispin Struthers, Silver Linings Playbook

Dylan Tichenor and William Goldenberg, Zero Dark Thirty

Sound Editing

Erik Aadahl and Ethan Van der Ryn, Argo

Wylie Stateman, Django Unchained

Eugene Gearty and Philip Stockton, Life of Pi

Per Hallberg and Karen Baker Landers, Skyfall

Paul N.J. Ottosson, Zero Dark Thirty
--------------------------------------------------------------
While many in the film industry celebrated their nominations for 85th Academy Awards on Thursday, some Twitter users felt that others had been robbed.

The biggest snub appears to be Ben Affleck's absence from the nominees for Best Director. Many users, including Piers Morgan, felt that Argo made Affleck a worthy contender. Kathryn Bigelow and Quentin Tarentino were also hot topics among missing Best Picture nominees.

SEE ALSO: Oscars 2013: Here Are the Nominations

What do you think of this year's Oscar nominations? Who got snubbed in your opinion?
--------------------------------------------------------------
Several startups have launched apps and websites in recent years with the goal of driving readers to long-form journalism. Now, one former novelist hopes to do the same for short fiction with a new iPad magazine application called Paragraph Shorts.

The free app, which launched in the iPad Newsstand Thursday, curates short stories from leading literary publications like The New Yorker, Paris Review and Zoetrope to help casual readers discover works of fiction. Each issue of the magazine contains seven short stories and creates more of a multimedia literary experience by including text, audio and video pieces. The debut issue features works by big-name writers like Jonathan Franzen and Etgar Keret, as well as a song by the High Highs that you can have play in the background while reading.

The app was developed by Paragraph, a two-and-a-half year old publishing startup that is part of bMuse, a New York-based incubator focused on media innovation. Paragraph's co-founder and CEO Ziv Navoth has a long resume in the tech world, including executive roles at Bebo and AOL, but it was his experience as a writer that informed his vision for Paragraph Shorts.

On the same day he joined Bebo in 2007, Navoth had his first and only book published. That book, called Nanotales, was a collection of short stories presented in an unusual format with no chapters or page numbers. He tried to promote the collection in bookstores, but was told not to bother "because no one buys books of short stories."

"The more I thought about it, the more it became clear to me that short stories, for most of their history, were locked into these physical vessels. You couldn't publish a short story and sell it to the public," Navoth told Mashable. As he saw it, readers traditionally either had to purchase an anthology or subscribe to literary magazines to get access to short stories, which makes it harder to find and share these works of fiction.

Navoth decided to work on changing this with Paragraph, a startup whose mission statement is to "do to the short story what iTunes did to singles - provide people with a great way to enjoy quality, bite-sized experiences, discovering not only great stories, but great writers." The Shorts magazine is an initial step towards that goal.

Paragraph Shorts only collects short stories from websites that are not behind paywalls, which certainly limits the selection. For example, Navoth estimates that only about 10% to 15% of the short stories published in The New Yorker are available to read in their entirety for free online. Still, that leaves plenty of stories to curate, and the startup has been in touch with publishers to make select paywalled content available for free through the app. The Paris Review has already agreed to take this step.

"Someone else could make the argument that mobile devices are the last nail in the coffin of the short story, but with the right people thinking about it in the right way, there's no reason that the mobile device can't start our renaissance with the short story," said Lorin Stein, editor of The Paris Review. "It's all the in the execution."

When readers click on stories in the magazine from publications other than The Paris Review, the app first loads the website where the story originally appeared  giving a page view to the publisher  and then offers the option to read a mobile-friendly version within the app. The mobile version is not paginated, which might be nice for longer reads, but users can place a bookmark at any point within the text. There are also options to share stories to Facebook and Twitter, favorite stories from various issues to read later as well as recommendations for similar stories and links to other works from that author.

The hope going forward is that the magazine app will be to use social recommendations to power suggestions for what to read next. Navoth says he's also interested in the idea of opening the magazine up to submissions. The problem, as he puts it, is that then the app might start to turn into more of a traditional literary magazine "with a slush pile of thousands of stories" that someone needs to sort though.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A new study from Common Sense Media shows the majority of parents (75%) feel that shielding children from violence is difficult. That same percentage of parents blame "media violence, such as content in TV, movies and video games" for adding to "Americas culture of violence."

For this survey, conducted by USA Market Research, 1,050 parents with children ages 18 years and younger were randomly selected to share their opinions.

Results revealed that 88% of parents said violent ads should be prevented from airing during programs largely watched by children. What's more, 91% want theaters to show previews that only have the same or lower rating than the movie being shown.

"Parents are clearly concerned about how violence in media may be impacting their children," James Steyer, founder and CEO of Common Sense Media, said in a statement. "Our culture of violence seems to have made it the new normal that parents who take their kids to a movie theatre or gather to watch a football game are at risk of exposing them to inappropriate content that is marketing video games, or films rated for more mature audiences."

In addition to content that children see in the media, parents were also asked about other factors contributing to violence in America. Parents said they worry about bullying (92%), access to guns (75%) and current levels of crime (86%).

Do you limit what video games, movies and TV programs your children watch because of the violence portrayed in them? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Just like the McRib sandwich, snowy weather should best be enjoyed sparingly and only during special times of the year. It's nice at first  but everything  everything  whether it's barbecued or iced, overstays its welcome at some point.

SEE ALSO: 12 Cool Photos of This Week's Massive Winter Snowstorm

Mashable understands. We've thrown together some of the best YouTube videos, above, of winter taking its toll on people. Be warned: It ain't pretty. But "pretty" has never really been Old Man Winter's style.

This goes out to anyone who's ever slipped on ice, or gotten stuck in the snow. And remember that it's okay to laugh  it helps (frozen) tears taste less bitter.

Any good videos that we missed? Share your favorite winter "fail" videos with us, below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A thread at the top of Reddit's most popular photography group, r/photography, accuses BuzzFeed of "stealing people's long exposure pics ... without any permission" for a sponsored post advertising a camera on the site.

The BuzzFeed post, "14 Amazing Photos That Are Totally Not Photoshopped," is a list of images taken with a camera's shutter open for an extended time, a technique commonly used for star trail and "light drawing" photography. Samsung sponsored the article to promote the Galaxy Camera's "Light Trace" mode, a feature that helps people take these increasingly popular photos.

Several of the original photos in the article, according to Redditors posting in the thread, were taken from Reddit or Imgur (the most popular image host among the Reddit community) without permission of the photographers or proper link credit. Most of the sources were originally listed as "Imgur"  when clicked, brought readers to a hosted .JPG file, devoid of ownership information.

Following the complaints, BuzzFeed switched the photos in favor of Flickr content licensed under Creative Commons.

"We were very concerned we were pissing off people in that community," said Jonah Peretti, co-founder of BuzzFeed, "And we've already removed all of those images and updated the post. It was something just designed to show how cool that sort of photography is. Sometimes I think Imgur confuses the sourcing of which images wind up out there. And we quickly corrected it when we were able to discover who the actual photographer was and that he was upset that it was used."

When asked if BuzzFeed should take steps to identify photographers before a post like this goes live, Peretti agreed that it should. "If we can find the person yes, for sure," he said. "I think that sometimes we have trouble finding the person."

One Redditor proved the straightforwardness of sourcing the photos. Mtranda did "40 minutes of research" and was able to identify the photographers behind most of the images.

"We really regret that we made these awesome, creative people upset," said Peretti. "And we would love to talk to any of them directly to figure out how to work together in the future on this stuff."

Peretti emphasized that BuzzFeed, not Samsung, was the creative force behind the post. "It was a BuzzFeed post, not a Samsung post. They sponsored it, but it was a BuzzFeed post," he said. Samsung has yet to respond to Mashable's request for comment.

Although several of the Redditors posting in the thread are upset at BuzzFeed for the post, others blame the photographers themselves for uploading the images to Imgur, from which photos may be easily taken without adequate sourcing.

"This is a perfect example of why Imgur is a horrible place to post photos," wrote wpnw. "You do open yourself up to this kind of thing by posting your photographic work on Imgur," added PowerCrumpet. "Welcome to the Internet, where fair use and piracy run both way[s]," opined bitparity.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Mark Hurd resigned as CEO and Chairman of Hewlett-Packard in 2010 after an investigation into whether he sexually harassed one of HP's contractors, but at least one influential person didn't want to see him leave: Steve Jobs.

Shortly after HP announced Hurd's resignation, Jobs reached out to Hurd to offer his perspective  as someone who had also been forced out of a company years before  and urged Hurd to return to HP, according to a new report in Bloomberg Businessweek.

"The pair spent more than two hours together, Jobs taking Hurd on his customary walk around [his] tree-lined neighborhood. At numerous points during their conversation, Jobs pleaded with Hurd to do whatever it took to set things right with the board so that Hurd could return," the report says, citing multiple anonymous sources familiar with the exchange. "Jobs even offered to write a letter to HPs directors and to call them up one by one."

Jobs apparently believed that without Hurd in charge, HP's board would undo the progress Hurd had made as the head of the company and do significant damage to the business. Ironically enough, it was one of Jobs closest friends  Larry Ellison  who ultimately undermined that effort by convincing Hurd to work at Oracle, rather than return to HP. Since then, HP has had two CEOs, some disastrous business decisions and the stock has tanked to its lowest level in a decade.

Perhaps Jobs was right to worry.

It might sound strange that Jobs would offer to go out of his way to help a company that competes with Apple on several fronts, but HP was more than just a competitor to Jobs, it was a key part of Silicon Valley and his personal history in the tech world.

Jobs has repeatedly said that the company's founders Bill Hewlett and Dave Packard were his heroes growing up, and he famously called up Hewlett at age 12 for spare parts. Hewlett laughed, gave him the parts he wanted and even gave him a summer job working on the assembly line at HP.

The story of the exchange between Hurd and Jobs is reminiscent of another anecdote about Jobs' soft spot for HP. During his final visit to Apple's campus before resigning as chairman of the company, some of Apple's board members gloated about the recent news that HP was abandoning WebOs and the TouchPad  its iPad competitor. Rather than celebrate this, as some on the board might have expected, Jobs lamented the news.

Hewlett and Packard built a great company, and they thought they had left it in good hands. But now its being dismembered and destroyed," Jobs told the group, according to Walter Isaacson's biography of the former Apple co-founder. I hope Ive left a stronger legacy so that will never happen at Apple."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Sammy Sosa missed out on the Baseball Hall of Fame this week, but he may have just landed a shot at the Internet Hall of Fame.

The steroid-tainted slugger apparently posted several bizarre, staged and downright creepy shots to his new Pinterest page three weeks ago, but the sports web just stumbled across the trove of Internet gold. In the photos, we see Sosa relaxing on a couch, pointing in multiple directions and posing awkwardly  or is that casually?  against various pieces of furniture.

It's hard to tell what to love most about the photos  Sosa's penetrating gaze, frozen smile or the the fact that all fourteen photos are of Sammy alone and have the exact same caption: "Sammy Sosa. Yes, I'm the real Sammy Sosa, and this is my Pinterest."

Now is this actually Sammy Sosa's Pinterest? Probably. The photos posted there can also also be found on Sosa's equally amazing Flickr page, and one is the profile shot for his Twitter page, which features a number of candid family shots and is in fact the real deal, according to a recent Chicago Tribune article.

Anyway, enough skepticism. Just take a deep breath and behold some of the majesty that is Slammin' Sammy's surreal Pinterest garden:

3. Don't Look at Me. Look Over There While I Make a Quick Conference Call

5. "Sammy Sosa. Yes, I'm the real Sammy Sosa, and this is my Pinterest."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Samsung has launched Galaxy S II Plus, a new smartphone that is essentially an update to the now very dated Samsung Galaxy S II.

The 4.3-inch phone sports a 1.2 GHz dual-core processor, 480 x 800-pixel screen resolution, an 8-megapixel camera on the back and a 2-megapixel one on the front. It also offers 1GB of RAM and 8GB of storage memory that can be expanded with microSD cards.

The S II Plus runs on Android 4.1.2 (Jelly Bean), and supports HSPA+, GPS, Bluetooth, Wi-Fi and an option for NFC.

Exact pricing and availability of Samsung's Galaxy S II Plus have not yet been announced, but given the middling specs, we assume the price will be on the cheap end of the spectrum.

What do you think of the S II Plus? Tell us in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Photographer Pablo Vicente filmed a  ahem  ridiculously attractive, shirtless guy having water balloons thrown at him. And he put it on YouTube in slow motion.

SEE ALSO: Scramble to Watch This Slo-Mo Egg Destruction

Feel free to play this on repeat for the next few hours. No judgement here, just tell everyone you enjoy the "cinematography."
--------------------------------------------------------------
If you're a skateboarder, the YouTube video above shows why you shouldn't bomb down steep hills that lead directly to busy cross streets.

The young sk8r guy shown here nearly gets mowed down by a passing motorist, but thankfully is able to skid to a halt just in time and his board takes the blow alone. We think his friend's astounded explanation sums up the situation pretty well.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It sounds like a great idea: A boot with retractable skis. It saves a lot of room in the car and takes less time to get on and off the slopes. Too bad the product  SkiBrogues  is a fake.

The concept is actually an ad for Hertz. If you click through to SkiBrogues' official-looking site, there's a Hertz banner ad showing weekly rental rates for ski destinations. And if you still want to buy a SkiBrogue? Sorry, they're sold out.

Hertz isn't the first advertiser to create a product to generate interest for its primary offering. Applebee's last summer advertised an inflatable doll that was supposed to act as a decoy at work so you can grab lunch at the chain. That, however, was a real product, which sold briskly on Amazon.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  When you go to the store, how often do you pick things up off the shelf, examine them and then put them back? Some items make it into the cart, others do not. Thanks to the check-out counter, retailers know when somethings been bought, but not much about what made you stop and choose it in the first place. Now, 3D sensing technology may offer an unlikely, yet powerful, solution.

In a small suite adjacent to the massive CES 2013 convention hall, Primesense and partner Shopperperception showed me a rather remarkable technology that uses the formers 3D sensing technology, and an iPad-based analytics app to give retailers an aggregated view of what shoppers are doing at store shelves.

Primesense, which unveiled its tiny Capri 3D sensor at the show, also provides the 3D sensing technology for Microsofts Kinect for the Xbox 360. Its low-cost, tiny motherboards bathe the area in front of it in an infrared 3D mesh that a second camera interprets. Its how interactive games know not only where multiple people are in a room, but also exactly what each of them is doing. Its obviously super useful for virtual dancing and driving, but as Primsense demonstrated to me, the open platform can do far more than just play games.

In the case of Shopperception, a Primesense 3D sensor sits high above a store shelf. Its so small that most shoppers probably wouldnt notice it, and its not taking pictures. Instead the sensor is watching as people touch products on the shelf, take them off the shelf and even as they put them back. Shopperception's app aggregates the data for all the shoppers who interacted with the shelves to create a real-time consumer response report. Theres even a heat map to show which items had the most  and least shopper activity.

Primsense execs tell me that Shopperception is already in some stores and a typical use case scenario is one brand (like Heineken) or manufacturer setting it up to evaluate how their own products and promotions are doing.

You can see Shopperception in action in the video above. Watch and the let us know in the comments what you think of the latest innovation in retail.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  New York Jets player Tim Tebow launched a line of headphones on Thursday with audio accessories company Soul Electronics, featuring high-endurance models for athletes, as well as a business-inspired pair called the "Jet."

Tebow unveiled the new line at the 2013 International CES conference in Las Vegas under the Soul Electronics brand, which was founded by rapper and actor Ludacris.

In addition to the Jet, Tebow has become a brand ambassador for the company's flagship SL300 signature headphone series  the latest model is available in blue, white and black for limited release. Meanwhile, Tebow's Combat+ line features noise-cancelling technology and is designed for athletes, as well as more casual users.

When a Soul Electronics spokesperson introduced the Jet headphones, she said it might not be called this for "too much longer  we might change the name," alluding to the possibility of a looming trade. "I'm just kidding," she added. (Tebow turned red and laughed along with the press).

When asked if he regrets the name, he said: "It's also called the Jet because it's the executive line for people who fly across the country ... and are flying in jets." (More laughter followed).

Tebow said he was most directly involved with developing his Combat+ line.

"I was so interested in having something comfortable I could practice on the field in before games," Tebow said. "So many headphones can feel good and sound great, but when you're warming up, they fall off and that is a big distraction. We came up with these Combat models to help you keep that focus."

Despite it being an already saturated market with a big increase in celebrity-branded headphone lines  including one from reality TV star Snooki that also launched this week  Tebow said his collection is appealing for all types of people.

"People who try them out will hopefully believe in them," Tebow said. "We have headphones for athletes who want to train and some for those who want to fly or even sleep. They are even great for moms who are doing the dishes and listening to their country or gospel music. Whoever you are, whatever you are doing, we have something that fits you."

Tebow, who said it was his first time at CES, called the huge tech conference "a whirlwind."

"I've seen a lot of cool stuff," he said. "That fork that helps you lose weight is pretty crazy."
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Launchpad is a series that introduces Mashable readers to compelling startups. If you would like to have your startup considered for inclusion, please see the details here.



One-Liner Pitch: Trip Tern will plan out the itinerary for your next getaway.

Why It's Taking Off: Trip Terns goal is to make your travel planning easier by creating an itinerary that includes information about your city, hotel and interests.

Planning a trip to a new city is time-consuming and often requires researching restaurants, hotels, transportation and more on various travel websites. Now, one India-based startup hopes to simplify that process by being a one-stop destination for all your trip planning needs.

Trip Tern is a social travel site that prepares your own travel itinerary for your next trip in just a few minutes. Users can select the destination, hotel, dates and attractions that theyre interested in, and Trip Tern will create an itinerary with all of the information. Trip Tern also provides a map that shows the location of the hotel and attractions nearby.

We found that when planning your own trips, travel sites just give you information and a list of places to see without any direction, Shailendra Sason, co-founder of Trip Tern, told Mashable. Trip Tern creates the perfect itinerary so that you have an optimized plan for however long you are staying in a city.

Users can edit the itineraries as needed to suit any changes to their travel plans.

Similar to the online travel organizer TripIt, Trip Tern lets you share your itinerary online with friends and family. TripIts itinerary feature, however, allows users to include more detailed information about their trips, such as flight and hotel details, weather and driving directions.

Although users cannot book hotels on Trip Tern, the company plans to add this option and earn revenue from it in the future. The team is also considering giving users the option to contact travel agents in their desired city directly from the site.

As you visit new destinations from Trip Terns list of cities, you can build a collection of your trips with photos that you can share with friends. Trip Tern also lets you keep up with your friends travel adventures by showing you their photos and details about their trips each time you log on to the site.

Trip Tern is currently in beta and has 6,000 users, many of whom have been exploring New York and London as possible travel destinations. Although there are only 16 cities to choose from on its website, the company will soon add more cities in Europe, North America and South America.

The startup is also planning to develop a mobile app, create a local language glossary and add details about weather and transportation to itineraries.

Trip Tern is self-funded and expects to launch publicly in March.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Among Vincent Van Gogh's most famous paintings is this swirly, stern-faced self-portrait of the legendary artist himself:

But what would that headshot look like if it was a photographed portrait rather than a piece of impressionist art?

Well, probably a lot like this:

The stunning recreation was done by Tadao Cern, an architect and photographer from Lithuania. On his personal site, Cern also gave the project a funny backstory:

Some time ago a stranger asked me to make his portrait ... So I did. I sent him the image and I never heard back from him again since that moment. Not long ago I saw one painting and I felt that it was very familiar to me. And then I got it  It was a copy of my photo! I did a little research on that and it seem that the guy who draw(copied) it is quite well known around... His name is Vincent Van Gogh or something ... Pity that he never mentioned me and I can't find his contact now.

This video Cern posted to YouTube also shows a sped-up version of the process of turning an iconic work of art into a startlingly lifelike faux-tograph:
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  For Verizon, CES 2013 was all about innovation. The carrier didn't make any huge announcements at this years show, and instead took the opportunity to talk about how it is getting involved with other companies to create groundbreaking new products that will change how we interact with the world around us.

Today at 12 p.m. PST / 3 p.m. EST, Verizon is going to do a live tour of its CES booth using Livestream's Broadcaster, one of the devices actually on display in the carriers booth at CES. The device allows videographers to broadcast live video to the web directly from their camera.

During the tour youll be able to see a technology for football helmets that can report exactly where a player was hit and with what force, Diebold's ATM of the future and get a closer look at Verizon's LTE Broadcast.

Well have the whole broadcast below.

While you watch, let us know in the comments what you think about the technology you see.
--------------------------------------------------------------
UPDATE: CLICK HERE TO SEE THE LIST OF NOMINEES

Oscars host Seth MacFarlane and actress Emma Stone will announce the nominees for the 85th Academy Awards at 5:30 a.m. Thursday at the Samuel Goldwyn Theater in in California.

Watch live here to hear the nominees. Winners will be announced Feb. 24 at the Dolby Theatre.

SEE ALSO: Watch Seth MacFarlane Tell His Dad He's Hosting The Oscars

MacFarlane, who earned the hosting gig in October, is now only one of two Oscars hosts to ever participate in the nominations announcement. Charlton Heston did so in 1972.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Amazon announced AutoRip on Thursday, a free service that gives consumers a cloud-based backup for every CD they've bought from the company since 1998.

For Amazon, it's another move towards ensuring that consumers consider the company their primary stream of content, whatever the format. However, the introduction of the service raises another question: Why are people still buying CDs in 2013? After all, most music is available online in a format that's usually cheaper than CDs and doesn't take up shelf space.

Yet, the CD is still the predominant format for music buying. Consumers bought 193 million CDs in 2012 vs. 118 million digitally downloaded albums, according to Nielsen SoundScan. Though digital continues to grow at a rapid clip, it will probably be a couple of years before CD buyers become the minority. There's also reason to believe that CDs will still hold a significant share of the market for some time.

Though there's some debate on the issue, David Bakula, SVP of client development for Nielsen, believes that the sound quality of downloaded music isn't on par with music on a CD. However, it's worth noting that the quality of older CDs may actually be worse now than a decade or so ago thanks to the so-called Loudness War that prompted engineers to apply a high rate of compression to old recordings to make them louder.

Hard-core audiophiles, however, can seek out optimized digital recordings and/or vinyl recordings to get a purer sound.

If you live on either coast or in a major city, you may get the impression that everyone is on Spotify and has an iPhone. However, there are only two markets  Hawaii and San Francisco  in which people download music more than they buy CDs, according to Nielsen. Meanwhile, there are markets and genres in which CD buying is the norm. A couple of analysts mentioned country music as a genre in which the majority of purchases are still via CD. "Country fans are still going to big chains [to buy music]," says Glenn Peoples, senior editorial analyst at Billboard.

"The majority of music buyers purchase CDs and dont buy digital so theres a large non-digital population," says Russ Crupnick, SVP of industry analysis for The NPD Group. "They simply never had the need or motivation to buy digital downloads."

Bakula also noted that in 1994, when CDs had been out for a few years and had come down to mainstream pricing levels, cassettes still claimed 40% of the market.

People still listen to a lot of their music in their cars, which are still adapting to the digital changes. "As long as cars have CD players, there's a market for them," says Crupnick.

Bakula notes that CD sales always spike in the fourth quarter because you just can't wrap a download. As Peoples also notes, up-and-coming bands still like to hand out or sell CDs at gigs rather than merely direct users to a URL. "Market research shows people buy CDs out of habit," Bakula says. "They also buy when they really like the artist. They want a physical package with the artwork. CDs offer that offer a kind of connection with the artist." Crupnick agrees: "Uber fans like to have the physical version in addition to/instead of digital for artists where they have a strong affinity."

What do you think? Are you still buying CDs? Are you still mystified that other people do? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Sorry to break it to all you bros out there, but back in the day you were just one of the ladies.

And while we're sure you'll be happy to finally release the goddess within, take a moment to learn how you grew up to be oh so manly.

It has something to do with chromosomes and skin overlapping ... and all that other stuff they taught you in 7th grade science class, but you were too busy making paper airplanes to listen to.

SEE ALSO: 4.5 Billion Years of Earth's Evolution Boiled Down to 2 Minutes

That's why this video from ASAP Science reveals the answer to the most asked question of history  Why do men have nipples? Just watch and learn.

What was the most surprising thing you learned in the video? Share in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Wikipedia, the site you have probably used countless times to find out information on literally everything, is launching Wikivoyage tentatively sometime next week, reports Skift.

The free worldwide travel guide is currently in beta and made waves when it was first made official in September.

The main page acts like a guidebook and features links to articles titled, "Destination of the month," "Off the beaten path," and "Featured travel topic." Each section is clickable. There is also a discover section, which links to its own page. Here you can read about "strange but true trivia about destinations around the world."

When it launches, Wikivoyage will be accessible to everyone for reading or editing. So when you use Google to find out more information on your next trip, Wikivoyage might show up in high the results (like Wikipedia) and provide an extensive overview of the locale. Or you can browse through a long list of places and explore destinations new to you.

When the media began covering the Wiki travel site news, there was immediate speculation that travel guide publishers would have reason for concern with the SEO-dominating site.

The Wikimedia Foundation is the non-profit organization behind Wikipedia. There's already been some controversy surrounding Wikivoyage, namely the kerfuffle over the original travel wiki, Wikitravel becoming Wikivoyages as editors of the former left in droves to edit Wikipedia's new site.

Despite the company's struggles to create the site, for your future travel planning, Wikivoyages might provide a wealth of information and links to other useful resources.

What will you use Wikivoyages for when it's launched? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  Were still decades away from Rosie the Robot-style house-cleaning robots, but smaller, single-purpose robots are here today and more and more of them are ready to tackle the jobs we absolutely do not want to do.

Unveiled here at CES 2013, Ecovacs Winbot Series 7 is actually the companys second-generation Window-cleaning robot.

The old model was a two-piece device that used magnets to cling windows (one magnet on the inside and another on the outside). But Series 7 is a single AC-powered device. We took it for a test-spin on the floor of CES.

Winbot Series 7 is square with rounded corners and a large handle. While it feels substantial, its not heavy. Using it was a bit more complicated than I expected. You start by adding a bit of solution to the cleaning surfaces on the base. Then you have to place it on the Window surface, turn it on (theres a slider switch under the handle), and hold it against the window while Winbot builds up enough suction to hang on.

This took about 30 seconds. The whole time the robot made a tiny whirring sound as it created a vacuum seal between it and the dirty window.

After that, it was smooth sailing. Winbot immediately started moving about the window, measuring the space and mapping out a cleaning plan. It then started cleaning and worked until it decided the surface was completely clean.

When finished, the robot returns to exactly where you started. It makes little tones at the start and finish of each cleaning task. Because it includes a squeegee system, there is no residue, or liquid of any sort, left on the window when Winbot was done. Not bad.

Winbot arrives later this year with an expected retail price of between $299 and $399. Check out the video above to see Winbot in action  and let us know in the comments if you think this could replace your window cleaner.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Behind all the dazzling mobile-ready electronics products on display at the International CES in Las Vegas this week is a looming problem: how to make the networks that support all these wireless devices function robustly and efficiently.

With less fanfare than youd see in Vegas, potential solutions are arising in labs in like Pittsburgh, Los Angeles, and New Brunswick, New Jersey. The grand challenge is to overhaul the Internet to better serve an expected flood of 15 billion network-connected devices by 2015many of them mobileup from five billion today, according to Intel estimates.

The Internet was designed in the 1960s to dispatch data to fixed addresses of static PCs connected to a single network, but today it connects a riot of diverse gadgets that can zip from place to place and connect to many different networks.

As the underlying networks have been reworked and added-to to make way for new technologies, some serious inefficiencies and security problems have arisen. "Nobody really expects the network to crash when you add one more device," says Peter Steenkiste, computer scientist at Carnegie Mellon University. "But I do have a sense this is more of a creeping problem of complexity."

Over the past year, fundamentally new network designs have taken shape and are being tested at universities around the United States under the National Science Foundation's Future Internet Architectures Project, launched in 2010. One key idea is that networks should be able to obtain data from the nearest location  not seek it from some specific data center at a fixed address.

"Today I have on my desk a smartphone, a tablet and a Mac computer. To move data between them, today the request goes all the way to the cloud  God knows where that is  so it can come back here to another device that is two feet away," says Lixia Zhang, a computer scientist at the University of California, Los Angeles. "That is wrong, it is simply wrong."

Things would work quite differently under the Named Data Networking (NDN) project that Zhang heads. Under NDN, data packets are assigned addresses that emphasize the information they contain  not just the IP address of where they came from or where they are going. These codes could, among other things, allow easy sharing of data directly between devices.

"In the end, I think we can improve the speed, throughput, and overall efficiency. Today you have many data centers that can have thousands of people asking for same piece of data. In the NDN system, you just find the nearest copy of that data," says Zhang. "Conceptually, this is pretty simple, but it is really a revolution."

This data-centric concept allows security and privacy settings to be cryptographically attached directly to the datawith different settings depending on how sensitive the data israther than relying on measures such as VPNs and firewalls.

In addition to Zhangs project, the NSF effort also funds Internet architecture projects with similar goals at Rutgers, the University of Pennsylvania, and CMU, where Steenkiste runs the expressive Internet architecture, or XIA, project.

David Clark, the MIT computer scientist and the Internets former chief protocol architect, says its too early to say which will win out. All are research, all are speculative, and are potentially exciting, he says, but he adds that the NDN effort is the most revolutionarythe project really changes the underlying model of what a network does. It replaces communication among end-points with access to data, wherever it may be.

Several early demonstrations of these new Internet architecture projects have taken place over the past year, and more are expected in 2013. It is early days for these efforts, says Dipankar Raychaudhuri, head of the Rutgers Winlab, who runs its NSF-funded Mobility First project, which tries to make mobile devices and car networks a more seamless part of the infrastructure. Still, he predicts that in another two years, you should be able to see comparative evaluations and metrics, that show the value of the projects.

Among other things, new architectures could allow devices to attach to two or more networks at the same time. Today your smartphone can switch back and forth between, say, 4G and Wi-Fi, but not use them both and combine the data coming from each. The root of the problem is that the original protocols assumed only a single network interface. You could, in principle, remain connected to both networks, and the network could decide how to send you the data at each moment, Raychaudhuri says.

Meanwhile, some existing applications help fill a gap. For example, the network optimization company Akamai  which runs 119,000 servers and delivers between 15 and 30% of the webs traffic  has for several years been offering something called Net Session. This application allows device-to-device file transfers, rather than server-to-device downloads, and is popular in developing countries where connectivity is poor.

So far, Net Session has been installed on 30 million devices, most of them laptops. The goal is to expand it so it can support mobile handsets, tablets, and media-type boxes at home, says Kris Alexander, director of strategy at Akamai. However, making that leap is no small feat. No Net Session app for iOS or Android is available, and the main reason is that the necessary processing power and battery drain is too large.

This article originally published at MIT Technology Review here
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS - Sony announced Monday the Xperia Z, its new flagship smartphone. Powered by Android, the phone has a quad-core Snapdragon S4 processor, 1080p display, and a 13-megapixel built-in camera.

Designed with durability in mind, Sony used tempered glass on the front and back of the phone, as well as an anti-shatter film. The phone is dust and water-resistant  IP55 and IP57, specifically  and can survive everything from a conference call in the rain to an accidental dunk in your toilet.

We had the opportunity to spend a little time with the Xperia Z this week at CES. Check out a walk-through of the phone and its features in the video above.

Let us know what you think about the Xperia Z in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
China's ZTE has teamed up with an unnamed European carrier to build a smartphone based on Firefox OS, Bloomberg reports. The companies plan to launch the device in Europe this year.

According to CEO of ZTEs U.S. unit Cheng Lixin, the company might also launch a Firefox OS-based device in the U.S. in 2013.

We closely monitor the ecosystem and how it evolves. If that is ready and if consumer studies support that data, then we may launch one in U.S. also this year, Cheng said.

He did not disclose any additional details about the device's specifications or pricing.

Vice president of products at Mozilla Jay Sullivan confirmed the company is working with ZTE, as well as Qualcomm and TCL on Firefox OS-based devices.

Mozilla had announced Firefox OS in July 2012 as a fully open alternative to Android, promising first devices would arrive in 2013. It seems they'll be on schedule, though the road ahead is long and hard, especially since Android and iOS are quickly overtaking market share from smaller competitors.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It's tough enough for a startup to get acquired once, but one company has just been acquired for the second time in a year.

Forrst, an online community for designers and developers, has been acquired by interactive design firm Zurb for an undisclosed sum, Zurb announced Thursday. Forrst had previously been acquired by another design community called Colourlovers in March, 2012.

The startup was created by Kyle Bragger back in 2009 and the service gradually attracted tens of thousands of users. After Forrst was acquired the first time, Bragger decided to leave the company and join Fancy Hands, a virtual assistant startup, as a product engineer. In the meantime, Colourlovers did little to update or change Forrst  for better or worse.

Bryan Zmijewski, the chief instigator at Zurb, tells Mashable that his company has been aware of Forrst for some time, and an "opportunity presented itself" recently to acquire the company and the team felt it fit in with their long-term vision.

"Our purpose as a business is to help people design for people. Much of what you see online over the last 15 years has evolved, but the people-component of what people are designing for is missing," Zmijewski told Mashable. "A lot of that happens through design feedback. Forrst aligns with that vision."

Zurb already has laid out steps to improve Forrst's website and boost engagement among the community. It plans to streamline the site's interface by implementing responsive design and reward users who share quality posts on the service with more invites.

While Bragger is longer affiliated with Forrst, he told Mashable that he believes Zurb will be a "better fit" for the startup than Colourlovers.

"They're focusing back on the basics with Forrst being a place for real constructive criticism from peers and industry leaders, improving your craft as a developer," Bragger said. "It sounds like they are doing all the right things in terms of what I would do to hit reset and get Forrst back to a good place."
--------------------------------------------------------------
As John F. Kennedy once noted, the Chinese word for "crisis" is composed of the characters for "danger" and "opportunity." So characteristically, amid the hand-wringing at CES about the show's decreased relevance, a handful of Chinese brands saw a big opportunity.

In fact, the emergence of several Chinese brands as wannabe major players became one of the central narratives of the show. Typically at CES, Chinese tech brands are relegated to the International Pavilion rather than the show proper.

This year, though, there were at least five brands from China  Hisense, ZTE, TCL, Huawei and Haier  that took the main stage or at least got treated seriously by the press.

Next up: Convincing U.S. consumers that Chinese brands equal high quality. Despite the fact that most U.S. electronics are actually manufactured in China these days, U.S. consumers still view Chinese brands on a lower plane, says Hayes Roth, CMO of Landor Associates, a branding consultancy. However, those beliefs can change.

Roth pointed out that Japanese brands Sony and Panasonic set the precedent for changing U.S. mindsets in the 1960s. Buoyed by a simultaneous influx of Japanese auto brands, the U.S. public slowly began to have a different view of "Made in Japan," Roth says. "The Japanese got around that by reinventing quality control," Roth says. "They became the gold standard." A generation later, South Korean brands LG, Hyundai, Kia and Samsung convinced U.S. consumers that Korean goods could go toe-to-toe with Japanese products.

Samsung, in particular, likely provides an aspirational road map for Chinese brands. In 2012, the brand successfully battled the perception that it was an Apple copycat with a slew of innovative, quality products. Samsung is now the top producer of cell phones in the world and its smartphones outsell Apple's by a roughly two-to-one margin.

However, success for the following brands is far from a given. Roth notes for instance that, despite its lead in the marketplace, the China-based Lenovo "hasn't become a dominant brand." In the footwear category, Li-Neng, known as the Nike of China, is still pretty obscure in the U.S., even though it's earned high-profile U.S. endorsers like Dwyane Wade. Another cautionary tale is HTC, the Taiwanese telecom brand whose quick ascendance in the U.S. has been followed by an equally swift collapse.

Despite the odds, the following Chinese brands saw CES as their springboard for a breakout 2013:

Hisense has been established in the U.S. since 2001 and makes TVs, refrigerators, freezers and air conditioners, among other products. Since 2007, it has achieved 30% annual growth. In 2012, the company posted $2 billion in sales. By 2015, it aims to achieve a total of $5 billion in sales. At CES, Hisense got attention by showing off a 110-inch ultra HD TV, a Smart TV controlled by gestures and voice and a glasses-free 3D TV. The company also makes Android phones.

ZTE has had a U.S. presence since 1995. The company manufactures phones for Verizon, among others, but plans to make a bigger name for itself in 2013 with a Firefox OS-based smartphone. ZTE plans to release the device in Europe  and possibly the U.S.  this year. "They're really expanding their range and their portfolio,"

TCL is the world's fourth-largest TV producer after Samsung, LG and Sony. At CES, TCL displayed an Android-based TV called Ice Screen that includes Frequency, a video curation app that lets you subscribe to BBC, CNN and other channels.

Huawei sought to stand out from the pack at CES with the Ascend P1 S, which is billed as the "world's slimmest smartphone" at 6.68 mm and the Ascend D2 smartphone, which sports a 6.2-inch screen.

Haier, another conglomerate that makes everything from mobile phones to washing machines, showcased a vision-control system for TVs at CES that lets you adjust the volume and browse a news feed with your eyes.
--------------------------------------------------------------
You did Timberlake proud, ladies (and drummer dude).

But may we suggest adding Anna Kendrick via Pitch Perfect to your trio? (Skip to 1:25 to hear her rap.)

Heard any other good versions of these songs? Share them in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
In the search for an Earth-like alien world, astronomers have had their eyes set on planets beyond our solar system, but some moons orbiting these exoplanets may be just as likely to support life, scientists say.

Astronomers have discovered more than 800 exoplanets, with many more candidate worlds awaiting confirmation by follow-up observations. Most of them, however, are gas giants, similar to Jupiter, and only a handful have a solid surface and orbit their host stars in the habitable zone (the range where liquid water, and perhaps life as we know it, can exist).

But a team of astronomers says these uninhabitable exoplanets could host habitable exomoons.

"There is a habitable zone for exomoons, it's just a little different than the habitable zone for exoplanets," Rory Barnes of the University of Washington and the NASA Astrobiology Institute said in a statement.

Barnes and Ren Heller of Germany's Leibniz Institute for Astrophysics Potsdam explained that considerations about climate and light would be very different for exomoons compared with exoplanets.

Like Earth's moon, many exomoons are tidally locked to their host planet, meaning one hemisphere is permanently turned away from the planet, which would constrain the habitable regions on the moon's surface. Moons also have two sources of light  one from their star and the other from their host planet  and are subject to dramatic eclipses.

"An observer standing on the surface of such an exomoon would experience day and night in a totally different way than we do on Earth," Heller said. "For instance, stellar eclipses could lead to sudden total darkness at noon."

The astronomers, whose research is detailed in the January issue of the journal Astrobiology, say the effects of tidal heating must be considered when determining an exomoon's habitability. Moons that orbit their planet too closely will experience strong tidal heating and a runaway greenhouse effect that would boil away any surface water.

Though no habitable exomoons have been found, Barnes and Heller say there's no reason to assume they don't exist.

Some researchers have already started thinking about how they might use instruments like the planet-hunting Kepler Space Telescope to detect alien moons. Telescopes such as Kepler search for planets as they transit, or cross in front of, their star, causing telltale dips in the star's brightness. Variations in these brightness patterns might reveal the presence of a moon orbiting a planet.

This article originally published at Space.com here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Counting calories? No need to worry about that anymore.

A team of gastroenterologists have developed a weight-loss gadget, called AspireAssist, that pumps food directly out of the stomach after a meal is consumed. The team says it's an ideal way for anyone struggling with obesity to shed a few pounds.

The AspireAssist pairs with a valve that's surgically implanted into the user's stomach (see image below.) About 20 minutes after each meal, users can drain up to a third of what they just ate through the valve.

The aspiration process is performed about 20 minutes after the entire meal is consumed and takes 5 to 10 minutes to complete. The process is performed in the privacy of the restroom, and the food is drained directly into the toilet. Because aspiration only removes a third of the food, the body still receives the calories it needs to function. For optimal weight loss, patients should aspirate after each major meal (about 3 times per day) initially. Over time, as patients learn to eat more healthfully, they can reduce the frequency of aspirations

The gadget was tested on 24 obese participants in Europe. After a year-long trial, the company says, the patients lost an average of 45 pounds each.

Not everyone is completely sold. Several health bloggers have referred to the gadget as a "medically assisted bulimia" kit, arguing that flushing out 30% of a meal directly after consumption doesn't allow enough time for nutrients to be absorbed.

SEE ALSO: 5 Diet Apps to Keep You on the Right Track

AspireAssist was recently patented by Segway inventor Dean Kamen. But the FDA has yet to approve the gadget, according to Popsci.

Watch the video up top to learn more. Would you try AspireAssist? Or do you think it sounds too risky? Share your thoughts with us below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
An eighth grader had his Michael Jordan Game 6 moment, and while the kid didn't walk away with an NBA championship, he did end up with a pretty awesome story to share.

Number 50 got the ball with only moments left in the game, and with little room to square up, he scrambled to let off the old granny shot. Did we mention this amazing basketball moment happened with the shooter's back to the net?

SEE ALSO: Is This the Best Worst Basketball Lowlight of All Time?

Watch the heroics unfold in the video above.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Joe Carberry is a partner at Brunswick Group LLC, advising on corporate reputation and issues management. He holds a CIPP/US certification from the International Association of Privacy Professionals.

In this era of clouds and big data, information has become a valuable commodity. Even organizations that are not traditionally in the technology space now deal with massive amounts of consumer data  from airlines to clothing retailers, universities to non-profits.

But if that data includes individuals personal information, such as images, credit card numbers or shopping habits, alarm bells should be going off for business leaders. Issues around privacy and data security are increasing and can have a huge, public impact on business operations. But they also can do significant damage to another valuable business commodity: customer trust.

So, for many businesses, the approach to safeguarding data is quickly becoming a top priority. And if it hasnt yet, it soon will be.

According to IBM, more than 2.5 quintillion new bytes of information are created each day. In this environment, it has become commonplace  some say essential  for organizations to use personal information to make better products, track performance or deliver the right content. Great things are possible with access to data. But as the use of data grows, so will the use of personal information associated with new devices and services.

The flood of mobile technologies will only accelerate this trend. Mobile data traffic last year was eight times greater than all Internet traffic in 2000, according to Ciscos Virtual Networking Index. Mobile-connected devices will exceed the global population by the end of 2012, according to the study.

Even if it is increasingly common, use of sensitive information creates the potential for enormous risk. Years ago, managing that risk was a compliance issue, often handled solely by engineers and attorneys. No longer. Today, privacy concerns and missteps are frequently front-page news. Even the most responsible companies can make mistakes, and even the safest can fall victim to attack. If something goes wrong, it can spread in minutes on Twitter, Facebook and blogs, which reach all of a companys critical audiences.

 

This increased awareness drives expectations higher. People tend to believe that data about them is theirs and tend to react strongly when companies fail to meet their expectations around privacy and security. This includes policymakers who oversee industries; investors who do not want to see issues become a drag on performance; and, of course, consumers who use a companys products and services.

According to a recent TRUSTe survey, 91% of consumers worry about online privacy. Eighty-eight percent of them say they would avoid doing business with companies that don't protect their privacy.

So, what can company leadership do? It can ensure brands are prepared to deal with the main types of risk related to data. This includes risk and operational issues, legal and regulatory issues and risks to reputation. Most companies work hard to ensure they have risk management and operational controls in place to protect the information in their care. Likewise, most companies have attorneys in place who apply sound policies and legal protections that guide appropriate behavior. However, many companies simply overlook the need to make a forward-looking investment in protecting their reputation in the event of a problem with private data.

More and more companies are now adopting what is called Privacy by Design, a strategic approach that weaves responsible privacy practices into the entire life cycle of product design and development. It helps make privacy part of an organizations DNA. Similarly, many smart companies are starting to think about customer trust related to big data, and are building reputation into their technology innovation and product development cycles. Call it Reputation by Design.

Companies following this approach present customers with a clear and compelling reason for their collection or use of personal data. They offer context around those decisions. And they have taken steps to prepare for a day when they may have to address problems in a transparent manner.

To build trust in the realm of big data, it is critical to start before something goes wrong. In this regard, management should be thinking about three things:

In the end, every business is dependent on the trust of its customers for success. Those customers increasingly see real value in companies that can demonstrate care in the handling of their information. To maintain trust, organizations need to take visible steps to meet  or exceed  customer expectations around privacy and security. People believe that safeguarding their personal information is the right thing to do. That alone makes it the smart thing for a business to do.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Following widespread criticism of the use of models to market products at the International CES, a CEA exec tells Mashable that the media is to blame  for repeating the commonly-used term "booth babes."

According to Karen Chupka, senior vice president of the Consumer Electronics Association, the industry giant has no plans to remove models from CES.

"The story has been overly sensationalized," Chupka says. "A lot of people are hired to come in and support exhibitors, since the booth is only one-third of the cost of attending the event.

"I can't understand. This is the year 2013, and I thought women had come farther than this. I'm really appalled that anybody prints the word 'babe' and thinks that's okay."

Using temporary employees is a key way for companies to cut costs, Chupka adds. CEA recommends temporary staffing agency Judy Venn & Associates to out-of-town presenters, which describes its services as "trade show staffing, convention models, trade show hostesses."

CEA CEO Gary Shapiro admitted to the BBC last year that "people naturally want to go toward what they consider pretty," highlighting the overarching motivation to employ models at trade shows. Shapiro also called the BBC's story on booth babes "cute, but frankly irrelevant."

Chupka, on the other hand, understood why scantily-dressed models can touch a nerve for some trade show attendees.

"I can understand why people have different feelings about what's comfortable to them," Chupka says. "I walked in and saw a man in a completely tight body suit and thought, 'Hmm that's a little interesting.' Women walk around in yoga pants. Why? Because they're comfortable."

Yoga pants, however, are a far cry from the body paint and thongs captured in the photo above by Mashable reporter Emily Price. The women at the booth were painted, put on display and described as "fembots." Attendees were encouraged to Instagram and share photos using the hashtag #getmore.

Here's what Chupka had to say about that booth: "They were covered in paint. It's seen a lot at the European shows."

SEE ALSO: From Ada Lovelace to Marissa Mayer: The Rise of Women in Tech

The CEA claims to distributes a disclaimer to attendees, encouraging caution. "The rules in the PR manuals that go out to the companies planning the event are that they should be properly attired according to decency laws," Chupka says.

"We remind them that the audience is diverse, and they should take into consideration how they display their products."

Mashable requested a copy of the clause in the PR manual dictating attire. The CEA directed us to the Exhibitor Manual, though after thorough searching (and further questioning the CEA), we were unable to locate the regulations Chupka mentioned.

Increasing the number of women in science and technology jobs is an ongoing struggle in 2013. The presence of scantily-dressed, overly-sexualized female figures at industry events could, arguably, prevent women from feeling comfortable in that environment.

According to a U.S. Deptartment of Commerce report, "Women in STEM: A Gender Gap to Innovation," women hold about half of jobs in the U.S., but less than a quarter of STEM jobs. Just 14% of women are engineers and less than 10% of venture-backed companies were co-founded by women.

As the BBC notes, that's the reason why China has made the use of models at trade shows illegal.

But Chupka demurs. "It's not our policy, because each company should get to choose how they want to present itself," she says. "Our show represents a wide variety of industry segments. For us to say you must fit within a role would be like saying you have to dress like a pilgrim."

SEE ALSO: 7 Tips for Women in the Tech Industry

To its credit, the CEA itself runs contrary to the industry trend. The association employs 87 women out of a total staff of 139. Of the 40 members of senior staff, 22 are women.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Campbell's Soup wants to give you new resources for your smartphone and the web to find meal ideas.

The company is inviting developers to "Hack the Kitchen" and create web or mobile apps that make people's lives easier when it comes to finding recipes and cooking. The contest begins on Monday, Jan. 14th and the deadline to submit entries is February 1st.

"The solution can be a web experience, mobile app, something for the XBOX or even an in-car app experience that leverages the new SDKs announced at CES," Adam Kmiec, director of global digital marketing and social media at Campbell Soup Company, told Mashable. "We havent set a requirement; it's a blank canvas. We know that consumers are looking for ways to answer the question, 'Whats for dinner?' and we've developed our own API to help guide the development process."

It's not a requirement that Campbell's products be part of the app.

"With the 'Hack the Kitchen' effort, we want to make the entire dinner process easier - from choosing what to eat and how to prepare it, incorporating pantry items and understanding the health benefits of various meal options. We are hoping to see ideas that incorporate these key elements," Kmiec said.

A small number of developers will be chosen to present a prototype by March 4, 2013. From there, 10 finalists will be selected to present their application at Google Headquarters in New York City on March 22, 2013, where the winner will be chosen. The top 10 finalists will be announced on March 11, 2013.

The grand prize winner will be awarded $25,000 plus a $25,000 contract to develop the app. The runner-up will be given $10,000 for their idea and consideration by Campbells for possible future development.

Do you consult apps to help you plan your dinner menu? What would you like to see in an app like this? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
After five days of hitting the ground running, the Mashable team at CES 2013 can finally rest. The Las Vegas convention is over, and the Mashable staff in attendance have collectively covered hundreds of miles. We tracked their progress using Nike+ FuelBands and can now deliver the final results:

Our champion was videographer Evan Engel, whose lead from day one was never overtaken by the rest of the team. Heavy video equipment in hand, he racked up over 27 miles in five days, further than the standard marathon distance of 26.2 miles. Second-place finisher Samantha Murphy also traveled further than a marathon, completing 26.7 miles. But it was photo editor Nina Frazier who put in the most hours, leaving the rest of the team in the dust with more than 74 hours total activityeven more impressive considering she was carrying about 65 pounds of gear with her.

Evan and Mashable Editor-in-Chief Lance Ulanoff, who finished fifth overall, caught up with illusionist David Blaine on the last day of CES:

On day five, reporter Emily Price stopped by Canon to see their new cameras and checked out some Samsung UHD TVs with Lifestyle editor Andrea Smith, who finished third in the overall competition. Andrea hit a personal best on day five, reaching a total of 6.5 miles total. Towards the end of day five, Emily was disturbed by the tableau of "booth babes" in one product's display. Her outraged reaction on Twitter received over 700 retweets.

Samantha and Nina spent their last day with Tim Tebow and his new line of headphones. One of the models is called the "Jet," which happens to be almost identical to the name of the football team for which Tebow plays. However, the player claims the name could also apply to people traveling cross-country.

Finally, tech editor Pete Pachal spent some time in front of the camera himself on day five, appearing on Fox News Live to talk about his experience at CES.

Samantha completed the most miles in a single day, covering 8 miles on day four. The longest active day overall was Nina's 16 hours and 20 minutes on day three.

Are you surprised by the final results? What was your favorite moment at CES? Let us know in the comments!
--------------------------------------------------------------
Recent rumors about a cheaper iPhone have recently been all but debunked by Apple's SVP of Worldwide Marketing Phil Schiller, who told Chinese newspaper Shanghai Evening News that "cheap smartphones will never be the future of Apple products".

Based on Schiller's comment, Reuters and several other news outlets have reported that Apple has probably dismissed the idea of a cheap iPhone. The story doesn't end there, though, as Reuters had withdrawn that article, claiming it "was subsequently updated with substantial changes to its content." Reuters said that no replacement story will be issued.

It is unclear what the "substantial changes" to Reuters' story were. We can imagine several possible scenarios: Shanghai Evening News could have gotten the quote from Schiller wrong, or Reuters could have gotten credible info from another source that Apple is indeed working on a cheaper iPhone.

In any case, the future of the "cheap iPhone" is still undetermined. After Apple's launch of iPad mini, the idea of a cheaper iPhone (iPhone Mini, perhaps?) became much more plausible, with reports claiming it would be manufactured from cheaper materials than iPhone 5, with price ranging from $99 to $149.

Right now, iPhone 4 remains the cheapest Apple smartphone, which can be had for $0 with a contract or $450 without one.
--------------------------------------------------------------
If you like dirty jokes, we've got a treat for you. This Is 40 director Judd Apatow has given Mashable a deleted scene from the comedy flick, a spin-off sequel to 2007's Knocked Up.

The never-before-seen footage features a heavy dose of funny lines from Megan Fox, Jason Segel and Chris O'Dowd.

"I'm sure when they envisioned the Internet they thought it would be a great resource for doctors and scientists, or even a productive way to further global philanthropy," Apatow says.

"Personally, I am happy that it affords me a direct link to show fans some of my favorite jokes that never made it into the movie," he adds.

SEE ALSO: Actress Megan Fox Joins Twitter and Tweets About 'Star Wars' 

This Is 40 arrived in North American theaters on Dec. 21.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Sony Music has exclusively given Mashable the audio for "Nuclear," the first song from Destiny's Child since 2005. Here is the world premiere of it:

UPDATE on Jan. 23: Sony Music has taken down its initial Soundcloud embed after uploading the song on YouTube.

The track will be featured on Destiny's Child's recently  and unexpectedly  announced album. Titled Love Songs, the 14-track album is a compilation of the trio's romantic music from 1997 to 2004 plus "Nuclear." It is available for pre-order and comes out Jan. 29.

The release of "Nuclear" marks the first time in eight years that Beyonc Knowles, Kelly Rowland and Michelle Williams have joined forces to unleash a recording together.

SEE ALSO: Beyonce Announces Destiny's Child Comeback With Online Posts

Pharrell Williams produced "Nuclear" and co-wrote it with Michelle Williams, James Fauntleroy and Lonny Bereal. Knowles and Bereal took the reigns on vocal production.

In conjunction with the song premiere, Sony Music created DestinysChild.Tumblr.com.

Fans are encouraged to submit their favorite memories of Destiny's Child on the blog.

Love Songs infuses recordings from six albums  four of Destiny's Child's studio albums, one of Rowland's albums and one from the group's remix album:

Sony Music offshoots  Music World Entertainment, Columbia Records and Legacy Recordings  are in charge of unleashing Love Songs at the end of month.
--------------------------------------------------------------
From heat waves and hurricanes to earthquakes and droughts, 2012 shattered weather records around the world. And more bizarre conditions are welcoming 2013 with a bang, as a snow storm blanketed palm trees in Jerusalem for the first time in 21 years on Thursday. In Australia, high winds are fueling more than 100 bush fires along the eastern and southeastern coasts.

SEE ALSO: 33 Stunning Weather Photos From Readers Around the World

Take a look through our slideshow of weird weather, featuring breathtaking  albeit terrifying  photos of floods in the Philippines, tornadoes in Italy and more.

What extreme weather moments did we miss? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
We knew Facebook was eager for new revenue streams. We just didn't know they were this eager.

If you try to send founder and CEO Mark Zuckerberg a message on Facebook, Mashable discovered Thursday, the social network may offer to keep the message out of his "Other" Inbox  for a cool $100.

In our tests from multiple accounts, it appeared to be the case that users only get this message if they're not one of Zuck's 16 million followers. That, however, could still be coincidental.

Keen Facebook observers will recognize this as a variant on the $1 pay-to-message plan that the social network has been experimenting with for months. The company indicated at the time that it would be experimenting with other prices, so it's possible we're starting to see the fruits of that.

There were sporadic reports in December of Facebook charging various people $100 for the service, but this is the first time we've seen it  and certainly the first time we've seen it applied to the founder.

The "Other" inbox is Facebook's dumping ground for all messages it guesses you won't want to read urgently. It's been controversial for some time, as most users are entirely unaware of its existence  and many have been known to discover messages they really wish they'd read at the time, such as job offers.

The $1 pay-to-message test was first announced in December, and was described by the company as a test. It allows anyone to message any other person's inbox directly for that one-time fee, whether they are friends or not. It was derided by some users as Facebook spam. (However, it is only possible to receive one such message per week.)

Here's what Facebook had to say in a statement from a spokesperson: "We are testing some extreme price points to see what works to filter spam."

Can you see a situation in which you'd pay the extreme price point of $100? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The cast of Oscar-nominated Silver Linings Playbook will participate Friday in a live chat streamed on Fandango at 9 p.m. ET.

Four of the film's Oscar nominees will take part, including Bradley Cooper (Best Actor), Jennifer Lawrence (Best Actress), Robert De Niro (Best Supporting Actor) and Jacki Weaver (Best Supporting Actress). Best Director nominee David O. Russell as well as actors Paul Herman and Dash Mihok will also chime in. The flick earned eight total nominations.

Online movie ticketer Fandango told Mashable that week-over-week Fandango ticket sales for the movie have increased 127% since Thursday's Oscars nominations event.

Fandango has been trying to build up exclusive-content inventory in ways that also help promote and boost ticket sales on the same page as the content.

Snubs | GIFs | 3 Kickstarter Films Get Nods SEE ALSO: Full List of Nominees

In December, for example, Fandango premiered the first four minutes of upcoming zombie romance flick Warm Bodies. The video's landing page allowed people to register for a FanAlert, which will tell people when tickets will go up for sale.

Fandango will promote tickets for Silver Linings below Friday's Q&A stream. Fandango's chief correspondent Dave Karger, who hosts the site's The Frontrunners video series, will lead the chat.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Photos from Flickr are now showing up in Yahoo Image searches, the company announced on Thursday.

Yahoo is making "tens of millions" of Flickr photos available, which are available for reuse and reposting. The photos are available under Flickr's Creative Commons licensing agreement. Photos not covered under Creative Commons won't be affected. Offering such images can give Yahoo a real advantage over Google and Bing, which do not offer the photos in their image searches.

To use the feature, employ the left rail on the Yahoo Image Search page and click the "Labeled for Reuse" option.

The move comes after Yahoo upgraded the Flickr mobile app last month with Twitter integration. The app was released almost at the same exact time that Instagram  now a unit of Facebook  began disabling support for Twitter Cards.

Flickr, which was bought by Yahoo in 2005, has been a prime area of focus for Marissa Mayer, who became Yahoo's CEO in June. Shortly after Mayer began, the Internet petitioned her to "Make Flickr awesome again." Yahoo responded by thanking the Internet and soliciting suggestions for making the photo-sharing site "awesomer."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Imagine if you could get the same experience of a cocktail party  and all the potential date option, but online.

That's the idea behind a new crop of dating websites that aim to recreate the experience of cocktail parties or a get together at a friend's apartment where you just might meet someone new. Parties are always great places to meet people, but since most people don't have the opportunity or time to attend one every day, websites like Friendlylook, TheDatable and Circl.es let you browse your friends' friends.

The newest site Friendlylook says it engineers serendipity. The idea behind the site is that you join, mingle with new people, make friends and meet their connections. You can also have a bunch of friends join to meet new people and scour others' connections to find a potential love match for you or themselves. With Friendlylook, users have the ability to create private social events to meet people in real life. And the site is free for members.

Members can set a search parameter of two-four degrees away from them to meet strangers. But even among friends of friends, users cannot see who or specifically how they connect to any of their friends. And just like a real-life cocktail party, if you find a potential match you can ask your friends' opinions of the prospect.

Members also have a "singles stream," that is kind of like a Facebook News Feed. The only people who show-up in the stream are ones who match a user's search criteria (age range, distance, education, etc.). The stream is very basic at the moment, but the idea has potential.

If you want to reach out to someone on the site, all communication is free. If you're the bold type, you can broadcast updates that go to everyone who meets your criteria on the site.

Currently, the team behind Friendlylook is seeking funds on Indiegogo, the crowd-funding platform, in order to build more features.

Trevor Chidester, founder of Friendlylook, says the difference between his site and traditional dating websites is that rather than go through as many dates as possible, on Friendylook people are able to identify potential matches who are more suitable for them. The ol' quality over quantity reasoning.

Circl.es and TheDatable have similar ideas  except with these sites you actually connect with Facebook to see friends of your friends.

TheDatable is kind of like a social experiment. You create a private account on TheDatable and then sign into Facebook through the site. Tag your single friends who you consider "datable"  as a sign of approval for other people to date, and then they tag their "datable" friends. The free service aims to create a network of singles.

With Circl.es, singles sign-in using their Facebook accounts and browse through all of your friends' friends. Since your profile information is already there, it doesn't take long to get started. Potential dates don't see your entire profile, just some select information from which they can select "yes," "no," or "skip." If you click "yes" the potential match is notified and then you can see each other's profiles. To avoid endless online flirting with no action, once you've both said "yes" to chatting with each other on Circl.es, you have two weeks to communicate.

Have you ever used a dating site in which you find connections through friends? What was your experience? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Gmail rolled out its new Compose feature in October, allowing users the option of a cleaner, more efficient format. Some users rejoiced, while others found the changes difficult to use.

Thankfully, Gmail hasn't made the new feature mandatory; you can order your email in whichever flavor you choose. So, which will it be?

If you're trying to juggle multiple discussions, or copy text from one email to another, having multiple drafts is incredibly convenient. Drafts can sit right next to each other on on your Gmail screen, or you can choose to pop them out for easier resizing.

If you are working on draft over time, for example, to maintain a casual list of dinner recommendations to send friends, Gmail's new feature makes it easier to put tasks on the back burner. Users can now minimize drafts to the bottom or their Gmail windows, similar to how Gchat conversations already function. Emails in process that you need to put on hold can sit on your screen until you end your session, making it harder to forget about your unfinished emails while still keeping your day organized.

If you wish to search for something while composing an email, Compose won't interrupt the draft you're working on. You can also check and respond to more pressing emails while keeping your original draft intact. This definitely makes Gmail's web client more competitive with email programs like Outlook, in which multitasking can hinder productivity.

Compose mode features a much more streamlined email interface. Gone is the top row of buttons. Most of the options you'll need are nested next to the send button on the bottom-left corner, accessible based on priority. The result is a cleaner interface for your message.

Don't like change? One of the best features is that you can easily return to the old interface by clicking on the small arrow in the right corner of the emails and select "switch back to old compose." It's not for everyone, and there are lots of reasons to stick to the old Gmail formula.

While the clean, minimalist format for Gmail's new Compose is nice, tools like changing your font seem buried. You'll find that it takes a little longer to access the tools you need. And you'll be disappointed if you're an active user of canned responses (buried in the additional options) or emoticons (not in the new Compose). This format is meant to hide the bells and whistles.

In that vein, the CC and BCC fields are much harder to access. It's easy to overlook them, tucked in the far left corner. The option to edit your email's subject is now buried unexpectedly under your reply or forward options.

We all appreciate a distraction-free environment when writing. Opening a new email in the old mode brings up that large blank canvas we're all used to, and it can definitely curb urges to look at your other incoming emails while writing.

If you use Gchat regularly and have activated right-hand chat  a popular app for those who want to reduce clutter  you'll be disappointed by the new Compose. New emails cover the entire chat column.

The one thing new Compose doesn't clean up is the bottom of your Gmail window. If you are a heavy chat user, you'll soon find that you have many chats and emails all vying for space, it might be easy to lose one if you have too many windows open.

Have you switched to Gmail's new Compose? Why or why not? Please share your own pros and cons in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The FBI has begun collecting tips on the names of unidentifiable bank robbery suspects through a new Google map that pictures heists nationwide, bureau officials announced this week.

The new site, bankrobbers.fbi.gov, shows visitors the location of incidents down to the street level, as well as the traditional Wanted poster photos and physical descriptions. Users can search by location, weapon used and the unidentified robbers nickname, among other clues, to help authorities ascribe names to faces.

The site is intended to protect citizens from gun violence, not just financial losses, FBI officials said in a statement.

"Many bank robberies are committed using verbal demands or notes; however, the use of weapons and threats of violence are also common," they said.

According to FBI statistics, 49 bank robberies occurred in Washington, D.C., and Northern Virginia during 2012. That marks a new low for the bureau, which tallied 80 raids in 2011. Last years count was the lowest in more than a decade.

While the bureau has hard figures on nationwide bank robberies, other crimes are harder for the feds to count. FBI statistics do not measure cybercrimes and other offenses that have arisen since reporting began in 1930. Late last year, Justice Department officials convened the first meeting in more than 80 years to decide on the best crime labels and incident characteristics to track.

Tweets during the meeting indicate cops want crime statistics to better illustrate quality of life at the local level: "Commissioner Ramsey: 'crime data must tell a story about community safety,'" Deputy Assistant Attorney General James Burch typed, referencing comments by Philadelphia Police Department Commissioner Charles Ramsey.

This article originally published at Nextgov here
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  iHome's latest collection of Bluetooth speakers, Lightning docks and accessories are a vibrant treat for the eyes as much as the ears.

iHome  which claims to sell one in every four digital speakers in the U.S. Although it announced some of its new products in the days leading up to the 2013 International CES conference in Las Vegas, Mashable got an up-close look at the new products this week at the show.

SEE ALSO: Training for a 10K? Try CES 2013

From a cord-cruncher cable that keeps the cable from tangling to a bright-colored, retro-designed Bluetooth boom box with USB charging, the assortment was one of the best we've seen in the past few days.

Check them out in the gallery above. What are some of the best tech accessories you've seen come out of CES? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Remember your first screen name? Before you were worried about your "personal brand" and had a professional-facing "firstname.lastname@email.com" address?

Those were the good old days. The Internet seemed more casual then. Our online identities were never meant to stay with us forever. They were meant to be more fun. Sure, they were often naive, but also more whimsical than what you'd expect to show up on a resume.

So a few weeks ago we asked you to submit yours to us. What was your first screen name? We even offered up some Mashable staff examples ("NakedSushiNight," anyone?) to get you started. And we had Kiersten Essenpreiss illustrate them.

We received hundreds of submissions, making it extremely hard to pick just a few. Your entries confirmed what we suspected: Lots of people used their birthday or the year for an identifying number. There were a lot of word mash-ups and deliberate misspellings. And there was a fair amount of aLtErNaTiNg CaPsSs (LOL).

We picked some of our favorites and sent them over for illustration. Without further ado, here are some of your first screen names, illustrated for the first time.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Global crowdfunding platform Indiegogo released statistics about its work in 2012 last week, focusing on campaigning, community and the influence of video within the past year.

The stats show that on average, campaigns raised more than 2011 campaigns did, and nearly half of all campaigns received support from more than one country.

Many people know of Indiegogo as the platform used for more than 100,000 cause-related, creative or entrepreneurial campaigns, including raising money for bullied bus monitor Karen Klein, victims and families of the Sikh temple shooting, Hurricane Sandy relief and a Nikola Tesla museum.

Indiegogo empowers people all over the world to raise money for whatever theyre passionate about," Danae Ringelmann, co-founder of Indiegogo, told Mashable. "Education is a huge component of empowerment, which is why we publish our Insights series. There's no one way to have a successful campaign in 2013, but having a high "gogofactor" [the algorithm that measures campaign and community activity] means your campaign is thriving."

Indiegogo regularly shares insights, tips and tricks with its users to help them create better and more successful campaigns. "Its exciting to see that our 2012 data shows our customers are listening," Ringelmann said.

Campaigns appear to have garnered more support in 2012, raising an average of 20% more than projects did in 2011. Successful campaigns took an average of 11 days to prepare for their launches. The most successful campaign, "Let's Build a Goddamn Tesla Museum," raised an Indiegogo record of $1,370,461 in total funding. Indiegogo campaigns also seem to have had shorter funding periods in 2012  core campaigns ran an average of 49 days, as opposed to 60 in 2011, and successful campaigns ran for an average of 39 days.

In addition to more money raised, the generosity of the Indiegogo community seems to have increased in 2012, too, with 33% of all contributed dollars deemed "altruistic" dollars (contributed in excess of perk amount or without any perk). This is compared with 23% in 2011. Surprisingly, 14% of campaigns had a single contributor refer more people to the campaign page than the campaign owner. Campaigns had an average of 1.7 team members, whereas 2011 campaigns had an average of 2.2 team members. In July 2012, co-founder Slava Rubin told Mashable that if a campaign has four or more people on its team, it will raise 70% more money than a crew of one. Through Indiegogo, 45% of campaigns received contributions from people in more than one country (57% of successful campaigns). Campaigns received an average of 42 more likes or shares on Facebook than they did in 2011.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Does jet lag put a damper on the first few days of a big vacation for you? A handy new website called Jet Lag Rooster maps out a plan to fight it.

Enter the cities you're departing from and arriving to plus the days and times of your departures and arrivals. The calculator is picky about the format, so be sure to follow the example provided.

To test it out, we entered a departing destination of San Francisco, Calif., and an arrival destination of Bangkok, Thailand. The calculator recognized the nine-hour difference in time zones and showed us a customized plan to reduce jet lag. The advice it gave was to seek sunlight and avoid it during certain hours in order to quickly adapt to the local time. It mapped out a daily plan for seven days, describing when to "seek light" and when to "avoid light." If you're inside, sit next to a window to get light, the site read. If it's dark out, go somewhere with lots of artificial light.

The site also offers up some other basic advice about jet lag. Mostly stuff we've heard before, but it's nice to hear it again as a reminder: Avoid coffee, tea and soda, drink lots of water, take a shower and a short nap when you arrive.

Once you get your let lag plan, you can email it to yourself or others, or print it.

What do you think about Jet Lag Rooster? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
George Washington, Abraham Lincoln and Benjamin Franklin did a pretty great job being the Fathers of America but who's to say Batman, Superman and the Green Lantern couldn't have handled the job just as well?

German artist and designer Aslan Malik wondered the same thing and re-imagined American history by turning the figures on U.S. currency into comic book superheros.

SEE ALSO: With This Kiss...Superman and Wonder Woman Are Finally an Item

We're sure the combined powers of the Justice League would defend democracy to its highest degree. Or at least handled the fiscal cliff without complaining.

Which bill is your favorite? Share in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Eccentric pop star Kesha just released her first music video since she saw her "Die Young" song drastically losing radio airplay in December after the Newtown school shooting.

Unrelated to the radio controversy, the "C'Mon" music video shows Kesha quitting her job and jumping into a very Scooby-Doo-looking van to embark on an adventure with furries.

She teased the video's release Thursday with a tweet about the furries:

"C'Mon" is ranked 65th on Billboard's Hot 100 singles charts  which tracks digital downloads and streaming stats along with radio airplays and sales. "Die Young" is 13th.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Actor Marlon Wayans, whose comedy-horror flick A Haunted House landed in theaters Friday, gets inspiration for his Twitter missives in the darnedest places  like the bathroom.

"My greatest thoughts are when I'm on the toilet. And especially the spiritual shit when I'm just like 'Yo, make sure if you want to lead, never be a follower,'" he says in the above clip from the Shorty Awards. "See how that sounds? That comes from sh*tting."

Wayans (@MARLONLWAYANS on Twitter) also reveals his Twitter pet peeve and announces he's a new judge for the Shorty Awards, an annual crowdsourced contest that honors social media professionals, agencies, brands, celebrities, comedians and more.

SEE ALSO: Apple Co-Founder Steve Wozniak to Judge 2013 Shorty Awards

He joins the Real-Time Academy Comedy Jury that picks the winner in the humor category.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Redditor HighlifeTTU shared a photo album with r/Minecraft on Friday that details a massive custom overhaul to the online version of the popular building game. The goal: to unify 70 servers into one enormous game space.

Here's why this is kind of a big deal. Multiplayer Minecraft worlds are not served from a central location. Any player can host one, on his local machine or a dedicated server. Other players must know your server's address to join the world. Thousands of public servers are listed on community forums and other gathering places.

Every server is different, depending on who's in charge  different rules, game modes, communities. Popular servers fill up, preventing others from joining. HighlifeTTU and his fellow coders have modified the server software to connect multiple worlds to a central "lobby" (pictured above). Rather than trying to connect "manually" to a list of server strings, players can jump into the lobby and join whatever world they please by walking through a portal.

This could prevent overcrowding in popular servers and allow players to move seamlessly between them. There's definitely a big convenience factor there, but more compelling is the gameplay potential.

World builders could theoretically connect multiple maps together (an "overworld" map leads to a "town" map or a "dungeon" map through server portals), uniting thousands of players in a much larger "universe"  essentially, a Minecraft massively multiplayer online game (MMO), akin to World of Warcraft and EVE Online.

Mojang, the indie studio behind the wildly successful game, has always encouraged player-made modifications ("mods"), even incorporating some into the official product. It will be interesting to see where a server infrastructure project like this goes.

It's all rather technical, so check out the Imgur gallery for a granular breakdown of how the server unification works, and the original mods it's built on.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A Florida man was arrested yesterday for allegedly selling over 40 gallons of moonshine to undercover state beverage agents.

The Florida Division of Alcoholic Beverages and Tobacco posted a fake Craigslist ad, pretending to be someone "looking for some strong moonshine." A middleman contacted the agents and referred them to 23-year-old Daniel David Pawa, a Lantana resident. Over the course of several months, Pawa sold over 40 gallons of moonshine to undercover agents.

The operation came to a close on Thursday when state agents arrested Pawa and seized his .45-caliber firearm and a grenade. Pawa faces a bevy of charges including possession of moonshine, conspiracy to violate beverage laws, and possession of a firearm, the latter of which carries a maximum of 15 years in prison.

In an exciting exclusive, The Jane Dough was able to get into contact with a member of the police force that arrested Pawa. What follows is Detective Pam Sarlowe's account of Thursday's events, in his own words:

I had just left some dame's joint when I got a call from the big man  turned out there was a case that the coppers wanted my help with. I had sworn that messy business off years ago but it was a dark night in January, I was out of hooch, and the city was coated with a weak rain like some Crazy Daisy sprinkler had jammed up and none of the angels in heaven wanted to play anymore; in short, it was the kind of night that made you want to dive down into something deep and dark. I hoofed it to the old clubhouse and found the Lieutenant just as I had left him: looking like a tea kettle someone had left on top of a fire for too long. He gave me the casefile and a stare colder than my dead wife's corpse. "Keep it by the book this time, Sarlowe," he yelled, his fat finger in my face. "Don't go flying off all half-cocked!" Yeah, yeah, I knew what I had to do, but it's easier said than done, like every good thing is in this stinking sewage line we call Lantana. I have seen crime and it has winked back at me like some real hootchie-cootchie type broad, the kind that cries when you tell her you're leaving but plunges a knife in your back before you're even out the door. Yeah, I have known crime as intimately as I have known those kinds of broads and I have the Swiss cheese back to prove it. It didn't take me long to find the poor sucker, a chump who wouldn't stop flipping his yap about the 'shine. He looked like a boozehound and was sitting in a grade-A dump that even the darkest shadows that haunt me wouldn't be caught dead in. Dead  like my dead wife. I considered pumping some lead into the weasel, putting him out of his misery, but in the end, I decided to leave him to the Big House. I didn't need anymore blood on my hands  the color red doesn't suit me and I was all out of soap. I told the chump he was going to the slammer and I started to laugh. His future and my past were one and the same: an expansive black hole that is like the bed of a bad broad, the chamber of a gun, and the mouth of a serpent telling you to take a bite of a city that is rotten to the core. An apple a day doesn't keep shit away. Before the other men in blue knocked down the door to take ol' Johnny, I handed him a quarter, told him he could keep it, and said good luck. I was done playing games with chance; like I told you, it's a messy business."

... What? We can't believe there is still a black market for moonshine.

This article originally published at The Jane Dough here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Morgan Freeman is the most powerful man alive.

Because nothing exists until his smooth-like-butter voice narrates it. Like right now, he's narrating you reading this.

And Morgan Freeman goes through four or five microphones a day because his voice turns them into bars of gold. And not even penguins existed until Morgan Freeman narrated March of the Penguins.

So when life seems a little out of control, just remember Morgan's voice is all over it.

Have any more Morgan Freeman facts? Add them in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
And now for the self-destructing text  maybe.

Over the last few weeks there has been a lot of chatter about Snapchat, a very cool smartphone app that allows you to "chat" with friends via photos and now video. The idea is that you capture a "selfie"  or short video clip  using your phones front-facing camera, and then add a text caption or even a little artwork before sending it text-style to all your BFFs.

The popularity of the service was confirmed late last year when it was revealed that Snapchat had met the two accepted standards for success in todays app-crazed world: regular server outages caused by too much traffic and an offer to acquire the service by Facebook. (Undeterred by the Snapchat founders refusal to sell, Facebook went ahead and launched its own Snapchat clone called Poke.)

SEE ALSO: Is Snapchat the Next Frontier for Marketers?

As well as offering the ability to add photos and videos to texts - a huge hit amongst its target demographic of tweens and teens - Snapchat has one other advantage: the messages self-delete after they have been viewed. Thats right: the sender can select a duration - anything from 1 to 10 seconds - after which the image, along with any added text or artwork, will self-destruct.

Of course, it didnt take concerned parents too long to point out that such a service was perfect for "sexting" - the unofficial practice of sending nude or sexually suggestive images via smartphones and other mobile devices. What better excuse for inappropriate behavior among oversexed teens, they argued, than a photo app that immediately destroys the evidence?

Unfortunately, kids who are determined to indulge in risky behavior hardly need Snapchat to achieve their goals. Ever since we started putting powerful digital cameras in immature hands, we have run the risk of our kids getting themselves into trouble. The safeguards havent changed: Talk to your kids so they understand the risks, and monitor their behavior so you can intervene before that risk becomes a serious problem.

And when you talk to your kids about Snapchat, Poke and similar messaging apps, you might want to point out that there is really no such thing as a self-deleting text. Snapchat recognizes just one of the ways in which its texts can live on by alerting the sender if the recipient takes a screenshot.

What? I hear you ask. Whats the point of a self-deleting texting service if the person receiving the text can take a screenshot? Exactly. Snapchat has no way to disable the recipients ability to take that screenshot, so all it can do is warn the sender when it happens. Add to that the ability of the recipient to use another smartphone or camera to capture a screenshot and that self-deleting feature doesnt look quite so clever after all.

SEE ALSO: Photo-Messaging App 'Snapchat' Launches on Android

Snapchat founder Evan Spiegel has been quoted as saying that the app was never intended for complete privacy  something that's borne out by a look at the companys Terms of Service: Although we attempt to delete image data as soon as possible after the message is transmitted, we cannot guarantee that the message contents will be deleted in every case. Again, so much for self-delete.

Snapchat is a brilliant app that provides a novel and fun way for people to liven up those dreary texts. But lets not kid ourselves - or our kids - that weve suddenly found a way to erase our digital footprints.

This post is part of a series on the digital dilemmas of raising digital kids. We'd like to hear some of the parenting issues technology has raised for you. Please let us know in the comments, or on our Mashable Lifestyle Facebook page. You can also follow and tweet us @mashlifestyle.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS - Pebble, the company that raised almost 8 million to create an e-ink smart watch, announced at CES this week that it will start shipping the watch to its Kickstarter backers on Jan. 23.

We caught up with Pebbles creator, Eric Migicovsky, at the show to give the smart watch a try.

Migicovsky told us that Pebble chose CES to make the shipment announcement because a tremendous percentage of the projects backers would be in attendance.

Though absent from the show floor, Pebble had a suite at the Venetian Hotel set up, and it invited Kickstarter backers to stop by and give the watch a spin. Its going to take the company six to eight weeks to get units out to everyone who took part in funding via Kickstarter. That means that while some backers will have watches in late January, others will be waiting until almost April.

CES was show full of smart watches made by a number of different companies. The most notable examples include Italian-born Im watch and, another Kickstarter project, Martian.

Pebble is the only smart watch out there using an e-ink display. Having handled the competition this week, I can say that its a ton lighter than the other options, something youre definitely going to appreciate when it comes to wearing it on your wrist all day.

Power is going to be another area where the Pebble stands out. Migicovsky says that the Pebble can keep kicking for seven days on a single charge, with the watch only needing a few hours to charge up completely.

Pebble charges using a unique magnetic charger that snaps onto the watch's side, a bit different than its competition, which charges using microUSB.

As far as apps are concerned, Pebble currently only has custom watch faces. However, it's expected to have a number of apps soon. Notably, RunKeeper announced that it would be available on the watch earlier this year.

The screen on Pebble is not controlled by touch, but is instead navigated using the buttons on the side of the device. The button on the right side of the watch serves as a back button, with up, enter and down buttons positioned on the left side of the watch face.

Navigating through menus was a breeze, and I was able to accept a call, text, and read email pretty effectively as well.

So, are smart watches ready for prime time? It certainly looks like Pebble is.

Were going to have one of Pebbles smart watches in our office soon. Stay tuned for a full review in the coming weeks.

What do you think of Pebbles smart watch? Let us know your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  One of the big surprises of CES 2013 was Project Shield, a handheld game controller that Nvidia unveiled in dramatic fashion earlier this week. We got a little hands-on time with a pre-production model of the device, which the company hopes to transform into a full-fledged gaming platform, while at the show.

The Shield certainly seems to have the goods to do what Nvidia promises. Powered by the just-officially-unveiled Tegra 4 processor, it ably handled some taxing Android games and relayed graphics-intensive PC games to an HDTV with just a couple of button pushes.

Picking it up for the first time, I could tell Project Shield was something special. It feels solid in the hand, although heavier than your average Xbox controller. Gameplay buttons are where you expect them, and the array in the middle, which includes the big button that toggles between Android and your PC/media hub, is clearly labeled.

When I flipped open the lid to reveal the 5-inch 720p touch screen, the display came on almost instantly. It's eye-poppingly bright and sharp, exactly what I'd expect from an OLED display. Gameplay screens look good, but for the kinds of games the Shield was made to play  graphics-intensive titles with lots of action  it feels a little small.

Good thing, then, that the Shield can mirror the action to a big screen easily, either via wired or wireless (dual band, 2x2 MIMO) connection. Nvidia only had a wired connection available, so naturally the game played flawlessly, with no lag that I could detect.

The real test was seeing how Project Shield handled moving PC content to a TV. Toggling to the PC/media gateway, I cued up Hawken. Here's where the Shield works as a kind of relay, starting up and then pulling the content from the PC and rendering it both on the Shield's screen and the TV. It's said to support resolutions up to 4K.

The linkup worked fine, although it required some creative button pushing to finish starting up the game. PC games don't all necessarily start in the same way, so Nvidia may need to polish this slightly before general release.

Once Hawken was running, however, everything was smooth. Shield seemed to relay every pixel of the graphics-intensive game with ease. It didn't even get warm.

Would it have if the graphics were 4K and I played for hours instead of minutes? Probably. But the fact that there's a device that can even move that many pixels among three devices, wired or wireless, is astonishing.

Based on my time with Project Shield, I think the gaming crowd will be pleased. It adds tactile controls to Android games and opens a whole new dimension to anything on a PC. And let's not forget that it's also a Jelly Bean-powered Android device, so you have email, web browsing and apps when you want them.

I think there's little question Project Shield will be on many gamers' wish lists when it becomes available (planned for the spring). The big question now is how much Nvidia will charge for it. You tell us: How much would you pay for Project Shield? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Sometimes we all just need a mentor, a guiding spirit or a cheering squad to get us through those tough moments.

And while this puppy is having a mega-crisis of sorts trying to conquer his fear of the stairs, this other, bigger dog steps in as quite the shoulder to lean on.

SEE ALSO: Puppy Acts as Seeing Eye Dog for Another Pooch in Touching Video

It's simple  this paw first, this paw second, trot along, then everyone cheers. See? Now follow me.

Teamwork has never been cuter.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Quvenzhan Wallis, the 9-year-old actress who recently earned an Oscars nomination, just won a prize at another awards show and read her acceptance speech on a smartphone.

At the Critics' Choice Awards, she won Best Young Actor/Actress for her Beasts of the Southern Wild role, a fantasy drama she acted in when she was six.

Winners at awards shows typically speak off the cuff, memorize their speech or read from a piece of paper when accepting their honors. Wallis's speech stands in stark contrast.

Wallis carried her phone, wrapped in a bright pink case, with her on stage to help her:

The Critics' Choice Awards will provide Mashable with footage of the speech shortly, but for now, here is the text of what she said, courtesy of The Daily Mail.

First I would like to thank God for all my blessings. I would also like to thank the film critics for this award. Thanks to Mr. Benh Zeitlin and the Court 13 family for thinking I could make a good Hushpuppy. Lastly, to my family, friends and fans  good night!'

For the Academy Awards, Wallis is vying for Best Actress against Jessica Chastain (Zero Dark Thirty), Jennifer Lawrence (Silver Linings Playbook), Naomi Watts (The Impossible) and Emmanuelle Riva (Amour). She is the youngest nominee ever in the category.

Beasts of the Southern Wild is also nominated for Best Picture, Best Director and Best Adapted Screenplay. Winners will be announced Feb. 24 at Hollywood's Dolby Theatre.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Late Thursday, a report from the Shanghai Evening News suggested Apple would not be producing a less expensive iPhone despite reports to the contrary. That story, and what happened after its publication, is shaping up to be one of the most bizarre technology stories in recent memory.

According to the report, Apple marketing chief Phil Schiller stated that his company would not be developing "cheap smartphones." Based on those comments, Reuters ran an article with the headline, "Apple exec dismisses iPhone as a market share grab  report."

On Friday, Reuter pulled their original story after "substantial changes to its content" were made to the Shanghai Evening News report. In doing so, Reuters said "no replacement story will be issued."

AppAdvice, and others, have no idea what "substantial changes" were made to that first story. All that remains of it is the unedited version hosted at jfdaily.com.

It was clear on Thursday that many news outlets were concerned as to the accuracy of the Shanghai Evening News report. After all, its content went against reporting done earlier in the week by the Wall Street Journal and Bloomberg that said a less expensive iPhone was coming.

Although The Next Web received confirmation from Apple that the comments attributed to Schiller were correct. This latest development only adds some more confusion to the situation.

Our best bet is that Schillers comments were correct, but perhaps taken out of context. Having read those comments in print, Apple likely sounded the alarm, which leads us to where we are at this moment: confusion.

This article originally published at AppAdvice here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Rovio Entertainment, the Finnish gaming firm best known for its Angry Birds franchise, tweeted on Friday that it has more than a quarter billion active users.

Although Rovio didn't expand on the statement, the figure likely refers to monthly active users, the industry standard. At the Mipcom conference in Cannes, France, back in October, EVP Andrew Stalbow announced that the Angry Birds games had 200 million monthly users. Stabow added, "In any given day, we have 20 to 30 million people playing our games connected." Zynga, meanwhile, claimed 306 million active users around the same time.

Though Rovio has had trouble expanding beyond Angry Birds, the three-year-old franchise keeps on giving. In November, the company introduced yet another Birds title, Angry Birds Star Wars. An Angry Birds movie also is set for 2016.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Remember the Rubik's Cube? Of course you do. Invented in 1974 and sold non-stop from 1980 onward, the fiendishly difficult six-faced puzzle has fascinated the planet for generations. It is widely regarded as the best-selling toy in the world, shipping more than 350 million units. There's even a touchscreen version.

But there has always been one group unable to enjoy it  until now.

"My buddy is blind. I want to get him a Rubiks Cube, but I dont really have the skills to make this kind of thing." So wrote Lauren, a user of the website Custom Made, which connects the unusual desires of its customers with makers looking for a challenge.

The maker who stepped up to the plate in this instance was Tom Stringham of Emerald Models Inc., a company that has built projects for the New York State School for the Blind. Stringham tells the story of building the cube on the Custom Made blog.

The result is what you can see above: a cube with nine clear acrylic plastic molds on each side. Each one of the molds bears the contours of a distinct shape  crosses, triangles, squares, circles, stars and lines.

The braille-like cubes aren't for sale commercially, but you can get one custom-made here. Stringham's suggested price is $100.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  Sculpteo is making it easy to create your own 3D iPhone case. Winner of this years Best of Innovations award at CES, the company has released an app called 3DP Case that lets you create a three dimensional case for your phone in just a few minutes.

Cases can be customized almost any way you can imagine, however, there are a few base models to choose from. Highlights from Sculpteos booth at CES include cases with the recipients profile cut out of each side, and one case that had been customized to be cross-stitched after printing.

Cases are easy to create and customize, and are affordable. The average 3D-printed iPhone case from the company is priced at around $30.

3DP Case is available now for iPhone, iPad and iPod touch.

What sorts of 3D cases would you like to create? Let us know your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  Say what you want about Snooki, but she attracted among the most hype and commotion at 2013 International CES conference this week while promoting the launch of her new headphones line. Based on the amount of buzz around her arrival, you'd never guess President Bill Clinton had spoken nearby to attendees just a few hours earlier.

Swarms of people flocked on Wednesday to see the tiny reality TV star model on the show floor her sparkled and cheetah-printed headphones and quirky tech accessories, including earbuds that look like earrings. Called Snooki Couture by Nicole Polizzi, which is manufactured by iHip, she says she wants to bring funky clip-on fashion to the audio industry.

"My line features accessories you can clip on to headphones, so you can change them as much as you want," Polizzi told Mashable. "I wanted my headphones to be like me  fun and fashionable  and something I would definitely wear. I love bows, feathers and cheetah print, so I made sure to include them."

Snooki, who says she was very involved in the design process, joins a long line of celebrities who introduced headphones and earbuds at the tech conference this year, including Tim Tebow, Nick Cannon and Ro Marley Not to mention New Orleans Saints quarterback Drew Brees is the new brand ambassador for a pair of Monster earbuds.

The celebrity-headphone trend has been fueled by the popularity of Beats by Dr. Dre headphones over the years. Monster, the first company behind the Beats product, said earlier this week that clip-on headbands for headphones are something it's already working on for the future. (Is Snooki on to a larger trend?) The company showed prototypes of spiked and feathered headbands during its new product launch event on Monday.

Although Snooki may have wrapped the final season of The Jersey Shore, she can still be heard quite often online, thanks to her very active social media presence:

"I absolutely love social media," she said. "During Hurricane Sandy, we were without electricity for a week and I couldn't tweet, Instagram or do anything. I wanted to kill myself; it was so awful."

Snooki said becoming a new mom has made her more of "an Instagram freak" in recent weeks: "I take way more pictures of my son Lorenzo than I do myself now," she said. "I love it."
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  If there was a trend at CES 2013, it was 4K. Every major TV manufacturer announced at least one TV with 4K resolution, and some unveiled several. Not many addressed the main issue with the new "Ultra HD" format, however: the lack of content.

Sony was one of the few who did, and the company's chief operating officer, Phil Molyneux, told Mashable in an interview how customers of its 4K TVs will be able to get content in native 4K.

"We wanted to deliver a native 4K experience," Molyneux says, "so we put together a media server, and we worked with Sony Pictures, and we remastered 10 titles into 4K. We loaded them onto the server, and we loan that server to the customer so they've got that real experience."

The 4K server ships with Sony's only 4K TV available right now, the 84-inch model, and Molyneux didn't say whether it would also be packaged with the 65- or 55-inch sets the company unveiled at CES.

It'll probably get boring to watch the same 10 4K titles, though, so Sony plans to send out regular updates with more content. The first is due in February. These won't be downloaded  Sony will actually hand-deliver a "memory device" to owners of the 84-inch TV via its white-glove service.

But as Molyneux announced at Sony's press conference, downloads are in the works.

"What we're focusing on this summer, in the U.S. only, is this download service, so owners of all of our 4K TVs will be able to download content remotely to a server device," he says.

Will customers be able to download only Sony movies, however? Molyneux says the project is in early stages so other studios haven't yet had the chance to sign up. But broad 4K support from Hollywood and others is the goal with the service.

"What I believe will happen is that there is now great momentum, that consumers are embracing 4K because it's such a thrilling experience, and I believe other studios will get on board," Molyneux says. "But there are other content creators outside of Hollywood who are producing great 4K content, many of them using our 4K cameras."

How do you like Sony's plans to deliver 4K? Would you prefer downloads or a disc format? Share your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
In a memo titled "This Isn't the Petition Response You're Looking For," the Obama White House formally (and finally!) responded Friday to a petition asking to secure the resources to begin construction on a Death Star by 2016. Sorry, Dark Side supporters, but the administration's view is clear: it "does not support blowing up planets."

As we, and the White House, know, the real cost of building a Death Star is so high it has 15 zeroes attached, and, for practicality's sake alone, that's one project that will not be getting the green light this year.

But  that's not all! Cheekiness aside, the White House used this petition response as an opportunity to remind us of all the great space programs that are currently underway. There's the International Space Station, robots on Mars, telescopes discovering new planets, and prospects of manned missions to the Moon this decade  exciting times, no matter which side of the Force you're on.

SEE ALSO: Mr. President, Build This Death Star

The greatest lesson, though, comes at the close of the memo: "If you do pursue a career in a science, technology, engineering or math-related field, the Force will be with us! Remember, the Death Star's power to destroy a planet, or even a whole star system, is insignificant next to the power of the Force."

Take heed, future Jedis of America, and get studying!

This article originally published at GeekSugar here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Drones can be deadly. They're used in Afghanistan, Pakistan and elsewhere to spy and take out suspected terrorists. But drones can be good too. We've already seen that their potential extends beyond the battlefield. And other than delivering burritos, they can be used for humanitarian reasons as well, like delivering medical supplies to hard-to-reach areas.

That's the goal of a Palo Alto startup called Matternet, that wants to build a network of unmanned aerial vehicles to bring medicines and other important supplies in countries where some communities live in areas not served by usable roads.

"Imagine if we can deliver the medicine within hours or even minutes with a small autonomous flying device," said Matternet CEO and founder Andreas Raptopoulos at last years PopTech conference, "The key here is the autonomy of the solution, there are no humans involved."

In places like Haiti or Lesotho, in Africa, large parts of the population live in areas that are not served by usable roads, isolated from cities and essential infrastructures like hospitals. Building roads so that trucks can reach them can be expensive. Why not use small, flying robots to bring them what they need? The idea is to create a network of base stations to blanket an area and then use GPS-guided drones to fly around and deliver the supplies.

SEE ALSO: Google Grant Helps WWF Fight Poachers With Drones

According to a case study Matternet did last year, building 50 base stations equipped with 150 drones would cost $900,000. Each flight would cost $0.24. The startup has conducted trials in the Dominican Republic and in Haiti, where it used drones to to deliver supplies in Haiti last year.

Although this network of drones sounds great on paper, there are numerous challenges to actually deploy it effectively. Cost is the first. Even though the drones are autonomous, Matternet will probably need to put personnel in the base stations to load the drones and make sure everything is running smoothly. And there are safety issues, too. The UAVs will sometimes fly in areas where aircrafts or helicopters fly as well, so there needs to be a system to avoid collisions.

To know more about this project, check out the video above.

UPDATE: An earlier version of this article mistakenly stated that Matternet had conducted trials in Lesotho. In actuality, the only tests the startup has carried out have been in Haiti and the Dominican Republic.
--------------------------------------------------------------
After controlling small satellites in the International Space Station on Friday morning, two teams of high school students took home top prizes for their programming skills.

The teams were part of the Zero Robotics SPHERES Challenge, an annual competition that asks students to program bowling ball-size satellites to perform maneuvers related to current space-exploration problems. This year's competitors had to mimic cleaning up broken satellites and other unwanted debris humans have put into orbit around the Earth, but haven't brought back down again. Such "space junk" increases every year, which is a problem for new satellites that people want to put into space.

The student-written programs run in real testing satellites, called Synchronized Position Hold, Engage, Reorient Experimental Satellites, or SPHERES, that zip around the cabin of the International Space Station.

Every year, winners are announced among U.S. and European Union teams. In the United States, the winning team included students from Montclair High School in New Jersey and the Evergreen School District in Washington State. In the EU, the top prize went to a team of students from the Enrico Fermi School in Italy and Herder-Gymnasium in Germany.

This article originally published at TechNewsDaily here
--------------------------------------------------------------
A new study has found that almost half of U.S. adults online don't understand where Facebook funds are coming from.

The study, conducted by by The Search Agency, surveyed 2,006 American Internet users. Of those surveyed, only 54% could say how Facebook earned cash  57% of men and 51% of women.

So perhaps Facebook isn't being all that clear when it comes to its reliance on advertising.

SEE ALSO: Facebook Search Will Make Money, But Still Be Ineffective

The study also found that 22% of people polled have clicked on an ad via a search engine and that millennials were two times more likely than older users to click on search engine ads. 

 

Check out the video above to learn more about the study.

Were you ever confused about how Facebook turns a profit? Tell us in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
This video of several men singing "Can You Feel The Love Tonight"  yes, the Disney song  in harmony, a cappella could be the greatest contribution Canada has ever made to the Internet.

Who else thinks Tim Horton's should have this gray-haired, harmonizing gang as their new TV commercial?

SEE ALSO: The Most Misheard Lyrics of 2012

Come for a coffee, stay for some happiness. That's the Canadian way.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  Toshiba is showing off at CES a prototype of an OLED smart watch that knows its owner by his or her pulse.

An embedded ECG sensor in the rear of the watch lets it recognize its owners unique pulse patterns, and will shut down the watchs smart functions if an impostor tries to put it on.

Able to connect to both iPhones and Android devices, the watch displays alerts for incoming calls, emails, and calendar events. Its display can be used for navigation, or to display the latest news and weather information.

The watchs high-resolution OLED display has sensors built-in that optimize for brightness and viewing angle, so youll always be able to see whats on the screen.

Currently in prototype form, the smart watch is just a glimpse at the kind of tech that we could see coming to our wrists in the future.

Several other smart watch makers were on hand at this years CES, including Im watch and Kickstarter-favorite Pebble.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  The world's first-ever smart hunting rifle will help users never again miss their targets.

With video streaming technology, an integrated wireless hot spot and even an app, the TrackingPoint rifle was on display at the 2013 International CES conference this week. It's billed as the most accurate long-range shooting system in the world, and its mission is to give both amateur and expert hunters real-time data to shoot with precision.

The rifle will be available for purchase in the near future, but no date was specified at the conference. The launch is untimely in light of recent gun-related tragedies and it's unclear whether this will affect the product's public reception.

The firearm  which is priced at $20,000 and comes with an iPad mini  displays for shooters a video-game-like map of a prey's location, based on imagery transmitted back from the rifle's scope. The software recognizes the animal the hunter is aiming at and paints a target on it. The hunter lines up the virtual cross hairs line up with the target.

However, if the rifle's aim doesn't match the painted location, shooting capabilities will lock. The software also provides data on wind, temperature and distance to target.

"We want to teach people about ethical shooting," a spokesperson told Mashable. "Some people playing hunting-inspired video games will want to shoot animals in the butt, but that is not the way you hit a target and it also causes suffering for the animal. The app and the rifle won't let you do that."

SEE ALSO: Facebook Charging $100 to Message Mark Zuckerberg

The accompanying iPad Mini and the TrackingPoint app (iOS) are intended for those who hunt in pairs. For example, one person could hold the tablet and reference the app's data and video streaming feed to help the other calibrate the rifle. When shooting alone, a hunter can use a heads-up display in the scope and see the same geo-location data. When not hunting, the app can still be used as a teaching tool and a game.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  3D hasnt quite lived up to the hype: Were not all sitting in our living rooms, wearing special glasses and marveling at the soccer ball some player just kicked in our face. That doesn't mean, however, there's nothing useful for 3D to do. Companies like Leonar3Do are using passive 3D technology to build education products that put teachers and students inside the design process. It introduced its latest product, Vimensio, here at CES 2013.

The virtual reality company's still-in-beta 3D educational system is actually comprised of multiple parts: the content and app-building environment Edit and Vimensio Play, where you interact with the virtual 3D app environment.

What makes the platform cool, however, is the hardware. Known as "Bird" this 3D mouse lets you interact with the virtual world (as long as youre wearing the passive 3D glasses). The spikey-looking, hand-held mouse (which looks nothing like a mouse) includes haptic feedback, which means it vibrates when you move over a virtual object or barrier. To use it, you hold the Bird in the air and move it around. Sensors affixed to the edge of the screen pick up the Bird's location and orientation in space. I gave it a test drive and found that, with a little practice, I was able to use the Bird to manipulate and look around a 3D Jeep.

"Leonar3Do's vision has always been to breakout of the antiquated 2D mold and drive design innovation to empower how people can visualize, create and innovate their ideas they've imagined but in real, 3D space," said Roland Manyai, Leonar3Do's business development and marketing director, in a release announcing the product.

The company also told me it's working on an app that can turn your smartphone into a 3D mouse. Check out the video for my hands-on tour.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  It was expected, but still impressive. Nvidia unveiled its quad-core Tegra 4 mobile processor at CES 2013, and many products with the next-generation chip are already planned. One of them was a the show: The 10.1-inch model in Vizio's new Android tablets, and I got a little one-on-one time with it.

The sample I checked out was a prototype. The finishing wasn't final, but the screen and software were pretty much final. The screen, by the way, is a 2,560 x 1,600 display, comparable with Google's Nexus 10. The software is close to pure Android 4.1 "Jelly Bean," mirroring Vizio's approach with its Windows 8 machines: Getting rid of the bloatware.

The tablet (no name yet) is relatively light, noticeably less hefty than an iPad. The screen looks great, rendering retina-resolution photos with amazing clarity. Droplets on a petal of a rose, for example, had excellent texture, and you could see the details of the light reflected in each one.

Have you ever had that experience on a tablet or phone of flipping too fast through photos that the screen can't keep up? Didn't happen at all on the Vizio tablet. Every pic slid in and appeared instantaneously or close to it.

Videos look good, too, and, like photos, playback begins just as you tap the play button. Graphics-intensive websites load fast, on par with the iPad 4.

There weren't any games or benchmarks loaded on the tablet, so I couldn't really give Vizio's 10-inch tablet a thorough workout, but we're looking forward to checking it out when it's released, scheduled for this summer (no prices yet). Preliminary specs call for 32GB of storage, a 5MP camera in back and a 1.3MP one in back, and the micro trifecta of HDMI, USB and SD card ports.

The tablet doesn't have a name yet, and it's joined by a 7-inch model, which is closer to final product. That one will pack Tegra 3 and 16GB of storage as well as have a 1,280 x 800 screen.

How do you like Vizio's Tegra 4-powered tablet? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  What if your phone had two displays? Announced in mid-December, YotaPhone aims to change how people use their smartphones by bringing together a full-color LCD display on one side of the phone and an e-ink display on the other.

I caught up with Yota Devices Vladislav Martynov at CES to give the phone a closer look.

In essence, the two displays on the handset each have their own unique purpose. The front display is used just as you might your traditional smartphone screen to run apps, browse the web or watch videos.

The rear display on the YotaPhone is what makes it stand out. An electronic paper display, it shows content you push to it from the front of the device. Less for interacting with and more for reference information, you can use the display for a map to your next destination, a clock, or a place to keep the boarding pass for your flight handy.

Martynov showed me a few applications designed specifically to use with the screen as well, including an app that shows low long youve kept a particular goal, such as not smoking. The company plans to release an API for other developers to make applications that take advantage of the dual-screen functionality as well.

Running Android 4.1 Jelly Bean, Martynov says that he plans to keep Android as vanilla as possible, something he feels is very important. He also wants to make sure that the phone is on-par with high-end Android smartphones, spec-wise. The current iteration uses the Qualcomm Snapdragon MSM 8960 platform, and Cornings 3D Gorilla Glass. Its also a multi-band LTE handset that can run on LTE networks anywhere in the world.

YotaPhone is expected to go one sale during the second half of 2013.

What uses do you see for an e-ink second screen? Let us know your thoughts in the comment.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Here at Mashable, we love a good office prank, whatever the time of year. For your viewing pleasure, we have scoured YouTube for 10 funny examples of colleagues who got creative with trickery.

From dismembered heads in cardboard boxes to disappearing doors, we think you'll find something to smile at in our gallery of great pranks.

SEE ALSO: 8 Easy PC Pranks to Trick Your Friends

Cheer up your work day with a look through our video slideshow. Share in the comments below your own practical jokes for co-workers.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Aaron Swartz, online activist and founder of Infogami, a service later merged with Reddit, committed suicide in New York City on Jan. 11, the Tech reports.

The news was revealed to the Tech by Swartz's uncle Michael Wolf and confirmed by Swartzs attorney, Elliot R. Peters. The tragic and heartbreaking information you received is, regrettably, true, said Peters.

Born in 1986, Swartz co-authored the first specification of RSS when he was 14. He also started Infogami, a service funded by Y Combinator that was later merged with social networking site Reddit.

Swartz also co-founded Demand Progress, an advocacy group that rallies people "to take action on the news that affects them  by contacting Congress and other leaders, funding pressure tactics, and spreading the word in their own communities."

In July 2011, Swartz was arrested for allegedly harvesting 4 million academic papers from the JSTOR online journal archive. He appeared in court in Sept. 2012, pleading not guilty.

A blog post from 2007 on Swartz's website reveals a possible cause for taking his own life: depression. In the post, Swartz describes his experiences with severe depression, as well as several other health issues, including migraines.
--------------------------------------------------------------
There's been some confusion around the rumors indicating that Apple is considering a cheaper version of the iPhone. As of today, no one really knows what's going on. So much so that even Reuters misfired, pulling a story based on comments made by Apple marketing chief Phil Schiller to a Chinese daily that appeared to debunk the rumors.

As it turns out, Schiller didn't really mean it. Or, at least, he was misquoted.

On Thursday, the Shanghai Evening News ran a story with the headline: "Apple will not push a cheaper smartphone for the sake of market share." The piece then quoted Schiller saying Apple would not launch a cheap iPhone just for the sake of expanding its market share.

But yesterday, as reported by Reuters, the Chinese daily published a new story removing the headline and all references to cheap smartphones.

The new version leaves a door open for a low-end version of the popular Apple phone: "Apple wants to provide the best products, will not blindly pursue market share." The daily also added a new quote from Schiller: "Apple has always focused on providing the best products for its consumers, weve never blindly chased market share."

SEE ALSO: Cheaper iPhone Would Cost $99 to $149, Report Says

Even if this doesn't completely clear up all the confusion around these rumors  there will always be uncertainty with a new Apple product until the official launch  it does provide some insights. The Shangai Evening News evidently misquoted or at least put Schiller's words out of context. His words seem to indicate that he wasn't specifically trying to deny the possibility of a new, cheaper iPhone, but just state that whatever Apple does, it always looks for quality over price and market share. There's nothing that hints there won't be an iPhone mini, or whatever its name will be.

The original article already raised eyebrows, as it contradicted reports by Bloomberg and The Wall Street Journal that indicated that a cheaper iPhone was in the works.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Don't sweat it, you got this. Just make sure you're looking your best. So, you know, maybe shave. But don't use that generic shaving cream  that stuff leaves nicks and smells like cleaning products. What you need is something that will make you stand out. Something that everyone, diet aside, can truly appreciate.

Bacon-enthusiasts J&D, best known for their ever-increasing line of bacon accessories, have a  you guessed it  pork-flavored tub of shaving cream for sale on their website. It's exactly what you'd hope it would be.

SEE ALSO: 'Unavoidable' Bacon Shortage Leads to Twitter Hysteria

The tub runs for $14.99. But, if it's not exactly your "plate of bacon," you're still in luck  bacon-flavored lip balm, envelopes and popcorn are also available on the site.

Sir Francis Bacon once said that "friends are thieves of time." In that sense, any time spent shaving without this would be a waste of awesomeness. Now that is philosophy.

Does this sound like something you or your carnivorous friends would use? Tell us what you think about it.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  Tech companies brought their best new products to 2013 International CES last week, and one way for them to stand out in an endless sea of accessories was to bring the bling. We're talking a plethora of sparkles, sequins and diamonds. And believe us, there was plenty to go around.

SEE ALSO: Things Get Weird and Wacky at CES 2013's International Pavilion

From rhinestone-studded Minnie Mouse headphones to bejeweled iPhone cases, here's a look at what glistened on the show floor.

What do you think of the trend? Let us know in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
What's the recipe for a winning meme? While you may prefer grumpy cat videos, there are a wide variety of memes that have seen viral success.

Compiled by Pelican PR, one infographic looks at patterns in 100 memes from 1980 to today, and determines the necessary ingredients for a video or photo to take off.

Entitled "How to Cook up a Winning Meme," it reveals that the ideal equation for the perfect meme = picture + cat + Reddit. For the exact breakdown, check out the entire infographic, below:

What ingredients does your favorite meme include? Share with us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It's the weekend. Time to kick back, relax and catch up with all the reading you were too busy to do during the week. If technology and social media is your thing, you've come to the right place.

The reporters and editors at Mashable spent the week buzzing around the Internet like digital bees, checking out all the best new apps and gadgets. To help you get up to speed in a hurry, we gathered all our most usable stories into this one post.

In addition to the topics we normally cover  social media, business, tech and lifestyles  this week's features roundup contains a couple of comedy posts. The Internet is nothing if not funny, right?

For more social media news and resources, you can follow Mashable's social media channel on Twitter and become a fan on Facebook.

For more business news and resources, you can follow Mashable's business channel on Twitter and become a fan on Facebook.

For more tech news and resources, you can follow Mashable's tech channel on Twitter and become a fan on Facebook.

For more digital lifestyle news and resources, you can follow Mashable's lifestyle channel on Twitter and become a fan on Facebook.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The NFL playoffs are back this weekend with four thrilling divisional matchups, and the U.S. is abuzz, waiting to see who's going to survive these games and advance to the conference championships. Now, thanks to a powerful new tool, you'll be able to see what everyone's talking about before, during and after the big games.

A collaboration between Facebook and CBS Sports and powered by Mass Relevance, the Facebook Football Insights on CBS Sports gives you a detailed look at which teams and players are dominating the chatter on Facebook.

An interactive map of the United States allows you to see which NFL teams receive more mentions in each state. And the numbers can be filtered by gender and age.

There's also a demographic breakdown that shows the most popular teams based on age segments and a graph displaying the teams that are trending over time.

Overall, in the last week, the Green Bay Packers are the most popular team on Facebook, with 1,228,530 mentions. Interestingly, their dominance comes mostly from female fans. The Packers are the most-mentioned team in all female age segments, but they only top the 45-54 and 55+-year-old males segments.

SEE ALSO: Twitter Voting Comes to 'NFL Countdown' as the Second Screen Expands

At the bottom of the page there are also two streams that get updated in real time.

One collects NFL-related Instagram pictures uploaded by fans using the #CBSSuperbowl hashtag. The other aggregatesFacebook updates by fans, teams and players regarding the NFL.

What do you think about this dashboard? Did any of the numbers surprise you? Tell us what you think in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS This year's CES was a whirlwind ride through a techie kaleidoscope. We didn't miss a thing, (except for that exclusive ride on the Albatross One which was supposed to land on Lake Mead, because of high winds rats!)

Cameras in hand, our team got some spectacular shots on the ground in Las Vegas. What was in all of our camera bags? The photo editor (that's me) carried two Canon 5D's, a Sigma 28mm f/1.8 prime lens, a Canon 24-105mm L f/4, and a Canon 70-200mm f/2.8 L. Our tech editor, Pete Pachal, was armed with a Canon T4i mounted with a shotgun Rodemic for interviews, and our reporter, Emily Price, carried the identical set-up. Tech reporter Samantha Murphy carried a Panasonic Lumix DMC-GF2, and editor-in-chief Lance Ulanoff used his beloved Olympus Pen. And of course when all else failed, we used our iPhones and Android smartphones.

From Samsung's keynote featuring Bill Clinton, who warned the audience not to take tech for granted, to every ultra-thin, high-speed, compact, Lightning connector-ready device, to a whole slew of celebrity branded headphones  we were there to capture the full spectrum of the tech scene at CES 2013.

Check out our favorite shots  which one is yours? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Sudy Bharadwaj is a founder and the CEO of Jackalope Jobs, a platform that helps job seekers find a job via their social networks. Learn how Sudy and Jackalope Jobs obsess over job seekers by connecting with them on Facebook, LinkedIn and Twitter.

New research shows the effects of a bad hire go beyond a minimal cost. While 41% of employers estimated the costs of a bad hire to be more than $25,000 (and 24% estimated more than $50,000), many of these employers also listed loss of productivity, lost time to recruit and train another worker, and the cost to recruit and train another worker as the main pitfalls of making a bad hire.

But lets flip our perspective for a moment and consider this: What if you are that bad hire? More importantly, as you look for your next job, how can you improve the perception to your new employer that you are not that bad, high-risk new hire?

You might be hiding in a corner right now wondering what you did wrong  but dont put all the blame on yourself. In fact, its partially the employers fault. Employers reported that much of the reason for making a bad hire included trying to fill the job too quickly, insufficient talent intelligence and failure to check references.

If youve been fired because you just werent the right fit for a company, keep your chin up. Learn from your mistakes and the ones made by the hiring manager, and make sure your next job is a great fit for both you and your employer.

The following are a few ways to avoid being a bad hire for a company.

This can be a tough task. Use your networking skills and try to find out what happened with the employee you are replacing. You may need to walk a fine line between not being too nosy, but proper research should benefit you and your employer. One quote I have seen successfully used is, I am not looking for a job, I am looking for a win, let's work together and learn from the past to get to a successful future. This type of dialogue can certainly change the tone of your conversation with an employer.

Just as the employer needs to sufficiently research you, you also need to conduct adequate research on the company. This needs to be done way before you accept the job. In fact, you should be doing this research prior to writing the cover letter. Before you accept any job offer, take the time to truly understand the mechanics of your employer. Do a little research online: Take a look at their website, social media accounts, and any recent news.

Consider these questions when doing company research:

Employers cited 67% of their bad hires as having lackluster work. But if the candidate didnt understand the job requirements, this may be part of the problem. Understanding the job you're accepting can help ensure you're not making a poor decision in terms of fit or skills.

Job seekers are often so enthralled in simply getting a job, they forget any job isnt the same as the right job. So, make sure you asked a lot of questions during your interview. If youd like to hear more about processes, deadlines, managers or any job-related work, dont hesitate to ask. This will give you a better sense of your day-to-day work, and if that work aligns with your skills and experience.

Again, its easy to get overzealous about accepting any job  but being honest with your employer is vital. Lying on your resume, cover letter, references or during the interview will never work in your favor. Lies, large and small, often have a way of coming back to bite you. Be upfront about anything that the employer might need to know before youre hired.

Employers cited that 60% of their bad hires did not work well with other employees. This lack of teamwork is often due to the company culture, and if you were unaware of this culture prior to accepting the job, therein lies the problem. Always make it a point to get a sense of the company culture before accepting a job. If you dont know enough about the culture from the website or social media accounts, ask your interviewer if you can have a quick tour of the office.

Avoid being a bad hire by having some foresight before accepting any job. Your employer will thank you for it later.

Have you ever been fired because you were a poor fit with the company? How do you recommend rectifying these situations in the future?

The Mashable Job Board connects job-seekers across the U.S. with unique career opportunities in the digital space. While we publish a wide range of job listings, we have selected a few job opportunities from the past two weeks to help get you started. Happy hunting!
--------------------------------------------------------------
Ever think a client is saying one thing ("Sure, I think it's a good idea, but I'll need to run it by the team") but thinking another?

Hint: They do it all the time. But by understanding a few simple facial cues, you'll be able to match people's words to their actions, and see who's telling the truth every time.

Check out this visual guide to what your client is really saying.

Infographic courtesy of AmExOPENForum via visual.ly, photo via iStockphoto, P_Wei

This article originally published at The Muse here
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  The CES show floor was home to several GPS trackers this year. One of the most interesting was Im Here, a tracker developed by the same company that created an Android smart watch called Im Watch.

Unveiled during the companys CES press conference, Im Here is a pint-sized tracker designed to help you keep up with everything from your suitcase to your kindergartener.

The tracker works using the same technology found in cell phones. Users can find out where the device is located  whether it's in a bag or tied to a shoe  whenever they want.

If, for example, you arrive at your destination without your bag, simply ping the device to find out where it is. The Im Heres location is shown on a map in an accompanying app for the device.

Im Here has a high up-front cost  around $160  but after its initial purchase, you can locate the device 200 times for free. Each additional search after the initial 200 will cost $0.05. The device can be used in any country around the world for the same price.

Trakdot, a competing GPS tracker specifically for suitcases and bags, is expected to be available in March of this year for a suggested retail price of $49.95. Activating that device will cost an additional $8.99, plus an annual service fee of $12.99.

Whereas Trakdot is a fairly large device, however, Im Here is both small and colorful, making it ideal for tracking kids (by tying the device onto their shoe, for example). It's also great for finding lost valuables such as house keys or a pet.

What do you think about using devices such as Im Here to track your kids and luggage? Let us know your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
I'm not immune to charms of giant ultra HD screens, glowing white booths filled with futuristic sports cars and celebrities sporting the latest headphones, but my favorite part of CES 2013, by far, is the back alleys  especially the tiny booths in the International Pavilion.

They're kind of off the beaten path. You won't find them in the giant Central Hall, or the auto-filled North Hall or even the lower floor and tiny and quirky booths of the South Hall. No, they're a walk away in the ballrooms of the Las Vegas Hotel (formerly the Las Vegas Hilton).

Inside are dozens of tiny booths full of tiny  and mostly Asian  companies peddling unusual wares. When they saw me and my cameraman arrive, one company rep actually thanked us and said, "no one comes around here."

And that is a shame, because the products are unusual, interesting and if nothing else, colorful. It's not just the products that are different. The International Pavilion has its quirks. Most company reps speak little-to-no English and many quote prices in Yen. Some grow nervous when you ask when the products will hit the U.S. market, asking if they can "contact you tomorrow."

And everywhere you look there are not only bowls of odd candys but crackers and nuts. One woman smiled broadly and encouraged me to take some nuts and all I could think about was the hundreds of other hands that had already been in that bowl of unwrapped food.

Yet, even this only added to the International Pavilion's charm.

Among the highlights: a tiny flying RC robot, a remote control power strip that looks more like a toilet seat, a speaker that looks like a boat, see-through keyboards and a hand-crank charger for your iPhone. So settle back and join me on a tour of CES 2013's best back alley.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LAS VEGAS  We saw quite a few eccentric items at CES this year: an iPad man, the Direct TV kangaroo starting a impromptu dance mob, and even sumo wrestlers  but one of our favorites was this iPad mini case by Japanese brand Ozaki. It looks like a Bible. Genius.

This takes the "disguise your dirty magazine in a textbook" idea to a whole new level. I would have appreciated it, had such tech been around during my brief stint attending catechism classes.

If the Bible isn't for you, Ozaki also has plain leather-bound cases that give the look of classic novels, and other book titles including The Old Astronomy Book, a dictionary, and even Dare to Play Your Tune, as seen above.

Would you disguise your iPad mini as a Holy Bible? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Sometimes, you just have to use a little Force.

When a petition calling on the Obama Administration to begin building a Death Star by 2016 blasted past the 25,000 signatures necessary for an official response late last year, the White House could have gone any number of ways. It wasn't required to reply in a timely fashion; it could have stuck the whole thing in a drawer. The petition was obviously frivolous; it could have just said thanks, but no thanks.

But the President, a known sci-fi geek who once flashed a Vulcan salute with a Lieutenant from the Starship Enterprise, evidently opted for a third direction. The response would be written promptly, in full, with as many lovingly-chosen Star Wars references as possible pressed into the service of soaring scientific rhetoric.

Never mind giving George Lucas the National Medal of Technology, as George W. Bush did; Obama would go a step further in honoring the $4 billion franchise that won our hearts in 1977 (and was sold to Disney in 2012). He would, in effect, make sure its key phrases were read into the national record for all time.

The title of the online letter, written by Paul Shawcross at the White House Office of Management and Budget, is the first clue: "This Isn't the Petition Response You're Looking For." (Now repeat, in a dazed Stormtrooper voice: "this isn't the petition response I'm looking for. You can go about your business.")

After giving props to economics students from LeHigh University who calculated Death Star construction costs at some $850 quadrillion (13,000 times the Earth's GDP), the letter gives voice to a common-sense argument every moviegoer knows: "Why would we spend countless taxpayer dollars on a Death Star with a fundamental flaw that can be exploited by a one-man starship?"

By linking to a set of instructions for viewing the ISS in the night sky, Shawcross is able to use the line "that's no moon, it's a Space Station!" He doesn't need to do anything with the NASA-private space industry partnership, the Commercial Crew and Cargo Program Office: its acronym is C3PO. That's a gimme.

The next paragraph laments that "the United States doesn't have anything that can do the Kessel Run in less than 12 parsecs." (Might a petition to build the Millennium Falcon meet with more success?) It also reminds us that the Voyager spacecraft are poised on the brink of interstellar space, that the galaxy is suddenly lousy with 17 billion Earth-size planets, that there's a robot on Mars wielding a laser (not to mention a scrubbing brush), and that in five short years a NASA probe will go investigate the surface of the Sun for the first time.

And if you're anywhere close to a true space nerd, this is the part that might give you a very Carl Sagan-like thrill. Hey, we really are starting to conquer the galaxy, aren't we?

Lest anyone doubt who signed off on this thing, the petition response points out that Obama is handy with a lightsaber (he used one to parry with the U.S. Olympic fencing team on the South Lawn, which is surely the geekiest thing any President has done). It also can't resist pointing out that he launched a marshmallow cannon at the first ever White House science fair.

But that's just setting the stage for a Jedi-like pivot to STEM, or Science, Technology, Engineering and Math, the four kinds of education the US desperately needs to compete in the 21st century global economy. The letter closes by effectively comparing STEM to the Force  just so it can end on this:

That's right. The President's administration just explained its top education policy with a Darth Vader quote.

Somewhere in Marin County, George Lucas  who gave billions of dollars from the Disney sale to his educational foundation  just cracked a shy little smile.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Technology has helped solve many problems for us. We make phone calls and read emails from wherever we are (most of the time) using cellphones, and record our favorite TV shows and movies to watch later.

But it hasn't helped solve the age-old dilemma of figuring out whats for dinner  until now. Samsung showed off a smart refrigerator at the 2013 International CES that can offer recipe suggestions based on what you have in your fridge at the time.

No photo magnets here  the front of the 32 cu. ft. capacity four-door fridge is adorned with a 10-inch tablet pre-loaded with apps designed to help you and your family get organized.

Theres Evernote for shared grocery lists, so you can add to the list while your partner is shopping and the update will appear on their mobile device.

A grocery manager helps you keep track of whats going into the fridge  fresh food or leftovers  and lets you set an expiration date. A note pops up on the screen letting you know whats set to expire in a day, or however you ask it to remind you. It's perfect for those who tend to forget those Tupperware containers of leftovers in the back of the fridge.

You tell the app whats in the fridge by a simple drag-and-drop of items on the screen. Super easy to use which means you may actually use the feature. Once your food items are listed, you can tell the program what options you have available for dinner and it searches Epicurious to find a recipe using your ingredients.

Samsung has partnered with Unilever, so every once in a while a coupon for a particular product will appear on your screen. Were waiting for the day it will be smart enough to know what items youre running low on, and then offer coupons for what you need.

The Samsung T9000 Refrigerator will be available later this year, but there's a price for getting your kitchen life organized. It will set you back a whopping $4,000.

Watch the video above for our hands-on look  inside and out  of the new Smart Refrigerator, and let us know what features youd like to see in a smart fridge.


--------------------------------------------------------------
One alleged tablet thief in South Africa may be the newest addition to our list of dumb criminals caught through Facebook.

James and Barbara McCall experienced a recent spate of burglaries at their guesthouse in Hillcrest, KwaZula-Natal, and found their Samsung tablet missing after the latest incident, South Africa-based IOL News reported.

Upon discovering the theft, McCall changed the login passwords for his social networks; that's when he saw a man's photo had been uploaded to his wife's Facebook page. He said he believes the man is one of the burglars.

"He probably did not realize he was doing it. Usually you never log off from a tablet, so it could have happened quite quickly."

McCall handed the photo over to police, but so far, no arrests have been made. Check out the video, above, for more.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Tina Fey doesn't like Twitter. In fact, she thinks most Twitter users are downright boring.

That's what the comedian said in a short video, answering a question from a fan who wanted to know if she used Twitter. "I have never used it," she said. "I do look at other people's twit of things sometimes."

Why doesn't she use it? "I think you should have to get a license to use Twitter because most people are so fucking boring that they should shut up," she said.

SEE ALSO: Marlon Wayans Gets Inspiration for His Tweets on the Toilet

In fact, the actress even jokingly volunteers to be the one deciding who should get a license to tweet. Check out the video above to see Fey's entire answer.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The long-anticipated 2013 International CES came and went in a flurry of techno-goodness. Luckily, Mashable's team was in Las Vegas so that nothing that happened at this year's CES stayed there. And there was definitely a lot to remember and report on at this year's gadget bonanza.

It was really hard to narrow down all the tech stories that came out of CES to just 10, but we think these are the 10 biggest ones. They also reflect the wide array of diversity that was on display in Las Vegas. This year, there were giant tablets, Ultra-high-def TVs, super-fast processors and the world's first 1TB USB 3.0 flash drive.

Intel showcased a reference laptop that should give us an idea of what laptops will look like next year: They'll have detachable screens and Intel's next-gen processors. Qualcomm also unveiled a new, faster, mobile processor.

There was also time for innovative and surprising gadgets like Nvidia's Project Shield, a game controller that integrates a 5-inch screen and is an actual all-in-one Android-powered console.

Take a look at our Top 10 Tech This Week gallery to see the best of CES.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It was another busy week at Mashable and in tech news, as our staff literally ran around Las Vegas testing and viewing some of the newest gadgets at CES 2013. In case you missed any of our top stories out of Vegas or the other news stories happening elsewhere, we've got you covered.

Here are some of the top news stories published on Mashable this week.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The uNu DX Protective Battery Case for iPhone 5 doubles your talk time, letting most iPhones last for two days on one charge.

While that's still far from what feature phones can manage, it's a significant improvement and would come in handy in many situations. The great thing about this case is how little bulk it adds. It's 15mm thick and actually looks quite good.

Another case discussed in the video below is an LED case that's still a prototype. It increases your battery life, protects your phone, and adds an LED panel to the back of it. The cool thing about the LED panel is that you can connect to it with Bluetooth and push custom notifications to it.

You can already use the the built-in iPhone flash for alerts, but with this case you would get different notifications from each app.

While I don't care about getting better notifications on the back of my phone, I'm sure some people will see the benefits of having the LED panel.

There's no doubt that uNu is doing interesting things with cases. Learn more about what the company's up to here.

This article originally published at AppAdvice here
--------------------------------------------------------------
The technology community's brightest minds are memorializing Aaron Swartz, the 26-year-old programmer and digital rights activist who committed suicide Friday months before his trial over computer fraud was set to begin.

Swartz was nothing short of a prodigy: at the age of 14, he helped develop the Real Simple Syndication (RSS) standard, paving the way to services such as Google Reader. He worked on the Open Library, which has a goal of putting one page online for every book ever published. He founded Infogami, which was eventually incorporated into Reddit before the sale to Conde Nast, a move that gave him the means to detach and take up various causes at his pleasure.

"He was brilliant, and funny. A kid genius. A soul, a conscience, the source of a question I have asked myself a million times: What would Aaron think," wrote Harvard academic, activist and personal friend of Swartz Lawrence Lessig.

"He was a kind of 21st century, nerd renaissance man," wrote MSNBC's Chris Hayes in a blog post Sunday.

"Wanderers in this crazy world, we have lost a mentor, a wise elder", wrote World Wide Web inventor Tim Berners-Lee.

Developing code, however, was far from Swartz's only fixation. He was a dedicated believer in the open-source/open-code/open-web ideology, working on causes such as net neutrality and data liberation while also helping to bring about the Creative Commons content licensing structure. He founded Demand Progress, a digital rights group that played an instrumental role in defeating the Stop Online Piracy Act early last year.

"He had an astonishingly broad range of interests, from health care to political corruption," wrote technology policy reporter Timothy Lee in the Washington Post. "But Internet freedom and public access to information were two recurring themes in his life and work."

It was Swartz's dedication to that ideology, which Timothy Lee called "aggressive, perhaps even reckless," that contributed to his becoming the target of a federal hacking investigation.

Swartz, having previously wrote an automated program to free court documents from a government paywall using libraries' credentials, used a similar tactic to "liberate" academic articles hosted and charged for by JSTOR. First, Swartz began downloading JSTOR articles en masse over the Massachusetts Institute of Technology's wireless network. After MIT cut him off from wireless access, he sneaked into a network closet and plugged into the school's wired network, a move that was discovered by the school.

In July of 2011, Swartz was charged by the U.S. Attorney for Massachusetts with computer fraud and other charges that in total carried a potential sentence of 35 years in jail and $1 million in fines. JSTOR later dropped its charges against Swartz (and has since said it "regretted being drawn into" the case), but MIT was less clear about its wishes (MIT's president, Leo Rafael Reif, said in a statement released Sunday that "it pains me to think that MIT played any role in a series of events that have ended in tragedy. He also announced an internal investigation of MIT's involvement).

U.S. attorney Carmen M. Ortiz decided to go full steam ahead with the trial, which was expected to begin later this year.

The intensity of the charges against Swartz in combination with Ortiz's decision to proceed despite JSTOR's decision to drop the case became the subject of much controversy, which has only magnified since Swartz's death. Swartz's family in a statement blamed his suicide in part on "a criminal justice system rife with intimidation and prosecutorial overreach" and on the U.S. Attorney's office's decision to pursue "an exceptionally harsh array of charges, carrying potentially over 30 years in prison, to punish an alleged crime that had no victims."

Lessig also placed a share of the blame on "the absurdity of the prosecutors behavior" in a blog post entitled "Prosecutor as bully." An excerpt from Lessig's impassioned post:

For the outrageousness in this story is not just Aaron. It is also the absurdity of the prosecutors behavior. From the beginning, the government worked as hard as it could to characterize what Aaron did in the most extreme and absurd way. The "property" Aaron had "stolen," we were told, was worth "millions of dollars"  with the hint, and then the suggestion, that his aim must have been to profit from his crime. But anyone who says that there is money to be made in a stash of ACADEMIC ARTICLES is either an idiot or a liar. It was clear what this was not, yet our government continued to push as if it had caught the 9/11 terrorists red-handed.

As a memorial to Swartz, some academics have been sharing their articles for free with the Twitter hashtag #pdftribute.

Lessig did not, however, completely exonerate Swartz, instead arguing that "Aaron brought Aaron here" through his alleged actions.

"The causes that Aaron fought for are my causes too," wrote Lessing. "But as much as I respect those who disagree with me about this, these means are not mine."

Many commentators have pointed out that Swartz had been suffering from depression since at least 2007, when he wrote about his struggle with "depressed mood" in detail. Some believe Swartz's mental health played some role in his death.

"Depression strikes so many of us. I've struggled with it, been so low I couldn't see the sky, and found my way back again, though I never thought I would," wrote Cory Doctorow, describing his own battle with depression in a moving tribute to Swartz.

The ultimate reason, or combination of reasons, for Swartz's death may never be fully understood. But Wired's's Kevin Poulsen put five simple words to the feeling shared by many this weekend: "His death is a tragedy."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Bill Clinton continued his "Remember How Awesome I Am" tour, this time stopping by the Golden Globes to introduce Best Motion Picture nominee, Lincoln.

Fresh off of his CES appearance, the husband of Hillary Clinton  as host Amy Poehler so delightfully referred to him  brought the room of Hollywood elite to its feet, and Twitter users to their keyboards.

Golden Globe GIFs! SEE ALSO: Golden Globes Recap: Best Moments and Winners

Girls star and writer Lena Dunham was pretty excited too:
--------------------------------------------------------------
Jason Pike loved playing with LEGO pieces when he was young  "I was that kid," he told Mashable with a laugh.

At 30-years-old, it's still rare to find the Chicago-based entrepreneur without a handful of yellow figurines stashed somewhere in his jacket  albeit for slightly different reasons now.

Pike recently brought his love of LEGO to Tumblr with Brickstagram. The page is stacked with splendidly twisted photos of LEGO minifigs arranged in whimsical, whatever-comes-to-Pike's-mind situations. Think an aqua monster sifting through bubbles or a cross-legged fig serenely sitting by a Buddha statue.

Despite the page's lighthearted theme, Brickstagram started from a relatively dark time in Pike's life. Last year, shortly before he started the page, doctors diagnosed him with throat cancer.

"One of my friends brought LEGOs to my hospital room as a way to cheer me up," he said. "Whenever I was bored, then  and feeling good from morphine  I'd take pictures of them with my camera phone. People started bringing in more, so I just kept taking pictures."

SEE ALSO: LEGO-Inspired iPhone 5 Cases Will Make You Geek Out

Pike began compiling his pictures on a website, using the minifig snapshots as a way to document his recovery process.

"I used it as a sort of therapy. Really, it's how I stayed sane during all of it," he shared. "People brought more and more LEGOs, and it sort of became a habit."

Pike is cancer free now, but old habits are hard to keep tucked away in the toy box. Brickstagram is focused less on telling his personal story like his first website, and more about sharing whatever concept  funny, dark or bizarre  comes to mind. He has also begun sharing his love of LEGO offline by donating part of his extensive collection to a friend's elementary school class in Chicago.

"This class has a weekly story time where they read stories aloud," he said. "At the end now, they get a challenge to build something  anything  from the story, using the Legos. I know it's a tiny, insignificant thing, LEGOs, but they helped me laugh and get through tough times."

Check out the gallery up top to see some of our favorite shots. You can see the rest on Brickstagram.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Chelsea P. Gladden is the Director of Marketing and PR for Flexjobs, an award-winning service that helps job-seekers find professional opportunities that also offer work flexibility, such as telecommuting, freelance, part-time or alternative schedules . To learn more about Chelsea, visit Flexjobs.com or tweet her @FlexJobsChelsea.

There it is: a stack of 150 resumes, received in the first hour of posting a job, piled up in the hiring managers email inbox. How will you stand out? These four tips for creating an effective, well-organized resume, should help you stay at the top of the pile and in the top of the hiring manager's mind.

For most positions, HR reps just wants a resume they can read and that captures the skill sets they are looking for. Fonts such as Times New Roman and Georgia are your best bets for making it readable, as well as a 10- to 12-point size. Acceptable sans-serif fonts include Arial and Tahoma. Whichever your choice, make sure to stick to one to keep it presentable versus using a few different fonts that can crowd the page and make you appear disorganized. On the other hand, if you are applying for a creative position such as graphic design, your resume will likely be expected to bend the rules and show your creative pizzazz.

Assume a hiring manager is going to skim your resume quickly, in 15 to 20 seconds, and will concentrate mainly on the top half (much like you might skim the headlines in a newspaper). They will want to see immediately that your experience is a fit instead of tossing out your resume to get to the next in the pile because they didnt see that you are a match. Highlight your most relevant skills and experience first and then work your way down to other pertinent information. The following resume subheadings could be included: Contact Info, Summary of Core Qualifications, Relevant Work Experience, Relevant Volunteer and Other Experience, Education and Honors & Awards.

Resumes are not just a showcase of your experience and skills, but also of your personality. Speak with confidence and ease when describing your accomplishments. Try to come across as friendly and open, professional but personable, and super-knowledgeable in your field to add depth and interest to an otherwise rather boring document.

Again, go for a resume that will be easy on the eyes and is formatted well, with plenty of white space. Attempt to keep it to one page (or two pages if you have more than five years experience in your field) and be absolutely certain there arent typos or grammatical errors  these will instantly land your submission in the trash. Be sure to review your resume often and make changes and updates as needed. There's nothing like a last-minute job application and an outdated resume that gets a too-quick scrubbing instead of an in-depth cleaning to derail your chances at being hired.

Though you spend hours on your resume to stand out, hiring managers just want to be able to easily weed through their very large pile as quickly as possible. Sending in a clean resume that gets straight to the point will be your best bet at landing the interview.

The Mashable Job Board connects job-seekers across the U.S. with unique career opportunities in the digital space. While we publish a wide range of job listings, we have selected a few job opportunities from the past two weeks to help get you started. Happy hunting!
--------------------------------------------------------------
ASCII art is an early graphic-design technique, dating back to the 1890s when typewriters became more than just a new tool for writing. Public speed-typing competitions and typewriter drawings were a popular form of entertainment and artwork. The earliest preserved example of typewriter art was made in 1898 by a woman named Flora Stacey.

As computers advance, so does the ability to create unique artwork. ASCII art is an outdated practice, but people are still blowing minds by incorporating typography and shading techniques.

Some of these pieces of ASCII art have seen slight Photoshop alterations, while others stick to the more traditional medium. Take a look in the gallery above.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Im what you would call an International CES veteran. Ive been covering the trade show long enough to know what kind of items I need to have on hand to get me through the long days and nights  and Im not just talking comfy shoes.

Reporters walk a lot during the course of the day, and we carry plenty of gear. We depend on our laptops and cellphones to communicate with the rest of our team, as well as to file stories. Wi-Fi and cellular signals are also essential, but dont always work the way theyre supposed to when theres a lot of network traffic, so bringing backup is key.

Here are the essentials I take with me when packing for any kind of travel:

One day, we'll live in a perfect world where every device will use a universal charging connector. Until then, we have Innergie's Magic Trio. It's a charging cable that provides three connectors in one: mini USB, micro USB and a 30-pin connector. This was my best friend throughout the show. I was able to charge almost all my devices with it, using either my laptop or plugged into a USB-to-AC adapter. What's more, "Magic Trio" may soon become "Magic Quartet," as the company will be adding a Lightning connector to the cable after Apple gives its approval.

The press room can get pretty packed with reporters trying to work and charge up their devices at the same time. I never travel anywhere without my Belkin mini surge protector. It provides three extra outlets and two USB ports; this came in handy when there was just one open outlet left where I was sitting; I was able to plug in and add two more devices, as well as two items that charged via USB. Then, someone next to me asked if he could add his brick to mine  we created quite the tower of power (pictured above).

The only device that lost power more than I could find locations to charge it was my iPhone 5. While it provided great, fast coverage and took almost-postworthy pictures, I had issues with running out of battery power halfway through each day. Our team was using GroupMe to communicate, and we sent a lot of texts throughout the day. I also checked my calendar frequently to see where my next event or meeting was. I found myself one evening leaving my phone to be charged at the one booth I found that had a Lightning charger. To avoid this from happening again, I started bringing the MyCharge with me each day. It provided an extra charge to my phone during the day via a USB-to-Lightning cable that I brought with me. If I had events late into the night, I could always charge up the MyCharge off my laptop, so if I needed it again, it would be available.

Im sure everyone whose toes I ran over hates me, but Ive learned over the years, I cant carry it all. I use a wheelie-bag to navigate the packed halls, and while it sometimes makes it difficult to get through the crowds, I dont know how I would make it if I had to carry everything I bring with me each day  not to mention the things I collect throughout the day. Knowing I have the rolling bag also makes it easier for me to throw in those chargers and extra batteries because Im not worried about the added weight.

Wi-Fi in the press room can either be fabulous or useless. You never know. And companies don't usually provide Wi-Fi during their press conferences, so if you want to tweet out the latest news and send your material in, you need a mobile hotspot. I was using AT&Ts MiFi Liberate with speedy LTE, which never failed me once the entire time I was there. I only needed to remember to keep it charged, and it provided access when I needed it, whether in the press room, a crowded conference or on a shuttle bus from the hotel to the Las Vegas Convention Center.

The other lifesaver was an Ethernet-to-USB adapter for my laptop that doesnt have a built-in Ethernet port. Others on my team didn't have this, and when the Wi-Fi failed, as it often does, they were out of luck  or signal.

Another option in that situation would have been the TP Link Portable Router. If you have just one Ethernet line, you plug it into the tiny router which then becomes a hotspot. Up to ten people can then log on to its password-protected signal and share the connectivity.

Chatty airplane seatmates and the need to focus on work require a good set of headphones. A solid pair will help drown out the noise around you so you concentrate on getting some writing done. On this trip I took along the Plantronics Blackwire 700 Series USB Headset, because not only can I hear the interview audio Im transcribing from my computer, they also pair to my cellphone via Bluetooth. That way, if I receive a call or text from someone on my team, I don't miss it because I'm submerged in silence. I can simply hit "answer" and the call will be routed to the headphones.

I often find myself trying to write a quick post while I'm grabbing lunch or a snack, resulting in sticky keys. Or my cellphone screen gets smudged from being pressed up to my cheek during a call. For those situations, there are Toddy Wipes. They're funky colored microfiber cloths. They come in a variety of vibrant, designer patterns, and they're washable, reusable, and have an antimicrobial coating to keep germs and bacteria from spreading.

Those are the items I take with me  let us know whats always in your bag when you travel.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Just a month after Pope Benedict XVI launched his official Twitter account, other representatives of the Catholic faith are giving new meaning to the term, "religious text."

The Holy Name Province, self-described as the largest group of friars in the U.S., announced that they are now accepting prayer intentions via text.

Called "Text a Prayer Intention to a Franciscan Friar," the program encourages participants to text the word "PRAYER" to 306-44, according to a release. Senders will then receive a welcome message inviting them to submit their prayer intentions. After they are sent in, participants will receive another text confirming that their prayer has been received and will be prayed for.

"With technology changing the way we communicate, we needed to offer people an updated way to ask for prayers for special intentions and needs either for themselves or others," Father David Convertino, executive director of development for the Franciscan Friars of Holy Name Province, said in a statement.

Do you think text messaging is a good way for religious bodies to connect with their followers? Discuss in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
During the 70th Golden Globe Awards, Adele took home the trophy for Best Original Song for "Skyfall," and Mychael Danna won Best Original Score for Life of Pi.

Listen to their musical creations, below.

"It's very strange to be here," Adele said in her acceptance speech. "We've been pissing ourselves laughing." The singer beat out Keith Urban's "For You" from Act of Valor, Bon Jovi's "Not Running Anymore" from Stand Up Guys, Taylor Swift's "Safe and Sound" from The Hunger Games and "Suddenly" from Les Miserables in the Best Original Song category.

Golden Globe GIFs! SEE ALSO: Golden Globes Recap: Best Moments and Winners

A 77-piece orchestra backs Adele's vocals on "Skyfall," which she recorded at Abbey Road Studios in London.

Composer Mychael Danna accepted the award for Best Original Score, besting other composers for their work on Anna Karenina, Argo, Cloud Atlas and Lincoln.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Winners of the 70th Golden Globe Awards, hosted by Tina Fey and Amy Poehler, will be revealed Sunday night. You can enhance your TV viewing experience with our digestible list of six ways to get more from tonight's Golden Globes online.

The red carpet events begin at 6 p.m. ET. And the televised show starts at 8 on NBC.

Among the presenters this year are George Clooney, Meryl Streep, Kristen Wiig, Will Ferrell, Nathan Fillion, Jennifer Garner, Jennifer Lopez and Debra Messing.

Like clockwork, expect a heavy flow of tweets from celebrity attendees and fellow viewers, who will be using hashtags #GoldenGlobes and #GlobesParty during and after the ceremony.

Twitter created a special Golden Globes page, where you'll find star live tweeters. And to encourage people at home to participate, @GoldenGlobes has been seeking questions:

Notable accounts to follow throughout the show include @GoldenGlobes, @NBC, @Eonline, @TwitterMovies, @TwitterTV, @MashEntertain and Mashable's @BAHjournalist.

E!'s GlamCam 360 will give you a 360-degree view of the fashion rolling down the red carpet, while a Detail Cam and Mani-Cam will showcase close-ups of the accessories and nails.

The special views will be shown on TV, online and on E!'s iOS app.

Additionally, Livestream will be streaming red carpet arrivals starting at 6 p.m. ET.

And E!'s Heat Gauge tells you which red carpet stars are attracting the most Twitter buzz.

You can access photos from this Instagram account, the #GoldenGlobes hashtag from within the app, @SofiaVergara, @BeverlyHilton or this location feed on Gramfeed.

You'll be seeing promotions before and during the Golden Globes broadcast for Zeebox, a second-screen expereince. NBC will be touting Zeebox to encourage you to check out custom zeetags for trivia, movie video previews and IMDB talent profiles; Fandango zeetags for ticket sales; and iTunes zeetags for nominated songs.

SEE ALSO: Is Zeebox the Second-Screen TV App That Finally Goes Mainstream?

Using the Zeebox app, you can also vote on your favorite red carpet fashions, view photos and read facts about the celebrity attendees.

The Hollywood Foreign Press Association took over the Celebs on Facebook page on Sunday to give behind-the-scenes content to the page's 4.6 million followers.

The Golden Globes YouTube channel offers behind-the-scenes footage of the hosts and celebrities as well as glimpses of what it takes to put on the ceremony.

3 Kickstarter Films Get Oscar Nods SEE ALSO: Oscars 2013: List of Nominees
--------------------------------------------------------------
We've seen the contract that blogger and mother of five Janell Burley Hofmann gave her son Gregory when she gave him a Christmas gift of an iPhone. But what did the young recipient think of those strings attached?

Our friends Nitrozac and Snaggy at The Joy of Tech intercepted Gregory's caustic response. It looks like he has the matter totally under control:

Comic illustration provided by The Joy of Tech. Published with permission; all rights reserved.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Security experts are recommending computer users disable or uninstall Java following the discovery of a zero-day Java exploit which allows hackers to take control of vulnerable Macs, PCs and Linux computers.

The exploit takes advantage of a vulnerability left open in Java 7 Update 10, released in October of last year. It works by getting Java users to visit a website with malicious code that takes advantage of a security gap to take control of users' computers.

Update: Oracle has released Java SE 7 Update 11 to address the vulnerability. It "strongly recommends" that Java SE 7 users upgrade immediately.

What's worse is this particular exploit is reportedly being used to push ransomware, a type of attack that demands users pay to have control of their computers returned from a hacker's grasp.

Java's creator, Oracle, hasn't specified the number of users who have downloaded Java 7 Update 10. However, Java runs on more than 850 million computers and other devices. When Oracle released Update 10, it "strongly recommended" that users update to receive "key security features and bug fixes."

The exploit was first discovered by French researcher Kafeine, who claimed to have found it running on a site registering hundreds of thousands of page views daily.

"This could be a [sic] mayhem," Kafeine wrote.

SEE ALSO: Is Your Mobile Device Safe From Hackers?

Should you be worried about this exploit? While security lapses are sometimes overblown, there are good reasons to take this one seriously: The U.S. Department of Homeland Security issued a warning advising users to disable Java until a fix is discovered. Apple has apparently moved to disable Java in response to the threat. Mozilla took the opportunity to warn users and advertise "Click to Play," a Firefox feature which stops Java from loading on individual web sites until a user allows it. Many security experts are advising users disable or uninstall Java for the time being.

Our advice? It's probably a good idea to disable or uninstall Java until a fix is published. You can find out how to do that right here: How to disable Java in your web browser. How to uninstall Java for Mac. How to uninstall Java for Linux.

Have you downloaded Java 7 Update 10? Will you disable or uninstall it in light of this new threat? Share in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
While there are many cool and creative office pranks you can play on your co-workers, a true classic that never goes out of style is the "cubicle makeover."

We have found 10 amusing YouTube clips showing various offices, desks and cubicles given a new look while their unsuspecting owners spend time away from the workplace.

SEE ALSO: 8 Easy PC Pranks to Trick Your Friends

Hide in your cubicle and take a look through our video slideshow. Share in the comments below any workplace remodelling you've been party to in the past.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The preference for cats or dogs can stem from allergies, familiarity or just stepping in pooch poop one too many times.

Bad experiences with Fido or Fluffy may cement a pet bias for life. Just ask the five kids GIFed below.

SEE ALSO: Cat Friend Vs. Dog Friend: If Humans Were Pets

Worry not, cat lovers, it's not all flying kitties. Scroll past all the eeks moments for a gallery of six children who will likely always have a soft spot for the Internet's favorite animal.

Annnd, finally, one cat that will never like kids.

BONUS: Awww, 6 Kids Who Will Grow Up to Be Cat Lovers
--------------------------------------------------------------
Chris Crowell is a veteran kindergarten teacher and contributing editor to Children's Technology Review, a web-based archive of articles and reviews on apps, technology toys and video games. Download a free issue of CTR here.

This week's top apps for kids have one thing in common: beauty. From an iPad-turned-planetarium to an intricately illustrated e-book, your kids will be learning  and awe-ing  from these apps that are visually pleasing yet still educational.

SEE ALSO: A Parent's Take on Snapchat

Our friends at Children's Technology Review shared with us these 5 top apps from their comprehensive monthly database of kid-tested reviews. The site covers everything from math and counting to reading and phonics.

Check back next week for more Top Kids Apps from Children's Technology Review.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Six days after Megan Fox joined Twitter, the Transformers actress pondered why she's tapping away messages on the service. Then, abruptly, she stopped tweeting altogether.

If you had the chance, how would you respond to Fox's question?

Fox has been silent on Twitter since sending this tweet on Jan. 9, but a nudge from some of Mashable's social media-savvy readers may be just what she needs to come back.

Her #WhatIsThePoint question garnered many answers from her nearly 275,000 followers:

"you gotta start following people to get it. Its about discovery, connection, etc." "The purpose is about to follow me baby. I love you!!!" "you keep followers informed of what you're up to in as much detail as you choose" "there's no such thing as a point on Twitter... but you if you want I'll explain you over dinner." "Seeking validation and pretending your thoughts have meaning. Duh."

Fox had entered Twitter's birdcage Jan. 3 with a username she didn't want: "Every possible version of my name is already in use so for now my Twitter handle is [@MeganFox516]," she told her fans in a Facebook post announcing her new Twitter account.

SEE ALSO: Megan Fox Tells Dirty Jokes in Deleted 'This Is 40' Scene

Fox had gotten off to a solid start earlier this month, confessing her love for Star Wars with the hashtag #StarWarsNerd, and sharing a photo of an R2-D2 toy.

How would you encourage her to give Twitter another shot? Let us know in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
More and more lately, we're witnessing technologies from our favorite sci-fi films and television shows getting closer to reality. The latest is like something from Minority Report  it's a new kind of software meant to predict the actions of criminals.

Police in Baltimore and Philadelphia are already using the software to prevent murders, and Washington D.C. is next on the list. Don't worry, no one is keeping psychics in a pool. Well, not that we're aware of ....

The technology was developed by Richard Berk, a professor at the University of Pennsylvania. The hope is to decrease murders and other crimes.

But how does it work? The software isn't used to predict what you or I might do in the future, but what those already convicted of crimes and headed for parole might do.

"When a person goes on probation or parole they are supervised by an officer. The question that officer has to answer is 'what level of supervision do you provide?'" Berk told ABC News. The level of supervision is dependent on the parole officer's best guess. The officer looka at the prisoner's record and decides what's appropriate, but now, it's the software that assesses the likelihood to commit another crime.

Beginning several years ago, the researchers assembled a dataset of more than 60,000 various crimes, including homicides. Using an algorithm they developed, they found a subset of people much more likely to commit homicide when paroled or probated. Instead of finding one murderer in 100, the UPenn researchers could identify eight future murderers out of 100. Berk's software examines roughly two dozen variables, from criminal record to geographic location. The type of crime, and more importantly, the age at which that crime was committed, were two of the most predictive variables.

So it's not simply a case of a murderer likely to commit the crime again. There are many factors involved.

"People assume that if someone murdered then they will murder in the future," said Berk. "But what really matters is what that person did as a young individual. If they committed armed robbery at age 14 that's a good predictor. If they committed the same crime at age 30, that doesn't predict very much."

The software is also used to predict which criminals may themselves be victims of murder, leading many to make the connection to the Steven Spielberg film, Minority Report. Berk said, "We aren't anywhere near being able to do that." Washington, D.C. is currently only testing the software on lesser crimes, but if proven successful, will likely spread out its use to more serious offenses.

This article originally published at The Mary Sue here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Leo Rafael Reif, president of the Massachusetts Institute of Technology, announced in a statement Sunday that the school will be conducting an investigation of its involvement in the case of Aaron Swartz, the 26-year-old programmer and digital rights activist who committed suicide in his New York City apartment Friday.

"Now is a time for everyone involved to reflect on their actions, and that includes all of us at MIT," Reif wrote. "I have asked Professor Hal Abelson to lead a thorough analysis of MITs involvement from the time that we first perceived unusual activity on our network in fall 2010 up to the present. I have asked that this analysis describe the options MIT had and the decisions MIT made, in order to understand and to learn from the actions MIT took."

Lief added that he will share the report publicly once it has been completed.

Swartz, who believed deeply in the principle of open information, was charged with computer fraud and other crimes in July 2011 after sneaking into an MIT network closet to free academic research from JSTOR. Swartz's charges carried a sentence of up to 35 years in jail and $1 million in fines.

JSTOR later dropped its civil charges, but MIT was opaque about its wishes. The U.S. Attorney's office decided to pursue the case, which was scheduled to begin this spring.

Some of those who have commented on Swartz's suicide have put varying degrees of the blame on MIT  something Lief acknowledged in his statement.

"I want to express very clearly that I and all of us at MIT are extremely saddened by the death of this promising young man who touched the lives of so many," Reif wrote. "It pains me to think that MIT played any role in a series of events that have ended in tragedy."

Swartz was not a student at MIT.

SEE ALSO: Technology's Greatest Minds Say Goodbye to Aaron Swartz

Many of the world's top technology minds have spent their weekend eulogizing Swartz. Hundreds of academics and researchers from around the world have been posting their work online to memorialize him, using the Twitter hashtag #PDFtribute.

To the members of the MIT community: Yesterday we received the shocking and terrible news that on Friday in New York, Aaron Swartz, a gifted young man well known and admired by many in the MIT community, took his own life. With this tragedy, his family and his friends suffered an inexpressible loss, and we offer our most profound condolences. Even for those of us who did not know Aaron, the trail of his brief life shines with his brilliant creativity and idealism. Although Aaron had no formal affiliation with MIT, I am writing to you now because he was beloved by many members of our community and because MIT played a role in the legal struggles that began for him in 2011. I want to express very clearly that I and all of us at MIT are extremely saddened by the death of this promising young man who touched the lives of so many. It pains me to think that MIT played any role in a series of events that have ended in tragedy. I will not attempt to summarize here the complex events of the past two years. Now is a time for everyone involved to reflect on their actions, and that includes all of us at MIT. I have asked Professor Hal Abelson to lead a thorough analysis of MIT's involvement from the time that we first perceived unusual activity on our network in fall 2010 up to the present. I have asked that this analysis describethe options MIT had and the decisions MIT made, in order to understand and to learn from the actions MIT took. I will share the report with the MIT community when I receive it. I hope we will all reach out to those members of our community we know who may have been affected by Aaron's death. As always, MIT Medical is available to provide expert counseling, but there is no substitute for personal understanding and support.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Celebrity finances and musical bug penises await you in this week's edition of Reddit Facts.

Learn something cool from the Front Page of the Internet? Share a link in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
With the snow comes the fun. To help you find amusement in the colder weather, we have found 10 toys, gadgets and gizmos for the next snow day.

From contraptions that will help you win snowball fights to different ways to hurl yourself down snowy slopes, you'll find something in our superb selection.

SEE ALSO: 6 Great Gloves for Touchscreen Gadget Lovers

Take a look through our ice-cool selection of snow-themed toys and gadgets in the gallery above. Let us know in the comments below how you celebrate the snow.
--------------------------------------------------------------
There's a lot to be impressed by at the Golden Globes. The lights, the cameras, the action, the starlets in low cut sparkly dresses and  ahem  George Clooney. Amirite, ladies?

But if you're Tommy Lee Jones, it's just another damn day at work. And he's not impressed.

Golden Globe GIFs! SEE ALSO: Golden Globes Recap: Best Moments and Winners

When Will Ferrell and Kristen Wig had the rest of the Hollywood big-wigs giggling with their antics while presenting an award, Jones was doing his best McKayla Maroney impression. And thus was born the Tommy Lee Jones is Not Impressed meme. Good job, Internet.

SEE ALSO: Twitter, Hollywood Flip for Bill Clinton at Golden Globes

Seen any other great Tommy Lee memes? Share them in the comments below.

BONUS: Ermahgerd! The 12 Best Memes of 2012
--------------------------------------------------------------
Toy Story, released in 1995, became an instant classic: Telling the story of a child's toys come to life, it was the first feature-length animated film. It set the bar extraordinarily high for producer Pixar, which has mostly been delivering blockbusters ever since. Toy Story pulled in nearly $362 million at the box office and was nominated for three Academy Awards.

But what if Toy Story wasn't animated, but instead shot in live-action with real toys and people? That's exactly what YouTube user "jonasonsMovies" did.

His project, Live-Action Toy Story, combines his own footage with the film's original audio, clocking in at one hour and 20 minutes. It has more than 83,000 views and made it to the front page of Reddit after a day online.

Check Live-Action Toy Story out in all its real-life glory above. Would you watch the whole thing? Share in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Did thoughts of floppy disks, DOS and "portable" computers that weigh more than an anvil just flood your mind? It's cool, computer geeks, we all keep it stored somewhere in the personal hard drive known as the brain.

SEE ALSO: Command-A(ttention) With These Vintage Apple Shoes

Recall a few of those old-school memories by taking a click through eight awesomely vintage computer books pictured in the gallery below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
If the winter blues are getting you down, take a gander at this week's viral video recap.

Our most recent edition features curious creatures, including: a cat's single-minded obsession with bubbles, a puppy's fixation on half an orange and a baby panda's first steps in public at the San Diego Zoo.

For some belly laughs, be sure to check out one magician's drive-thru "invisible driver" prank, and celebrities reading mean tweets about themselves.

Finally, to cap off your viral-video viewing, take a look at these epic slam dunks from Hungary's acrobatic sports team.

Which viral video do you like the most? Tell us in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Changzhou, China is home to a bizzarre world of rides, food and fun: A World of Warcraft-style theme park that's completely unlicensed by Blizzard, maker of the Warcraft series.

The park opened in the summer of last year. It reportedly cost $48 million to build and is "pretty huge," according to Reddit user Francesca Timbers who originally posted these pictures republished here with permission.

"I thought it was great," posted Timbers. "A lot of the rides used 4-D and special effects, which I hand't experienced much of before. There was a good roller coaster with loops, where you are lying horizontally, face forward, like you are flying. That was my favourite ride. The water log ride ('splash of monster blood') was pretty good too."

SEE ALSO: Why 'World of Warcraft' Might Get You More Dates Than Match.com

Another weird tidbit: Some rides have a "happiness index," showing, we believe, the intensity of the ride.

While most of the park is Warcraft-flavored, one section is dedicated to another Blizzard favorite: Starcraft.

For the rest of Timbers' pictures and more details about her trip to the utterly weird theme park, visit her Reddit thread. Would you book a trip to China to get out to this theme park?
--------------------------------------------------------------
The 2014 Corvette has been completely redesigned, and Chevrolet rolled it out for the first time on Sunday night at the Detroit Auto Show. The company revealed a car that features styling cues from the iconic 1960s Corvette coupled with the latest carbon-fiber materials  resulting in a sports car that makes a bold statement for the recently imperiled Detroit automaker.

They're even calling it the Stingray, just like that fast-backed Corvette Stingray from the early '60s, a vehicle that was designed by GM to show those European gearheads that America could also build a powerful sports car with appealing design.

The base 2014 model will be the Corvette Stingray, and the Corvette Z51 will offer Magnetic Ride Control, brake improvements and 19-inch wheels instead of the standard 18-inch size.

The new Stingray is called "C7" by enthusiasts because it's the seventh redesign of the Corvette in its 60-year history. This 2014 model is more powerful at 450 hp than the standard 2013 Corvette's 430 hp. It delivers more torque than its predecessor as well  450 pound-feet of acceleration that's certain to press a lead-footed driver deep into its sporty seats.

Chevrolet wasn't specific about Stingray's pricing, but did say that car buyers who can afford a currently available Corvette will be able to afford this new Stingray when it's released sometime during the third quarter of this year. Currently, 2013 Corvettes can be obtained at a starting price of $49,600, with most of them costing at least $55,000 once a buyer has added a few options.

The entire car has been almost completely redesigned; Chevrolet said there are only two parts used in the 2014 Corvette that were used in the 2013 model.

At 177 inches, the 2014 model is a couple of inches longer than the Corvette C6, and has a wider stance, with a wheelbase that's an inch wider. The new model's frame has been changed from steel to aluminum to reduce weight, and the roof and hood are made with lightweight carbon fiber. The result is a car that is lighter and has a significantly lower center of gravity.

The interior is also a noticeable improvement over today's Corvettes, with lots of stitched leather instead of plastic, as well as carbon-fiber trim.

The reveal of the new Corvette wasn't a complete surprise; sites such as Jalopnik already had spy photos of the new car long before its official introduction on Sunday night. Chevy also released a teaser video last month that showed little parts of the new car.

Still, when Chevy's pictures of the Corvette were released Sunday night, even those who were never enthusiastic about past Corvettes were highly impressed with the technology and design of the 2014 Corvette Stingray.

To give you a closer look at its new car, Chevrolet has launched its official 2014 Corvette site, which includes complete specs, notes and lots of pictures.

What do you think of this new sports car? Can it challenge the supremacy of the great European supercars? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Aaron Swartz, the 26-year-old programmer and digital luminary who took his own life Friday, did so only days after his lawyers unsuccessfully attempted to strike a plea deal with prosecutors over a computer fraud case, according to a report. Swartz, whose trial was expected to begin in the spring, was facing a maximum sentence of 35 years in jail and up to $1 million in fines.

Swartz's lawyer, Elliot Peters, made the second of two attempts at striking a plea deal with Assistant U.S. Attorney Stephen Heymann as recently as last Wednesday, according to a Monday report from the Wall Street Journal. Peters told the Journal that no compromise was reached, as Heymann stuck to the government's earlier position: Swartz would have to plead guilty to every charge and face at least some time behind bars  possibly six months but up to seven years, according to a "person familiar with the matter."

Swartz, an ardent believer in the principle of free information, was charged in July of 2011 with computer fraud and other crimes after sneaking into a Massachusetts Institute of Technology network closet and using the school's connection to download millions of academic and research files from JSTOR without paying for them. Swartz was not a student at MIT.

Swartz did not leave behind an explanation for his suicide, but friends and loved ones have identified several possible reasons, including government prosecutors' desire to punish Swartz to the fullest extent of the law.

Lawrence Lessig, longtime friend of Swartz, wrote in a blog post that, "From the beginning, the government worked as hard as it could to characterize what Aaron did in the most extreme and absurd way." Swartz's family, too, blamed prosectors' overreach, saying in a statement that Swartz was facing "an exceptionally harsh array of charges, carrying potentially over 30 years in prison, to punish an alleged crime that had no victims."

According to Swartz's girlfriend, Taren Stinebrickner-Kauffman, the impending case was to be a financial and social burden for Swartz, as he would need to seek help for legal fees while some of his friends were being subpoenaed.

"It was too hard for him to ask for the help and make that part of his life go public," Stinebrickner-Kauffman told the Journal. "One of the things he felt most difficult to fathom was asking people for money."

SEE ALSO: Technology's Greatest Minds Say Goodbye to Aaron Swartz

Suicide is, however, rarely the result of only one cause. Swartz's previous battles with mental illness and depression were at points severe. He wrote about his "depressed mood" publicly in 2007. Reddit co-founder and colleague Alexis Ohanian told the Journal that one of Swartz's blog posts on the subject was so alarming it convinced him to alert the police, while others who have written about Swartz's death, including Cory Doctorow, have speculated his depression played some role in his suicide.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Aaron Swartz, the 26-year-old digital luminary who took his life Friday, played an instrumental part in organizing the technology community's opposition to the Stop Online Piracy Act early last year.

SOPA was designed to combat online piracy, but many Internet advocates  Swartz included  believed it would have a disastrous effect on Internet freedom.

In a keynote delivered to the 2012 F2C: Freedom to Connect conference, Swartz explained in depth how the technology community was able to quickly organize and ultimately cause SOPA's author to shelve the bill.

"The Internet really is out of control," said Swartz. "But if we forget that, if we let Hollywood rewrite the story so it was just big company Google who stopped the bill, if we let them persuade us we didn't actually make a difference, if we start seeing it as someone else's responsibility to do this work, and it's just our job to go home and curl up on the couch, pop some popcorn and watch Transformers, well then next time, they might just win. Let's not let that happen."

SEE ALSO: Technology's Greatest Minds Say Goodbye to Aaron Swartz

To help defeat SOPA, Swartz founded Demand Progress, an advocacy group focused on Internet legislation. Demand Progress continues its work today.

"We will be in touch with our members and the general public in the near future to offer suggestions about ways to move forward," said the group in a statement on Swartz's death. "Tragically, well have to continue to stifle the visceral impulse to run our half-formed ideas by Aaron, to help us make them better ones."
--------------------------------------------------------------
As everyone who watches Mad Men knows, the ad business is tough. Winning over new clients is particularly challenging.

But a Lexington, Ky., ad agency used a tool that didn't exist in Don Draper's day  LinkedIn  to grab the attention of a potential client in a way that would have made Draper smile, or at least smirk.

Cornett Integrated Marketing Solutions calls the stunt a "Linkedin Bomb." Here's how it happened: In April, everyone in the agency sent LinkedIn requests to A&W Restaurants President Kevin Bazner and Director of Marketing Sarah Blasi at the exact same time. The messages were all headed "Welcome to Lexington" because A&W had just moved its headquarters from Louisville after being spun off from Yum Brands.

Blasi says she was at a photo shoot and "all of the sudden I got about 35 LinkedIn notifications at once." At first she thought someone had hacked her account. Then she read them. "They were all individual stories about their personal relationships with A&W Restaurants." One was from a guy who visited the restaurant with his grandfather when he was a kid. Another was from someone who's first date with the woman who became his wife was at an A&W.

The stunt was a shot in the dark. No one at the agency actually knew anyone at A&W. No one knew if the company was looking for a new ad agency. (It turns out they weren't, really.) The LinkedIn Bomb got Cornett's foot in the door, though. After several months of meetings and evaluations, the two companies are planning to announce on Tuesday that Cornett is A&W's agency of record now.

Of course, the bomb could just as easily have backfired. "There was a moment when we thought we could really get their attention, but not in a good way," says Christy Hiler, chief strategic officer for the agency. (Her husband, Whit, came up with the LinkedIn Bomb idea.) For Blasi, the key was that the messages themselves showed a strong affinity for the brand. Says Blasi: "It was crazy. I went from thinking I was hacked to a few seconds later thinking 'Wow, they took time to write personalized notes.'"
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Anonymous hacktivist group appears to have hacked MIT's website, leaving a tribute for Aaron Swartz, the online activist who recently committed suicide.

Swartz was a the co-founder of Demand Progress and founder of Infogami, a service later merged with Reddit. He committed suicide in New York City on Jan. 11.

MIT's website was defaced with a message claiming the prosecution of Swartz, who was arrested in 2011 for allegedly harvesting academic papers from the JSTOR online journal archive, was a "a grotesque miscarriage of justice".

"The situation Aaron found himself in highlights the injustice of U.S. computer crime laws, particularly their punishment regimes, and the highly-questionable justice of pre-trial bargaining. Aarons act was undoubtedly political activism; it had tragic consequences," says the message.

In the message, the Anonymous also lists several "wishes," including a reform of computer crime laws as well as copyright and intellectual property law.

"We call for this tragedy to be a basis for reform of computer crime laws, and the overzealous prosecutors who use them. We call for this tragedy to be a basis for reform of copyright and intellectual property law, returning it to the proper principles of common good to the many, rather than private gain to the few. We call for this tragedy to be a basis for greater recognition of the oppression and injustices heaped daily by certain persons and institutions of authority upon anyone who dares to stand up and be counted for their beliefs, and for greater solidarity and mutual aid in response. We call for this tragedy to be a basis for a renewed and unwavering commitment to a free and unfettered internet, spared from censorship with equality of access and franchise for all."

The defacement of MIT's website comes hours after the institution announced it will be conducting an investigation of its involvement in the case of Aaron Swartz.
--------------------------------------------------------------
As an illustration that iPhone 5 sales are not as strong as expected, Apple has cut orders for components for the model, according to a report.

The Wall Street Journal, citing "people familiar with the situation," reports that Apple cut its order for iPhone 5 screens for the January-March quarter "by roughly half of what the company had previously planned to order." Apple notified suppliers about the reduced orders last month, according to the report, which adds that other component orders were also affected. Though the report garnered attention Monday morning, some pointed out that the information wasn't new. Peter Misek, an analyst with Jeffries & Co., for instance, noted the order cuts in a Dec. 14 note to clients. BGR also notes that the fiscal fourth quarter traditionally posts far fewer sales than the fiscal fourth quarter, so there's nothing unusual about cutting back in the face of en ebb in seasonal demand.

Apple could not be reached for comment on the report.

The report comes as the market share for Android-based smartphones hit 72% globally last November, according to Gartner. Apple's iOS fell from 15% in Q3 2011 to 13.9% in Q3 2012, the researcher estimates.

Apple's stock was down more than 3% in pre-market trading on the news and was flirting with $500. The company's stock price dropped to that level back in December for the first time in 10 months. Apple's stock had eclipsed $700 after the iPhone 5 launch. The subsequent drop off has come as other supplier reports have indicated weaker-than-expected demand, though Apple's iPhone 5 launch in China last month offered some hope for investors.

The apparent sales slowdown has prompted Apple to reportedly explore the idea of a cheaper iPhone model. Apple is expected to report its fiscal first-quarter results on Jan. 23.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Apple's stock briefly dipped below $500 a share on Monday for the first time this year, falling as low as $498 a share, a decline of more than three percent from Friday's closing price of $520.30.

The stock's decline comes after reports in The Wall Street Journal and Reuters suggested demand for the latest iPhone has been lower than expected.

The Journal cited "people familiar with the situation" who said that Apple has cut its orders for iPhone 5 screens in half for the March quarter. Likewise, Reuters cited Nikkei, a leading Japanese business daily publication, which reports that Apple has asked its LCD suppliers to halve its initial order of 65 million screens for the iPhone 5, in addition to cutting other components.

Several analysts and publications have since raised doubts about these two reports, noting that the Journal's estimates are a month old and the Nikkei's estimates are based on an incredibly bullish assumption that Apple would order parts for 65 million iPhones when most expect it to sell fewer than 50 million iPhones that quarter.

Still, the news has clearly unsettled investors as it reinforces concerns that the iPhone 5 is not selling as well as the company had hoped. As of publication, the stock was hovering around $503 a share.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Amidst all the stress and running around from meeting to event and back to meeting again, there was one conversation I had during last week's International CES that was particularly calm and somewhat stress free. It was one with Arianna Huffington, president and editor-in-chief of Huffington Post Media Group. She told me she doesn't expect anyone to answer her emails at night or over the weekend.

Speaking at the Digital Health Summit about how we can actually use technology to improve our health and well being, Arianna, as she's known in the industry, talked about the need to prioritize de-stressing. She also showed off the guide from her newly-released app; GPS for the Soul.

Walking the show floor at CES I was struck by the increase in the number of health and fitness devices have come on the market. In fact, the CEA says floor space devoted to health and wellness is up 25% over last year. So it seems we all want to know how much we're walking and how many calories we're burning in this fast-paced world, but Arianna says that's not enough.

"We need to deal with our minds, not just our diet and bodies, our mind and spirit count for so much," she told me. "That's where anxiety and depression and insomnia come from," she added. That's why it's important to prioritize de-stressing your life.

And she should know. Four and a half years ago, Arianna fainted from exhaustion, broke her cheek bone and wound up with stitches around her eye. That's why, she tells me, her current obsession with the issue of helping people de-stress stems from her own personal experience.

She launched the iPhone app, in conjunction with HeartMath, to create a guide for users  a course-correcting mechanism  to help them get back in sync. In addition to giving you your heart rate variability, it gives you something to focus on that makes you happy and calm. For Arianna, it's pictures of her family. For others it might be the ocean, poetry or a particular place. Users can show and share guides, as it has a very large social component. There are also expert guides from Dr. Oz and Deepak Chopra.

"We're never going to eliminate stress, but we can reduce it," she tells me. "Heart disease, diabetes, both are related to stress."

I get that, but I have to confess, the words tech and stress-free just seem like an oxymoron to me. I still don't get how we can use the tech currently available to us to help de-stress our lives. Arianna's answer is simple, and this is where it really begins to make sense.

Arianna says she always puts the day behind her before going to bed. She puts her phone on charge in another room. That way, even if she wakes up in the night, there's no temptation to sneak a peek at it.

"You can't be tempted to look at it, even if you go back to sleep, you've allowed your day life to intrude into your recharging, restoring time," she tells me.

And no screen time before bed. Studies show reading on a screen before going to sleep can be detrimental to getting a good night's sleep.

Arianna says she wants others on her staff to gain the same rejuvenation from sleep and relaxation as she does. No more emails that pull you in all weekend long. Arianna says she makes it clear to her staff "If I send an email at eleven at night, it's to get it off my to-do list, but I don't expect a reply. And I make that very clear, I don't expect replies over the weekend."

Does she go so far as to have a tech-free weekend? It's more like a catch-up, which in some cases can help reduce stress as well. "I go through my inbox on a Saturday, but I don't expect a reply over the weekend."

What about you, does tech make you more stressed? Could you go the weekend without responding to email? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
With one of the worst flu seasons in history under way, it is critical employees take the necessary steps to avoid getting themselves, or others, sick.

A recent study found that 84% of employed adults have gone to work while sick, and nearly half of those employees make no attempt to warn others of their illness.

In order to stay healthy, NSF International Public Information Officer Cheryl Luptowski advises employees to follow some simple guidelines. Here are a few that she mentions.

Beware of common items: Studies have shown that germiest areas in offices were sink faucet handles in the break room, microwave door handles and keyboards. Employees should wipe down their workplace with a disinfectant on a daily basis, as well as wash their hands after touching common items like the refrigerator, microwave, door handle and faucets. Wash hands: Workers needs to make an effort to wash their hands before eating, after reading magazines in the break room and after meetings where they're sharing office equipment or shaking hands with people. Hands should be washed with soap and warm water for at least 20 seconds. Stay hydrated: In order to avoid dehydration, which when combined with a lack of sleep and stress compromises an immune system, employees should keep a jug of water at their desk. Vitamins: When workers start to feel under the weather, they need to consult with their health care provider about taking a supplement such as vitamin C or zinc. No touching: Employees must make a conscious effort to not touch their face during the workday. Touching eyes, noses and mouths gives germs direct access to the body and further compromises the immune system.

NSF International is an independent, not-for-profit organization that provides standards development, product certification, auditing, education and risk management for public health and the environment.

This article originally published at BusinessNewsDaily here
--------------------------------------------------------------
The air quality in Beijing, China is notoriously bad, but it was unspeakably terrible over the weekend.

How bad was the pollution? On a scale of 0-500 (500 being the worst), Beijing hit 755 on Saturday evening. That's not a typo  Beijing's air was so bad that it shattered the existing scale.

That's according to the Beijing Air Monitor (@BeijingAir), a Twitter account run by the United States Embassy in Beijing that periodically tweets air sampling data from atop the embassy, per the New York Times.

The air pollution level has since fallen to 152, which the account marks as "Unhealthy" based on Environmental Protection Agency standards.

A number on a scale is one thing, but what does it actually look like to be living in off-the-charts pollution? Bill Bishop, who writes for the Sinocism China Newsletter, tweeted this picture on Saturday:

The barely-seen object is the China World Trade Center Tower III, a 1,000-plus foot skyscraper that's one of the tallest in Beijing. Here's another picture of it Sunday, after pollution levels dropped somewhat:

Here's what it might look like on a comparatively normal day (it's the larger building on the left in the background):

What can Beijing do to help reduce its air pollution? What would you do if this were your city? Share in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
"Weekend Update" veterans Tina Fey and Amy Poehler anchored a show together over the weekend. No one can stop talking about the new albums forthcoming from Destiny's Child and Justin Timberlake. But, no, we haven't gone back in time to 2005. It just happened to be a very busy week for artists looking to make a comeback.

We premiered last week "Nuclear," the first single from Destiny's Child in seven years. Over the weekend, Justin Timberlake released the new track "Suit and Tie" (which happens to feature an appearance by Beyonce's husband Jay-Z). David Bowie outshone them both, however: his first album in more than a decade has not yet dropped, but it is already at the top of the iTunes charts in 17 countries.

The buzz around these new releases is understandable: the public loves a comeback. To celebrate the biggest musical comebacks of our age, we put together a Spotify playlist of the best musical comebacks for this week's Music Monday.

What are your favorite musical comebacks of all time? Let us know some of your picks and we'll add them to our playlist. Here's how you can share your favorite musical comebacks with us:
--------------------------------------------------------------
Bexar County, Texas, has unveiled plans for what could become the nation's first bookless public library.

The initiative is being pushed forward by County Judge Nelson W. Wolff, who told The San Antonio Express News that he was inspired to develop a bookless library after reading Walter Isaacson's authorized biography of late Apple co-founder Steve Jobs. Wolff, whose own personal library contains more than 1,000 printed and bound first editions, believes future generations will have little use for hardcover or paperback volumes.

The library system, dubbed BiblioTech, proposes to make thousands of e-books available for county residents both online and at a 5,000-square-foot physical location on the South Side of the county, according to a statement issued by Bexar County officials. Visitors would be able to check out books to read on their own e-readers or tablets, or borrow one of the library's 150 take-home e-readers.

"If you want to get an idea what it looks like, go into an Apple store," Wolff said.

Several universities have already gone bookless, including the University of Texas at San Antonio, which is also situated in Bexar County, as well as Stanford University's engineering school. The concept has thus far failed to take root in city and county-wide institutions, however. In 2002, a small library branch offering only e-books opened in Pima County, Arizona, but began stocking printed books a few years later in response to community demand. In early 2011, a highly publicized proposal to replace a budget-strapped branch of a public library in Newport Beach, Calif., was dismissed following public outcry.

Unlike the Newport Beach branch, which houses more than 30,000 books, Bexar County has no print legacy to contend with. The county currently lacks a public library system, instead paying $3.7 million per year to San Antonio city for access to its library, according to The San Antonio Express News. Given the growing affordability of e-readers as well as current book-buying trends  e-book sales surpassed hardcover sales in the U.S. for the first time in June, according to the Association of American Publishers  a bookless library makes a good deal of sense in the year 2013.

The proposal has been met with early enthusiasm from the community. Wolff hasn't yet outlined the budget for the project and acknowledges that private donations will be needed to get it off the ground.
--------------------------------------------------------------
One of the most talked-about new social platforms is finally opening up to the public.

Branch, a website that lets users create discussions around social content, launched out of beta on Monday and will now let anyone with a Twitter account sign up.

Social networks such as Twitter already let users post conversation starters online, of course. But Branch hopes to take this a step further by providing a space for these conversations to continue and grow  or as the company puts it, to provide a "home for dialogues online."

Branch users can create conversations around tweets and articles by linking to the original URL. They can also flesh out any part of an exchange in a Branch thread, turning it into its own discussion.

The startup was founded in 2011 by two college students and an Etsy designer. After several months of bootstrapping the company, initially called Roundtable, the trio joined the Obvious Corporation, an incubator launched by Twitter co-founders Evan Williams and Biz Stone.

Branch went on to raise a $2 million round of funding in early 2012, and emerged out of private beta in August.

In addition to launching publicly, Branch announced a couple new features that are common on other social networks, including giving users the ability to offer feedback on posts through likes, favorites and upvotes, and to view an activity feed of people listening in to their Branch conversations.

The service has also integrated SoundCloud and Spotify, so users can easily share music into their discussion threads.

Have you tried out Branch yet? What do you make of it? Share in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Brandon Spikes made six tackles as his New England Patriots pummeled the Houston Texans in NFL playoff action on Sunday, but his greatest contribution to the win was undoubtedly this extremely fresh celebration dance after the Pats recovered a fumble during the game's third quarter.

An official review of the play actually nullified the fumble  but really, who cares? The pop. The lock. The crisp head turn. Spikes' sweet moves stand up to any review. GIFs and video clips of the dance were an immediate viral hit with fans of football and funny on Sunday and Monday.

Spikes is actually a man-about-Internet-town, too  this isn't his first time making a splash on the web. In a Christmas Eve tweet last month, the former Florida Gator mentioned leaving "a big fat rail of coke and a shot of Jack for Santa this year," because cookies and milk don't fuel optimal present-delivery performance. In September, he used Twitter to blast the NFL's replacement referees, then told critical fans to "bit me," enjoy their blow-up doll dates and "kiss my whole ass."
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Internet has reshaped the music industry. More than ever, musicians can distribute and sell their music without the help of a record label.

Those still looking for that traditional "big break" in the form of a record contract, however, are probably having a tough time transcending the glut of unsigned music on the Internet. It seems like every Tom, Dick and Harry has been begging you to check out his band ever since MySpace became a popular music publishing site nearly a decade ago.

To address this disconnect, a brand new website called Chartburst is making an ambitious attempt to use music fans' input to sort through the rabble of undiscovered talent, for the benefit of record labels. The site launches its beta phase Monday.

SEE ALSO: Why Are People Still Buying CDs?

Chartburst co-founder Francis Gane tells Mashable that the idea has the ear of talent scouts at about 30 record labels and management companies.

"For virtually every major label there is to speak of, we have an A&R [artist and repertoire representative] on board," he says.

Indeed, Chartburst has amassed an impressive list of record labels across the nine genres the site will feature, including indie, pop, rock, dance, hiphop, world, country, folk and acoustic.

"I am excited to see what the site can offer and am looking forward to hearing the first bands when the site goes live," Cleo Russell, a representative from Warner Music Group, tells Mashable.

As the name of the site suggests, Chartburst will feature a chart-based ranking system. Artists can submit one song at a time to one of the charts, which reset every two weeks. At the end of the two-week period, the top five artists in terms of fan votes on each of the charts will have their music forwarded to genre-specific talent scouts.

Representatives from the labels will then provide feedback to the artist via email within two weeks. In theory, this connection could lead to record deals for said Chartburst artists.

"The site can't last unless people get signed," Gane says. "That's what they're paying their money for, and that's what the A&R signed up for."

After a free trial period, artists must contribute a monthly fee to submit their music to the charts. The trial period lasts two months for beta users and one month for those who sign up when the site fully launches in several months. Beta users also get a discount on the monthly fee, which is $5 regularly but $2.50 for early adopters. You must like Chartburst's Facebook page to get a code to sign up for the beta, and there are a limited number of spaces.

Chartburst is the brainchild of a father-and-son duo that has considerable music industry experience. The father, Laurie Gane, was a founding member of the Metropolitan Blues Quartet, a 1960s band that hit it big after becoming The Yardbirds.

"He was replaced by Eric Clapton when he left the band," says Francis Gane, referring to his father.

The elder Gane went on to open a recording studio in London in the 1970s. He eventually grew tired of city living and relocated to bucolic northwest Wales. He set up a new studio at his country dwelling called Bryn Derwen Recording Studio, which has hosted the likes of Bat for Lashes, Beth Orton and Starsailor.

Francis Gane graduated from the University of Manchester in 2009. He studied software engineering. Growing up, Gane spent a lot of time helping around the studio. He is also a recording artist and DJ.

At 25, this is Gane's first attempt at a startup. Though they are both 50/50 investors, the younger Gane is very much the driving force behind the project, while the edler has supplied both contacts and guidance drawn from his many years in the industry.

"He has provided advice all along the way, which has been pretty invaluable," Francis Gane says of his father's involvement with Chartburst.

Make no mistake about it, Chartburst is a bold and ambitious idea. If it works, it could help democratize the music industry. For the site to work properly, however, it will have to satisfy three different factions: artists, music fans and record labels.

Musicians should be relatively easy to cajole  they get a potentially life-changing opportunity for a small investment. The site could become an effective tool for the record labels if the charts work properly. For that to happen, however, fans will need to engage with the site.

Chartburst could foreseeably turn into an annoying popularity contest, with bands constantly begging their social media followers to cast votes. The site will not work if music fans are only going to Chartburst out of obligation to their friends' bands, without attempting to discover new music.

"We're hoping that having this filtered system will really give people a chance to find great new music," Francis Gane says. "Having a chart in which people's fans can vote for their favorite band's track is really giving the fans a vote, literally, in the future of popular music."

To facilitate fan engagement, the idea begs for a free mobile app  a sort of Pandora for unsigned artists. Gane says he hopes to produce a mobile app soon after the site launches. Being true startup, the Ganes' current financial situation will not allow for development of a mobile app quite yet.

"We're a bootstrap father-and-son operation," Gane says. "Assuming we get an investor on board or we start getting some income from the site, it will all be plowed back into the development of a nice shiny app."

Until then, the Chartburst team will need to find creative ways to keep fans interested.

For every band that has ever begged for an opportunity to be heard, every music fan who has complained about hearing the same old stuff on the radio and every talent scout who has lamented the music logjam on the Internet, you all now have a place to call home. The quality of your collective nurturance will make or break this site.
--------------------------------------------------------------
CNET senior writer Greg Sandoval has resigned after parent company CBS Corp. forced editors of the tech product review site to remove Dish Network's Hopper with Sling DVR from consideration for its "Best of CES" awards. The reason for its removal? CBS is currently suing Dish for its ability to skip commercials, a feature that's included in the Hopper set-top box.

A spokesperson for CBS Corp. acknowledged in an email to Mashable Monday morning that the DVR was made ineligible for the award "due to active litigation involving our parent company CBS Corp." Going forward, CNET staffers are not only forbidden to nominate products involved in litigation with CBS Corp. for award shows and other accolades, but also to review them, the spokesperson wrote. A similar statement was posted at the bottom of the page that hosted the livestream of the award announcements late last week, and on a (favorable) review of the Hopper box published just five days ago.

To impose such a policy on a publication like CNET  whose primary product is in-depth, unbiased reviews on a wide variety of hardware  isn't just problematic; it's also a poor business decision. It undermines the credibility of the entire CNET operation, doing little damage to Dish Network in the process. Indeed, it calls into question the integrity of all of CBS Corp.'s journalistic properties  a portfolio that includes CBS News, CBS Sports and a range of news sites.

It's for that reason that Sandoval resigned. "I no longer have confidence that CBS is committed to editorial independence," he tweeted. "We are supposed to be truth tellers."

CNET had reviewed the Hopper and Dish's other commercial-skipping DVRs before. Why did CBS suddenly feel the need to get involved late last week? According to The Verge, this is how it played out:

Executives at CBS learned that the Hopper would win "Best of Show" prior to the announcement. Before the winner was unveiled, CBS Interactive News senior-vice president and General Manager Mark Larkin informed CNET's staff that the Hopper could not take the top award. The Hopper would have to be removed from consideration, and the editorial team had to re-vote and pick a new winner from the remaining choices. Sources say that Larkin was distraught while delivering the news  at one point in tears  as he told the team that he had fought CBS executives who had made the decision. Apparently the move to strike the Hopper from the awards was passed down directly to Larkin from the office of CBS CEO, Leslie Moonves. Moonves has been one of the most outspoken opponents of the Hopper, telling investors at one point, "Hopper cannot exist... if Hopper exists, we will not be in business with (Dish)." According to sources, reviews lead Lindsey Turrentine, Larkin, and CBS Interactive president Jim Lanzone fought hard against the mandate from CBS, with numerous calls between CBS Interactive and CBS in New York.

Thus far, Sandoval is the only CNET (and, for that matter, CBS Corp.) employee to speak out about the incident. We hope he won't be the last.

Update: CNET's editor-in-chief has issued a statement on the matter. "I stand by my team and the years of work they have put into making CNET what it is," she says of her reason for not quitting on the spot. "But I wish I could have overridden the decision not to reveal that Dish had won the vote in the trailer. For that I apologize to my staff and to CNET readers.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Want to stay safe on the road? Wear a seat belt, check your blindspots, avoid texting while driving and ... listen to Coldplay.

Strange as it may sound, the British band's soothing tunes could help you avoid accidents while driving. Coldplay's "The Scientist" landed on a list of "ultimate safe driving songs" compiled by Confused.com, the creator of driving app MotorMate.

From the data, London Metropolitan University professor Simon Moore concluded that the optimum music volume for driving is 55 to 65 decibels, while the ideal tempo should mimic the human heartbeat at around 60 to 80 beats per minute.

Based on Moore's findings, Confused.com created a safe-driving playlist that includes: Norah Jones' "Come Away With Me," Jason Mraz's "I'm Yours," Radiohead's "Karma Police" and Elton John's "Tiny Dancer." For more, check out the video above.

On the other side of the spectrum, Moore cautioned against listening to music that is noisy, upbeat and increases your heart rate. For example, drivers should avoid the Black Eyed Peas' "Hey Mama," which topped Confused.com's list of top 10 dangerous driving songs.

What do you listen to while driving? Tell us in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
In a proposal almost as fanciful as the fictional 20,000 Leagues Under the Sea by Jules Verne, the Defense Advanced Research Projects Agency kicked off a research project last Friday to develop sensor systems that could be placed miles below the surface of the ocean and activated when needed by a remote command.

DARPA said it wants to develop a system that can store unmanned sensors such as waterborne or airborne cameras, decoys, network nodes, beacons and jammers, in watertight capsules that can withstand pressure at depths up to six kilometers (3.7 miles) and then be launched to the surface after years of dormancy.

Nearly half of the worlds oceans have depths deeper than 4 kilometers (2.5 miles), DARPA said, which provides a vast area for concealment of storage and this concealment also provides opportunity to surprise maritime targets from below, while its vastness provides opportunity to simultaneously operate across great distance, DARPA said.

The agency said it envisions the subsystems of its Upward Falling Payloads projects will consist of a sensor payload, a riser providing pressure tolerant encapsulation of the payload and a communication system triggering launch of the payload stored on a container with an inner, 4-7/8 inch diameter and a length of 36 inches.

In the first stage of the three-phase project expected to cost no more than $1.75 million DARPA wants researchers to concentrate on a communications system that avoids false triggers of the deep-sea systems and can operate at long distances from the submerged sensors. Proposals for this phase also should detail the design of a capsule and riser system that will work after sitting for years on the seabed, and potential sensor systems for military or humanitarian use.

The second phase of the project calls for the communication system to wake up the system on the seabed and launch it, with tests planned the Western Pacific in 2015 and 2016,though tests also could be conducted in the Atlantic or offshore Hawaii, DARPA said.

In the third phase, planned for 2017, DARPA plans tests of a completely integrated and distributed Upward Falling Payloads system at full depth in the Western Pacific.

Proposals are due March 12 and DARPA expects to make an award in June.

This article originally published at Nextgov here
--------------------------------------------------------------
If you have ever dreamed of designing a tank, now's your chance. The Pentagon's futuristic arm, the Defense Advanced Research Projects Agency (DARPA), wants your help to develop a next-generation amphibious armored vehicle.

DARPA is about to release open-source software to allow anybody to become a tank designer. What's more, there's an enticing $1 million prize on the line. All the participants will go against each other in a contest called the FANG (Fast, Adaptable, Next-Generation Ground Vehicle) challenge. Other than the considerable money prize, you'll have a chance to see your design eventually become reality  DARPA will build the chosen one.

The goal is to build "new infrastructure for systems design development from a set of requirements  an idea on a cocktail napkin  all the way to a final fielded product," Lt. Col. Nathan Wiedenman, the DARPA program manager who heads the project, told Wired.

The first part of the contest, the Mobility/Drivetrain Challenge, will kick off today at noon EST. That's when DARPA will release the open-source software, called Meta on a dedicated website set up for the challenge. DARPA is also going to allow contestants to use its virtual workshop software called VehicleFORGE to share ideas and work together.

SEE ALSO: Pentagon Sets Out to Create the Ultimate Wireless Network

After the first phase, DARPA will select the top 20 tank conceptions and their creators will go on to the next phase, to design more parts of the vehicle. The registration to the challenge is already open

Watch the video above to learn more about this innovative contest.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Paul Hawtin made headlines two years ago when his hedge fund Derwent Capital Markets became the first to use Twitter data to make investing decisions. The fund had a 1.85% return in its first month, seemingly proving the power of social media as a trading tool, but it shut down shortly afterwards as investors were hesitant to sign up.

Now Hawtin is back with a new tool called DCM Dealer that hopes to turn Twitter into a stock trading tool for the masses by providing average investors with real-time sentiment analysis for stocks based on tweets.

DCM Dealer, which launched Monday, receives a pipeline of Twitter data from social data platform DataSift and uses several algorithms to weigh the meaning of the tweet for the stock, including analyzing keywords, looking at the number of followers the user has and his or her relationship to the company in question and factoring in how old the tweet is. The end result is a Twitter sentiment score of 0 to 100, with the higher numbers being more positive.

The sentiment score isn't the only metric in the tool  there are other features like a built-in news feed for stocks and tools to manage your stock portfolio  but it's clearly the centerpiece that differentiates it from other trading platforms.

"Investors have long accepted that the markets are driven by greed and fear, but how do you quantify that? Now we have so much data, so much valuable information. You can listen to what hundreds of millions of people are saying," Hawtin told Mashable.

Several reports have come out in recent years suggesting that posts on Twitter can be an incredibly accurate gauge for a stock's performance. In late 2010, researchers at Cornell published a paper showing that Twitter sentiment had an 87.8% accuracy rate in predicting day-to-day stock performance on the Dow Jones Industrial Index. More recently, DataSift found that Twitter sentiment correlated with price changes for Facebook's stock on the day of the IPO.

In his own experience, Hawtin says he's found that Twitter tends to be more precise for gauging the performance of more popular companies like Facebook and Apple, which have more people talking about them, rather than more obscure businesses. At launch, DCM Dealer analyzes Twitter data for 250 publicly traded companies, but Hawtin says the plan is to ramp up that number to about 8,000 companies in the next two months.

DCM Dealer is free to use for those living in the U.K. and Europe, as the company instead charges traders 2.5 (or about $4) for every trade placed through the service. However, in the U.S., the tool is considered a derivatives product and users are not allowed to place trades through it. As a result, DCM Dealer is offering the Twitter sentiment analysis as a standalone feature for $19.99 a month.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Dell is in talks to take the company private, according to a Bloomberg report.

According to the report, Dell is meeting with at least two private equity firms to discuss going private. The report warns that the talks are preliminary and may come to nothing. Dell lost about a third of its value last year amid the PC slump.

Dell's stock price was up 14% on the news. Nasdaq briefly halted trading of the stock after it shot up 10%, triggering a circuit breaker.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Delta Airlines' new iPad app has a cool feature that will help pass the time on long flights: A "glass bottom jet" setting that lets you see exactly where you're flying and how fast.

The feature offers a view of the plane flying over the map, replete with the shadow that the aircraft is projecting. The map also calls out landmarks and messages from your social networks. If a Facebook friend, for instance, has checked in to somewhere you're flying over, you'll see it. The Fly Delta for the iPad app has other features as well, including destination guides, flight checkin and a "What's Next" feature to help make post-flight plans. An updated version of Delta's iPhone app also includes Passbook-based ticketing. AKQA developed the app.

In a press release explaining the app, Delta notes that Fly Delta for iPad is part of a $140 million technology investment in the company. Delta currently has more than 800 planes equipped with wi-fi.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Watch your step, man. You almost walked in (pixelated) dog poop.

In promotion for its newest animated film, Wreck-It Ralph, Disney transformed London's Brick Lane over the weekend into a pixel-themed street display called 8-Bit Lane.

The film, which is scheduled for release in the United Kingdom on Feb. 8, is about an arcade video game villain, Ralph, who rebels against his "bad guy" status to become a hero.

Reddit user robynkendal uploaded early images of the street on Saturday. The pictures show basic street elements such as pigeons, trees, taxi cabs and dogs, arranged as life-sized pixelated objects. One shows a giant poster, with Ralph's mugshot, overlooking the street with the phrase "Loading In Cinemas."

SEE ALSO: Golden Globes Recap: Best Moments and Winners

Disney tweeted out a link on Monday to a virtual tour of the whole set-up:

Reception of 8-Bit was positive across Twitter, with many fans referring to the street as a "stroll through a video game":

Wreck-It Ralph was nominated for a Golden Globe and an Academy Award, both under the category Best Animated Feature Film. It lost to Brave at the Golden Globes on Sunday; the Oscars air Feb. 24. The film was released in the U.S. on Nov. 2, 2012. It stars John C. Reilly, Jack McBrayer, Sarah Silverman and Jane Lynch.

Flip through the original Reddit gallery here.

What are the most creative marketing campaigns you've seen? Or, better yet, did you see 8-Bit Lane in person? Tell us what you think about it below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Talking and texting may have been the first things we used mobile devices for, but theyre hardly the only ones anymore. And when its just as easy to place a video call via Skype, send an instant message through WhatsApp, tweet, or check in on Facebook, summoning a phones dialer tends to be an afterthought. So could we could be approaching a time when it makes little sense to even have a voice or text plan.

To get a sense of how feasible it might be to do without one, I spent the recent holiday week in December trying to abstain from using the voice and SMS services on my Android device (or my landline phone at the office).

There are good reasons to think that a data plan may be all you need. People are indeed spending less time on wireless callsonly 1.8 minutes per call in 2011, down from 3.1 minutes in 2007and according to PricewaterhouseCoopers, the number of minute is declining overall. Juniper Research predicts that one billion people will use voice and video calling through apps on mobile devices by 2017, about the same number that use smartphones today.

Simultaneously, 4G mobile networks are expanding and getting more reliable, Wi-Fi is available in more places, and a growing number of companies are offering very good free or low-priced voice, video chat and messaging apps that run over these data networks. Even Facebook is introducing free calling to its mobile Messenger app, starting with iPhone users in Canada; some carriers are also getting involved.

Somewhat surprisingly, I could not last a whole week without voice. But it was a fascinating experiment, and I quickly realized that thanks to the new possibilities opened up by some clever apps,one-on-one data communication is gradually becoming more interesting.

As an Android device owner, I used two mobile apps to make outgoing calls to any landline or mobile device: Skype, which is owned by Microsoft, and Rebtel, from a Swedish company that claims to be the second-largest mobile voice-over-IP service, with 20 million users globally. With either app, people could see my regular phone number when I dialed, and I set up call forwarding so that I could use Skype to answer all incoming calls to my normal Verizon account.

The quality of mobile voice-over-IP is clearly improving, but it is not quite ready to replace traditional calling at a large scale. When calls went well, the voice quality actually seemed better than usual, and people on the other end often agreed. That will no doubt become a trend as carriers focus infrastructure investments on 4G networksoften at the expense of voice networksand as app providers improve their own services.

For example, a Skype spokesman told me that the company is now working to integrate Opus, a newly standardized audio compression algorithm, to provide CD-quality sound in its desktop and mobile software.

It was nice, too, that the apps replicated my usual dialing experience, integrating with all my phone contacts. And neither Skype nor Rebtel consumed unreasonable amounts of data (about 30 to 40 megabytes each in a week), even though I had them open most of the time (I did not use much video).

But some calls didnt go well at all, especially if I was trying to reach people on their phones, not through Skype or Rebtel accounts. Several calls were dropped or plagued by distracting audio delays, probably because of a poor data connection or a network that switched from 4G to 3G service.

Rebtel was generally more reliable, and it offers the option of switching to its local calling service over the cellular network in mid-call if data or Wi-Fi service begins getting patchy. But I cheated a number of times when I had to make important, quick, or time-sensitive phone calls and just used my devices dialer.

My attempt to avoid texting was more difficult, partly because I text a lot. Most messaging apps generally require the recipient to be signed up for the service as well. I barely found any of my usual contacts through the popular WhatsApp service, and only a few were on Skype. I was slightly more successful with Google Talk. Facebook Messenger came the closest to being an SMS replacement, since many of my friends were set up to receive mobile chats, and now the company doesnt even require a Facebook account to sign up.

The experiment was hypothetical, of course, and few smartphone owners seem ready to let go of their voice plans. In fact, some new smartphone contracts dont provide the option of reducing voice minutes to save money, let alone giving up voice service altogether. The two dominant wireless carriers, Verizon and AT&T, now bundle unlimited minutes and texting with tiered data service plans for smartphones (though not tablets). This allows the carriers to hang on to relatively lucrative revenue streams from lower-bandwidth voice networks for as long as possible, even while charging more for data use. It also lowers the incentive to adopt mobile talking and chatting apps.

But even without a financial incentive, the features that come with communicating over data networks are compelling. Suddenly, rather than just talking with my ear to the handset, I could open up a face-to-face video call, reach out to a Facebook contact whose number I dont have, send a friend my current location while talking, or forward a photo or message that self-destructs in a few seconds via the privacy-protecting app SnapChat.

There will be more innovations to come, whether network carriers like it or notthough they do have some power to slow the adoption of mobile VoIP services, says Susan Crawford, a former communications policy advisor to President Obama. For example, they could discourage video calling with burdensome data overage feesor block such services outright, as AT&T tried to do with Apples Facetime video-chat app last year.

Phone calls have been the same way for 100 years, says Tim Tuttle, founder of Expect Labs in San Francisco. Carriers have controlled the network, and theres been no ability to build technologies on top of it.

Tuttles startup is building a calling app, first for iPad, that will listen in on a conversation and, like Apples personal assistant Siri, recognize key terms to pull up information that is relevant to the ongoing discussion, such as movie times or a phone contact. The company also plans to sell a technology platform designed to help employees collaborate on documents while talking on their phones.

Rebtel CEO Andreas Bernstrom says he would like to see someone devise a way to make calls across different mobile voice-over-IP services so that a Rebtel user could, for example, call a Skype user. The company recently released a developer platform so that any app can use its calling technology.

I might be willing to forgo a voice plan one day. But the replacement features would have to be a little more reliable and compatible with one another, and thered have to be some savings involved. I have faith that the first two things will happen, but as Crawford told me, the dominant network carriers will find ways to make sure talk doesnt get too cheap.

This article originally published at MIT Technology Review here
--------------------------------------------------------------
The average graduate of a four-year university leaves school with $26,600 in student debt, according to the Project on Student Debt.

In an effort to fight the growing debt trend, MassMutual launched "Down With Debt" on Monday, a Facebook campaign that will relieve one lucky young adult of some loan burden  while teaching all fans some important financial planning tips.

MassMutual will award one Facebook user with $20,000 for debt relief for liking the campaign's page and writing a creative, 140-character (tweet length) explanation of how they plan to reduce their debt.

"MassMutual recognizes that new graduates and young professionals in todays world face big financial challenges," said Tara Reynolds, MassMutual's corporate vice president. "As a result, we created 'Down with Debt' to help people learn about effective ways to conquer their loans and take smart first steps in building a secure financial future."

SEE ALSO: Find Scholarships for College, Student Loans With These Websites

MassMutual plans to use the Facebook campaign as an opportunity to teach America's youth about planning for their futures, with tips such as: pay with cash, not credit, avoid buying luxury goods, and budget.

Down With Debt runs through Feb. 14.

College loan debt now surpasses auto and home loans in the U.S., with more than $1 trillion owed by graduates, according to the U.S. Department of Education and Consumer Financial Protection Bureau. The Project on Student Debt notes that 66% of U.S. higher education students now take out loans, explaining in part how the overall debt burden has gotten so substantial.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A Dublin radio station is under fire after its handling of an on-air suicide call that lasted more than one hour and trended on Twitter in Ireland.

The caller, identified as Jay, eventually came down from the bridge he was standing on when he called the radio talk show and demanded to be put on air.

While the nightly FM104 Phoneshow was being broadcast, alarmed listeners across Dublin tuned in as the caller informed host Jeremy Dixon that he was standing on the ledge of an overpass, holding a knife.

As Dixon attempted to talk the man down on air, the Irish police force, known as the Gardai, were called to the scene. So were the man's parents. Traffic was halted. According to reports, the man could be heard yelling angrily at the police to stay off the bridge.

"I'm not qualified to deal with this," stated a clearly emotional Dixon while the call aired. Though the caller eventually hung up, around midnight he was talked down from the bridge.

The incident caused the hashtag #FM104 to trend in Ireland on Twitter, and the subsequent publicity left listeners squarely divided over the incident, flooding the radio station with complaints. "#FM104 kept a caller who was threatening suicide on air for an HOUR & even went to ad break during?" read one typical reaction. "Distasteful & voyeuristic."

But others sided with the studio, arguing that airing the call was the responsible thing: "Imagine what could have happened if they said no?"

Reports on Twitter alleged that the caller had threatened suicide at this same bridge four times within the previous month, and that the radio station had not actually halted his behavior. At the center of the controversy, Dixon, who tweeted that he was "completely drained" after the night, stated the following morning that the radio had "no other way to deal with" the call but to air it:

He wanted to talk to FM104. He didnt ring anybody else, he didnt ring his family, he rang FM104.  When someone rings and they feel as desperate and that, there is only one thing to do and that is to talk to them.  Hopefully it has worked.

Still, criticism of the decision to air the call remained fierceespecially for its decision to take an ad break in the middle of the call. Irish Parliament member Finian McGrath called the station "grossly irresponsible."

Norah Bohan, cofounder of Depression Hurts Ireland, tweeted that companies need a strategy in place for crisis management of this kind.

FM104 confirmed after the incident that its staff would receive training for how to respond to suicidal behavior.

This article originally published at The Daily Dot here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Dunder Mifflin  yes, it's a real brand  is crowdsourcing its first Super Bowl ad, which will run in just one market: Scranton, Pa.

In an example of reverse product placement, NBC Universal teamed up with Staples unit Quill in 2011 to create a Dunder Mifflin line of paper products. Until then, the company was a fictional entity that existed only on the U.S. version of The Office. Apparently, the venture has been successful: In November, the company began expanding into tissues, disposable cups, notepads and markers, among other products.

Now the brand is making its first foray into TV advertising. Dunder Mifflin has teamed up with crowdsourcing platform Tongal to create the ad.

On Monday, Tongal started soliciting bids for the project. The requirement for the ad is pretty broad, though it has to prominently mention the brand, Quill.com and include a plug for The Office at the end. The producers of The Office will also be reviewing the entries.

The creator of the winning ad will receive $15,000. The ad will run on local TV in Scranton during the Super Bowl. (Scranton, of course, is the headquarters for Dunder Mifflin in the show.)

The posting comes on the same day Tongal received $15 million in funding from a private equity firm.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Diane von Furstenberg and VSP, the largest non-profit vision benefits company, are working together to give free eye care using a Pinterest campaign.

VSP will donate up to 1,000 certificates for eye exams and glasses  one per repin from its #PinToGiveAndGet board  to youth in need through the New York City Mission Society, a charity chosen by DVF. Each giveaway is valued at $385, which will total up to a $385,000 donation.

"We've been following what other brands are doing on Pinterest and we saw a lot of brands dabling in Pin It To Win It and Pin To Give," Julie Berge, VSP senior PR specialist, told Mashable. "Being a not-for-profit, and our ability to provide eye exams, we thought Pinterest would be a fun platform to experiment with, and it's a space we thought we could make a big impact."

There's something in it for you if you repin from the #PinToGiveAndGet board besides doing good. Participants will be entered to receive one pair of DVF sunglasses each week and one $500 gift card to be used on dvf.com.

The campaign, which launched last month, will run through Jan. 31.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Retro rock gets a contemporary update on Untamed Beast, the forthcoming album from Portland, Ore. quartet Sallie Ford & The Sound Outside.

Today Mashable is pleased to offer "Party Kids" as a stream and free download. The song will be accompanied by a video in the coming weeks, which the band is teasing via its Cinemagram account.

Ford and her band have been a favorite of ours since 2011, when they released their debut, Dirty Radio.

We caught up briefly with the band over email in advance of the new album.

Mashable: How did you guys get so into Cinemagram?

Ford: We have always enjoyed those GIFs online where you are limited to your use of video data. Art is something that thrives on limitations so only having 3 or 4 seconds of video is great and simple. We enjoy using it and it is exciting to see possibilities everywhere.

You've suggested that your generation needs more freedom and honesty. Is the Internet helping or hurting that cause? How so?

The ease and functionality of today's smartphones make it so apparent for you and your friends to see what you had for breakfast or what you did for the holidays or how drunk you were last Friday, which can all be quite fascinating and true. But it is sort of hard to say what is honest because you could have 90% of the Cinemagrams be of Jeff [Munger, the band's guitarist] eating fried chicken, so everyone thinks he eats a ton of fried chicken, but really it is a much smaller percentage in daily life. As time goes on people are splitting the difference between really being honest with themselves and how they would like to be perceived by their online reputation.

Are there any artists or bands you particularly admire for their social media presence?

Mac DeMarco's Facebook page is littered with great little footage from the road and online tidbits that are really endearing and fun to watch.

Give us one prediction for an upcoming trend in digital music.

We are definitely persuaded by convenience so I do see the quality in wireless transmission to stereos getting better. But we all listen to records at home and hopefully more people will believe in a pure signal path like record grooves to thick speaker wires and good speakers.

Do you have any hopes or aspirations for the band or the album in 2013?

We don't really have any expectations for the upcoming album, we just hope that people enjoy what we have made and come to the shows so they can dance and smile and make love so we can continue making art how we like to.
--------------------------------------------------------------
There's a glitch in the Matrix down south in Atlanta, Ga. How do we know this? Thanks to an occult moment that happened during a promotion at an NBA game. A fan named Kevin was given a chance to win $1,000 by hitting a half-court shot during a break in play between a Jazz-Hawks contest this Saturday. Kevin elected to go with the one-handed, over-handed, quarterback-style toss but the end result was even more incredible than any swish. As you see above, the ball lands squarely on the back of the rim without bouncing or rolling around.

SEE ALSO: The Incredible Story of a 5-Foot-5 Dunking Sensation

The ball just sits there for a few full seconds until the contest's MC hops up to pull the net and jostle it loose. Things get even weirder as the ball finally falls through the room to applause from an audience of stunned sports fans.

At the end of the video, the announcer seems to say that Kevin has indeed won his $1,000, despite the shot's rather bizarre circumstances.

Do you think it should have counted? Give us your take in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Hot on the heels of CES, where 4K TVs stole the show, comes news that the world's first 4K TV channel is now live in Europe. Eutelsat, a French-based satellite provider, has just begun broadcasting in 4K on a demo channel.

4K, also called "Ultra HD," has four times the resolution of current high-def broadcasts. The format doubles the pixel count in both directions, which can result in a much sharper picture at larger screen sizes. While 4K TVs made headlines at CES, there is currently very little native 4K content, leaving the super-sharp TVs upconverting lower-resolution video most of the time.

Eutelsat's 4K channel aims to point the way toward changing that. The provider says 4K doesn't require any modification to its systems, although if you're a customer you'll obviously need a 4K TV and the 4K-capable receiver to see the broadcasts at full resolution (Eutelsat says "some terrestrial systems" won't be able to handle them).

SEE ALSO: Feast Your Eyes on the Epic Panasonic 4K OLED TV

The channel is intended to serve as a showcase for the new format, so presumably the programming will consist of various demo reel, but no full-length 4K content. Eutelsat also hopes the rollout of 4K will accelerate plans to create a compression standard for the format.

Energized by all the 4K news coming out of CES, the race is clearly on make the format a reality. Sony has also begun answering the question surrounding 4K content, implementing plans to provide its 4K TV customers with several movies as well as a content distribution system this summer.

Bear in mind, however, the extra pixels of 4K won't make much of a difference at smaller screen sizes. If viewed at normal viewing distances, today's 1080p TVs are already so sharp that the human eye can't discern individual pixels. The benefits of 4K are clear only for larger screens.

Do you have plans to upgrade to 4K? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Television check-in app GetGlue is no longer merging with Viggle, the startup announced in a blog post Sunday.

"The two companies remain friendly and think highly of each other," GetGlue said, adding that it is "moving forward as an independent company."

In an unexpected move, Viggle acquired GetGlue for $73 million last November. The three-year-old startup, which describes itself as a "loyalty program for television," paid $25 million in cash and 48.3 million shares of stock for its competitor.

Commentators expressed surprise at the acquisition, as Viggle is a much newer and lesser-known brand. GetGlue, which launched in 2007, boasts 3.2 million registered users, while Viggle has 1.2 million.

One reason for the failed merger may be Viggle's precarious financial situation. The company reported a loss of $96.5 million on revenues of $1.7 million in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2012, according to a 10-K filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission. At the time of the acquisition, Viggle president and COO Greg Consiglio told Mashable that the deal would only close if it successfully raised $60 million in debt financing.

SEE ALSO: TV Shows and Movies With the Most-Engaged Fans on GetGlue

GetGlue and Viggle did not immediately respond to requests for comment.

The two companies are considered competitors in the "second-screen space," as both offer awards for check-ins and other types of engagement with television programs.

What are your thoughts on this failed merger? Share in the comments below.

UPDATE: Viggle CEO Robert F.X. Sillerman announced Monday that the termination of the merger was "cordial."



"During the time we started talking to GetGlue about an acquisition and since the merger agreement was signed in November, we have seen impressive growth in our business," Sillerman said in a statement.



GetGlue CEO Alex Iskold told Mashable that his company initiated the merger's cancellation, but added that he could not share any further details.

Correction, 1/14/13 9:11 P.M.

This article has been edited to reflect the following correction: GetGlue has 3.2 million registered users, while Viggle has 1.2 million registered users. A previous version of this article switched the two figures.
--------------------------------------------------------------
With its extensive library of promo photos from major news events and exotic locations around the world, Getty Images could one day become a force on social media. That day may, in fact, come sooner than later.

The company on Monday launched something called "The Feed by Getty Images," which essentially piggybacks off Twitter's API to identify trending topics on social media then push out Getty photos that match those conversations. For major news, sports and entertainment in particular, this could launch a much more powerful presence for and greater awareness of Getty on social media.

Getty produces more than 10,000 images per day and many of the best ones will find their way to Getty's various Facebook pages, the @FeedMeGetty Twitter handle and a gateway page at thefeed.gettyimages.com. On Twitter for example, the company will post images of trending topics each hour, then increase that output when major news breaks or big events take place. On The Feed website, meanwhile, users will also be able to look at photos of trending topics sorted by region. 

 

Yvonne Chien, the company's senior vice president of marketing, says the move's goals are twofold  to drive more Getty subscriptions and image purchases, as well as elevate the brand's profile and visibility with normal Internet surfers simply hungry for visual content to look at.

"There is undoubtedly a desire from both business customers and consumers alike to see the newest and most exciting images," Chen told Mashable in an email. "The Feed was built to open up ways for Getty Images content to be showcased through todays top social media networks, enable real-time engagement and create new experiences. We looked to see whether other visual content providers had this type of capability, automatically populating their content into social media using trending algorithms, and did not see any similar brands doing this anywhere else."

Chen says the project has been in the works for four months, and that it will likely soon expand to include video and additional social platforms.

Do you think this is a cool idea, or are there already enough photos on the social web? Give us your take in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The annual gathering booze hounds and sequins  also known as the Golden Globes  had Hollywood's attention Sunday night. And if you dozed off faster than Taylor Swift can say "Why, hello there, Bradley Cooper," we have you covered.

No, we don't have a bootleg copy of the award show, but we do have a collection of GIFs (courtesy of Tumblr) that sum up the night quite nicely.

What moments did we miss? Share 'em in the comments.

Kristen Wiig and Will Ferrell couldn't believe Bill Clinton showed up

Tommy Lee Jones is not impressed by Golden Globe shenanigans

How you like them apples, Will Arnett?

Aziz Ansari had a little too much fun with the cast of Downton Abbey

Quentin Tarantino couldn't believe the stuff going down on stage

The Les Mis cast is very close
--------------------------------------------------------------
Several big moments brought attendees at the Golden Globes to their feet Sunday night.

Former U.S. President Bill Clinton strolled on stage for a surprise appearance  making jaws drop  to introduce the montage for presidential flick, Lincoln.

"Wow, what an exciting special guest ... That was Hillary Clinton's husband," co-host Amy Poehler, alongside Tina Fey, jokingly said after Clinton's appearance.

Ben Affleck, who was left off the Best Director nominees list for the Oscars, took home top honors for Best Director. He and his Argo comrades also won for Best Drama.

Meanwhile, some celebrities referenced viral web entities. Hollywood Foreign Press Association President Aida Takla-O'Reilly channeled her inner Carly Rae Jepsen by saying, "Allow me to say three little words to Bradley Cooper: Call me maybe?" And during Jodie Foster's head-scratching speech for her Lifetime Achievement Award, the actress quipped, "I'm not Honey Boo Boo Child."

On Twitter, people sent 3.6 million tweets during the red carpet and broadcast, pushing the total in 24 hours to 4.2 million. These were the most-tweeted moments: 1) Jennifer Lawrence wins Best Actress (comedy or musical) for Silver Linings Playbook with 19,886 tweets per minute; 2) Anne Hathaway wins Best Supporting Actress (comedy or musical) for Les Miserables with 19,695 TPM; and 3) Clinton introduces Lincoln with 18,290 TPM.

Golden Globe GIFs! SEE ALSO: Listen to Winners Adele and 'Life of Pi'

The televised 70th Golden Globe Awards experienced several technical glitches, too. Salma Hayek and Paul Rudd fell victim to a teleprompter malfunction, preventing them from properly introducing the Best TV Drama Series nominees, while the sound cut out multiple times during Foster's speech.

And here are the people these winners beat out:
--------------------------------------------------------------
Google launched on Monday its sixth annual Google Doodle competition, encouraging young students to design their own Google logo for the search engine giant's homepage.

Starting today, the program  Doodle 4 Google  is calling for submissions from students in Kindergarten through grade 12. Google said a panel of celebrity judges and a public vote will be factored into the decision. The top winner will take home a $30,000 scholarship, while the student's school will receive a $50,000 technology grant.

This year's theme is "my best day ever," which aims to give kids a chance to "explore themes that could be imaginary, exploratory or even sentimental, past, present or future," Google said.

SEE ALSO: The 10 Most Popular Google Doodles of 2012

The winning doodle from each of the 50 U.S. states will go on display at the American Museum of Natural History in New York City from May 22 to July 14.

Last year, more than 114,000 doodles were submitted for the theme of "If I could travel in time, I'd visit..." A drawing from Wisconsin-based Dylan Hoffman, age 7, that portrayed a pirate looking for treasure on an island came in first place.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Imagine a place where computer nerds are revered like jocks and rockstars. That was San Francisco this past weekend.

A carefully selected group of 100 college students flocked to the Bay Area to powwow with veterans of the famed tech startup scene. The students came for an all-expense paid weekend to compete in the inaugural run of the "University Hacker Olympics."

One of the event's organizers, Ahmed Siddiqui, called it the "largest university hackathon ever held."

"Our whole goal is to get the best technical minds to the Bay Area and connect them with awesome startups and companies," Siddiqui told Mashable.

Monica Poletti, a 19-year-old sophomore at North Carolina State, was a member of the winning team. Working with mentors from Pinterest, Poletti and five other students  from Brown, Tufts and Ohio State  designed a visually appealing and functional collaborative workspace.

The tool, called "Project Yarn," is intended to help plan trips, parties and other events. Poletti summed up the project as a cross between Google Docs and a virtual bulletin board. It allows multiple users to work on the board in real time.

"I don't know if we expected it to win, but we all really liked what it could do," Poletti told Mashable. "I learned so much out here in just two days; it was incredible."

Despite the known gender divide in the tech world, the six members of Poletti's team were divided equally by gender. According to the U.S. Department of Commerce, women comprised less than a quarter of the country's STEM (science, technology, engineering and mathematics) workforce in 2009.

Poletti said this group had the highest ratio of females to males of any collaborative programming project she has ever worked on.

SEE ALSO: STEM Careers: The Need to Get More Women Involved From the Start

Below is a screenshot of a Project Yarn story board, on which users planned a cross-country motocycle trip.

SignalFire, an organization based in San Francisco, hosted the competition, which was sponsored by tech companies large and small, from Google to Nature Box and many more. Prior to the event, companies brainstormed ideas. When the students arrived, they divided into teams. The companies then pitched their ideas to the student teams who selected which ones they wanted to pursue.

"It's like doing recruiting without resumes," Siddiqui said. "There's a huge problem of getting developers out here in the valley."

The students went through a rigorous screening process to win the chance to compete. More than 500 students from about 30 colleges and universities signed up for online coding challenges during November.

Drawing from the top performers in the coding challenge, SignalFire reps selected a final pool of 100 hacker olympiads, based on their previous experience and LinkedIn profiles.

After about 24 hours of programming by the students and their mentors, a panel of judges selected the top three groups, which then attended a VIP dinner, accompanied by a group of tech CEOs. There, the contest winner was announced. In addition to the networking opportunity, the top three teams also won Amazon Web Services credit packages.

SEE ALSO: College Programmers Beat Tech Elite in Hacking Contest

Raj Mukherjee, vice president and general manager of products for GoDaddy, participated in the competition as a judge. He called Project Yarn a "a cool application with an awesome front end."

"I was frankly blown over by the quality of the students that participated in the hackathon," Mukherjee told Mashable.

All parties  organizers, sponsors and students  seemed to agree that the University Hacker Olympics was a success. On behalf of SignalFire, Siddiqui said the company hopes to make this a bi-annual tradition, including even more colleges and universities in the future.

Stay tuned, hackers. Next time, it could be you who brings home the gold.

Images courtesy of Flickr, Scorpions and Centaurs, and Monica Poletti/Project Yarn
--------------------------------------------------------------
Which celebrity fashions from Sunday night's 70th Golden Globe Awards sent your fingers running to Facebook to publicly react via status updates?

We've already revealed the top-tweeted moments from the ceremony. Now, we've got Facebook data from the social network's "Red Carpet Talk Meter" partnership with InStyle.

SEE ALSO: Golden Globes Recap: Best Moments, Top-Tweeted Topics & Winners

The meter anonymously aggregated Facebook posts and comments to rank the hottest fashions and trends. The most talkative states were New Jersey, Texas and Iowa.

Below, check out the rankings  and commentary from InStyle magazine.



 Photos via Paul Drinkwater/NBCUniversal via Getty Images and Jason Merritt/Getty Images

Tina Fey received twice as many outfit-related mentions as Amy Poehler, who didn't wear a dress on the red carpet.

Which Golden Globes fashion statements did you like most? Let us know below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Looking to start your dream job in 2013? Our new Dream Job series will give you an upper hand. We're talking to recruiters at top tech companies like Spotify and Kickstarter to get the behind-the-scenes knowledge about what it takes to get a gig.

Don't know much about Birchbox? The company launched in 2010 and has received $11.9 million in funding to date. The discovery commerce platform has 140 employees (100 in New York, the rest in London, Paris and Barcelona) who surprise and delight more than 300,000 subscribers every month with a box full of high-end samples that you can buy on the Birchbox website. (And no, this startup's not just for ladies  its bright new digs are indicative of the "de-pinking" of Birchbox. Haven't you see Birchbox Man?)

This week, we spoke with Melissa Enbar, director of recruiting at Birchbox. Read on to find out how to score a gig.

The Openings: "We have tons of jobs open," says Enbar. Indeed, the company  which just moved into a new space  has many open desks waiting for you to fill them, both for full-time employees and interns. A small sample of what's available at Birchbox:

The team that's "always growing" and set to grow at a rapid pace in coming months is the brand partnerships team, which collaborates with Birchbox's brand partners to select the products that will be sampled and sold. Since "editorial is a huge component of our business," that team is always looking for solid writers, too.

Then, of course, there's the team that builds and maintains the site and shop. "We're often categorized as a beauty company, but really, we're changing ecommerce, we're doing some really interesting things around personalization and box allocation  we're really tech-enabled," says Enbar. The tech team is headed up by CTO Liz Crawford (yes, a woman!), and that team is 38% female.

Birchboxers describe the company as a "discovery commerce company," so there's a lot of data being used to solve interesting problems. "We're a very numbers-driven business," explains Enbar. Consequently, there are analyst positions in multiple departments, including ecommerce and brand marketing.

The operations and customer service team is the group that interfaces with Birchbox customers, but each person on the team also has a side project in another area of the company, says Enbar. "Theyre our tie to our customers, and the information they know is vital," explains Enbar, adding that these teammates "work on projects with other teams to keep those teams connected to our customers." Operations member Loren works on the Birchbloggers program, communicating with bloggers about new developments at Birchbox, while a few other members of the Operations team gather data, insights and customer feedback for monthly presentations to the Beauty Partnerships to help determine what products should be sent to subscribers. These side projects help to make the brand more cohesive and ensure that Birchbox is giving its subscribers what they want.

U.S. jobs can be found here, and international positions are here.

The Application Process: While the application process varies based on the position and level, the first step is usually a phone interview. Then there are in-person interviews, during which you should expect to meet with more than just your future department. "Because we have a collaborative work environment, we also do cross-team interviews. In almost every interview process candidates meet someone from another team who they will work closely with on the job," says Enbar. "That's really important to us  one of our values is 'one team,' so everything we do is collaborative." There are usually two or three rounds of interviews, and there's typically a department-specific assessment at some point during the process. For example, the tech team's main aim is to assess a candidates fundamental skills, not their knowledge of any specific technology or framework. Software engineer applicants typically are asked to write code for algorithmic problems on a white board, tackle an object-oriented design problem, discuss a software architecture problem in detail, and answer some relational database questions. "These questions allow us to understand how candidates think and understand their strengths," says Enbar. The social media team, on the other hand, asks candidates to evaluate what Birchbox is already doing and develop ideas for how to improve the strategy.

During the final round of interviews, everyone meets with either Katia or Hayley  "It's really important to us that people coming onboard understand the mission, the vision, who we are as a company, where we're headed," says Enbar.

The Ideal Candidate: When sifting through resumes, Enbar says a few things jump out at her. She's intrigued by people who've done interesting things and have been leaders in previous positions, people with interesting extracurriculars, and people who are passionate about the business model. If you haven't worked in beauty, you need not worry  that experience is a nice-to-have, but not a must (if it is a must, it'll say so in the job description). The brand has grown to have Birchbox Man and shipped a limited-edition home box, so "as we grow, lifestyle is a big part of the equation," says Kelly Herman, senior PR manager. "The big picture understanding of who we are, discovery retail and what that means  that's important to us," says Enbar.

When reviewing applications in the Resumator (the application platform), Enbar says the recruiting team really looks at the person as a whole  their personality, their skills, how much research they've done on Birchbox. But the company also has values that define Birchbox, so applicants are measured against those values.

SEE ALSO: Beauty Delivered: How Birchbox Is Disrupting the Cosmetics Industry

Perks of the Job & Company Culture: "In general, we're a fun, energetic environment," says Enbar. There are weekday workouts (a whole wall is devoted to it), weekly company meetings, Thursday breakfasts, hot lunches and recreational activities, like the Tough Mudder. Plus, everyone gets a free subscription to Birchbox, a discount on all products and a chunk of money to spend in the Birchbox shop. On day one, you get a Birchbox hoodie, and after one year with the company, you get a fresh pair of custom sneaks. The company offers medical, dental and vision, and Birchbox offers options to be covered 100%.

As a fun, young startup Birchbox does mixers with other startups in the area, like Tumblr, Venmo and Lot18. The company believes in celebrating its wins, so there are a lot of celebrations in the office (and for big occasions, there's usually some sort of swag).

"One of the things that differentiates us is that people come here because they love the business, they love the changes we're making, and they want to work on something that people love," says Enbar. "We care about our customers, and we listen to them."

And Birchbox leadership listens to the team, too. Day to day, you'll see founders Katia and Hayley in cubes with everyone else, accessible and happy to chat with you about the company.

The best part about working here is:

When I started working here, I was surprised by...
--------------------------------------------------------------
Our TV sets are getting bigger and bigger and with ever greater resolutions. But what if the screen isn't enough anymore though? That's the idea behind Microsoft's latest idea, a technology that turns the room around your TV into an extension of it.

IllumiRoom uses a Kinect sensor and a projector "to blur the lines between on-screen content and the environment we live in allowing us to combine our virtual and physical worlds," as Microsoft puts it the project's official site.

Basically, the Kinect maps its surrounding environment, noticing the shape and distance of furniture and shelves, and then tweaks the images that are going to be projected so that they match the room.

SEE ALSO: Hands On With the Microsoft Surface Pro

Microsoft unveiled IllumiRoom at the 2013 Consumer Electronics Show of Las Vegas last week, but there's no word on the actual release, since the project is still just a prototype. According to Microsoft, we'll know more about it later this year at at the Conference on Human-Interface Computing in Paris.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Instagram underwent a healthy chunk of change in 2012, what with the Facebook acquisition, the Twitter feud, a major app overhaul and a robust web presence. But as always, we're never satisfied.

SEE ALSO: The Beginner's Guide to Instagram

The social platform could stand to make a few more renovations. And we're here to point them out  within reason. We avoided major changes that would compromise Instagram's unique and successful vision, which revolves around mobile-exclusive tools and barriers to entry that discourage copyright violations.

That being said, these changes would make the user experience a whole lot more pleasant. If given the chance, what would you change about Instagram? Share your suggestions and gripes in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Who says tech can't be fashionable? We spotted many creative and beautiful tech accessories in the wild last week at the 2013 International CES conference in Las Vegas  from glitzy iPhone cases to sleek laptop bags and even a designer Rebecca Minkoff-branded clutch purse that doubles as a speaker.

SEE ALSO: iPhone Cases Framed as Beautiful, Collectible Art

Here's a look at some of the top fashion-forward accessories that came out of tech's biggest show. Which ones are catching your eye? Let us know in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The case you pick for your iPhone or iPad says as much about your personality as the clothes you wear. Instead of standard rubber cases and hum-drum colors, there's a whole vibrant world of fun and creative ways to dress up your mobile device.

SEE ALSO: Lego-Inspired iPhone 5 Cases Will Make You Geek Out

We saw so many funky and off-the-wall cases at the 2013 International CES conference in Las Vegas last week, from playful cases with mazes and games to Lego-inspired covers and funky spiders.

Here's a look at the many ways you can add a little quirk to your smartphone style. Check out the gallery above, and let us know which is your favorite in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Mashable's mission is to inform the connected generation; but we can help you put that knowledge to work, too.

Since 2005, Mashable has been committed to bringing the top digital, social and tech news and resources to our readers. Over time, we've built a readership of 20 million people who are well versed in digital trends, social media and all the hottest technologies. So when the world's best companies are looking to fill open positions, they post them on the Mashable Job Board. New jobs are added every day, and many positions are exclusive  employers know that if they're going to find the right person for the job, they're going to find them reading Mashable.

Below, we've rounded up five recently posted jobs; check the Mashable Job Board daily for more open positions, and be sure to read our Job Search Series for tips on how to land your dream job.

"Yelp's Search & Data Mining, Ads, and Spam Prevention teams run services that respond to hundreds of requests every second. Each and every query must be lightning fast, 24/7/365. This means our infrastructure needs to be both speedy and reliable. It also needs to make efficient use of resources and be easy to use for relevance/machine learning developers to modify and improve."

"Your core responsibility will be helping to define and build that long-term vision of a fast, reliable, efficient, and ductile search infrastructure. So get your infra mojo on and join us!"

"The Harlem Globetrotters are the best-loved name in family sports entertainment with broad appeal, a rich heritage and highly engaged fan base. We are a commercially successful, privately-held business. Digital marketing is critical to our success. A core member of the brand marketing team, our freelance part-time marketing manager will help The Globetrotters achieve our digital traffic and social engagement goals. It reports directly to the Director, Internet Marketing. The group also comprises EVP Brand Marketing and Manager, Digital Marketing."

"Do you have a passion for designing and delivering great products that consumers love? Would you like to do so at one of the most respected brands in the world, in an environment where the only accountability is to that consumer, and not to an advertising partner?"

"If you are a highly experienced, customer-driven digital product manager who is ready to make a very large impact, read on. Consumer Reports is in the midst of a significant investment in its digital business and were looking for people who have deep experience shipping real product for major consumer-focused brands to take our digital offerings not just to a new level, but into entirely new spaces."

"Onion Inc. is an American multimedia news organization. It features satirical articles and reporting on international, national, and local news as well as an entertainment newspaper and website known as A.V. Club."

"The Onion's articles comment on current events, both real and imagined. It parodies traditional newspaper and media features, such as editorials, man-on-the-street interviews, and stock quotes, as well as traditional newspaper layout and AP-style editorial voice. Much of its humor depends on presenting everyday events as newsworthy items, and by playing on commonly used phrases, as in the headline, "Drugs Win Drug War."

"The Onion is looking for a highly organized managerial leader in Chicago. We need someone who's optimistic, flexible and cool under pressure to manage our fast-paced operation, juggle multiple projects across diverse platforms (video, print, online, social media, and stage), oversee staff (both full-time and freelance), develop product schedules, and harness the immense potential of our highly creative team. This person will work closely with our Editor to keep things running smoothly under intense deadlines while maintaining our company's singular creative vision."

"Maker Studios is a next-generation media company and is home to many of online videos top digital stars and content including the all-time most-subscribed personality Ray William Johnson, KassemG, The Game Station, Nice Peters Epic Rap Battles of History, the Shaytards and celebrity actress/comedian Lisa Nova, among others. Maker has over one billion views online per month with over 800 channels with 80 million subscribers, and more than 400 original videos produced per month. Maker Studios is the only network to offer partners development, production, promotion, distribution, sales, and marketing services. Maker Studios is headquartered in Los Angeles, Calif. To learn more, visit www.makerstudios.com and follow us on Twitter and Facebook."

"The Social Media Community Manager should have a passion for the internet and social media, and be curious about new trends and fan interaction. Candidates MUST have previous experience in social media and working with large talent social accounts."

Check out these and other jobs on Mashable's Job Board. New positions are added every day, ranging from entry-level to C-suite positions.
--------------------------------------------------------------
After teasing a musical comeback several days ago, singer Justin Timberlake unleashed a new song featuring Jay-Z on Sunday night.

"Suit and Tie," which is now available on iTunes, marks Timberlake's first song as a lead artist since 2006's FutureSex/LoveSounds. He was featured on Madonna's "4 Minutes" in 2008.

"Suit and Tie" is the lead single from The 20/20 Experience, an album title he also revealed Sunday in an open letter to fans (see below). He says the album will come out this year.

SEE ALSO: Listen to the World Premiere of Destiny's Child's 'Nuclear'

Timberlake produced his latest track with Timbaland and J-ROC. They also co-wrote the song with Jay-Z and James Flauntleroy.

Timberlake tweeted to announce "Suit and Tie." The announcement includes a link that leads his 15.4 million followers to Countdown.JustinTimberlake.com, a website he teased Jan. 10.

Listen to the new song here or in the link within the tweet.

The website now includes this open letter from Timberlake to his fans:

I hope this gets to you the right way. It's the only way I know to do it. Some people may criticize me for the last 3 days. But it was fun, right?? Right?!?! Besides, I'd rather speak directly to all of you. And, who can knock me for having a little bit of fun with it? Well... No more teasing. Although, it was A LOT of fun. (Did I mention that I'm having fun with this?? Ha!) This year is an exciting one for me. As you probably have heard through the "grapevine," I'm gearing up for a big 2013. Back in June of last year, I quietly started working on what is now, my next journey with that thing I love called MUSIC. The inspiration for this really came out of the blue and to be honest, I didn't expect anything out of it. I just went into the studio and started playing around with some sounds and songs. It was probably the best time I've had in my career... Just creating with no rules and/or end goal in mind and really enjoying the process. What I came up with is something I couldn't be more excited about! It is full of inspiration that I grew up listening to and some newfound muses that I've discovered along the way. I'm calling it "The 20/20 Experience," and it's coming out this year. I hope you enjoy listening to it as much as I enjoyed making it. That's all I'm giving you for now... I know, I know! Again, with the teasing!!! Get ready. This is going to be fun (well, at least it is for me).
--------------------------------------------------------------
Plenty of small children have a favorite toy bulldozer in their collection  but how many of them could handle the real deal?

YouTube user Su Jiang gifted the Internet with this video, showing a young child who can't be more than six years old at the helm of a full-size bulldozer. The little tyke commands the construction vehicle with ease, expertly navigating and making use of the blade to move dirt.

SEE ALSO: Puppy Tackles the Stairs in Cutest Video You'll See Today

The video got viral traction after it was posted to Reddit over the weekend. Would you trust a small child behind the controls of a bulldozer? Share in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Over the past several months, the long and winding road toward what most assume will be Lance Armstrong's eventual admittance of using performance enhancing drugs (PEDs) to win the Tour de France a record number of times has played out largely online.

Critics and supporters have, of course, reacted to the controversy on Twitter and other social networks with statements of vitriolic condemnation and steadfast support. But Armstrong himself has also used social media to send cryptic, even boastful, messages to followers. And perhaps the most damning piece of the case against Armstrong was posted online in October.

But the drawn out repetitions of accusation and denial will finally reach an end this week with Armstrong admitting PED use in an interview with Oprah Winfrey scheduled to air on Thursday, according to the Associated Press. The interview was taped on Monday but the AP cites "a person familiar with the situation" as confirming Armstrong's forthcoming confession.

Armstrong has long been suspected by media, competing cyclists and other fans of relying on PEDs to win a record seven Tour de France titles from 1999 through 2005. He has steadfastly denied all accusations over the years, but Internet users reacted in shock last August when he posted an online statement staying he would end his years-long contention of doping charges by the U.S. Anti-Doping Agency (USADA) but admit no wrongdoing.

"I am finished with this nonsense," Armstrong's statement defiantly declared.

The next day he tweeted that donations to his Livestrong Foundation had soared to a 25-fold increase since his announcement. Armstrong founded Livestrong in 1997 after battling testicular cancer to help others struggling with cancer. Livestrong's record of good work and strong public image further clouded the debate over the significance of Armstrong's alleged PED use.

Some six weeks later, however, Armstrong and his supporters were hit with another bombshell when former Tour de France teammate George Hincapie used a tweet and post to his official website to admit for the first time that he took performance enhancing drugs and named names of other dopers for investigators. The USADA then released hundreds of pages of testimony from 11 of Armstrong's former riding mates, detailing PED use by the team.

Later in October, Armstrong finally acknowledged the mounting evidence and momentum against him in a fitting move for the social media age: by removing his claim to seven Tour de France titles from his Twitter bio.

He struck a more defiant tone in November, however, by posting a photo of himself reclining while surrounded by his seven Tour-winning jerseys accompanied by the expertly trolling caption, "Back in Austin and just layin' around..."

That image went viral with sports fans online, gaining more than 300,000 views on the multimedia-sharing network Mobli  in which, it just so happens, he's an investor.

Assuming Armstrong cops to doping this week, does that make him a disgrace  or do his achievements still outweigh everything else? Give us your take in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A note to parents: parental control software doesn't protect your daughters from engaging in risky online behavior as much as "quality parenting," and monitoring her online activities yourself.

Researchers from the University of Cincinnati released a report on Monday in Pediatrics about the online behaviors of teenage girls and factors that increased their risk of engaging in potentially dangerous, or at least inappropriate behavior.

The study followed the online behavior of 251 teenage girls, ages 14 to 17, for 12-16 months in 2008 when the hot social network was MySpace. Their offline behavior was also monitored, in addition to how each teen was parented.

Researchers wanted to see if girls who were maltreated (neglected, or physically or sexually abused) were more likely to engage in dangerous behaviors. Of the 251 girls in the study, 130 experienced "substantiated maltreatment" and 121 of whom were demographically matched comparison girls who reported no maltreatment. However, all subjects were considered "high risk."

Girls who were maltreated were more likely to have exposure to sexual content online, create "high-risk social networking profiles," and receive online sexual solicitations. And 30% of the teens said they've met a stranger in person after chatting online.

"Maltreatment, adolescent behavioral problems, and low cognitive ability were uniquely associated with high-risk Internet behaviors," the study notes.

But girls whose parents monitored their behavior and encouraged open communication reduced the association between a teen's risk factors and risky online behaviors.

The study suggests pediatric practitioners advise parents on media literacy and encourage greater involvement in their kids' social media lives.

"Internet safety and sex education programs should highlight the implications for provocative self-presentations, offer skills for handling sexual solicitations," the study concludes.

What do you do as a parent to keep your kids safe online? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Microsoft will issue a critical security patch for Internet Explorer today, Jan. 14, the company has announced.

The patch fixes an issue with a severity rating of "Critical", and affects Internet Explorer versions 6-8 but not the latest two versions, 9 and 10. The vulnerability allows a malicious hacker to remotely execute code on the victim's machine.

Microsoft has already released a quick, downloadable fix for the issue, but now it's coming up with a full security update for the affected browsers.

"We recommend that you install this update as soon as it is available. This update for Internet Explorer 6-8 will be made available through Windows Update and our other standard distribution channels. If you have automatic updates enabled on your PC, you wont need to take any action. If you applied the Fix it released in Security Advisory 2794220, you wont need to uninstall it before applying the security update," Microsoft notes in an advance notice.

The security update should become available Jan. 13 at 1PM PT.

Thumbnail image composite by Mashable. Original photos via iStockphoto, alengo, and malerapaso
--------------------------------------------------------------
Before you shake Rover out of his afternoon snooze, and don him in a denim vest and bedazzled beret, take a moment to consider his feelings. Maybe your dog doesn't want to parade around town like a monkey in a beauty pageant.

Still not convinced? Take a stroll through the gallery above to see 12 Etsy doggy clothing models that look pawsitively embarrassed by their duds.

SEE ALSO: Woof! These 15 Slush Puppies Are Crazy About Snow

Does your dog love dressing up in fancy duds? Share an image of your furry friend in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
New licensing deals Netflix has inked with Turner Broadcasting and Warner Bros. will bring past seasons of Carton Network and Adult Swim shows to Netflix starting March 30.

The entertainment entities on Monday announced the U.S. programming agreements, which also include Warner Bros. Animation's Green Lantern. TNT's Dallas will arrive in 2014.

Netflix's Cartoon Network selection will include Adventure Time, Ben 10 (pictured), Regular Show and Johnny Bravo. The Adult Swim offering will include Robot Chicken, Aqua Teen Hunger Force, The Boondocks and Childrens Hospital.

SEE ALSO: Redbox Instant Opens Invites, Prepares for Netflix Face-Off

The news comes just one week after Netflix announced it eventually would start streaming eight Warner Bros. shows and possibly more in the future. The slate includes newer shows (Revolution, The Following, Longmire, Political Animals and 666 Park Avenue) and older ones (Chuck, Fringe and The West Wing).

It appears Time Warner, the parent company of Turner Broadcasting and Warner Bros., is loosening its once tight grip on the content it previously didn't want streaming on subscription services like Netflix.

"The industry has evolved so that TV Everywhere and subscription video on-demand services can co-exist with the appropriate windowing strategy, while allowing for more content flexibility to meet consumer demand in the changing digital landscape," Deborah Bradley, senior vice president of program acquisitions for Turner Broadcasting, said in a statement.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Commuters in subway stations around the globe were turned into peeping Toms on Sunday, as many unwittingly faced their fellow travelers' underclothes.

Straphangers got an eyeful during the 12th annual No Pants Subway Ride, a prank started in 2002 by Improv Everywhere. The New York City-based group calls themselves a "prank collective that causes scenes of chaos and joy in public places." And what could possibly bring more joy than strangers in their underwear?

Thousands participated in more than 25 countries, including China, Australia and Mexico. In Seattle, pranksters braved 37-degree weather sans pants.

There are only two requirements: Take 'em off and keep a straight face. No thongs or other offensive underwear are allowed, but everything else is fair game.

Participants are organized into groups and assigned a specific train car, but can't speak to one another. The first No Pants Subway Ride had just seven men and a pants peddler who later came through the car with a duffle bag. This year, NYC had more than 4,000 bare-bottomed pranksters.

Check out this year's video and take a peek at our gallery, above, of pants-less people around the world.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The National Rifle Association released on Monday a first-person shooter for the iPhone and iPad  one month to the day after a tragic shooting at Sandy Hook Elementary School in Newtown, Conn., left 26 dead.

The game, "NRA: Practice Range," has two modes. The first, a "Safety, Training and Education" section, has "2nd Amendment newsfeeds, gun law information centers and educational materials that you can access anywhere, anytime," according to the game's iTunes description. The second is "Target Practice," which is designed to instill "safe and responsible ownership through fun challenges and realistic simulations."

Target Practice has nine firearms (including an unlockable AK-47 and an MK-11 sniper rifle) and three shooting ranges.

Between shooting sessions, players are presented with various gun safety tips, including "always keep the gun pointed in a safe direction."

Practice Range's release comes with a degree of irony: NRA chief Wayne LaPierre blasted violent video games in the organization's post-Sandy Hook press conference. During that conference, LaPierre accused "vicious violent video games, with names like Bulletstorm, Grand Theft Auto, Mortal Kombat, and Splatterhouse" of contributing to a violent society.

SEE ALSO: Joe Biden Asked Not to Investigate Violent Video Games

Admittedly, Practice Range is one of the least violent iOS games involving guns in the App Store: Players shoot either clay disks or targets that almost, but not quite, look like human beings.

The game was developed by MEDL Mobile, makers of other titles including "Shotgun Free," which invites players to "unleash a high-caliber hell storm." NRA: Practice Range is rated appropriate for players ages four and older.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Looking for an easy way to watch President Barack Obama's ceremonial swearing-in on Jan. 21? How about your smartphone?

All you have to do is download the official Inaugural 2013 app, released Monday morning for iPhone and Android devices. Among its features is a livestream that will go live on Jan. 21 with footage of the ceremony.

Users can also elect to sign up for mobile notifications of Inauguration news so they don't miss out on any of the live-streamed content.

The app, which is easy to use and works smoothly on an iPhone 5 we used for testing purposes, has a handful of other features as well. Those who want to participate in the Inaugural Committee's National Day of Service on Jan. 19 can use the app to find volunteer events in their neighborhood. If you're among those headed to Washington, D.C. for the inauguration or related events, the app has a nifty map feature, clearly showing the National Mall and demarcating off-limits areas.

The app, produced by AT&T, is available for free download in the App Store and Google Play. Are you planning on using it to watch Obama's ceremonial swearing-in? Share in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Slow Mo Guys Gav and Dan get into the type of trouble that can only happened when paint cans are acquainted with fireworks. That's right  fireworks, paint and a slow-mo camera to capture all the colorful explosions.

SEE ALSO: Watch Water Balloons Smash Into a Shirtless Dude in Slow Mo

If Jackson Pollack had had a thing for kabooms, this might have been his painting method.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Science fiction movies are among the hardest and most expensive films to make in Hollywood. You need a big budget and a lot of people working on it. But not if you're Kaleb Lechowski. The 22-year-old German who studies digital film design made his own animated Hollywood-style sci-fi short  and now he's headed to Hollywood.

Lechowski's film, titled R'ha, is a fully computer animated six-minute short that you won't believe was made by just one student. In R'ha, machines rebel against their rulers, an alien species, and force them out of their planet. The short starts with a robot interrogating one of the aliens after the Matrix-style insurrection. Perhaps R'ha's most original element is that there are no humans in sight. The story seems to be only about this alien race and their former servant robots who have turned on them.

Despite being the work of a student, R'ha is so good it's already attracted the attention of Hollywood executives. After seeing Lechowski's creation online, Scott Glassgold, of the managing company IAM Sports & Entertainment, was impressed. "His work is not only professional, it's extraordinary," Glassgold wrote Mashable in an email. "There are shots in there that look like they are from a 150-million-dollar movie." Glassgold has experience with science fiction, he sold the shorts Rosa and True Skin to studios last year.

Lechowski studies at the Berlin Mediadesign Hochschule. R'ha is his second big project at the school and his first animated 3D short. Lechowski told Mashable that he had the original idea for the story in the summer of 2011. Then, last semester, when he had to develop an animated 3D short for school, he decided he wanted to do a sci-fi video and use the idea he previously had developed.

SEE ALSO: Science Fiction Dreams That Came True in 2012

Inspired mostly by movies like Matrix and videogames like Half-Life, Lechowski is a big sci-fi fan. He wanted to create a science fiction short because he likes the freedom that the genre allows. In sci-fi "you can create almost anything, like creatures, machines, you can create worlds, you can create basically everything," Lechowski told Mashable in a Skype interview.

In 2011 he wrote down his ideas and when he started his school project he scribbled down some more ideas, doing drawings of the creatures he wanted to animate, and then he simply started working on his computer. Lechowski says he actually prefers to improvise directly with the program he uses rather than do too many drawings with pen and paper. Apart from having an actor doing the voices, and receiving help with the sound, he did it all by himself.

Thanks to his impressive work, Lechowski is now headed to Hollywood. Glassgold, who acts as Lechowski's manager, got in touch with him and offered him a chance to pitch his short and his ideas as a full feature to movie producers. The manager thinks the movie has great potential, not only because of its technical excellence. "After speaking with him, the world and universe that he has in mind for R'ha is groundbreaking," the Glassgold wrote.

The German student will go to Hollywood in a few weeks to meet with executives and see if he can get the financing he needs to turn this into a movie. Lechowski and Glassgold declined to give more details about who they'll meet but Glassgold said they "are already fielding offers and interest for a feature."

Lechowski said he has some ideas on how to develop the movie, although obviously the rest of R'ha's story isn't decided yet. What he needs now is some help so he doesn't have to keep doing everything on his own, although he jokingly says that could do that too  with a considerable amount of time on his hands.

"It's just a question of time, I think," he says. "If one would say I have 10 years of time to make a full feature out of it, I could do it my own, I guess. But that's not what I want to do."

This wouldn't be the first time that a short becomes a full-featured successful movie. That's what happened with the critically acclaimed District 9, which was adapted from the short Alive in Joburg.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Investors may have soured a bit on Apple, but they're starting to love Research In Motion.

While Apple's stock struggled to stay above the $500 mark Monday, RIM's stock jumped more than 10%, briefly passing $15 a share for the first time since February of last year before ending the day at $14.95.

RIM's surge is due in part to investor optimism for the long-awaited launch of the BlackBerry 10 operating system and smartphones, which is set to take place at the end of this month.

Reps from Verizon, AT&T and Sprint confirmed last week that they would support RIM's upcoming BlackBerry 10 smartphones, an early positive sign for the company. What's more, on Monday, the company's VP of developer relations tweeted that RIM received 15,000 BlackBerry 10 app submissions from developers over the weekend.

The company's stock may also have been helped by reports that Apple had cut its iPhone 5 supply orders, suggesting weaker-than-expected demand.

"There is a lot of speculation that RIM can continue higher, with even more anticipation for the BlackBerry 10 release with the Apple news [Monday]," Joe Kinahan, chief derivatives strategist at TD Ameritrade, told the Wall Street Journal. "Investors are betting that, with momentum from Apple slowing, the momentum in RIM shares will pick up."

Hype for the BlackBerry 10 has helped push RIM's stock above the single-digits in recent months, even as the company reported its first ever decline in subscribers in December. The stock has nearly doubled from just under $8 at the end of October to close at just under $15 Monday.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Samsung has sold more than 100 million Galaxy S devices, the company has announced.

Samsung reached this milestone in 2 years and 7 months after the launch of the original Samsung Galaxy S back in May 2010.

A big chunk of this success Samsung owes to its Galaxy S III, whose average daily sales are currently 190,000 units. All in all, the company sold 40 million Galaxy S III devices in 7 months. It took 20 months for its predecessor, the Samsung Galaxy S II, to reach that same milestone.

For comparison, Apple sold more than 250 million iPhones to date, but it had a big head start, given the first iPhone was launched in June 2007.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Samsung's 85-inch Ultra HD TV set, the UHD TV 85S9, is up for pre-order in Korea.

The huge TV, showcased at CES 2013, sports a 4K resolution, built-in 2.2 channels speakers, a quad-core CPU and Samsung's diamond black panel.

Samsung UHD TV 8559 is priced at 40,000,000 won ($37,872) in Korea, which is quite high compared to some other 4K competitors' offerings, for example Sony's 84-inch XBR-84X900 which costs $25,000.

Samsung offered no details about the pricing and release date of the UHD TV 8559 in the U.S. or other markets.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Since leaving Microsoft a couple months ago, Steve Sinofsky has been busying lining up teaching gigs, launching a blog and apparently playing with iPhones.

Sinofsky, the longtime Microsoft exec who was in charge of developing Windows 7 and Windows 8, has been caught tweeting from an iPhone multiple times this year by Mark Gurman at 9to5Mac. But it's not as bad as it sounds.

Yes, Sinofsky did tweet from an iPhone (as you can see below), but he has also recently tweeted from several other products including Windows 8 devices.

In response to someone asking him on Twitter about his iPhone use Sunday, Sinofsky clarified that he likes to test different products to see what's out there. (For what it's worth, the tweet below was sent from an iPhone as well.)

Later in the day, Sinofsky expanded on this point in response to a blog post from Bijan Sabet, a general partner at Spark Capital:

I have owned every iphone released (and every ipad and galaxy and kindle). It is far better to actually use a product day in and day out so before CES I started using it and will use it for a month or so. Just prior I was using my 920.

In Office I spent a long time using SmartSuite or Google Docs for the same reasons.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Skittles social-media team tasted the rainbow, and then threw it up all over Twitter and Facebook.

Whether social-media gurus of the web world label the effort brilliant or bizarre, it's hard to deny that the candy company keeps 140 characters (or less) quite entertaining.

Skittles' Twitter feed includes a lot of references to animals  both real and mythical  as well as musings that might sound familiar to anyone who has spent a lot time with  cough, cough  Doobie Howser, WD.

What do you think of Skittles' social-media strategy? Finish noshing on the rainbow, then share in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Soundscapes, anyone? Some of us need soothing music to fall asleep, but our partners don't always find the sound of waves crashing over and over as soothing as we do.

For people who sleep in the same bed as a significant other, or perhaps have paper-thin walls and roommates, a new product announced at International CES 2013 will help you get some shut-eye without disturbing others.

SleepPhones are a soft headband that you wear around your head and over your ears  it looks like a sweatband that you'd wear to workout. The headband has headphones in it that you align over your ears. And it's Bluetooth enabled so you can play music or sounds from any Bluetooth enabled device, like your smartphone.

SleepPhones have been around for a while, but they required users to plug a cord into their iPod or bedside alarm clock. This wireless version will be available for purchase in April and will retail for $80.

While our tablets and phones have been to blame for keeping us awake, this handy device could prove that not all late-night gadgets cause sleeplessness.

Do you wear headphones while listening to sounds or music at night in order to fall asleep? Which ones do you currently use? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The people have spoken. In a week of two big-name awards shows, the People's Choice Awards took home the title of biggest social star. The Jan. 9 CBS broadcast spurred 6.3 million comments on social media, beating out the Golden Globes.

Conversely, Sunday's film and television awards gala on NBC drew an impressive 3.8 million mentions  a 256% increase over last year's tally  with Will Ferrell and Kristen Wiig's goofy presentation ranking as the most active moment of the night.

The most popular Golden Globe star on social media was Les Miserables' Anne Hathaway, followed by Jennifer Lawrence, Lena Dunham, Hugh Jackman and Claire Danes.

The data is courtesy of Trendrr, which measures social media activity related to specific television shows (e.g., mentions, likes, check-ins) across Twitter, Facebook, GetGlue and Viggle. To see daily rankings, check out Trendrr.TV.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Launchpad is a series that introduces Mashable readers to compelling startups. If you would like to have your startup considered for inclusion, please see the details here.



Why It's Taking Off: Spreecast boasts a stronger feature set than similar apps and it serves the unique needs of the entertainment industry.

One of the contenders for Mashable's recent Innovation Index was HuffPost Live, a product from the news giant that broadcasts live, fresh content nearly 24 hours each day with highlights running late nights and weekends. While it's still in its infancy, industry leaders are quick to point out that the live video hub represents a shift in audience engagement with news content.

Spreecast brings a similar experience to any brand or publication which wants to host a live video session, along with a rich feature set for making the experience interactive for viewers. The site first launched in beta a little over a year ago.

When I spoke to founder Jeff Fluhr about the product, he initially compared it to Google+ Hangouts, which understandably falls into the same category of live video and has some of the same features. But, in practice, the two don't necessarily occupy the same space. Where Google+ designed Hangouts to work within its own social network, Spreecast is more of a platform, and Fluhr is quick to point out that users can invite friends to a Spreecast live video through any social identity  Facebook, Twitter, LinkedIn, Google+ or email.

The feature set of Spreecast is comprehensive, if a bit deceiving, since it allows for public or private video sessions, large and small. There's so many possible ways someone could use it: for a private meeting between team members, as a video-style podcast, as an alternative to a group Skype call for friends or family, and the list goes on. Features include the live chat window next to the video viewer, options to tweet or share to Facebook directly from the viewer and subscribtions to brand channels  all the necessary makings of a social video site.

Nearly all features follow the experience when a Spreecast is embedded elsewhere, so brands or publications can host a Spreecast on their own site. While a Spreecast can be watched by anyone live, it's also captured and can remain online later, with the text chat timed in tandem with the video.

But in practice, the experience of Spreecast is unique from potential competitors such as Join.me, Skype or Google+  it stands out as an experience ideal for entertainers, from film directors to writers to TV personalities. Recently, Extra hosted "After Hours" for its hit show, The Bachelor. Another popular Spreecast was this live chat with the director of Looper. Anderson Cooper experimented with a short "After Show" on Spreecast, although it's no longer running.

So, why is Spreecast the epicenter for entertainment and live content made to enhance other live content? First, Fluhr, who is CEO, has a background in live entertainment  he was co-founder of Stubhub, and has found partners in the entertainment space, such as Viacom's VH1.

But most importantly, the experience on Spreecast is conducive to entertainment channels. The design discriminates between who is on the show versus who is watching. It's consistent with how a fan wants to interact with a favorite entertainer, while also being accessible  fans can be added to the conversation easily. Unlike a social network (Google+), users are not trying to grow their personal following or a reputation on Spreecast, so the ease of signing in with whichever social platform is preferred makes sense. The admin controls make a Spreecast feel more highly produced than a Hangout does.

As for 2013 plans, Fluhr says they'll be testing possible ways to generate revenue  the platform is currently free. But, revenue could come in the way of charging users for additional features, or selling ads. The company also plans to release apps for iPhone and iPad, but no date is set.

Spreecast's mix of interactive video and discussion brings a lot of potential to the entertainment industry, who will need to take advantage of this new way to engage audiences.
--------------------------------------------------------------
When Star Wars first hit theaters in May 1977, one scene that always had audiences gasping and whooping  according to multiple contemporary reports  came when Han Solo's ship escaped Tatooine and zoomed into a field of suddenly-stretched stars.

"The sequence where Han Solo's ship hits light speed - hyperspace - gets a cheer every single time," Rolling Stone's Paul Scanlon told George Lucas that summer. "People just love it."

Lucas, ever the drag racer, responded: "There's nothing like popping the old ship into hyperspace to give you a real thrill."

In the decades that followed, the stretched-star imagery became a common sci-fi meme.

Well, kid, strap yourself in and prepare for a shock: A fantasy movie that featured lightsabers, vanishing gurus, self-aware droids and seven-foot wookiees got its hyperspace science all wrong. It just took us 35 years to prove it.

According to a new study from physicists at the UK's University of Leicester, what the Falcon would have seen instead of a field of stretched stars is a rather less exciting big white blur  as seen in the composite above.

"They would simply see a central disc of bright light as Cosmic Microwave Background Radiation is shifted into the visible spectrum," the University's press release announced Monday. "There would be no sign of stars because of the Doppler effect."

The team of M.Phil candidates used Einstein's Special Theory of Relativity to calculate the effects of light-speed travel. And the news for Han and Chewie gets worse.

Not only is their view far more boring, but their ship is going to be under some serious pressure from cosmic X-rays. About as much pressure as you'd find at the bottom of the Pacific, the team calculated. (Talk about the dark side of the force.)

"Perhaps Disney should take the physical implications of such high speed travel into account in their forthcoming films," offered Leicester student Katie Dexter.

Then again, if Lucas was at all concerned with scientific accuracy, he wouldn't have added awesome sound effects to all those space battles  and the movies would be poorer for it.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Walmart last week announced the availability of iPhone 5 on a Straight Talk no-contract plan with unlimited voice, text and data, but like most so-called unlimited plans, this one too has a limit. For $45 a month, you can use up to 2GB of data, which these days isn't a whole lot. Stream a movie on your shiny new iPhone? Not likely.

However, Walmart has made it easier to buy an iPhone 5 off-contract by offering $25-a-month financing on the purchase of a phone as long as you use a Walmart credit card. Only a few prepaid providers offer the newest iPhone (Cricket ; C Spire, a regional provider in the South), and you'll pay $649 up front for the phone. At Walmart, you have the option to buy the phone outright or put it on your card with no interest fee.

It's no secret that carriers use the term "unlimited" to describe plans that indeed include what the industry calls a soft data cap. That means when you use your data allotment, the service slows data speeds to a crawl. Technically, data is unlimited, but it's so slow that it's unusable.

For the majority of smartphone users, 2GB of data is often enough as long as a reliable Wi-Fi connection is available. Streaming video can quickly eat up data, but if you watch a movie over Wi-Fi, it won't count against your data allotment.

But choosing a prepaid plan instead of a two-year contract for your smartphone saves consumers around $1,000 or more over a 24-month period. For instance, an AT&T customer will pay $70 for voice, $20 for messaging and $30 for 3GB of data a month  that's $120 a month compared with $45 via Walmart's Straight Talk.

The iPhone 5 16GB in black and white is available at most Walmart locations. For an additional $15 a month, Straight Talk subscribers can add international calling to Mexico, Canada and India.

This article originally published at TechNewsDaily here
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Surface was supposed to be Microsoft's real answer to the iPad  a Windows-based tablet that would satisfy both casual users and digital workers. Now it looks like it's appealing to neither.

UBS analyst Brent Thill estimates Microsoft has sold only 1 million Surface RT tablets, reported by Business Insider. He had previously estimated 2 million. To put those figures in perspective, Apple is estimated to sell in the neighborhood of 20 million iPads for the same period.

This is far from the first sign that the Surface isn't doing very well. A month ago, brokerage firm Detwiler Fenton said Microsoft wouldn't even break a million units, estimating sales for the quarter at 600,000 units maximum. However, that was before Microsoft expanded retail distribution of the Surface early, which likely led to better numbers.

In addition, last week Samsung said it was pulling back plans to release its own tablet based on Windows RT  the same operating system running on the Surface  citing customer ignorance about the pared-down version of Windows made to run on ARM-based devices. Cost was also a factor.

"We didn't necessarily attain the price point that we hoped to attain," Samsung senior vice president Mike Abary told CNET.

Looking at web usage, a study conducted by Chikita Insights just before the holidays found the Microsoft Surface accounted for just 0.22 ad impressions for every 100 impressions from an iPad. Finally, Microsoft CEO Steve Ballmer said in an interview last November that sales were "modest" (although Microsoft later said Ballmer was talking about supply and distribution of the Surface, not sales).

If the Surface RT is doing poorly, Microsoft's hopes in the tablet space could be resurrected by the Surface Pro, a slightly larger version of the device that runs Windows 8 Pro. Microsoft has previously said the Pro version would launch three months after the Surface RT, or about the end of January.

Why do you think the Surface is struggling, and do you think the Surface Pro will turn things around? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Maybe you only kind of followed the NFL playoffs this weekend. Maybe you know the scores and major stars, but missed the little things that make the games truly entertaining for sports fans of a certain sophistication. We're talking, of course, about plays like this one  and about the hidden trolling talents possessed by one Peter Tebow.

Peter is brother to Tim Tebow, the Internet demigod and fringe NFL quarterback. Tim, as most of us by now know, surged to prominence last season with an improbable string of success quarterbacking the Denver Broncos to eight regular season wins and an upset playoff victory. Then the Broncos unceremoniously shipped Tim off to the New York Jets, where he languished on the bench for a crappy team this season.

When the Broncos lost on Saturday to end their Super Bowl hopes this season with new quarterback Peyton Manning, brother Peter  who works in the Denver area as a youth pastor  couldn't resist a parting shot:

Sports fans seemed to enjoy Peter's trolling schadenfreude, retweeting the post more than 2,100 times.

There seems to be a nice digital good/evil dynamic at play now between the brothers Tebow. On the one had, we've got the inspiration for a legendary meme and someone who calls a hospitalized child after a viral Twitter campaign, then on the other we've got a vindictive fellow who enjoys trolling entire metropolitan areas. We can't wait to see what Peter has to say about the Jets' results next season, assuming they cut Tim loose as expected.

If you were Tim Tebow, would you be annoyed at Peter's tweet, or does it not matter? Give us your take in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
What happens when you team golf superstars Rory McIlroy and Tiger Woods with a clever script and Nike's indomitable sports branding power? An Internet advertising hit, as we found out on Monday.

The one-minute spot above, which marks McIlroy's first appearance in a Nike spot, has spread far and wide on the social web since hitting YouTube early Monday. In it, the two golfers  with Woods, the former prodigy, playing the role of old dog  square off in a driving-range accuracy contest to the surprise of anyone holding a cup within striking distance.

The ad also signifies McIlroy's ascent in the advertising world. His new Nike deal is reportedly worth up to $250 million.

Do you think this ad is worth the hype it's getting online, or does it fall flat? Give us your take in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Ah the Golden Globes, the one night of the year where, according to Amy Poehler, the "beautiful people of film rub shoulders with the rat-faced people of television."

It's what makes it such a special occassion. Well, that and the unlimited champagne.

But we say last night's 70th annual show was memorable mostly because of the hosts, BFFs and comedy powerhouses, Tina Fey and Amy Poehler.

They outshone past hosts like Ricky Gervais  which they'll tell you themselves  and added an SNL flair to their comedy bits, complete with costumes and an attempt to take home awards for their made up film, Dog President.

SEE ALSO: And the Golden Globe Goes to ... GIFs!

Even their response to seeing a former president on stage was right on beat.

"That was Hillary Clinton's husband," Poehler quipped after Bill Clinton surprised the crowd to introduce Lincoln.

We're not sure if it was the excessive amounts of free booze but the audience seemed to love it, and so did we. We just pray that the Hollywood Foreign Press Association hires these two indefinitely to keep all future awards shows equally torture-less.

What was your favorite joke or moment of the night?
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Tinto River in Spain provides little comfort for most life. The river is naturally similar to the toxic water leaking from old mines, known as acid mine drainage. However, within that harsh river, biologists identified pockets of salt that created an oasis for bacteria. Similar salt deposits on Mars could also provide refuge for life.

The reason is that conditions in this environment [salt deposits] remain less adverse than those of their surroundings given that they provide protection from radiation, for example, said Felipe Gmez of Spains Centro de Astrobiologa in a press release, and they keep moisture levels higher than outside.

Five different varieties of microorganisms were found in the salt deposits. The microbes were types of algae from the genera Dunaliella and Cyanidium.

SEE ALSO: Photos: Evolution Before Your Eyes

The Tinto River contains salt formations mixed with sulfur and iron, known as jarosite. Similar mineral deposits were identified on Mars by the Opportunity rover in 2004. Other surface salt formations were observed by the Mars Global Surveyor. These Martian deposits could host life or at least preserve its remains, according to the Centro de Astrobiologa paper published in Planetary and Space Science.

From the astrological point of view, salt deposits are of great importance and should be considered when searching for life on space exploration missions, like the current Curiosity rover mission on Mars, said Gmez.

This article originally published at Discovery News here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Semi-naked CES "Booth Babes," the status of CDs in todays digital world, a hefty fee to message Mark Zuckerberg, and Google's decision to make the Google Maps app unavailable to Windows users were all hotly contested topics. We've pulled together our favorite comments of the week to show off the best conversations and the biggest debates.

A California-based hard drive company chose to include colorfully painted, topless women in its 2013 CES presentation, incurring tons of responses via social media. Some commenters voiced support and others were vehemently against the display. Our readers hotly debated the ethics of "booth babes" at trade shows and in advertising in general.

SEE ALSO: 10 Top News Stories This Week

With Amazon's recent announcement that it will be granting CD buyers MP3 copies of songs, we asked our readers: Why Are People Still Buying CDs? Some commenters argued that CDs have higher sound quality than songs stored in the cloud, while other readers admitted that they no longer buy physical discs.

Significant change to Facebook is always a topic of much debate among our readers, so this week's post about the $100 fee to message Mark Zuckerberg via his social network garnered a lot of attention.

And finally, Google's decision to make its maps app unavailable for Windows mobile users confused many, and then upset some.

We'd love to hear your opinions regarding the above stories, so weigh in below and let us know what you think.
--------------------------------------------------------------
If you weren't completely impressed by the Golden Globes on Sunday night, don't give up just yet  maybe these Twitter photos will reverse that menacing glare.

SEE ALSO: Golden Globes Recap: Best Moments and Winners

Our friends over at Skylines sifted through 34,746,409 unique Twitter photos from the past week and compiled the most shared and retweeted. Click through the gallery above to see the top 10. There are some from the usuals (Justin Bieber, One Direction and Super Junior), plus a few NBA-sized surprises.

What were your favorite photos from the week? Share them with us below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Rise and shine, haters of Monday. If you need a pick-me-up, this 20-second video of a skiing trombonist might do the trick.

The multitasker, California native Sean Pawling, plays "Ride of the Valkyries" down the mountains in Lake Tahoe.

SEE ALSO: Watch the Scariest Skiing Lesson of All Time

If you really can't get enough, part two of the video shows a little more of the stunt in action. Pawling glides down to the bottom of the mountain where onlookers are both confused and mildly impressed.

BONUS: 10 Videos of People Getting Pwned by Winter
--------------------------------------------------------------
A cohort of Twitter users with fake names and profile pictures have become a trusted source of information regarding drug cartel violence in Mexico.

These citizen journalists choose to remain anonymous to avoid violent backlash from gang members, but their reports have become increasingly influential.

On Jan. 8, a team from Microsoft Research published a paper called "The New War Correspondents: The Rise of Civic Media Curation in Urban Warfare," which details a social media study conducted over the past two years. Their main finding was that as Mexicans increasingly turn to Twitter for reports of violence, a core of mostly anonymous yet trusted curators have led the dissemination of public safety information.

"You find this small cluster of people, whom we call curators, who tend to be really well-regarded in their cities," Andrs Monroy-Hernndez, one of the paper's five co-authors, tells Mashable. "These particular curators are those that have a lot of followers, which means that they're somewhat trusted by the community."

In the paper, the authors discuss how difficult it was to contact and interview the curators, who feel the work puts their lives in danger.

Those who did reply said that there was a feeling that Mexicans had been "abandoned by their government and the media." Mexico continues to show up on the Committee to Protect Journalists' list of most dangerous countries in the world for members of the media.

"Although traditional journalists regularly serve as curators, both on Twitter and in the more mainstream media outlets, the rise of citizen curators suggests that existing outlets are not meeting public need," the paper reads.

In fact, during the time of his research, Monroy-Hernndez says he noticed the mainstream media even began to quote social media as a source in its own reporting:

"Social media has become a source of information for mainstream media, as well as a way for mainstream media to protect itself from retaliation from drug cartels."

Though these anonymous Twitter curators don't get paid for their work, it doesn't mean they are not dedicated. One told the researchers that spending up to 15 hours a day on Twitter is common.

According to Monroy-Hernndez, his general sense is that these people provide this service for altruistic reasons.

Twitter user @BalaceraMTY has been reporting on violence in Monterrey for two years and has amassed more than 60,000 followers. In an email reply to Mashable, the owner of the account said the following:

"It all started on Twitter while I was looking for information on how to protect my relatives and myself, considering how violent the region had gotten at that point. It was vital to be properly informed of such dangerous circumstances. At the same time, I started commenting on the information I was gathering. I never thought my number of followers would grow the way it did. What do I get in return? Nothing economically, its not about that. Its really just the satisfaction of being able to help, the idea of doing something so things can eventually get better."

The anonymous curator says they have been through extremely "hard times" in Monterrey over the past few years, but his or her belief is that things are getting better:

"While there is need to manage information, such as my time and health permits, I will continue trying to do my part."

Monroy-Hernndez says this phenomenon is not specific to Mexico, and that Twitter has emerged as a trusted source of information in other places where violence occurs, particularly relating to organized crime.

For social media outlets to accomodate these reporters, the authors of the paper suggest that "there is a significant need for developing technical strategies to assess trust without revealing identity information."

The authors will formally present their findings at the Computer Supported Cooperative Work (CSCW 2013) conference in late February.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Defense Department wants new computer tools to analyze mounds of unstructured text, blogs and tweets as part of a coordinated push to help military analysts predict the future and make decisions faster.

The search is part of the Office of Naval Research's "Data to Decisions" program, a series of three-to-10-year initiatives that will address the volume of information that threatens to overwhelm planners in the digital age, contract databases indicate. The goal is to build an open source system that can unite various tools that collect, manage and draw relationships between data sets.

In a program announcement, ONR is calling for computer algorithms to predict events, fuse different forms of information and offer context on unfolding events. The office expects to spend $500,000 each year in funding. The Department of Defense recognizes the potential for text analytics to play a vital role in future capabilities that inform timely and accurate situational awareness in time-constrained, uncertain, and complex environments, the tender reads.

Defense is seeking ways to predict the future by monitoring Twitter, blogs and news, and determining the "frequency of contacts between nodes or clusters." As networks grow larger and more complex, researchers have found it harder to monitor group behavior. ONR also wants researchers to discover networks that could be hidden within networks, and how information and money flows through a community.

Officials also want tools that fuse and assimilate multiple, incomplete data sets on agriculture, weather, terrain, demographics and economic indicators to find patterns. ONR is especially interested in ways to comb text-based information to provide more nuanced views of how groups, such as terrorists, operate by extrapolating the "stated values and beliefs that motivated behaviors of interest," "community structure and clusters of social networks" and the level of "emotional support expressed towards topics or persons."

The office also seeks better technologies for machine translation and processing  translating physical characters or sounds  into one machine-readable language.

Proposals are due Jan. 15 and funding decisions will be made by Feb. 15, contract documents indicate. Carey Schwartz, an ONR program officer and researcher affiliated with the Applied Research Laboratory at Pennsylvania State University, spearheads the program. So far, Clifton Park, N.Y.-based Kitware, which develops algorithms to analyze battlefield imagery, has been slated for funding, in partnership with software developer SOARTech, data-focused firm Signal Innovations Group, sensor processing company Systems Technology Research, defense giant Lockheed Martin Corps. and University of Southern California.

Government agencies have been pushing technologists to refine techniques to sift through open source intelligence or publicly available data sets. The CIA, responding to mounting calls that such information needed to be systematically collected and better analyzed, created the National Open Source Center in suburban Northern Virginia around 2005 to acquire and analyze the information to support intelligence agencies.

The Defense Advanced Research Projects Agency, the Pentagon's research arm, in 2012 sought out research ideas on computer programs that predict "cyber terrorism events" by detecting how criminal groups and hackers interact on the Internet.

This article originally published at Nextgov here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Call it "Tweet Your Own Adventure."

The CBS procedural Hawaii 5-0 is set to make history Monday night  becoming the first TV show to have its ending determined by Twitter. In fact, it will be both the first and second show to try this trick.

The plot revolves around the murder of a teacher at O'ahu State University, for which there are three suspects  his boss, his assistant and a disgruntled student. Unlike with every other cop show in the history of television, the producers have laid out and filmed three possible endings.

The ending shown will be determined entirely by how many votes are received on Twitter for each character. And because the show is on twice  once at 10 p.m. on the East Coast, once at 10 p.m. on the West Coast  the outcomes could well be entirely different.

"I love that our dedicated and attentive fans will actually play a part in resolving our story," says Executive Producer Peter Lenkov. "I've always felt the most fun aspect of watching a mystery is trying to figure out whodunit."

That isn't exactly what fans will be doing, however. The satisfaction of a good murder mystery is solving a puzzle using the clues the writer has carefully laid out for you. By necessity, this show will have to lay clues to all three suspects.

There's no inevitability about the outcome  it's like a crossword where the answers adapt to what you want them to be.

Twitter users will then be able to play God, rather than Sherlock Holmes, deciding which of three possible realities will come to pass. Justice, in this case, is altered retroactively.

No matter which choice the audience makes en masse, it gets to be right. Whomever is least likable gets the chop. You might call it a TV lynching.

Still, it will be interesting to see if the East Coast and West Coast opt for different murderers. (Somehow, we doubt it'll be the student.) All three endings will be available online after the show.

How could other TV shows use Twitter? Share your ideas in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
If trimming a few pounds is on your New Year's resolution list, a new study suggests you should turn to Twitter.

Researchers at the University of South Carolina's Arnold School of Public Health revealed in a report that popular social-networking site Twitter can serve as a support system for those trying to lose weight.

In fact, those who participated in a weight loss program had more overall success when they used the site to receive and share information. Not to mention every 10 posts to Twitter by the test group corresponded with about 0.5% weight loss, the study said.

SEE ALSO: How Everyday Tools Can Help You Lose Weight

"We wanted to find a way to provide the group support we normally deliver during a face-to-face weight loss intervention to the online community," Gabrielle Turner-McGrievy, lead author of the study, told Mashable. "In typical face-to-face delivery methods, there is no way for someone to ask for what to order at a restaurant as theyre sitting and looking at the menu. With Twitter, we were able to do that."

Although traditional behavioral weight loss interventions provide social support weekly, it can also be costly and time consuming.

The study  which was conducted among 96 overweight and obese men living in a metropolitan area during a six-month period  assigned participants to two groups: One that listened to only podcasts to help with weight loss and another that coupled podcasts with mobile phone use. The latter group followed each other on Twitter, providing social support to one another via status updates such as "I went to the gym today. Felt great!"

Users in the mobile group logged on to Twitter daily to read and post messages. Weight loss counselors also tweeted participants twice a day with information and words of encouragement. Overall, those who actively engaged with Twitter during the study lost more weight.

 

"But Twitter didn't work for everyone in the study  some people were not engaged or posted only a few times," Turner-McGrievy said. "When we looked at what predicted Twitter use in the study, it didnt matter if you were a Twitter user prior to enrollment. What did matter was initial weight loss."

Although she said the researchers aren't sure if being initially successful led participants to post more to Twitter or if posting to Twitter led to initial weight loss. The team is also looking at Facebook to see if it provides the same support to those looking to lose weight.

"We hope to explore more in future studies about how to predict who will engage in a social network," she said.
--------------------------------------------------------------
An online petition that asks the White House to remove the U.S. attorney in charge of the prosecution of Internet activist and hacker Aaron Swartz passed the 25,000 signature threshold Tuesday that should prompt an official response.

Swartz committed suicide in New York City on Friday. At the time of his death, Swartz was accused of computer fraud and awaiting a trial expected to begin in the spring. He faced a maximum of 35 years of prison and up to $1 million in fines.

The petition has now passed 25,000 signatures, which means the White House is supposed to answer it  although it's not legally bound to do so. A recent petition to build a Death Star was addressed, although others take more time and some go unanswered.

Parker Higgins, an activist at the Electronic Frontier Foundation, a digital rights advocacy group, lamented Monday that a petition to grant open access to scholarly articles has been unanswered for more than seven months.

"White House makes jokes about their beer recipe and building a death star, but they don't answer a real petition on open access," Higgins tweeted.

Swartz was accused of sneaking into the Massachussets Institute of Technology's library, plugging his laptop into a network closet and illegally downloading millions of scholarly articles from the online publisher JSTOR.

Swartz was reportedly depressed, but his family, supporters and legal experts such as Lawrence Lessig, have accused the prosecution led by assistant U.S. Attorney Steve Heymann, working under Ortiz, of overreach that may have played a role in his suicide. Swartz's lawyer had seen his plea agreement rejected as recently as last Wednesday.

According to Swartz's latest lawyer, Marty Weinberg, his last plea deal was accepted by JSTOR, but the deal fell through when the MIT refused to sign the deal. MIT's president already announced that the famed school will conduct an investigation to assess its eventual role in Swartz's death.

SEE ALSO: Technology's Greatest Minds Say Goodbye to Aaron Swartz

The success of the petition will certainly keep stirring the controversy surrounding his death. Andrew Good, Swartz's former lawyer, told the San Francisco Gate Monday that last year he told federal prosecutors that his client was a suicide risk.

"Put him in jail, he'll be safe there," they responded, according to Good.
--------------------------------------------------------------
As with so many others, Aaron Swartz had an indelible impact on my life. I didn't know Aaron well; we exchanged a dozen emails in early 2008. Still, if you followed the geekier aspects of Mac and web standards culture in the early 2000s, it was hard not to run across Aaron's work.

You probably know the basic outline by now. He co-wrote the spec for RSS at 14. He was part of Creative Commons at the very beginning. He beta-tested Markdown for John Gruber. Oh, and he co-founded Reddit (whether acknowledged or not) and sold it to Cond Nast.

The guy was a genius, in the purest sense of the word.

When I first emailed Aaron, we were at different phases in our life. At 25, I was just starting my career as a tech reporter. I was green and unsure of exactly what it was I wanted to achieve.

Though younger than me, Aaron was far more accomplished. He was 21 and had sold his first startup, left the company that acquired it, and was busy immersing himself in a wide array of policy projects.

I first emailed Aaron about Jottit, one of those post-Reddit side projects. I was familiar with his work and was a longtime reader of his blog, so I made sure to mention some of our shared passions for books, film and the radio show This American Life.

We were also both depressed.

Depression came up in our second email exchange. We had both written online about our respective struggles with it. I was just coming out of a major bout that had lasted months. I described it as "coming above ground into the light after months in darkness."

Aaron too seemed to be coming out of his depression. He was frustrated that it wasn't something he could control.

There's an odd paradox with depression and all mental illnesses: It's one of the few diseases where the patient blames herself and feels like a failure for having to accept help or take medication.

This is especially difficult if you're highly intelligent and usually able to solve problems and answer questions  as many in the tech community are.

At 25, I'd already suffered through four major depressions since the age of 14. I had battled through phases of wanting to believe I could conquer my illness without the need of medication. But by the age of 18, I had come to the conclusion that it was necessary. I had stopped feeling like this made me weak or less capable.

It was never said explicitly, but I got the sense that Aaron didn't feel that way. It's difficult for anyone to come to terms with the idea that you can't have complete control over your mind, let alone someone of Aaron's intellect.

We stopped emailing each other after a few weeks. My life got busier. My career started to take off. Aaron became increasingly focused on public policy and advocacy for worthy causes.

In July 2011, Aaron was charged with hacking into the journal archive JSTOR. I e-mailed him to see if he could give an official comment. I also let him know that he had my support and if there was ever anything I could do, to let me know. He politely declined to comment and thanked me for my offer.

It was to be our last email exchange.

I won't pretend to know exactly what Aaron was going through, or why he made the decision to take his life. I can only speculate that the impending legal case against him  a trial that seems unfair and so very trivial in the wake of all of this  was taking a heavy toll.

But while I can't speak for his situation, I am an expert on major depression. I diagnosed myself at the age of 9, on the basis of a mental health TV commercial. At 14, I was officially diagnosed with major depression and anxiety disorder. So began a 30-month process of trying to find the right combination of medicines that would properly align my biochemistry.

At 16, I missed the second semester of my sophomore year of high school because I literally couldn't get out of bed. I just wanted to die. I prayed for death. After a few good years and a good start in college, depression reared its ugly head again at the age of 20. A few years later, my psychiatrist told me I would probably never be able to come off my anti-depressants.

While I haven't had a period of depression in more than five years since then, I still feel the occasional twinge of it. This is not a disease that can be cured. It's chronic, and it's for life.

Depression is an illnesses largely hidden from society. By the time the illness is visible  when a person can't get out of bed, when they stop caring for themselves or their job  they've already been suffering for a long, long time.

Most depressed people work with every fiber of their being to hide the horrible fact of it. To be depressed is to be a very good actor. Fake it long enough, you think, and maybe it'll become reality.

That might work with other aspects of life, but it doesn't work with depression. At some point, holding back the feelings of pain and despair becomes too much. It finds a way to spill out. It's messy.

I've often described depression as a vacuum or a vortex. When you're in it, you can't remember life on the outside. Everything is sadness. Everything is bleak. Nothing seems to have purpose. Tiny flickers of light, moments of reprieve, often just make you feel even worse.

It aches powerfully, like the loss of your first love. It hurts like the scorn of high school bullies. And it sucks everything you have into its black hole of destruction.

What's worse is that when you come out of it, it can be difficult to remember what depression is like. It is only through periods of genuine sadness  like the loss of someone as young and talented as Aaron  that I connect with that part of my brain and remember those feelings.

I bring up my personal history because there are many in the tech community who have experienced something like it. I can't say we (tech journalists and the techies we cover) are more prone to depression; I can say we're iconoclastic enough to talk openly about it.

Ben Huh, Cheezburger maker extraordinaire, has been a leading light in this regard. Huh told Mashable the story of what saved his life here.

Mental illness has become one of the last social taboos in Western society (it's far, far worse in other parts of the world). There is a profound and subtle stigma associated with depression, anxiety, bi-polar, OCD, ADHD and any other in the myriad of treatable, functional illnesses.

Bias against depression is systemic. Until Obamacare, having a diagnosis of major depression or an anxiety disorder would prevent a person from getting full-coverage health insurance as an individual. It's a pre-existing condition. Most insurance companies won't take you, no matter how much you're willing to pay.

At 27, I was young, a non-smoker, a casual drinker, with perfect blood work, low cholesterol and well below the average weight for my height. Yet I couldn't get any insurance company to accept me on a PPO plan.

It wasn't until my company had enough employees to get good health insurance that I was able to stop paying more than $800 a month for medication. I wasn't alone. A number of my friends could not get insured after college. They could not afford their antidepressants or anxiety medication or ADHD drugs.

The stigma breeds fear. Fear keeps those suffering quiet.

But in the tech world, we're all about finding new solutions  the way Aaron did. So for Aaron's sake, it's time to stop being quiet. It's time to stop hovering in the darkness. It's time to come out of the closet, to speak frequently and at length about depression.

Stigma doesn't go away until the population hears personal stories from the afflicted. History bears this out, time after time, with each stigmatized group. More stories means creating a culture where future Aarons know they can speak out about their suffering.

Fellow techies, let's tell our stories. I for one am tired of staying silent.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Just hours before the debut of the Video Podcast Network on YouTube, podcasting stalwart Adam Carolla has pies and sweaters for dogs on his mind. They help tell a story about survival.

The network spawns from the success of The Adam Carolla Show, a nearly 4-year-old daily comedy podcast that eventually secured the Guinness World Record for most-downloaded podcast ever in 2011. During the podcast's early years, he asked himself a humble question.

"My first goal was just survival; can we make a business out of this?" he tells Mashable, saying it's a question many people have whether it's making sweaters for dogs, baking pies or making podcasts. "That's nine-tenths of the battle."

"Then comes the icing on the cake  or in this case, the  la mode on the pie  because that survival question has been answered," he adds.

The  la mode for Carolla appears to be the Video Podcast Network, which starting Tuesday night will serve as a hub for several comedy podcasts with a visual spin.

VPN's first podcast will feature Harley Morenstein, host of popular YouTube cooking show Epic Meal Time, and will air live on YouTube at 7 p.m. PST. You can watch it right here:

Video Podcast Network will post a podcast every Tuesday from Carolla.

"I'm not scared of doing it live. I like to wing it. Rehearsed or scripted sounds scary."

This week, however, VPN will deliver a comedic blitz. During the Sundance Film Festival in Utah on Friday and Saturday, VPN will live stream five video podcasts from comedians Tom Lennon and Paul Scheer as well as Comedy Bang Bang with Scott Aukerman, You Made This Weird with Pete Holmes, Who Charted? with Howard Kremer and Kulap Vilaysack, Call Chelsea with Chelsea Peretti, and Windy City Heat.

After Sundance, VPN will regularly feature podcasts from The Big 3 and Earwolf with producer Daniel Kellison at the helm of the network.

VPN will fall under the Adam Carolla Entertainment Broadcasting Network umbrella, which also manages the For Crying Out Loud podcast from Carolla's wife, Lynette. "If you're baking the pie, your wife is going to come into the kitchen" and create "her own cookies," he says.

The Adam Carolla Show also occasionally features their 6-year-old twins, Natalia and Santino, who sometimes jump into their dad's studio and grab the mic.

Carolla can only wonder what it will be like when his kids grow up and want to listen to his old podcasts  his self-described "audio diaries." Imagine going back to 1993 and hearing your parents talk about how someone "invented a telephone with no cord," he says. "It's weird."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Similar to how parents hide vegetables in grilled cheese sandwiches and pasta to get their kids to eat greens, finding a way to teach your kids to make healthy choices might take some creativity.

Dennis Ai, who developed a smartphone game for kids called JiveHealth, is one of 10 semifinalists in the End Childhood Obesity Innovation Challenge. In the game, players have to search for healthy foods in order to take their characters to the next level. So kids will learn about making smart food choices while immersed in a game.

The in-app game is the only tech-related semifinalist in the competition. The top three finalists will present their ideas at the Building a Healthier Future Summit in Washington, D.C., from March 6 to 8, 2013. First Lady Michelle Obama is likely to attend, along with more than 1,000 business, policy and health leaders, writes the blog BuiltInChicago.

More than one third of children and adolescents in 2008 were considered overweight or obese, according to the CDC. Overweight or obese children are likely to grow up to be overweight and obese adults, making them susceptible to a slew of chronic conditions and ailments over their lifetime.

This isn't the first time a company has tried to get kids practicing healthy habits through games. DanceDance Revolution recently announced it would bring a version of its game to schools so an entire class could play. And at this year's CES we discovered a health monitor for kids  the Ibitz lets kids earn rewards for their activity.

Do your kids play any games that teach them about health or get them moving? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
New England Patriots quarterback Tom Brady struts off the field and removes his helmet.

"Whoo! I'm white!" he yells, before high-fiving a teammate on the sideline.

No, that's not undercover audio from some hidden NFL Films clip. It's America's Game getting the Bad Lip Reading treatment  to hilarious effect.

For the uninitiated, BLR is a YouTube series that slaps comedic  yet visually believable  overdubs on famous people. They've already stuffed wacky words in the mouths of Paul Ryan, Katniss Everdeen and Barack Obama and Mitt Romney.

The video above shows your favorite coaches and players as you've never seen  er, heard  them before.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Drop a frog in hot water and he jumps out instantly. But submerge the little guy in cold H2O and heat the pot gradually, and you can cook him alive before he notices.

This morbid myth usually functions as a metaphor about social change, but it was also the inspiration behind the aptly titled music app Boil the Frog. And you play the part of the frog in this particular scenario.

The app operates on a simple conceit: Choose two musicians and Boil the Frog generates a playlist that links the two musical genres. It transitions so gradually that you might not notice song-to-song stylistic changes, even if the first and last artists are drastically different. The musical environment has changed around you. You are, effectively, boiled.

"I like the idea of this musical journey," says Paul Lamere, the app's developer. "Instead of just creating a static playlist of songs that all sound the same, I like the idea of being able to have a progression. I think that's how a lot of people like to listen to music, as well."

The programmer built Boil the Frog on top of two APIs: Rdio, which provides the music, and The Echo Nest, which provides "everything else." The music information company, where Lamere is director of developer platforms, has powered music apps for MTV and Spotify, among others.

The Echo Nest's music brain holds more than a trillion data points on 30 million songs, but Lamere decided he only needed a catalog of the 100,000 (or so) most popular musicians. An artist similarity algorithm allowed him to build a graph connecting these artists to their closest neighbors.

"The Echo Nest has a really good idea of 'If you like Weezer, we think you might be also interested in these 10 or 20 other bands that are very similar culturally and acoustically.'"

From there, he applied a short-path algorithm so users could make their way from one artist to another in a reasonable amount of time. But he wasn't done yet. Early on, Lamere found these paths could lead through pretty obscure territory. If you want a route from Jay-Z to Katy Perry, two of the biggest names in pop music, you probably don't want to stray far into the indie spectrum. So Lamere adjusted the graph. Now, popular artists more frequently lead to popular artists, and unknowns to unknowns.

He also collected a song catalog designed to lessen the shock of jumping between artists. By minimizing the energy jump from song to song, Lamere says users can avoid a head banger following a folk ballad. This ensures the ride from artist to artist is as smooth as possible.

If there are bumps along the way, of course, Lamere also programmed in an easy Bypass button so you can skip songs, rerouting around any song you don't want to hear, like a GPS guiding you to your final destination.

Boil the Frog might not be the most revolutionary music app of all time, but it is fun to play with. For Lamere, it's an old concept he was finally able to hammer out over the holidays. And it cuts through the tedium of some modern music discovery:

"Some of these music sites out there give you a radio experience. There's sort of a fatigue that comes in. It's just the same thing over and over again. So this is a way to listen to something that takes you someplace new."

Say you want to prove to your reluctant Belieber bestie that System of a Down might be up his alley. You could inundate him with System until he's sick of it, or just send him a link to the Bieber/System playlist (10 songs) and let the boiling begin.

Lamere admitted this kind of guided social music discovery was also part of the inspiration behind Boil the Frog. The idea iterated under a different name, Music Makeover, when the developer was trying to guide his teenage daughter from Miley Cyrus to Miles Davis.

Lamere released the app on his music technology blog, Music Machinery, where he also debuted another fun music app, The Infinite Jukebox, in November of last year. (Pro tip: Try loading Gangnam Style into The Infinite Jukebox. If you don't have Gangnam fatigue yet, you soon will.)

In the two weeks since its release, Boil the Frog has garnered "modest" traffic, Lamere says, as well as a fair amount of feedback. After some initial bug fixes, most of the comments have politely critiqued his app:

For now, Boil the Frog's Rdio infrastructure means only subscribers to the online music service will hear their playlists in full (otherwise, you'll get 30-second samples of each song). If you're having trouble deciding on a particular artist, check out Lamere's list of faves, like Mickey Mouse/deadmau5 or Elvis/Elvis. We also recommend Ben Folds/Ben Folds Five.

"I think this is where the tool really shines, is in music discovery," Lamere says. "Starting off with a slow, quiet song and building gradually to a high, energetic song is really appealing to me."

Have you boiled the frog yet? How did your playlist turn out? Make sure to let us know in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Get ready to meet the Long brothers  but be sure to have some tissue handy first.

Conner is 9-years-old, and Cayden is two years younger. Cayden was born with a debilitating condition called spastic cerebral palsy, but that hasn't stopped him from competing in triathlons (with a little help from his big brother). Cayden ditches his wheelchair for a cart or stroller, and Conner runs and bikes with Cayden in tow.

SEE ALSO: How Facebook Inspired One Woman's Incredible 'Tough Mudder'

The brothers were selected as Sports Illustrated Kids' "Sportskids of the Year" for 2012, and the incredible video above shares their story. It ends with some of the sports world's biggest names applauding the Long family as they take the stage to accept the award. To call the video a tearjerker would be an understatement, and to call it inspiring wouldn't do it justice.

It was posted on the Special Olympics Arizona Facebook page late last week, and has already been shared more than 160,000 times.

So grab the tissue and check it out, and then let us what you think in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
People are going to use smartphones in their cars whether we enable them or not, a GM spokesperson told Mashable at International CES 2013 when explaining the company's plans to create an in-car smartphone-syncing dashboard.

It's true that people have a hard time taking a break from their mobile device  even when they're behind the wheel. A new study from McKinsey shows that 35% of smartphone owners said they use them while driving. And those are just the ones who admitted it. Out of the 4,000 people surveyed for the report, 89% said they use their phone for calls while driving; 68% said for navigation and 39% said for SMS. The survey also shows that 55% of people ages 18 to 39 say they think in-car access to data is important. And 83% of that same group is willing to pay for in-car access.

At CES 2013, car companies like Ford and GM were eager to share their upcoming smartphone-integrated systems, plus initiatives to encourage developers to make more apps that consumers can use while in their cars.

Sound dangerous? There's definitely that potential since using your phone while driving is distracting: texting and driving makes an accident 23 times more likely; another report shows that up to 25% of all roadway accidents are gadget related. However, we have seen some apps that can be used to create safer drivers. Yet the statistics on gadget-related accidents, and what is working to prevent those accidents, are clear. Some states have passed bans on the use of mobile devices while driving: California, for instance, saw road fatalities decline by 22% in just two years after it implemented a ban on talking or texting on a mobile phone while driving.

But maybe the car companies have a point  the consumers are going to use their devices regardless, so they might as well make them more touch-free.

Scott Fosgard, infotainment communications manager for GM, told Mashable at International CES 2013 that safety would be a top priority for any in-car app they would install.

In-car apps would work through a dashboard installed in the car, so it could possibly require less of your attention than a smartphone.

At this point, car makers are open to any new ideas from developers for in-car apps. Some have suggested navigation apps; free streaming music apps; and apps that help people find the closest gas station while monitoring how much fuel their car has in its tank.

Do you think integrated in-car apps would be distracting for drivers? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Social networks like Facebook and Twitter may be gaining users at a quick pace, but at least one group continues to be hesitant about joining: CEOs.

Only 18% of the CEOs of the world's top 50 biggest companies by revenue have one or more social networking accounts, according to a study released Tuesday by global pr firm Weber Shandwick. By comparison, the firm conducted a similar study in 2010 and found that 16% of the top CEOs had at least one social networking account, suggesting that not much has changed in the past three years.

The problem, according to the firm's president of digital, Chris Perry, is that maintaining a profile can be time-consuming and the risks of doing so for CEOs may be viewed as outweighing the rewards. "There is a risk with off-the-cuff commentary," Perry told Mashable. "There are lots of examples of that hurting CEOs and the companies for being seen as undisciplined."

Indeed, the study found that one social network in particular  Twitter  has actually lost members of this elite CEO group, a fact that Perry says could be due in part to a greater perceived potential for risk there compared to LinkedIn or Facebook. Between 2010 and this year, the percentage of the top 50 CEOs on Facebook grew from 4% to 10% while the percentage on Twitter dropped from 8% to 2%.

There is at least one notable exception to this trend, however: GE's CEO Jeff Immelt joined Twitter in September and has tweeted several dozen times since.

It may be a sensible precaution for CEOs, but the downside is the company misses out on a potentially powerful way to engage with customers and get its message out there. What's more, the firm found that one-third of top CEOs had their names tied to fake social media accounts, showing the downside of not establishing a presence on these sites.

Even though the vast majority of top CEOs don't have personal accounts on social networking sites, they do maintain a social presence online on behalf of the company in other ways. Weber Shandwick found that 66% of the CEOs engaged online through biographies and videos on company websites as well as videos shared on YouTube, nearly double the 36% of CEOs who engaged this way back in 2010.

"These chief executives understand that their role does not change as storyteller-in-chief in the social age, it's just a matter of how do you participate through company-owned properties rather than personal properties," Perry said. "They understand they have to be a leading voice, but they don't think they have to spend their time amassing followers."
--------------------------------------------------------------
China has added 51 million new internet users in the last year, the Associated Press reports citing data from the China Internet Network Information Center.

Compared to 2011, China's internet user population rose 10 percent, bringing the total number to 564 million. That's more than the entire population of Russia and the U.S. combined.

The increase is largely due to a surge in mobile web surfing. The number of Chinese web surfers who access the internet from mobile phones, tablets and other wireless devices, rose 18.1 percent in 2012 to 420 million.

China's huge web usage growth comes despite the government's measures to prevent access to a large number of online services. The world's largest online social networks  Facebook, Google Plus and Twitter  have been completely blocked in China for years.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Air pollution over Beijing and other parts of eastern China shattered the air quality scales over the weekend, hitting 755 out of 500 (500 being bad) on the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency's standards.

The smog was really awful on the ground, with residents posting photos that look more like life on some sort of future Mars colony than on Earth. But what did the pollution look like from on above?

The U.S. National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration posted this photo taken on Sunday after the peak pollution levels had dissipated somewhat. Natural clouds appear as white, while smog and "other pollutants" make up that "dull, grey blanket over the region," per NOAA. Yikes.

The picture was taken by the NASA/NOAA Suomi NPP satellite, which orbits at 512.01 miles above Earth.

Here's what Beijing looked like from a terrestrial standpoint over the weekend:

What would you do if your city was so badly polluted?
--------------------------------------------------------------
Soon, you will be able to craft emails in Google Chrome using only your voice. Google updated the beta feed of its Chrome browser Monday with developer support for the Web Speech API.

The Web Speech API is a JavaScript API that lets web developers integrate speech recognition into their websites and web apps.

Google Chrome has had support for voice search for quite some time but as the Google Chrome blog points out, more robust dictation support could open up a lot of other opportunities.

Google built a demo showcasing the new API support in the new Chrome Beta that lets users compose an email using their voice.

I tested out the feature and was very impressed. Despite being on horribly laggy hotel Wi-Fi, the API worked well and was mostly accurate and fairly fast at understanding my voice.

Here's the text output of my voice dictation (which you can watch in the video above):

Aside from confusing "though" with "know" and getting slow at the end, it's not bad.

Because this API is JavaScript-based, it's something we can see working its way down to Chrome for Android  and maybe even Chrome for iOS. I know I'd love to record an interview but also have it auto-transcribe to Google Docs on my phone.

Apple added some similar built-in dictation features to OS X Mountain Lion, which works in almost any app or open text field. I can only imagine that Google will be bringing this feature to its Chromebooks in a future update.

If you want to get in on the fun or start building support for the Web Speech API in your own sites, check out this article on HTML5 Rocks and download the Chrome Beta here.
--------------------------------------------------------------
An anti-obesity ad rolled out this week from an unlikely source: Coca-Cola.

The soft drink giant unveiled a campaign that will take on what it's calling "the issue of this generation." The first ad in the campaign, the 2-minute spot above, notes that Coke can "play an important role" in the fight against obesity. The ad also points out that of its 650 beverages, Coca-Cola now offers 180 low- and no-calorie choices. In addition, the company has introduced smaller-portion drinks which Coke intends to have in 90% of the country by the end of the year. It's unclear whether another ad in the series will run during the Super Bowl. Coke has purchased three 30-second spots during the big game.

In a press release introducing the campaign, Coke cited several anti-obesity initiatives, including nutrition labeling, school beverage guidelines and Coca-Cola Troops for Fitness, which offers "military-style fitness classes like calisthenics, sit-ups, push-ups, pull-ups and other fitness and nutritional techniques to families in communities most in need of wellness services."

The push comes after the Center For Science in the Public Interest has been a vocal critic of Coke, linking its soft drinks to obesity and diabetes. In November, that organization worked with Alex Bogusky, a former adman who created ads for Coke, on "Real Bears," which featured a polar bear family rejecting soda after they got obese and sick from drinking it.

Bogusky on Monday took to Twitter to criticize Coke's latest campaign:

Meanwhile, the Michael Jacobson, executive director of the CSPI offered the following statement about the campaign on its Facebook Page:

"They're trying to stem the tide of criticism by taking a page out of crisis control 101, which is to pretend like they're concerned about the issue. If they were serious, they would stop advertising full-calorie drinks, charge less for lower calorie options, and stop fighting the soda tax. They're just running feel-good ads aimed at neutralizing criticism."

What do you think of Coke's new campaign? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
College basketball star C.J. Leslie scored 25 points to lead North Carolina State to an upset win over perennial power and in-state rival Duke on Saturday, but his most impressive feat came immediately following the game.

In a story that's become an online hit with sports fans this week, Leslie actually saved a wheelchair-using student from State fans' wild post-game storming of the court.

Here's how it went down:

Student Will Privette was one of hundreds to storm N.C State's home court immediately following the big win, but he was the only reveler in a wheelchair. This YouTube video shows the bumrush, and if you look closely, you can see Privette being wheeled out at turbo speed by a friend.

He was knocked over in the chaos amid a crowd of oblivious, out-of-control students. Luckily, Leslie  in the middle of the celebration  spotted Privette on the ground, lifted him up and carried him outside the melee.

A photo of Leslie's good deed then went viral online.

Privette was unharmed, and he and Leslie actually continued the celebration on their own from a safer distance.

I was originally just going to put him back in his chair. But when he got in my arms, he started cheering, so I was like, Wow, so I just kept cheering with him, Leslie told Today.com. It was about a good three or four minutes where he was in my arms, and we started cheering together.

After that, I had to put him down because my arm was getting a little tired, he added.

Privette also told Today.com that rushing the court on wheels was his idea, and that the person pushing him was, in fact, N.C. State's student-body president. A video that Privette shot on his phone shows the scary incident from his perspective:
--------------------------------------------------------------
Color is one of the hardest aspects of design to master. The infinite number of combinations means it can be a frustrating process to decide on a palette that perfectly suits your requirements. The color scheme you choose will affect the entire design, so be sure to dedicate plenty of care and attention to color management.

SEE ALSO: 10 Completely Useless Websites We Found in 2012

These 10 color combination tools will allow you to quickly and efficiently browse and create a variety of color schemes or palettes.

Which sites or resources do you use to create color combinations? Share some recommendations in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Before 26-year old programmer Aaron Swartz took his own life late last week, he was being charged with computer fraud and other crimes and facing jail time under a 1986 law called the Computer Fraud and Abuse Act (CFAA). That act, written before Swartz was born but amended several times since, has become a subject of intense debate following Swartz's death.

Swartz was arrested in 2011 after sneaking into a Massachusetts Institute of Technology network closet to use the school's JSTOR access to download a massive amount of academic research. He was later charged under the CFAA, which in part makes it illegal to "intentionally accesses a computer without authorization or exceeds authorized access, and thereby obtain ... information from any protected computer."

The charges against Swartz could have put him behind bars for up to 35 years and cost him $1 million in fines. A Wall Street Journal report said government prosecutors might have only sought a maximum of seven years but were willing to work down to less than a year in a plea deal that was ultimately rejected.

Some legal commentators have been citing Swartz's case as an example of why the CFAA needs to be reformed. Marcia Hofmann, senior staff attorney at the Electronic Frontier Foundation, published Monday a scathing critique of the CFAA. Hofmann argued the law doesn't clearly define "authorization," giving prosecutors plenty of wiggle room to use CFAA in cases that "aren't really about hacking a computer."

Hofmann pointed to United States v. Drew as an example, in which a woman created a faux MySpace profile to bully a young girl, who later committed suicide.

"No crime made the bullying itself illegal, so prosecutors charged Drew under the CFAA, claiming her fake profile violated MySpace's terms of use, which made her access to the social networking site's computers 'unauthorized,'" wrote Hofmann. "An obvious problem with this argument is that it would mean anyone who runs afoul of a web site's fine print is a criminal  and many of us intentionally or unintentionally violate those agreements every day."

Hofmann's second critique of the CFAA  and one that's shared by many of those who have commented on Swartz's circumstances  is that the legal penalties are "harsh and disproportionate to the magnitude of offenses." While Hofmann acknowledged a report that the government "might only seek seven years at trial," she argued that time is still "a wholly disproportionate penalty for Aaron's alleged actions."

SEE ALSO: Technology's Greatest Minds Say Goodbye to Aaron Swartz

Jennifer Granick, director of Civil Liberties at The Center for Internet and Society at Stanford Law School, wrote in a detailed analysis of CPAA, its history and its future post-Swartz that "another way of looking at the CFAA, is that it protects the box, regardless of other social values or laws regarding the information residing there."

Our laws try to balance the protection of information with other social goods, including freedom of expression and the public's right to know. So copyright is conditioned by fair use. Trade secrets are specifically defined and only protected against misappropriation. Classified information must be marked, and there is a cultural and legal history that enables news organizations and journalists who report on such issues to continue to operate. The CFAA doesn't care about any of that nuance. There's a bright line protecting the box, and even otherwise public data stored on the box is thereby subject to the system owner's control.

Animosity toward the CFAA and the prosecutors using it to prosecute Swartz hasn't been unanimous among commentators. Orin Kerr, a professor of law at the George Washington University Law School and Drew's legal representation in the previously mentioned Myspace bullying case, wrote that he believed the "charges against Swartz were based on a fair reading of the law," "none of the charges involved aggressive readings of the law or any apparent prosecutorial overreach" and "all of the charges were based on established caselaw."

"Indeed, once the decision to charge the case had been made, the charges brought here were pretty much what any good federal prosecutor would have charged," wrote Kerr.

SEE ALSO: MIT to Investigate its Role in Aaron Swartz Case

For Granick, who responded to Kerr in a separate blog post, it's exactly the CFAA's history that shows it should be changed.

"The CFAA is shockingly broad," Granick wrote. "Prosecutors shouldn't file CFAA cases just because they can under existing case law. To the contrary, this is why the CFAA should be amended and narrowed."

Do you believe it's the right time to revisit the Computer Fraud and Abuse Act? Share your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Consumers watched 11.3 billion online video ads last month, up from 7.1 billion ads viewed in December 2011.

According to comScore's report, ads accounted for more than 22% of all videos viewed. Ads from Google Sites received the most views for the month. The BrightRoll Video Network and Hulu also ranked in the top five platforms for most video ads seen.

More than 53% of the U.S. population saw a video ad in December. On average, each Internet user saw 70 ads for the month. Nearly 2 billion video ads were seen on the Google Sites platform. The BrightRoll Video Network came in second to Google for most ads seen. More than 1.8 billion ads were seen through BrightRoll.

LiveRail.com, Hulu, and Adap.TV rounded out the top five for most online video ads seen. Hulu specifically was responsible for more than 1.4 billion video ads viewed by Internet users. Hulu also garnered the highest frequency of ad views for the month. Users of the streaming video site saw an average of 65 ads in December. Google Sites came in second to Hulu in ad view frequency. The platform reportedly held a frequency of 20 ads per viewer.

Google Sites was also ranked number one in the category of unique viewers for general online video content. The platform had 153 million unique viewers in December. Facebook came in second for total unique viewers for the month. The social network had more than 58 million unique viewers for December.

According to comScore's study, 84.9% of the U.S. population saw an online video in December. The average length of an online video was reported to be 5.4 minutes long. While the average length of an online video ad was found to be 0.4 minutes long.

Statistics for the report come from comScore's Video Metrix platform. The platform analyzes online video viewing activities across multiple media channels to come up with a detailed analysis of online video trends.

This article originally published at ClickZ here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Online dating services want you to spend less time on your couch and more time meeting potential partners. The latest scheme? From the founders of OkCupid, a mobile app called Crazy Blind Date that serves up just what its name implies.

Here's how it works: After downloading the app to your iOS [iTunes link] or Android [Google Play link] device, you'll be asked to choose a picture of yourself, which the app will then divide up and scramble, Rubik's Cube-style, to distort your identity. (You can rearrange the tiles to make your facial features a little more distinct, if you wish.) You'll also hand over your age, gender and sexual orientation, or you can connect your OkCupid account to import that information automatically.

Next, you'll tell Crazy Blind Date when you're available and a few locations you'd be open to meeting at (say, 7 p.m. tonight at a bar in lower Manhattan). If a match is found, the app will message you to confirm the place and time. A half hour before the date is set to start, an anonymous chat window will appear so you can find your date (and help your date find you).

A few hours after the meeting, Crazy Blind Date will send you a request for feedback  and here's where the app's monetization strategy kicks in. If you had a good date, you'll be encouraged to give your date kudos: one kudos ($0.99) if you liked your date, and 10 kudos ($2.99) if you really liked him or her. The more kudos someone has, the higher he or she will be positioned in the dating queue. OkCupid co-founder Sam Yagan is betting that women will be the ones to pay for this, at a ratio of about 3:1. Whether or not the dates give each other kudos, they still have the option (if both parties agree) to message each other to set up a second date.

Yagan says the app isn't so much designed to help people meet their life partners as to enable them to have fun. "A lot of dates aren't going to work, but you are going to meet someone interesting," Yagan told Mashable in an interview last month. "And you're going to have a lot of stories."
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Curiosity rover will soon drill for the first rock sample in an area that NASA scientists call a "candy store" of Martian terrain. Full of flat rocks with puzzling veins, the site may explain the wet history of Mars.

NASA says this will be the most significant thing Curiosity has done since her perfectly timed landing back in August. Therefore, the Mars Science Laboratory (MSL) team will take their time drilling and analyzing this history-laden area in Yellowknife Bay, which is located in a very low point of the Gale Crater.

"Scientists are ecstatic about the kinds of things we are seeing in this area," says MSL project manager Richard Cook.

This site especially is interesting because it's filled with different types of sedimentary rock, signaling that Mars is geologically active. As the image below from Curiosity's Mastcam shows, the rocks are covered in whitish veins that tell us water moved through these networks. "This is the first time on this mission that we have seen something like this," says project scientist John Grotzinger.

Researchers used the rover's Mars Hand Lens Imager (MAHLI) to examine the diverse range of rocks in this area. Some are sandstone with peppercorn-sized grains, while others are siltstone with grains that have a texture similar to powdered sugar. According to MAHLI deputy principal investigator Aileen Yingst, grain size is important because it tells us strength of transport mechanism. "The stronger the transport, the larger the grain," she says.

Also notable is that, in this case, many of the grains are rounded. This tells us that they were "knocked around" during their formation, indicating that a fluid transported these grains.

The rover will drill a hole about 5 centimeters deep, retrieving a powdery sample that she will then send to her on-board chemistry lab. The first sample, about the size of half an aspirin, will be used to clean Curiosity's ChemCam instrument (in order to avoid contamination from Earth materials). It will take a couple of days for cleaning and a few weeks to analyze the samples, according to Yingst.

SEE ALSO: How the Mars Curiosity Rover Works

"When it comes to drilling we just happen to be in a really sweet spot to do that," says Grotzinger. "There will be discoveries that we'll make that we have never thought of before [...] We've got some really good stuff here to look at."

The team first spotted this area from orbit, noting its particularly interesting thermal inertia data. Later, on sol (that's a day on Mars) 120 and 121 of Curiosity's mission, scientists observed drastic temperature changes as she crossed the boundary into Yellowknife Bay. Suddenly, the lows were lower, and the highs were higher.

"It's like we entered a whole different world," says Grotzinger. "We don't know what's causing this change. We couldn't have predicted any of this stuff from orbit, and we can't wait to get drilling on this stuff."

The rock chosen for drilling is called "John Klein," a fitting tribute to former Mars Science Laboratory deputy project manager John W. Klein, who passed away in 2011.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Microsoft unveiled a neat contest for developers, giving them a chance to have their app featured in a Windows Phone television ad.

The contest, which officially started Monday, is called Windows Phone Next App Star, and is open to Windows Phone developers worldwide. Participation is easy: Just have a killer app, and you'll get a chance to be featured in a primetime TV ad in the U.S.

The top 64 apps will be chosen based on user rating, app quality and successful implementation of new Windows Phone 8 features, such as Live Tiles. The 64 entries will then vie for public votes in a head-to-head competition that whittles down candidates until the best app is chosen.

Microsoft promises thousands of dollars in prizes for developers of the 64 selected apps. Other winnings include a Nokia Lumia 920 Windows Phone and a free, one-year Dev Center subscription.

Registered Windows Phone app developers can opt in by visiting the Dev Center by March 5. Developers who haven't yet developed a Windows Phone app can participate as well, by registering and publishing an app by March 5.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Want your favorite Disney and Pixar characters to come together in one epic video game? Disney executives announced on Tuesday in Los Angeles a new gaming platform that does just that  and even features real-life game pieces that make it come alive.

Disney Infinity, which is currently in development with Avalanche Software and will debut in June, will feature 17 plastic characters  and 40 interactive pieces  from both Disney and Pixar movies to power the game. The toys will focus on upcoming film Monsters University, as well as The Incredibles and Pirates of the Caribbean. It will also come with a base, so when figures are placed on top, they can play certain experiences. Meanwhile, each film has its own Playset (or gaming universe) that can combine up to three characters from other films.

However, the company stressed its more of an interactive gaming platform than just a typical game. Disney Infinity will come to gaming consoles such as Xbox 360, Playstation 3, Wii U and Wii systems, and will also come to mobile and online platforms, as well.

Disney is facing some tough competition in the interactive toy market. Activision's Skylanders franchise, released in 2011, also combines collectable toys with a video game for a unique interactive experience. Activision announced Monday the franchise had grossed more than $500 million in the U.S. since launch.
--------------------------------------------------------------
People who buy the Downton Abbey season three pass on iTunes will get access to the final three episodes on Jan. 29 before PBS airs them on TV in the United States.

The new season of the British-American period drama premiered in the U.S. on Jan. 6, months after debuting in the United Kingdom. The iTunes season pass, which costs $19.99, will give people the unedited UK versions of the final three episodes.

The show's TV finale is Feb. 17, so the pass gives fans a well-advanced viewing opportunity.

Apple teases season three on iTunes as such: "The Great War is over and the long-awaited engagement of Lady Mary and Matthew is on, but all is not tranquil at Downton Abbey as wrenching social changes, romantic intrigues, and personal crises grip the majestic English country estate for a third thrilling season."

SEE ALSO: 'Downton Abbey' Seasons 1 and 2 Explained in 5 Minutes

On Sunday, Maggie Smith won the Golden Globe for Best Performance By An Actress In A Supporting Role In A Series, Miniseries or Motion Picture Made For Television. She plays Violet Crawley, the Dowager Countess of Grantham.
--------------------------------------------------------------
When you don't feel well, or need to find a doctor in your area, do you check Google first? The Internet has become the go-to place to look for medical information for 35% of U.S. adults, according to the latest Pew Internet and American Life Project Health Online 2013 report.

Half of those who searched for medical information online sought out a doctor's opinion as a follow-up as well. But what if you could do both at the same time?

With 59% of U.S. adults saying they looked for health information online within the past year, it seems whether for convenience, ease of use, free opinions or any number of reasons, people are gravitating to the online world when it comes to finding out about their health.

That's why Jeff Arnold, the founder of popular site WebMD, is so excited about Sharecare.

I sat down with him after the Digital Health Summit at the International CES last week to learn more about the social platform, and why cardiologist and TV personality Dr. Mehmet Oz is a partner and huge fan.

Jeff Arnold says his goal with Sharecare was to form partnerships and humanize health in a way that would have a measurable impact. So he created a site that lets people find health experts, connect and share stories, and get information on topics ranging from the flu to autism.

He's working with hospitals and companies to help educate consumers and wants Sharecare to be the place people go to search for health info.

The fact is though, when you look at the Pew survey results, most people start their search for health care at a search engine. They don't necessarily head to one of the health verticals.

That's probably because people don't engage with health on a daily basis, usually just when they're sick and need information. The question is, will they trust social health sites to give them safe, reliable information and recommendations?

SEE ALSO: Internet Is First Stop for Many Ill People, Study Finds

Dr. Oz sees Sharecare and other health verticals as a "Facebook with health info." It's a place people can go to get information, share and engage. He tells me there needed to be a "playful, fun, uplifting way to get the public engaged in health."

Not all doctors have their own TV show, of course, and not many even have the social expertise to create their own Facebook page to engage with patients. Sharecare allows them to get referrals by answering questions and to communicate with a broad array of potential clients.

When people looks for answers, Dr. Oz says, "they want concise, clear info they can trust."

Sharecare is expanding, having just launched the HealthMakers 250 video channel, which is an online library of over two thousand videos by prominent health figures.

Jeff Arnold says getting info on the site is like building your own virtual medical team and, with this technology, it seems there is the potential for much more. Patients will be able to schedule appointments online, exchange messages through email and, as Dr. Oz put it, "create an experience where you feel like you control your body and take away intimidating elements."

Would you search for health care info and doctor referrals on a health vertical? What kind of information would you like to see available?
--------------------------------------------------------------
If you ever used it, you know Facebook Search barely counts as such. Its absolutely awful. As of Tuesday, however, its about to go from zero to hero.

To understand how fundamentally better Facebooks new Graph Search will be, just spend five minutes using the current excuse of a search engine. Yes, thats right, it stinks.

Sure, theres some word-wheeling in there  where suggested results start appearing as soon as you type a few letters  but the quality of the results ain't great. its just an endless number of Facebook pages that have little relation to your query.

When I type in "friends in NY", my top result is "Best Friends Animal society  New York City." Second is "Friends in Deed." Scrolling through all the results, theres nothing that relates to me or my existence on Facebook.

Facebooks Graph Search, though I hate the name, promises to change all that. Based on what we learned today, Im inclined to believe it.

Graph Search uses all that data we've been pouring into Facebook for the last eight years  all that wonderful structured data  and lets you search against it in pretty much any way you can imagine.

According to Facebooks promotional video and CEO Mark Zuckerbergs presentation, you can type in real-world, real-language questions you might ask for instant and useful answers.

Two examples Facebook gave clearly illustrate the power:

So you could start with a simple search like "Find friends who work at my company." Thats nice, but then Facebook lets you add in who like to ski  a cross reference of the graphed data to get some truly interesting results.

Naturally, these searches work with all the assets you drop in Facebook, making a search like photos of my friends before 1995 a rewarding experiencing.

This may be the first Facebook innovation in a while that excites small business, since users will now be able to search for local firms that their friends like. They get to cross reference interests, too  so if they like the right kind of food in the area, that result is more useful.

Im sure it will help big brands on Facebook, too. Most of their structured data is public, and I expect to see a lot more serendipitous discovery of brands, services and products that fit your needs.

You'll notice the focus on Likes. Thats right, sentiment is now part of the search engine. Facebooks secret sauce. Its a key component and the one that should make Google, which has been struggling to integrate Google+ and its +1's with its own world-leading search engine, very nervous.

I suspect that Facebooks Graph Search will be powerful enough to cause Facebook a world of privacy trouble. No, Facebook isn't changing any of its privacy policies for the new search, but once you have a super-easy-to-use tool that can unearth previously hidden or hard-to find information, people are going to freak out a little.

Nothing you have set as private will appear, but everything you forgot to set as private (or simply forgot you ever posted and left as public) will appear.

Try not to freak out, and dont blame Facebook. This is something the service has to do, and it is going to make Facebook a million times better. I suggest that you prepare for it by carefully combing through your Timeline and privacy settings to ensure that everything you want private is now private.

You may also want to ask some friends to un-tag you on, ahem, certain photos.

We dont know everything about Facebook Graph search. For instance, pretty much all the examples and explanation we got talks about Facebooks meta, interest and connections information about you: who you are, where you work, what you like, who your friends are. There was no mention of status updates.

Can Facebook Graph search within posts? To do so, Facebook would have to index every word in every update and do keywords searches. Theyd still apply the same privacy settings, but the results would be even more fascinating for a query like "Friends from Palo Alto who said they like sunshine and wish the Oscars weren't four hours long in 2004."

Thats a much heavier lift, and probably not something Facebooks still-in-beta Graph Search is ready to do, but they could be on their way. Microsofts search engine, Bing!, is integrated, after all.

For now, Bing Integration sounds more like another room in the house, rather than a new sink or oven. It lets you search the web outside Facebook and bring the results inside. That may annoy the heck out of Google, but it will not change your world all that much  yet.

Overall, Im far more excited about Facebooks latest announcement than I thought Id be. No, its not a new phone (you do not need a Facebook phone) and its not Zuckerberg stepping away to become a philanthropist (too young), but it is the thing Facebook needs the most.

Facebooks Graph Search will be a game changer on so many levels  and could be just the thing the social network needs to reach even greater heights.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Facebook says its new Graph Search functionality has the potential to become a reporter's left hand.

As journalists are always on the hunt for new sources and pictures to accompany stories, the social network's latest smart search features could reveal a wealth of opportunities for uncovering new information. Perhaps the biggest areas for members of the media include sifting through public photos on the site and looking for experts.

Facebook announced on Tuesday a new and improved internal search system, allowing users to look within their own social graph for specifics  from revealing which friends like certain TV shows or which pictures were taken by friends in, say, New York City.

 

"The new search enables journalists to do richer searches when trying to find an expert for a story," Facebook said in a blog post. "For example, say youre doing a story on a specific company and youre looking to interview someone who works at the company in their New York office, you could do this by searching for 'People who work at ACME Inc in New York' to find potential employees to reach out to."

Reporters can narrow the search even more to find those that work at the company with a specific title, and do the same when looking for pictures.

SEE ALSO: Facebook Graph Search Could Be Its Greatest Innovation

"With more than 240 billion photos on Facebook, Graph Search makes it easier to find public photos and filter the results, such as finding photos posted within a specific location (as broad as photos within a city to photos posted at a specific landmark based on location tags from users)," the company said. "This could serve as a great tool during breaking news situations or even to conduct research about a location to get a sense of what it appears like visually."

For example, Facebook describes how using the site during the 2012 London Olympics could been a key tool for finding images: "If you were a journalist covering the story, you would be able to do custom search (i.e. 'photos taken at Olympic Park') to find photos uploaded within a specific area and reach out to potential sources and, if they provide permission, their photos in your story."

At the same time, Facebook said the move will make it easier for users to follow with journalists by typing in "journalists" into the find pages section.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Facebook on Tuesday introduced "Graph Search," a new search technology that will allow users to find content based on certain criteria  "tourist attractions in Italy visited by my friends," for example.

Graph Search almost immediately sparked questions about user privacy. What will Graph Search mean for your Facebook privacy?

People will be able to use Graph Search to find any content that you already share with them. Uploaded some public, geo-tagged photos of the Empire State Building? They're Graph Searchable by anyone and everyone. Like "Toy Story 3?" If your likes are public, that like is Graph Searchable by all. Checked-in to Golden Gate Park, but you have your privacy set so only friends can see your check-ins? That's Graph Searchable, but only by your friends. And so on.

Ultimately, any of your content that could be discovered before Graph Search will be discoverable after Graph Search, and it will not cause any content to be revealed that wasn't already accessible.

"It makes finding new things much easier, but you can only see what you could already view elsewhere on Facebook," reads a Facebook press release.

One important point: Like before, any photo of you that someone else uploads will be searchable per that user's privacy settings. As an example, if a friend uploads a picture of you at a bar, geo-tags it and sets it as public, it will be Graph Searchable to anyone who searches for pictures from that bar. You can, however, make sure to untag yourself or request the uploader of the photo remove it from Facebook or change the privacy settings.

To help ensure Facebook users have set their privacy settings to their liking before Graph Search reveals any unpleasant surprises, Facebook has began asking users to "review who can see your stuff." You should expect a prompt with that language to appear on Facebook shortly.

"We realize that people are going to care what shows up about them in search," Facebook CEO Mark Zuckerberg said while unveiling Graph Search.

Still have questions about Facebook's new Graph Search and your Facebook privacy? Watch the explainer video from Facebook embedded at the top of this post. Are you concerned about Graph Search and Privacy, or do you have more questions about it? Share in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Google's stock price barely budged on the news of Facebook's Graph Search after investors concluded that the search giant has little to fear from Facebook.

That's because Graph Search is more akin to Yelp or Foursquare  at least in its current incarnation  than Google. That's not to say, however, that Facebook isn't going after the search advertising market. Back in August, Facebook released Sponsored Results, its first search ad units. Sponsored Results will pop up when you use Graph Search, according to the Facebook Studio blog.

It's unclear whether another ad unit will replace Sponsored Results. A rep for the company declined to comment. Debra Aho Williamson, an analyst at eMarketer, says she believes Facebook will roll out another search ad unit. She sees two possibilities: Search ads on the right-hand column, and ads that show up in the top, rather than in the second tier, of search results.

Sponsored Results, meanwhile, is a fair stopgap solution. A search for "dogs" called up an ad for Porch Potty Pet Supplies, which is logical. But a search for "cats" yielded a Sponsored Result for Traily, the personality test that has nothing to do with cats. Nevertheless, the ads are effective. Click-through rates for Sponsored Results ranged from 0.7% to 4.1% in September for a sample measured by researcher Optimal. Even at the low end of that range, that's 10% better than Facebook's Marketplace ads.

Whatever ad unit Facebook winds up using, Williamson points out that Facebook's huge size will make it one of top players in search. If Facebook gets just 10% of its revenues from search ads this year then it will have made around $268 million, making it the fourth-largest player in search, ahead of AOL.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Facebook's big search announcement appears to have unnerved investors for at least one tech company: Yelp.

Yelp's stock dropped by more than 8% on Tuesday to as low as $20.16 a share after Facebook announced the beta version of a smarter search engine called Graph Search. The new search tool lets Facebook users search for businesses based on their social graph, using queries like "sushi restaurants that my friends have been to in Los Angeles."

While the feature is still in its early stages, it poses a potential threat to Yelp, a company whose bread and butter is serving as a resource to recommend businesses to consumers. Yelp may have 84 million monthly visitors and tons of 33 million reviews, but Facebook may reduce the incentive to check those reviews if it can quickly suggest a restaurant based on where one's friends have gone.

Yelp isn't the only company whose stock dropped right after the Facebook announcement.

IAC/InterActiveCorp, the company that owns Match.com and OkCupid, saw its stock drop by more than 2% as Facebook demonstrated how one could potentially use Graph Search as a dating tool to look up single people in a specific region who are friends with your friends.

LinkedIn's stock also dipped slightly by about 0.3% after the announcement, perhaps in reaction to the fact that Graph Search can pull up job opportunities from your social graph.

Facebook's stock, meanwhile, was down by more than 2% in trading as of publication, as investors appeared disappointed the company didn't announce other rumored products like a Facebook phone, operating system, new ad products or a more traditional search engine that pulls up links.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Now we know what Facebook is building: a better internal search system.

Speaking at a much-hyped event at Facebook HQ, founder and CEO Mark Zuckerberg announced a raft of improvements to "graph search"  that is, the ability to search within your social graph for specifics.

The search improvements involve the ability to ask questions in regular English, such as "which of my friends live in New York?" The search is now intelligent enough to rank your friends based on how much interaction you've had  so that closer friends will appear higher up the results list.

It can also search based on stories or photos you've Liked. One example Zuckerberg offered: the site can now display which of his friends have Liked the HBO show Game of Thrones. You can search for people who Like multiple products or services, which seems likely to be a bonanza for marketers.

Photos can also be ranked by which have the most Likes, based on the people most important to you in your Friends list. And one of the most useful use cases appears to be searching for local businesses that have received a thumbs-up from friends (and their friends).

Graph search starts today in beta, and will appear as a large blue search bar at the top of your Facebook page. You can sign up for the beta  or rather, join the Waiting List for a beta invite  here.

Zuckerberg was careful to emphasize that Graph Search is a new and limited product. For now, it will focus on four areas: people, photos, places and interests.

Here's what it looks like:

"With Graph Search you combine phrases (for example: 'my friends in New York who like Jay-Z') to get that set of people, places, photos or other content that's been shared on Facebook," wrote product manager Tom Stocky and engineering manager Lars Rasmussen on Facebook's official announcement blog post.

"We believe they have very different uses."

The pair were also careful to assuage privacy concerns:

In cases where it can't find anything useful for you, Graph search will default to a web search  powered by Facebook's partner, Microsoft's Bing. Zuckerberg reluctantly revealed that negotiations with Google that would have allowed the search giant access to Facebook results had broken down.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Facebook is building something, and its ready to show it off. The social network is holding an event Tuesday at its Menlo Park headquarters where it plans to show the press what it has up its sleeve.

Typically only invited on campus in small groups, the sheer number of press expected at Tuesday's event indicates the company likely has something big in store.

Is Timeline getting a new overhauled look? Will we finally see the long-rumored Facebook phone?

Ill be there at 10 a.m. PST documenting it all.

THE LATEST: Facebook Unveils a Smarter Search Engine | Facebook's Graph Search for Businesses | Graph Search: Facebook's Greatest Innovation? | Graph Search and Privacy | Journalists and Facebook's Graph Search | Graph Search and Sponsored Results | Hands On With Facebook's Graph Search
--------------------------------------------------------------
Facebook's Graph Search isn't just for looking up your old buddies and potential new friends, it's also designed for Business Pages.

The company gave the example of a search for "sushi restaurants that my friends have been to in Los Angeles" and TV shows my friends like. Though these are largely organic results rather than paid ads ("There are no new ad formats available today," Facebook noted on its marketer-friendly Facebook Studio blog), Sponsored Stories will show up in searches as will Sponsored Results.

Overall rankings will be based on top search suggestions including people, Pages, apps, places, groups and suggested searches. The results are also based on data shared by a business and connections of the person searching. In the blog post, Facebook urged business owners to "Continue to invest in your Page" by making sure it's up-to-date. That means updating addresses to show up in local searches and cultivate "the right fans."

The post noted that web searches will continue to be supplied by Bing.

Though it's possible Facebook will unveil paid search ads at a later date, for the moment the company is sticking to its strategy of encouraging businesses to make more engaging Pages. For brands like Coca-Cola or Toyota, it provides further incentive to cultivate and interact with as many fans if possible, if only to come up first in a search for "Sodas my friends like" or "Cars my friends recently bought."
--------------------------------------------------------------
When Congress was debating the Stop Online Piracy Act back in late 2011, a report alleged staff at the U.S. House of Representatives were downloading pirated content illegally  the exact practice SOPA was intended to fight.

Fast forward to today, and it seems House employees are still grabbing TV episodes and movies on the digital down-low.

Computers in the House of Representatives have been used to download "dozens" of films and television shows, according to a report by ScanEye shared with U.S. News and World Report. ScanEye works by tracking IP addresses used to download files via BitTorrent. ScanEye matched IP addresses of downloaders with the House through use of IP-to-location finder MaxMind.

BitTorrent is commonly used to pirate content but also used to share legitimate files. However, ScanEye's analysis shows that much of the content downloaded by IP addresses in the House are most likely protected by copyright law: Episodes of popular television shows Glee and Dexter and films such as Lawless and The Cabin in the Woods, for example.

There's even a DVD rip of Life of Pi  which won't be officially released until March 5  listed in ScanEye's report.

SEE ALSO: BitTorrent Surges to 100 Million Active Users

US News' report notes it doesn't include "every Congressional office"  the Senate is notably absent  "so the number of illegal downloads may be higher."

Mashable has reached out to ScanEye for data regarding the Senate's downloading practices. We will update this story with any response. ScanEye's report is embedded below.

Does it surprise you that federal employees are allegedly pirating content? Share in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A mysterious Japanese teaser site appeared Tuesday morning with silhouettes from the Final Fantasy universe and a date of Jan. 17.

Fans were left to speculate on social media if the wordless webpage posted by publisher Square Enix was related to a particular game in the Final Fantasy franchise or perhaps a new product entirely. Most of the sprite-shaped silhouettes are recognizable to fans as characters from Final Fantasy VI, originally released in 1994, but a few of the characters could also be from other games.

There is also reason to believe the game is coming to iOS, since Jan. 17 falls on a Thursday, the weekly release date for new iOS games. Square Enix has also been active about releasing Final Fantasy games and other titles to iOS over the last year.

We're reached out to Square Enix, but until then we'll have to wait until Thursday to see this mystery revealed. What do you think the teaser image means? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Aside from the free champagne and opportunity to watch your great aunt do the Cha-Cha Slide, photo booths are the highlight of any wedding.

With sombreros, oversized frames and boas, the taking of gratuitous, timed selfies of you and your friends heightens every event. And a Chicago-based company has a new take on the experience with Fotio, a photo booth without the actual booth.

Event planners Nick Harvey and Theresa McMullen created a custom, vintage-inspired view camera shell from solid oak, brass and leather. Hidden inside is a Canon T4i dSLR and a 20-inch iMac, and the subject controls the shutter by pressing a red, wired button. Check out the video, above, for more.

SEE ALSO: New Tool Enables Wireless Tethered Photography

Instead of prints, the photos are displayed on the iMac screen in random slideshow format, because "people love posting pictures online and talking about them right after an event," Fotio's creators say on their site.

It's intended to be a social experience, where everyone gathers around the screen to view shots of different guests.

"We are more interested in a truly unlimited photo experience that's more like a photo shoot and gets the craziest and best photos," Harvey told Mashable. Fotio was inspired by Harvey and McMullen's DIY photo booth they created for their own wedding.

With Fotio, each guest gets a custom red ticket with information for a password-protected online gallery, which is uploaded within 24 hours. All pictures displayed are black and white but at the end of the event, the party planner receives a USB with files in full color.

Getting Fotio at your next function will cost you $600 for 6 hours.

What do you think of the photo booth experience sans booth? Tell us your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
"Now this is a story all about how my life got flipped, turned..."

Did you finish the lyric and then possibly the entire song? Congratulations, you probably watched a lot of television in the 1990s.

The catchy theme song to The Fresh Prince of Bel-Air lives deep in the brains of pop culture junkies. That's why the creative folks at YouTube channel collectivecadenza decided to turn the tune upside down with help from Google Translate.

SEE ALSO: 7 Pianists + 1 Piano = This Cover of Jay-Z and Kanye West's 'Paris'

Collectivecadenza ran the original lyrics through Google's magical translate machine to Mandarin Chinese and then back to English. Not satisfied with just one new version, they then dragged the song through five of the world's most used languages and created a fresh lyrical take on Will Smith's memorable ode to high-class living.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A picture is worth 1,000 laughs  with the right filter and caption, of course. Instagram is quickly becoming a great outlet for visual wit.

If you need a dose of humor in your Instagram feed, look no further than these funny photographers. Check out our picks above and share yours in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Theres an old joke about a man who reads Shakespeare for the first time and is spectacularly unimpressed: "Why do people call this good writing? Its nothing but clichs!"

On the blog Least Helpful, dedicated to collecting "daily dispatches from the Internets worst reviewers," that clueless reader reviews Homer, Zippo lighters, Target and everything else on the Internet.

Homers not the only writer from antiquity who leaves modern readers cold. This guy faults Aesops Fables for being overly, well, fable-ish:

Its been almost 10 years since an anonymous seventh-grader wrote this review of H.G. Wells's Time Machine. Hopefully, his understanding of science has matured since then.

Or maybe the reviewer grew up to be this guy:

We can think of many reasons a gay bar might deserve a bad review: nasty-tasting drinks, poor-quality sound system, unfriendly wait staff  but this bar-hopper in Glasgow, Scotland, had a different complaint:

Disclaimer: Weve owned Zippo lighters in the past, and have bought Zippo lighter fluid too. Its true that this next review isnt exactly overflowing with helpful or informative commentary, but seriously, its lighter fluid. What else is there to say?

Its probably not fair to single out Target in this next example. Corporate retailers in general tend to be pretty laissez-faire about spirits of the undead haunting their stores (even stores that offer a great deal on socks).

And the hotel and hospitality industry isnt much better:

This article originally published at The Daily Dot here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Developers who want to get their hands on Googles Project Glass wont have to wait much longer.

Google announced plans Tuesday to hold a Glass Foundry in San Francisco and New York in the coming weeks: Two full days of hacking that will allow developers to get an early look at Glass and start developing for the platform.

The first day of the event will be an introduction to Glass, while the second will explore the Mirror API, which gives you the ability to exchange data and interact with the user over REST. Google engineers will be on site to help developers at any point in the process.

At the end of the second day, there will also be the opportunity for developers to show off what theyve been working on, with some special guest judges on hand to take a look at all the entries.

Google co-founder Sergey Brin demonstrated Google Glass during the companys annual developer conference last year. The glasses offer the ability to record video, get weather updates, and see messages from your friends.

Developers who were in attendance at the conference were able to order Explorer Editions of the glasses for $1,500. Those glasses are expected to ship to developers early this year, however, an exact ship date has yet to be announced.

Glass Foundry will be held in San Francisco from Jan. 28 to 29 and in New York from Feb. 1 to 2. Both events require registration and are available only to a limited number of developers.

Developers who take part in the Glass Foundry events will be able to use units on-site.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Green Dot wants to disrupt the banking industry in the same way that Apple disrupted the music industry.

Green Dot, the largest provider of prepaid debit cards in the U.S., announced Tuesday that it is launching a new bank account called GoBank which is specifically designed for consumers with smartphones.

Rather than partner with an existing banking institution, Green Dot designed GoBank from the ground up to be truly mobile-first. For starters, customers can quickly set up an account from their phone using GoBank's mobile website or apps for Android and iPhone. GoBank members can send money to friends and family for free through e-mails, texts and Facebook notifications.

GoBank has also implemented several novel features that may not be necessities, but will likely appeal to a generation raised on smartphones and social networks. For example, you can customize your debit card with a photo taken from Facebook instead of simply having a bank logo on the card, or you can turn to the Fortune Teller feature in the app to determine whether to make a purchase based on your current budget.

The bank, which is FDIC insured, has no branches to walk into or tellers to deal with. Instead, GoBank offers a network of 40,000 fee-free ATMs around the country that consumers can visit to withdraw and deposit funds. Green Dot has also partnered with Walmart, which will accept deposits in stores, and the company hopes to partner with other retailers in the future.

"We have tried to bring everything we always wanted in a bank and take out all the things we hate about a bank," said Sam Altman, the EVP of mobile for Green Dot, told Mashable. As part of that effort, GoBank has also eliminated some of the most derided aspects of traditional banks, including overdraft fees, minimum balance requirements and overly complicated fee disclosure forms. In their place, GoBank has just four fees up front and has adopted the Radiohead model of asking users to determine how much they are willing to pay for a monthly fee.

For Green Dot, which went public in 2010, building a bank account was part of its original vision, but it took a long time to develop. Altman says the company made its first effort to purchase a charter bank in Utah in 2010  a "long and painful process" which took nearly two years to complete. Green Dot also held discussions with some existing banking institutions about why they hadn't implemented these steps and whether there was an opportunity to partner in the future, but ultimately, he says, "no bank wanted to be as innovative as we needed."

In the meantime, a couple other companies have attempted to innovate the banking experience for mobile. Simple, a startup formerly known as BankSimple, launched an online-only bank in 2010 to eliminate fees and work better on smartphones. Likewise, American Express partnered with Walmart last year to launch Bluebird. Altman expects that more startups and larger companies will begin to innovate in this space in the coming years.

Green Dot is banking on the assumption that consumers are frustrated enough with existing big banks and fees to consider switching to a new institution. The hope for Green Dot, which had 4.4 million active prepaid accounts as of last quarter, is that this will significantly expand its customer base. That said, as Altman points out, the new bank account will likely prove less popular among an older demographic who are "still more comfortable with physical branches and tellers." But, he says, "if you live on Facebook and your phone all the time, then we're probably a great choice."

GoBank is currently available in beta and will accept around 20,000 users in the next couple months before launching publicly.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Facebook unveiled Graph Search on Tuesday, a new way to search for things youre looking for on the social network.

Meant for uncovering information in your Facebook network, Graph Search can be used to search for something simple like Photos of my friends," or something more complex like Photos of my friends before 1990 uploaded by my mom.

The service is in beta now, with only a few hundred people gaining access Tuesday. Facebook will be using results from those initial users to help tweak the service, before it pushes it out to the whole of the Facebook community.

As one of the lucky ones granted early access to Graph Search, I took the service for a spin. Check out some of the searches I was able to do on Facebook in the gallery above.

What sorts of searches would you like to be able to do on Facebook? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The ice cube is getting a much-needed 21st century upgrade thanks to a 23-year-old MIT student.

Dhairya Dand's Cheers is a set of LED ice cubes that change color from green to yellow to red depending on how much you've imbibed. The cubes also send a message to your designated friend if you've passed your limit. Oh yeah, they also light up to ambient music and noise.

As the video above explains, Dand came up with the idea three weeks after he was rushed to the hospital with an alcohol-induced blackout. Soon after he went to work on the project, which employs an LED, an accelerometer, IR transcievers and a battery, and are ensconced in an "edible and tasty" jelly cube. The accelerator detects motion and calculates how many sips you've had. That, coupled with the timer cube, provides an estimate to your relatively drunkenness.

The only catch: These cubes don't come cheap. It cost Dand $50 in materials to make them. On the other hand, they don't melt, either.
--------------------------------------------------------------
When you're sick or have a health concern, is the Internet the first place you turn to for information? A new study shows the web is just a starting place for finding health information  most people still see a doctor for serious concerns.

In a Pew study released today, 35% of U.S. adults say they've used the Internet to diagnose themselves or someone else. And about half of those people followed up with a doctor's visit.

The Pew Research Centers Internet & American Life Project released further data that shows how the more than 3,000 U.S. adults surveyed answered. 59% of U.S. adults say they looked online for health information within the past year. One in four people seeking health information on the web encountered a pay wall. Most tried to find the information somewhere else, some gave up on their quest and only 2% paid a fee.

"Online health information is available day or night, at no cost, and the Internet has become a de facto second opinion for many people," Susannah Fox, an associate director of the project and lead author of the report, said in a statement.

But for serious health issues, most people still see a doctor, or interact with others in person. 70% of U.S. adults found information, care or support from a doctor or other healthcare professional. 60% turned to family or friends for information or support. And 24% found help from others with the same health condition. Most of these interactions occurred offline.

Consumers consult the web for health information, but one place they don't check too often are review websites.

"There has been little growth in the use of health care-related review sites," the study notes. "One in five Internet users have consulted online reviews and rankings of health care service providers and treatments, compared with, for example, the eight in 10 Internet users who say they have researched a general consumer product or service online. And only 3 to 4% of Internet users have posted a health care-related review."

This data was taken from a nationwide survey of 3,014 adults living in the United States. Interviews were done in English and Spanish.

Where do you go on the web to find information about health? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Iranian space officials announced they will make another attempt to launch a live monkey into space within the next month, according to news reports.

"Testing phase of these living capsules has ended and monkeys to be sent to space are now in quarantine," Hamid Fazeli, head of the Iranian Space Agency, was quoted as saying by the country's Mehr News Agency on Tuesday (Jan. 15).

"These monkeys will be sent into space according to a timetable on Fajr Ceremonies," Fazeli said, referring to a 10-day period in the beginning of February when the Iranian Revolution is commemorated. He added that the capsule is called Pishgam, which means "pioneer" in Farsi.

Iran apparently failed in a 2011 effort to launch a live monkey into space. News reports out of the country at that time did not explain what went wrong, but the plan had been to send a rhesus monkey into orbit atop a Kavoshgar-5 rocket.

A successful mission this time around would seem to advance Iran's goal of sending a human into space by 2020 and an astronaut on the moon by 2025.

"Monkeys have similarities to humans, so with them in space, we can examine human factors in space," Fazeli told Mehr News.

Iran has made progress in spaceflight technology in recent years. The country sent its first domestically built satellite into space in February 2009 and launched a Kavoshagar-3 rocket in 2010 that delivered a rat, two turtles and a worm into space. Iran also sent Earth-observing satellites into orbit in 2011 and 2012.

Western critics have expressed concern over the potential military applications of Iran's rocket program since boosters developed to reach space could also be used as long-range ballistic missiles. The Islamic republic has denied such ambitions for its space program.

In the early days of spaceflight for the United States and Soviet Union, animals were used to test the safety and feasibility of launching a living being into space and bringing it back unharmed.

A rhesus monkey named Albert I was the first ever monkey astronaut. It was launched aboard a U.S. military V-2 rocket from White Sands, N.M., in June 1948 but suffocated and died during the flight. A monkey named Yorick was the first monkey to live through a space flight. Yorick and 11 mice were recovered after an Aerobee missile flight of 236,000 feet at Holloman Air Force Base, N.M., in September 1951.

This article originally published at Space.com here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Arnold Schwarzenegger, the former Governator of California and action megastar of our youth, stopped by Reddit earlier today to answer Redditors questions.

Schwarzenegger did the AMA sessionthe popular question and answer format used on the siteto promote The Last Stand, his glorious return to the action genre. Minutes before his session started, Reddit users had already left more than 3,000 questions for the governor, ranging from queries on marijuana legalization to popular lines from his movies.

Despite only answering questions for an hour, the IAmA is slated to be one of Reddit's most popular ones, accruing more than 11,000 total karma points as of this writing.

We've compiled some of the better Arnold responses below, including some answers he wrote out using his iPad.

1. What role do you most regret turning down? (via Salacious)

I most regret not doing The Rock. I love the movie, and it turned out well. When it was offered to me there was only an 80 page script with a lot of handwriting and scribbles and it didn't seem fully baked. But they obviously did a fantastic job.

2. What are your thoughts on the current state of the Republican party? (via y0nkers)

The most important thing is that we need to be a party that is inclusive and tolerant. We can be those things and be the party we always have been. We need to think about the environment - Teddy Roosevelt was a great environmentalist and people forget Reagan was the one who dealt with the ozone layer with the Montreal protocol. We also need to talk about healthcare honestly - Nixon almost passed universal healthcare. We need to have an talk about immigration and realize you can't just deport people. We need a comprehensive answer. We also need to stay out of people's bedrooms. The party that is for small government shouldn't be over-reaching into people's private lives. Mainly, we need to be a party where people know what we are for, not just what we are against.

3. Would you rather fight 100 duck sized Predators or 1 Predator sized duck? (via Synanon)

4. In your films are all the "Ayyaagh's" in the script or do you improvise them? (via dev729)

5. Politicians are wildly unpopular these days - if you had to pick one current American politician who best embodies what is good about politics, who would you pick, and why? I've always appreciated your perspective on American politics and admired your optimistic spirit, so I'd love to hear your answer to this. (via rycla)

Great question. And this has to be my last one. Even though Congress has an approval rating of 9% (and loses to cockroaches and colonoscopies in polling), there are still some leaders who are doing the people's work instead of the partys' work. That's political courage to me, being willing to risk your job to choose what's good for the public instead of getting stuck in your ideology. One of my favorites is Mayor Chuck Reed from San Jose. He's a Democratic who took on pension reform, he has always put the people first. You should look him up.

6. Is it a tumor? (via LGFL5000)

After answering his final question, Governor Schwarzenegger thanked Reddit and its users with a handwritten note and a drawing of the Snoo, the site's mascot alien logo.

This article originally published at The Daily Dot here
--------------------------------------------------------------
When it comes to designing a functional iPhone case, whales don't typically come to mind. With their wide bodies and protruding fins, it makes more sense for the ocean-dwelling mammal to stay under water than in your hand.

But that didn't stop designer Seyook Lee from creating the iWhale, a case that "mimics the silhouette of a whale coming to the water's surface to breathe," according to Yanko Design.

SEE ALSO: Life-Size Lobster iPhone Case Helps You Stand Out From the Crowd

Surprisingly, the iWhale is more functional than it looks. The case's curved tail allows users to prop up or hang the phone for video-viewing, while its humped back makes the phone easier to hold. There's also space inside to store headphones and other accessories. And to top it all off, the whale's blowhole is a headphone jack.

The iWhale costs $23.90, and is available for purchase on Lee's website.

Would you buy this case? How does your current smartphone case look? Tell us in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Fans of the board game The Settlers of Catan will probably agree: the actual board part could use some work.

Tim Walsh, a San Francisco-based Catan fan, was fed up with the game's wobbly playing surface. He invented a new set of pieces, called Hexels, and launched a Kickstarter campaign to raise funds. Now, after a few weeks, he's already met his fundraising goal.

Hexels are six-sided magnetic pieces, representative of the 19 "hexes" used in the game, that connect to each other to create a sturdier game board (see the image below).

A Hexel ... magnetically connects to each of its neighbors by allowing each magnet to freely orient itself in whatever direction creates the strongest bond. The result is a board that stays together when playing, allows complete modularity, can be used as a storage device, and it all fits into the original box your game of settlers came in.

The traditional Settlers hexes are individual cardboard pieces. Each one represents a resource  brick, lumber, wool, grain or ore  that gamers collect and eventually trade in to build roads, cities and settlements. The pieces are arranged randomly at the beginning of each game to ensure every one plays out differently than the last  the lack of a solid structure, however, makes it difficult to keep the board in one place during gameplay.

Hence the appeal of the Hexels' magnetic attraction.

SEE ALSO: 'Settlers of Catan' Gets a New Game Board Thanks to Kickstarter

This isn't the first Kickstarter project to improve Settlers' board. In November, Mashable interviewed Bill Trammel and Nate Veldkamp, also from California, who designed a single board tray to hold each hex. Their design, along with Walsh's, has been officially endorsed by the game's creators.

Walsh's Kickstarter campaign has already collected $93,664, well past its original goal of $50,000, and will continue until Jan. 21. He estimates the pieces will be delivered to their earliest backers by February.

Would you use this new design to play Settlers? Tell us what you think about it below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Taking medications is often an inevitable part of life for the elderly and those with long-term illnesses. It can be pretty confusing when you have different pills to swallow at multiple times of the day. MedFolio is designed to simplify this process.

The MedFolio Electronic Pillbox offers an organized way to take your medications, with times and days sectioned in each container. Not only can you track your medication one week in advance, but each section also features an LED light that glows when you need to take the pills. The light goes off once the related segment has been removed.

When it's time to take your medication, the light will flash and send audio alarms via email or text message. You can also place all your medications in a list so that they are easy to identify.

MedFolio recently added another component to its Electronic PillBox  a wireless version. While the original pillbox will still be available for $248, MedFolio now offers an electronic pillbox that has Wi-Fi capabilities (price is not yet available).

This feature is great for connected family members who want to play a more active part in their parent's healthcare. The box will sync information about the user's medication journey to a secure server, so a family member can check whether or not their loved ones are actually adhering to their medication list.

This article originally published at Chip Chick here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Mobile advertising prices rose dramatically in the fourth quarter of 2012, as the advertising season kicked into high gear. In fact, the metric for effective cost per thousand impressions (eCPMs) was up 50%, new data suggests.

A new report from MoPub  a real-time bidding exchange where advertisers bid on ad inventory from smartphone apps  tracked its network of 30 billion ad impressions in the fourth quarter of 2012 to reveal spikes in mobile ad prices.

"By looking at the fourth quarter  which is the big advertising season  it's evident that mobile is catching up to what we already know is happening," said Elain Szu, director of product marketing. "Advertisers really looked to mobile during the holidays, which validates the channel and the overall marketing trend."

Click-through rates during the holiday season not only performed well in December, but remained high on both iOS and Android platforms well into January  it even surpassed click-through rates in December.

But iOS saw the biggest spike in eCPMs during the period with 66% higher prices than the beginning of the quarter.

"The iPad overtook the iPhone as the most popular device among advertising sources," MoPub said in its report. "Larger screens are proving better for publishers trying to monetize ads."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Business collaboration, productivity and process apps went mobile in a big way in 2012, and this upward trend is expected to continue through 2017.

In a new report, research firm Strategy Analytics says more than 200 million mobile workers will be using mobile business apps in 2013. It predicts that the revenue associated with these mobile business apps will increase from $25 billion in 2012 to almost $50 billion by the end of 2017.

"The consumer mobile experience has taught mobile workers to expect, even demand, access to information and applications from anywhere using mobile devices," said Mark Levitt, director of business cloud strategies at Strategy Analytics.

"Mobile workers have moved beyond just mobile email and messaging to include other collaboration apps such as conferencing, productivity apps such as content authoring, and business process apps such as CRM and even ERP."

"The business imperative for workers to be productive while on the way to, from and at customer and other remote work sites is driving the rapid mobilization of business apps, added Andrew Brown, the firms director of enterprise research. Growth in secure application distribution through mobile device and application management (MDM and MAM) and Enterprise App Stores is helping to allay security fears and ensure compliance.

This article originally published at TabTimes here
--------------------------------------------------------------
A NASA probe recorded a spectacular flyover video of the moon's far side shortly before intentionally slamming into a lunar mountain last month.

NASA's Ebb spacecraft shot thestunning final moon video on Dec. 14, just three days before it and its twin Flow ended their gravity-mapping mission, known as Grail, with a dramatic crash near the moon's north pole.

Ebb was just 6 miles above the lunar surface when it captured the images using its MoonKAM (Moon Knowledge Acquired by Middle school students) camera. The probe was skimming over the far side's northern hemisphere at the time, near an impact crater named Jackson.

Grail scientists pieced together about 2,400 individual frames to make the nearly two-minute video, NASA officials said.

The $496 million Grail mission short for Gravity Recovery and Interior Laboratory  launched in September 2011, and Ebb and Flow arrived in lunar orbit about three months later. The washing-machine-size spacecraft spent a year zipping around the moon, detecting the tiny changes in the distance between them caused by lunar mountains, craters and subsurface mass concentrations.

The Grail team used these super-precise measurements to construct an incredibly accurate mapof the lunar gravity field  the best ever created for any celestial body, researchers said.

But Ebb and Flow couldn't keep flying forever. They were running out of fuel by last month and would have crashed into the moon eventually, so the mission team decided to bring them down in a controlled fashion, far from the Apollo landing sites and other areas of historical importance.

So on Dec. 17, the two probes slammed into a crater rim near the moon's north pole. Shortly after the impact, NASA announced that the crash site would be named after the late Sally Ride, America's first woman in space.

Ride had led Grail's MoonKAM project, which allowed schoolkids around the world to pick out sites for Ebb and Flow to photograph. She died last July at the age of 61 after a battle with pancreatic cancer.

This article originally published at Space.com here
--------------------------------------------------------------
NBA star Kevin Durant, one of the sports world's renowned good guys, has recently come under a bit of scrutiny for a fouler-than-normal mouth and surlier-than-standard on-court demeanor.

His grandma, for one, doesn't approve.

That's according to a text message she sent him after his team, Oklahoma City Thunder, beat the Phoenix Suns Monday night. In the message, she congratulated him on the win, but tempered her praise with a side of scolding: "Kev kev stop cussing so much they be showing u when u do."

Durant shared a screenshot of the message  and his reply  with his 960,000 Instagram followers on Tuesday:

The photo came with an appropriate enough caption: "sorry grandma lol." But the message did seem to go over well with fans  at the time of writing, more than 63,000 people had Insta-liked the photo.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Point-of-sale giant NCR and Paypal are teaming up to make life a little easier for restaurant-goers. The two companies announced an agreement on Tuesday that will bring the option to pay with Paypal on NCR's recently announced mobile payment app.

In early December, NCR announced the launch of Mobile Pay, a cloud-based system that enables restaurants to give customers a wide array of services, including mobile payments. The idea behind mobile pay is to allow customers to interact with the restaurant through an app on their phone.

"We can essentially eliminate all the waiting time and all the uncertainty and insecurity by simply letting you to use your phone to interact directly with your guest check," said Michael Finley, vice president and CTO of hosted solutions at NCR, in a phone interview with Mashable.

Finley also noted that "it's important to think of the payment as a small part of this." What NCR wants to achieve with Mobile Pay is in fact much more ambitious: "It's almost like you can envision the mobile phone becoming the concierge within the restaurant," he said.

In fact, in addition to payments, NCR's app will also let users re-order drinks, mark a particularly good dish or share the experience through social media, and in the future, order food before getting to the restaurant.

The deal with Paypal, though, appears to be all about the payment part of the user experience. Paypal will be integrated into NCR's Mobile Pay app and give users the option to use their Paypal account to pay the check at the end of the meal.

The collaboration between NCR and Paypal seems to position the two companies in a good position to compete against Square in the mobile payments market.

SEE ALSO: How Square's Transparent Office Culture Pays Dividends

Both companies have a great reach. NCR, which used to be called National Cash Register, has a 128-year history and powers 38% of the top 100 restaurants in the U.S., while Paypal has 117 million accounts worldwide.

Finley wasn't able to tell Mashable when the option to pay with Paypal will be integrated into Mobile Pay, but said they're working on it.

UPDATE: An earlier version of this article implied that Mobile Pay allowed users to order food before getting to the restaurant, but that feature is still unavailable at the moment.
--------------------------------------------------------------
New Myspace  with its drastically different redesign  has left invite-only mode, opening up the revamped social network to the public.

The landing page for New.Myspace.com shows a dapper Justin Timberlake and promotes his new "Suit and Tie" single that he released late Sunday night.

Timberlake, who took an ownership stake in the company in 2011, had given the world a sneak peek of New Myspace in September, but now anyone can use the refurbished network.

The modern design features horizontal navigation, and like Pinterest, is heavy on visuals. But Myspace wouldn't be Myspace without a focus on music.

BONUS: The New MySpace  Music Meets Social, Done Right
--------------------------------------------------------------
The next time you go shopping for a smartphone, you might see some unfamiliar software on the screens lining store shelves.

The smartphone market is dominated by Apples iPhone and devices running Googles Android software, with Microsoft and RIM hoping to carve out the remaining market share for their new Windows Phone 8 and Blackberry 10. But several completely new operating systems will soon be available.

Manufacturers, carriers and other parties have realized how important the mobile operating system is in providing control over the modern computing experience. Apple and Google are able to sell apps and digital content through the stores tied to their mobile operating systems, causing users to become locked in to their ecosystem of hardware and software.

Now, competitorsand some free-software proponentshope to capture some of the same success, or at least stop the two juggernauts from gaining too much power. They recognize that an environment dominated by just two players could stifle innovation and give the leaders too much power over carriers, handset makers, and users themselves.

Today, according to IHS iSuppli, close to 46% of cell-phone users worldwide have smartphones, and 87% of those phones run either Google or Apple software. Both handset makers and carriers want more options, says David Yoffie, a professor at Harvard Business School.

Yoffie notes that Android was originally seen as an unbiased player with no hardware or sales revenues from handsetsa software Switzerlandbut Googles purchase of Motorolas handset business makes the software more threatening to other hardware makers, and he believes this is leading a number of them to consider alternatives.

New entrants include Tizen, a platform thats supported primarily by Samsung and Intel; Firefox OS, created by the Mozilla Foundation, which makes the Firefox web browser; and a version of the free, open-source Ubuntu Linux operating system designed for smartphones. There are also several efforts under way to revive Hewlett-Packards critically acclaimed webOS.

While Android can be modified, its development is still controlled by Google. So an alternative could make it easier for a carrier, or a technology giant like Samsung, to show off its own services and contentpotentially helping it gain a more substantive relationship with smartphone buyers.

Even with interest from smartphone makers and wireless carriers, any would-be mobile operating system faces the challenge of establishing a healthy application ecosystem. Tizen, Firefox OS and Ubuntu are all counting heavily on web-based HTML5 apps, which they hope will make it easier for developers to make apps that can work on multiple platforms. This could encourage more coders to support nascent operating systems.

Tizen, which grew out of Nokias MeeGo platform and (like Android) is based on the open-source Linux operating system, may have the best chance of success. Along with Samsung and Intel, its supporters include the wireless carriers Sprint, Vodafone and NTT Docomo; electronics maker Panasonic; and the Chinese telecommunications company Huawei. The software is still under development, but a video of a Tizen developer conference held last year shows novel features such as 3D-type effects (photo browsing takes on the look of a spiraling cascade of images, for example).

The Mozilla Foundation and Canonical, the company behind the Ubuntu operating system, are both likely to be hoping that their alternatives will provide a more open mobile environment where no companies dominate. Firefox mobile apps are essentially web pages, and the Firefox team came up with ways for Firefox OS to access all the hardware on a smartphone running the software. Even the phones dialer acts as an app, says Chris Lee, Mozillas product lead for the OS.

Lee says Firefox OS phones will be low on built-in memory at about 256 megabytes of RAM, and many will include a microSD slot so users can pop in their own memory card to store music, photos and videos. He adds that the first phones are expected to cost around $100 (in line with lower-end Android smartphones) and will be made by the electronics maker TCL Communication Technology and the Chinese telecommunications company ZTE. These devices are expected to be available in the first half of this year, initially in Brazil, where they will be sold by the wireless carrier Telefonicas Vivo brand.

Strategy Analytics senior analyst Scott Bicheno thinks Firefoxs strategy could pay off, especially in areas where Telefonica has a strong presence.

Theres still plenty of growth in the rest of the world at lower price points, he says. However, the developing world also presents a potential problem for the Firefox OS: access to reliable high-speed wireless networks. The OS is highly dependent on its users access to the web, but many developing economies still dont have robust networks.

Lee says this is definitely a challenge, but that the OS does allow some functionality offline. Firefox OS has already managed to get some major app makers on board: Lee says it is working with the likes of Facebook, Twitter and Google, along with local app developers in various other markets.

Canonical has even more ambitious hopes for Ubuntu. Although it hasnt publicly named hardware or wireless partners, Canonical project manager Richard Collins says Ubuntu hopes to have between 5% and 10% of the smartphone market by 2016.

To reach this goal, Ubuntu is targeting the high and low ends of the smartphone market in the developing world. High-end smartphones running the OS will also be able to act as Ubuntu PCs when docked with a keyboard, mouse and monitor. Collins says the company will work with a hardware manufacturer and mobile operator on getting the Ubuntu phone to market; it aims to ship its first phones by the beginning of next year.

Even with a well-stocked app larder, underdog operating systems wont find it easy to grab major market share. Still, theres always an opportunity in a market growing so rapidly. While less than half of the world had a smartphone in 2012, IHS iSuppli expects 56% of cellphone users to be swiping and tapping on smartphones by the end of this year.

This article originally published at MIT Technology Review here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Laughter is the best medicine, and it might even help cure the world's ills, too.

Various organizations use Internet humor to promote serious causes, whether it's fighting AIDS, protecting the environment or promoting pet adoption. Behind the jokes and laughs, however, is the drive to create change.

SEE ALSO: Top 5 Non-Profit YouTube Videos of 2012

We've rounded up nine examples of non-profits that successfully employ web humor  using comedy to engage people while laying out important facts at the same time.

Which non-profit would you nominate for No. 10 on this list? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Crowdfunding platform Kickstarter allows people to share their creativity with the world and get the ball rolling on great ideas. But for every Pebble Watch, there's a weird, racy project (or video pitch) that'll have you wondering.

Are you an Air Sex professional in dire need of some tighty whities? Maybe you're a breastfeeding mom looking for a soundtrack, or are just in the mood for some kinky coloring.

SEE ALSO: 20 NSFW Etsy Products That Will Make You Blush

While Kickstarter prohibits pornographic material (we have Offbeatr for that), there are a few suggestive projects that slipped past the guidelines. Check out some sexy and awkward NSFW pages we found. For more bizarre projects, visit this Tumblr, Your Kickstarter Sucks.

Would you fund any of these projects? Share your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Footage of a Scottish man successfully passing a polygraph test while denying having murdered his 14-year-old girlfriend is now available on YouTube.

The footage, which was posted to the video sharing site on Sunday, is believed to be the first public record of a convicted killer passing a prison-administered lie detector test and may help to free the convicted man after 10 years in jail.

In June 2004, when Luke Mitchell, now 24, was 15, the Edinburgh, Scotland, native was charged with the murder of his 14-year-old girlfriend, Jodi Jones, a crime that he has long professed to have not committed.

A Scottish court declared Mitchell guilty 10 months after the arrest and sentenced him to a life in prison. But in April, polygraph tests administered by British Polygraph Association secretary Terry Mullins declared that Mitchell was telling the truth.

Knowing all prison-administered polygraph tests are videotaped, Mitchell and his defenders began lobbying for the tape to go public shortly after he stepped out of the chair. Last week, Scottish Prison Service officials granted the two parties permission to air the clip. The 17-minute video was posted on YouTube Saturday, where it's received more than 13,000 views.

Their hope is that the evidence will rally enough public support for the Scottish Prison System to reconsider the lengthor even the convicted guiltof the longtime prisoner.

Mitchell is seen answering three questions that directly relate to the killing of Jodi Jones: "Were you present when Jodi was stabbed?"; "Did you stab Jodi on June 30, 2003?; and "Did you know for certain where Jodi's body would be found?"

To all three questions, Mitchell offers a brief "No." Mullins said in a statement that he was "certain of the test result."

"It's absolute. I can't believe Luke Mitchell was convicted on the evidence that was available."

According to The Independent, Mitchell's case is currently being reviewed by the Scottish Criminal Cases Review Commission, "which investigates potential miscarriages of justice and can recommend new appeals."

This article originally published at The Daily Dot here
--------------------------------------------------------------
The latest Facebook phishing scam tricks people into thinking they're verifying their Facebook information while actually giving away personal data.

The scam works when a user clicks on what looks like a link from a friend in a tweet or post. That link takes them to a fake Facebook page where they can log in. They are then are asked to verify a bunch of information  that's where the worst damage can occur. The user is asked to enter credit card information, down to the security code.

Scams like these are not uncommon. You may be wise enough to know not to give personal details to an unverified account or person online, but do your children?

Caroline Knorr, parenting editor at Common Sense Media tells Mashable "today's kids who are active online need to develop a 'nose' for phishing scams."

Often, phishing scams come in the form of a letter and seem legitimate, but increasingly, phishing scams are finding their way to social networks. And they're getting more sophisticated.

Knorr says if it looks strange, don't click it. "But as this scam shows, phishers on social networks can very accurately recreate a legitimate website's page to a T."

It can be confusing for anyone when it seems like a friend is directing you to some content. But there are a few things you can teach your kids (and perhaps learn yourself) when it comes to steering clear of scams.

"First, be wary of any link that asks you to verify your username and password, or provide other sensitive information. Most trusted businesses will not ask you for this kind of information over email or without notice," Knorr said.

Kids should let their parents know if someone requested a social security number or credit card information.

"Second of all, take a close look at the link itself. Most legitimate businesses handling sensitive information use the Internet protocol HTTPS instead of the regular HTTP address. Phishers will likely not use the secure protocol," she adds. "They will also try to fool you by using a similar, but phony, URL."

Make sure letters in the URL are not missing or words are not misspelled on purpose. And lastly, she says, know your friends.

"If it seems strange that your aunt or grandfather would share a link to a Gangnam Style parody on their Facebook page, then it's likely they weren't in control of that post!" Knorr says.

What do you do to educate your kids about phishing scams on the Internet? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Russia or China could be behind one of the largest and most complex cyber espionage campaigns ever revealed, according to cybersecurity experts contacted by Mashable. The operation, codenamed Red October, was uncovered yesterday by the Russian online security giant Kaspersky Lab.

Unfortunately the evidence can't clearly show who is behind the attacks. All the experts, including the Kaspersky researchers, warn that caution is due. "If you don't see clear evidence," said Markus Jakobsson, cybersecurity expert and CTO of FatSkunk, a Silicon Valley anti-mobile malware company, "what you can do is base it on a hunch and look at who's targeted."

The malware targeted mostly government networks, diplomatic or research institutions, and critical infrastructures located in countries across all continents. Claudio Guarnieri, a security researcher at Rapid7, an information security company, said that because of the nature of the targets, the operation is "definitely politically motivated." That opinion is shared by the researchers at Kaspersky, who wrote in the report that "the main purpose of the operation appears to be the gathering of classified information and geopolitical intelligence, although it seems that the information-gathering scope is quite wide."

According to Kaspersky's analysis, Russia and former Soviet countries are the ones hit the most. Jakobsson notes that in these cases, it's also important to see who is not among the victims. There's a big player in the cyber espionage world that seems to have come out unscathed from a global operation that Kaspersky estimates has been ongoing for at least 5 years: China.

That detail, coupled with the fact that the motives seem to be clearly political, makes Jakobsson put his money on China, with a caveat. "Either it's criminal attempts, and then my bets are that it is from Russia, or it's politically motivated and then my money is on China," he told Mashable.

Both Guarnieri and Jakobsson, as well as Adam Segal, a fellow at the Council on Foreign Relations, agree that the information stolen by Red October is hardly something that could be easily sold or commercialized, which seems to exclude the criminal motive. Criminal organizations who use malware, explains Jakobsson, normally target a lot of computers and try to steal data that can be then sold in the black market and that has high value. This doesn't seem to be the case.

However, not everybody is so sure China is behind the operation.

Segal notes that the United Kingdom is missing from the list of victims as well, and the UK might be a country interested in Russian-related intelligence. He estimates that there are eight to ten countries who could have motives to spy on Russian targets, and three to five countries with the technological capabilities to carry out such a complex operation. "Could have been the Chinese, could have been the Brits, who knows," he says.

According to Kaspersky, an analysis of the malware itself is not revealing. "The information we have collected so far does not appear to point towards any specific location," the report initially states. However, some of the exploits, "appear to have been created by Chinese hackers," and the Red October "malware modules have been created by Russian-speaking operatives."

The fact that the malware seems to come from China is hardly a conclusive evidence, said Segal. "Pieces of Chinese code are often widely available on these black market websites where hackers sell and swap code," he told Mashable. However, This could also be an instance where some sort of freelance hacker group is stealing intelligence with the intent of then selling it to a government  although Segal seems to hint that this is a more unlikely explanation.

Of course, all these clues could just be red herrings, designed to mislead investigators, as Kaspersky Lab senior security researcher Costin Raiu noted in an interview with Wired's Threat Level blog.

Guarnieri, who had already seen some signs of Red October in February last year, is more inclined to think Russia is behind these attacks, considering some of the domains used are Russian and some signs seems to point the hackers are Russian-speaking.

Furthermore, he notes, China doesn't have a history of such a widespread and long-running espionage operation with very diversified targets and a unique and large malware framework, but rather multiple concurrent campaigns with different targets and different sets of tools, operated by different people. That being said, he admits, "it's very difficult to completely exclude China in this kind of context because it's a big player and it's often the protagonist in this sort of attacks."

SEE ALSO: Is Iran Behind a Wave of Cyberattacks Against U.S. Banks?

Red October, or in short "Rocra," is still live, and it's been harvesting a wide array of documents and files, including some that seem to be associated with an encryption software typically used by the European Union and NATO, according to Kaspersky. The operation targets computers, smartphones and removable storage devices such as USB thumb drives. The Russian cybersecurity giant has identified hundreds of infections and more than 1,000 malicious modules.

Most of the malware modules are designed to perform different tasks, some are one-time, some are recurrent. A few examples include siphoning all kinds of documents and files, record keystrokes, make screenshots, retrieve Outlook email messages, extract saved passwords, and stealing data from connected phones.

Kaspersky was first warned of this campaign by one of its clients  which the company declined to identify.

Red October is just the latest in a string of high-profile cybersecurity attacks uncovered by Kaspersky and other companies in the last few months. Last year, the Russian company revealed the existence of Flame and Gauss (both believed to be developed by the the U.S. and Israel), while Symantec uncovered DuQu.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Arguably the biggest struggle RIM will have when it releases BlackBerry 10 at the end of this month: making sure there are enough apps on the platform.

So in preparation for the operating system's debut on January 30, the company held a Port-A-Thon this past weekend. The 36-hour event let developers port over their existing apps to the BlackBerry 10 platform, and earn cash - and developer devices - in the process.

Starting at 12 p.m. ET last Friday, RIM invited developers to a porting party to bring their apps to BlackBerry 10 before launch. Experts of the OS were on hand to help with porting questions.

The event actually ran a little long - 37.5 hours - but in the end, RIM was able to reach its goal of approving an astounding 15,000 apps over the course of one weekend.

RIM gave developers $100 for each app approved for BlackBerry App World. The first 200 developers to port between five and 10 apps scored a BlackBerry Dev Alpha device, while the first 10 developers to submit more than 10 approved apps received a paid trip to BlackBerry Jam Europe to celebrate the launch of BlackBerry 10.

RIM's latest OS is set to debut on Jan. 30.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Paging C-3PO: there's a job opening with your name on it.

Robot Restaurant, in the Heilongjiang province of China, has a staff of 20 robots that cook, serve and entertain its guests. The restaurant opened in June 2012 and has since become a novelty spot in the province's capital.

The robot staff operates through tracks on the floor, which lead from the kitchen and down the aisles between tables. The menu includes dumplings and noodles and is prepared by the robots themselves. After a patron orders, a robot sings near the table while their food is being cooked.

The bots are between four and five feet tall and can display 10 different facial expressions.

SEE ALSO: Fast Food Robot Builds the Perfect Burger

According to the Daily Mail, each machine can work for about five hours after a two-hour charge. But the staff doesn't come cheap: each one costs between $30,000 and $50,000, the Mail reported.

Other restaurants are experimenting with non-human staff as well. In San Francisco, a tech startup called Momentum Machines is hoping to launch a burger joint where all the cooking is done by robots. The company says the machines can crank out more than 360 hamburgers per hour.

Would you dine at a robot-run restaurant? Tell us what you think about it below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Samsung was the top brand on Twitter during last week's International CES, according to report on Twitter trends surrounding the trade show. Buzz about the Korean electronics giant was led by exciting product prototypes as well as announcements during the company's keynote at the show.

The report, from social media marketing firm Salorix, looked at over 1 million tweets related to CES. While Samsung was the most-tweeted brand, Sony, Panasonic, Lenovo and LG all scored highly as well. Among products, 4K "Ultra HD" TVs, smartphones and tablets got the most attention on Twitter.

Samsung was the most-talked-about brand for all four days of the show except Day 1, which was dominated by Sony. Although Samsung announced many new products at CES, what generated the most buzz were prototype devices such as its flexible cellphone and curved OLED TV. The company's Day 2 keynote address  whose highlights included an unprecedented 8-core mobile processor and former U.S. president Bill Clinton  fueled its Twitter dominance that day, accounting for about 30% of all CES-related tweets.

SEE ALSO: Top 10 Tech This Week, CES 2013 Edition

However, Samsung was only the third most popular branded hashtag during the show. The top company hashtag was #lookforlogitech, according to the report. Logitech didn't make any announcements at CES 2013, but it did run a product giveaway via Twitter.

Per usual, CES played host to many celebrities, and the report cites many as the top CES influencers, including @snooki, @llcoolj, @funkmasterflex, @MCHammer and @Ludacris. Alicia Keys' appearance at Monster Cable's event also generated "huge buzz."

Did you follow CES on Twitter? How do you think Salorix's findings stack up with what you saw? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
One month after the horrific Sandy Hook Elementary School shooting in Connecticut, 21 students gathered this week to record the Academy Award-winning tune "Over the Rainbow."

The Newtown children got some celebrity help recording the benefit song. Singer-songwriter Ingrid Michaelson lent her voice, while Talking Heads and Tom Tom Club rockers Chris Frantz and Tina Weymouth opened their studio to the project.

The song is available digitally on Amazon and iTunes. Proceeds will go to Newtown Youth Academy and United Way of Western Connecticut. Here are the kids recording the track:

"Music has the power to heal both the listener and the performers," Tim Hayes, CBGB owner and executive producer of the song, said in a statement. "The new arrangement of the song feels as if the young angelic adult voice, Ingrid's, is almost teaching the song to the children."

"First she introduces it to them, then she is joined by an innocent, yet strong chorus of voices and by the end of the song it is only the children that we hear," he says. "In fact, the children were asked to sing the song as if it was a prayer. That emotion really comes though when the children sing their 'oooos,' which transforms the recording into something truly spiritual."

SEE ALSO: Piers Morgan Dedicates a 'RIP' Tweet to Each Child Killed in Newtown

Michaelson and the students performed the song Tuesday on Good Morning America.

Although this is the first tribute song involving Newtown children, several other tributes have come from young voices. The New York City Children's Chorus sang "Silent Night" on Saturday Night Live. And the PS22 Chorus belted Sandy Hook Elementary's school song.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The question has been asked for decades: Why havent psychic powers been proven yet? Psychics have been studied for decades, both in and out of the laboratory, yet the scientific community (and the public at large) remains unconvinced.

In a recent book, Science & Psychic Phenomena: The Fall of the House of Skeptics, author Chris Carter insists that the reason that psychic powers have not been proven is because scientists are unaware of the research or refuse to take it seriously because Clearly many scientists find the claims of parapsychology disturbing.

This is a common charge leveled against skeptics and scientists: that they refuse to acknowledge the existence of paranormal phenomenon (psychic abilities, ghosts, etc.) because it would somehow challenge or disturb their worldview.

Skeptics and scientists, they say, are deeply personally and professional invested in defending the scientific status quo and cannot psychologically tolerate the idea that they could be wrong. This results in a closed-minded refusal to accept, or even seriously examine, the evidence.

But is this really true? Do scientists ignore and dismiss claims and evidence that challenge dominant scientific ideas? Lets examine some recent examples.

A study published in 2011 in a scientific journal claimed to have found strong evidence for the existence of psychic powers such as ESP. The paper, written by Cornell professor Daryl J. Bem, was published in The Journal of Personality and Social Psychology and quickly made headlines around the world for its implication: that psychic powers had been scientifically proven.

Bems claim of evidence for ESP wasnt ridiculed or ignored; instead it was taken seriously and tested by scientific researchers.

Replication is of course the hallmark of valid scientific research  if the findings are true and accurate, they should be able to be replicated by others. Otherwise the results may simply be due to normal and expected statistical variations and errors. If other experimenters cannot get the same result using the same techniques, its usually a sign that the original study was flawed in one or more ways.

A team of researchers collaborated to accurately replicate Bems final experiment, and found no evidence for any psychic powers. Their results were published in the journal PLoS ONE. Bem  explicitly contradicting Carters suggestion that skeptics set out to discredit his work or refused to look at it  acknowledged that the findings did not support his claims and wrote that the researchers had made a competent, good-faith effort to replicate the results of one of my experiments on precognition.

SEE ALSO: Indonesian Crop Circle Prompts Rumors of Aliens

The following year a second group of scientists also tried to replicate Bems ESP experiments, and once again found no evidence for psychic power. The article, Correcting the Past: Failures to Replicate Psi, was published in The Journal of Personality and Social Psychology and is available on the Social Science Research Network.

In September 2011, news shot around the world that Italian physicists had measured particles traveling faster than light. The neutrino in the experiment only exceeded the speed of light by a little tiny bit  60 nanoseconds  but if validated would violate the fundamental laws of physics.

Questions swirled: Would the findings hold up under repeated experiments? Could this team have proven Einstein wrong about the speed of light?

What was the reaction from the scientific community to the news of this fundamentals-of-physics-challenging finding? They didnt ignore the results, hoping the inconvenient truth would go away. They didnt brand the scientists liars or hoaxers; they didnt shout, Burn the witch, this is heresy and cannot be true!

Instead, they did what all scientists do when confronted with such anomalous evidence. They took a closer look at the experiment to make sure the results were valid and tried to replicate the research. It later turned out that the anomaly was caused by at least two measurement errors, possibly including a loose cable. The experiment was flawed.

The scientists were not skeptical because accepting that Einstein was wrong about something would lead to a nervous breakdown, or that their whole worldview would crumble beneath them, or that they would have to accept that science doesnt know everything.

SEE ALSO: Real-life Paranormal Activity: Are Ghosts Real?

The reason scientists were skeptical is because the new study contradicted all previous experiments. Thats what good science does: When you do a study or experiment  especially one whose results conflict with earlier conclusions, you study it closely and question it before accepting the results.

In science, those who disprove dominant theories are rewarded, not punished. Disproving one of Einsteins best-known predictions (or proving the existence of psychic powers) would earn the dissenting scientists a place in the history books, if not a Nobel Prize.

The same pattern exists in other areas of the unexplained. For example many scientists have worked on analyzing alleged hair from mysterious animals such as Bigfoot and the Chupacabra. Researchers from Oxford University spent part of last year collecting samples of alleged Bigfoot hair for possible genetic identification. Geneticist Bryan Sykes conducted DNA analysis and plans to publish his results in a peer-reviewed scientific journal soon.

The reason that the scientific community doesn't accept psychic powers, Bigfoot, ghosts and other phenomena is simply because there is little or no good evidence for them  not because scientists havent looked at the evidence.

Better research follows better evidence, and as one prominent scientist and Bigfoot researcher, British primatologist John Napier noted, There are no shortage of problems to tackle, and it is not surprising that scientists prefer to investigate the probable rather than beat their heads against the wall of the faintly possible.

The evidence for psychic powers, like the evidence for anything else, stands or falls on its own merits. Theres no reason in the world that scientists would fear the unknown, or be afraid to learn more about the world in which we live.

This article originally published at Discovery News here
--------------------------------------------------------------
It's the David Blaine of cats.

Kido's first shell game is proof that animals are geniuses too. And he's even captured that cool swagger of magicians, not even impressed with his own brillance.

Feel free to move to Vegas and start counting cards next, kitty, you're too good for these small-town magic tricks now.

SEE ALSO: Cats Demonstrate the Top 10 New Year's Resolutions

And kudos to Kido's owner who rescued the two-time abandoned cat and raised him into the Einstein of the feline world. Clearly love and nurturing does a cat good.

What's the smartest thing you've ever seen an animal do? Tell us in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Launchpad is a series that introduces Mashable readers to compelling startups. If you would like to have your startup considered for inclusion, please see the details here.



One-Liner Pitch: Snoox makes it easy to find and share product recommendations with the people whose opinions you value most.

Why It's Taking Off: It's one of the more promising companies unlocking the power of social recommendations for shopping.

There's no shortage of online reviews for shopping products; the tough part is narrowing down those recommendations to just the friends and tastemakers whose opinions you value most. That's where Snoox comes in.

Snoox, a website that launched in public beta last November, tries to make it as easy as possible for you to recommend products, and find recommendations from the people you actually care about. When you register on Snoox, the website pulls information from your Facebook account for all the items you've Liked, and then lets you decide which items you want to recommend to others.

After completing that step, Snoox prompts you to make additional recommendations using a tab at the top of the page that says, "I recommend..." All you have to do is type in the name of a product, write a few words that explain why you're recommending it and Snoox takes care of the back-end. The site organizes all the recommendations from your Facebook friends into a dozen categories, including books, food, music and travel; it then presents them in a very visual Pinterest-style layout.

"Snoox is governed by recommendations between friends," Guy Poreh, the company's founder, tells Mashable. "Every day, you get recommendations from friends; we are just putting that behavior on the web."

Since the site launched two months ago, more than 10,000 people have registered, and shared nearly 30,000 recommendations. Now, Snoox is putting out its first big set of updates, including speeding up the recommendation process and redesigning the homepage with a real-time feed of recommendations.

Snoox isn't the first website to tap into the power of social recommendations. Others, such as The Find and Mouthee, have previously integrated with social networks to help determine what products users and their social connections like.

This space may only get more competitive in the coming months. Facebook announced a new smarter search engine called Graph Search on Tuesday that lets users search through some of this same data to find recommendations for businesses and places they may be interested in. The search feature is not specifically product-oriented yet, but it's not hard to imagine Facebook taking it in that direction in the future.

For now, the greatest obstacle for Snoox is convincing users to continue sharing recommendations. In addition to streamlining the recommendation process, Snoox also plans to release apps for iPhone and Android in the near future, as well as get celebrities on board to share recommendations of their own  all of which should help boost engagement on the service.

Snoox raised a funding round of nearly $2 million from several angel investors last year, and generates revenue from affiliate links when users purchase products through the site.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Dear Frosty: A bit of advice from us  run, hide, camouflage. There's a masked man on the loose and he's looking for your carrot nose.

We're not sure why this dude's got a vendetta against our icy friends, but he's determined to crush, destroy and obliterate them in any fashion possible. And record it in slow motion.

SEE ALSO: Watch Water Balloons Smash Into Shirtless Dudes in Slow Mo

Some of his past crimes against snowmen include melting them with boiling water or decapitating them with a chain saw.

No need to watch that latest horror movie, just watch this crazed man tackling poor snowmen. We're guessing he's going after snow angels next.
--------------------------------------------------------------
For tablet- and smartphone-owners who love their touchscreens but occasionally yearn for the tactile feel of a physical keyboard, Fremont, Calif.-based company Tactus has unveiled new technology that unites both features on one gadget.

It developed a tactile user interface for touchscreen devices: transparent physical buttons that emerge from a tablet or smartphone's surface on demand. To see the technology in action, watch the video above.

"With the buttons enabled, users can push and type or rest their fingers as they would with any physical button or keyboard," Tactus explains on its website. "When the buttons are disabled, they recede into the screen, becoming invisible and leaving a smooth, seamless flat touchscreen with maximum viewing area."

This "Tactile Layer" technology integrates with a touchscreen device by replacing its cover glass.

While current smartphones include the option of haptic feedback, which causes on-screen keys to vibrate upon touch, Tactus says it's not the same as physical buttons.

Would you use this technology on your smartphone or tablet? Tell us in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Facebook not only revealed its new Graph Search feature on Tuesday, it also shared what looks like a childhood photo of CEO Mark Zuckerberg.

Long before the Zuckerberg helmed the billion user strong social network, he was just a cute elementary school student with charming grin and fondness for mock turtlenecks.

SEE ALSO: Facebook Graph Search Could Be Its Greatest Innovation

The screen grab, released by the Facebook newsroom, also shows a snapshot COO Sheryl Sandberg (picture top row, center) as a little curly-haired girl.

These kids grew up to run Facebook  how boring do our old school photos look now?
--------------------------------------------------------------
Pro skateboarder Tony Hawk has teamed up with non-profit Operation Smile to bring transformative surgery to children born with facial deformities. The campaign asks you to upload a photo of your smile and watch as it's sent across the world.

The campaign is built around an interactive film Change Forever featuring Hawk, which asks you to share your smile through a Facebook app to help children with cleft lip or cleft palate. You're then encouraged to share your smile and the film on Facebook, Twitter or Pinterest, and to take a pledge to spread awareness of facial deformities.

The pledge also states that every child has the right to smile, because humans smile to express happiness. According to Operation Smile, a child is born every three minutes with facial deformities preventing smiling. Of those born with facial deformity, 10% will not live until their first birthday.

SEE ALSO: 9 Non-Profits That Get Web Humor

That's why the non-profit works to bring facial reconstructive surgeries to children in the developing world who would not otherwise be able to afford them. Without the surgeries, many children will never be able speak or eat normally. Additionally, in many of the communities that benefit from Operation Smile surgeries, the children would otherwise be shunned.

Change Forever's launch coincides with the non-profit's 30th anniversary as well as National Birth Defect Awareness Month.
--------------------------------------------------------------
If youre laid up in bed right now, nursing a cough, achy body and a funky stomach, you dont need me to tell you that flu season has arrived with a vengeance.

As one of the worst flu seasons in recent memory, things have gotten so bad in Beantown that Boston Mayor Thomas Menino declared a public health emergency. So far, 18 people have died and the city has experienced 700 reported cases  10 times as many reported cases as last years flu season.

Flu shot or no flu shot, the rapid spread of the virus may have you feeling a bit helpless. However there are a string of new apps and websites coalescing user data that can help you avoid the flu altogether and help cities prepare for the worst.

SEE ALSO: Why Dont People Get the Flu Shot?

Recently launched FluNearYou is a public safety project in collaboration with the American Public Health Association and the Skoll Global Threats Fund. Anyone 13 years of age or older can register to complete a weekly survey of symptoms in effort that the shared data can help multiple sectors with pandemic preparedness. Data is made available to public health officials, researchers, disaster planning organizations and anyone else who may find this information useful.

Germ Tracker culls symptom data from social media platforms and tracks the virus, via a map, as it spreads. Upon publication of this post, the site was experiencing heavy user traffic and politely excused any potential delays.

Help, I Have the Flu, developed by pharmaceutical startup Help Remedies, is an app that scans your friends Facebook statuses for references to sneezes, coughs or flu. If someone in your network is sick, youll receive an alert that lets you know you might want to avoid contact with them for a few days.

SEE ALSO: Flu, Whooping Cough, Vomiting Virus: Whats Going On

Googles Flu Trends tracker is another data heavy site that, besides showing a spike in flu related searches, also shows that a majority of the U.S. is experiencing intense activity in reported flu cases. The Center for Disease Controls (CDC) map shows similar widespread flu activity across the U.S.

This article originally published at Discovery News here
--------------------------------------------------------------
In a ruling that could have dramatic consequences for online news agencies and digital journalists, a judge ruled Tuesday that two news outlets should have asked permission before using a Twitter picture from a photojournalist.

According to the court's ruling, Agence France-Press violated the copyright of photojournalist Daniel Morel by taking photos of a 2010 earthquake in Haiti that he tweeted and disseminating them without permission via Getty. The Washington Post, the court found, violated Morel's copyright by running four of the photos from Getty also without Morel's permission, according to Reuters.

Twitter's Terms of Service lay at the center of District Judge Alison Nathan's decision: While the AFP argued Morel's work was free to use once posted to Twitter, Nathan instead found that Twitter's Terms of Service required that news outlets first get permission before running tweeted photos.

Nathan, however, did rule that the retweeting of such photos is allowed.

Twitter has long held that photographers own their tweeted content. The company's Terms of Service section on copyright maintains that "Twitter respects the intellectual property rights of others and expects users of the Services to do the same."

The section also contains detailed instructions on contacting Twitter if a user feels his or her content is "copied in a way that constitutes copyright infringement."

SEE ALSO: Redditors Accuse BuzzFeed of Photo Theft

The trial began in early 2010 when the AFP sued in order to get a judge's ruling that it was legally allowed to distribute tweeted photos after Morel first accused it of copyright infringement. Morel then launched a countersuit against the AFP, the Washington Post and Getty.

Morel initially called for "tens or hundreds of millions of dollars," but the judge on Tuesday limited the financial damages Morel might be entitled to receive to a single award per infringed image. The judge also refused to rule on whether the news outlets acted willingly in violating Morel's copyright or if they violated his rights under the Digital Millenium Copyright Act.

The trial is still ongoing. Getty is a party to the trial but was not included in Tuesday's decision.

Should journalists and media outlets be required to get a social media user's permission before using his or her photo? Share your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The flood of petitions advocating secession that flowed into the White House after President Obamas November reelection were not the most constructive use of the administrations public engagement website We the People.

Directly engaging the public, however, is a messy business that requires dealing with a lot of loud people so a few softer voices that might not otherwise be heard can break through, digital democracy advocate J.H. Snider said Monday.

Petitioners from all 50 states sought to secede from the union in the wake of President Obamas reelection victory. The White House responded to nine of those petitions that crossed the 25,000 signature threshold for an official reply on Friday.

Snider is president of the digital democracy project iSolon.org and a fellow at Harvard Universitys Edmond J. Safra Center for Ethics. He compared the secession petitions to the often outlandish questions politicians take on TV and radio call-in programs or at town hall meetings.

Petitions are a type of democratic research and development, Snider said. Like R and D investments, few petitions will pan out, and it may take many years for the payoff. Despite the short term cost and hassles, they are worth it. They strengthen democracy.

We the Peoples principal value for Snider is less about how the administration responds to petitions but that the site becomes a tool for advocates of low-visibility issues to begin rallying public support.

He described the site as having great promise soon after it launched in September 2011 but said hes been less impressed by the way its developed since then.

He criticized the site Monday for promoting featured responses about issues that are administration priorities such as reducing gun violence and reforming immigration rather than issues that might not otherwise garner public attention.

He also argued the White House should give petition writers access to the email addresses of signatories to use as an organizing tool. The White House has declined to do that out of privacy concerns.

Harvard Professor Archon Fung agrees with Snider that We the Peoples best use is to unearth issues that wouldnt normally get a hearing on Capitol Hill. He describes the site as just as much a barometer as an organizing tool, though.

For me, its most interesting as an early detection system for new issues that are out there or old issues that are being treated in new ways, he said. I guess secession is kind of like that. People talk about states rights but secession is a more radical version of that for sure.

Fungs research focuses on democracy and citizenship. Rather than simply respond to the petitions, he suggested, the White House should have reached out to some of the organizers to learn more about their concerns.

The secession petitions in aggregate received more than a million individual signatures, though many people signed numerous petitions. One petition from Texas received 125,000 signatures, making it one of the most popular petitions posted to We the People thus far.

As a matter of political preference, I dont think secession is a reasonable policy alternative, Fung said, but [the secession petitions] did get a lot of signatures. Thats not many people as a percentage of the American population, but a lot relative to the site. So I would have preferred there to be some next step in the conversation.

Administration officials responded to one We the People petition on improving oversight of commercial dog breeders with a new proposed regulation. Otherwise the site has produced few major policy changes.

This article originally published at Nextgov here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Wi-Fi and Cellular versions of the iPad mini and the fourth-generation iPad will debut in China this week, Apple announced Monday.

Both devices will be available to Chinese consumers starting this Friday, the Cupertino, Calif. company said in a release. They are currently sold in more than 100 countries worldwide.

SEE ALSO: 5 Chinese Tech Brands You'll Be Hearing From in 2013

Interestingly, the iPad mini received a lukewarm reception when it first launched in China last month. Reports suggested that turnout for Apple's 7.9-inch tablet was minimal, and that lines were "nearly nonexistent"  even in high-traffic areas such as the company's Beijing-based flagship store.

Still, Apple products are wildly popular in China, with more than 2 million units of the iPhone 5 sold in the first weekend it launched there.

Company CEO Tim Cook has made it clear that Apple considers the Chinese market a priority.

"China is a very important market for us and customers there cannot wait to get their hands on Apple products," he said last month.

The Wi-Fi and cellular-capable iPad mini and fourth-generation iPad start at $459 and $629, respectively (for the 16GB models).

To our China-based readers: Do you plan to buy these versions of the latest iPad and iPad mini? Tell us in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It's a snowball fight for the record books.

No really, this video shows the biggest snowball fight ever, as certified by the Guinness Book of World Records. It took 5,800 people gathered at the Seattle Center chucking icy snow bombs to break the record.

SEE ALSO: 10 Wicked Cool Snow Toys to Kick Winter's Butt

The battle required 30 truckloads of snow poured into the icy battlefield before participants waged an epic snow war against each other. The event was used as a fundraiser for the Boys & Girls Club of King County and managed to raise $50,000.

Now that's what we call war with a purpose.

Anyone up to challenge this record? Don't forget your mittens.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Feustel and fellow astronaut Mike Fincke had just finished running power cables from the U.S. side of the International Space Station to the Russian, and  at the EVA's five-hour mark  some anti-fogging solution from the inside of Feustel's helmet had begun to flake. One of those flakes, swirling in the modified snow globe that is a spacesuit helmet, ended up in precisely the place you wouldn't want it to.

"Just as an FYI, my right eye is stinging like crazy right now," the astronaut announced to his team. "It's watering a lot. Must have gotten something in it."

Which was an appropriately mellow response, because Feustel's liquid little plight wasn't an emergency: He managed to wiggle down far enough in his spacesuit to reach the spongy device typically used to block the nose in case of a pressure readjustment  and to use that to rub his eye. Which did the trick.

But the episode was a reminder that much of the science  much of the experimentation in general  being done on the orbiting lab of the space station is being conducted, by default, on the humans who call the vehicle home. Knowledge  about zero-gravity's effect on the body, about space as a human environment  reveals itself in fits and starts, through unexpected events like the flaking of anti-fogging solution in an astronaut's helmet. In this case, Feustel's tearjerkerwas a reminder of the fact that astronauts, technically, can't cry.

Astronauts can, certainly, tear up  they're human, after all. But in zero gravity, the tears themselves can't flow downward in the way they do on Earth. The moisture generated has nowhere to go. Tears, Feustel put it, "don't fall off of your eye ... they kind of stay there." NASA spacewalk officer Allison Bollinger, who oversaw Feustel's EVA, confirmed this assessment. "They actually kind of conglomerate around your eyeball," she said.

In other words, yep: There's no crying in space.

And now, courtesy of ISS Expedition 34, we know a little bit more about the brand-new phenomenon that istears in heavens: Crying, without the crying part, actually kind of hurts. And that's so even when the tears in question aren't being formed by eye-stingingly errant chemical flakes. Chris Hadfield, current ISS denizen and prolific tweeter, replied to a student question on the subject with this description of space tears:

Which is ... weird. Tears, in theory, shouldn't hurt. We don't know why, exactly, we cry, but we're pretty sure that the action, evolutionarily, has a palliative effect. Tears should soothe, not sting. But we know as well that life in near-zero-gravity can have a deleterious effect on human vision  and one explanation for that could be fluids shifting toward the head during long-term stays in microgravity. It could be that space gives you a pretty wretched case of dry eye  and that sudden moisture to the cornea, particularly when it takes the form of (eeesh) "a liquid ball," could sting rather than soothe.

Then again  fortunately for any sob-happy space explorers currently above us  those eyeball-clinging orbs are easily dealt with. If you experience them in the space station itself, you can just wipe them away. Or, if you can put up with the stinging, you can wait for them to blow you away. According to shuttle astronaut Ron Parise, "When the tears get big enough they simply break free of the eye and float around." Meaning that, in space, you could ostensibly watch a show composed of your own weightless tears. Which sounds just beautiful and lyrical and haunting enough to make you want to ... well, you know.

This article originally published at The Atlantic here
--------------------------------------------------------------
The NHL finally returns this weekend, and while you may not be able to skate with your favorite hockey stars, you can drive the Zamboni.

Well, let's qualify that: You can drive a digital Zamboni thanks to the latest Google Doodle, which recently went live in Australia.

When you hit play, skaters and hockey players mark up a patch of ice with their blades. Then you enter with your Zamboni and use your arrow keys to motor around and smooth out the surface while picking up fuel cans for extra range and ice cream cones for bonus points.

It's a pretty slick little game and calls to mind the interactive Doodles Google released during the 2012 Summer Olympics.

But why the Zamboni theme? It's not the salvaged NHL season we have to thank  Jan. 16 is the 112th birthday of Frank Zamboni, Jr., inventor of the much-loved ice resurfacer.

Frank, who passed away in 1988, was an innovator and entrepreneur in his own right well before the days of digital. According to the Zamboni Company website, he and his brother left the refrigeration business to open an ice rink in Paramount, Calif., in 1940. When they found the process of manually resurfacing their rink to be arduous and inefficient, Frank began experimenting and the first Zamboni model was finalized in 1949.

The company is still based in Paramount and has produced more than 10,000 machines since.

To have some fun with the new Zamboni Google Doodle, head over to Google.com.au, or simply wait a few hours for Jan. 16 to roll around where you are  then go to Google.com.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Quick quiz: Are you familiar with the term "SoLoMo"? How about "the Internet of things"? Collaborative consumption?

If at this point you're asking WTF, then check out Behind the Buzzwords, a Tumblr with illustrations of some of 2013's hottest terminology. In addition to the charming illos, there are some cogent explanations from people in these industries. CreativeFeed, the marketing firm behind Behind the Buzzwords launched the project "in order to explore the direction of enterprise, tech and marketing" says Sona Rai, a rep for the agency. For the full list of buzzwords, click here.

What do you think? Do these images help you process what Big Data means? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The 2014 Corvette brings many new features to the design of the iconic sports car: muscular lines, carbon-fiber parts and redesigned tail lights to name a few. But the most head-turning feature may be the dashboard's retracting LCD screen.

At the touch of a button, the screen in the middle of the dash lowers, revealing a "secret" alcove where the driver or passenger can stash a cellphone, camera or anything about the size of a baseball or smaller. There's even a USB port for charging and syncing your phone while it's safely ensconced in the cubby.

Besides being bercool, the hidden space has a clandestine aspect  hard for anyone to steal objects within if they don't even know it's there. Not that we'd ever recommend hiding contraband inside it.

SEE ALSO: Chevy Unveils 2014 Corvette at Detroit Auto Show

The new Corvette's hidey-hole certainly isn't the first motorized screen for a car dashboard, but it's the only one we've seen with a secret storage area tucked behind it.

If you know of any others, please let us know in the comments. And tell us what you think of the Corvette's disappearing screen trick.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The law that was used to prosecute Internet freedom activist and hacker Aaron Swartz could be amended in the near future  at least that's what Democratic California Rep. Zoe Lofgren wants.

Lofgren posted on Reddit Tuesday evening a proposal to amend the Computer Fraud and Abuse Act, under which Swartz was being charged.

"We should prevent what happened to Aaron from happening to other Internet users," Lofgren wrote on her Reddit post.

Lofgren called her proposal "Aaron's Law." The core of Lofgren's proposal is to make the violation of an online services user agreement (commonly referred to as "terms of service") a non-criminal activity. She underscored the importance of reforming a law that dates back to 1986 and one that's being harshly critiqued.

"The government was able to bring such disproportionate charges against Aaron because of the broad scope of the Computer Fraud and Abuse Act (CFAA) and the wire fraud statute," wrote Lofgren. "It looks like the government used the vague wording of those laws to claim that violating an online services user agreement or terms of service is a violation of the CFAA and the wire fraud statute."

After Swartz's death on Friday, his friends and supporters pointed fingers at what some consider his prosecutor's overzealous behavior. Lawyer and prominent Internet thinker Lawrence Lessig likened the prosecution to "bullying." Swartz was facing a maximum of 35 years in prison and up to $1 million in fines.

Marcia Hoffmann, a senior staff attorney for the digital rights advocacy group the Electronic Frontier Foundation, criticized the CFFA in a post published on Monday. The key to Swartz's case, according to Hoffmann, was that the prosecution was accusing him of gaining unauthorized access to MIT's network to download scholarly articles. The CFAA makes it a felony to access a computer network "without authorization" or in a manner that "exceeds authorized access."

"Unfortunately, the law doesn't clearly explain what a lack of 'authorization' actually means," Hoffmann wrote in the post. "Creative prosecutors have taken advantage of this confusion to craft criminal charges that aren't really about hacking a computer but instead target other behavior the prosecutors don't like."

SEE ALSO: Is it Time to Reform the Computer Fraud and Abuse Act?

But Lofgren's proposal might not be enough to solve this issue. "Its a great first step, Hoffman told Forbes. "But if its trying to make sure what happened to Aaron cant happen to someone else, it needs to do more."

Tor Ekeland, a lawyer who has worked in the recent case of a hacker who published the email addresses of 114,000 iPad users, which AT&T left visible on a public website, agrees that an eventual reform to the CFAA needs to tackle this issue.

"Unauthorized access is nowhere defined in the [CFAA] and the case law is hopelessly confused on this point," he wrote in Forbes. "The [CFAA] is a prosecutors wet dream and a defendants nightmare. Amending the definition of unauthorized access to exclude [terms of service] violations is just putting a band aid on a gaping, gushing wound."

Lofgren's draft hasn't been introduced to the house yet  she posted it on Reddit to receive feedback and suggestions from the online community. So there's a possibility that her actual proposal will address these issues. "Lofgrens bill is a good start," Lessig told TIME.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A U.S. robot ship resembling a Star Wars spacecraft skimming the waves could hunt for enemy submarines within a few years.

The unarmed robot ship, called Anti-Submarine Warfare Continuous Trail Unmanned Vessel (ACTUV), aims to track submarines using laser detectors, radar and sonar. Such steady sea surveillance could protect the U.S. Navy's prize aircraft carriers and other large warships against underwater threats  one of many ways robots can watch the backs of humans on future battlefields.

ACTUV's design has a "trimaran" shape with gull-like "wings" touching the water on either side of the ship's main body, so that it could appear to almost fly over the ocean surface at high speeds. A video released in December 2012 envisions how the robot ship could handle its future tracking missions.

A human pilot could operate the ship remotely until it gets out of harbor, but ACTUV's own robotic brains would take over from there as it patrolled and tracked down submarines.

Sea deployments would ideally last from 60 to 90 days without any humans or maintenance. ACTUV could supposedly survive rough wind and waves approaching near-gale conditions of 32 to 38 mph.

The U.S. Defense Advanced Research Projects Agency (DARPA) awarded $58 million to the Science Applications International Corporation (SAIC) in August 2012  funding intended for building and testing the ACTUV robot ship. DARPA wants the robot ship to begin sea trials by mid-2015.

NASA's Jet Propulsion Laboratory and Carnegie Mellon University both have a hand in helping create the robot's software brains. SAIC has also enlisted the help of Oregon Iron Works and Christensen Shipyards to work on ship design, construction and propulsion.

Such a robotic submarine hunter would represent one of many tireless robots working for the U.S. Navy in the near future. The Navy previously experimented with ways to launch drones from its own submarines and test-fired missiles from robot boats.

U.S. Navy warships are also poised to deploy swarms of drone helicopters and warplanes from their decks. The Navy has tried out drone helicopters such as the MQ-8 Fire Scout during operations targeting smugglers and pirates from the air. More recently, the X-47 robot warplane the size of a fighter jet underwent its first sea trials aboard a U.S. aircraft carrier in late 2012.

Defense experts have even envisioned the Navy deploying a huge submarine to act as an underwater mothership for swarms of swimming or flying robots. That scenario came up during war games held by the U.S. Department of Defense's NeXTech workshop series in August 2012.

This article originally published at TechNewsDaily here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Adaptive design. It's one of the big buzzwords in digital media right now, but what does it mean?

Nick Davison, director of web development for ad firm Digitaria, has come up with the quickest explanation we've ever seen, not only for adaptive design, but for static, liquid and responsive designs as well. Best of all, it's almost completely visual.

Still confused? Then check out Mashable CTO Robyn Peterson's explanation here.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Amazon's UK streaming video subsidiary Lovefilm has signed a deal with NBCUniversal to bring hundreds of TV episodes from its catalogue to British users.

The TV shows on offer include newer shows, such as the U.S. version of The Office, 30 Rock and Heroes as well as cult classics such as David Hasselhoff's Knight Rider.

"This deal with NBCUniversal strengthens our exceptional and unrivalled on-demand TV offer. Our content, unbeatable value for money and the instant nature of our service make us the first choice for people who want the best possible entertainment experience," said Jim Buckle, Managing Director at Lovefilm.

The deal follows Amazon's movie deal with NBCUniversal as well as similar deals with ABC, BBC and ITV.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It's flu season and chances are you know someone who's coughing and sneezing their way through it right now. For many people, especially those who are away from their regular doctor for whatever reason, diagnosing symptoms can become a scary thing.

We know many people self diagnose using the Internet. A recent Pew research report found eight in 10 online health inquiries start at a search engine. But what if you need more info or want to have a medical consult?

GreatCall, makers of the Jitterbug phone, has introduced the Urgent Care app. It lets you search symptoms, peruse a medical dictionary and basically be your own doctor. Unless, of course, you feel you need one.

In that case you simply press a button and you'll be connected to a live registered nurse who, after asking a few questions, can help diagnose your issues. If more care is needed, the nurse can connect you to a board-certified doctor in your area who will call you within 30 minutes.

This isn't for emergencies or for when you think you may need to go to the hospital. We don't recommend waiting 30 minutes to find out you should head to the emergency room. Instead Urgent Care is a useful resource in situations where you may have a question about medication or are unsure if something is serious and should be escalated.

I can also see Urgent Care being particularly useful for seniors who live alone and want the reassurance of a registered nurse in the middle of the night. The staff is all US-based and available 24/7. Looking up information is free, but each call to a nurse costs $3.99.

Urgent Care if a free app available for iOS, and will be available for Android later this month.

Would you be comfortable with a virtual or phone consult with a nurse or doctor as a way to get immediate medical attention? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
As spring semester begins at colleges across the country, students are boarding planes for study abroad programs.

Spring is the most popular semester for study abroad, according to GoAbroad.com. And the number of students in study abroad programs has never been higher. And while having a few semesters of language classes under your belt is a great start, living in a new country can take some adjusting. From getting around to figuring out expenses in local currency to contacting family and friends at home, there are more than a few scenarios that'll be new to you and possibly require some assistance from your smartphone.

AccuWeather and Weatherbug: If you're traveling in between cities and countries on the weekends, you'll want to dress for the weather. AccuWeather and Weatherbug are both free apps for iOS and Android. AccuWeather uses a map to let you know the weather when you're abroad. On the map within the app, an orange exclamation point will appear over a location that's expecting snow, ice, rain, wind, or the probability of thunderstorms. With Weatherbug, you can save locations in the app and quickly tap to get the weather.

Vonage Mobile and Viber: Since international fees can get super steep, you'll want to download one or both of these free apps. Make sure both people communicating have downloaded the apps, that way calls, texts and roaming charges won't apply. With the Vonage app, you can purchase calling minutes through iTunes, that way you can also call someone who doesn't have the app and roaming charges won't apply.

Convert Any Unit Free: This app converts tons of measurements, like centigrade to fahrenheit, plus a wide variety of currencies. There's also a lot of technical measurements you likely won't need, like frequencies and energies, but at least you'll know that, whatever you need to convert, this app has it. There's both a paid version of the app that costs $2.99, and contains bookmarks and a calculator, and a free version of the app. Both are available in the App Store.

Highlight: This is a great app no matter where in the world you are, but if you're a student traveling abroad it's especially convenient. Highlight is a great way to meet new people: The app will let you know if friends, or people it thinks you might be able to make friends with, are nearby. You sign into the app using your Facebook account and are able to message people privately through the app.

Currency Banknotes: This app for iOS offers both a free and 99 cent version, but for just a buck the paid app is better. There are a lot of currency converting apps available, but this one stands out because you can actually see an image of what each bill in a selected currency should look like, in addition to being able to calculate the exchange rate. Tipping Tips is also handy in figuring out tipping protocol throughout 108 international regions. And while we're on the topic of money, BillPin is an app that makes splitting bills and storing payment information simple. The free app helps track expenses and the amounts you and your friends owe each other.

iTranslate: Need to converse with a waitress or hotel manager and forgot how to say a word or phrase? This free app can translate more than 60 languages and also includes a dictionary.

CouchSurfing Travel cheap on the weekends and during breaks with this app. CouchSurfing connects you with people who have at least a couch, but maybe even a bedroom, to let you sleep on for the night as you travel. Common courtesy suggests you buy them a beer. The app is available for free in the App Store and Google Play.

SupperKing: This app could potentially be great for travelers who want to meet new people and mingle with locals. With SupperKing, users basically crash private dinner parties. You can eat home cooked food and meet people in a comfortable setting: their homes.

The Pill: This is a great app for female travelers. The app reminds you to take your birth control pill at a time you set. It adjusts to local time and also works when the app isn't running and when it's in airplane mode. The free app is available for iOS. There is a similar app for Android called Contraceptive Pill that lets you set reminders for various cycles of pills (from 21 to 28 days) and won't remind you on your days off.

What apps do you use when you travel? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
AT&T is allowing more iOS users to place FaceTime calls over its network for no additional charge.

Previously only available for customers with Mobile Share plans and those using an LTE device on a tiered plan, now AT&T customers with non-LTE tiered plans can also make FaceTime calls over AT&Ts network for no additional charge.

AT&T customers on unlimited data plans are still unable to make FaceTime calls over the network.

FaceTime over cellular originally launched on AT&T in September 2012. AT&Ts Mark Collins says that the company wanted to roll the service out gradually, in order to have minimal impact on the mobile experience for all of our customers.

Last September several public interest groups, including Free Press, Public Knowledge and New America Foundations Open Technology Institute, placed a formal complaint against the carrier with the FCC over its decision to block the service on all but its most expensive data plans.

Wednesday, Matt Wood, policy director at Free Press, issued a statement on the issue in light of AT&T's support for additional data plans.

"AT&T's announcement is another step in the right direction. It shows once again that the FCC's Open Internet rules can create more consumer certainty, as they work to give people more choices and freedom in use of their data. Yet as we've made clear all along, the company has no right to block the application in the first place. Until AT&T makes FaceTime available to all of its customers, it is still in violation of the law and the broader principles of Net Neutrality. We remain ready to bring our complaint unless AT&T finishes the job and stops blocking this application altogether."

The carrier has started updating its systems and processes, and expects to start rolling the update out to customers gradually over the next few weeks. The update will arrive automatically for affected AT&T customers.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Tennis fans around the world are focused Down Under for the Australian Open Grand Slam tournament that started on Monday, and runs through Jan. 27.

But you don't have to be in Melbourne or glued to your TV to follow the action, thanks to the tournament's outstanding digital presence that builds on last year's social smash hit.

Like last year, a social leader board ranks the top male and female players at the tournament according to who is gaining the most social mentions and driving the most traffic on the Australian Open site. Also returning are the 24/7 live updates from the tournament through its official Facebook and Twitter pages.

But some new initiatives have beefed up the digital offerings as well.

A Twitter account called @AOSOS has been set up to act as a help hotline for out-of-towners visiting for the tournament  somewhat similar to the social-media command center for last year's Super Bowl.

"Having this account allows us to carve out these questions from the main tournament account, and provide a customer service-based interaction with fans," says Daniel Lattimer, social-media coordinator for Tennis Australia, the sport's governing body Down Under.

A free iPad app called Open Shutter, meanwhile, delivers a day-by-day photographic timeline of the tournament, while the the official Australian Open program will be available for iPad as well as in hard copy. There's an added emphasis placed on Pinterest, Instagram and Google+, as well.

While last year's Open was a digital success, and this year features an even more robust social offering, you can expect next year's tournament to keep adding new angles.

"We're constantly looking at ways to enhance the fan experience across a variety of social media and digital channels, and offer them unique experiences," Lattimer says.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Chris Budnick is head of Vanguard Plastics, a small injection-molding operation in Southington, Conn., that makes plastic fixtures, gaskets and other stuff no one cares about unless it breaks. On a computer screen, placed where all his workers can see it, Budnick displays what he considers the companys key statistic: sales divided by man-hours.

Budnick, a Yankees fan who never misses a game on the radio, calls it his companys batting average. Wages are his second-biggest expense (after raw materials), and sales have been slow. Even so, the figure stands at $206.8 per man-hour, above the previous years mark of 201. For Vanguard to stay in business, says Budnick, the figure has to go up by 1% or more every year. Theres only one way get there: produce more while working less.

That is why Budnick is now considering adding a new member to his team: a robot called Baxter. Baxter was conceived by Rodney Brooks, the Australian roboticist and artificial-intelligence expert who left MIT to build a $22,000 humanoid robot that can easily be programmed to do simple jobs that have never been automated before.

Brookss company, Rethink Robotics, says the robot will spark a renaissance in American manufacturing by helping small companies compete against low-wage offshore labor. Baxter will do that by accelerating a trend of factory efficiency thats eliminated more jobs in the U.S. than overseas competition has. Of the approximately 5.8 million manufacturing jobs the U.S. lost between 2000 and 2010, according to McKinsey Global Institute, two-thirds were lost because of higher productivity and only 20% moved to places like China, Mexico or Thailand.

At Budnicks shop, its easy to see how efficient things already are. Even though its a small company, with $6 million in revenue, Vanguard operates state-of-the-art automated electric presses, costing about $150,000 each, that crush plastic pellets into shapes under 1,000 atmospheres of pressure. Custom-built robotsrunning on tracks overheadswing down to pluck out the finished parts and place them on a conveyor. The presses work nonstop from Monday to Saturday at noon. Sunday is for resting.

One routine job thats still done by hand at Vanguard is packing parts. Coming off one of the presses are small, textured, plastic cups, which Vanguard sells for $0.02 apiece to a medical company to package liquid medicines. A worker from a temporary agency, earning $9 an hour, stacks the cups, then flicks a plastic bag over the stacks.

This is the job that Baxter will be trying out for when Rethink delivers a modified version of the robot, due at Vanguard for a field test this winter. Budnick says if he can eliminate one temporary workerthus earning back his investment in a single yearhell buy Rethinks robot.

This will be a big test for them, says Budnick, pointing to the tattooed worker stacking the cups. Because if they cant do that, what can they do?

Rethink, which unveiled Baxter to wide attention in the media last September, hasnt sold any robots yet. But it has received inquiries from scores of manufacturers, including artisanal breweries that want to see if the robot can box bottles. Most folks are treating it as a totally new category that they should roll out in small numbers, says Mitch Rosenberg, vice president of marketing at Rethink, which has raised more than $62 million from investors.

The ultimate goal is for robots like Baxter to take over more complex tasks, such as fitting together parts on an electronics assembly line. A couple more ticks of Moores Law and youve got automation that works more cheaply than Chinese labor does, Andrew McAfee, an MIT researcher, predicted last year at a conference in Tucson, Ariz., where Baxter was discussed.

Rethink brags that its robot is made of 75% American parts and is built in Massachusetts. The flag-waving is intentional: its target market is people like Budnick, 48, a Little League coach and former Army lieutenant who has resisted overtures to move his factory to Mexico and refuses to buy machine molds from mainland China because they are not free people. They dont vote.

But Budnick wont buy Baxter out of patriotism. When Rethink executives first brought the robot to Vanguard for a demonstration early in 2012, he and his father thought Baxter looked like a relative weakling compared with their imported Austrian presses, some of which have been operating for 100,000 hours.

They came in and said, Well Mr. B, what do you think of that? And my dad said, Well, you know, you guys have to improve it 100%,  says Budnick. And all the engineers jaws dropped.

Baxter comes with two arms, a vision system, and 360-degree sonar (which it uses to detect people nearby), but for the cup-stacking job it will also need a specially designed gripper, which Rethink is now developing. Rethink is also developing software so that the robot can communicate with other machines, such as a conveyor belt, telling it to move forward or stop.

So how important will Baxter really be to Vanguard? Budnick couches his answer in baseball terminology. Baxter is a potential double, he says. Maybe a home run if it can use both its arms.

This article originally published at MIT Technology Review here
--------------------------------------------------------------
The photographs and measurements coming out of Beijing these days are horrifying. You can see the brown clouds from space, and Chinese media have even been talking up the problem.

I've heard from some Americans saying, "Why don't they do something about this? How can they live like this?" Etcetera. To an early 21st century American, particularly one living in northern California or a relatively pollution-free Washington, DC, it seems crazy to live with such bad air.

But it was not always so.

As America became an industrial power during the 19th century, Pittsburgh emerged as the seat of metalworking, iron and then steel. This was a city powered by coal. Soot and smoke covered the city. There was no blue sky. Travelers from around the world visited Pittsburgh to see the wonder of American capitalism. The stories they tell are like  exactly, like  the ones you hear today about China. (This is a story that I covered in some detail in my book.)

A wry southerner observed, "If a sheet of white paper lie upon your desk for half an hour you may write on it with your finger's end through the thin stratum of coal dust that has settled upon it during that interval."

Another traveler recounted, "Every body who has heard of Pittsburgh knows that it is the city of perpetual smoke, and looks as if it were built above the descent to 'the bottomless pit,'" that is to say, hell. And yet, this dirty power also happened to make a lot of people a lot of money. It was said, "He whose hands are the most sooty handles the most money, and it is reasonable to infer is the richer man."

Everyone knew that the smoke covering their homes and clothes and trees was bad. But it made a certain group of people a lot of money. And so they fought pollution controls. And those people had friends.

So, while the American Academy of Arts and Sciences (granted, a less august institution back then) declared the health hazards of smoke and wondered aloud whether corporations should be allowed to produce what it called such "evil," a Pittsburgh doctor maintained that soot and smoke "only go throat-deep" and said that fire and smoke "correct atmospheric impurities."

The politics of how this works are pretty simple. The smoke and the soot are something we recognize now as an externality. A cost of doing business that the business doesn't have to pay because they can dump it on society. Chinese citizens and activists and assorted air-breathers will have to get the polluting companies to internalize these costs. The polluting companies don't want to internalize that cost. Here's Chicago's smoke inspector (yes htere was such a title and in this case, he was named F.U. Adams) in 1896 laying out the rhetorical positions of the two camps:

Viewed from the standpoint of the Smoke Inspector, the 1,600,000 people of Chicago are divided into two classesFirst, those who create a smoke nuisance; Second, those who are compelled to tolerate a smoke nuisance. One class has radical champions who maintain that smoke is an irrepressible necessity; a concomitant of the commercial and manufacturing supremacy of Chicago; that smoke not only is not unhealthy, but that it is an actual disinfectant, and that the low death rate of the city can be largely attributed to the prevalence of smoke; that the smoke ordinance and its enforcement are aimed at the interests of the Illinois coal operators; that the advocates of smoke abatement are visionary sentimentalists, and in a general way they are emphatically opposed to any agitation on the subject. The other side has partisans no less radical, and equally emphatic in voicing the story of their wrongs. They declare that the enforcement of the smoke ordinance is a farce; they demand that soft coal be excluded from the city; they insist that its consumption entails an annual damage greater than the difference in cost between soft and hard coal; they declare that the smoke nuisance is a positive menace to the health of citizens, that it has resulted in an alarming increase in throat, lung and eye diseases; they point to ruined carpets, paintings, fabrics, the soot-besmeared facades of buildings and to a smoke-beclouded sky, and demand that the Smoke Inspector do his plain duty under the law. It is impossible to reconcile the radical partisans of these two classes. It is fortunate that not many of our citizens are so radical on either side of this most important question. There exists a growing contingent, around which is crystallizing a sentiment that it is practical and possible to abate the smoke nuisance without endangering the stupendous interests involved. The most intelligent and active members of this contingent are drawn from the ranks of those formerly largely responsible for the smoke nuisance. They now oppose smoke for the same reason that they once defended it. They have made the discovery that it is cheaper to abate a smoke nuisance than to maintain one. And by reason of this discovery the smoke nuisance in Chicago will be a relic of the past before the close of the present century.

Ah, you beautiful visionary sentimentalists! My asthma thanks you. But man, F.U. Adams was optimistic. Change takes a long time. Pittsburgh, for its part, did not enact smoke controls until 1946! Yes, 1946! And they didn't really get a handle on the smoke problem until well into the 1950s. That's, oh, 120 years after all those travelers decried the place as hell with the lid off. I mean, this is what Pittsburgh looked like at noon, the lights all on because so little sunlight could penetrate the pollution:

This is what passed for fresh air.

Until finally, one day, after a century of agitation, activists got smoke control measures passed. The sky started to clear.

The fundamental struggle of any kind of pollution control is trying to get the polluters to internalize the costs of their pollution. Because if they don't, the rest of us have to pay more. We  i.e. all of society  subsidize their businesses through increased health care costs, declining values of certain kinds of housing, toxic land or water or air. And the only reason they get away with it is that tracing the line of causality back to them  even when the air looks as disgusting as it does in these photographs  is just that difficult. They hide their roles in the complexity of the system.

So, next time you see one of the photos of Beijing's pollution and say, "Geez! The Chinese should do something about this!" Just know that it took American activists over a century to win the precise same battle, and that they're losing a similar one over climate change right this minute.

This article originally published at The Atlantic here
--------------------------------------------------------------
A rescue dog with an adorably crooked smile that warmed the Internet's hearts has passed away.

The Humane Society announced Wednesday that Billy the chihuahua died unexpectedly over the holidays. Adam Parascandola, Billy's rescuer and later owner, shared the news in a tearful video that will touch anyone who has ever loved an animal.

SEE ALSO: The 10 Cutest Videos of 2012

Billy sparkled in the web fame spotlight after the story of his rescue went viral last December, accumulating more than 600,000 views on YouTube. The tiny dog grew up at a North Carolina puppy mill and dealt with many health problems  including missing part of his lower jaw  as a result of living in a cage without proper medical attention for years.

Parascandola hopes that Billy's legacy of bringing attention to the dogs still suffering in puppy mills will live on.
--------------------------------------------------------------
In 1791, the United States of America, in the text of the First Amendment, promised its citizens that Congress shall never have the authority to prohibit or abridge their right "to petition the Government for a redress of grievances."

In 2012, one concerned citizen exercised that right by requesting the U.S. government build a Death Star, the Empire's focal point in the original Star Wars trilogy. The petition gained the 25,000 signatures necessary to force a response from the White House, an act that fully lived up to its comedic potential. ("The Administration does not support blowing up planets," reads one part of the response.)

But that's just one of countless documents making a public mockery of We the People, the White House's official petition site, started in 2011 to use the Internet to foster participation and transparency in the Obama administration. Hundreds of petitions have been submitted to the site, with more than 250 currently remaining open.

Most of them are serious in nature, demanding that the government take constitutional stances on issues such as gun control, Internet rights, distributed denial-of-service (DDoS) attacks, the latter created by hacktivist collective Anonymous.

But regrettably, it's the more absurd protests that have garnered the public's attention and support. Here are a few of the most bizarre requests made thus far. And appreciate them while you can, because the White House is no longer amused.

As the White House's project grew in popularity, many petitioners felt that their voices were simply not being heard  whether the threshold of 25,000 signatures was met or not. In what could be possibly be the site's most meta moment so far, there was a petition for petitions to be taken more seriously.

"You are not above us. You ARE us. Govern accordingly," the petition concluded.

Response: In an essay titled "We're Listening. Seriously," the White House explored the process behind the site's operation, making sure to clarify any gray areas.

"We may not agree with the policy views expressed in every petition (for example, we believe we do take these petitions seriously!), and gathering enough signatures to meet the signature threshold does not guarantee that the Administration will change our policy on a specific topic," read a part of the response.

In response to Morgan's "hostile attack against the U.S. Constitution by targeting the Second Amendment," angry citizens called for the deportation of the British journalist. A counter petition was created in response to this petition by users of social news site Reddit, entitled "Keep Piers Morgan in the USA.," which stated that the UK didn't want him back.

Response: The White House refused to send Morgan packing, citing the protection of free speech, which is also guaranteed in the First Amendment.

Not long after 4chan's Death Star petition was released, the website BuildTheEnterprise.org petitioned to make part of Star Trek a reality. The creator explained the various benefits that construction of the first USS Enterprise would provide, such as serving as "a spaceship, space station and space port all in one." How economical!

When major media outlets reported Obama's enjoyment of a home-brewed beer named "Honey Ale," it piqued the curiosity of Americans, resulting in Freedom of Information Act requests for the recipe for the beer. Despite not reaching the critical mass necessary to force a response, the Obama administration released the recipe in September 2012 to appease the all-important homebrewer voting bloc in an election year.

The 50 United States have state flags, birds and flowers. Why not official State Pokemon?

The document that could have paved the way to see Pikachu represent the State of New York reached close to 1,000 signatures in one day. Unfortunately, site moderators removed it, citing an undisclosed terms-of-service violation.

The petition that could have solved the United States' money troubles "in two quick and simple steps" came just days after the country avoided plunging off the so-called fiscal cliff at the end of 2012. The petition acknowledges its absurdity, but backs it up with the fact that a platinum trillion-dollar coin is "no more absurd than playing political football with the U.S.  and global  economy at stake."

This single-word petition was also created just after the country's near drop off of the fiscal cliff. The petition claims that the administration has failed to understand the real causes of the country's major problems, such as gun control and global warming. "By any reasonable definition of the American people, this administration is a failure," it concludes.

An example of protest by parody, this mock petition was drafted as a response to a proposed ban on assault weapons by Senators Dianne Feinstein and Joe Lieberman. It aimed to highlight the dangers of baseball bats and hammers, stating that the two items caused more deaths in the U.S. than guns.

Vice President Joe Biden's series of poorly worded quips and accidental utterances would make for quality reality TV. This petition wants to see a "recurring C-SPAN television program featuring the daily activities and interactions of the Vice President with elected officials, foreign dignitaries and everyday American families." It claims that not only will viewers see "a glimpse of the lighthearted side of politics even in the midst of contentious and divisive national debates," but it will also be educated on the duties and responsibilities of the vice president.

Why should being named to the position of Treasury Secretary come at the cost of one's unique signature? This petition shows that a loop-filled John Hancock and high-ranking government positions can indeed go hand-in-hand. It demands to see newly appointed Treasury Secretary Jack Lew's "doodle on every dollar in circulation."

This article originally published at The Daily Dot here
--------------------------------------------------------------
In the latest casualty of consumers' move towards online streaming video, Blockbuster UK has entered administration, the British equivalent of bankruptcy.

The chain, which employs 4,350 people in 239 stores, has called in accounting firm Deloitte, which will handle the bankruptcy proceedings. Deloitte is also handling the administration proceedings for HMV, another entertainment retailer.

Lee Manning, a partner at Deloitte, told SkyNews that, "In recent years Blockbuster has faced increased competition from internet-based providers along with the shift to digital streaming of movies and games. We are working closely with suppliers and employees to ensure the business has the best possible platform to secure a sale, preserve jobs and generate as much value as possible for all creditors."

The move follows Blockbuster U.S.'s bankruptcy filing in 2010. Dish Network bought Blockbuster in 2011. Blockbuster UK launched in 1989 and is independent of the U.S. operation.

Though the impetus for Blockbuster's downfall was competition from Netflix, Blockbuster proved itself too slow to effectively respond. The company launched its DVD-by-mail service in 2004, seven years after Netflix's launch. Blockbuster's Dish-based streaming video service, which was hyped to be a response to Netflix's streaming video service, was actually just a $10 a month add-on for existing Dish subscribers.

Because of the streaming revolution, DVD sales in the U.S. fell 120% in units in 2012, according to Digital Entertainment Group. Blu-ray sales, however, propped up revenues, which only fell 2%.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Texting and driving is a serious problem among teenagers in the United States. In fact, according to a study, one in four teens respond to texts at their wheels, and 30 percent read messages while on the road. A new app hopes to change that by giving parents a tool to track their children while they are in their cars.

The app is called Canary and allows parents to track a teenager's phone, letting them see when they make calls, text or even leave a certain area in real time. It also notifies when the app is disabled.

"Parents get immediate alerts via the app installed on their own phones and by email, with complete details of their teens activities," states the app description. Basically, the app will let you track your kids and instantly notify you whenever they use their phone while driving.

SEE ALSO: 5 Apps To Prevent Your Teen From Texting While Driving

The app, which is available for both iOS and Android devices, offers a seven day trial period. After that, parents will have to shell out $7.99 a month to keep using it.

Watch the video above to learn more about this new app. Do you think this is a good way to prevent accidents on the road? Share your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
CES 2013 is already fading from memory, but what a ride it was. Thousands of companies and hundreds of thousands of visitors converged on the desert-dry town to ogle the latest gadgets and gizmos, hobnob with celebrities and reconnect with old friends and colleagues.

It was like that for me. When I wasn't grabbing another drink of water or applying Chapstick to my lips, I was running from booth to booth, meeting to meeting and interview to interview to get the story.

Highlights for me included the "I think I'm looking out a window" 4K ultra HD screens, 3D interfaces, touch-screen computers, surprise gaming platforms, Danny DeVito, Felicia Day, robots and Samsung's green lemonade.

I could describe the story of CES 2013 in more detail or you could simply settle in for almost a minute to enjoy Mashable's supercut of our experience at CES 2013.

Its the best way to get at least the flavor of the massive technology event  without the chapped lips.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Getting yourself ready is challenging enough sometimes. For families on the go, making sure everyone is dressed and ready can feel nearly impossible.

Luckily, one very clever father has figured out a way to clean the house and do his daughter's hair with the same device.

SEE ALSO: 4 Minutes of Dad Jokes Is Surprisingly Hysterical

Watch this guy create the perfect ponytail with a simple flick of the vacuum cleaner switch.

Hopefully she checks her head for dust before leaving the house.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Two old friends use technology to stay connected.

It's wonderful that this pup pair have technology to maintain their long distance relationship. But hearing the tone of their conversation, it seems like these dogs have some serious issues to discuss.

SEE ALSO: 3 New Zealand Dogs Learn to Drive Mini Coopers

They're most likely debating the government's financial woes and how it will affect their daily allotment of Kibbles 'n Bits.

Does your dog have any favorite tech toys? Share in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Measured en masse, the stack of "books I want to read" that sits precariously on the edge of a built-in bookshelf in my dining room just about eclipses 5,000 pages. The shelf is full to bursting with titles I hope to consume at some indeterminate point in the future.

It would be a lot easier to manage if I just downloaded all those books to an iPad or Kindle. None are hard to find editions that would be unavailable in a digital format, and a few are recent hardcover releases, heavy and unwieldy.

But there's something about print that I can't give up. There's something about holding a book in your hand and the visceral act of physically turning a page that, for me at least, can't be matched with pixels on a screen.

Yet the writing appears to be on the wall: E-books are slowly subsuming the printed format as the preferred vehicle on which people read books. E-books topped print sales for the first time in 2011, a trend that continued into 2012. Just this month, Bexar County, Texas announced plans for the nation's first electronic-only library. A recent study from Scholastic found that the percentage of children who have read an e-book has nearly doubled since 2010 to almost half of all kids aged 9 to 17, while the number who say they'll continue to read books in print instead of electronically declined from 66% to 58%.

For those who prefer their books printed in ink on paper, that sounds depressing. But perhaps there is reason to hope that e-books and print books could have a bright future together, because for all the great things e-books accomplish  convenience, selection, portability, multimedia  there are still some fundamental qualities they will simply never possess.

That's not to say that electronic books can't be beautiful  as a medium, e-books are still new and designers have yet to fully realize their potential. But for paper books, we're already there. As Craig Mod points out in his essay "Hacking the Cover," the book cover evolved as a marketing tool. It had to grab your attention from its place on the shelf. For that reason, the best designed covers were often beautiful art pieces. Not so in the digital world.

"The cover image may help quickly ground us, but our eyes are drawn by habit to number and quality of reviews. Were looking for metrics other than images  real metrics  not artificial marketing signifiers," he wrote. And though that might eventually free book designers to get more creative with their designs, you can't display a digital book, even if you wanted to. Any electronic book that boasts beautiful design, does so only ethereally.

Author Joe Queenan, in a Wall Street Journal opinion piece, argued that e-books are great for people who care only about the contents, have vision problems or other physical limitations or who are ashamed of what they're reading.

But for people who truly love books, print is the only medium that will satisfy.

"People who need to possess the physical copy of a book, not merely an electronic version, believe that the objects themselves are sacred," he wrote. "Some people may find this attitude baffling, arguing that books are merely objects that take up space. This is true, but so are Prague and your kids and the Sistine Chapel."

Web entrepreneur, designer and novelist Jack Cheng, who recently funded the printing of his book through Kickstarter, told me that printed books just offer a more robust experience to the reader. "I feel like with e-books, you often just get a meal on the same white plate as all the other meals," he mused. "But a nice hardcover is like having a place setting, having dinnerware selected to suit the food. The story is still the main thing you're there for, but the choices around it  the paper stock, the way the book is typeset, the selection of fonts  they add their own subtle flavors to the experience of that story."

Your favorite books define you, and digital versions don't seem to impart connections that are quite as deep.

This piece of the experience doesn't translate to the electronic format. Someday in the distant future, maybe David Eggers' Kindle will be sold by Bauman Rare Books on Madison Avenue, but it's unlikely that digital books will ever be personal artifacts the way that their physical counterparts can be.

"I think print and paper has a lasting value that people appreciate. Pixels are too temporary," said Praveen Madan, an entrepreneur on the Kepler's 2020 team, via email. Madan and his cohorts are attempting to reinvent the business model for independent bookstores, including ways to sell and offer services around e-books. "Books have been around for a very long time and people have a deeper relationship with some books than most digital content," he said.

They possess the quality of scarcity, which means that your copy is unique on some level. For readers who truly love a particular book, an electronic facsimile is not an adequate replacement for owning a physical copy.

"There are books that I need bound and sitting on my shelf. I need a copy of Fahrenheit 451. That book is important to me," author Rob Hart, the website administrator for digital imprint Mysterious Press and class director at LitReactor, told me. "Digital technology is funny  you own an e-book, but you don't ... You're paying for the right to access data."

Cheng has also felt the draw of books as collectible objects. "Personally I've gone out and purchased hardcovers of books I first read on my Kindle because I wanted them in a more tangible form," he explained. "Having a hardcover on my shelf is like having a print by one of my favorite artists on the wall."

He predicts that print might have a future similar to vinyl.

"The physical artifacts are beginning to feel more precious, more like gifts. And I can see publishing going the same way," he said. "Maybe what we'll lose to digital publishing are the cheaply produced mass market printings on poor quality paper. And what we'll gain is a new appreciation for well-designed, higher-quality hardbacks, like the ones folks at The Folio Society are putting out."

In a surprising flip of the traditional publishing cycle, Random House's Doubleday recently announced plans to print hardcover versions of E.L. James' bestselling 50 Shades of Grey trilogy, even though electronic and mass market paperback editions have already sold 65 million copies. Why? Reader demand. You just can't collect an e-book.



The PBS website MediaShift recently asked a group of book lovers in Chapel Hill and Durham, N.C. which they preferred: printed or electronic books? Those who preferred printed books cited things like the smell, the feel and the weight as reasons.

"Paper books don't get replaced by e-books, because there's just part of the experience you can't reproduce," said one man. (Of course, nostalgia is generational.)

But if e-books just replace mass market paperbacks, as Cheng predicts, will books become merely art pieces? Some pundits think so.

Writing last year in Slate, Michael Agresta argued that printed books will only survive as art. Books are no longer a good "vessel for text," he wrote. "Bookshelves will survive in the homes of serious digital-age readers, but their contents will be much more judiciously curated. The next generation of paper books will likely rival the art hanging beside them on the walls for beauty, expense, and 'aura'  for better or for worse."

In some ways, Agresta is correct. It would be smart to bet that print sales will continue to decline, while e-book sales will continue to rise. Most people will own fewer printed books, and those they do own may very well be beautiful collector's editions, like the 50 Shades hardcovers, meant for display.

But it's a mistake to assume that this is a case of the MP3 replacing the CD, or the CD replacing the cassette. E-books are not simply a better format replacing an inferior one; they offer a wholly different experience.

Brian Haberlin is one of the co-authors of Anomaly, an ambitious printed graphic novel, augmented by a smartphone app that makes animations leap off the page while you read. I asked why he chose to print the heavy, unwieldy and expensive hardcover edition. His answer was simple: "Because books are cool! I love print, always will. I love digital, always will. But they will continue to be different experiences. Its a different texture, a different experience and that alone warrants their existence."

Yes, Anomaly is one of those beautiful, collectible art pieces. But it also highlights why print is here to stay. The experience of reading Anomaly on your iPad is vastly different than the experience of reading the printed version. The story is the same, but the medium affects the way you read it. It's not totally unlike the difference between watching the movie version of Les Miserables and watching it performed live on stage.

There may come a time when we look at electronic books and printed books as similarly divergent mediums.

In a recent Fast Company column titled "The Future of Reading," author and comedian Baratunde Thurston made a compelling case for why books might just be better in electronic form. Superior annotation tools, easier discovery, interactive content and shared reading experiences are just some of the things made possible because digital publishing has allowed us to, as Thurston put it, network our words "and the ideas they represent." For Thurston, this is an either-or scenario. Digital books or printed books. And while he lamented our diminished attention spans  the result of distractions embedded in the digital format  he concluded that it's all worth it because of the great things e-books can do.

But the choice between e-books and printed books is not a zero sum game. Print books do not have to disappear for e-books to flourish, and e-books don't have to be the only choice.

"Printed books are for people who love printed books. Digital books are for those who love digital books," Haberlin told me.

Maybe it's just that simple.
--------------------------------------------------------------
You may want to think twice before posting that update to Facebook. New research has found that Facebook status updates are more memorable than lines from a book or the faces of strangers.

Overall, the researchers found that Facebook status updates were one-and-a-half times more memorable than sentences from books and two-and-a-half times more memorable than faces. Those numbers represent remarkable differences in memory performance, researchers say.

"We were really surprised," said Laura Mickes, visiting scholar at UC San Diego and a senior research fellow at the University of Warwick. "These kinds of gaps in [memory] performance are on a scale similar to the differences between amnesiacs and people with healthy memory."

The findings undercut popular assumptions about social media posts, she said.

"Facebookis updated roughly 30 million times an hour, so its easy to dismiss it as full of mundane, trivial bits of information that we will instantly forget as soon as we read them," Mickes said. "But our study turns that view on its head, and by doing so gives us a really useful glimpse into the kinds of information were hardwired to remember."

In the research, which was published in the journal Memory and Cognition, participants studied more than 200 anonymous Facebook posts. Researchers picked posts that were close in length to sentences from books, and made sure to take out any irregularities in those postings that may have made them more memorable.

"Not only is the 'Facebook effect' on memory strong, but we replicated the effect each time we examined it," said Christine Harris, a psychology professor at UC San Diego.

Researchers say that a number of factors make these posts more memorable; however, the top reason is that digital communications very closely resemble the way people talk. That is, researchers believe the similarity of online communication to everyday speech makes it more memorable than lines from books, which are more carefully composed.

"One could view the past 5,000 years of painstaking, careful writing as the anomaly," said Nicholas Christenfeld, a psychology professor at UC San Diego. "Modern technologies allow written language to return more closely to the casual, personal style of pre-literate communication. This is the style that resonates, and is remembered."

The research was co-authored by Daniel Bajic, Ryan Darby and Vivian Hwe of UC San Diego, and Jill Warker of the University of Scranton.

This article originally published at BusinessNewsDaily here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Investors and consumers are still in the process of figuring out exactly what Facebook Graph Search means for the future of the social network, but right now, the first reaction from many analysts seems to be "meh."

Brian Wieser, a senior analyst at Pivotal Research Group, said in an investor note Tuesday that Facebook's new smarter search engine is a "favorable" development in that it shows the company is continuing to innovate, but he doubts about how much potential it has for monetization going forward.

"We are not assuming that the initiative will lead to meaningful revenue growth in the near future as several issues will limit Facebook's potential," Wieser wrote in the note. "Our initial view is that the quantity of Facebook search volumes will be relatively low, as consumers are likely to continue prioritizing other sources (i.e. Google). Advertisers would consequently only use search if they can - or are perceived to - satisfy their goals efficiently with Facebook."

Likewise, Gartner analyst Ray Valdez suggested that the data shared between friends could be a powerful tool for search, but noted that the average user probably doesn't have that much data to share. "Very well-connected individuals have a rich treasure trove of data that they can mine, but the average person's storehouse of data is much sparser and has less relevance to these queries," he told Reuters.

Nate Elliott, a principal analyst at Forrester, went a step further by downplaying the feature as something Facebook should have released years ago. His verdict: "not really a big deal."

"I've no doubt that parsing a trillion connections between a billion users is an immense challenge," Elliott wrote in a blog post. "But it's still just site search. The big news isn't that Facebook has fixed its search tool; the big news is that they didn't do this long ago."

Facebook's stock closed down by nearly 3% on Tuesday and quickly dropped below $30 a share in early trading Wednesday. The stock had been on a nice run this month in part due to the anticipation for the company's big press announcement yesterday.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Facebook launched on Wednesday a smarter way to search on the site, allowing you to make complex queries to filter through friend networks and public profiles on the site.

Although it's a huge leap forward for the company, we aren't feeling the name of the internal search system: Facebook Graph Search. Snooze. It's also clunky and definitely not user friendly.

SEE ALSO: Hands On With Facebook's Graph Search

The name refers to the commonly-used tech term "social graph," which includes each Facebook user's friends and followers network. But Facebook members are consumers more than they are tech experts, developers and marketers, so the name is way too technical for the typical user.

It's been reported that the Facebook team has referred to it as "Browse" instead of Graph Search, but went with the latter in the days leading up to the launch.

So we're asking you, dear readers: If you could rename Facebook Graph Search, which would you pick? Vote below or add your own suggestion in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
When Mark Zuckerberg set out to build Facebook in the fall of 2003, he was still trying to figure out exactly what the website should be. One conclusion he arrived at pretty early on was that it shouldn't be branded as a dating site.

"I don't think people would sign up for the facebook thing if they knew it was for dating," Zuckerberg wrote at the time in an IM chat with his close high school friend Adam D'Angelo, who became Facebook's CTO and eventually went on to co-found Quora. "I think people are skeptical about joining dating things too."

Though the look and feel of Facebook has changed in the years since, Zuckerberg and employees at the company have generally refrained from referring to the social network as a dating site, and from going after the online dating industry. That's why it was so striking to see Facebook tease a feature clearly intended for dating during the company's big press event on Tuesday for Graph Search, a new search engine that lets members use natural language to pull up recommendations for people, places and businesses from their social graph.

Facebook reps demonstrated several uses for the product, ranging from recruiting to searching for restaurant recommendations. Then, at one point, a Facebook employee stood on stage and searched for "friends of my friends who are single and living in San Francisco." With that simple line, Facebook asserted itself as a potentially big player in the future of online dating.

"Facebook just announced that they are moving in on the essence of online dating," said Dan Slater, author of Love in the Time of Algorithms, a history of online dating and its impact on our culture, which comes out next Thursday. The bedrock of most dating sites, according to Slater, has been the ability to discover people you don't know who share similar interests, whereas Facebook's focus was on helping you find the people you do know. Graph Search changes that by making it much easier to search for people outside your immediate social circle. "That is a radical change for a community as big as Facebook."

With Graph Search, Facebook members can search for other single users and filter the results based on their interests, education, age, hometown, current city and more  all while using natural language. If you want to find single women under the age of 35 who are from your hometown and now live in New York, you can type exactly that into the search engine and see what pops up.

At first blush, it might seem obvious that Facebook could be used for dating purposes. The social network has long served as a place to flirt by letting users advertise their relationship statuses, stalk one another's updates and Poke people they might be interested in. Indeed, one study last year from Stanford found that about 10% of couples who met online knew each other first in some other context and re-connected through a social network like Facebook.

That said, several startups have tried in recent years to leverage Facebook's social graph for dating, but with only mixed success. Kingfish Labs raised $500,000 in early 2012 to use Facebook for dating, but its first Facebook application, Yoke, struggled to take off and the company itself was later acquired by BuzzFeed.

Yoke was able to rely on Facebook data to help its users find people who shared connections and interests with them, but the problem the dating app faced was providing a way for users to get in touch with those people. "Cold friending or cold messaging someone on Facebook is uncomfortable because you don't know if the other person wants to be approached. On OkCupid it's not uncomfortable, it's standard," Rob Fishman,co-founder of Kingfish Labs, told Mashable. The assumption is that everyone on OkCupid is interested in dating, but on Facebook, even those who label themselves as "single" may not be in the market for a new relationship. "There is no way for the third party to signal that 'yes, I want a date to approach me.'"

More fundamentally, Fishman says that his company found Facebook's Like data was often not fresh or comprehensive enough to serve as a match-making tool. "Facebook Like data is actually pretty sparse and stale," Fishman says. "If I asked you what your favorite movies are and went to your movies section on Facebook, I don't think they would match up. On OkCupid, people curate their profiles with a scalpel."

These two problems will likely limit the potential of Graph Search as a dating tool for now, but Fishman suggests this could change in the future if Facebook adds additional relationship status options like "Looking for a date," and if the social network can accrue enough real-time interest data for users from its partnerships with other websites.

"Someone is going to crack the nut of Facebook dating," Fishman says. "It might well be Facebook."

The larger question then is whether Facebook can or will ever take on the big players in the online dating space. Investors appear to be concerned about this possibility, as the stock for IAC/InterActiveCorp  the parent company of Match and OkCupid  dropped by more than 2% after Facebook announced Graph Search on Tuesday.

"I think the online dating business has to be looking at this announcement and saying this could either be the best thing ever for us, or it could be the beginning of the end," Slater says. If members of existing dating sites are successful in finding matches through Facebook, it could cut into their business. On the other hand, Slater says, Facebook could potentially help the industry by removing whatever "cultural barrier" remains for online dating.

About a third of the single population in the U.S. currently uses online dating sites  a number that has been relatively flat in recent years. Both Slater and Fishman suggest that Facebook has the potential to make it more common for people to use the Internet to find dates, without necessarily stealing away many customers from other online dating sites.

Even before Facebook made its big announcement, Slater says he noticed that a growing number of non-dating platforms are being used for dating purposes, from match-making apps on Spotify to social discovery tools like Highlight. Meanwhile, he says some dating websites are starting to re-brand a bit by taking the "pink hearts" off their homepage with the goal of being a little more welcoming to those who might previously have been put off by the idea of online dating.

Facebook could fit nicely in this trend by serving as a more general social venue where casual users occasionally browse for dates without necessarily branding themselves as online daters. "It's very similar to going to a club or a poetry reading or whatever your thing is [to meet people]," Slater says, whereas "online dating is more like going to a speed-dating event."

At least in this sense, Facebook could help online dating function a little more like offline dating.
--------------------------------------------------------------
If you came down with the flu in the last six weeks  and mentioned the fact on Twitter or Facebook  you're not alone.

Since the beginning of December, there have been 626,379 mentions of flu on those two services, according to sentiment analysis firm Crimson Hexagon. That's a 2,336% increase on the previous month, with flu mentions spiking in early January.

Of those, fully 40% of the posts included the phrase "I have the flu." That represents more than 250,000 Twitter or Facebook users with the dreaded winter bug.

Another 10% of users reported their friends or family had the flu. That kind of post peaked more recently, on Jan. 13.

The good news: Overall mentions of flu appear to be dropping precipitously. Either we're all getting better, or we've stopped posting about our condition.

According to these figures, Twitter is the service we're more likely to turn to when sick. It was the source for 90% of Crimson Hexagon's mentions.

This has been an unusually rough flu season, especially on the East Coast  and technology has been in the forefront of determining just how bad it is. Google.org, in partnership with the CDC, has noted a spike in searches for flu-related topics that far outpaces the last seven years.

The problem appears just as great on the other side of the Atlantic. In the UK, 47% of tweets and Facebook posts about the flu were from someone who had it. (Those figures also include cases of norovirus, which is particularly virulent in Europe this winter.)

Social media has been used to predict the opening weekend box office takings for movies; it has been less successful when it comes to predicting elections.

But is it reliable when it comes to the spread of disease? Give us your take in the comments. 

 

Image via iStockphoto, Thomas_EyeDesign
--------------------------------------------------------------
Now you can call your Facebook friends for free  if youre an iPhone user, that is. The company has rolled out a new feature in the U.S. that allows Facebook Messenger app users to place voice calls with friends over the social network using their data connection or Wi-Fi.

The feature started rolling out in the United States Wednesday, and comes as a simple free calling button in the existing app. Users dont have to update the existing Messenger app in order to take advantage of the feature.

Free calls are placed by tapping the "i" icon on the top right side of chat, and then selecting "Free Call" from your friend's contact card. Your friends will need to have Facebook's stand-alone Messenger app installed on their phone in order for the feature to work (otherwise the "Free Call" icon will appear grey and marked out).

Calls have a similar look and feel as traditional voice calls you might make on your iPhone.

Facebook started testing the feature in Canada earlier this month. The functionality was announced alongside an update to the companys iOS and Android apps that allows Facebook users to send short voice messages to each other.

Vonage launched an app in 2010 that allowed Facebook users to call friends for free, however, the app required that both parties have the Vonage for Facebook app installed on their devices in order to do so.

Messenger is one of several stand-alone apps developed by Facebook. The company often uses the apps to test new features with power users before deciding which features to include in the traditional Facebook app for the social network's general audience.

Will you use Messenger to call your Facebook friends? Let us know your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Valentine's Day is approaching and it's just not the time of year that you want to be alone.

And, sure, you could bring back that made-up gal-pal you bragged about around space camp back in the day, but technology has really screwed with your ability to fib. A quick Google search can reveal the truth.

So let technology fix the problem that it created; sign up for NamoroFake.com. For $39.99, all (or at least a few) of your dating woes will be solved. The Brazil-based site can generate a fake Facebook profile for your "girlfriend," complete with comments and relationship statuses from the past 30 days.

It's almost foolproof. (Until, perhaps, someone asks to see a picture of the two of you tagged together on Facebook  then you'll have to Photoshop your way out of that mess.)

SEE ALSO: How Facebook Graph Search Could Disrupt Online Dating

And sheer desperation doesn't have to be the only reason for your membership. Using the site could be a great way to get that ex of yours all jealous, or get your matchmaking mother off your back.

Seems like such a steal for $39.99.

Unfortunately, the site currently only creates fake girlfriends, not boyfriends. But they promise to eventually launch a male version of the imaginary lover.

While you wait for Mr. Facebook Perfect, feel free to invest in one of these boyfriend arm pillows, which we're sure you can pass off as a boy-toy with just a hat and some sunglasses.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Hell hath no fury like an iPhone owner scorned, and one Las Vegas man is bearing the brunt of it.

Apple's Find My iPhone app has mistakenly sent dozens of users to Wayne Dobson's North Las Vegas home over the past two years. The problem became so bad, the poor guy posted a sign on his front door that reads, "No Lost Cell Phones!!"

According to the Las Vegas Review-Journal, angry people have appeared at all hours of the day, showing Dobson proof of their accusations.

The iPhone-tracking feature, also available for other Apple devices, locates your lost smartphone on a map. For many people, that pinpoint led them straight to Dobson's home in Clark County.

He found the problem affects only Sprint iPhones, and company officials told him GPS locators don't give an exact address, but a general location.

It turns out, Clark County zoning accidentally assigned Dobson's home address to a cellphone tower, a Las Vegas news station reports.

SEE ALSO: How Does GPS Know Where You Are?

Not only does he get accused of being a thief, but police show up on his doorstep to answer 911 calls originating from his home. Local police use the same tracking system, so if a 911 caller doesn't know where they are, police are given Dobson's address.

County officials are working on changing the cell tower's address to restore some normalcy to Dobson's life.

Has GPS ever failed you? Share your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Google.org, the philanthropic arm of Google, announced it's funding two new tech projects on Wednesday, one to encourage civic innovation and the other to open government data.

The larger of the two grants, a $2.1 million gift, was given to the Sunlight Foundation. The Foundation will use the money to grow its local programming, particularly to create consistant standards for open data in all U.S. cities.

Another $1.6 million was given to mySociety, a UK charity that builds open source codes for local authorities, governments and corporations. The grant money will be used to accelerate building new civic apps.

Matthew Stepka, VP of Google.org, told Mashable that these two grants are an extension of Google.org's mission to create and spread technology solutions that can make a positive impact and combat major challenges.

SEE ALSO: Google Fights to Save 3,054 Languages

"Both Sunlight Foundation and mySociety have proven track records in using the Internet to open up government data and deliver tools to civic developers," Stepka says. "Their past work shows their success, and the new projects point to their ambition. They're both doing work that's foundational to the sector  the projects being funded by Google.org are connecting other players in the space and building a network that can allow for more new efforts to flourish."

Stepka notes that Google was already working on civic engagement and open data projects  such as its online election tools, Civic Information API and Kenya Elections Hub  prior to distributing these grants.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Google on Wednesday answered a query that had been consuming the blogosphere for 24 hours: Why did the donkey lie down on the road?

The speculation began when an image of a donkey lying on its side in the middle of a dirt road in the Kweneng region of Botswana emerged on Street View. Then @TheRealSheldonCooper tweeted his suspicions about the photo to his 149,000 followers.

After a social media uproar, Google addressed the controversy on its Google Maps blog on Wednesday. In a post entitled "Never ass-ume," Kei Kawai, group product manager for Google Maps provided photographic evidence that the donkey got up and walked away after the above image was taken.

So what was the donkey doing? Kawai speculated that the donkey was taking a dust bath.

This isn't the first time Google has posted a provocative image on Street View. Past sightings include an apparently headless man, a guy getting arrested and what looks like a beam from outer space. Steve Jobs was also apparently spotted in a Street View image as well.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Hey, you. Yes, you, smiling like a homecoming queen. You're too perky  grouch it up a little, mmkay?

Grumpy Cat can lend a paw. No, the Internet's most famous feline Scrooge won't make an appearance at your family pancake breakfast, but you could see her crabby face with every sip of coffee. Just pick up a hand-painted Grumpy Cat mug.

SEE ALSO: Grumpy Cat Tattoo Could Impress Even the Crankiest Kitty

That's right; you can now meow "Good riddance!" to regular cat-themed home decor. Etsy merchants, Reddit users and even Grumpy Cat's real life owners have plastered  litter-ally, in some cases  the meme kitty's face to an assortment of products.

Of course, the real Grumpy Cat would hate every plush toy and nipple pasty pictured below, but she doesn't have a credit card anyway.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Hubble Space Telescope's iconic "Deep Field" photo wowed the world in 1996 by revealing a huge collection of galaxies hiding inside a patch of the sky that looked like nothing more than blank space. Now NASA plans to image six more "empty" bits of sky for a whole new set of deep fields that could revolutionize astronomy once again.

Hubble captured the Deep Field by staring at the same point over many hours, letting particles of light from extremely distant objects slowly pile up to reveal celestial bodies that would otherwise be too faint to see.

Since the original photo's release, Hubble looked even longer at the same spot to create the "Ultra Deep Field" in 2004 and then the "eXtreme Deep Field" in 2012. But the new effort, called Hubble Frontier Fields, will be the first to try a similar technique on some new areas of the heavens. These photos won't go quite as deep as the Ultra Deep Field, but will represent some of the deepest images of the universe ever taken.

"As iconic as the Ultra Deep Field is, now we'll have six that are almost as nice," said Hubble scientist Dan Coe of the Space Telescope Science Institute in Baltimore, Md., which manages the telescope.

The Hubble Frontier Fields will collect light for about 45 hours each, spread over a period of three years, imaging objects that existed in the first 500 million years after the Big Bang.

Plus, in a new twist, astronomers will image each of the six blank patches of sky in combination with nearby galaxy clusters, whose gravity can act as a cosmic magnifying lens to zoom in on small, distant objects behind them.

Researchers will "observe six galaxy clusters and blank fields in parallel," Coe told SPACE.com. "While they're observing a cluster, the other camera is just far enough away where it's not really looking at the cluster anymore. It'll be essentially blank. To really go deep in both of these at the same time, that's never been done before."

The added magnification boost of the clusters' gravity should make these pictures the deepest glimpses of the universe yet. The shots could capture galaxies that are older and farther away than anything ever seen before.

"Some of them will be among the most distant galaxies yet found," said Coe, who led the study of one of the current contenders for farthest galaxy ever seen, MACS0647-JD, which lies about 13.3 billion light-years away.

The original Deep Field photo revealed about 3,000 previously unknown galaxies in a patch of sky only 2.5 arc-minutes across, or about one 24-millionth of the whole sky. The new fields will determine whether that huge haul was a fluke, or if almost any patch of blank sky contains a similar wealth of treasures."You don't know, it might be a special part of the sky you're looking at," Coe said.

Hubble will begin observing the first of the new fields later this year.

The nearly23-year-old telescope is still going strong after five upgrades from visiting space shuttle crews. NASA hopes to keep the observatory running until at least 2018, when its successor, the James Webb Space Telescope, is due to launch.

This article originally published at Space.com here
--------------------------------------------------------------
If Jesus had been around in the 21st century we all know he'd be plugged in with his iPhone 5  How else would he keep tabs on the Apostles?

Cartoonist Brad Colbow imagined just how digital this member of the Holy Trinity would be if he were one of us Apple fanboys.

Clearly there would have been no wandering in the desert for 40 days (unless maybe Jesus was using Apple Maps) and the Last Supper would be delivered via Seamless app.

SEE ALSO: Jesus Would Be on Facebook if He Lived Today, German Priest Says

You know Jesus would be Instagramming his Baptism to make Judas all jealous. And, needless to say, #FF (Follow Friday) on Twitter would have a whole new meaning for the saintly crowd.

What other apps do you think Jesus would have on his smartphone? Share your ideas in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
We've all seen that Apple Maps is a far cry from perfect, but the Wall Street Journal's Kabul bureau chief may have just discovered some of its most amusing glitches while browsing on his iPad.

Yaroslav Trofimov discovered a street named "Bad Monkey" and another named "MoJo Way." After discovering these unlikely streets on Apple Maps, he shared his findings to Twitter, UN Dispatch reports.

But how did these streets achieve these misnomers? Apple copied old maps from crowdsourced and edited mapping platform OpenStreetMap without fully fact checking street names.

The maps copied by Apple are some of the earliest created by a group of Afghan university students. The students assigned spoof names to nameless or disputed streets. Though corrections have since been made to OpenStreetMaps, the Apple maps inherited the initial errors.

"The issue is that Apple took an old snapshot of the OpenStreetMap data and hasnt updated it since, so things like 'personal' street names are in there, even if they have been fixed since," Kate Chapman, Indonesia-based director of the Humanitarian OpenStreetMap Team, told UN Dispatch. "The fact that they dont update the data shows that the incentive for people to improve the map just isnt going to be there."

At press time, you could still find Bad Monkey, MoJo Way, and even "Hillbilly Hameed" in Jalalabad, Afghanistan. Seems like Apple isn't making any quick effort to correct Maps' faux pas in areas with low iPhone and iPad penetration.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Telepresence allows people to connect and communicate with others around the world. If you're using a tablet, you know the difficulties of maneuvering and angling to squeeze everyone in on the conference call or show off your new pup to Mom.

Revolve Robotics, a San Francisco-based start-up company, created a robot to take away all that awkwardness. KUBI is a motorized tablet stand designed to pivot and rotate for added hands-free convenience.

KUBI, which means "neck" in Japanese, has a 300 degree pan and 90 degree tilt to allow users to look around the room. Creators Marcus Rosenthal and Ilya Polyakov wanted to create a "natural experience that actually gets the KUBI out of the way and lets your loved ones enjoy the experience without knowing it's there," they say on their Indiegogo page.

The remote user can change point of view with a secondary device. For example, if you were using your iPad to FaceTime, you could login to the KUBI Kontroller website on your smartphone and use a grid interface to control motion. Check out the video above for more information.

No cables are necessary, since it connects via Bluetooth. The KUBI fits tablets 7.9" to 10.6" screen size and works in both portrait and landscape mode.

Though it doesn't have motion tracking on its own just yet, a "following" feature may be included if Revolve Robotics doubles its $100,000 fundraising goal.

The stand is available for pre-order on Indiegogo for $199.

Would you use a KUBI? Are there any devices you use to make video calling easier? Let us what you think in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The largest thing ever? That's quite the claim.

Astronomers from the University of Central Lancashire, in England, have discovered a collection of luminous and highly radiant quasars that they're saying is the largest known structure in the universe. The large quasar group (LQG) spans almost four billion light-years across at its widest point, Science Daily reports.

Quasars are the brightest known objects in the universe. They tend to assemble in large groups, Space.com says, with the previous record measuring 600 million light-years across. This new discovery, however, is on an entirely different scale.

SEE ALSO: The 10 Biggest Space Moments of 2012

The LQG is so large, in fact, that it's challenging the cosmological principle. The principle states that when "viewed on a sufficiently large scale, the properties of the universe are the same for all observers"  basically, the universe looks homogenous if you zoom out far enough. But the size of the newly discovered LQG make it a landmark regardless of where you're viewing it from, the report says.

The researchers from the project will publish the remainder of their findings in the Monthly Notices of the Royal Astronomical Society. In the meantime, watch the video above to learn more.

What was your favorite space discovery of the past year?
--------------------------------------------------------------
Below are the letters sent to President Obama from children asking him to take action on gun violence. Click to enlarge and read the letters.

This article originally published at National Journal here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Streaming live on Mashable, SportsNetworker founder Lewis Howes will answer questions from readers at 3 p.m. EST (12 p.m. PST) Thursday, Jan. 17. As part of the Young Entrepreneur Councils #StartupLab initiative, a virtual mentorship program, Howes will appear live via video chat broadcast on this site.

Lewis Howes, a former two sport All-American and current world record holding athlete, has graced lists such as Details' "5 Internet Gurus Who Can Make You Rich and Incomediary.coms 50 Most Influential People in Blogging. Most recently, Howes was ranked as one of Genjuices top 100 Most Desirable Mentors, along with the likes of Barack Obama, Russell Simmons and the queen of Jordan.

In just three years, Howes went from sleeping on his sisters couch to running a seven-figure business. He began his entrepreneurial career by hosting LinkedIn meetups around the country and co-authoring the successful book LinkedWorking. He has hosted over 400 webinars, spoken to thousands at conferences and events and educated career professionals and business owners around the world on the power of LinkedIn.

With over 100,000 in his weekly email reach, over 99,000 Twitter followers, more than 14,000 Facebook fans, 21,000 LinkedIn connections and over 660,000 views on YouTube, Howes is a familiar face in the social media for business landscape. He has also been featured on some of the top blogs and media outlets in the world, including Mashable, Social Media Examiner, Forbes, The Wall Street Journal, Entrepreneur, Business Week, TIME, CBS Radio, Fast Company, The Washington Post, Sports Illustrated and ESPN.

#StartupLab is a free virtual mentorship program created by The Young Entrepreneur Council (YEC), an invite-only organization comprised of hundreds of Americas most successful young entrepreneurs. #StartupLab takes YEC's mission to help more people start successful businesses to the next level by offering millions of entrepreneurs direct access to YEC members through interactive video chats, email lessons and a library of how-to articles, videos and eBooks. Whether you're just starting up, a current business owner, or you run an organization that supports entrepreneurs, sign up for #StartupLab today for real-world advice from some of the coolest entrepreneurs on the planet.

Check Mashable tomorrow afternoon at 3 p.m. EST (12 p.m. PST), when Lewis will answer questions from the audience live via video chat.

You can also sign up for an email reminder of the chat by visiting this registration page
--------------------------------------------------------------
Two people were killed and 12 more injured after a helicopter struck a construction crane and crashed into a busy street in London Wednesday morning. Almost immediately after the incident, video of the aftermath was posted to YouTube.

The footage here, which Mashable verified by cross-referencing local media reports and Google Street View data, shows flaming wreckage on Wandsworth Road in central London. It was uploaded by YouTube user "niczerogoeshome" and, speaking to the power of citizen journalism, has since been picked up by major media outlets including Reuters. Note: It's not graphic.

The helicopter, according to the BBC, struck a crane atop The Tower, a residential skyscraper currently under construction on the bank of the Thames. It then crashed to the ground, killing the pilot and one bystander while wounding several others and igniting nearby cars and buildings.

Bad weather is possibly among the factors to blame for the deadly crash: London was blanketed in a heavy fog Wednesday morning, prompting the helicopter's pilot to request a diversion to a close-by heliport in order to land safely before the accident occurred.

The scene of the crash can be found on Google Street View:
--------------------------------------------------------------
If you thought John McAfees recent international run from the authorities sounded like something out of the movies, youre not alone.

Warner Brothers has bought the rights to a Wired magazine article documenting the events.

When McAfees neighbor in Belize was killed in November, he went on the run, claiming that authorities in the country were trying to kill him. After a lengthy and unusual series of events, McAfee was eventually found in Guatemala where he faked a heart attack and was later deported to the United States.

McAfee is best known for his computer anti-virus software.

While Warner Brothers has bought the rights to the story, that doesnt necessarily mean that it will make a film. For that, well just have to wait and see.

Would you go see a film documenting McAfees exploits? Let us know your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Mobile commerce, or "mcommerce," has had a transformative (and highly publicized) impact on some businesses, including Amazon, eBay and flash sales sites like Gilt. But for the vast majority of retail companies, mobile represents only a neglible fraction of total sales, and it's likely to stay that way for the next half-decade, according to data from Forrester provided exclusively to Mashable.

Sales of physical retail goods and services made on smartphones were $8 billion in the U.S. last year, accounting for 3% of online sales and less than 1% of total retail sales. (Those numbers have been driven up by some outliers, like the aforementioned Amazon and eBay, which have mobile sales in the billions, per Forrester's estimates.) For most U.S. retailers, mobile represents only 1.5% of online sales. Over the next five years, total mobile sales are expected to grow 33% annually to $31 billion, making up 9% of online sales in 2017.

As someone who makes a purchase via a smartphone at least once per week, I wonder what's holding the rest of smartphone owners back. According to Forrester, of the 132 million Americans with an Internet-connected smartphone, only a quarter made a purchase on their devices last year.

The research outfit blames the low transaction rates on retailers, who have made it difficult for customers to check out and pay on smartphones, or are otherwise investing in apps that consumers aren't aware of. Although Forrester didn't mention it, we wonder if the smartphones themselves aren't partly to blame: Even with image-zooming capabilities, smartphones' screen sizes make it difficult to examine products closely, particularly in the apparel category.

With mobile retail sales still so small, is it worth investing in? Forrester says yes. Ensure that your mobile commerce site has a fast checkout solution, like PayPal Express or Checkout by Amazon. Make sure your mobile websites are responsively design so that it is optimized for the wide variety of device screen sizes on the market. And above all, invest in creating a great tablet experience  Although there are less of them out there, they're generating significant traffic and sales.
--------------------------------------------------------------
From leveraging specific features like GPS all the way down to the mere fact that people are walking around with Internet-connected computers in their pockets, smartphones open a whole new world of opportunities for marketers at businesses from large and small. The following are some key ways businesses are getting an extra boost via mobile apps.

Back in 2010, then-Google CEO Eric Schmidt talked about how the future of mobile would be autonomous and serendipitous. That is, mobile devices would present users with information about the world around them in an automatic way. In Schmidts example, as he walked around a particularly storied neighborhood of San Francisco, an app would passively display information about the history of places he passed. But the technology has become a reality, and a boon to business. Here are some ways businesses could use geo-targeted push notifications.

One of the single biggest opportunities for businesses to leverage mobile apps is that smartphones have opened a whole new world of shopping and engagement opportunities. Interactions between customers and businesses have grown to become geo-agnostic. The morning commute, waiting in line for movie tickets and sitting in a doctor's office are all places people could be using their smartphones to shop your store or engage with your brand.

These pockets of free time that were previously biased toward reading, can now be used by consumers for so much more. A mobile app maximizes opportunities for reaching users in these new pockets of time. A push notification might remind users of a nearly abandoned shopping cart, bringing them back into the shopping experience. A more seamless experience of stored login and billing information means an easier path to transact.

The classic targeted ad story goes something like this: A potential homeowner is stuck in traffic on his daily commute home and looks out his window to read a sign on a new housing development that says, If you lived here, youd be home by now.

Now multiply that times a billion and youve got the power of modern, smartphone-powered targeted advertising. These smart ads can target users by their specific location, displaying ads that are geographic and contextually optimized. Businesses can make on-the-fly tweaks to campaigns based on what works in a particular geographic location. They can also display coupons to potential users nearby or help users find the business by advertising directly on a map.

When you tie in technologies like push notifications and geotargeting, magical things start to happen. Businesses can use data collected through geotracking and ad campaigns to deliver just-in-time offers. Groupon Now is just the tip of the iceberg. The power of mobile apps allows businesses to do all sorts of cool things to boost revenue.

For example, movie theaters and very time-sensitive inventory that goes to waste at a particular time and cant be recovered. The theater could track and send a coupon to users who are nearby and looked up information about showtimes but didnt make a purchase. A bar with a slow night could offer an impromptu extended happy hour to past patrons who are nearby.

Ever walked into a store, shopped around a bit, and then walked out without making a purchase? Thats called a "bounce." Online, users bounce for a variety of reasons and on mobile the reasons are even greater. Users might not have a credit card handy, typing in account information is considered too tedious or they simply get distracted and put their phone back in their pocket.

Fortunately, one way to combat transaction abandonment is through automatic address fill-in. Using a phones GPS, transactional apps can detect a users location and automatically fill in address data. Seamless, the leading online food delivery service, has been aggressively marketing its mobile apps that automatically detects a users location to fill in a delivery address and display restaurants able to deliver there.

One of the really powerful tools available to online businesses is that they can easily track every move customers make from the moment a user lands on the site. What engaged users and what turned them off? Where, exactly, in the online store did a user go and what did they do when they got there? These are really easy questions for webmasters to answer, but good luck figuring that out in brick-and-mortar store. That is, unless youre using the Wi-Fi signals emitted from smartphones in your customers pockets and purses. Tracking signals from mobile devices is opening a whole new world of analytics and data-gathering opportunities for retailers stuck in the physical world.

Many brick-and-mortar retailers complain about showrooming, the practice whereby shoppers visit a physical store to inspect the goods in person all the while intending to ultimately make their purchase online, where prices are usually cheaper. While the traditional retailer might be on the losing end of that transaction, the customer and online retailer are winning. Price comparison tools are helping etailers drive additional traffic and sales. Amazon, for example, even went so far as to offer a $5 discount to shoppers who scanned items using their price comparison tool.

Mobile apps are helping businesses increase revenue largely by increasing efficiency. Instead of advertising to broad spectrum, users can be narrowly targeted. Businesses can lure back customers who havent been in a while but are nearby. Customers can shop during small pockets of time that would have have previously gone to waste. Businesses can precision-discount inventory in the last moments before it would have gone to waste. And all these little efficiencies are resulting in more revenue for businesses while, by and large, enhancing the overall experience for users.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A new deal between NASA and a commercial spaceflight company to add a privately built module to the International Space Station could lead to future uses of the novel space technology beyond low-Earth orbit, space agency and company officials say.

NASA will pay $17.8 million to Bigelow Aerospace of North Las Vegas to build an inflatable module, test it and prep it for flight. The Bigelow Expandable Activity Module (BEAM) is to be launched around the summer of 2015.

The space agency and Bigelow officials provided details of the contract in a Las Vegas briefing today (Jan. 16).

The new inflatable BEAM will be launched to the International Space Station by a Falcon 9 rocket built by another private spaceflight company, California-based SpaceX. The module will be cocooned inside the unpressurized cargo hold of SpaceX's Dragon capsule atop the Falcon 9. NASA has already purchased the launch of the SpaceX Falcon under a separate Commercial Resupply Services contract.

The module will be installed on an open berth of the station's Node 3 connecting module using a robotic arm. Once it is attached, the inflatable room will be activated by station astronauts, adding to the volume of orbiting laboratory.

The module is cylindrical, weighs roughly 3,000 pounds (1,360 kilograms) and is about 13 feet (4 meters) long and 10.5 feet (3.2 m) wide.

Bigelow Aerospace's founder and president is Robert Bigelow, a Las Vegas-based general contractor, real estate tycoon, hotel businessman and developer. Since 1999, his company has been focused on creating affordable inflatable space habitats for national space agencies and corporate clients.

In 2006 and 2007 the firm launched orbiting prototypes of its expandable habitat technology, Genesis 1 and Genesis 2. Work is ongoing within Bigelow Aerospace on BA 330 modules, structures that offer 12,000 cubic feet (330 cubic meters) of internal space.

Michael Gold, director of Washington, D.C., operations and business growth for Bigelow Aerospace LLC, based in Chevy Chase, Md., said: "With Genesis 1 and 2, Bigelow Aerospace showed the world that it can achieve escape velocity from high costs. We're going to do this again with the BEAM, bringing both innovation and a vital demonstration of affordability to the crown jewel of NASA's human spaceflight program, the International Space Station."

At this time, NASA's planned use of the BEAM is for technology demonstration, to validate experimental expandable habitat technology and let the space agency become more familiar with it, Gold told SPACE.com in an exclusive interview.

"I'm told the BEAM will be acoustically the quietest location aboard the station, due to the non-metallic nature of the structure," he said.

NASA's interest in the module for the International Space Station was first reported on SPACE.com by this reporter in January 2011  so why the long glide path, some two years, for the project to become a reality?

In actuality, the program "moved forward with relative alacrity," Gold responded.

"The ISS is the pinnacle of the human spaceflight program. NASA went through a thorough amount of analysis prior to agreeing about BEAM  Analysis and study does take time," Gold said. "It demonstrates the attention and commitment to safety and quality that both NASA and Bigelow Aerospace have."

For Bigelow, there is another bonus from having BEAM attached to the space station: the chance to generate more business.

"Many in the foreign community perceive NASA as the gold star. I can think of no stronger statement relative to NASA's confidence both in Bigelow Aerospace and expandable habitat technology than their desire to place BEAM aboard the ISS," Gold said. "That speaks volumes not just domestically, but possibly more importantly, overseas as well. I think that any sovereign client or potential clientele should be paying attention to this."

Gold said the private entrepreneurial firm is pleased to be working with NASA to further validate the promise and benefits of expandable habitat technology  and not only in low-Earth orbit, but beyond.

Beyond BEAM, Bigelow Aerospace is "moving aggressively" on the larger BA 330 module, "dedicating a great deal of resources" to expeditiously push forward an expandable habitat of that size.

According to the Bigelow Aerospace website, the BA 330 can function as an independent space station, and several BA 330 habitats can be connected together in a modular fashion to create an even larger and more capable orbital space complex.

Robert Bigelow and his team have extensively blueprinted concepts for their expandable habitats to be used at other destinations.

"Expandable habitats are an enabling technology that will make the dream of robust beyond-LEO human space exploration a reality," Gold said. "Regardless of the ultimate destination, be it L2 [Lagrange Point 2], the surface of the moon or even a historic mission to Mars, the large volumes provided by Bigelow Aerospace systems, combined with enhanced protection from radiation and physical debris, make habitats such as the BA 330 an essential part of any realistic beyond-LEO architecture."

Gold said he knows Capitol Hill wants to see a robust beyond-LEO human space exploration strategy, but that new funding will be hard to come by.

"The BA 330 and expandable habitats will not just offer enhanced protection from radiation and micrometeorites, but protect future astronauts from a much more dangerous threat lack of funding," Gold concluded.

This article originally published at Space.com here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Nail art has been around for centuries, but the trend has gained widespread popularity over the past couple years.

However, today's manis are far from the prim and proper French classic. Reddit users of the nail art community RedditLacqueristas, among other web users, have turned stereotypical genres of nerd into elegant works of art. Whether you like video games, computers, robots, pirates or memes, there is a cool and elegant design found on someone's finger tips.

This is Revenge of the Nerds, nail art style.

SEE ALSO: YouTube Beauty: Top 10 Channels to Follow

Most of these manicures are done at home. Do you have what it takes? Share your nerdy nail art in the comments below.

Photo pinned by Grace Cauley, from The Nailasaurus
--------------------------------------------------------------
Have you signed up for the new Myspace? If so, we have some useful tips and tricks that will help you get the most out of the revamped social network.

Whether you want to add music to mixes more easily, understand how connections work or change your location in your posts, our easy guide can assist you.

SEE ALSO: The New Myspace: Here's How to Get Started

Take a look through our handy hints in the image gallery above. Share in the comments below any new Myspace tips and tricks you've found useful.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A touching story that captivated the sports world last fall was an elaborate social media-fueled hoax involving the fictitious illness and death of a beautiful young woman, who was allegedly the girlfriend of one of college football's biggest stars.

The only remaining question: Was Notre Dame Heisman Trophy candidate Manti Te'o the victim or the perpetrator of the deeply sophisticated case of stolen identify and fake death?

A Facebook post by the Notre Dame football program and statement released by Te'o both say he was unaware of the scam until late December.

The lies were exposed on Wednesday by the sports blog Deadspin, which reported the girlfriend never existed. She never died and she never lived. The photos associated with her social media activity were reportedly, in fact, stolen from an account of a 22-year-old California woman who was oblivious to the whole thing.

Here's the backstory: Te'o said he began dating a young woman named Lennay Kekua in early 2012. in September, he learned of her death following a car accident and subsequent leukemia diagnosis, nearly at the same time he was told his grandmother had died as well.

Burdened by grief, Te'o still played spectacularly this season and led Notre Dame back to glory and a spot in this year's BCS national title game. Along the way, fans were touched by many tweets he sent to the supposedly deceased Kekua's Twitter account:

Tales of Te'o's heroism in the face of tragedy were published by multiple national news outlets including Sports Illustrated, ESPN and CBS.

Deadspin's long report hit the sports web like a bombshell on Wednesday, immediately sparking multiple worldwide Twitter trends as stunned fans reacted to the news.

Dennis Brown, Notre Dame's assistant vice president, soon posted a message to the Notre Dame Football Facebook Page  which has more than 350,000 online fans  saying that Te'o had not perpetrated any hoax. He was, in fact, the victim of an evil and cold-hearted deception by other people, Brown wrote:

On Dec. 26, Notre Dame coaches were informed by Manti Teo and his parents that Manti had been the victim of what appears to be a hoax in which someone using the fictitious name Lennay Kekua apparently ingratiated herself with Manti and then conspired with others to lead him to believe she had tragically died of leukemia. The University immediately initiated an investigation to assist Manti and his family in discovering the motive for and nature of this hoax. While the proper authorities will continue to investigate this troubling matter, this appears to be, at a minimum, a sad and very cruel deception to entertain its perpetrators.



That post quest was shared more than 850 times in just over half an hour, with many commenters expressing skepticism about its veracity and calling it little more than cynical spin. Te'o soon released a statement of his own, professing his innocence and calling the entire episode "painful and humiliating."

At a minimum, the twisted and bizarre tale raises a bevy of followup questions: Was Te'o in on the scam? Why? How did he think it was possible to not get discovered? If he was in fact the victim here, how did the people targeting him not expect to eventually get caught? And how could someone who never existed fool a real-live person when the two had supposedly met in person?

Give us your take in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
After an initial period of reticence following the Newtown shootings, the National Rifle Association has come out with an acerbic web-only ad calling President Obama an "elitist hypocrite" because his kids attend a school with armed guards.

"Are the President's kids more important than yours?" the ad asks. "Then why is he skeptical about putting armed security in our schools when his kids are protected by armed guards at their schools?"

The NRA posited the idea of armed guards in schools on Dec. 21, a week after the tragic Newtown massacre. The ad comes as Obama plans to unveil a "package of concrete proposals" relating to gun violence on Wednesday.

What do you think? Is this an effective argument? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Parallel parking is no easy feat, let alone doing it in New York City. Anyone who's tried to park in Manhattan can attest to the impossibly narrow lanes and no-nonsense pedestrians.

Design firm Pentagram is trying to make the ordeal a little less stressful by creating clearer parking signs. Taking a cue from Twitter, the 6,300 new signs give drivers information in no more than 140 characters.

Since every second counts in a New York minute, the makeover is intended to clarify on-street parking regulations by making signs easier to understand. The change reduces information on the signs by nearly 50% with messages no longer than a tweet.

SEE ALSO: Listen to Coldplay if You Want to Stay Safe on the Road, Study Says

"You shouldn't need a Ph.D. in parking signage to understand where you are allowed to leave your car in New York," said Council Member Garodnick in a statement from the citys Department of Transportation.

What are your thoughts on the redesign? Do you think Twitter-sized parking signs can change driving habits? Let us know your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
President Barack Obama and Vice President Joseph Biden are set to unveil their proposals to reform gun control laws at the White House on Wednesday at 11:55 a.m. ET. You can watch live here.

The proposals are expected to include universal background checks, a renewed assault weapons ban and a prohibition on high-capacity magazines, according to CNN and others.

Obama put Biden in charge of a task force on gun control following last month's shooting at Sandy Hook Elementary School in Newtown, Conn. Over the past several weeks, Biden has met with several key stakeholders including victims' groups, pro-gun groups such as the National Rifle Association, the entertainment and video games industries, and law enforcement officials.

New York this week became the first state to pass stricter gun control laws in the aftermath of Sandy Hook, strengthening the state's assault weapons ban, reducing the number of bullets allowed in a single magazine and requiring mental health professionals to report persons they believe are a danger to themselves or others.

The laws fortify New York's existing assault weapons ban, limit the number of bullets allowed in magazines and strengthen rules that govern the mentally ill, which includes a requirement to report potentially harmful behavior. New York also authorized the creation of a statewide firearms database.
--------------------------------------------------------------
President Barack Obama suggested more research needed to be done on the affect of video games and other "violent media" on children during his Wednesday morning address detailing his plan for lowering gun violence in the United States.

"Congress will fund research into the effects that violent video games have on young minds," he said. "We dont benefit from ignorance. We dont benefit from not knowing the science of this epidemic of violence."

Obama's 23-part plan gave more details on how this research might be conducted: The Centers of Disease Control and other scientific organizations would receive funding to conduct investigations into "the causes of gun violence." Funding for these programs need to be approved by Congress, and Obama is asking for at least $10 million for that cause.

The CDC has conducted research on gun ownership and gun violence in the past, but according to NBC News, a 1996 appropriations bill cut the organization's funding and prevented it from conducting any research that would "advocate or promote" gun control.

The Entertainment Software Association, which represents America's video game makers, released a statement supporting further research. The ESA, along with several large game publishers, participated in a meeting last Friday with Vice President Joe Biden on the topic of violence in video games.

"We concur with President Obamas call today for all Americans to do their part, and agree with the report's conclusion that the entertainment and video game industries have a responsibility to give parents tools and choices about the movies and programs their children watch and the games their children play," the statement said. "The same entertainment is enjoyed across all cultures and nations, but tragic levels of gun violence remain unique to our country. Scientific research and international and domestic crime data all point toward the same conclusion: entertainment does not cause violent behavior in the real world.

We will embrace a constructive role in the important national dialogue around gun violence in the United States, and continue to collaborate with the Administration and Congress as they examine the facts that inform meaningful solutions," the statement continued.

The International Game Developer Association also weighed in with comments that echoed the open letter they had sent to Vice President Joe Biden last week. The organization's executive director Kate Edwards said she hopes the CDC confirms there is not a connection between games and violent actions:

"In response to the President's executive order, the IGDA welcomes more evidence-based research into the effects of our work to add to the large body of existing scientific literature that clearly shows no causal link between video game violence and real violence. We support the President's call for new government research, with an emphasis on examining the totality of imaginary violence and not focused only on video games. We especially encourage the new research to explore all aspects of violence in media, including their potential benefits. For example, recent research shows a steam valve effect in which violent video gameplay helps release stress and aggression before it can lead to violence. Others studies have indicated that recent declines in real world violence can be attributed in part to potentially violent people spending more time looking for thrills in video games instead of on the streets."

Consumer advocacy group Common Sense Media, which helps parents become more savvy consumers of media for their children, supported the president's plan for action.

"Parents across this country have expressed their strong concern about the possible influence of media violence on their children, and about how hard it is to shield their kids from such gratuitous violence that is marketed to them from a very young age," said CSM CEO James Steyer. "By calling on Congress to direct $10 million to the Center for Disease Control for research on the possible linkage between violent video games and other media images and acts of violence, our country is taking an important first step towards protecting the most vulnerable among us."

Do you support Obama's call for more research into video games' affect on children? Let us know your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Here at Mashable we love a good prank. If your office could stand to liven up a bit, why not try one of our fun tricks on your co-workers?

We've gone old school with a selection of absolutely classic workplace pranks that never go out of fashion.

SEE ALSO: 8 Easy PC Pranks to Trick Your Friends

Take a look through our list of ideas for some devious inspiration. Share in the comments below any dastardly tricks you've successfully played on your colleagues.

Find the number for your nearest zoo. Give your colleague a message to call and ask to speak with Mrs. C Lyon.

Change a colleague's email signature to read "Lots of love and hugs, [Their Name]."

Hide a wireless doorbell in your colleague's office/cubicle/desk. Keep ringing it.

Make your colleague a new folder on his or her desktop. Label it for maximum embarrassment. "My Nudey Pics" works well.

Stick a coin to the floor in a busy area of your workplace. See how many people bend down to pick it up.

Get a wireless mouse with a tiny USB receiver and plug it into your colleague's computer. Give the mouse a wiggle every now and then.

Find some double-sided sticky tape. Tape your colleague's phone handset down to the base. Dial his number and watch as the entire phone lifts up when he answers.

Collaborate with colleagues to phone your victim repeatedly asking for "Bill." At the end of the day, get someone to call pretending to be Bill asking if there are any messages for him.

Super glue your colleague's pens to her desk. It's simple, but very effective.

Finally, why not "decorate" a colleague's office/cubicle/desk with images of The Bieb? They'll secretly love it.
--------------------------------------------------------------
No one ever recalls their online education experience with as much fondness as those remembering their college dorm years.

San Jose State University in San Jose, Calif., is piloting a new program to offer remedial classes online. The university is partnering with Silicon Valley start-up Udacity, an online education platform. At first, the program will let in around 300 students and offer only three courses, but there's a possibility this online education for first-year classes could expand to all California state schools if it's a success. The California State University system is the largest university system in the U.S., so the college experience for future students could potentially be drastically different.

As the New York Times noted, California Governor Jerry Brown has been pushing schools to adopt online classes as a way to make education more affordable for students.

CSU Chancellor Timothy White tells the Sacramento Bee that these online courses can expand access to popular "bottleneck" courses, entry-level courses that are required for students to move on to classes for majors.

Dr. Katherine Cohen, CEO and founder of IvyWise, a company that offers education counseling and tutoring for students, tells Mashable this may be the California State University school system's first major foray into online education, but other universities and organizations instituted online courses some time ago.

"Distance learning has been taken to a whole new level in recent years with the introduction of MOOCs (massive open online courses) taught by well-respected professors from revered universities, including Stanford University, Massachusetts Institute of Technology and Harvard University, aimed at large-scale participation and open access via the web," she says.

These online education companies give people unprecedented access to higher learning, she continues. Students from anywhere in the world can get access to classes at Ivy League universities at a much more affordable rate.

But what's missing is the typical college experience, in which students, now legal adults, get to have more independence outside their parents' homes and move into dorms or campus housing. With online classes, students could continue to live at home with their parents in order to save money on living expenses.

"Now, there's certainly something to be said for the college experience," Cohen said. "College is where students build their social and professional networks, ones they will rely upon throughout the rest of their lives. Students living on campus also tend to mature much more quickly, as they take on new responsibilities and maintain a new level of independence. These are aspects of the college experience that can get lost in a large, virtual college classroom."

TechCrunch predicts that, if successful, this pilot program will spell an end for community colleges, part-time teaching faculty and, eventually, graduate programs, since teaching jobs could dry up. It ends with a small number of students actually receiving face-time with professors.

As more universities add online courses, do you think the typical college experience will change for the better or worse? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
If you're not a n00b, then you read Penny Arcade, the long-running video game-themed webcomic by Jerry Holkins and Mike Krahulik.

In the 15 years since its debut, Penny Arcade has grown far beyond the confines of its panels. Holkins and Krahulik (a.k.a. Tycho and Gabe in the comic) host Penny Arcade Expo (PAX), a series of hugely popular annual gaming festivals. They also star as themselves on their web show, Penny Arcade: The Series. Only this season, they're switching up the programming a bit.

After a successful 2012 crowdfunding drive, a surplus of funds allowed the guys to revisit an idea from the past: a competitive reality show about webcomics. Why couldn't this dream of yesteryear take the place of their web show's third season?

Strip Search, coming soon to the PATV video channel, is that dream. The show pits 12 webcomic creators (six guys and six gals) against each other for a $15,000 cash prize and the opportunity to work out of the Penny Arcade offices for a whole year.

We talked with Holkins, Krahulik and Robert Khoo, Penny Arcade's head of business operations, about the experience of making Strip Search, drama on the set and their own favorite reality shows.

How did the concept for a webcomic reality show originate, and what made it possible?

Mike: I think the original idea for Strip Search popped up on a very old podcast ... at least five years ago. We came up with the idea for a reality show for webcomics and it just sort of went by the wayside. It wasn't until recently that Robert came back to us and said, "Hey, were you serious about that? Because we can try it now."

Robert: We were in the middle of planning our Kickstarter campaign from 2012, in which we were looking to remove ads off of Penny Arcade, and then we thought a cool "stretch goal" would be actually to do this idea of a reality show based around a webcomic. That, plus us wanting to switch up the format of our own normal reality show.

Were you guys fans of reality TV beforehand? What are your favorite shows?

Jerry: I think all people are fans of reality shows. There is a reality show that every person enjoys. You can't really get away from it. This is the kind of television that's being made now.

Mike: I am a huge fan of Kitchen Nightmares. I also enjoy Inkmaster, and I really like Hotel Hell. Really anything with Chef Ramsay I would rate up towards the top.

Jerry: I like Master Chef a lot; I like Project Runway, I think that's really great. And have you ever watched RuPaul's Drag Race? It's fucking fascinating!

Robert: My favorite is, without a doubt, Amazing Race. It's interesting, because Amazing Race is what I look for when I'm planning out the Omegathon at PAX ... We've done 12 or 13 of them.

What is the format of Strip Search?

Robert: It is very traditional in the sense of reality shows. You have 12 artists, the contestants, living in a giant house, and they are, through a structured process, eliminated one by one. That's all we can say.

Jerry: It's like Agatha Christie, except everyone is still alive at the end. But there are parallels.

It's not anything that you don't expect as an enthusiast of the genre, I would say. What makes it different is the exact nature of the competition and the fact that we had a real crop of really, really interesting people and we hope to give them plenty of time.

How did you choose contestants?

Mike: We did open call on the website. I think we got something like a thousand entries and just whittled down from there until we were left with 12 super talented artists that we were excited to see compete against each other.

Robert: Our hiring process is pretty unique and it's pretty rigorous as far as what we make people go through to work at Penny Arcade. Since one of the prizes for Strip Search was, in fact, to be integrated into the Penny Arcade machine for a full year, all of the contestants essentially went through that same due diligence process that a normal employee would.

Robert: We had nearly a thousand applicants. We whittled that down round after round, down to like 500, down to 200, down to 50, down to 20, down to 12. Eventually we came up with a group of incredibly talented and, quite frankly, very charismatic people.

Charisma is important if you want them to get along on camera, right?

Mike: Well, we didn't necessarily want them to get along in the house. They did. But that was not our intention.

Did you want drama on the show?

Mike: It would be fun, yeah. I mean, I wouldn't have minded if somebody had gotten into a fistfight or there had been some sort of rumble in a hot tub. I don't know. None of that actually happened, but it wasn't for lack of trying.

Were you surprised that 12 artists could get along in one house?

Mike: I was, absolutely. I mean, being an artist myself, I assumed that if you put 12 artists together in a closed space like that, you were sure to get some arguments and some fighting. I certainly would have fought with them. But they all got along really well. And they were friends, which, you know, that was a little disappointing.

Robert: To be fair, that's not really true. There is conflict. Don't forget, we have all the interviews, all the one-on-one interviews with everyone, where they actually say their real feelings. It's not all roses. There's definitely conflict.

Mike: We never had to call an ambulance to the house. And to me, that's something we need to work on for season two.

Jerry: One of the strange things about the process and the house, and the process of making cartoons, or making anything, is that generally speaking, a creative endeavor is very solitary. And other people really don't understand what that's like. Unless you have done it yourself, unless you have committed to turning a blank sheet of paper into something more interesting, there are things about that that you don't understand. And I think that they were all really excited to be in a place where this is actually something that they all understood very well. You're not given many opportunities outside of, you know, Twitter or something like that, but to actually be in a house with other people who understand such a specific personal problem was actually really great, I think, for most of them.

What was your interaction with the housemates like?

Mike: Well, Jerry and I had different interaction than Robert did, so I can only say what our part was. We only saw the contestants when it was time to eliminate someone. So after the contest and everything, after all the day's activities were done, they would show up in front of us and we would decide who would go home.

Robert: But you would be getting clips and notes throughout the day.

Mike: Oh yeah, we had spies everywhere, much like Sauron. We were well-informed of the day's activities.

Robert: My interaction with the house was, essentially I was one of the on-site producers. But my actual interaction was to have no interaction with them. Like, I did not speak to them throughout the entire day unless it was especially appropriate for the show, so I was very much part of the crew.

Was it tough not to interact with them?

Robert: Yes. I would say that both parties actually really want to interact with one another. Like, I really want to talk to them, because keep in mind: As far as the selection process, 95% of that was me, and so I knew everything about everyone. I knew all their personalities, I knew their Internet history, I knew all the work that they had done and I really wanted to get to know these people, but I could not. And I know that a lot of them wanted to talk to me about Penny Arcade, or about the business side of things, but they could not. So that was challenging, for sure.

Mike and Jerry, what was challenging about judging the contestants?

Jerry: I think that judging people is harder than it seems. At least, to their face. It's very easy to watch American Idol or any of these other reality shows and be on your couch judging ... But when the people are in front of you and you can see their lips quivering and their eyes moistening with the prospect of leaving, it makes it tougher. But also sort of more delicious. More savory.

Mike: We only got to interact with these people during the most dramatic part of their lives. You had to fuck up in order to get in front of us. They were essentially on our altar, and we had to choose which one to skewer. That was our real job. And that was our only job, every day.

Jerry: I learned that I have a taste for blood. But I had to develop it. And it turns out that dashing people's hopes is actually a very tough business if you are the sort of person that has hopes yourself. Like, I know exactly how they feel and what they're up against, trying to lead a creative life. In one hand, I have the life that they want. In the other hand, I have a black sword. And it's hard to have those two things.

Also, right above the space that we did the eliminations was a medical marijuana collective and I don't have a card, so I can't go up there and get any, but a lot of times when we were waiting for the contestants to come, we would have to sit outside in a car for an hour or two, and just seeing people coming in an out of there, with an ounce, two ounces at a time, was hard. That was hard.

So would you want to do another season of Strip Search?

Robert: Our experience was very positive, but what it comes down to is whether or not people want to watch it. I don't want to sound over-dramatic, but I think it was life-changing for everyone involved.

Jerry: Yeah, in front of and behind the camera. You know, the reality is  and in this case I'm referring to reality television  the truth of it is that everyone knows about these types of shows. Everyone has seen this type of television program. So everyone understands the sort of tropes that are going on in that kind of entertainment. What was weird was, when you're actually here, being a part of it, you actually can't escape it. It turns out that those tropes have a weird sort of gravity. And things just are occurring to create the maximum drama, without you having to do anything.

That was the weirdest part of the experience for us: actually watching human drama unfold in front of you. We're so geared to look for it by the genre, and we actually had a chance to see it in front of us. It was almost spooky.
--------------------------------------------------------------
For most of us, public speaking can be incredibly nerve-wracking. What if you mess up? What if no one claps? What if someone asks you a question to which you dont know the answer? What if you throw up on stage? (Seriously, you should at least stop worrying about that one.)

But with the right preparation, public speaking doesnt have to be such a daunting, fretful experience. The chance to strut your stuff and raise awareness for your brand is actually really exciting, especially if youre a young company looking to introduce your expertiseand offeringto the world.

Here are five steps to take before you get up on that stage to make sure you most genuinely connect with your audience, get your point across in the time allotted, and (most importantly) dont pass out.

The benefits of this old adage are twofold. First, becoming comfortable with the material youll be delivering will ease your nervesafter reading your speech to your mom, grandma and six closest friends, the experience will feel much less intimidating.

Second, youll significantly improve your delivery. Audiences want to connect with the people theyre watching speak or present, and if youre reading from a piece of paper for 20 minutes, theyre not going to have the opportunity to do so. The more you know your stuff, the more youll be able to make eye contact, throw in a joke and ensure you pack in all of your crucial points before the buzzer.

If you have the opportunity to do solike at a conference or cocktail partycheck out where youre going to be speaking. Are you using a microphone? Do you have any AV requirements? The better you understand your surroundings, the more you can concentrate on the public speaking itself. And if youre incorporating AV aspects into your presentation, back to #1 you go.

It's important to know your audience across all of the various ways you communicate. But this sentiment is arguably most important when it comes to communicating in person. Your No. 1 goal for any public speaking opportunity is to really connect with your audience. Regardless of how well you address the topic at hand, if people dont get it, it wont resonate. And if youre not getting your message across, whats the point?

Research the event and check in with the coordinators beforehand so you know who to expect, and then tailor your comments accordingly. For example, think about explaining the current social media landscape to a room full of senior citizens versus a room full college students. Different speech, right? (Answer: Yes.)

Another aspect to consider, thanks to our ever-evolving digital world, is any virtual audience that might be participating in the event. Is your presentation being live streamed? Live tweeted? Its just as important to understand this community. Ask what platforms will be pushing out the contentlike the events Facebook pageso you can further amend your speech to address this audience. And, as the technology behind this can get complicated (especially if youre planning to engage with your digital audience in real-time!), apply the first two tips solely to this aspect prior to getting on that stage.

If youve founded a content production business, and youre speaking at a Content Production 101 workshop, it makes a lot of sense for you to talk about your company and your experience in the industry. But many times, the connection between what you do and what youre speaking about isnt so straightforward. And in these cases, remember that while you want to use the speaking opportunity to draw attention to your business. You also dont want to come across as too salesy.

So how do you find the balance? Remember that you represent your brand, so if you give a kick-ass speech, people are going to want to know more about you. As long as theres an easy place for them to find you and to learn about what you do (a.k.a., make sure your companys name, website and Twitter handle is in your slides or the events program), the connection will be made naturallyno awkward, forced interjections of your brand into your speech required.

That said, its also OK to find one or two places to seamlessly (and genuinely) tie together what you do and the topic youre discussing as youre crafting your remarks.

Finally, make sure to network at the event. One of the biggest benefits of public speaking is the opportunity to position yourself as an expert, so make yourself available for questions and meet-and-greets both before and after your speech so you can strut your stuff.

Really, dont forget to breathe. Youll be great!

This article originally published at The Muse here
--------------------------------------------------------------
A thread in r/AskReddit on Monday posed the question, "What is the most beautiful song you've ever heard?"

Think to yourself, what is the most beautiful song you have ever heard, im not talking about your favourite song, or the most technical, or something that made you cry, I just want to know the song that made you say "holy shit... I could die to this"

After 9,634 comments, a strong list was assembled. Subsequently, Redditor Dansecaribe collected the 100 most upvoted songs into a public Spotify playlist.

It's embedded below for your listening pleasure.

Selections range from Debussy to Chopin to Radiohead to The Beach Boys to Sigur Ros. As of this writing, the playlist has more than 25,000 subscribers.

Which of these works gets you in the feels? Share your faves in the comments.

BONUS: Pin this image to easily share on Pinterest.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Apple has been slammed with another suit, this time by Russian Railways, which claims the hardware giant has infringed on its trademark.

The Russian company is seeking $65,000 compensation for use of its logo in a third party app, "Railway Tariff," sold in the App Store, RT reports. Railway Tariff lets users track cargo-delivery costs and times across the country.

A release from Russian Railways, translated by Google from Russian, states:

Clarification of the lawsuit JSC "Russian Railways" company to Apple Inc.

JSC "Russian Railways" to the Arbitration Court of Moscow with a claim concerning infringement of the exclusive right to the trademark under the certificate No. 341333 by Apple Inc. We are talking about the use of the trademark of "Russian Railways" in the online store Apple Store by posting pictures.

The Company intends to continue to protect its intellectual property, especially as the decision of the Federal Service for Intellectual Property of the trademark [is] recognized as well known in the Russian Federation.

The Russian Railways' suit follows another European rail company's case against Apple last year. In September, Swiss Federal Railways sued Apple for stealing its clock design. The Swiss company was awarded $21 million in November 2011.

Do you think Russian Railways will have the same luck as the Swiss, or does its case seem weaker? Let us know in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Chromebox, Samsung's Chrome OS-based mini PC, has been criticized for not packing enough power for its price. Now, it looks like Samsung is responding with a new version of Chromebox that has a much faster processor.

Instead of the lowly Celeron processor, the new Chromebox has a 2.5GHz dual-core Intel i5 processor. Its other specifications are identical to the old model: 4GB of memory and a 16GB SSD. The device, named XE300M22-A01US, is available through multiple retailers.

Price-wise, the Chromebox has gone up a little. The latest version costs upwards of $405, depending on the retailer, whereas its predecessor retails for $329.

While we welcome this increase in processing power, the fact that it comes with a significantly higher price tag makes us wonder whether the new Chromebox is worth purchasing.

Would you buy it? Share your thoughts in the comments, below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Ever wonder what it would be like to be broken up with by Samuel L. Jackson?

It would hurt, but it would sound great, as witnessed by Jackson's on-air cover of Taylor Swift's "We Are Never Ever Getting Back Together."

Jackson has more edge than Swift (who doesn't?), but his voice is just so damn intoxicating  It's like hot fudge telling you to get lost.

SEE ALSO: Samuel L. Jackson Might Have Dropped the F-Bomb on SNL

And Sammy's not afraid to cuss you out either. He really wants you to leave him alone.

T-Swift, might we recommend a collaboration for your next single? Or maybe just date Jackson; We'd love to hear that break-up song.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Spurred on by a skeptical father, a pair of sisters posted the image, above, to Facebook on Tuesday. They asked other users to like the photo, and make their dad follow through on his promise of a new puppy if the shot received a million digital thumbs-up.

Less than seven hours later, the girls had their wish.

"Hi World," reads the message written in marker on a piece of butcher paper. "We want a puppy! Our dad said we could get one if we get 1 million likes! He doesn't think we can do it! So 'LIKE' this!"

On the Facebook page, entitled Twogirlsandapuppy, the girls write that their previous dog died of cancer last year. Inspired by another pair of siblings who had tried a similar stunt, they asked their dad to agree to a bet of sorts.

Posts by different family members over the course of the day tell the story of a simple bet gone viral. In one, a family member says "the girls were giddy" as they watched the likes pile up, but didn't hint that the goal was within immediate reach. In another, the father promises that he'll be true to his word should the photo indeed reach 1 million likes.

Finally, the milestone was achieved in a post about six hours after the page was first set up:

Everyone pointing out that the profile pic has 700,000+ likes and that that other pic has 300,000+, we've just realized that. So wowthey will wake up to find they've already reached their goal! Amazing. Dad has a long day of work tomorrow but it seems we'll be looking before the week's out. We will post a picture here in thanks!

An hour later, the profile picture had 1.2 million likes, so it's likely that the family will soon be visiting shelters to look for a new addition. The sisters will gain a puppy, and parents everywhere will learn an important lesson: Never doubt the power of social media, a couple of adorable sisters and, of course, puppies.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It was an unforgettable evening of celebration, networking and digital inspiration at Mashable's SmartBash at CES in Las Vegas. Presented by LG, the SmartBash brought partying to a new level with the company's latest cutting edge products and, of course, specialty cocktails like the Smartini.

Mashable's community came together to network and talk about the innovations at CES. 

Attendees spent time looking at the new LG 3D smart TVs and the Super-Capacity Smart French Door Refrigerator, which features smart functions like food management and a Google calendar.

The night was a blast and, as always, Mashable loved spending time with our community in Las Vegas.

To see photos from SmartBash, check out the gallery below. You can also follow Mashable's full CES 2013 coverage here.
--------------------------------------------------------------
For the first time, smartphones trump tablets when it comes to data consumption, a new study reveals.

Conducted by mobile analytics firm Arieso, the report suggests that smartphone users now "consistently consume" more mobile data than tablet users despite the latter's market expansion.

At the top of the list are iPhone 5 owners  the "hungriest" data consumers  who demand 50% more than iPhone 4S users and four times as much as iPhone 3G users.

Overall, mobile data consumption is skyrocketing, pushed by "new devices and richer content," according to a release.

"Extreme users are beginning to move to new LTE networks, but there is not let up on existing networks."

Do you use up more data on your smartphone or tablet? Tell us in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Mashable Deputy Editor Chris Taylor is about to use his considerable writing talents  and maybe a wee bit of The Force  to write the book the Star Wars oeuvre has been missing: How Star Wars Conquered the Universe.

A look at the business and culture of this iconic film series, the book will boldly go where no Star Wars tome has gone before (oops, wrong sci-fi reference). Chris book (his first) will offer a fresh perspective on how Star Wars became one of the most talked about franchises and brands in history.

Chris has already written extensively about Star Wars on Mashable, most recently covering the Obama Administration's response to a petition requesting the U.S. Government build a real Death Star.

Heres how Chris describes his new project:

I'm thrilled to be writing How Star Wars Conquered the Universe, the first book to examine the entire Star Wars brand from a business/culture perspective. As Disney takes control of the franchise and prepares to release Episode VII in 2015, there's never been a more important time to consider exactly what made this epic great in the first place. Its past offers a lot of clues to why it has a robust future in the post-Lucas era, given how much of it was a team effort from the very beginning. I want to give proper credit to all the other talented writers, technicians, artists and game-makers who built the Expanded Universe and helped it thrive. It's a daunting prospect, trying to do justice to a modern legend that has mesmerized every generation since 1977, but I can't imagine a more engrossing research project. This book will be more fun than a barrel full of Banthas.

Keep watching Mashable for book updates, exclusive excerpts and more as Chris races to finish the Kessel Run in less than twelve parsecs.

How Star Wars Conquered the Universe will be released by Basic Books in early 2014.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A full sequel to the mobile smash hit Temple Run was spotted in the New Zealand version of the App Store Wednesday night.

Imangi Studios had been completely silent on Temple Run 2, but Touch Arcade downloaded a copy as soon as it went live there. According to game screenshots, the endless runner builds on the same formula that brought success to Temple Run, setting players to flee from a giant monkey in an ancient temple.

Temple Run was released in 2011 first for iOS, then ported to Google Play and Amazon's App Store in 2012. It has been downloaded more than 170 million times by players around the world. In summer of 2012, Imangi Studios partnered with Disney to release Temple Run: Brave as a tie-in for the Disney-Pixar release.

Temple Run will be available in the U.S. App Store at midnight on Thursday. There's no word on a version for Android.

Come back tomorrow to read an interview with Temple Run developer Keith Shepherd of Imangi Studios, as well as additional information about the game.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Having refused to build a moon-sized battle station in space  and worse, invoking the power of the Force without so much as a nod to the Dark Side  the Obama administration should have expected some mockery at the hands of the Galactic Empire.

It got that Tuesday, in the form of an unusual press release on the official Star Wars website. Datelined "Imperial City, Couruscant," the post crows about the "overwhelming superiority" of Imperial forces over the United States.

The post quotes one Governor Wilhuff Tarkin (not yet promoted to Grand Moff): "Such destructive power can only be wielded to protect and defend by so enlightened a leader as Emperor Palpatine.

Tarkin wouldn't confirm rumors that the Imperials themselves are constructing a Death Star of their own, though Admiral Conan Motti (not yet the guy who was force-choked by Darth Vader) warned the Senate not to believe the petition response's "exaggerated claims" of a weakness in the Death Star design, "should one ever be built."

Motti also took issue with a claim in the White House petition, based on calculations by economics students at LeHigh University, that the Death Star would cost $852 quadrillion (or 13,000 times global GDP). The estimate was based on the market price of steel.

The costs of construction they cited were ridiculously overestimated, though I suppose we must keep in mind that this miniscule planet does not have our massive means of production," wrote Motti.

The White House could not be reached for comment. But there were one or two fans in the comments section of the blog eager to point out that since the movie took place "a long time ago in a galaxy far, far away," Tarkin and Obama are not actually contemporaries. Thanks for the fact check, guys.
--------------------------------------------------------------
If your Facebook profile could look like an object, what would it be? The Creators Project is launching a series of three new apps that transform your Facebook persona into 3D printable art.

By looking at your Facebook interests, Likes, relationships and status updates, the apps  called Monster Me, Crystallized and Astroverb  create an abstract sculpture that embodies your online presence. The project, which is done in collaboration with VICE and Intel, features an app which takes your profile page and morphs it into a real-life mini monster, while another crystalizes your friends network and the other cranks out a personalized zodiac sign based on your online personality.

Although the apps are free, the cost of printing a figurine is about $15.

"We wanted to play with the idea of taking your virtual self and bringing it back into the physical," Julia Kaganskiy of The Creators Project told Mashable. "We wanted it to be playful, fun and creative and brought on a varied group of our creators to develop unique artistic experiences using the data Facebook makes available."

Each app creates a 3D sculpture, which is printed by Shapeways, through layers of materials such as sandstone and stainless steel. It takes about five minutes to go through the creation and profile analysis process via the apps.

SEE ALSO: 5 Sites to Score 3D-Printed Gifts

The Monster Me app by design studio Sticky Monster Lab uses your birthday to determine the monster's shape, geographic location to determine the environment and the number of friends in your network to decide how many mini friends your monster has within the app. It also looks at interests and Likes to determine the buildings in your personal "cityscape."

Meanwhile, the Crystallized app  developed by SOFTlab  visualizes social relationships and designs a crystal 3D structure to reflect that network. Each point on the geode represents a friend and its distance from the center is determined by the strength of your relationship, ranging from mutual friends to interactions on Facebook. "The interior represents your friend's interests and Likes as crystal clusters," the company said.

In addition, the Astroverb app by Sosolimited looks at status updates and searches for keywords that fall into one of its six "personality dimensions." It ranks your profile based on how you score for each dimension and uses that information to construct a personalized horoscope and zodiac symbol.

"We're really excited about 3D printing right now and wanted to create a really easy way for people to try it for themselves," Kaganskiy said. "Shapeways was a great partner for that because they make the process painless and easy."

Update: Click here to create your own 3D-printed figurine.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Want to get your kids to fall asleep faster at bedtime? Turn off the TV. For that matter, turn off the tablet and the laptop too.

Researchers in New Zealand found kids who had difficulty falling asleep at night were exposed to more screen time within 90 minutes of bed than those with earlier sleep onset.

The study, published in the Journal Pediatrics, called "Presleep Activities and Time of Sleep Onset in Children" looked at the behavior of over 2,000 children. It examined the association between how much TV the kids watched and how long it took them to fall asleep.

Researchers concluded those "participants with a later sleep onset had significantly greater engagement in screen time than those with an earlier sleep onset."

This isn't the first time we've heard how screen time can keep you awake at night. A few months ago we reported on a study out of the Lighting Research Center at Rensselaer Polytechnic Institute which found two or more hours of exposure to backlit devices suppresses melatonin by as much as 22%. That suppression, especially in teenagers, can lead to problems getting to sleep at night.

While the New Zealand study looked at younger children and adolescents, you can see the pattern here. Screen time of any kind, whether TV, smartphone or tablet can disrupt your ability to sleep, no matter your age.

So what can you do to settle your kids before bed? Try a warm bath and reading a good book.

Do you let your kids watch TV before bed or do you have other bedtime rituals? Tell us about them in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Brazil is social media-obsessed: It's home to more than 65 million Facebook users, more than 40 million Twitter users and 29 million users on Orkut, a Google-owned service that predates Google Plus.

Facebook and Google have already planted their flag by setting up offices in the country  and now Twitter is joining the fray by opening an office in Sao Paulo, the country's largest city, according to Reuters.

"We believe our new office in Brazil will allow us to get closer to the users and show the value of our platform," Twitter's country manager for Brazil, Guilherme Ribenboim, told Reuters. "Brazil has rather mature Internet and advertisement markets. Our audience is very big and active. We are going to try to monetize it."

The move is highly tactical: many Brazilians have been switching from Orkut, which was hugely popular, to more modern social networks popular elsewhere in the world. However, Facebook has been taking a larger slice of the social pie than competitor Twitter. By putting an office in the heart of Brazil, Twitter is likely hoping to convince those abandoning Orkut to focus their social energy on Twitter over Facebook.

SEE ALSO: Facebook Finally Beats Google's Orkut ... in Brazil

Twitter is also aiming to bolster the network's popularity before two major events sure to be watched and tweeted about by millions the world over: the 2014 FIFA World Cup and the 2016 Olympic Games. Last year's Olympic Games in London generated 150 million tweets.

"The World Cup and the Olympic Games offer huge opportunities to leverage and show the potential of Twitter," Ribenboim told Reuters.

89 million  slightly less than half  of Brazilians are online, giving the country a ranking of fifth overall in terms of web access. What can Twitter do to entice more Brazilians to start tweeting? Share your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Want to read about the latest exploits of Bat Boy? It's gonna cost you.

Weekly World News, the source of dubious reportage like Elvis Presley sightings and pictures of shockingly obese housepets, has inked an agreement with MediaPass, which will erect a paywall for the publication. Price plans include $3.95 a month for a year's subscription, $5.95 a month for a six-month commitment and $6.95 a month on a per-month basis. MediaPass bills itself as a turnkey solution for publications that want to erect their own paywalls.

Once a fixture of supermarket checkout aisles with a print circulation of 1.2 million, Weekly World News became a strictly online entity in 2009. Since that time, it has doubled that figure in global unique visitors, according to the company. The publication follows The New York Times, Gannett's 80 newspapers and blogger Andrew Sullivan, which have all put meters on their websites in the past couple of years. Some 48% of newspapers now have paywalls, according to the Alliance for Audited Media.
--------------------------------------------------------------
For most people, massage appointments are a luxury  a tradeoff between time and money, and relaxation. But one company aims to make massages more accessible by using a robot.

The WheeMe is a personal pint-sized massage therapist that "massages and caresses" as it rolls across your body, according to the device's official website.

Created by DreamBots, the WheeMe uses "tilt sensor technology" to steer itself on a surface without falling off or losing its grip. The robotic masseur runs on three AA batteries, and functions autonomously; just place it on your body to get started.

At less than a pound heavy, the WheeMee isn't capable of giving deep tissue massages, but DreamBots does promise users a "nice gentle feeling." Check out the video, above, for more.

Would the WheeMee replace your visits to the massage therapist? Tell us in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Petitioners will now have to work a little harder for President Obama's attention.

In a blog post Tuesday, the White House announced that petitions on We the People, an official government website for submitting petitions to the president, must receive 100,000 signatures in 30 days to receive "an official response" from Obama's administration.

The threshold was previously set at 25,000 signatures, and prior to that, the minimum number was 5,000, according to the post.

"We're making another adjustment to ensure we're able to continue to give the most popular ideas the time they deserve," said Macon Phillips, the White House's director of digital strategy.

The new limit only applies to petitions created after the announcement, and won't be retroactively applied to those that already exist, Phillips added.

Use of the site has skyrocketed recently, with 2.4 million new users joining the system, 73,000 petitions created and 4.9 million signatures registered  all in the last two months. Within that time, it took an average of just nine days for petitions to cross the 25,000 threshold (and most achieved that in five days). Compare that to the first 10 months of 2012, during which it took an average of 18 days for a new petition to meet the minimum requirement.

We the People saw a boost in publicity after a popular petition encouraging the government to build a Death Star went viral online. Ultimately, the White House responded with a rejection  albeit one that's chock full of Star Wars references.

What do you think of this new threshold? Fair or unfair? Discuss in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Season four of the Comedy Central hit Workaholics premieres Wednesday night, marking the return of ne'er-do-wells Adam, Blake and Ders to college living rooms across the country.

The sitcom follows the three twenty-somethings as they party, get into mischief and generally screw off at their lame telemarketing job in Southern California. Its offbeat humor, clever dialogue and irreverent take on post-grad life have made Workaholics a cult favorite beyond just the college set, and an AMA the co-stars did on Tuesday was up-voted to Reddit's top spot.

Comedy Central has posted more than 50 Workaholics clips to YouTube, but the trio likely would have never made it to TV in the first place if not for the video sharing network.

Comedy Central picked up the show in 2010 based on the humor and popularity of Adam DeVine, Blake Anderson and Anders Holm's YouTube channel Mail Order Comedy and their online series 5th Year. The rest, as they say, is history  but their path from web to broadcast reflects an increasingly common method of making it big and the wider range of possibilities facilitated by the social web.

"The way this show evolved from a 5th Year and Mail Order Comedy webisode concept into a Comedy Central series is an example of how creative talent can use these two complimentary media platforms, David Pritchard, head of the production company Gigapix Studios, said in a press release when Workaholics was picked up.

The gallery above includes a handful of Mail Order Comedy's funniest throwback videos, all uploaded between three and six years ago. Check it out to see what the flakiest workaholics around were up to before they became superstars. For more, head over to the YouTube channel itself.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Empire State Building wants New Yorkers and the rest of the world to choose the official standard colors for its new LED tower lights.

The new LED lighting system of the Empire State Building, designed by Philips Color Kinetics, allows customized lighting from a palette of over 16 million colors, as well as many special effects and animations.

Starting tonight through January 20, each night the Empire State Building will shine each of its sides in a different shade of the same color. The colors on offer will be red, orange, yellow, green, blue, purple and pink, meaning the total number of choices will be 28.

"Since many people have expressed interest in requesting colors for our lights, this is their chance to get involved, helping us select the Empire State Building's new standard LED colors for our tower," said Anthony E. Malkin, President of Malkin Holdings which supervises the Empire State Building.

Everyone interested in choosing which exact colors will be used for ESB's LED lights can head up to the building's official Facebook page and vote for their preferences. Voters will also be able to share their picks via Twitter, Facebook or Pinterest.

The final seven colors will be announced the week of Jan. 21, 2013.

The Empire State Building often uses its lighting to celebrate or highlight certain events, such as President's Obama's re-election, pictured above. In case you're wondering, @esb_lights is an unofficial Twitter account that explains the meaning of ESB's lighting on any given day.
--------------------------------------------------------------
So, the college football world got Catfish'd by the Manti Te'o girlfriend hoax. If you too have suffered the experience of being epically duped, you're probably just relieved it didn't play out in front of everyone with a TV or computer (or tablet or smartphone or newspaper).

Either way, we'd like to help with 10 things, other than Manti Te'os girlfriend, that turned out to be a bit different from what you first thought.

So stop #Teoing for a second to peruse the list.

More like King of the Suburbs.

Nice try at slipping into the solar system, Pluto.

6. I Can't Believe It's Not Butter

Fabio, how could you?

She's actually a really sweet cat. Mashable Deputy Editor Chris Taylor found this out first paw  err, hand.

The look of a turtleneck without all the belly button sweat.

Well, it tastes like chicken. (Sorry.)

Bonus Thing You Still Forget Is Real  Narwhal
--------------------------------------------------------------
The next time you find yourself grumbling while browsing eHarmony, take a second to reflect back on a time before online dating, when you couldn't stalk potential dates on Facebook. That scary time was called the '80s.

Yes, curling up with your iPad on the couch to peruse mate candidates can be frustrating. But imagine instead sifting through hours of VHS footage of lonely dudes.

SEE ALSO: Create a Fake Girlfriend on Facebook for Just $39.99

Still distraught over the modern challenges of mate selection? Prepare to  beep beep  backup on those grumbles after watching YouTube user SuperZen2012's montage of 80s video dating.
--------------------------------------------------------------
U.S. Attorney Carmen Ortiz, the leading prosecutor in the case against the late hacker and activist Aaron Swartz, said in a statement released late Wednesday that she would have recommended to the judge a prison sentence of six months, not the maximum sentence of 35 years Swartz potentially faced under charges of computer fraud and other crimes.

Ortiz has been heavily criticized since Swartz took his own life on January 11th. Some commentators and Swartz's family believe the threat of jail time and what they consider Ortiz's prosecutorial overreach were contributing factors in Swartz's decision.

Ortiz, however, insists her office's conduct in the case was "appropriate" given the crime.

"The prosecutors recognized that there was no evidence against Mr. Swartz indicating that he committed his acts for personal financial gain, and they recognized that his conduct  while a violation of the law  did not warrant the severe punishments authorized by Congress and called for by the Sentencing Guidelines in appropriate cases," said Ortiz in her statement. "That is why in the discussions with his counsel about a resolution of the case this office sought an appropriate sentence that matched the alleged conduct  a sentence that we would recommend to the judge of six months in a low security setting."

"At no time did this office ever seek  or ever tell Mr. Swartz's attorneys that it intended to seek  maximum penalties under the law," she added.

A reports this week from the Wall Street Journal suggested that Ortiz's office offered Swartz' lawyers a plea deal which was rejected because the government was insisting on some amount of jail time, reportedly six to eight months.

Ortiz, in her statement, acknowledged that Swartz's defense "would have been free to recommend a sentence of probation," which, if approved by a judge, may have kept Swartz out of jail with the understanding that a repeat incident would likely put him behind bars.

"Ultimately, any sentence imposed would have been up to the judge," wrote Ortiz.

SEE ALSO: After Aaron Swartz: The Tech World Must Talk About Depression

A White House petition to remove Ortiz for her approach to Swartz' case has more than 40,000 signatures, enough to prompt an official response. Darrell Issa, chairman of the U.S. House of Representatives Committee on Oversight and Government Reform, is investigating Ortiz and the Department of Justice's handling of the case.

Swartz was arrested in 2011 after sneaking into a Massachusetts Institute of Technology network closet, connecting a laptop and using a program to rapidly download a large amount of academic research. His trial was expected to begin in the spring, but the charges against him have since been dropped  standard procedure when a defendant dies.

STATEMENT OF UNITED STATES ATTORNEY CARMEN M. ORTIZ REGARDING THE DEATH OF AARON SWARTZ As a parent and a sister, I can only imagine the pain felt by the family and friends of Aaron Swartz, and I want to extend my heartfelt sympathy to everyone who knew and loved this young man. I know that there is little I can say to abate the anger felt by those who believe that this offices prosecution of Mr. Swartz was unwarranted and somehow led to the tragic result of him taking his own life. I must, however, make clear that this offices conduct was appropriate in bringing and handling this case. The career prosecutors handling this matter took on the difficult task of enforcing a law they had taken an oath to uphold, and did so reasonably. The prosecutors recognized that there was no evidence against Mr. Swartz indicating that he committed his acts for personal financial gain, and they recognized that his conduct - while a violation of the law - did not warrant the severe punishments authorized by Congress and called for by the Sentencing Guidelines in appropriate cases. That is why in the discussions with his counsel about a resolution of the case this office sought an appropriate sentence that matched the alleged conduct - a sentence that we would recommend to the judge of six months in a low security setting. While at the same time, his defense counsel would have been free to recommend a sentence of probation. Ultimately, any sentence imposed would have been up to the judge. At no time did this office ever seek - or ever tell Mr. Swartzs attorneys that it intended to seek - maximum penalties under the law. As federal prosecutors, our mission includes protecting the use of computers and the Internet by enforcing the law as fairly and responsibly as possible. We strive to do our best to fulfill this mission every day.
--------------------------------------------------------------
American Airlines on Thursday rolled out a new logo and a new look for its planes. The design, via TristanGatsbyMace, presents a more streamlined and airy look than in the past.

The airline told USA Today that this is the first fleet-wide rebranding since 1968.

According to the design agency, this is the new logo:

For comparison's sake, here's a plane decked out with the old logo:

What do you think? Do you like the new design? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
No one likes a trip to the doctor. Triple that dread if you're a child-turned-banshee once a needle comes into the picture.

There's an app for that, and just in time for flu season. Healthline Networks launched a "Big Shots Get Shots" campaign to help children overcome their needle fear, or trypanophobia.

Along with a free iPhone app to distract little ones on the examining table, the campaign encourages parents to take an online pledge to end needle phobia. The pledge is designed to be shared on social networks to spread awareness on what doctors say is a life-threatening aversion.

"Big Shots Get Shots" takes users on a journey with Pablo the Pufferfish, who's afraid of his own needles. Serving as an interactive storybook, the app distracts children with cute sea creatures, Jigsaw puzzles and drag and drop games.

SEE ALSO: App Game for Kids Encourages Healthy Eating

So while your eyes may widen at that syringe (an estimated 50 million Americans are afraid of shots), your child will be too busy watching Pablo learn how needles protect. Watch the app demo here.

Kids today get more shots than previous generations, needle phobia expert Dr. Amy Baxter says in a Healthline press release. Early fear of needles leads to people not completing their immunizations, and carries on to adulthood. That's where technology comes in handy.

"Another approach is to let the child choose a distraction, like seek and find games or a favorite iPad app," Baxter says on the site. "The more sensations you can involve, the better."

Do you think apps can help get rid of phobias? Do you use any particular health apps to educate and distract your kids? Share your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Apple started offering installment payment plans in its China web shop, letting buyers pay for iPhones, iPads and Macbooks over the course of 2 years, Bloomberg reported.

The deal is valid for owners of China Merchants Bank credit cards and for purchases ranging from 300 yuan ($48) to 30,000 yuan ($4,800). Buyers can split payments into three, six, 12, 18 or 24 installments, with additional fees being applied for the last two options.

With this move, Apple hopes to tap into the mid-range consumer market in China, where an iPhone  which costs 5,288 yuan ($850)  is still out of the price range of the average customer. An urban worker in China has an average monthly pay of about 3,585 yuan ($577), according to data from the National Bureau of Statistics.

IDC now places Apple sixth in China's smartphone market (down from fourth place in the quarter before that), behind Samsung, Coolpad, Lenovo, ZTE and Huawei.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Welcome to this morning's edition of 'First To Know,' a series in which we keep you in the know on what's happening in the digital world. Today, we're looking at three particularly interesting stories.

AT&T Reportedly Looking to Expand to Europe

AT&T is considering expansion to Europe, the Wall Street Journal reported, citing "people familiar with the carrier's thinking."

The company is looking into potential acquisitions on the old continent. If such a deal comes through, it could happen before the end of 2013, the WSJ claimed. Targets include Dutch company Royal KPN NV and the UK's Everything Everywhere, but AT&T also wouldn't mind settling in Germany, the report added.

Dutch Court Rules Samsung's Tablets Do Not Infringe on Apple's Design

A Dutch court has ruled that Samsung's tablets do not infringe on Apple's design, Reuters reported. It's another victory for the Korean electronic giant in a seemingly never-ending patent dispute. Last July, a UK court ruled that Samsung didn't copy the iPad, but in the following month, a U.S. court awarded Apple $1 billion in damages after a similar trial.

"We continue to believe that Apple was not the first to design a tablet with a rectangular shape and rounded corners and that the origins of Apple's registered design features can be found in numerous examples," Samsung said in a statement.

Asus Wants to Make a Windows Phone 8 Smartphone or Padfone

Asus has expressed interest in making a Windows Phone 8-based smartphone or Padfone, the company's trademarked combination of a smartphone and a tablet, the Wall Street Journal reported.

"With our Padfone concept, the phone plus tablet, I think it makes sense for Windows 8," said Benson Lin, the company's vice-president.

We're not sure how a WP8-based Padfone would work, since the operating system is a bit restrictive when it comes to screen size, but Microsoft certainly wouldn't mind seeing one, especially after HTC reportedly gave up on plans to make a large-screen WP device.
--------------------------------------------------------------
An earpiece that inflates like a tiny airbag inside human ears can create the perfect fit for any music-listening experience or hearing aid. The futuristic twist on earbuds could even arrive in Apple stores sometime in the near future.

The inflatable earpieces represent the newest invention of Stephen Ambrose, a pioneer in audio technology and founder of Asius Technologies. His technology aims to deliver better sound for consumer earbuds, hearing aids and the in-ear monitors used by performing artists, but without the collateral hearing damage caused by cranking up the volume to compensate for imperfect listening devices.

"We went to Apple, and they said we have the holy grail of in-ear devices and they just can't wait for us to be in their store," Ambrose said.

Asius earned early rave reviews from people with hearing loss during a study funded by the U.S. National Institutes of Health at Vanderbilt University in Nashville, Tenn. Electronics industry representatives and journalists also had a chance to try out the earpieces during the International CES in Las Vegas last week.

The inflated earpieces create an oddly comfortable feeling inside the ear that resembles the slight change in air pressure when riding an elevator, according to one CES attendee. In a clever twist, the earpieces can harness the sound pressure from the headphone or hearing aid speakers to inflate themselves.

"You don't have to slide it into the ear because it actually crawls into the ear canal and unfurls," Ambrose told TechNewsDaily.

Such inflatable earpieces can create an "isolation" seal in the ear that blocks outside noise, but remain flexible enough to absorb some of the excess sound pressure pumped into the ear by headphone or hearing aid speakers. Excess sound pressure can "beat up" the eardrum and trigger an acoustic reflex that defensively dampens loud sounds  often leading headphone users to crank up the volume even more in a vicious cycle.

The Asius technology can also reduce the "occlusion effect" that creates the booming, resonant sound of having your ears plugged.

But the earpieces required flexible, yet strong, material that could withstand being inflated and deflated countless times. Asius looked around at several custom and commercial materials before settling upon medical-grade ePTFE material (Gore-Tex), said Samuel Gido, vice president for materials technology at Asius Technologies and a polymer engineer at the University of Massachusetts in Amherst.

The Asius earpieces could eliminate the need for custom-fit earpieces used by professional hearing aids and expensive custom headphones, Gido said. Custom-fit molding currently relies upon an uncomfortable and imperfect "ear impression" process of pouring silicone "goop" into a person's ears to create a mold of their ear canals.

Inflatable earpieces could also prove more flexible in adjusting to the changing shape of human ear canals as people yawn, chew and talk. Human ear canals even change their shape as people get older.

"This device gives you an excellent seal as good as a custom mold, but you don't need the custom molding," Gido explained.

Audio device manufacturers such as Apple, Sony and Sennheiser have already begun discussing how to use the Asius earpiece technology. Ambrose has even successfully retrofitted existing commercial earpieces, such as an $800 pair of in-ear headphones owned by his wife, Garnet Ambrose. (They originally didn't sound much better than a cheaper pair of headphones.)

Garnet Ambrose has spent hours peering into microscopes to work on the Asius earpiece prototypes and retrofits by hand. She recalled her earlier days working with musicians such as Nick Mason, the drummer of Pink Floyd, as she demonstrated the inflatable earpieces to CES attendees crowding around the booth.

"I wore this all day while I was cooking, cleaning, and doing all my normal things," Garnet Ambrose said. "The only thing I was disappointed in was that I ran out of music and had to download more."

The early prototype earpiece she held in her hands looked like two inflatable bags dangling from the ends of headphone cords  a cruder version of the final product consumers can expect. Yet the prototype had survived constant inflation and deflation during demonstrations over the past two years.

Maybe durability from a soft, flexible material should not come as a surprise. After all, Gore-Tex has become a material of choice for surgeons repairing hernias and heart defects. The stuff is made for heavy lifting, right?

"You got it," Garnet Ambrose said.

In the background, her husband echoed the same words in a completely different conversation.

"You got it!"

This article originally published at TechNewsDaily here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Move over, Skrillex. One bird is giving the dubstep king some competition with his fat, feathery beats.

In a 45-second YouTube video, Harvey the cockatiel tweets out heavy bass and energetic whirrs that wouldn't sound out of place in a club. In our humble opinion, the yellow-and-grey bird demonstrates such musical prowess that he could be an honorary nightingale.

Since going online earlier this week, the video has attracted more than 5.4 million views.

What do you think of Harvey's skills? Are you aware of other musically inclined animals? Tell us in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
You can't eat social media, but you sure can get your creative juices flowing using such sites and apps as Pinterest and Instagram.

"It's made cooking a lot more accessible to everyone, and it's made everyone a lot more creative at home," celebrity chef Bobby Flay tells Mashable. "When you click on Instagram people are posting what they're cooking, eating, ingredients in markets and complaints."

Flay is among the famous faces of the cooking world who are taking the healthy-living mantras they popularized on TV and transforming them in digestible  and sharable  nuggets online.

This week, for example, Flay launched Bobby Flay Fit. It's a seven-episode series in which he serves up recipes, workouts, tips and guests to help you nix unhealthy behaviors.

Each short episode has a theme: Moderation, Motivation, Mix-It-Up, Expect More, Discipline, Support and Wrap-Up.

"You can watch the whole series in 21 minutes, and it's entertaining at the same time."

"The subject matter is hard to talk about for a long period of time," Flay admits.

The series' website, housed on Food Network's online hub, also features small portions of non-video content that all follow Flay's philosophy that it only takes one week to create healthier habits with moderation and exercise.

Flay, whose two TV shows (Brunch @ Bobby's on the Cooking Channel and Bobby's Dinner Battle) premiered this month, lives by the advice he offers in the Fit series.

"When I go to a restaurant, I used to clean my plate, but now I eat only three-fourths of my plate if I'm full," Flay says. "If I don't like it, I don't eat it. Sometimes people just eat to eat."

Episode one, for example, highlights his moderation tips  the ones he follows daily.

Food Network describes each themed episode as such:

Moderation: "Learn the secrets to staying fit and healthy every day with chef and restaurateur Bobby Flay. Bobby talks simple tips to keeping active within a busy work day as he walks to work in New York, and explains his key to being able to enjoy all his favorite foods. He and his assistant chef treat his staff to a healthful lunch of chickpea salad and crab pasta with parsley, mint and dill at the Bobby Flay offices." Motivation: "Get inspired to keep up that workout routine and stay energized throughout the day. Join Bobby on his morning workout routine as he shares what inspired him to lose weight and keep it off. He divulges his secret ingredient to fitness and leading a healthy lifestyle all year long. Bobby gets a little extra motivation from his trainer who reveals his own secret to fitness success  stretching. Bobby creates a recipe for a tasty and filling tea smoothie with Greek yogurt and berries to keep energy levels high after a great workout." Mix-It-Up: "Get more out of your workouts. Bobby ditches his old routine and joins his good friend and avid weight-lifter, Iron Chef Michael Symon for a new, challenging workout. Bobby shows how to keep energy up and hunger away with a yummy nutritious snack of coconut chocolate granola. Bobby shares his tips to keeping energy and motivation up both during and after a workout." Expect More: "Variety is the spice of life when it comes to workout routines. Bobby tries a brand new way to stay fit: spinning. Bobby's wife Stephanie March introduces him to SoulCycle and they push each other to the limit at this challenging full-body low-impact workout. Bobby and his friends share how they stay motivated to keep fit year round. Bobby and his friend Katie Lee reward themselves by cooking a delicious brunch after class of oatmeal pancakes and open-faced eggs Florentine sandwiches, including a well-deserved sangria with Pisco and hibiscus tea." Discipline: "Bobby talks all about discipline and how he makes time to eat right and exercise, even with his hectic schedule. He visits one of his restaurants, Bar Americain, and discusses the challenges of staying focused on making healthy choices when there are temptations all around. Bobby reveals his tips on keeping meals healthy and delicious every day at home and in his restaurants while still being conscious of how tasting food in all of his restaurants can add up for him. He shares his secrets on how to make food vibrantly flavorful without adding calories by whipping up a light fish dish with a citrus relish packed with flavor, but not fat." Support: "Bobby emphasizes the importance of having a workout buddy and keeping fitness fun. One of Bobby's good friends, Michael Symon, joins him in the gym for a kettle bell workout and some friendly racing competition. Not only do they get the work done in the gym, but they do it with a smile. After their workout, the two chefs refuel with a protein-packed, Greek-inspired meal including lamb and quinoa." Wrap-Up: "Bobby recaps all of the great tips he has learned to staying fit including how to get motivated, eat healthy, make conscious choices while still having fun and mixing it up. Emphasizing the importance of balance and dedication, Bobby shares his tricks and techniques to leading a healthy lifestyle and hopes he can use his experiences to inspire others to have success in eating right and exercising year-round."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Being a new parent is challenging enough with the lack of sleep and caring for a little one around the clock. And for many mothers, breastfeeding doesn't always come easily. A new app aims to make that a bit easier by helping tired new moms track and record when they've breastfeed their baby.

SmallNest is an iOS app that lets moms record how long their babies nurse and how often. This is important because for a baby to get enough calories and for a mom to establish her milk supply, it's typically recommended that she breastfeed at least eight to 12 times in a 24-hour period. With the app, moms can track this information  convenient when days and nights blur together for new parents. And for non-breastfeeding parents, they see when mom last breastfed, get to know the baby's pattern, know when it's time for another feeding.

With SmallNest parents can also track diaper changes and baby's sleep patterns.

The app requires to you login through Facebook but says it won't post to Facebook on your behalf. The company however did send Mashable stats on how many mothers breastfeed and how often, according to information gleaned from the app.

SmallNest says the app has tracked 2,000 babies, primarily in the U.S. and Canada, to gather data about feedings. The average number of feedings for a newborn is 16-18 times per day. However, some moms are breastfeeding 30 or 40 times each day  for up to a year and in some cases beyond. From data from 180,000 feedings entered into the app, SmallNest was able to see moms use the right breast most often.

Alex Shartsis, founder of SmallNest, tells Mashable "Like most apps and websites, moms using SmallNest agree to our privacy policy, which allows use of anonymous aggregated data. As the volume of data grows, SmallNest's aim is to give insights back to the community so moms can learn and achieve better breastfeeding outcomes: even just knowing you're within a normal range can be really helpful in relieving anxiety and worry," he says. "Of course, knowing things aren't normal is even more useful, as you can seek professional help. America has a long way to go before it's back to a healthy level of breastfeeding. Hopefully information like this can help get us there."

Shartsis says with regard to the right breast/left breast data they only looked at "feeding occurrences across the entire population as a giant sum and average, so there wasn't even really anything to anonymize."

Would you use SmallNest to track breastfeeding and/or diaper changes? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
When you need help picking out a new book, gadget, hairstylist or even doctor, what do you do?

Turn to online reviews, of course. Almost all online retailers, from Amazon to individual retail e-boutiques, provide a way for customers to review their products and services. And we, as consumers, scour these reviews to guarantee we're making the perfect choice.

So it should be no surprise that there are company review sites, like Glassdoor.com and Jobitorial.com, that provide a window-shopping experience for the modern jobseeker. You can see reviews and information (like average salaries) from current and former employees  all designed to help you gauge the overall company experience.

But how do these sites fit in to your job hunt? Should you take them as absolute truth, or with a grain of salt? Before you go down the rabbit hole of online reviews, here are some guidelines for effectively incorporating them into your job search  and your ultimate employment decisions.

When you're searching for a job, it's tempting to look at online reviews right away  or even use them as a way to find the best places to work. And yeah, while glowing reviews may encourage you to look closer at a company, bad ones can seriously hinder your motivation to submit an application  even if you would otherwise be very interested in the job (and even if said reviews turn out to be off the mark).

To avoid that bias, hold off on reading reviews until you snag an interview. Check out companies' websites, job descriptions, social media platforms and current news-based research. (Did they just release a new app? Make an appearance on the Today Show?) You should be excited about what the company does at its core  not just how cool its office is or how much (or little) its employees get paid.

Then, once your resume and cover letter are sent, and you've (hopefully) booked an interview, browse away.

On average, a happy customer will tell three people about her great experience, while an unhappy one will tell more than three times that.

OK, so you're not looking up product reviews or restaurant recommendations, but the same logic can be applied here. Keep in mind that an unsatisfied employee (or ex-employee), is more likely to actively look for a place to vent his frustrations about his company than a happy employee looking to sing its praises, and for that reason, many online review sites skew negatively.

This doesn't mean you should discredit all the reviews; in fact, a series of bad reviews that bring up the same general themes can certainly be a reflection of an undesirable company. But realize that every company has a few dissatisfied employees  even consistently top-rated places to work, like Google  so consider everything you're reading with a critical eye.

Also, put yourself in the company's position. Do the reviews complain about layoffs, cuts in PTO or recent changes in management?

On one hand, that could be a red flag to indicate a company's downward spiral. But if you investigate further, you may find out that the business is restructuring or has been recently acquired, and these changes may be a normal and healthy part of revitalizing a once-struggling company or resetting its course.

Or, as you dig deeper, you might learn that employees' grumbling about "cuts to vacation" are due to the former "unlimited vacation" policy being switched to three weeks, which is hardly the same as the company scrimping on vacation days. Don't just take what you read at face value. If you're concerned about something, do additional research to get the facts.

OK, so you've combed through all 74 reviews about your company of choice, and you've noticed a few key issues that come up again and again. Now what?

The best thing to do with this information is to pinpoint things you want to address during the interview process, whether by observing whats going on around you or by directly asking your interviewer.

First, determine the things that you might be able to get a straightforward, factual answer to. For example, if a review stated, "Everyone here is worked to the bone," you could easily ask a question about the length of a typical workday.

On the other hand, if a review that insisted, "All of my managers have terrible leadership skills," that's admittedly a bit trickier. Unfortunately, there's no truly objective way to verify this information, and you'll have to keep an eye out for other signs that will help you discern whether or not you should be concerned.

Now, when you do ask for information, make sure your tone is purely inquisitive and never accusatory. Even if you read about a company's flat management structure and infrequent promotions, it won't translate well if you hit your interviewer with, "So, would I really be in the same position for at least five years?"

Instead, stick with a simple, "Can you tell me about the path to move up to a management position, and the typical time frame for that?" The hiring manager can easily provide a factual answer to this, without feeling attacked.

All is said and done, and your interviewer verified what all the reviews mentioned: long hours and no overtime. But, after a few short years, you'll be in a great position to land your dream job. Could the long hours be worth it? Or, maybe you're in the opposite scenario  while all the reviews say that the company culture makes up for the lack of promotions, you've been dead set on climbing the ladder quickly, and the situation you've uncovered has given you pause.

Remember that the issues that are complaint-worthy (or praise-worthy) to one employee may not affect you in the same way. Instead of grouping the reviews you read into "good" versus "bad," evaluate the issues individually and decide what they mean to you.

Also, while it's easy to get caught up in online reviews, your overall opinion of the company should come from a much wider array of sources. For one, go offline, and see if you can get more personal information from a current or former employee.

Beyond research, the things you observe within the company (are employees smiling? Is everyone hiding in their cubicle?), your interaction with the hiring manager and your enthusiasm for the company's core purpose should all influence your ultimate decision. Don't be afraid to trust your (well-informed) gut. It's usually right.

This article originally published at The Muse here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Cyanide & Happiness won't be coming to a television near you.

The creators behind the popular webcomic announced that they walked away from a potential deal with a cable network to turn their webcomic into a television show, MediaBistro reports.

Kris Wilson told readers that he and the other Cyanide & Happiness creators had been approached about a TV show twice before, but walked away "due to rights and creative control issues."

"We're starting to realize that TV as an industry just isn't compatible with what we want to do with our animation: deliver it conveniently to a global audience, something we've been doing all along with our comics these past years," Wilson wrote. "That's just the nature of television versus the Internet, I suppose."

The third and latest deal fell through for similar reasons.

Other YouTube channels have made the leap from the Internet to the small screen. Pop culture commentator KalebNation got his own deal for a show in October 2011, and Nickelodeon gave Fred Figglehorn his own show, and he starred in two made-for-TV-movies for the network.

Epic Meal Time shot a TV pilot for G4 earlier last year, and a TV version of the Annoying Orange now airs on Cartoon Network. The sisters who commentated on Ray J's junk in the Kim Kardashian sex tape also got a one-hour special from OWN: Oprah Winfrey Network.

However, Wilson and company still want to bring a Cyanide & Happiness Show to the web. The creators plan to launch a Kickstarter campaign to raise money for production. Wilson feels that the entertainment industry is changing and soon the Internet will be the main way people watch programming, and C&H fans are likely already on the cutting edge.

"The Internet is already the largest network, available when you think about it," Wilson wrote. "Why go anywhere else?"

Fellow web content creator and Vlogbrother John Green showed his support for the creators and revealed that he and his brother Hank have run into similar problems when approached about bringing their YouTube channel to television.

This article originally published at The Daily Dot here
--------------------------------------------------------------
It's nearly impossible to fully delete yourself from the Internet, but a new app from online privacy startup Abine says it will significantly cut down on your online footprint.

DeleteMeMobile [iTunes link]  which launched for iOS devices in the Apple App Store on Monday and already has several thousand users  aims to strip your personal data from many of the largest websites that collect and sell it, including Spokeo and Intelius.

These sites collect a huge amount of information about you, from estimated net worth, religious and political affiliations, children's names, websites visited and articles read (yikes).

"Hundreds of data brokers you've probably never heard of track everything people do, online and off," Sarah Downey, Abine privacy analyst, told Mashable. "This collection of digital data is leading to the creation of a 'digital you,' and increasingly, decisions are being made based on this version of you, such as your credit scores, ability to get loans, insurance premiums, online shopping prices and whether you're hired."

The DeleteMe app is free to search what kind of information is out there about you and it comes with one removal from any data broker site. After that, there is a $24.99 subscription for three months with unlimited deletions. The app is similar to the company's web-based DeleteMe service.

Here's how the app works: After downloading it and providing some basic information to sign up, the app searches data-broker sites looking for information about you. About eight results listings will pop up for the typical user. A user can click the results by saying "This isn't me" if it's not a proper match or hitting "DeleteMe" to remove the data.

SEE ALSO: What Facebook's New Graph Search Means for Your Privacy

"That listing will be added to a list of requested removals, and it's updated whenever the listing comes down," Downey said.

Powering the app behind the scenes is a mix of automated technology and human-powered effort.

"We built search technology to comb major data brokers for results, and when users request removal, we've automated some of those processes," she added. "In many cases, though, it comes down to our team of DeleteMe Advisors  all of whom are Boston locals and a lot of whom are law students  to do the hard work of writing emails, sending letters and more."

Although I had initial trouble finding matches, due to using my current city location instead of my hometown, three of the five results were accurately linked to my identity. In two cases, the results creepily revealed the full names of my parents, including my mother's maiden name and my father's middle initial. The company told me that the revealing of my parents' names "could just be the tip of the iceberg" as to what these data brokers have saved.

What's also interesting is that I've used data-swiping services before, but Abine said it's not rare for that information to come back again over time.

After hitting "DeleteMe" on one listing, I received a message that it could take up to a few weeks for the company to comply with my removal request. However, it was a little buggy after the removal process, as it didn't log it under its pending section. (Abine said it is looking into the issue).

Although the app has received mixed reviews in the Apple App Store so far, Downey said  despite one review claim  information entered within the app is kept confidential.

"Abine does not share your personal information and states this in the app's privacy policy," Downey said. "We wouldn't be able to exist as a company if users couldn't trust us."

UPDATE: This story has been updated from its original version with a quote from the company about privacy, as well as more details about our personal experience with the app.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Disney Infinity is more than just a new game, it's a new business and merchandising model from Disney Interactive.

One part Minecraft, two parts Skylanders, with dashes of Club Penguin and Mario Paint, it's Disney's most ambitious interactive investment yet.

The new project  which Disney describes not as a game but as a "universe"  is Disney's attempt to fuse physical toys with a digital world.

Borrowing heavily from Activision's blockbuster Skylanders, Disney Infinity works by attaching real world, physical figurines to the game. The experience of the game changes depending on what figurine is present on a connecting hub  a device Disney calls the "Disney Infinity Base." The game world will mimic the figurines, special powers and other objects placed on the Infinity Base.

Like Skylanders, Disney will make multiple sets of figurines, power discs (which sit below a character on the Infinity Base and offer extra powers or special features) and Play Sets (worlds within which a player can play) available for purchase.

Of course, what makes Disney Infinity unique is that its characters and Play Sets are from across the Disney and Pixar universe. Moreover, players can combine figurines from different franchises within the same game universe.

John Lasseter, the chief creative officer at both Pixar and Walt Disney Animation Studios, told us that the idea behind allowing the separate worlds to merge was based on the way that kids actually play with toys.

"Look at how [Toy Story toy owner] Andy played with his toys," Lasseter said. "He had a Buzz Lightyear, a Cowboy Woody and Mr. Potato Head and played with them all alongside one another."

Moreover, Lasseter says that the way Disney looks at the experience of Disney Infinity isn't as changing or expanding the storyline of the renowned franchises, it's about letting kids play with different characters within one universe.

Disney only announced three franchises that will have initial support  Monster's University, Pirates of the Caribbean and The Incredibles, but executives promised multiple additional worlds and characters when Disney Infinity launches in June.

I asked John Blackburn, the leader of Avalanche Software (the Disney-owned game studio that built Infinity), about the possibility of having characters from Star Wars inside Infinity  after all, they are now part of the parent company.

Blackburn said that, "from a creative standpoint, I would love that  but it's too early to say anything definitive." The decision, he said with a smile, is also "above my pay grade."

Assuming Disney is as serious about its investment in Infinity as it says it is, I absolutely expect all of Disney's biggest characters and properties to make their way into the game.

Disney's unique asset with Infinity is the characters. The more characters available, the better the experience.

Infinity isn't really a game  it is, as the executives said, an experience and a new universe. Each Play Set will have mission-focused aspects  like a traditional game  but the element that had me believing this will be a winner was the open-ended play mode called "Toy Box."

"Toy Box" is basically Minecraft with Disney characters. Users can create their own worlds and drop in objects, characters and power-ups to create their own adventures.

One of the demos Disney showed us at their press event was the recreation of Bowser's Castle from Mario Kart, complete with a racer in a kart  in this case, Cinderella's magic buggy.

Disney said that it plans to let users upload their worlds and experiences to share with others. Once Disney vets the experiences and makes sure they are appropriate, other users can download and play or add on to the worlds and adventures created by others.

In the hands-on demos, the focus was on the "Toy Box" more than the guided gameplay. Perhaps that functionality is further along in development, but I got the sense that this open-ended play is what Disney is really wanting to create.

As a child, I would spend hours building elaborate Lego destinations that my other toys could visit and exist within. "Toy Box" just might be the digital equivalent.

One of the more unique aspects of Infinity is that it isn't just being developed for game consoles. Disney is also targeting computers and mobile devices.

On the console front, the Wii, Wii U, PlayStation 3 and Xbox 360 will all support Infinity. For mobile, Blackburn would only confirm iOS support for now, but said the company is actively invested in supporting other mobile platforms  including Android.

What is less clear is how seamless the experience will be for users who engage in the experience on a phone or tablet  versus with a game controller and TV. Blackburn told me that the team is looking at optimizing the experience for mobile play.

When I asked why the focus on mobile, Blackburn said that its an increasingly important  or even primary  gaming device for its audience.

Disney Interactive needs a hit. The division has been losing money for Disney over the last few years, and it's under pressure to become profitable this year.

It's not a surprise to see a more concentrated effort on projects, such as Infinity, that include the addition of toy tie-ins alongside games.

The big question will be: Is Infinity an experience kids will want to be part of?

From my time with the demo, I think it is. I also think the quality of the figurines and the openness of "Toy Box" mode will make this a success.

Disney Infinity will make its debut this June.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Federal Aviation Administration grounded on Wednesday all Boeing 787 Dreamliners operating in the United States following a string of malfunctions that have plagued the new model aircraft. 787s are prohibited from operating in U.S. airspace until the FAA completes a safety inspection.

The FAA's decision came after three separate problems involving the revolutionary composite-built 787. Earlier this month, an electrical fire struck a 787 parked at Boston's Logan International Airport and owned by Japan Airlines. Several days later, a separate Japan Airlines 787 had to cancel takeoff from Boston due to a fuel leak. On Wednesday, an overheating battery forced an All Nippon Airways 787 to make an emergency landing in Western Japan.

Electrical problems, not the fuel leak, are at the core of the FAA's decision to ground the Dreamliner and launch a safety investigation of the aircraft.

"The battery failures resulted in release of flammable electrolytes, heat damage, and smoke on two Model 787 airplanes," the FAA said in a statement. "The root cause of these failures is currently under investigation. These conditions, if not corrected, could result in damage to critical systems and structures, and the potential for fire in the electrical compartment."

United Airways, which operates six 787s, is the only American company with Dreamliners in its fleet. Since the FAA's decision, the European Aviation Safety Agency has also grounded all 787s in Europe. Qatar Airlines, LAN Airlines, Air India and Ethiopian Airlines have separately decided to ground their 787s, according to the Huffington Post.

Boeing has promised to work with investigators to resolve any issues and get the 787s flying once again.

"We are confident the 787 is safe, and we stand behind its overall integrity," said Jim McNerney, Boeing chairman, president and CEO Wednesday in a statement.

Do you want the 787s flying again?
--------------------------------------------------------------
Nowadays, sneaking in a personal call or quick browse through Facebook during work is typical on-the-job behavior. But what if you abandoned work completely and outsourced your job to, say, China?

That's precisely what one U.S. developer got away with last year, paying a Chinese consulting firm 20% of his six-figure salary to do his job. Referred to as "Bob" in a case study outlined by Verizon's security team, the employee worked for a U.S.-based critical-infrastructure company, and was versed in C++, Java, Python, Ruby, as well as other programming languages.

Despite his skills, however, Bob didn't do any work. Here's how a typical day went for him:

This particular company wasn't Bob's only victim; the Verizon report said he similarly scammed "multiple companies in the area," earning several hundred thousand dollars a year, while the outsourced Chinese firm earned around $50,000 annually.

What's more, as Bob's performance reviews reveal, it was a business model that worked. For the past few years, he had been receiving "excellent remarks," according to the report.

"His code was clean, well-written and submitted in a timely fashion. Quarter after quarter, his performance review noted him as the best developer in the building."

For the entire unbelievable tale, visit Verizon's blog. What's the riskiest thing you've ever done at work? Tell us  if you dare  in the comments below.

[via The Next Web]
--------------------------------------------------------------
Have you ever daydreamed with your best friends about the epic adventures you should go on, once you get the chance?

Most of these fantasy trips never make it out of the imagination, but nine determined friends spent two years planning the ultimate 30-day vacation. Oh, and the group wore nothing but tuxedoes for the month-long adventure.

Reddit user irkima, part of the adventurous group of friends, filmed the entire trip. The former developer quit his four-year day job to follow his passion, and now he's freelancing.

SEE ALSO: Your Profile Pic Has Nothing on These Guys

The group traveled across Europe, visiting 24 cities and 10 countries. The original invite list had 20 people involved, irkima told users, but nine people on a month-long trip was still quite impressive.

New videos will be released every week. You can follow the adventure using the hashtag #TuxedoChallenge.

BONUS: Travel the World With These 15 Inspiring Instagram Accounts
--------------------------------------------------------------
On Tuesday Facebook unveiled Graph Search, a new way to search for information on the social network.

Currently in a limited beta, the feature allows you to search Facebook for things centered around four focus areas: People, Places, Photos and Interests. Searches unearth information shared by your friends, as well as public information on Facebook as a whole.

 

For instance, while traveling you can use the tool to find out what friends or friends of friends you might have in the area. If you're looking for a new job, you might use Graph Search to see if you or any of your friends happen to know anyone who works at your dream company. It could even be used for online dating.

Curious what we could discover, we did a few off-the-wall searches using Graph Search to see what general, and interesting, information might be easily accessible now.

Check out the gallery above for some of the unique searches we did, and what we found out.

What will you use Graph Search for? Let us know your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
You've probably heard that "a little knowledge is a dangerous thing." It's fair to say the English poet who first wrote that wasn't thinking about social network usage data.

Still, in an age when we're bombarded with statistics, the phrase has become more appropriate than ever. And it's why you should take recent reports that Facebook lost more than a million active users with a pinch of salt.

Case in point: when Instagram's Daily Active Users seemed to drop by a quarter at the end of December, according to AppData, some commentators took it as a sign that the Terms of Service kerfuffle had driven 25% of the photo app's users away.

But as Instagram announced Thursday, its Monthly Active User count has actually grown 10% since December, to 90 million users. Monthly active user numbers are more reliable, and less prone to day-to-day fluctuations. (AppData had also shown a rise in monthly users before Instagram stopped reporting its information to the service.)

Now comes news that Facebook lost 1.4 million monthly active users in the U.S. in early December, as reported by the analytics firm SocialBakers. That's a more reliable indication that the service is slipping, right?

Wrong. First of all, SocialBakers is tapping into information Facebook gives its advertisers to test the reach of their ads; it isn't intended for precision user metrics.

But even assuming the number is right on the money, consider that 1.4 million users is less than 1% of Facebook's U.S. total active user base  which is 167 million.

Consider this, too: Facebook's growth has never gone in a straight line. No growth ever does. As you can see in the video above, it has slipped back several times in the past  and always bounced back.

Then again, Facebook is certainly approaching the definition of a mature market in the U.S., with more than half of everyone in the country using the service. Considering those under 13 can't join it, and many of those over 65 don't care to, it doesn't have that much room left to grow at home (though it is still growing like a weed internationally.)

What do you think? Will Facebook user numbers continue to rise in the U.S., or is this the beginning of a stagnation period? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A rape suspect posted a Facebook message saying he was about to get shot before being shot and killed by police Thursday.

"Well folkes im about to get shot. Peace," read the message from Eric Lee Ramsey, 30, of Mt. Pleasant, Mich. He posted the still-public message via a mobile device:

Ramsey's Facebook friends initially thought his post was a joke, only to realize the truth later. Their messages have not been published here in order to protect their privacy.

Mashable verified the authenticity of the suspect's Facebook page by comparing his profile picture and other personal data with a police mug shot and information from local media.

Ramsey's public photographs included an image, apparently posted as a joke, of three children and a dog seemingly locked in a dog cage with the caption "needs a home, dog is optional." Other images are more typical pictures of family and friends.

SEE ALSO: Here's How Police Get a Suspect's Facebook Information

Ramsey, who had previous convictions for assault and destruction of police property, was being pursued by police for kidnapping and then raping a Central Michigan University student, according to the Morning Sun.

Ramsey approached the woman around 9:30 p.m. Wednesday on CMU's campus and forced her at gunpoint to drive his Ford Escape from campus, police say. The woman lept from the vehicle after Ramsey threatened to kill her. She was able to call police at approximately 10:05 p.m., telling a dispatcher that she had been kidnapped and sexually abused.

Ramsey was shot while being pursued by a Crawford County Sheriff's deputy at approximately 4 a.m. local time.

As of press time, there was no official word on how the suspect managed to post the prescient message to Facebook in the midst of the police pursuit, during which he "rammed a sheriff's deputy's car head-on."
--------------------------------------------------------------
When Deadspin broke the news Wednesday that one of the nation's top NFL prospects, Manti Te'o, had a made-up dead girlfriend  a story the linebacker presumably gamed to land magazine covers and spots on ESPN sports shows  the Internet went ballistic.

Twitter had a field day: "Manti Te'o," "So Te'o," and other related terms peaked at more than 3,000 tweets a minute. Many were incredulous  and for good reason: It's not 1993. You can't tell your friends you have a girlfriend you met at camp and only see once a year. Everyone and everything has an online footprint. You can't just get away with this.

Or can you?

If there's one thing to take away from this fiasco, it's that there's hope for Forever Alones who want to trick the world into thinking they're worthy of love. On the Internet, even in 2013, there are myriad ways to conjure a seemingly real lover from zeroes and ones.

Chase Hoffberger's new girlfriend seemed perfect. Allison had a sly smile and brown eyes and texted him constantly  nice things like "You are my only man. I'm gonna be be thinking about you!"

She was into roleplaying; she could "act as anything you need me to, whether it be hispanic, asian, black, white, mixed, etc." She was also 17. Oh yeah, and Chase bought her companionship for $5.

He was testing the site GirlfriendHire.com, a virtual marketplace for "flings": For a given price, young women offer to perform nonsexual or sexual services (online) for a week. Flirt over text, critique your music taste, offer fashion advice, you name it.

Chase, of course, just wanted an interview.

This Brazilian site is the whole package: You pay for different levels of fake-girlfriend completion. For 30 days at a time, the site will create a fake Facebook profile and update it with authentic-sounding statuses and comments.

The Te'o package will set you back a cool $99.

College might prepare kids for a job interview, but it leaves them crippled with debt and unable to stop mooching off their parents until their 30s. Traveling is an amazingly valuable experience that no one can have anymore because it costs thousands of dollars.

Fortunately, if you are rich and go on fun trips, you can convince broke college kids to be your fake girlfriends (or boyfriends) and even let you wiggle your genitals around their genitals. It's a win-win and not exploitative at all.

How do you meet them? Easy! Sites like Sugar Daddie, SeekingArrangement.com, or Miss Travel make it happen.

Miss Travel - How It Works from Miss Travel on Vimeo.

"Discretion is guaranteed," the site claims. It damn well better be. Why else would you pay a monthly fee for top-tier girlfriending? The Fake Internet Girlfriend experience specializes in revenge and family cover-ups:

If the fake-girlfriend experts can't invent a dead girl who will win you media adoration, whom can you trust?

Well, there's one last option.

Here's an overlooked fake-girlfriend method that's foolproof until you ruin everything by telling the cops about it. You can pay Nigerian spammers a lot of money to be your Internet girlfriend. It works so well, you won't even realize they're spammers.

Just make sure to overlook the fact that your love has bank accounts in three different continents.

This poor schmuck in Illinois found out about it the hard way. Turns out he wasn't looking for a fake girlfriend at all. He was looking for a real one. And he sent "her" hundreds of thousands of dollars because he thought she was missing.

That's really sad, actually. Don't do that.

This article originally published at The Daily Dot here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Instagram users have their noses pressed up to their smartphone screens trying to spot the app's most elusive dog. Momo the border collie and his talent for blending in to scenery has made #FindMomo the real-life version of Where's Waldo?

Ontario-based graphic designer and Momo's best human friend, Andrew Knapp, discovered the dog's knack for hiding in plain sight while playing fetch. "Momo does it himself," Knapp told Mashable. "He runs off when I'm about to throw a stick, and waits until I throw it, usually camouflaged in the forest."

Knapp's keen eye for landscapes also helped him create photographs people actually want to look at  with Momo or without. Still, the dog proves to be an eye-catching addition to his images.

"I love taking photos of these landscape and streetscapes, but without a subject or a sort of quirk, there was just nothing really interesting about them," Knapp said. "With Momo in them, you're forced to look at the photo for at least a second or two."

While Knapp said the game isn't "that challenging," it has certainly engaged thousands of Instagrammers that play along in their feed.

But fear not  Momo's Internet fame hasn't turned this Canadian pooch into a hotdog. "He's never bragged once about being a good hider," Knapp said. "He'll [still] be scared of you if you're wearing a big hat."

Good to know Momo still has his paws firmly planted in the dirt  unless of course you're wearing a sombrero, in which case he'll be a foot off the ground while running away.

Can you spot Momo in the photographs, below? If your peepers start cramping, skip to the answer key at the bottom of the page.
--------------------------------------------------------------
OfficeMax has partnered with GoDaddy to help small businesses set up shop on the web.

Starting Thursday, the office supply chain will offer "GoDaddy website bundles" including domains, website design and SEO. Prices range from $12.99 for a domain name to $249.99 for a package that includes 999 pages, 10 email addresses, one domain name, premium website builder, search engine visibility, online storage and premium shopping cart. Those prices are charged annually. The offering marks the first time that GoDaddy has offered such services via a brick-and-mortar retailer. OfficeMax has more than 900 stores in the U.S. and Mexico.

The GoDaddy offer is not available on OfficeMax's website so it will not be in direct competition with GoDaddy. To get the services, customers have to visit OfficeMax's stores. OfficeMax associates will facilitate the agreements.

GoDaddy claims nearly 11 million customers worldwide, 70% of whom are small businesses. Some 75% of small businesses still lack a website, according to the U.S> Census.
--------------------------------------------------------------
UPDATE: The first screening of the interview has now aired on the east coast and online. See reactions here.



Before Manti Te'o girlfriend-gate came along, sports fans were captivated this week by the build-up to cyclist Lance Armstrong's interview with Oprah Winfrey, expected to be a watershed moment in the extended saga surrounding his alleged use of performance enhancing drugs.

It was leaked earlier this week that Armstrong would confess to doping to win his record seven Tour de France titles  a revelation many took as obvious given the mounting evidence against him in recent months. But, ever the brilliant entrepreneur, Oprah kept the anticipation going by saying, "He did not come clean in the manner that I expected."

So how can you watch? The two-part interview  scheduled to air at 9 p.m. Eastern and Pacific times on Thursday and Friday  will be broadcast on the Oprah Winfrey Network (OWN) as well as streamed online.

If you want to watch online, the interview will stream during each broadcast time on Oprah.com as well as OWN's Facebook page.

If you'd rather watch the old-fashioned way, this handy tool tells you how to find OWN in your area.

The Oprah interview will mark the culmination of a years-long did-he-or-didn't-he drama surrounding how Armstrong managed to dominate cycling so completely in the early 2000s. Over the past few months, much of that drama played out online. Here's a quick recap:

In August, Internet users reacted in shock after Armstrong used a statement posted to his website to announce that he would finally end his long contention of doping charges by the U.S. Anti-Doping Agency (USADA). He admitted no wrongdoing, however, defiantly writing that "I am finished with this nonsense." The following day, he tweeted that donations to his Livestrong Foundation increased 25-fold since he released the statement. Armstrong founded Livestrong in 1997 after a bout with testicular cancer. The foundation aims to help others with cancer, and its positive reflection on Armstrong lent the debate over his steroid use a complicating twist. In October, Armstrong's former Tour de France teammate George Hincapie used a tweet and post to his official website to share a damning revelation. He admitted for the first time that he had taken performance enhancing drugs, and also said he'd named other users for investigators. Shortly after, the USADA released hundreds of pages of testimony from 11 of Armstrong's former riding mates. Later the same month, Armstrong made what many interpreted as a decidedly digital and indirect admission of guilt by removing his claim to seven Tour de France titles from his Twitter bio. In November, however, he posted a passive-aggressive photo of himself reclining while surrounded by the yellow jerseys he wore to win his seven Tours with the caption, "Back in Austin and just layin' around..." The image went viral with sports fans, quickly picking up more than 300,000 views on the social network Mobli  which Armstrong is an investor in.

Will you watch Lance Armstrong's interview with Oprah? What do you expect? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Hubble Space Telescope's iconic "Deep Field" photo wowed the world in 1996 by revealing a huge collection of galaxies hiding inside a patch of the sky that looked like nothing more than blank space. Now NASA plans to image six more "empty" bits of sky for a whole new set of deep fields that could revolutionize astronomy once again.

Hubble captured the Deep Field by staring at the same point over many hours, letting photons of light from extremely distant objects slowly pile up to reveal celestial bodies that would otherwise be too faint to see.

Since the original photo's release, Hubble looked even longer at the same spot to create the "Ultra Deep Field" in 2004 and then the "eXtreme Deep Field" in 2012. But the new effort, called Hubble Frontier Fields, will be the first to try a similar technique on some new areas of the heavens. These photos won't go quite as deep as the Ultra Deep Field, but will represent some of the deepest images of the universe ever taken.

"As iconic as the Ultra Deep Field is, now we'll have six that are almost as nice," said Hubble scientist Dan Coe of the Space Telescope Science Institute in Baltimore, Md., which manages the telescope.

The Hubble Frontier Fields will collect light for about 45 hours each, spread over a period of three years, imaging objects that existed in the first 500 million years after the Big Bang.

Plus, in a new twist, astronomers will image each of the six blank patches of sky in combination with nearby galaxy clusters, whose gravity can act as a cosmic magnifying lens to zoom in on small, distant objects behind them.

SEE ALSO: Hubble Mosaic Pays Tribute to Van Gogh

Researchers will "observe six galaxy clusters and blank fields in parallel," Coe told SPACE.com. "While they're observing a cluster, the other camera is just far enough away where it's not really looking at the cluster anymore. It'll be essentially blank. To really go deep in both of these at the same time, that's never been done before."

The added magnification boost of the clusters' gravity should make these pictures the deepest glimpses of the universe yet. The shots could capture galaxies that are older and farther away than anything ever seen before.

"Some of them will be among the most distant galaxies yet found," said Coe, who led the study of one of the current contenders for farthest galaxy ever seen, MACS0647-JD, which lies about 13.3 billion light-years away.

The original Deep Field photo revealed about 3,000 previously unknown galaxies in a patch of sky only 2.5 arc-minutes across, or about one 24-millionth of the whole sky.

The new fields will determine whether that huge haul was a fluke, or if almost any patch of blank sky contains a similar wealth of treasures."You don't know, it might be a special part of the sky you're looking at," Coe said.

Hubble will begin observing the first of the new fields later this year.

The nearly 23-year-old telescope is still going strong after five upgrades from visiting space shuttle crews. NASA hopes to keep the observatory running until at least 2018, when its successor, the James Webb Space Telescope, is due to launch.

This article originally published at Discovery News here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Need a quick hit of presidential history to help get you in the mood for President Barack Obama's inauguration ceremony on Monday? Then you'll love this C-SPAN clip, which compresses the inaugurations of every president since Ronald Reagan into a 36-second supercut.

Obama's second official oath of office is actually happening at a private ceremony on Sunday, followed by a public ceremonial swearing-in Monday. Washington, D.C., officials and hotel owners aren't expecting the same number of visitors for Obama's 2009 inauguration, which drew an estimated 1 million-plus visitors. However, the D.C. metro system is still preparing to carry between 600,000 and 800,000 people to the event.

Looking for a place to watch the inauguration online? Mashable will have more details on that and other inauguration coverage in the days to come. Are you planning on attending the inauguration? Let us know in the comments below!
--------------------------------------------------------------
So much for reports that Instagram is suffering from an exodus of users.

Instagram revealed Thursday that it now has 90 million monthly active users. That's up 10% from the same period a month ago, according to a statement the company provided to AllThingsD.

"Instagram continues to see very strong growth around the world," Instagram co-founder Kevin Systrom told AllThingsD. "With many of the product and internationalization improvements we've made, we've been excited to see these efforts resonate with users globally."

This marks the first time that Instagram has ever released data on monthly active users. Facebook, which owns Instagram, revealed in September that the photo-sharing service had passed 100 million registered users.

Since then, though, Instagram has encountered its fair share of controversy  first by disabling support for Twitter cards and then by changing its terms of service.

Some data firms have reported that Instagram's user base had dipped recently as a result. AppData, a service that tracks apps connected to Facebook, said that Instagram's daily active user count had dipped by a quarter during the holidays, a fact that the firm speculated was due to the terms of service announcement. However, that report was widely panned and the new numbers from Instagram suggest that the number of users has continued to grow.

Aside from revealing the number of monthly active users, Instagram also announced that users now share 40 million photos each day and post 1,000 comments and 8,500 likes per second.
--------------------------------------------------------------
"My screen's bigger." "Mine's got more memory." "Mine has a faster processor." "Steve Jobs could balance the world on his nose." "Google is God." ... blah, blah, blah.

The iPhone versus Android debate is the modern evolution versus creation debate; Jacob versus Edward, Pepsi versus Coke, Christina versus Britney. It goes on and on, and on.

You know what?

You're all annoying. So stop it. That's it.

SEE ALSO: Watch These Epic iPhone 5 Vs. Android Music Videos

If they keep arguing about it, throw the phones down a subway grate and see which one survives  winner, winner, chicken dinner.

Thanks for putting an end to all the madness, DogHouseDiaries. The world appreciates it.
--------------------------------------------------------------
King.com is now number one when it comes to Facebook games. The company has overtaken Zynga for top honors on the social network, with three of its games making Facebook's top 10 in January.

In the #1 slot is Candy Crush Saga. A Bejeweled-style game that has players match three or more like pieces of candy together to remove them from the board.

King initially launched the game on Facebook in April of 2012, following that launch with a mobile version of the game in November. Still relatively new to Facebook, King's first Facebook game, Bubble Witch Saga, launched on the site just 18 months ago.

 

According to AppData Candy Crush Saga has more than 9.7 million daily players, beating out Zynga's FarmVille 2 with 8.8 million and Texas HoldEm Poker at 7.1 million.

On the mobile side, App Annie has the game listed as one of the top five grossing iPhone and iPad apps in 10 markets. King's CMO Alex Dale tells Mashable that mobile is what helped project the game to the top of the charts.

"People want to play a game on whatever device they want to whenever they want to," says Dale.

Candy Crush Saga is currently played more than 55 million times per day on Android and iOS devices.

Gameplay in Candy Crush Saga is synchronized across devices. So, if you make it to level 29 on your Galaxy S III on the train home from work, then you can start on level 30 when you crack open your laptop at home. Virtual goods purchases can also be used across all platforms, so if you make an in-app purchase on your iPad, that items will also be available when you're playing on Facebook.

With all its games, King launches titles first on its own website as a single-level timed arcade game. When a title is successful, it turns the title into a "Saga," adding more levels and bringing the game to Facebook, and later mobile.

The company's two other Facebook games, Bubble Witch Saga and Pet Rescue Saga, are also currently in the top 10 games on the social network.

What do you think about King taking the number one spot in Facebook gaming away from Zynga? Let us know your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Google CEO Larry Page had some harsh words for Facebook during a rare interview with Wired published on Thursday.

When asked about Google's motivations for competing with Facebook in the social networking space, Page didn't mince words. "They're a company that's strong in that space," he said. "But they're also doing a really bad job on their products."

Page didn't elaborate on the reasons he thinks the company is doing a bad job, or which products he was referring to in particular, but it is still one of the more direct criticisms Page has leveled against Facebook to date. (In the past, Page has also criticized Facebook for being closed with its data.) The latest remarks happen to come just a couple days after Facebook launched a smarter search engine called Graph Search, which some say could be an early step to competing more directly with Google.

That said, Page noted that Google doesn't need Facebook to fail as a company in order for it to succeed in social. "We're actually doing something different," Page said. "I think it's outrageous to say that there's only space for one company in these areas." The CEO also said that he's "very happy" with Google+ so far while poking Facebook a little in process: "A lot of it has been copied by our competitors, so I think we're doing a good job."

Aside from talking about Google Plus, Page talked about the need to keep the company ambitious with "moon shot" ideas and teased the possibility that Google could eventually have 1 million employees working for it. "Imagine what we could do if we had a hundred times as many employees," he said.

Page also appeared to scoff at Steve Jobs' desire to wage a so-called thermonuclear war against Android. "How well is that working?" he said.
--------------------------------------------------------------
If you thought no one would dish out $22,000 for LG's brand new 84-inch, 4K TV set, you were wrong. In fact, Chosun Ilbo claims LG has already sold 300 units in Korea.

Though it's not the most expensive TV out there, the price tag on LG's Ultra HD behemoth can buy you at least four regular (non-4K) TVs of similar size. It seems that neither the price, nor the lack of 4K content out there deterred these 300 early adopters in their quest for the perfect TV picture.

The TV boasts a 3,840 by 2,160 pixel resolution, LG's Cinema 3D technology, as well as "3D sound" through integrated 2.2 channel speakers.

Besides LG, other companies such as Samsung and Toshiba and Sony have announced 4K TV sets for 2013. Their offerings aren't much cheaper, though; for example, Samsung's 85-inch Ultra HD TV will set you back a whopping $37,872, while Sony's 84-inch XBR-84X900 costs $25,000.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Got a question for Howes? Use the chat feature above to get it answered live.

Lewis Howes, a former two sport All-American and current world record holding athlete, has graced lists such as Details' "5 Internet Gurus Who Can Make You Rich" and Incomediary.com's "50 Most Influential People in Blogging." Most recently, Howes was ranked as one of Genjuice's top "100 Most Desirable Mentors," along with the likes of Barack Obama, Russell Simmons and the queen of Jordan.

In just three years, Howes went from sleeping on his sister's couch to running a seven-figure business. He began his entrepreneurial career by hosting LinkedIn meetups around the country and co-authoring the successful book LinkedWorking. He has hosted over 400 webinars, spoken to thousands at conferences and events and educated career professionals and business owners around the world on the power of LinkedIn.

With over 100,000 in his weekly email reach, over 99,000 Twitter followers, more than 14,000 Facebook fans, 21,000 LinkedIn connections and over 660,000 views on YouTube, Howes is a familiar face in the social media for business landscape. He has also been featured on some of the top blogs and media outlets in the world, including Mashable, Social Media Examiner, Forbes, The Wall Street Journal, Entrepreneur, Business Week, TIME, CBS Radio, Fast Company, The Washington Post, Sports Illustrated and ESPN.

#StartupLab is a free virtual mentorship program created by The Young Entrepreneur Council (YEC), an invite-only organization comprised of hundreds of America's most successful young entrepreneurs. #StartupLab takes YEC's mission to help more people start successful businesses to the next level by offering millions of entrepreneurs direct access to YEC members through interactive video chats, email lessons and a library of how-to articles, videos and eBooks. Whether you're just starting up, a current business owner, or you run an organization that supports entrepreneurs, sign up for #StartupLab today for real-world advice from some of the coolest entrepreneurs on the planet.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The sports world and Internet in general were hit with a bombshell on Wednesday afternoon when it was revealed that the dead girlfriend of one of college football's biggest stars was in fact a social media hoax and never existed in the first place.

Manti Te'o, a star linebacker and Heisman Trophy candidate from Notre Dame reportedly began dating a young woman named Lennay Kekua early last year. She supposedly died of leukemia in September, but Te'o nevertheless played spectacularly and led Notre Dame to this year's BCS national title game. Along the way he sent Kekua tweets about how much he loved and missed her, and the story captivated the nation as it was reported on by outlets including Sports Illustrated, ESPN and CBS.

However, the sports blog Deadspin exposed the entire story as a myth on Wednesday. Not only had Kekua never died, she'd never been alive in the first place. The photos associated with her social media activity were, in fact, stolen from the account of a young California woman who was unaware of the hijacking.

Notre Dame and Te'o then released statements admitting that Kekua had never existed  but that Te'o was actually among the hoax's victimes, not its perpetrators. They had become aware of the truth in late December, they said.

But thanks to some Internet sleuthing by one Justin Megahan, it seems that others have actually been aware of Kekua's non-existence since well before then.

SEE ALSO: The Manti Te'o Lesson: We Are All Catfish

Messages from a pair of Twitter users called @jayRahz and @ceeweezy51 talk about the hoax as far back as early December. They both seem to indicate that Ronaiah Tuiasosopo, a former high school football player, is the person behind the hoax, which is what Deadspin said in its report.

They also say that Tuiasosopo was inspired by the movie Catfish, a 2010 documentary following a young man who starts a relationship with a possibly fictitious woman over Facebook  which seems to back up Te'o's claims to obliviousness.

And another from the same day:

In a conversation from Dec. 12, @jayRahz and @ceeweezy51 go back and forth in a discussion that touches on the scam:

For more you can check out Megahan's blog, but we may have the full story from Kekua her-or-him-self later today. In a cryptic series of tweets, @LennayKay, the handle that Te'o spent much of the fall tweeting with said on Thursday morning that it will "be releasing a statement, via twitter, between 11am and noon today."

And just in case you wanted one more element of weirdness  and more apparent evidence of Te'o's possible innocence  check out the tweet embedded below. The fake Kekua was allegedly a Stanford student, and on Wednesday night former Stanford football player Matthew Masifilo tweeted that Te'o would ask about his "mystery girl" after games between Stanford and Notre Dame.

Meanwhile, an NFL player claims he met Kekua in person back in 2011.

Anyway, the eyes of the world will soon turn once again to "Lennay Kekua" for answers, and the story may well get weirder still. Nothing, at this point, is out of the question.

Do you think Te'o was in on the hoax, or is he just a victim? Give us your take in the comments.

UPDATE: @LennayKay's much-anticipated statement turned out to be a cruel dig at Te'o's poor performance against Alabama in the BCS title game earlier in January:

But this just raises a new set of questions. While @LennayKay is an account Te'o tweeted at during much of the fall, it was later changed to @LoveMSMK and a quick look via Hootsuite shows that this particular page was set up Wednesday. So it likely means some other joker claimed the handle since it had been dormant for 30 days or more.

But at this point very little is out of the question.
--------------------------------------------------------------
There is no net. I tell Mashable reporters this all the time because the membrane between their reporting and the audience could be wafer-thin. What they report and write could be exactly what the audience reads. Not often, but sometimes, and if they misspell a word, misidentify a person or product or get any fact wrong, it's up to them to catch it before it's too late.

That's one lesson of the incredible Manti Te'o story.

Te'o is the college footballer, Heisman runner-up and possibly soon-to-be pro player whose remarkable story of tragedy and triumph captivated the sports world. His grandmother and girlfriend reportedly died within a 24-hour span and Te'o went on to lead his Notre Dame team to victory. As Deadspin expertly reported (you simply must read this story), Te'o's girlfriend's death was a hoax. In fact, she never even existed.

This brings us to the second lesson of this tale:

We are all, potentially, catfish.

Catfish is the 2010 documentary and now MTV series that looks at how average people's lives are turned upside-down when they fall for fake identifies online.

Te'o claims to be one of those people. He told Deadspin he was duped and found the experience "humiliating." Deadspin's reporting indicates, however, that Te'o may know the perpetrator of the hoax online accounts for the non-existent dead girl.

So we have two opposing forces here: The growing issue of online fakery and the media's inability to police the veracity of its own content. The tension is obvious. You have a world that lives its life online. We're images, avatars, handles, quips, memes, gifs, Instagrams and texts, but we're rarely two people standing face-to-face or even ear-to-phone-to-phone-to-ear. How many people do you "know" whom you've never met in person?

I assume these people are all real, because they have nothing to gain from me by being otherwise. Still the allure is obvious. Create a good profile, tell a good story, hook some gullible people or even co-conspirators, and then play it out until the end.

The end, as Catfish and the Te'o incident show, isn't always good.

In our day-to-day online activities, verifying that people are whom they say they are may not seem all that important. Unless, of course, it's your 14-year-old daughter talking to another 14-year-old girl she met online. Did you know 30% of teenage girls admit meeting in person someone they met online?

Does your stomach feel, like mine, a little sick now?

In reporting, the assumption is that you want the facts. It's the foundation of journalism. You want multiple sources for your story.

Of course, today's journalism is not the journalism of the 20th century. Speed is valued above almost everything else.

Even before the race to be first, the changing economics of digital journalism appeared to be preparing us for the coming fact holocaust.

When I was first in the magazine business in the late '80s and early '90s, we employed a team of fact-checkers  the last stop for every story before polish and publish. Fact checkers called sources and walked through quotes and pulled every nugget of information: dates, times, places, ages, locations, names, relationships, schools, and so on, to double check for accuracy. As a result, it was far more likely that a story would contain a typo than a factual error.

As the Internet rose, traditional media felt the ground shift under its feet and then gradually slip away. Circulations faltered and then plummeted. Ad revenues shrunk and soon most publications, including those I worked for, looked for cuts. Research and fact-checking were the first to go.

The loss of fact-checking hurt less than we thought, and most people still had enough time to work on stories and get the facts right (at PCMag, we published hundreds of pages every two weeks).

Fast forward to today, though, and you see most, if not all reporting happening online first. Some of it still takes months and, like the Deadspin story, is extremely well-reported; other pieces, which are reported and written sometimes in minutes, probably less so.

I can't see into the reporting process behind Sports Illustrated's and ESPN's initial Te'o stories. According to Slate, ESPN's Gene Wojciechowski, who also reported the Te'o story, never found a record of the "girlfriend" Lennay Kekua's obituary or car accident. Why didn't he verify any of it with Kekua's "family?" Te'o apparently told them they did not want to be contacted.

Perhaps Wojciechowski was, like others, swept up by the heartbreaking and yet uplifting story of a football player who conquered, even after the death of his grandmother and girlfriend. I would bet, though, that most of the stories on the subject did not go through an old-school fact check. To do so might have put one or more reporters' stories second or last.

We cannot go back to the old days of huge, expensive fact-checking departments, but clearly something needs to change. How can we trust a source when the very idea of identity is illusory?

It's not impossible for time-constrained reporters to get the story right, but doing so is a team effort. Linking to sources, primary, secondary (even tertiary) is one way of validating your information for the reader, but also an excellent bulwark against reporters picking up baseless or second-hand information without attribution. I often counsel reporters to follow the thread of links from various stories all the way back to the original source. Re-reported content is, by its very nature, interpreted content. If it's true, the facts are somewhere at the end of this trail.

In the case of Te'o, reports might have found that many of the links led nowhere, but to digital dead-ends. And while we're all checking links, we have to stop trusting social media accounts as reliable sources.

It's incredibly easy to create fake accounts on Twitter, Facebook, YouTube and Google+, as Catfish and Te'o show, and most of us already know. All these services have tried to combat this by requiring the use of "real names," verification and even shutting down accounts that are blatant impersonations. I commend those efforts, but they're largely ineffective.

Being someone other than yourself, a better, more perfect self or even someone completely different is obviously alluring to some people. The thrill of interaction with a person who likes that fake persona must, at least initially, feel like a validation.

Most of Catfish's stories, though, deal with one-on-one relationships. The Te'o case is different because someone, possibly Te'o or the person who created the fake girlfriend account, fooled a nation.

The Internet did not create "the hoax." Piltdown Man, alien autopsy, real fairies in England, all happened well before the age of the Internet and social media. But those two factors have acted like digital lubricant, making it that much easier for even the most average of people to perpetrate the most remarkable hoax. And now our own true protector, the news media, seems particularly unarmed.

Late last year, I predicted the end of anonymous trolls and the rise of reporting. At this moment I hope, maybe more than ever, that I am right, but I'm honestly not so sure.

What I am certain of is that there is no net  for reporters, editors and, most importantly, you.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Michelle Obama has a new Twitter account: @FLOTUS, which stands for "first lady of the United States."

@FLOTUS has 5,000 followers as of press time, but that's sure to rise quickly. @FLOTUS is managed by staff, but she will occasionally chime in with her own tweets signed "-mo." The account began tweeting Thursday, which also happens to be the first lady's birthday.

Obama's campaign account, @MichelleObama, has 2.6 million followers but has tweeted sparsely since the end of the election. @MichelleObama's last tweet, dated Jan. 15:

@FLOTUS is following @WhiteHouse, @VP and a handful of other government Twitter accounts. It does not follow @BarackObama, likely to keep in place a firewall which exists between government and campaign accounts.

Will you follow the first lady's new Twitter account? Share in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Michelle Obama started a new Twitter account Thursday  @FLOTUS  racking up 25,000 followers in a few hours' time.

But wait, you may be thinking. Didn't Michelle Obama already have a Twitter account?

You're right  Michelle Obama has been on Twitter as @MichelleObama since late 2011, gaining 2.6 million followers in that time.

Here's the skinny: @MichelleObama is a political campaign account run by staffers at Obama for America (OFA), Barack Obama's presidential campaign. @FLOTUS, on the other hand, is an official government account for the first lady of the United States.

@MichelleObama tweets are considered messages from Michelle, the presidential candidate's wife, not Michelle, the first lady of the United States. That's why the account has been largely quiet since Election Day: It has tweeted only six times since the end of the campaign, half of them retweets from the @BarackObama campaign account.

@FLOTUS tweets are to be treated as messages from Michelle as first lady  a role that has no constitutionally-mandated duties but is a de facto public celebrity who represents the White House in her public appearances and comments, including her tweets.

Putting the legal complications of official White House messages aside for a moment, different accounts for candidate's wife Michelle and first lady Michelle give Obama the option to choose from whichever platform is most appropriate for her message. It's the digital equivalent of style-shifting, the idea that a speaker changes his or her linguistic choices based in part on his or her role in relation to an audience.

There's a bit more to it, though: @FLOTUS tweets, as White House communiques, are also legally required to eventually be archived in a publicly-accessible fashion under the Presidential Records Act.

That law, passed in 1978 following the resignation of President Richard Nixon, is also why @FLOTUS and other official White House staff say that "tweets may be archived" in their Twitter bios (as a side note, citizens' social media interactions with official White House accounts are also preserved by the White House under the PRA).

SEE ALSO: Michelle Obama Has a New Twitter Account

The firewall between official government accounts and campaign accounts has been evident in the Obama administration's past Twitter activity: President Obama answered questions in a December Twitter town hall on the fiscal cliff not with his @BarackObama campaign handle, but with the @WhiteHouse account. With the campaign over, he was acting as President Obama, not candidate Obama, and thus had little use for @BarackObama.

Additionally, Vice President Joe Biden is in a Twitter situation similar to that of Michelle  his campaign account is @JoeBiden, his official Office of the Vice President of the United States account is @VP.

The official account vs. campaign account firewall is also probably why @FLOTUS isn't following @BarackObama, a campaign account that has recently been tweeting about gun control as OFA shifts from support-the-candidate to support-the-president-in-office mode as it did in 2009.

Have you followed @FLOTUS yet? Will you? Share in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Your feet take a lot of stress. By the time you reach the age of 50, most people have walked 75,000 miles  perhaps many more if you're a runner. Having the right running shoes is important for the health of your feet and knees.

It's usually recommended that running shoes are replaced every 400 miles. But if you don't feel like keeping track of hundreds of mile ran, you might be interested in the MilestonePod.

The tracking device attaches to your shoes and warns you before they wear down that you'll need another pair.

The company is currently seeking funds on crowdfunding platform Indiegogo. To make the MilestonePod a reality, they'll need about $42,000 in the next two weeks to reach their $60,000 goal.

The company explains on its Indiegogo page why keeping track of how much wear your shoes have is important: "The new MilestonePod (patent pending) allows you to passively track the mileage logged on your running shoes so they can be replaced at the correct time, not too soon (wasting valuable tread) and not too late (potentially causing injury).

"Although your shoes may continue to look new, the constant pounding from running causes the materials to wear down and stop providing support and protection. This reduction in shock absorption often leads to injury."

You can get two MilestonePods if you donate at least $30 to the company's campaign on Indiegogo. Would you buy one? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The new Myspace is pretty. It incorporates many of the trends in modern web design and social media  big visuals, responsive design, easy discovery  and gives them a clear focus: connecting through music. And it really works.

You may remember the old capital-S MySpace ("MySpace Classic," in the new site's parlance). The old site was the one-time social media king, boasting more than 100 million users at its peak. However, it also had a Wild West reputation with a lot of NSFW content, chaotic user profiles (filled with tacky design and annoying auto-playing songs), and tons of spam accounts. When Facebook offered a cleaner, more manageable alternative, MySpace users abandoned the service in droves.

Now Myspace is back, and it's no exaggeration to say it's better than ever. The service opened in limited form last fall, and now it's available to anyone who wants to join. From the first minute you spend on the site, it's clear that the new Myspace has learned a lot from successful social networks, especially those that emphasize visual media, such as Pinterest.

Case in point: Like most social sites today, Myspace calls for both a profile picture and a cover photo. The cover pic, however, has a minimum size of 1,024 x 768  probably the most high-res requirement for a cover photo that exists. The pic takes up the entire browser window, so the strict rule is definitely a good thing, preserving the experience for yourself and everyone. It also subtly discourages you from sticking an easily downloaded (and probably copyright-violating) pic in there.

The cover photos are just the tip of a visual-design iceberg, though, extending to photos in your feed, artist pages and the discovery process. It's extremely user-friendly, with actions typically only taking one or two clicks. When you try to do something, it usually does exactly what you expected, sometimes better.

As I got my feet wet in the new Myspace, it struck me how much the site reminds me of Windows 8. The horizontal scroll is the most obvious parallel, but to goes further: Wherever you are in the site, you can just start typing to search for something  exactly how the start screen in Windows 8 works. It's a superbly convenient feature that I wish more sites and services would incorporate.

SEE ALSO: New Myspace: 8 Essential Tips and Tricks

Myspace also mirrors Windows 8's People hub a little, putting all the updates from the friends and artists you connect with in one big horizontal stream. There's clearly no curating algorithm yet, merely dumping all the latest stuff from your contacts into an everscroll, but the break from Facebook's "edited highlights" approach to the news feed feels refreshing and honest... at least for now.

Finally, the service also features the dubious inclusion of a news feed (labeled "Trending"), with what appear to be original articles from Myspace staff. This is one of the new site's weakest elements. The pieces themselves are a grab bag of roundups about entertainment topics with a few longer profiles on some artists, but it's all fairly random. I believe the site would be better served by a curated news aggregator, pulling in articles from a variety of show-biz sites based on your preferences and connections. Perhaps that is to come.

The site is clearly intended to be first and foremost a music service, mixing a Spotify-like player (and radio) with elements of Facebook and Pinterest. The result is one of the best services for music discovery I've seen. Eventually Myspace intends to expand the service into all entertainment  it made a big announcement with Panasonic a year ago about TV integration  but with Justin Timberlake backing the site, music was a logical first move.

Myspace has a top-notch music player, which interacts with the site content extremely well. It constantly resides at the bottom of the screen, and whatever media you select enters the queue and starts playing as soon as you click on it. If you're in the middle of listening to a playlist (or "Mix"), the song or video just slips into the queue without disturbing the rest of it.

The player handles videos excellently. When you begin playing a video, it'll automatically take up the whole browser window, but if you move your mouse, the site navigation immediately appears. Click on something else and the video is instantly reduced a smaller window in the lower corner, playback undisturbed. You can even close that window and still listen the song, again with no interruption. Perfect.

Music discovery works well, too  in fact, it's the primary reason to use Myspace instead of, say, Spotify or Grooveshark. First there's the big Discover button that encourages clicking, and when you do you're rewarded with compelling imagery and a few simple, clear options such as Music, Mixes and People. Browse just a little and you're sure to find something you're looking for, whether it's hip-hop Mixes or reggae DJs in your city.

Use the new Myspace for a little while, and you'll quickly find yourself engaging with music more than you would on other sites. Whereas services like Pandora and Spotify are often more about passively listening, Myspace is all about users actively seeking out fans and artists with the same passions. It's what I believe Apple had initially wanted Ping to be, but done right.

If the new Myspace has a problem, it's a learning curve that's steeper than it needs to be. When you log on for the first time, the site encourages you to make connections with other users, but it's not immediately clear how to do that. The site needs some more signposts and walk-throughs on getting started beyond the option to "take a tour," which actually isn't that helpful.

Iconography is at times perplexing. The "connection" rings, which symbolize your relationship with songs, artists and other users  everything on the site, really  feel a little weird. (For what they mean, here's a guide.) It's a needlessly more complicated version of Twitter's Following/Follows You nomenclature. Although it's not that hard to understand, the fact that it needs a tutorial makes the site feel more insidery  not good for site that revolves around music.

And then there are the artist pages. Some have an active presence on the site, and Myspace apparently has a "verified" system, represented by a blue check mark underneath the person's profile pic, although again the site would be helped by more clear labeling. However, shortly after I joined Myspace, a profile that claims to be Paris Hilton connected with me. It's most likely a fake account  the scourge of Classic MySpace  and I hope the new site polices these diligently.

SEE ALSO: Spotify Wants to Make Music Discovery Truly Social

The flip side of the fake-account issue is the service's inherent democratization of artist access. Similar to Twitter (but with more depth) or Facebook (but with more focus), Myspace allows artists to interact with fans directly, showcase their best work and perhaps even learn a thing or two from them. By its nature, Myspace encourages more engagement between parties beyond just "Likes," and I'm excited to see what emerges from the new relationship  assuming the site takes off.

From the user experience alone, it's hard not to declare the new Myspace a success. However, the challenges it now faces are of marketing and overcoming its own past. Many still think of the site as the abandoned amusement park of social networks, and it's going to need a lot of positive word-of-mouth to reach a critical mass of interest to truly become a force again. In that way, the new Myspace reminds me again of Windows 8: All the tools for success are now in place, and now it just needs to overcome prejudice and convince the audience to respond.

How do you like the new Myspace? Share your thoughts in the comments.

Correction: Unlike the old MySpace, the new Myspace is spelled with a lower-case "s". We've corrected the piece to reflect the new spelling.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Part one of Oprah Winfrey's exclusive interview with disgraced cyclist Lance Armstrong aired online and on Oprah's cable channel OWN Thursday night  and Armstrong's performance appeared to win over few critics on Twitter or Facebook.

After years of denials to authorities and the public, Armstrong admitted to using performance-enhancing drugs and blood doping prior to his 2008 comeback from retirement. However, he denied that he did so in 2009 and 2010. He also denied that he had applied any pressure to his Tour de France teammates to join him in doping, and said that he had felt that he was not cheating because he "looked the word up in the dictionary."

Looking uncomfortable, shifting in his seat repeatedly and laughing nervously, Armstrong appeared to be having a hard time explaining the details. His apology to Emma O'Reilly, his former masseuse and a whistleblower whom Armstrong sued and admitted to calling a variety of epithets, was particularly tortured. (The cyclist chose to focus on denying that he had called O'Reilly "fat.")

Armstrong admitted that he was a "jerk" and a "prick" at various points in the interview, and that saying sorry was not his forte. "All of this is a process for me," the cyclist said. "I'll spend the rest of my life trying to earn back trust and apologize."

On Twitter, the interview-related hashtags #OWNTV and #Doprah were trending topics, as was O'Reilly's name. Users appeared incredulous at Armstrong's answers:

And at least one fellow celebrity was distinctly unimpressed:

There was better news for Armstrong on his Facebook page. Though his post announcing the interview was filled with many vitriolic comments, it also received messages of support  and some fans pointing out that doping is a more widespread problem.

Want a taste of the interview? In this clip, Armstrong details the drugs he had taken, contrary to previous denials:

Did you watch the Armstrong interview? Let us know your reaction in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A woman in New York came just feet from getting hit by a train on the city's subway tracks. A photo of the incident shot by a straphanger on the platform, and then captured by Humans of New York, has begun making its way across Facebook and Tumblr.

The caption of the photograph describes what happened:

"I was on the G-Train heading north through Brooklyn when the train abruptly stopped before the Hoyt-Schermerhorn station. The conductor shut down the power of the train, and held us there for about 20 minutes. When we finally pulled into the station, a breathless woman entered my car. 'A woman had a seizure and fell on the tracks!' she said, excitedly. 'And a train was coming into the station! Luckily the driver noticed and slammed on the brakes.' She pulled out her phone to show just how close the train had come to hitting the woman. Supposedly, after the last few incidents, the MTA has been urging its drivers to be hyperaware when entering stations. Looks like a life was saved today by one driver who took the warning to heart."

Brandon Stanton, the photographer behind Humans of New York, told Mashable in an email that the striking photograph is "completely authentic."

Image used with permission, Humans of New York
--------------------------------------------------------------
Playboy is being slammed for failing to keep children away from hardcore porn on two of its websites.

Ofcom, the UK's communications regulator and competition authority, fined the company 100,000 (about $160,200) for not having "acceptable controls" in place on Playboy TV and Demand Adult to ensure viewers are over 18 years old. Ofcom called Playboy's negligence "serious, repeated and reckless."

"There are a number of controls that websites can use to verify the age of users," said a statement from Ofcom. "This includes asking for credit card details before any adult content is made accessible. Credit cards, unlike debit cards, are not available to under 18s. Playboy TV and Demand Adult had breached UK rules by having no effective systems in place to protect under 18s from unsuitable free and paid-for content."

Demand Adult, one of the two sites, has a button saying "Enter I am over 18," after which, hardcore porn is displayed. To view additional content, users can enter a debit card number. Neither the self verification nor the debit card are valid forms of age identification, Ofcom says, explaining its fine of 65,000 for Demand Adult.

SEE ALSO: Startup Thinks Real Sex Can Sell

Playboy TV also uses self verification to access its site, though no hardcore porn is displayed until debit card information is entered. Ofcom is fining Playboy TV 35,000.

Do you agree with Ofcom that the age verification systems in place are not effective enough? Let us know in the comments.

UPDATE: Playboy sent Mashable the following statement Friday morning:

"The business subject to fine was part of the Manwin sale transaction completed in late 2011. Accordingly, Playboy cannot speak to the application of the regulations to the websites at issue."
--------------------------------------------------------------
When Windows 8 launched last year, Pokki came out with an app that brought the familiar Start menu back to the operating system.

Now that Windows 8 has been out for a while, Pokki is updating the Pokki Start menu for Windows 8, updating the user interface and adding a number of customization features for users to make it their own.

Pokkis original app brought the traditional Start menu back to Windows 8, with an added twist.

We didnt just bring back the old one,  Chester Ng, co-founder and CMO of SweetLabs, told Mashable during a demo of the original app. We agree with Microsoft that that one is outdated, and has a bunch of things that people dont use. So we decided to take a familiar, yet modernized, take on what the start menu should be today.

Pokkis Windows 8 app includes not only a Start button, but also a smartphone-like home screen where users can organize Pokki apps as well as websites, files, folders, and other Windows applications that are important to them. Just like on your smartphone, applications can be arranged however you like.

Wednesdays update offers easier access to settings and customizations in Windows 8, improved Search, and moves the notifications panel to a drop-down box, allowing for reduced Start menu width and easy access to app alerts.

Pokki for Windows 8 is available now from the companys website.
--------------------------------------------------------------
We can't all be supermodels  you gotta work with what the universe gave you. Nevertheless, it's a great feeling when the most beautiful people you know take some of the most horrendous pictures you've ever seen.

SEE ALSO: The 100 Most Beautiful Songs in the World, According to Reddit

Subreddit r/PrettyGirlsUglyFaces juxtaposes photographs of beautiful young women with their  er  less than photogenic moments.

Ironically, most of the submissions seem to come from the ladies themselves, which begs the question: Are you vain because you think you're "pretty," or are you humble because you (sometimes) look like a thumb?
--------------------------------------------------------------
It's AFC Championship time, and as the Baltimore Ravens prepare to battle the New England Patriots, fans get creative to prove hometown loyalty. A few musically-inclined fans have decided that the immortal tune of Carly Rae Jepsen's "Call Me Maybe" will be the song that leads them into the fight.

SEE ALSO: Watch 11 Sports Teams Rock Out to 'Call Me Maybe' [VIDEOS]

Run and hide Tom Brady, for fear the catchiest song on Earth will get wedged in your beautiful head pre-kickoff.

Now that Maryland has put up its best in this pre-game beats battle of sorts, it's your play, New England.

However, if viral video history is any guide, Baltimore might want to temper their expectations. During last year's AFC divisional playoffs, Denver rolled into Gillette Stadium with plenty of enthusiasm and the auto-tuned Tebow masterpiece "All He Does is Win." New England proceeded to crush the Broncos 45 to 10.

Who are you rooting for in the game? Share in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The mysterious global cyber espionage operation known as "Red October" appears to be ending. After being revealed by online security giant Kaspersky Labs on Monday, the operation is being dismantled, according to researchers.

"Red October is disappearing quickly," wrote Claudio Guarnieri, a security researcher at Rapid7. "I think the infrastructure has been almost completely dismantled, or at least moved elsewhere."

"On the night between [January] 14 and 15 the Red October infrastructure started to disappear," Costin Raiu, a Kaspersky Labs senior security researcher confirmed to Mashable. "Domains are actively being shutdown," Kurt Baumgartner, another Kaspersky researcher, wrote in an email.

"Services are actively coming down that were responding yesterday. Servers that we previously saw as active are coming down and denying connections."

The Red October operation, explained Raiu, used multiple layers of domains, proxies and "superproxies" to route traffic around and diguise the origin of the attacks. "It's like an onion with multiple skins," he said. At the core of the onion there's what the researchers refer to as the mothership, which is "some super big powerful server database which collects all that stolen information."

Since Kaspersky revealed the existence of Red October, that outer layer seems to be crumbling. "The mothership appears to be active but perhaps the outer layer, the outer skin, is severely crippled."

Raiu noted that this could be the result of companies taking efforts to shut down the operation, as well as the criminals themselves adjusting to being exposed. "It's a combination of registrars killing the domains, hosting companies killing the servers and the attackers shutting down some parts of the operation," he said.

This doesn't mean that Red October has been completely shut down or that the attackers have been defeated. "I think the operation will go dormant for a while. I know from previous cases that when some modules were discovered, the cybercriminals go underground, they go dormant for a few months and then they come back using different servers, different domains, different samples," Raiu said.

Kaspersky revealed on Monday that the global spying operation has been going on for at least 5 years, targeting multiple government networks, embassies, research institutions and other agencies across the world. The malware used for the attacks was designed to steal documents, passwords, emails, record keystrokes, take screenshots and perform an array of other tasks.

Whether the operation is being dismantled, slowed down or is still alive and well, the damage is probably already done. The attackers behind Red October might have already stolen thousands of documents, including sensitive encrypted files. Kaspersky researchers noted that the attackers went after some files encrypted with Acid Cryptofiller, an encryption software used by the European Union and NATO. The German magazine Der Spiegel found out that certain targeted files were encrypted with the German software called Chiasmus.

These files likely contain very important information, notes Raiu.

Can their encryption be cracked? Normally, just losing encrypted files like these wouldn't be a reason for concern, since you still need a key to open them and they are very hard to crack with brute-force attacks. But since Red October malware was designed to record keystrokes, it's possible that the hackers recorded the passwords needed to decrypt the files. If the victims were using public key infrastructure, explains Raiu, all the hackers need is a decryption key usually stored on the user's computer. Red October was designed to look for those kinds of files too.

"We can probably assume that the attackers have now collected the required encryption keys and passwords which allow them to decrypt the documents encrypted by these schemes," Raiu said.

SEE ALSO: Cybersecurity Guru Calls for More Online Regulation

According to Raiu, these new developments in the Red October saga don't help shed a light on who could be behind one of the most complex cyber espionage efforts ever uncovered. Contrary to the independent researchers previously contacted by Mashable, Raiu isn't too confident that this is a state-sponsored attack.

"There's no clear actor behind this attack," he said, adding that it's more likely to have originated in a Russian-speaking country than in China. He doesn't think it fits the pattern of other Chinese malware.

"After you look at thousands of different malware bodies and thousands of viruses you start seeing patterns and certain techniques which are common to certain types of threat actors," Raiu explained. "It's like, if you look at paintings [...] you are capable of saying that 'yeah this is most likely is a painting which belongs to Picasso or Dali, or it's from the impressionist period or from the cubist.' "

Obviously all these patterns and techniques can be copied to lead investigators down the wrong path, following false flags intentionally used to throw them off. In other words, we might never know who is behind this.
--------------------------------------------------------------
There may be some light at the end of the tunnel for Research In Motion after all. The BlackBerry maker, whose market share and revenues have been in free fall, still has hope in overseas markets, where smartphones still have a lot of room to grow.

A new study from Nielsen shows smartphone penetration in the relatively large markets of Brazil, Russia and India is still well below 50%. In the U.S., smartphone users became the majority among mobile customers in March 2012, and in November comScore reported that more than half of the population (whether they were mobile customers or not) owned a smartphone.

That's good news for RIM, who in recent years has enjoyed much more success with its BlackBerry phones abroad than in North America. Even as its market share among smartphones shrank, the company would often cite growth overseas and in emerging markets, buoyed by its phones' relatively cheap data plans and popular BlackBerry Messenger network.

At the end of the month, RIM will finally have its big coming-out party for BlackBerry 10, the mobile platform it hopes will breathe new life into the company. If RIM can keep prices down for both the phones and data plans  especially in those large markets cited in the Nielsen study  it may still be able to cultivate many new customers.

SEE ALSO: Major U.S. Cellphone Carriers to Support BlackBerry 10, Report Says

The market with the most potential is India, the second-most populous country on Earth with 1.2 billion people, where a massive 80% of mobile customers are still using feature phones. Although RIM has had problems dealing with the Indian government over access to enterprise-encrypted email (which infamously led to one of its former CEOs storming out of a BBC interview), Indian wireless providers are reportedly gearing up for BlackBerry 10.

Overseas markets could be where RIM's battle for survival is won or lost. Apple's iOS and Android have been eating up its market share for years, but RIM still sells a significant number of phones in many countries (a study from August 2012 showed BlackBerrys accounted for almost 10% of sales in the U.K., to 1.5% in the U.S.).

However, those numbers are in rapid decline as well. Will BlackBerry 10 be enough to reverse the company's slide? It may be too late to win back the U.S., but places like Brazil  where only about a third of the population owns a smartphone  RIM may find a more level playing field.

RIM's stock price has been climbing steadily over the past few months, despite its poor earnings report that saw the company's first net loss of subscribers ever.

Are you optimistic about RIM's future? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LinkedIn will pull the plug on LinkedIn Answers, its Quora-like Q&A service, on Jan. 31.

The company sent an email to LinkedIn users on Thursday explaining the move. A LinkedIn rep sent the following statement:

"As of Jan. 31, LinkedIn Answers will be retired from LinkedIn. We will be focusing our efforts on the development of new and more engaging ways to share and discuss professional topics across LinkedIn. In the meantime, members can still pose questions and facilitate professional discussions through other popular LinkedIn channels including LinkedIn Polls, Groups, or status update."

The apparent reason for the move: It was driving fairly limited engagement.

The company introduced LinkedIn Answers in 2007. The product let you post a question to your network (including second-level connections) and let other LinkedIn users provide answers. Questioners could rank the best answers and the person who provided the best answers would carry more weight for future Answers.

Amy Vernon, gm for SocialMarketing for Internet Media Labs, wrote in a blog entry that she's going to miss the product: "Maybe not everyone who uses LinkedIn uses the section. The people who do use it, however, find great value, and there are many. When I answered a question there after I was laid off from my newspaper job a few years ago, that led to one of my first consulting gigs, which in turn led me to the path I walk now. So, sure, part of it is likely sentimental. I can be like that sometimes."

The move comes after Facebook announced last October that it was shutting down its Questions product. Like LinkedIn Answers, Facebook Questions never managed to replace Quora, which had around 1.5 million monthly visitors as of last July.
--------------------------------------------------------------
If you contribute your genome sequence anonymously to a scientific study, that data might still be linked back to you, according to a study published today in the journal Science. The researchers behind the study found they could deanonymize genomic data using only publicly available Internet information and some clever detective work.

The study points to rising issues concerning genetic privacy and the need for better legal protection against genetic discrimination, experts say, since such a technique could reveal a person's propensity to a particular disease. The work also shows that study participants need to be better educated about the risks of joining genetic research efforts.

Open-access data sets of human genomic information are an important resource for researchers trying to uncover the genetic basis of human disease. The 1000 Genomes Project, for example, is a publicly available catalog of variation in humans that researchers can use to identify mutations that cause disease risk in certain populations.

Researchers use this kind of open database much more often than controlled access sources, the National Institutes of Health said in a response to today's findings.

"Our last intention is to push these resources behind some firewall, says Yaniv Erlich, a geneticist at the Whitehead Institute for Biomedical Research and senior author on the study. "We are in favor of public data sharing, but we need to think about how it could be misused and describe that correctly to people."

While the Genetic Information Nondiscrimination Act of 2008 offers people some protection against employers or health insurers discriminating against them based on their genetics, life insurers and disability insurers are not prevented from using such information in their decisions.

"We have no comprehensive genetic privacy law," says Jeremy Gruber, a lawyer and president of the Council for Responsible Genetics. "People need to be much better informed of the lack of privacy protections we have for genetic information," says Gruber.

In the long run, says Erlich, it is better for these potential breaches to be demonstrated by a friendly investigator rather than someone who really wants to exploit the data. "That would really undermine the public trust," he says.

This isn't the first time privacy risks have been highlighted for public genome databases. Different groups have shown that with a second DNA sample, an individual's genetic information could be pulled out of what was thought to be anonymous "pooled" genomic data or gene activity databases. But Erlich's team used only knowledge of genetic markers and Internet detective work to identify nearly 50 people in public genomic data sets.

Erlich, a former computer security researcher, was once hired by banks and other businesses to test their computer systems. For the DNA sleuthing, Erlich and his team used free genealogical databases that link surnames with genetic markers, called short tandem repeats, on the Y chromosome. There is no known biological function for these repeats, but the length and number are commonly used in ancestry research because, like surnames, those patterns are typically passed from father to son.

Once the team found a link between the Y chromosome repeats in the genomic databases and potential surnames, they used other pieces of demographic information, such as date and place of birth, which are included in some of the genomic databases, and public records to identify donors.

Eric Green, director of the National Human Genome Research Institute, and other employees of the NIH acknowledge that Erlich's study highlights vulnerabilities in these research projects. To mitigate future risks, they write in the response published in Science, the NIH has decided to "shift age information, which had been available for some of the participants on the repository's public web site, into controlled-access portions of the resource."

In addition to recruiting people who think the societal and medical research benefits of participating in genomic research outweigh the risks, better legal protection is key, says George Church, a geneticist at Harvard Medical School and founder of the Personal Genome Project, an open-access database of genomic and health data.

While there may be ways to make the data more secure, "for every lock there is going to be a countermeasure, and I think that's a game that's just not worth playing," says Church. "Much better is coming up with a protocol where you don't need any locks," he says, which would include better legal protection and education for study participants.

Today's findings emphasize the need for public representation in the oversight of data collection, says Wylie Burke, a clinical geneticist at the University of Washington in Seattle.

"Information should be readily available to the public concerning the oversight procedures in place, the research purposes for which data are being used, the outcomes of data uses, and, of course, how any misuses of data have been handled," she says. "Without this kind of approach, we could see increasing mistrust of the research process."

This article originally published at MIT Technology Review here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Magazine publisher Wenner Media dismissed the idea of tablet publishing two years ago. On Thursday, the group finally launched an iPad app for music magazine Rolling Stone.

The magazine costs $19.99 on an annual basis or $1.99 on a monthly recurring basis. A single copy of one magazine is available for $4.99, although those wishing to simply try out the magazine can do so with a one-month free trial.

Although Rolling Stone has been available digitally on Zinio, Kindle and Nook in the past, the iPad launch is significant for a few of reasons. The release marks the first time a native version of Rolling Stone has been available on Newsstand. It also indicates that publisher Wenner Media has mellowed in its approach to the iPad.

In an interview with AdAge less than two years ago, Rolling Stone founder Jann Wenner slammed magazine publishers for their "premature" embrace of the iPad, something he said was driven by "sheer insanity, insecurity and fear."

As with the print magazine, the Rolling Stone iPad edition promises breaking music news, album and movie reviews and more. One additional feature is iTunes integration, so readers can link directly to songs or albums mentioned in articles.

The bad news is that, unlike some other magazine publishers, Wenner Media does not offer a discount or bonus features to existing print subscribers. They, like everybody else, will be forced to subscribe to the digital edition.

This article originally published at TabTimes here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Olympic swimmer Ryan Lochte has become many things: medalist, sunglasses designer, artist, activist and strong advocate for peeing in the pool.

How well do you know Lochte? The swimmer hosted a Twitter Q&A Thursday afternoon, using the hashtag #AskLochte, and things got a little out of control.

Ok, actually the interview session was fairly quick and normal. But we've re-imagined the questions to give this Internet pool party a little pizzaz. Do you want to play a game of Lochte Jeopardy? Jeah, you do.

If you really want to know the answers, simply highlight the space under each of Lochte's tweeted answers.

Contestants, take your marks. Go!
--------------------------------------------------------------
Waking up to the insistent beep of an alarm clock can quickly lead to the throbbing pain of a headache. One gadget aims to make mornings easier by simulating sunrise for a more natural wake-up call.

The Rise and Shine Serenity Sleep System replicates the rising sun so users can wake calmly, rather than being jolted awake by alarms, according to creator Verilux. It also works the other way around, gradually dimming light to help users fall asleep naturally.

"[Rise and Shine] aligns the body's circadian rhythms that regulate normal sleeping and waking patterns," the company said on its website.

The gadget also includes a color-changing light that acts to calm users, Verilux added. Check out the video, above, for more.

Would you use this sleep gadget? What do you use to wake up in the morning? Tell us in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Your smartphone may be great for getting the latest movie listings and even providing directions to get you to the theater, but how well can it help you detect skin cancer? Not so well, according to researchers at the University of Pittsburgh.

Their study, published in JAMA Dermatology, found that "the performance of smartphone applications in assessing melanoma risk is highly variable, and three of four smartphone applications incorrectly classified 30% or more of melanomas as unconcerning."

The researchers say relying on the app instead of having a medical consultation often delays the diagnosis and can potentially harm users. They looked at four smartphone apps that evaluate melanoma, a potentially life-threatening form of skin cancer.

The apps work by having the user take a picture of a suspicious mole. Some of the apps were free, others charged a small fee, and the ones that actually send the image to a physician to evaluate cost $5.

Dr. Laura Ferris, a dermatologist and co-author of the study, along with her colleagues, evaluated photos of close to 200 moles to test four different skin cancer apps. Three of them provided instant diagnosis via algorithm, while one sent the mole image to a board-certified dermatologist for review. Those results often took up to 24 hours to get back.

Ferris reports the highest-performing of the instant apps missed 30% of the melanoma cases, while the worst-performing missed 93%. The app that used actual physicians to diagnose the melanomas worked well, correctly identifying more than 98% of the submitted images. The researchers didn't name the apps they tested in the study.

Ferris writes she's concerned a misdiagnosis can cause harm to patients, especially those who might not have medical insurance. "This potential is of particular concern in times of economic hardship, when uninsured and even insured patients, deterred by the cost of copayments for medical visits, may turn to these applications as alternatives to physician evaluation."

The idea of an app to evaluate a mole may be appealing to many users. Often times getting an appointment with a dermatologist can take days, if not weeks, and not everyone knows what to look for. With apps that help us measure our heart rate and glucose level and track daily caloric intake, one would think an app to evaluate the symmetry of a mole would be advantageous.

But Ferris says, in this instance, nothing really replaces the eyes of a trained doctor. "Reliance on these applications, which are not subject to regulatory oversight, in lieu of medical consultation can delay the diagnosis of melanoma and harm users."

However, since the app that used board-certified doctors to examine the moles correctly diagnosed the melanoma 98% of the time, perhaps virtual medical kiosks like the HealthSpot, and other telehealth options, will make skin cancer detection easier in the future. For now, it seems, for detecting skin cancer there's not an app for that.
--------------------------------------------------------------
If Pinky and the Brain taught us one thing, it's that taking over the world is difficult. But then again, social media makes it look pretty easy.

Over the past decade social media usage has been one of the most rapidly and universally adopted activities since the invention of breathing. More than half of the world's 2.4 billion Internet users sign in to a social network regularly  a figure that is rapidly increasing.

SEE ALSO: Biggest Social Media Moments of 2012

Even without China, the world's largest Internet population, Facebook boasts more than 1 billion active users. From Facebook on down the line, the figures for social media adoption are impressive.

Check out the following infographic, made by Social Jumpstart and hasai, for more information about global social media usage.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A long time ago  well, last Friday  the White House struck down a petition for a real Death Star on its We the People site. In one swift stroke, the Obama administration Force-choked any politically active nerd's greatest dream: seeing that technological terror floating beside our lame, forest-free moon.

OK, so maybe building a Death Star was always going to be impossible, even for a computer. Still, Star Wars is a treasure trove of tech richer than the salt mines of Kessel. All those ideas are just waiting to be exploited and transformed into reality.

Some Star Wars tech has already made its way from a galaxy far away to this one: modern toys can simulate the Force itself.

But what futuristic space stuff could the government do well to investigate further? Here are 10 technologies that deserve petitions of their own, for the betterment of mankind. The time is now, White House. Do or do not. There is no try.

Is there any sci-fi tech you're dying to see in the real world? Let us know in the comments below, you should.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The 10-day Sundance Film Festival will premiere jOBS, the much-anticipated independent film about former Apple CEO Steve Jobs, on closing night next week.

We'll have attendees' tweeted reviews of the flick when it debuts, but for those of you who aren't attending the festival (like us), here are ways you can get your Sundance fix online:

The Screening Room channel on YouTube has posted 12 films from its Short Film program of 65 films. Among them is Broken Night, a horror flick about a mother and daughter's road trip and subsequent accident that propels them into "the nightmare of darkness."

Sundance will air live sessions on Livestream from Jan. 18 to Jan. 21. One session, for example, on Friday at 8 p.m. EST, will feature such talent as Joseph Gordon-Levitt, Scarlett Johansson, Julianne Moore, Tony Danza and Glenne Headly.

Separately, you can watch other Sundance artists via the Meet the Artists interview series.

The Sundance app for Android and iOS gives you film trailers, descriptions and photos. It also uses GoWatchIt to notify you when films will be released.

Musician Dave Grohl is among the slew of actors, filmmakers and alumni who will provide guest commentary using the @SundanceFest account. Grohl, who will make his directorial debut with Sound City at Sundance this year, will tweet on Jan. 22.

Other celebrities will tweet each day, including actresses Mariel Hemingway (Jan. 20) and Kate Bosworth (Jan. 23). Festival directors also plan to tweet about Joseph Gordon-Levitt's backstage antics on Jan. 26. Gordon-Levitt is the festival's awards ceremony host.

Sundance will share more goodies on Pinterest, Facebook, Instagram, Twitter and Google+.

Sundance has scheduled seven Google+ Hangouts in which artists and special guests will spill their expert knowledge. Anyone can watch the Hangouts or submit a question via the Google chat module or Twitter with hashtag #SundanceHangouts.

Titles for the Hangouts, which start at 1 p.m. PST each day from Jan. 18 to Jan. 25, are: The New Frontier of Storytelling  Transmedia Disruptors; Kickstarter School (Experts Analyze $100 Million Bucks of Film Funding); Direct-To-Fan Distribution Church; Painting with Light  Cinematographers Smackdown; Fade In: The Art and Craft of Great Screenwriting; Get Funky: Film and Musicians Mixer; Film Festival Secrets from Sundance and AFI; and Surprise Hangout and Preview of the Sundance Film Festival Awards.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Is laziness even a thing in the animal kingdom? We're guessing not so much.

SEE ALSO: Introducing the Smartest Cat Alive
--------------------------------------------------------------
While many may say, "if it ain't broke, don't fix it," this is not true for Temple Run 2. The original was a smash hit, downloaded more than 170 million times across iOS and Android devices, but there remained a lot to be improved upon in the game.

Temple Run 2 [iTunes link] represents those improvements, proving that the development team of Imangi Studios took a lot of time to add more depth into this mega-addictive endless runner.

First off, the game is far more beautiful than its predecessor. Imangi cofounder Keith Shepherd said they added two members to the team specifically to make Temple Run 2 as beautiful as possible. The effort paid off: The game takes place in as lush of a game world as you can get on an iPhone, and it definitely takes advantage of Retina displays. The cloud-swathed, floating temple is surrounded by the pink sky of the "golden hour" that occurs before sunset.

The environments are also more varied, along with the obstacles. As soon as you start mastering the early terrain, Temple Run 2 switches it up on you, driving you deeper into dense woods full of ill-placed spike traps. Further down still is a perilous mine shaft, and you'll have to keep racing through to escape. Each area is interesting and full of nicely illustrated detail.

Even the menacing monkey chasing you has benefitted from a graphical upgrade. Instead of a pack of tiny primates, you're now being chased by one giant ape. Seeing his figure behind you as you race and turn is good motivation to keep going.

While many things have improved, the simple control scheme didn't, and that's a great thing. The best thing about the Temple Run franchise is it's easy to pick up, yet hard to master the game. It's the key to what made the original such a success, and it will help propel the second to great heights.

Temple Run 2 also beefed up the characters available to the player. Shepherd said they found there were enough fans who wanted a real differentiation between all the avatars, so the developer obliged by adding different power-ups to each. They don't add as much depth to the gameplay as advertised, but still are nice for players who favor one character over another.

The characters and power-ups can all be purchased with real money as well as in-game currency. This is something we've come to expect from freemium games. My one gripe, representative of the freemium formula being taken too far in Temple Run 2, is how the game handles your eventual death. Now, when your character falls off the edge or smacks his head into a wall, a small dialogue box appears, crying "Save Me!" Reviving your character costs one gem, and while they are sporadically available as you race through the game, five can be purchased for just 99 cents. It's an easy way to cheat death, but it could also easily be an addictive way to stretch your runs just a little farther. Just let me buy the game for a dollar so I don't have to see this, please?

Despite this drawback, I can see Temple Run 2 reaching the same success as the first game based on its improvements. I'm looking forward to seeing every mobile screen on New York's subway taken up by this game  a real sign of its success.

For the price (free), iOS gamers cannot skip this one.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The sequel to the explosively popular Temple Run is out Thursday morning for iPhone and iPad.

Temple Run took players on a jungle adventure as they attempted to escape from a horde of demonic monkeys with a stolen idol from a ancient temple. Players had to jump, dodge and duck under obstacles with swipes on the touch screen as they ran for their lives. The endless runner was downloaded more than 170 million times from Apple's App Store and Google Play since its 2011 release; 2.5 million of those downloads were on Christmas Day of 2012 as people unwrapped new mobile devices to game on.

Imangi Studios sprung Temple Run 2 on fans with little announcement or fanfare prior to its launch. Studio cofounder Keith Shepherd says the game is more of what fans loved, but with a depth his team wasn't able to add to the first game.

"We wanted to set out and do all the things we wanted to do with Temple Run but we couldn't fit in," Shepherd says. "It feels like a bigger, better, more awesome version of the first game."

Temple Run was developed in five months by Shepherd, his wife and Imangi cofounder Natalia Luckyanova, and graphic designer Kiril Tchangov. Shepherd says he was inspired by games like Sonic the Hedgehog and the platforming of Mirror's Edge. But mostly, he wanted to see an endless runner in 3D; earlier games released in the genre, like Canabalt, were only two-dimensional games.

Temple Run 2 greatly expands on the first game's concepts, according to Shepherd. The game now takes place in a floating temple in the clouds. Players are confronted with new obstacles, like swinging from zip lines and riding in a rickety mine cart.

"The world you're running in is much more rich and vibrant," Shepherd says. "There are curves and hills and valleys and stairs."

The new game also adds more things for players to do and collect, including characters that have their own specialized powers. The power meter is a new element to the series.

"Our fans have been fantastic and have given us great ideas and feedback," Shepherd says. "People always wanted more out of the game. It was so easy to unlock everything, so we're glad we can offer a lot more for this one."

Temple Run 2 is available now for iPhone and iPad for free. The team says Android versions will be coming out soon.
--------------------------------------------------------------
When Notre Dame football star Manti Te'o's touching story about his girlfriend's illness and death turned out to be a hoax, Internet users quickly took the opportunity to turn it into a more visible joke.

SEE ALSO: Notre Dame Star Te'o's Dead Girlfriend Was Social Media Hoax

Te'oing is the latest photo trend, similar Tebowing or Eastwooding, where users upload photos of themselves with an "invisible girlfriend." Photos with the hashtag #Teoing have flooded Twitter and Instagram since Wednesday's bombshell announcement.

Like most Internet trends, there is already a Te'oing Tumblr site collecting the best of the digital inside joke.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Tesla Model S has been hailed as both a must-have big boy toy for the well-moneyed as well a harbinger of environmentally friendly transportation tech. So well-regarded are Tesla's electric cars, in fact, that the Model S was voted the Motor Trend Car of 2013.

But how do Tesla's electric cars actually work? That answer requires a bit more explanation. The basics are pretty straightforward, but real intrigue lies in the details of its futuristic car tech.

Electricity charges a battery to give the Model S juice for a certain period of time, not unlike your smartphone or laptop. In fact, each Tesla electric car has much more in common with your MacBook than you might think  the company uses lithium-ion batteries just like the type that powers laptops worldwide.

There's just one difference  Tesla's batteries are a heck of a lot more powerful. The battery in each Tesla car is actually made up of thousands of lithium-ion cells that have a combined weight of about a thousand pounds, according to the company. Each pack is built at Tesla's Bay Area headquarters and comes equipped with a heating system that enables the car to function in cold weather.

To get that battery ready to roll, however, you're going to have to charge the sucker. Again, this process isn't much different from the way you charge the portable devices you carry around every day  what's unique here is you're dealing with a much bigger gadget that carries you around instead. And this is the key difference between a Tesla electric car and a hybrid, like the Toyota Prius  it's all electric and has to be charged, whereas the Prius runs partially on gasoline but doesn't have to be charged.

There are a few ways to go about charging your Tesla electric car. Tesla recommends getting an electrician to install a recharging station at your home. Called a High Power Wall Charger, this device plugs into the back of the car and can juice its battery twice as fast as a 120-volt outlet would. You can also plug in to 100-volt outlets via a mobile connector that allows you to charge wherever you find time and electricity. And, of course, you could always go green by installing solar panels to generate charge at home.

But that's not all  Tesla is also in the process of installing hundreds of "supercharging" stations on highways across the United States and in parts of Canada. These stations are designed to allow Model S owners to charge their rides in just about an hour, and several have already been built in California.

So what does all that electricity get used for? To power a watermelon-sized motor that converts mechanical power into electricity but also turns that mechanical power into more electricity. It's a much simpler, more efficient device than the combustion engine found in most cars, enabling you to get the most mileage for your charge. Tesla says its electric cars equipped with the most powerful battery packs available can travel at 55 miles per hour for up to 300 miles on a single charge.

Of course, eventually you'll run out of juice and the whole process will begin again. But now you'll have an appreciation for how the Tesla electric car actually works.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The folks from uptime monitoring company Royal Pingdom have assembled a gargantuan list of various internet-related stats from 2012, and it's a very interesting read.

Though we've seen nearly all of these numbers before  for example, we covered Facebook passing 1 billion users in October as well as Twitter's 200 million in December  seeing them all in one place reminds you of how small and insignificant we are in the vast ocean of data that is the internet.

Highlights from the list include 2.2 billion email users worldwide (425 million use Gmail, making it the biggest email service around), 634 million websites (with 51 million being added to the web every year) and 246 million domain name registrations in 2012.

There were 100 million .com domain names (remember the first one, registered in 1985?), 2.4 billion internet users worldwide, and 1.2 trillion searches on Google in 2012.

On the social media front, in 2012 there were 2.7 billion likes on Facebook every day, 175 million tweets were sent on Twitter every day, while Google's +1 button was used a whopping 5 billion times per day.

Finally, there were 1.3 billion smartphones in use worldwide by the end of 2012, 4 billion hours of video was being watched on YouTube monthly and a flabbergasting 7 petabytes of photos were added to Facebook every month.

Head over to Royal Pingdom to see the rest of the stats and tell us your estimates of what these numbers will look like at the end of 2013 in the comments!
--------------------------------------------------------------
Lenovo is launching its latest laptop model for schools that will now run Google's operating instead of one from Microsoft.

The rugged ThinkPad X131e Chromebook was designed with school administrators and teachers in mind, ZDNet reports. The device can be easily controlled from the cloud and runs thousands of educational apps. The company has yet to announce pricing of the computer, but special bidding will begin for schools on Feb. 26.

Lenovo has previously made Windows-powered X131e ThinkPad for schools  which has sold out in the education market  but the company's switch to Google OS allows students to take advantage of Google's Apps for Education and its Chrome Web Store.

SEE ALSO: Tablets Will Transform the Classroom

"Chromebooks are in use today by more than one thousand K-12 schools, and they make an ideal one-to-one device because they're more cost effective, easier to manage and maintain than traditional laptops or tablets," said Caesar Sengupta, director of product management for Google's Chrome OS.

The 3.9-pound Chromebook includes an 11-inch anti-glare display with 1366 x 786 resolution, a webcam, three USB ports, as well as both HDMI and VGA ports. Lenovo didn't specify the name of its Intel processor or the device's battery life, though it claimed the device lasts the duration of a school day.

The device is designed to withstand students' wear and tear, featuring a rubber bumper, reinforced corners, and hinges that have been tested to withstand 50,000 opens and closes.
--------------------------------------------------------------
How many times do you press snooze in the morning? Five more minutes often turns into an hour, and it's hard to say no to the allure of being wrapped in a blanket burrito.

India-based designer Sankalp Sinha created an alarm clock that'll make sure you get to work on time. The singNshock delivers an electric shock pulse when the user presses the button, sending microvolts to jump-start the day.

It's just enough electricity to trigger neurological functions, Sinha says on his site, but the feature is optional. Check out the video, above, for more.

SEE ALSO: Rise Alarm Clock App Makes Waking Up Pleasant

The device combines an alarm clock (with a tiny bit of taser-like qualities) with a music player. It has a touchscreen interface with LED illuminated sides, and can store up to 32GB of music so you wake up to your favorite song.

The singNshock is currently in its prototype stage.

Would you use an alarm clock that jolts you out of bed? Tell us what you think below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
To quote a venerable man, "It's all about the Benjamins, baby." The phrase is especially poignant today, on Benjamin Franklin's 307th birthday.

Even though he never became president, Franklin earned his spot on the $100 bill. The man wore more hats than Blossom, for crying out loud.

Among his many roles, he was a revolutionary, a statesman, a political thinker, a scientist, an inventor, a writer, a musician and a diplomat.

SEE ALSO: 25 Dead Presidents to Follow on Twitter

Franklin is truly among the most interesting and quotable figures in the history of the U.S., or anywhere else for that matter. He taught us some hard truths, such as, "In this world nothing can be said to be certain, except death and taxes."

To honor Franklin, Twitter users have busted out some of his very best quotes. Can you imagine how much Franklin would have dominated Twitter if he was alive today?

Scroll through the gallery above to see 10 notable Franklin aphorisms. If we left out one of your favorites, share it with us in the comments below.

Mashable composites: Images courtesy of Flickr, JasonLangheine, and via Twitter
--------------------------------------------------------------
Twitter has added nine new partners to its Certified Products Program, which provides Twitter-based products and services for businesses.

The new partners include Shoutlet, Spredfast, Sprout Social, Adobe Social, Percolate, Rallyverse, Sysomos, Simply Measured and Visible Technologies. The companies provide a variety of tools including analytics, listening tools, the ability to manage a Twitter presence and services that let you craft more engaging tweets. In addition, Twitter has hired former Forrester Analyst Zach Hofer-Shall to manage the program.

Twitter launched Certified Products last August with 12 partners, including HootSuite, Mass Relevance and Radian6.

The expansion of the program comes as Twitter has clashed with former partners like Instagram and LinkedIn as the company attempts to gain more control over its user experience.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Skip the body moisturizer  If you're suffering from dry legs this winter season, you may want to pick up a pair of Wrangler's Denim Spa Jeans.

The skinny-style jeans have been treated with hydrating oils and butters such as apricot kernel oil, passion fruit oil, rosehip oil and shea butter in an aim to battle cellulite, according to British Vogue. They will go on sale in three different "finishes"  Aloe Vera, Olive Extract and Smooth Legs  on Asos.com on Jan. 28 for 85 (about U.S. $136). A spokesperson for the company was unable to confirm that the jeans would go on sale in any U.S. stores, although Asos does ship to the U.S.

The jeans' moisturizing ingredients will evaporate in about two weeks, says Vogue, but purchasers can also buy a "reload spray" (price unknown) that will last between 67 and 95 wears.
--------------------------------------------------------------
If you live in New York or San Francisco, it's about to get even easier to find health information for restaurants in your city.

Yelp, the popular business review website, announced Thursday that it has started adding hygiene scores for restaurants in San Francisco and there are plans to add similar scores to restaurants in New York next.

The hygiene scores, which are on a 100-point scale, are based on inspection data from the city and a standard developed in partnership with local and federal government officials. Yelp is working with the technology departments of the cities of San Francisco and New York to collect and add this information into its database.

"While ratings and reviews are incredibly powerful ways to guide spending decisions, we're always looking for new ways to supplement the information to provide a better experience for consumers," Yelp's co-founder and CEO Jeremy Stoppelman said in a statement.

When you visit the business page for a restaurant on Yelp, you'll notice a health score right below the option to check out the menu:

If you click on that score, Yelp will show you a breakdown of health violations and previous inspection dates for the restaurant:

During a conference call with reporters on Wednesday, San Francisco Mayor Ed Lee praised the partnership as a way to make the government's vast amount of health data more accessible to the public.

While Yelp did not specifically lay out a timeline for adding similar data for New York restaurants, The New York Post reports hearing from city officials that it will be rolled out "over the coming weeks."

Yelp is expected to add health scores for restaurants in Philadelphia and Chicago next.
--------------------------------------------------------------
'Aaron's Law' is just the beginning of a more exhaustive reform of the Computer Fraud and Abuse Act (CFAA), a law being used to prosecute Internet activist and hacker Aaron Swartz, said Democratic California Rep. Zoe Lofgren in an interview with Mashable.

"The statute, which was adopted in 1986, needs a whole, complete overhaul," Lofgren said in a phone interview. "But that's likely to take a very long time. So I'm very keen to work on a complete overhaul while on a parallel track, I'm hopeful we can make these discreet changes."

On Tuesday evening, Lofgren posted the one-page bill on Reddit. Under her proposal, the violation of online terms of service would stop being a felony.

Some legal experts have said Lofgren's changes don't address what they see as other flaws of the CFAA. Lofgren is aware of those criticisms, but she wants to put this minor change ahead of more comprehensive reform. She's hoping this will take less time.

"I'm hopeful we can proceed promptly to make these discreet changes to prevent any other person from being tortured the way Aaron was," Lofgren said.

Lofgren's proposal, legal experts say, might come up short. They think that the main problem of the CFAA is that it lacks a clear definition of authorized access. Under the current law, prosecutors have a lot of leeway to charge hackers even in cases when all they did was get a hold of public information.

Lofgren knows of the limitations of the proposal. That's why she posted it on Reddit before introducing it to the House, looking for feedback and suggestions. "We're looking at what other elements could be included, if any, that would have basically prevented the indictment that Aaron faced," she said.

Swartz, a prominent Internet freedom activist, committed suicide on Friday, Jan. 11 in his Brooklyn apartment. At the time of his death he was awaiting trial for allegedly illegally downloading millions of scholarly articles over the Massachusetts Institute of Technology's network. He was facing up to 35 years in prison and $1 million in fines.

His family, along with some of his friends and supporters, believe the charges against him, and an overzealous prosecution led by U.S. Attorney Carmen Ortiz, contributed to his decision to commit suicide. A White House online petition to remove Ortiz reached 25,000 signatures on Tuesdsy. In response, Ortiz released a statement saying the conduct of her office was "appropriate" and that they never intended to ask for maximum sentence.

Lofgren refused to comment on the prosecution's behavior, arguing that that's not the role of a member of Congress, and instead went back to the CFAA.

"I'll just say this, if the statute allowed multiple felony charges to be lodged for what Aaron Swartz did, the statute should be changed," said Lofgren.

SEE ALSO: After Aaron Swartz: The Tech World Must Talk About Depression

Lofgren has been at the forefront of Internet freedom issues in Congress for years, always involved  and sometimes leading  reforms that intended to tackle outdated laws on copyright, privacy and other Internet-related issues. She was one of the most prominent critics and opponents of the much-maligned Stop Online Piracy Act (SOPA), and she thinks there's still much work to do. But for that, she says, the online community needs to step it up once more.

"The SOPA fight showed what can happen in terms of stopping bad legislation when people are armed with information and speak up to the legislator," she said, referring to the popular online uprising that led to Internet giants like Wikipedia and Google to join the protest. "The question is can people armed with information speaking to the legislator not only stop bad things from happening but make good things happen. And that's yet to be proven, we'll see."

Lofgren hopes that can turn out to be true in the following months, when she will introduce 'Aaron's Law' to the House, start working on an overhaul of the CFAA, domain seizure reform and re-introduce the Electronic Communications Privacy Act 2.0, which she introduced it in late September. The aim of the bill is to introduce the same email privacy protections that were finally stripped out of the so-called Netflix bill, which passed at the end of the year.
--------------------------------------------------------------
There's been a lot of buzz about the above photo over the past week.

The stunning shot of Manhattan, taken from a unique "bird's-eye" perspective, is part of panoramic photo project called AirPano. Essentially, it's Google Street View from the air  viewers can virtually access the entire island, from Battery Park up to Washington Heights.

Take a look at it here:



It's arranged into a number of pre-programmed tours. To start, click on one of the white arrow icons. If you choose "Times Square at Night," for example, you're instantly flown down through the iconically bright intersection. Once the tour ends, and you've seen everything there is to see, you're back at the top and free to choose another one.

Serge Semenov, the project's founder, created the tour by stitching together thousands of pictures from a helicopter trip in 2011. He says on his website:

The desire to share my impressions with those who can't travel due to different circumstances led me to the project AirPano.com. The sense of the project itself is to show the people the most beautiful places of our planet in the manner that nobody has ever seen them before: from the bird's-eye view with unlimited freedom of vision and movement

It's not just the Big Apple, either. Semenov has created similar aerial panoramas for a number of other destinations, including the Taj Mahal, Niagara Falls and the Christ the Redeemer Statue in Rio de Janeiro.

A few other still images from Semenov's New York tour  particularly, this one taken directly above Central Park  even made it to the front page of Reddit last week.

You can catch the rest of the panoramic tours on AirPano's website.

What other destinations would you like to see explored like this? Tell us below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
What do you do right after selling your company for a half-billion dollars? If you're Al Gore, you go ahead and make another small fortune from Apple stock.

Gore, who holds a position as a director on Apple's board, exercised options to purchase 59,000 shares of Apple stock on Jan. 15 for the insanely low price of $7.475 a share, according to a company filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission on Thursday.

Based on Apple's current share price of about $500, Gore effectively purchased $29.5 million worth of Apple stock for just $441,000. That's a pretty big discount and one that Gore probably doesn't need.

Less than two weeks earlier, Gore announced that his media company Current TV had been acquired by Al-Jazeera for a reported $500 million. Gore is said to have had a 20% stake in the company, which means he made $100 million and Forbes estimates that his total fortune is now $300 million.

It sure is good to be Al right now.
--------------------------------------------------------------
CBS and NFL have tapped singer-songwriter Alicia Keys to sing the "Star-Spangled Banner" before kick-off at Super Bowl XLVII in New Orleans on Feb. 3.

Her pre-game performance will be broadcast globally, marking the third time Keys has lent her voice to Super Bowl festivities. Keys helped ring in Super Bowl games in 2005 and 2008.

Kelly Clarkson sang the national anthem in 2012, a year after Christina Aguilera flubbed the song's lyrics at the previous Super Bowl (watch below). Other past performers include Whitney Houston, Garth Brooks, Mariah Carey, Faith Hill, Neil Diamond, Diana Ross, Billy Joel, Jewel, Harry Connick Jr., Dixie Chicks and Cher.

SEE ALSO: Alicia Keys Unleashes Interactive Storytelling App for Families [VIDEO]

Beyonce also has performed the national anthem before a Super Bowl game, but this year she's the halftime performer, a gig she confirmed via Tumblr in October.

Keys, a 14-time Grammy winner, will embark on a North American concert tour in March. Her fifth studio album, Girl on Fire, debuted atop the Billboard 200 albums chart in November.

Photo via Michael Kovac/Getty Images for City of Hope
--------------------------------------------------------------
American Idol capped its two-night season 12 premiere with Lazaro Arbos, a 21-year-old Florida resident with a speech impediment. Arbos stuttered while introducing himself but impressed the judges with a stutter-free rendition of "Bridge Over Troubled Water."

"Just sing all the time," new American Idol judge Keith Urban told Arbos after the audition.

Fellow judges Mariah Carey, Nicki Minaj and Randy Jackson joined Urban in advancing Arbos to the next round. Arbos and other hopefuls will congregate in Hollywood to audition again.

SEE ALSO: 'American Idol' Season 11 Sets Four Social TV Records [STATS]

Viewers quickly reacted to the emotional audition on Twitter using hashtag #IdolInspire:

Meanwhile, Arbos has been busy replying to fans (he calls them #Lazis) on Twitter:
--------------------------------------------------------------
In Part 2 of Oprah Winfrey's exclusive interview with Lance Armstrong, the disgraced athlete said a defiant tweet he posted last fall was a "mistake."

After the USADA stripped the seven-time Tour de France winner of all his titles and banned him from sports for life over charges of taking banned performance-enhancing drugs and blood doping, Armstrong tweeted to his followers a phot of him lying on the couch in his basement, surrounded by the framed yellow jerseys from his seven wins (shown below).

Winfrey asked him if that was the "cocky, arrogant jerk self" that Armstrong described in Part 1 of the interview. Armstrong, wincing at the question, said the tweet was "more defiance" and "another mistake." He later called it "dumb."

SEE ALSO: Lance Armstrong Interview Stirs Outrage on Social Media

When Armstrong first sent the tweet in early November, it immediately went viral. It was viewed more than 300,000 times in two days, and was retweeted 8,000 times.

The picture sparked plenty of reaction, much of it negative, as well as at least one parody pic that showed Armstrong surrounded by posters of pills and hypodermic needles.

In the previous month, Armstrong had erased any mention of his Tour de France wins from his Twitter bio.

What was your reaction to the tweet, and what do you think of Armstrong's admission it was a mistake? Share your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Imagine a runner on a track with a glowing marker that follows her, showing speed and time. Or a tennis court that shows for sure whether the ball was out, or even a basketball court floor that runs ads during half time.

Those are some of the possibilities with a glass floor designed by German company ASB Systembau GMBH. ASB supplies glass squash courts, and now has moved into smart flooring.

SEE ALSO: With LED Keyboards, Every Key Is A Screen

The company developed the Tron-like floor above after it noted that the glass on the squash courts, which is translucent rather than transparent, could be combined with lighting to make moveable lines that would be invisible when unlit. That led to the ASB Glassfloor, which has already been installed in a German school's athletics complex.

The floor itself is an aluminum frame that supports the glass, which is tempered to resist breakage, which means the panels can be much larger and thinner for their size than traditional glass floor tiles, like the ones made famous by Saturday Night Fever.

The surface is etched to prevent stray reflection, so players won't get blinded. In addition, to get that particular friction  the "feel" of a traditional parquet floor  the glass is covered with tiny ceramic dots.

Instead of painting lines on a wooden surface, the floor uses a layer of LEDs underneath the glass. The LEDs can be in the form of boundary lines for different sports, or can serve as a display. This system eliminates the problem of painting multiple lines on the floor for different sports. The glass floor is also, ASB says, more durable than wood.

SEE ALSO: Hack Yourself a Super Secret LCD Monitor

But forget just being able to adjust a floor for current sports: The ability to put lines on the floor means you can design games that use them as barriers or guides. A "smart" ball could sound off when a barrier is hit, for instance. Or lights could track players and show if they are off-sides or out of bounds. The future of sporting events just got a little more exciting.

This article originally published at Discovery News here
--------------------------------------------------------------
By now it's the sports story you've heard a million times online: Manti Te'o, a college football star for Notre Dame, gains widespread attention and adulation for his stellar play this season despite the death of his girlfriend.

There's just one catch: Lennay Kekua, the supposed girlfriend, never existed. She was an online construct, created largely through a cobbled-together set of social media profiles.

Some believe Te'o was in on the hoax, using the incredible story to boost his campaign for a Heisman Trophy he nearly won. Other believe he was the unwitting victim of an elaborate "catfishing" scam  so named for the documentary Catfish, which delves into the world of duplicitous fake online romances.

But while Te'o may have taken the bait hook, line and sinker, he's not the only star college athlete to be targeted by fake online paramours. The attempted scam may be much more common than originally thought, according to a blog post recently shared by a minor league pitcher and former college baseball hero.

Michael Roth led the University of South Carolina to the 2010 College World Series and was drafted by the Anaheim Angels in the 2012 Major League Baseball Draft. Shortly after his ascent to stardom in the 2010 series, he writes, a mysterious young woman contacted him and initiated an extended series of bizarre electronic contact.

She thought he was cute, she said, and she'd seen him pitch. She'd text him and they spent time talking on the phone. She said her name was Hope Porter and she attended the University of Texas. She sent photos, ostensibly of herself, showing a cute blonde. They were supposed to meet up in person once, but she flaked at the last minute.

Eventually, Roth Googled her phone number. Results showed up in a number of chat rooms, where other men related similar stories  a girl from Texas named Hope Porter, who led them on with flirtatious correspondences.

"The guys in the chat room said they had confronted her about it," Roth writes. "She said it was her Uncle. They pushed her further. Finally, she said she was initially doing a project to see if someone could fall in love over the phone. She was supposed to end it after a few months, but after talking with them for a while, she enjoyed it so much that she just kept doing it."

Roth finally made a call of his own and told the woman to leave him alone once and for all. So ended Roth's catfishing tale, which you can read in full here, but he says he's going to post a similar experience from one of his teammates soon.

Have you ever had a similar experience? Will "catfishing" become more common as online-based relationships continue to grow?
--------------------------------------------------------------
The first trailer for supernatural romance flick Beautiful Creatures has arrived, and people online are continuing to pit the film against the Twilight saga.

Based off the novel of the same name from Kami Garcia and Margaret Stohl, Beautiful Creatures tells the story of teenager Lena Duchannes, whose supernatural family moves to a South Carolina town where she attracts attention from Ethan Wate.

Lena leaves a trail of destruction  and sometimes death  wherever she goes. Ethan begins to fancy her months before her 16th birthday, at which time her magical powers will either permanently remain good or transform into dark magic.

Oscar-nominated Richard LaGravenese directed the Warner Bros. Pictures film, which premieres in theaters on Valentine's Day. It stars Alice Englert and Alden Ehrenreich as Lena and Ethan. Academy Award winners Jeremy Irons and Emma Thompson as well as nominee Viola Davis also have prominent roles, along with Emmy Rossum and Thomas Mann.
--------------------------------------------------------------
With all that email you get these days, it's easy to get buried. For those millions of you who use Gmail as your main email client, either for your personal email, or through work or school, allow us to make some suggestions.

SEE ALSO: 9 Things We Wish Gmail Could Do

Whether you're chasing Inbox Zero or just want a little more efficiency, Gmail Labs may be your solution. Labs are add-ons you can use to customize your experience; they can save you time by supercharging your Gmail. These "experimental" features can break at any time, or eventually be incorporated into Gmail itself, but since every click counts, we're willing to take the risk.

Check out our gallery above to learn how to enable Labs and see which ones are worth your time. Let us know your favorites in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Corvette has been redesigned only six times since its debut 50 years ago, so for the seventh version that it unveiled at the Detroit Auto Show this week, GM brought to bear some of its most advanced car technologies. A notable one: the addition of carbon fiber into the construction of the sports car.

By using carbon fiber and replacing its steel frame with aluminum, the 2014 Corvette managed to shave 100 pounds off its weight, says Tadge Juechter, the executive chief engineer in charge of Corvette. The car is also 60% stiffer, he says.

Carbon fiber makes up both the car's hood and roof panel, but composite materials also reduce the weight of the fenders, doors, rear quarter and underbody.

SEE ALSO: See the Coolest Feature of the 2014 Corvette Stingray

The interior design is treated with carbon fiber as well. Some of the paneling on the dashboard and doors has the telltale dual-tone gray markings, and running your fingers across it  feeling the smooth, stiff lines  is a dead giveaway.

The seventh-generation Corvette isn't the first to have carbon fiber built into its design. The sixth-generation Corvette, which debuted in 2005, was upgraded with carbon-fiber fenders and front wheel houses in 2006. In 2009, carbon fiber spread to the roof panel as well.

The new Corvette has a new LT1 V-8 engine capable of delivering 450 horsepower and 450 foot-pounds of torque. At the same time, GM says it's the most fuel-efficient Corvette ever made, rated at 26 miles per gallon (highway). Redesigning the car for its 50th anniversary cost GM a cool $131 million, the company claims.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Rebecca Levey is a co-founder of KidzVuz.com, a video review site by and for tweens. She writes about technology and education at Beccarama and is a White House Champion of Change for Education. Follow her at @beccasara.

On the face of it, my 10-year-old twin daughters are the poster girls for the "digital natives" generation.

They've had a Leapster since age 4, and have been online since they were 5  first playing on Webkinz, then Club Penguin, Moshi Monsters, and other online virtual worlds. They can navigate PowerPoint, Microsoft Word and Photoshop like pros. We had all the discussions I thought we needed to have  don't give out your password, don't give out personal information, report inappropriate behavior  and I keep their computers in the living room or kitchen where I can constantly look over their shoulders.

Being the digital mom I am, I thought I had covered all bases. But what I hadn't counted on was social media being an entirely different beast, and rendering my digitally savvy girls into digital Mr. Magoos.

I live a good deal of my life online. The ease with which I move between Twitter, Facebook, Instagram, blogs, chat and other social media is second nature and central to my work. It never occurred to me that my daughters would have no idea what they were doing when they entered the social media space. After all, for me it's just an extension of my "real" life. But I quickly came to realize that of course is the crux of the issue when it comes to tweens and teens online: they are just starting to figure out what it means to be social in their real world. Adding in social media amplifies and intensifies all of the bumbling mistakes, mean girl tendencies and just out right naivitee.

SEE ALSO: Parent's Dilemma: Are You Raising Tech-Addicted Kids?

Over the past year I've watched my daughters and their friends set up email accounts, Instagram accounts and various chat apps on their newly acquired smartphones and iPods. It's clear that they are truly clueless. Emails are always "reply all" and sent to practically everyone in their address books  not to mention the crazy chain emails they send.

So, the first discussion I had to have with my daughters was about email protocol and etiquette  and to reassure them over and over again that someone they loved would not die if they didn't forward that email to 10 other people. It's actually not easy to convince a 10-year-old girl of this fact.

Unfortunately, email was the most benign of our social media issues. The real problem is apps  specifically Instagram. There's been a ton of press coverage about the Children's Online Privacy Protection Act and the new focus on apps. However, that focus is all about marketing and behavioral tracking, not the real hazards of tweens using these apps  the ones parents are much more concerned about  and the social and psychological effects of over-sharing or just plain public stupidity. Most parents I've spoken to don't even know that it's illegal for their kids to have an Instagram account if they're under 13. There's been so much attention paid to Facebook, but from what I'm seeing and hearing, it's all about Instagram for kids.

Parents who would never let their child have a Facebook account are completely fine with Instagram, basically because it hasn't gotten the same amount of publicity. The same is true for the popular chat apps like Kik Messenger, which kids are signing up for in droves. Some know to keep their accounts private, but many don't. All you have to do is read the reviews in the app store to see the completely inappropriate, sexual and predator behaviors going on with Kik.

SEE ALSO: A Parent's Take on Snapchat

I would never hand my daughters the keys to the car when they turn 16 without having had some kind of driver's training  not to mention passing their driving test. Yet my girls have a supercomputer connected to the world in the palm of their hand every day, and no instruction manual. That had to change. This isn't about care and responsibility for the device, it's about having a social media playbook so they can understand the rules of the game and be as safe and smart as possible.

Here are my social media rules for my girls:

And here's a really important one for parents: Don't allow connected devices at your child's parties, especially sleepovers. This is where so much trouble starts. Inevitably kids who weren't invited see pictures on Instagram and feel left out. There is also potential for the worst pictures to be taken and shared. And, it's a huge recipe for peer pressure to text kids of the opposite sex, entice mean girl behavior and worse. Tell parents that all devices must be left home, and have a basket in your room to keep devices that come with guests despite your best intent. It's not the worse thing in the world for kids to actually have to play games and have fun without electronics for one day. They can still get in plenty of the usual trouble, but at least there won't be a digital record of it

Do your kids have a road map for good social media behavior and etiquette? Tell us about them in the comments.

This post is part of a series on the dilemmas of raising digital kids. We'd like to hear some of the parenting issues technology has raised for you. Please let us know in the comments, or on our Mashable Lifestyle Facebook page. You can also follow and tweet us @mashlifestyle.
--------------------------------------------------------------
On Wednesday Facebook added the ability to make voice calls to its stand-alone Messenger app. The feature is only available for iPhone users, and only works if both the caller and the recipient have Facebooks Messenger app installed on their phone.

While the feature is definitely good news for Facebook users who use the app, Facebook isnt the first company to offer free voice calls over data networks using your iPhone.

Check out the video above for a closer look at how to make calls using Facebook Messenger, as well as a look at some of the competition.

Will you use Facebook Messenger to place calls, or do you have another favorite app? Let us know your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Clipping your finger nails here on Earth is already a tedious task.

But how annoying would it be to do in space? Without the comfortable pull of gravity, those sharp, crescent moon-shaped slivers of keratin would be all up in your face  literally.

Thankfully, Canadian astronaut Chris Hadfield has mastered the art. He uploaded a DIY video from onboard the International Space Station about the best ways to file down your claws while floating in zero gravity.

SEE ALSO: Watch This Spectacular Tour of the International Space Station

His trick? Cutting above an air duct. Watch it for yourself above.

What are some other mundane tasks that would be difficult to do in zero gravity?
--------------------------------------------------------------
Remember the name Zora Ball. At seven years old, she's the youngest person to ever create a mobile game app, which was unveiled at the University of Pennsylvania's Bootstrap Expo last month.

Zora used the Bootstrap programming language, and lest you think her older brother Trace, who was a STEM scholar of the year at Zora's charter school, did the work for her, she reconfigured her app on the fly when asked, according to the Pittsburgh Courier.

This could be the beginning of a long career as a programmer and developer for Ball. But first she has to get through first grade.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Joe Chernov is the VP of marketing for Kinvey, a mobile back-end as a service startup in Cambridge, Mass. Joe joined Kinvey from Eloqua, where he served as VP of content marketing. The Content Marketing Institute named him "Content Marketer of the Year" in 2012.



For brand marketers, the mobile app is becoming the new website. Just as websites evolved from being digital marketing collateral to interactive storefronts, the second generation of mobile apps is maturing into virtual a cash machine for brands. Maybe that's why marketers are increasing their mobile budgets by 70% this year.

Mobile app measurement firm Flurry has found that consumers spend significantly more time interacting with mobile apps than browsing the web, and the company predicts app engagement may soon overtake television viewing. With apps cutting into time previously spent on marketing's most vital channels  web and television  it's little surprise brands are racing to build branded apps.

Despite what would appear to be a winning combination of budget and revenues, however, many brand apps fail to gain traction. Certainly the sheer number of apps crowding the App Store and Google Play make it difficult for any app to get noticed, but insiders argue the larger issue is the quality of brand apps. "Most (brand apps) fail because they try to do too much," says Chris Silva, a mobile technology analyst with Altimeter Group.

If less is truly more when it comes to mobile apps, what are the essential features that should top every marketer's must-have list? Experts point to these four:

1. Smart Push

Push notifications, or alerts delivered through the app, should do more than signal when it's time to download an update. Today's "smart" push can connect people to brands by anticipating and meeting each user's needs. Effective uses of push take into account the user's behavior and location to supply messaging based on the individual's particular circumstance. Walgreens' mobile app, for example, lets users scan a prescription with their phone's camera to receive an alert when the order ready for pickup and when it's time to order a refill. The app's fill-and-remind notifications are consistent with the company's goal to "help people get well and stay well," according to company spokesperson Mai Lee Ua.

But a word of caution: overusing push notifications can backfire, so try to deliver value in every alert.

2. Local Context

For many brands, especially retailers, what matters most is location. The ability to provide customers with recommendations and offers based on their whereabouts is a killer feature for many marketers. Small Luxury Hotels of the World, a network of premium independent inns, published an app that suggests to travelers nearby points of interest based on their phone's GPS coordinates, accelerometer and compass. Grassroots marketing meets mobile tech in Michaels Stores' app, which lets crafters search and select upcoming events held at their local store.

3. Social Integration

Nearly every brand app includes social sharing capabilities. Most integrate with Facebook and Twitter, while others, like cosmetics giant Sephora, facilitate Pinterest "pinning." But for most apps, successful social sharing relies more on what is being shared than on where it's being shared. Users are unlikely to post your product for the sake of posting. They need to deliver or derive value from the act.

The social sharing component of REI's Snow Report app centers on user value. By allowing users to publish their on-mountain whereabouts to public social networks and local messageboards, the app helps skiers and riders organize impromptu meet-ups on the slopes.

4. A Simple Commerce Engine

Every marketer knows that an increase in budget is met with a greater lift in expectations. Yet before marketers can generate revenue from their newly funded mobile apps, they must first capture their users' credit card information and then provide a frictionless path to purchase. Brands from Starbucks to Hungry Howies Pizza have mastered the science of mobile payments for simple transactions, but what about more considered purchases?

Enter Converse. The company's Sampler app adheres to its promise of "keeping it simple"  users select a sneaker within the app, position it over their foot using the device's camera, snap a photo to try it on virtually, then, if they like how it looks, order it right through the app. One thing, done well.

Although these four features may be the essential ingredients for an effective app, quality alone isn't always enough to ensure the project's success. The most popular apps also receive a heavy marketing push. The good news for brands is that the team responsible for developing the app is also the group for ensuring it gets promoted.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Foursquare introduced a mapping feature on Thursday that makes it easier to visualize check-in activity around the world.

The black-and-white interactive map lets Foursquare users search for any region by Zip code and zoom in to discover the density of check-ins in that area, based on data from the 500 million check-ins on the service. Aside from just being a cool feature, it shows the potential Foursquare has to use its massive amount of data to map out real-world activity and make recommendations to users about where to go next.

"What makes Foursquare Explore so powerful is that all those check-ins you see aren't just single points  they're links between all the other places people have been, too," the company said in a blog post announcing the feature. "We like to think of it as our version of Google PageRank for the real world  we're working to understand the billions of invisible connections between places so we can make amazing recommendations."

Just imagine how effective it would be for the company to target restaurant recommendations to those who have just come from a concert based on where others have enjoyed eating after leaving that venue in the past. If Foursquare can harness all its data into these kind of recommendations, it could prove incredibly useful for attracting advertisers and boosting the company's revenues in the future.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It turns out getting a million Likes on Facebook may be as simple as asking for them. At least, that's what two friends in Norway took away from the triumphant run of the photo of siblings asking for a million Likes so their dad would let them get a dog.

In the wake of that social media victory (the girls have since chosen their puppy), Petter Kverneng and Catherine Johansen, both 20, posted a sign on Facebook agreeing to have sex with each other if the image garnered a million Likes.

"It was meant as a joke for our group of friends," Kverneng told the Norwegian publication Verdalingen.no.

SEE ALSO: Sisters With Viral Facebook Campaign Pick Their Puppy

The picture soon went viral, after it was posted to 4chan's /b/imageboard page, and at press time has about 1.2 million likes.

According to the Verdalingen.no interview, the two plan to follow through with their agreement.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Musician Jonathan Coulton claims Fox's teen musical drama Glee borrowed heavily from his own music for an upcoming episode  without notifying him.

Coulton, famous for releasing geeky songs online under a Creative Commons license, debuted an acoustic cover of '90s rap hit "Baby Got Back" in 2005. Friday morning, Coulton tweeted that Glee had a version that sounded much like his.

The tweet points to a YouTube link for "Baby Got Back," presumably to be included in next week's episode of Glee, titled "Sadie Hawkins Dance." According to the GleeWikia, a new character sings this song on the show. Here's the uploaded version and Coulton's version, for comparison.

The copyright surrounding this song's use is tricky, since Coulton's version is already a cover. From his blog, he questions whether the Glee recording even used bits of his audio, saying "to my ears, it sounds like it actually uses the audio from my recording  not the vocals obviously, but the instruments sound EXTREMELY similar. And I could swear I hear the duck quack [which Coulton included in his version] somewhere in the background there, though it's hard to say if that's just my ears expecting it."

One notch against Glee is that Coulton's version of the song changes a line from "Mix-a-Lot's in trouble" to "Johnny C's in trouble." The Glee recording posted on YouTube uses the "Johnny C" version.

While Coulton said he isn't ready to comment to Mashable until he learns more about his legal options, he did ask for help on Twitter.

Intellectual property attorney David Ervin tells Mashable the rights to the recorded arrangement may belong to Coulton depending on which type of contract he obtained the cover rights under. Coulton's blog indicates he obtained the rights to "Baby Got Back" under a federally controlled statutory license, which anyone can obtain after the original artist publishes a song. It dictates that Coulton would probably have paid royalties for his recording. Ervin said Coulton was "likely" to retain rights to his original recording under this kind of use, but he couldn't say anything for sure without seeing Coulton's contract.

Ervin also said Coulton's recording of "Baby Got Back" may stand on its own simply because of how transformative it is when compared to the original. While this can be subjective, there are legal precedents for this argument. In a 1994 case brought before the Supreme Court, rappers 2 Live Crew successfully proved that their version of "Oh, Pretty Woman" was transformative enough to not be considered an infringing use of Roy Orbison's original. It was a legal victory that protects musical derivation as fair use.

There is also a small question of the Glee version's authenticity. The song isn't hosted by an official FOX YouTube account, but that account has posted only authentic Glee songs in the past. Fox hasn't responded to request for comment as of this writing. It's even more complicated that a previously unknown actor to the series is singing the song.

UPDATE 4:29 p.m. One of our awesome commenters pointed out that the song is available in the Swedish iTunes store [iTunes link here]. It looks like the real deal.

Listen to the songs above, and let us know in the comments what you think.
--------------------------------------------------------------
As one IT giant stumbles, another one rises. Reuters reports that Google is investing $1 billion in its new UK headquarters, just as Sony announced it would be selling its NYC headquarters for $1.1 billion,

The company purchased a 2.4 acre plot of land in London's Kings Cross Central development, where it plans to build a 1-million-square-foot office.

Once built, the office could be worth up to $1.6 billion, according to one of Reuters' sources.

"This is a big investment by Google, we're committing further to the UK  where computing and the web were invented. It's good news for Google, for London and for the UK," said Google's Vice President for Northern and Central Europe Matt Brittin.

Google already has a presence in London, in Victoria and Holborn districts, but it will move to the new headquarters once it's finished. The company plans to start the construction on the building in 2013, and the project should be completed in 2016.

This is not the first time Google has spent more than $1 billion on real estate. In December 2010, the company bought a 2.9-million-square-foot building at New York's 111 Eighth Avenue for a reported price of $1.9 billion. Investments such as these are easier to make, though, when you have $44.6 billion in cash as Google does.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The topic of passwords has made headlines in the past year  from high-profile hacks to web users repeatedly not picking the right ones  but Google has its sights set on making the login-process much more secure in the future.

How secure, you may ask? Consider logging into Gmail with a high-tech ring worn on your finger or a key card that plugs into your computer's USB port.

As detailed in a research paper in IEEE Security & Privacy Magazine and reported on by Wired, Google is already looking into password alternatives in the form of passdevices. The initiatives have also been confirmed by Mashable.

"We're focused on making authentication more secure, and yet easier to manage. We believe experiments like these can help make login systems better," a Google spokesperson said.

SEE ALSO: Google CEO Says Facebook Is Doing a 'Really Bad Job' With Its Products

Google is currently running a pilot program with USB cards called Yubikeys, which aims to get passwords off computers and the cloud. This means that instead of having Google accounts tied to text, they would be linked with an actual device.

"We'd like your smartphone or smartcard-embedded finger ring to authorize a new computer via a tap on the computer, even in situations in which your phone might be without cellular connectivity," Google said in its research paper.

However, some may argue having a physical authentication device might be another thing you have to worry about not leaving home without. This also means if a card or ring is lost or stolen, it should immediately be reported.

Another solution on Google's radar is a chip embedded within your smartphone. With close-range wireless, users could potentially tap the computer to unlock email or even just be within range.

In the meantime, Google plans on implementing a system not linked to hardware or software so anyone with a supported browser. If you don't want to wait, Google's two-factor authentication sends your phone a log-in code whenever you access your account from an unfamiliar computer.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Google has made its iOS application for Google+ available in 48 new countries and territories.

The full list of new countries is as follows: Albania, Anguilla, Barbados, Benin, Bermuda, Bhutan, Brunei Darussalam, Burkina Faso, Cambodia, Cape Verde, Cayman Islands, Chad, Republic of Congo, Dominica, Fiji, Gambia, Grenada, Guinea-Bissau, Guyana, Kyrgyzstan, Lao People's Democratic Republic, Liberia, Macau, Malawi, Mauritania, Federated States of Micronesia, Mongolia, Montserrat, Mozambique, Namibia, Nepal, Palau, Papua New Guinea, Saint Lucia, Seychelles, Sierra Leone, Solomon Islands, St. Kitts and Nevis, St. Vincent and The Grenadines, Suriname, Swaziland, So Tom and Prncipe, Tajikistan, Turkmenistan, Turks and Caicos, Ukraine, British Virgin Islands and Zimbabwe.

Users in these countries can simply visit the App Store on their mobile device, search for "google+", and install the app.

Google has originally launched the Google+ iOS app in July 2011; in 18 months of existence, it has reached version 4.2, adding support for iPad, iPhone 5 and iOS 6 along the way.
--------------------------------------------------------------
On Google+, users have the ability to manipulate their circles to control the groups of people and brands they receive information and content from, but there's no guarantee those brands or users will circle you to receive your updates.

This is where Google+ Communities come in, Google's version of a group or forum, built to bring people together around particular topics. Launched in December, the types of Communities available to the Google+ audience seem endless  ranging from science, animals, development and more.

Communities are places where users can share specific questions, comments or content relating to a particular topic with other users who are just as interested in the conversation. For example, if you're a member of a cooking community, it's likely each post will contain something related to food. And if there is a user who is posting content unrelated to the chosen topic, a moderator could step in and police that person.

Many of the more than 135 million monthly active Google+ users may have already explored Communities. But for those of you getting your first peek, check out our overview below.

After logging into Google+, you'll see an icon on the left rail for "Communities." This will bring you to the Communities homepage, which will give you a sample of the types of public communities available to join. You can choose to enter a community from here or search for a topic that may not be represented on the main screen, using the search bar at the top-right of the page.

Say you're interested in joining a community focusing solely on Grumpy Cat; you'd be ecstatic to discover there are already a number of communities devoted to our favorite dour feline. While public community pages allow you to access and explore the content, you must join the community before you can comment or post. Many public pages will allow you to join immediately, but some are dependent on moderation.

Private communities work differently from public communities in that they are, ahem, private. When a user creates a private community, as we'll discuss below, he or she can decide whether a private group appears in Google+ search results. If you're interested in joining a private community you found through search, you must ask the community's moderator to join before viewing or interacting with any of the content.

Sharing content to a community is much like sharing to one of your circles. While you can post to your respective community directly from the community's page, you can also post from basically anywhere on the platform. If you find a story you'd like to share with your community, but you're not on Google+ at that time, use the +1 button from the story's page and select your respective community.

At this time, Google+ prohibits you from sharing to multiple communities. Also, when you do choose to post to a community, you will not be able to share that same post through the public feed  meaning you'd have to post your content twice for it to show up in the community and in the public feed. If you do post your content to a public community, though, it will still be visible to users who navigate to your profile page. But if you share a post to a private community page, it cannot be publicly viewed anywhere except in that community.

Many community pages have added categories in order to organize the discussion. You will be prompted to choose a category within the community when you share a post. In the Android community, for example, users can post to "Fix my phone!!!," "Hacking discussion," "Development" and, for new community members to introduce themselves, "Hello, world." You should determine which category is the best fit for your post.

While discussing a particular topic may be your life's passion, you may not wish to be notified every time a new post has been shared in one of your communities. Or maybe you do. Either way, notifications can be toggled on or off by clicking on the bell icon on your community's page.

If notifications are on, you will get a notification by email, on your mobile device and by the Google toolbar when someone posts something new in the community. For public communities, notifications are off by default. For private communities, public communities where membership is moderated and communities that you created, notifications are on by default.

So you've browsed all the public communities and you didn't find that exact community you hoped to join. Or maybe you want to create a private group for your old high school friends, for example. Google+ gives you the option to create your own community, and it's a breeze to do. When you're on the main Communities page, you'll see a red button on the top-right that says "CREATE A COMMUNITY."

You can then choose to create either a public or private community. On its FAQ page, Google notes that users cannot change a community page from private to public, or vice versa, once it has been created, so choose accordingly.

If setting up a public page, choose what you want to name the community  names do not have to be unique  and then decide if you will allow anyone to join, or if you'd like to moderate memberships. For a private page, you can decide whether you want to hide the community from search or allow people to find the page and ask to join.

Once the page has been created, there are still a few things to complete: You should choose a tagline, pick an appealing photo that describes the community, complete your About section and then add a few discussion categories.

Now that your community has been created and set up, all that is left to do is invite users to the page and start the conversation.

Much like how Reddit has become a great resource for content discovery and conversation, Google+ Communities are for users who are more interested in vibrant conversations around topics than they are about self-promotion. Quality community members are those who share relevant content that sparks conversation or debate, and who participate in conversations by leaving comments and +1'ing posts. Users whose intentions are to promote themselves or spam the community will most likely be removed by a moderator, so be careful how you approach your communities.

Hopefully you have enough information to effectively navigate your way through Google+ Communities, or even to create your own community. If we've left out any important details, let us know in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
iPad owners are now getting more than just bells and whistles tacked on to some of their favorite magazines  they're also getting issues of those magazines first.

As first uncovered by The Loop, Apple has set up a new category in its Newsstand store featuring 20 titles  all owned by Hearst  which will be released before they appear in print "or any other digital edition." Subscribers and single-issue purchasers will be able to access new releases at the same time.

Exactly how much of a lead iPad readers will have will vary by magazine, but most will be within "a couple of days" of the print release, a spokesperson for Hearst told Mashable.

Apple's advantage here isn't so much over print as over other digital newsstands, like Amazon's, Google's and Zinio's. Many magazines owned by companies other than Hearst already push out their digital editions ahead of print: The tablet edition of Conde Nast-owned Golf Digest, for example, goes live one week before print issues hit newsstands, a spokesperson for the magazine told Mashable. (However others, like Runner's World, sometimes appear several weeks after, we've noticed.)

Why is Apple getting special treatment? Apple suggested it, says Hearst. The advantage for Hearst, presumably, is exposure. At Mashable's Media Summit in November, Hearst President David Carey said the success of its tablet editions relied heavily on promotion from digital storefronts. "If your magazines land in the upper carousel of [Apple's] Newsstand, you sell a lot of product. If you're nowhere on that page, you're not going to do as well," he observed.

Hearst's digital circulation is still marginal. In a note to employees sent at the beginning of the year, Carey said the company had amassed nearly 800,000 paid digital subscribers in the U.S. across its titles. To put that in context, just one of its titles, Cosmopolitan, has a print circulation of more than 3 million, according to ABC.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Eight years ago this week, a European mission went where no one, or probe, had gone before, Saturn's huge moon Titan, and a new video animation is recounting that historic landing by the Huygens spacecraft.

The European Space Agency's unmanned Huygens probe dropped onto the surface of Titan on Jan. 14, 2005, three weeks after separating from its parent Cassini spacecraft. The new animation, which was created by ESA using real Huygens data, captures the last portion of the lander's two-and-a-half-hour descent through Titan's thick, nitrogen-based atmosphere.

The new Huygens landing video, which runs for 1 minute and 40 seconds, shows the touchdown from a variety of angles and ends with a real photo Huygens took of Titan's surface.

Though Huygens stopped sending data home to Earth 90 minutes after touching down, the landing continues to teach researchers about Titan.

An analysis of Huygens data published late last year, for example, determined that the 400-pound probe bounced, slid and wobbled to a stop 10 seconds after first contacting the moon. The study suggests that Titan's surface at the time had the consistency of soft, wet sand with a fragile crust on top, researchers said.

Titan is the largest moon of Saturn, and the second-largest moon in the entire solar system (only the Jupiter satellite Ganymede is bigger). With a diameter of 3,200 miles, Titan is nearly 50% wider than Earth's moon.

Titan is the only object in the solar system besides Earth known to host stable bodies of liquid on its surface. But Titan's lakes and seas contain methane and ethane rather than water, as the huge moon has a weather cycle based on hydrocarbons.

Complex carbon-containing molecules are known to swirl about in Titan's atmosphere, further intriguing scientists who regard the moon as one of the best places in the solar system to look for alien life.

The $3.2 billion Cassini-Huygens mission, a joint effort involving NASA, ESA and the Italian Space Agency, launched in 1997 and arrived at Saturn in 2004. While Huygens is now a feature of the Titan landscape, the Cassini spacecraft continues to study the ringed planet and its many moons. Its mission has been extended through at least 2017.

This article originally published at Space.com here
--------------------------------------------------------------
As Friday is one year since the Internet blackout against the Stop Online Piracy Act, some Internet activists are marking the date by declaring "Internet Freedom Day."

How does one celebrate Internet Freedom Day? Fight for the Future, an advocacy group that played a key role in SOPA's defeat, is commemorating the date by uploading and sharing footage of Martin Luther King Jr.'s famous "I Have a Dream" speech.

Why is that a radical move? Footage of the speech is copyrighted by EMI, which has issued takedown notices several times after the speech has been uploaded to services such as YouTube.

Update: The video has been taken down from Vimeo. Fight for the Future is trying to learn more and is working to upload it elsewhere.

Update II: The video is back, now on YouTube.

Uploading the speech in acknowledged defiance of the copyright simultaneously celebrates Internet freedom and the legacy of Martin Luther King, Jr., who advocated for civil disobedience as a means to effect change. Martin Luther King, Jr. day is Monday, Jan. 21.

"It's untenable to have a world where young people can't easily hear and watch Dr. King's message of racial justice because it is censored by broken copyright laws," said Tiffiniy Cheng, one of Fight for the Future's co-directors, in a statement. "We're asking everyone on the internet to honor Dr. King's legacy and take part in a small act of civil disobedience by sharing the full video of his speech today."

Fight for the Future's video argues that if SOPA passed, Internet users could have been penalized for uploading or sharing the speech and "entire websites could have been shut down just for linking to it."

"[The video is] copyrighted so what we are doing technically is illegal," said Evan Greer, campaign manager at Fight for the Future, in an e-mail to Mashable. We'd more likely get a takedown notice than a lawsuit. Other versions of it have been taken down from YouTube. We think we have an excellent argument for Fair Use since it is clearly part of political speech and we are not making any money off it."

Mashable reached out to Cheng via e-mail for more on why Fight for the Future picked the "I Have a Dream" speech:

MLK Jr. fought for freedom for everyone  when I first heard his message, it changed me. Everyone should have the opportunity to see him speak. Hardly anyone wants to live in a world where something as inspirational and educational as Dr. King's speech can't be shared. And, Internet Freedom Day is about that. Learning and seeking knowledge is at the heart of what the internet is about it, and we're asking people to see and share the best of what has to be learned, albeit doing that it is illegal.

Dr. King, perhaps, would have agreed with Fight for the Future's tactics.

"One has not only a legal but a moral responsibility to obey just laws," he famously wrote in his Letter from Birmingham Jail. "Conversely, one has a moral responsibility to disobey unjust laws."

Access the video here: "MLK's 'I Have a Dream' speech is copyrighted. Share it anyway."

Other activity being planned for Internet Freedom Day can be found at InternetFreedomDay.net. Are you taking part? Why? Share in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The revised Instagram Privacy Policy and Terms of Service finally kick in on Saturday  and in case you missed it, the part where the service said it might sell your photos to advertisers has been redacted. You can relax on that front.

The only major change for users? Instagram is now allowed to start sharing their data with its parent company, Facebook.

"Our updated privacy policy helps Instagram function more easily as part of Facebook by being able to share info between the two groups," the company wrote on an unsigned blog post.

"This means we can do things like fight spam more effectively, detect system and reliability problems more quickly, and build better features for everyone by understanding how Instagram is used."

The changeover also means your Instagram pictures will be fully hosted on Facebook's servers for the first time. Previously, the pics were hosted on Amazon Web Services.

No doubt Instagram will lose a few users who aren't fans of Facebook. That may be offset by continuing growth, however.

The company also announced Thursday it has 90 million monthly active users as of January, which it said was a 10% increase over December.

Readers with sharp memories may recall Facebook founder Mark Zuckerberg throwing out the figure of 100 million Instagram users back in September. However, that number referred to the service's registered users.

All Instagram user-figure announcements before that, such as the 80 million mentioned in July, also referred to registered users. Monthly active users is a more accurate reflection of the service's popularity.

Instagram won't say how many registered users it currently has, so we can't do an apples-to-apples comparison. However, if it's anything like other social services such as Twitter, the total of accounts is likely to be roughly double the monthly active number.

Will Instagram be hurt or helped by the fact that it is joining its data to Facebook's? Sound off in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Friday, Jan. 18 marks the one year anniversary of the technology community's Internet blackout over the Stop Online Piracy Act (SOPA) and its sister bill, the PROTECT IP Act (PIPA). SOPA was intended to curb online content piracy, but Internet advocates warned it would have disastrous consequences for online free speech and worked to fight the bill. SOPA was shelved by its author soon after the blackout.

The story of SOPA's demise has become such an integral part of the Internet advocacy canon that some opponents of the bill decided the date of the blackout deserves to be documented with a holiday: Internet Freedom Day.

Internet Freedom Day was first proposed by lawyer Marvin Ammori in an early January op-ed for Wired, in part as a celebration of Internet advocacy and the SOPA saga but also of the Internet itself.

"So it's shocking that we don't already have an unofficial Internet Freedom Day, or even an official holiday like we do for the Fourth of July, given that the internet is one of the most revolutionary technologies the world has ever known," wrote Ammori.

The idea spread though technology advocacy circles, prompting many of the most well-known organizations in the field to participate. Fight for the Future is engaging in civil disobedience around digital copyright and organizing a Thunderclap around the Twitter hashtag #InternetFreedomDay. Ammori, author of the Wired op-ed, has released a free eBook entitled On Internet Freedom. The Electronic Frontier Foundation is holding an Ask Me Anything on Reddit, where much of the initial grassroots organizing against SOPA began. Real-world events are planned for San Francisco and Washington, D.C.

SEE ALSO: 'I Have a Dream' Posted in Defiance of Copyright for Internet Freedom Day

Internet Freedom Day has also taken on an unexpected meaning to the technology community: It's become, in part, a celebration of the life of Aaron Swartz, the 26-year-old programmer who took his own life before his trial over computer fraud allegations was set to begin.

Swartz believed wholeheartedly in the principles of an open Internet and public access to knowledge, ideals shared by many in the technology community. He also played a key role in the defeat of SOPA, founding advocacy organization Demand Progress to lobby against the bill. Accordingly, InternetFreedomDay.net, where Internet Freedom Day activities are being listed, is dedicated to Swartz's "incredible contributions to freedom, justice, and transparency." A memorial service for Swartz is being held Saturday in New York City.

The anti-SOPA movement started as a grassroots movement among a small group of concerned Internet-savvy citizens. It quickly grew into a powerful movement with the support of such Internet titans as Google and Wikipedia, the former putting a link with details about the bill on its homepage and the latter having blacked out its English-language site on Jan. 18, 2012. All told, 7 million people signed various petitions against the bill and nearly 1 million people made phone calls to Congress about it.

The movement has since been a case study in the political power of the Internet, allowing people with niche but similar interests to rally together in an organized and politically effective fashion. To some, it's an example of old-school political organizing's evolution in the digital era  though a few observers have questioned whether Google and Wikipedia's involvement in the movement disqualify it from "grassroots" status.

Are you celebrating Internet Freedom Day? How? Share in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Sharp has cut production of 9.7-inch iPads possibly to accommodate increasing demand for the iPad Mini, according to a report.

Reuters reports that production at Sharp's Kameyama plant in Japan is now at the minimal level for the larger screens and the slowdown began in late 2012. However, it was unclear whether the shift in production was because of a lag in post-holiday-season seasonal demand or an expanding consumer preference for the iPad Mini.

While analysts estimate that Apple sold between 19 million and 30 million iPads in its fiscal first quarter (which coincides with the calendar Q4), analysts are predicting a drop-off in fiscal Q2 of as much as 40% for iPad unit sales.

Meanwhile, there may also be a fair amount of sales cannibalization as consumers opt for the cheaper iPad Mini. KGI Securities analyst Ming-Chi Ku, for instance, predicts that 8.2 million of the 23 million iPads shipped in fiscal Q1 were iPad Minis.

The speculation  along with other reports of production slowdowns at Apple  are one potential factor bedeviling Apple's stock price, which has slid under $500 recently. Despite the somewhat gloomy outlook, though, analysts are expecting Apple's Q1 earnings to possibly be its best ever. The company is set to report earnings for that quarter on Jan. 23.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Joe Biden's TransAm driving, f-bomb-dropping alter ego made an appearance on Reddit Friday afternoon for an Ask Me Anything (AMA) sesh with the people.

SEE ALSO: Internet Raises Money to Buy Jort-Sportin' Joe Biden a Trans-Am [VIDEO]

"Diamond" Joe Biden is a creation of the The Onion, who instigated the AMA to promote the release of the "hot-shit Kindle Single" faux-tobiography The President of Vice.

You are welcome to ask me anything about the book, how to round up tail and make them wail, my Trans Am, things you can make into a pipe, Barack, or where we can hook up later if you're a smokin' hot mamacita. I'm fairly hammered right now so I'll try to answer as many of your questions as I can before I pass out. I don't know what other crap I'm supposed to type here. Please buy this book or some real rough dudes are gonna hurt Joe real bad. Until then, grab a brewski and enjoy the ride.

Despite the potty-mouthed VP impersonator's fiercest efforts, the real Joe Biden stole the show with a single tweet:
--------------------------------------------------------------
John Isner is six-foot-nine, America's best tennis player and holds the world record for longest match ever played.

Other than that, he's not so different from the rest of us  especially in his enjoyment of social media. Whether chatting with fans or tweeting about college sports or World Wrestling Entertainment, Isner is among his sport's more personable athletes on Twitter.

Isner was forced to pull out of this week's Australian Open with a knee issue, but that gave him some extra time to trade emails with Mashable. Read on to see how he first got into Twitter, who he likes to follow and what have been his most memorable experiences with social media.

You're a pretty active tweeter. How'd you first get into Twitter and are there any other social media platforms you enjoy as well?

I was first introduced to Twitter by my agent about two-and-a-half years ago. I wasn't that into in the beginning but it has definitely grown on me a lot. I never could have imagined that I would have over 120,000 followers like I do now. So it's all been a very cool experience for me. I am most active on Twitter and I also have a Facebook page that I update, just not as much. Instagram is an impossibility because I am one of the brave few who still use the BlackBerry. I actually prefer it over the iPhone, so I'll be sticking with my BlackBerry for a long time.

How do you see social media being most useful?

I use Twitter mostly to just interact with fans. One of the things I tweet the least about is tennis. I always find myself tweeting about everything but tennis. My Facebook page is the place to go to get more regular updates on my tennis. Some of my followers would probably prefer that I tweet more about tennis but I don't see that happening in the future.

I know you're a big fan of WWE, which is one of the more engaging social media sports brands. Are there any other teams and leagues your particularly enjoy following or keeping up with?

Yes, the WWE is something that I actively follow on TV and on Twitter. I was just never was able to grow out of that stage in my life and I still thoroughly enjoy it. As you mentioned, they're more active on Twitter than probably any company I've ever seen before. And it seems as though their superstars are also very active. They get through to their fan base extremely well and Twitter is a huge catalyst for that. I follow the Carolina Panthers, Carolina Hurricanes, Charlotte Bobcats. I'm extremely passionate when it comes to the Panthers and my Georgia Bulldogs, so I definitely keep a close eye on them through Twitter.

What's have been the most memorable things to come out of social media for you  either specific moments, or just in general?

I would say what's been most memorable for me on Twitter has been the opportunity for me to interact other athletes that I admire. I have 'met' athletes from all different sports and have sort of developed a relationship with them all through Twitter. So, for me, that has been very neat.

Do you have any rules about when you do and don't spend time on Twitter with regard to tournaments and competitions, or is pretty much always a part of your routine?

When I am at an event I don't have any rules when it comes to tweeting. Whether I'm at a small event or Wimbledon, I treat it all the same. I'll tweet just as I normally do. My followers would probably prefer I tweeted more about tennis, especially when I'm competing, but I don't see that happening anytime soon. 
--------------------------------------------------------------
Kim Dotcom's new service Mega has started to roll out for early-access users, revealing a wide-array of ambitious features and the service's premium prices, as reported by TechCrunch.

Mega is the new venture of the founder of the now defunct Megaupload, which was seized by the U.S. government almost a year ago. The service will launch to the general public over the weekend, but it's already available to some beta users. The features already available, among others, are mobile access, instant messaging and word-processing. Ingrid Lunden of TechCrunch explains that the site basically looks like a "simplified version of Dropbox."

SEE ALSO: Kim Dotcom Chooses New Zealand as Home for His 'Mega' Project

For basic, non-paying users, Mega will provide 50GB of space. For premium users, there will be three tiers of additional storage: 500GB, 2TB and 4TB for $13.29, $26.59 and $39.90 USD per month, respectively.

Many features are still unavailable and will probably be rolled out after the official launch. Mega will supposedly offer domain, hosting, and email services, instant messaging, a cloud-based Office-like suite and desktop and mobile clients. In other words, Dotcom wants Mega to be much more than an encrypted version of Dropbox. We'll probably find out more details over the weekend, when Mega goes live for all users.
--------------------------------------------------------------
"This is my body, and I can do whatever I want to it."

Lance Armstrong spoke those ambiguous words in a 2001 Nike commercial that has resurfaced after the disgraced cyclist admitted to doping in an interview with Oprah. The ad features Armstrong having his blood drawn and asking the question "What am I on?"

SEE ALSO: Lance Armstrong Interview Stirs Outrage on Social Media

Sorry, Lance, but the Internet never forgets.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Internet guru and academic Lawrence Lessig wrote a new blog post, sharing his feelings a week after Aaron Swartz's death and addressing Swartz's prosecutor's statement.

"Why was he being charged with 13 felonies?" Lessig asked.

In an emotional post, Lessig confesses that he hasn't slept since finding out about his friend's death. "I have been frantically trying to explain, to connect, and to make sense of all of this," he wrote. And even though there have been smiles in the midst of these sad times, that hasn't been enough.

"But these smiles have been drowned by endless sadness, and even greater disappointment  and none more pronounced than the utterly profound disappointment in our government, Carmen Ortiz in particular," he wrote.

Comparing Ortiz's response to that of Massachussets Institute of Technology's president Leo Rafael Reif, who announced he would open an investigation into the school's role in Swartz's prosecution, Lessig wrote:

I hate my perpetual optimism about our government. Aaron was buried on the tenth anniversary of the time that optimism bit me hardest  Eldred v. Ashcroft. But how many other examples are there, and why don't I ever learn? The dumbest-fucking-naive-allegedly-smart person you will ever know: that guy thought this tragedy would at least shake for one second the facade of certainty that is our government, and allow at least a tiny light of recognition to shine through, and in that tiny ray, maybe a question, a pause, a moment of "OK, we need to look at this carefully." I wasn't dumb enough to believe that Ortiz could achieve the grace of Reif. But the single gift I wanted was at least a clumsy, hesitating, "we're going to look at this carefully, and think about whether mistakes might have been made." [...] Ortiz's statement is a template for all that is awful in what we as a political culture have become.

Lessig then goes on to argue that Swartz's crime was political and "his harm was exactly none." For that reason, he compares the treatment Swartz received to that of Martin Luther King Jr. Lessig notes that King was never convicted of any felony, and he was only charged with two "bogus" charges, of which he was acquitted. In Lessig's eyes, Swartz received a far worse treatment.

SEE ALSO: Congresswoman: 'Aaron's Law' to Honor Aaron Swartz Is Only the Beginning

"This is a measure of who we have become. And we don't even notice it. We can't even see the extremism that we have allowed to creep into our law," Lessig writes, before dealing a tough blow to Ortiz. "And we treat as decent a government official who invokes her family while defending behavior which in part at least drove this boy to his death."

Lessig also had a final message for Swartz. "I will always love you, sweet boy. Please find the peace you were seeking. And if you do, please find a way to share that too."
--------------------------------------------------------------
As the strange story of Notre Dame football star Manti Te'o and his fictional dead girlfriend unfolds  and becomes even more complicated and bizarre  jokes about the incident continue to bubble up across the Internet.

Piggybagging on the Teoing trend, Funny or Die has posted its own parody video to the tune of those hokey eHarmony ads. An actor playing Te'o pretends to feed his imaginary girlfriend strawberries, gives her flowers and discusses their love.

It was revealed earlier this week that the linebacker's girlfriend Lennay Kekua, who of leukemia after being severely injured in a car accident, never existed. Their story of love and loss captivated Americans' hearts this past football season, but as the truth spills out about her false identity, it's up for debate if Te'o is a victim or perpetrator in the hoax.

SEE ALSO: The Manti Te'o Lesson: We Are All Catfish

"The chemistry was there from the start," the actor says in the video. "I talk about her so much, people say, 'I want to meet her. Is she real? Have you actually met her? Is it a hoax?' Because she is just that amazing."

What do you think of the video? Let us know your thoughts in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
If life is a song and all of us live online, what exactly would the musical be like?

Would a Keanu Reeves-like figure belt out "Good Morning, Interwebs" with the same amount of pep as the first scene of Hairspray? Is there an OK Cupid love ballad somewhere in the mix? Does Ermahgerd Girl become the next swan of My Fair Lady?

These are the kind of questions we ask you while participating in the return of MashTags. This week's theme is #WebMusicals.

Use the hashtag on Twitter, not in the comments. We'll showcase the funniest hashtagged tweets below. The top three will be retweeted from @mashable.

Be sure to follow our Watercooler account, which will also retweet some of our favorites.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Call it the ultimate in high art: Using a well-timed laser, NASA scientists have beamed a picture of Leonardo da Vinci's masterpiece, the Mona Lisa, to a powerful spacecraft orbiting the moon, marking a first in laser communication.

The laser signal, fired from an installation in Maryland, beamed the Mona Lisa to the moon to be received 240,000 miles (384,400 km) away by NASA's Lunar Reconnaissance Orbiter, which has been orbiting the moon since 2009. The Mona Lisa transmission, NASA scientists said, is a major advance in laser communication for interplanetary spacecraft.

"This is the first time anyone has achieved one-way laser communication at planetary distances," David Smith, a researcher working with the LRO's Lunar Orbiter Laser Altimeter  which received the Mona Lisa message  said in a statement. "In the near future, this type of simple laser communication might serve as a backup for the radio communication that satellites use. In the more distance future, it may allow communication at higher data rates than present radio links can provide."

The LRO spacecraft was the prime choice to test out the novel communication method because the spacecraft was already equipped with a laser receiver. While most spacecraft exploring the solar system today are tracked using radio signals, NASA is tracking LRO via lasers as well.

But the timing had to be just right.

NASA used its Next Generation Satellite Laser Ranging station at the Goddard Space Flight Center in Greenbelt, Md., to send the Mona Lisa signal to LRO. The team divided the famous da Vinci painting into sections measuring 150 by 200 pixels and then transmitted them via the pulsing of the laser to the orbiter at a data rate of about 300 bits per second.

Once the lunar orbiter received the image, it reconstructed the photo, corrected for distortions created as the laser signal zipped through Earth's atmosphere, and then sent the image back to Earth using its normal form of communication: radio waves.

"This pathfinding achievement sets the stage for the Lunar Laser Communications Demonstration," Richard Vondrak, another researcher with the Lunar Reconnaissance Orbiter said, "a high data rate laser-communication-demonstrations that will be a central feature of NASA's next moon mission, the Lunar Atmosphere and Dust environment Explorer."

The Lunar Atmosphere and Dust Environment Explorer is slated to launch toward the moon later this year and will focus on mapping the lunar atmosphere and environment.

This article originally published at Space.com here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Farewell, then, Rapiscan machines at airports. It's been genuinely horrible to know you (or rather to not know you, hidden TSA agents in back rooms). If we see invasive public technology of your kind in a hundred years, it'll be too soon.

After quietly removing many Rapiscans late last year, the TSA admitted Friday it was junking all 174 of them, $40 million worth of machinery, from airports around the U.S.

The agency made it clear it wasn't doing so voluntarily. Rapiscan was set to miss a deadline to turn all its scanners into ones that use generic cartoon images of bodies, a deadline mandated by Congress. (No, that isn't a typo: Congress did something right.)

The agency is keeping its L-3 Communications machines, the ones that use radio waves instead of X-rays. These scanners don't show you; they show a stick figure. Areas of the figure's body light up if the radio waves detect a suspicious object in any area.

No, they may not be the best solution, and they warrant further investigation, but at least everything's above board with the L-3s. You can see the stick figure for yourself when you leave the machine. Functionally, it's the same as using a "point to where the problem is" doll.

Rapiscans (was there ever a more darkly appropriate name?) were the machines that transmitted a naked image  a far from generic one of you, with your true outline and skin folds  to a back room. There, low-paid agents probed the fleshy X-rays for anything that looked like suspicious equipment. Personnel were supposed to give warning before leaving or entering the room, thus no supervisor was allowed to barge in on them.

What could possibly go wrong?

Anything and everything, as it turned out. Despite the TSA's best efforts to soothe us (see the head of the agency's labs who volunteered for one of the early press images, above) it was the TSA itself that was at the forefront of letting us know what was going wrong.

An anonymous ex-TSA agent reportedly wrote this blog post detailing what went on behind the scenes  in clouds of vapor smoke from e-cigarettes agents made crude remarks about the bodies they were seeing. And yes, occasionally they would step outside where they could see passengers who'd just walked through the Rapiscans.

No wonder legal experts doubted the scanners were constitutional under the Fourth Amendment  especially given possible adverse health effects from the X-Rays.

It got worse. In 2011, a Dallas-Fort Worth TSA agent was able to carry a handgun through Rapiscan scanners multiple times without the weapon being detected. In that case, the screening agent wasn't paying attention. But it didn't seem to matter if they were.

Look no further than the videos of blogger Jonathan Corbett, who detailed how he'd been able to strap sidearm-like metal objects to the side of his body that weren't detected because of the white-on-black nature of the image:

So the scanners were creepy, privacy violating, possibly unconstitutional and useless. How did they make their way into our airports in the first place? Because of powerful lobbyists  most notably former Homeland Security chief Michael Chertoff, whose Chertoff Group represented Rapiscan Systems. You don't really need to connect too many dots here.

Let the Rapiscans, then, be the high water mark. Let this stand as a warning for generations. The TSA shouldn't send the old machines back; they should be placed in museums so we never forget this disreputable chunk of our history. Let children be told: This was how bad things got for a few years in the 2000s, when we were so afraid we forgot about fearing fear itself. But we decided en masse that it was unacceptable, dehumanizing, and we never did it again.
--------------------------------------------------------------
NHL hockey finally returns on Saturday after a drawn-out lockout that had many fans hurting almost as bad as a puck to the face.

So if you're a fan who wants to make up for months of lost hockey by compensating with that much more NHL action, the digital subscription service NHL GameCenter may be for you. It's not exactly cheap at $49.99 for the shortened 48-game season, but that money does get you pretty much everything NHL-related.

You'll be able to watch live streams of not just your favorite local team, but out-of-market games as well. You can also replay games you wanted to catch but weren't able to, saving space on the DVR for other important programming like Workaholics. Both home and away audio feeds are available, so you can decide whose slant you want on the action. Personalization features, meanwhile, allow for customizable news delivery about specific teams and players. Split-screen capability lets you double-dose on the hockey, while more than 800 classic games let you relive some of the best face-offs in NHL history.

There's not shortage of ways to access all that content either. GameCenter is available as an app for both iOS and Android devices, as well as XBox 360, Apple TV, PlayStation and more. For the full list, click here.

While the NHL season was finally saved, the lockout did provide a number of social media moments that reflected fans' dissatisfaction with the ordeal. In October, a meme fail by the NHL's Instagram account drew some angry backlash. In early December, when an agreement seemed reachable, a parody lectern Twitter account reflected many fans' angst. And a viral Nike ad a few weeks later struck a defiant tone.

Would you consider buying NHL GameCenter? Let us know why or why not in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The NHL returns after a long hiatus on Saturday, and SportsCenter is celebrating the occasion with a new ad that debuted on YouTube Friday featuring New York Rangers goalie Henrik Lundqvist. But he's not the only big-name guest star  this spot also includes the famous Swedish Chef from The Muppets as ESPN's new in-house cook. Like Chef, Lundqvist hails from Sweden, so the ad's premise is that he's the only one who can understand the new kitchen master.

SEE ALSO: Hilarious ESPN Ad Shows Why it Sucks to be Michael Jordan [VIDEO]

ESPN's long-running line of "This Is Sportscenter" ads have for years taken a goofy fictitious look at the legendary show's behind-the-scenes productions. This is just the most recent in a number of really funny spots produced over the years, including one from September that had many sports fans calling it the best of all time.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Nike+ FuelBand is partnering with the popular calorie tracking app Lose It!, it was announced on Friday.

Now, people who wear the Nike+ FuelBand can see their activity on the Lose It! app. This way users can access both the calorie-tracking abilities of Lose It! and the fitness-tracking data of their Nike+ FuelBand for a more comprehensive fitness and health profile. You can learn about how to sync your Nike+ FuelBand to Lose It! on the company's support page.

The fitness-tracking space is packed full of apps and gadgets that compliment each other well. It seems developers have realized it's best to let consumers share their personal health and fitness data from app to app, rather than requiring they only use the app associated with the gadget. MyFitnessPal, Fitbit, other fitness app and gadget makers have partnered to let people sync information across apps.

Lose It! is a tracker to record your calories in (meals) and calories out (exercise). It has a number of features that make entering this data less time consuming, such as remembering which foods and meals you enter often. You can also use the barcode scanner to quickly enter nutritional information from a box or carton of food. The app will remind you when you forget to log a meal, which might explain the app's success rate for helping people lose weight: 15 million pounds lost and counting, according to its website. The app is free and available on iOS and Android devices.

Good news for Mashable commenters who said they'd like to see Nike make an Android app to pair with the FuelBand  the Lose It! app is available for both Android and iOS.

What fitness or health app would you like to see work with the Nike+ FuelBand next? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It's a little-known fact that President Barack Obama and official White House photographer Pete Souza made a bit of history in 2009 by releasing the first official presidential portrait taken with a digital camera instead of painted on canvas.

The new portrait features Obama, arms crossed and smiling, in front of his desk at the Oval Office. It was shot on a Canon 5D Mark III.

Obama's new portrait is a much different take on the president than Souza's 2009 take, which showed a content but not beaming Obama:

Think you've got a good caption for Obama's new presidential portrait? Download the pic above, add the funniest caption you can think of and post it in the comments below. Mashable will add a gallery of our best reader-submitted content to this post. Get captioning!
--------------------------------------------------------------
Pandora users created over 1.6 billion stations over the course of 2012, and listened to over 1 million different songs by over 100,000 different artists. All that added up to an astounding 13 billion hours of songs listened to throughout the year by a pretty amazing amount of people  10,000 of the artists who have songs on Pandora had more than 250,000 unique listeners.

"When we created the Music Genome Project thirteen years ago, we had a dual purpose: connect people with music they love and help talented artists find their audiences," Pandora Founder and Chief Strategy Officer Tim Westergren said in a blog post announcing the numbers. "We knew if we could get the first part right, the second would naturally follow."

This year Pandora faced scrutiny from those artists, who claimed the company wasn't appropriately compensating them for their work. In response Pandora detailed the compensation for several artists who are highly compensated on the service. For instance, Pandora claims that Lil' Wayne has made almost $3 million.

A big part of Pandora's growth is the service's integration into other devices and services, allowing people to connect with their favorite music almost anywhere.

Pandora was available in more than 1,000 different devices  at this year's CES, the most common of those devices being mobile gadgets.

125 million of Pandora's users have listened to tunes on the service using a smartphone or tablet. Pandora is available for the iPhone, Android devices, and things like the Barnes & Noble's Nook and the Amazon Kindle.

Not just for phones and tablets, Pandora also comes standard in a number of major automobiles, and is available in more than 760 consumer electronics devices ranging from Blu-ray players to a refrigerator made by Samsung.

Let us know where you listen to Pandora in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Some jobs are so easy, a monkey could do it. Don't underestimate your animal's abilities, though, because he may actually be able to hold down a regular 9-to-5.

Animals have long been trained to carry out tasks, acting as beasts of burden or herders. But you might be seeing them more around the workplace these days  then who knows who'll be getting that next promotion?

SEE ALSO: 12 Animals That Ran for Political Office [WOOF]

At the risk of being spit on, you can get a llama to carry your golf clubs, or ask that a monkey serves your lunch. From Navy dolphins to a cheetah ambassador, check out our gallery of pets with careers (that are probably cooler than yours).
--------------------------------------------------------------
Did you know that someone has literally been fighting for your right to party?

Or for legal use of the term "power hour," anyway. It's commonly known as a drinking game, during which players take one shot of beer every minute for an hour. The term was actually trademarked in 2010 by realtor Steve Roose, who markets a DVD game named "Power Hour."

Musician and party enthusiast Ali Spagnola has spent the past three years battling Roose over use of the term. Spagnola has an album titled Power Hour, that doubles as a drinking game. She developed and manufactured a shot glass USB as a way to distribute it.

SEE ALSO: Check Out This Keyboard Made of Beer Cans

In a very lengthy blog post about the entire process, Spagnola writes that she initially signed a contract allowing Roose to manufacture and sell her DVDs on his website and in stores. According to the post, Roose soon after dropped her product to focus on his own and then sent the "first of many" cease and desist letters.

Others using the term for business, such as the website Power Hour HQ and iPowerHour, also received cease and desist letters. Roose successfully had Power Hours taken down from YouTube, websites and software. Spagnola's album was removed from Amazon.

With help from Power Hour HQ founder Pete Berg, the Reddit community responded quickly to support the case. Roose backed down in 2010, but the court did not officially release the trademark until Dec. 31, 2012. Spagnola raised $5,700, but spent more than $30,000 throughout the long process.

To celebrate, Spagnola is planning the Power Hour Freedom Victory Tour. The campaign, launched on Indiegogo, lets donators decide what cities she will tour. The goal is to visit 20 cities, but Spagnola says that it depends on the amount raised.

"If I'm fortunate enough to raise a ridiculous amount over my goal, I have plans to bring a full band with me, go to cities outside the U.S., get a tour bus, lighting, maybe some pyrotechnics and turn the show into an even bigger extravaganza," says Spagnola.

BONUS: 5 iPhone Cases That Can Open Your Beer
--------------------------------------------------------------
Looks like Thomas the Tank Engine had the right idea all along. "I think I can" may be the best way to mentally achieve world domination.

According to ASAP Science, each thought we have can actually change the structure and function of our brains. And, no, they don't mean metaphorically; they literally mean thinking that you can do something and being positive about it will alter your brain.

Eventually the power of your thoughts could help you, for example, learn the piano or even increase muscle mass in your body.

And the next time you forget to write that midterm paper just let your professor know you've thought it all up in your noggin  it's pretty much the same.

SEE ALSO: This Brain-Sensing Headband Lets You Control Things With Your Mind

Granted, ASAP Science does remind us that while thinking is the first (and potentially the most important step), the psychical follow-through doesn't hurt.

Bet your mind is blown, but just don't actually imagine that happening  could be dangerous.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Dazzling green, purple and turquoise auroras glimmer in the sky over Iceland while a man proposes to his girlfriend in a new time-lapse video.

Neuroscientist Alex Rivest shot the amazing aurora time-lapse video, which featured his own proposal, over several days and nights in September 2012.

"On a trip to Iceland I asked my girlfriend to marry me under the aurora borealis," Rivest wrote in a video caption. "She said yes."

The couple is seen hugging after Rivest bows down on one knee toward the end of the footage, all while gorgeous displays of the Northern Lights dance in the night sky.

"Iceland is a pretty amazing place to watch the stars and the aurora," Rivest told SPACE.com.

The aurora borealis, as well as its Southern Hemisphere counterpart, the aurora australis, is created when charged particles from the sun hit atoms in Earth's high-altitude atmosphere, which are directed by the planet's magnetic field. The resulting light show has been dubbed the northern lights in the north, and the southern lights in the south.

Rivest has a Ph.D. from MIT and studies how brains form episodic memories. Rivest is also the founder of a non-profit called Blue Kitabu, which works to build sustainable schools in Ghana and Kenya. And of course, he's also an avid photographer and videographer.

The aurora time-lapse was shot with a Canon 5D Mark II and a Canon 40D, using a triggering device from pclix.com.

This isn't the first time an astronomical event has served as a backdrop for a marriage proposal caught on video. Last year, stargazer Shookie Basuroy proposed to girlfriend Rajeep while watching a total solar eclipse from a hot air balloon above Cairns, Australia, on Nov. 14.

Rajeep, like Rivest's girlfriend, said "yes."

This article originally published at Space.com here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Please don't tweet Goosebumps author R. L. Stine about the Ermahgerd meme. We know you want to share your knowledge of web culture with the master of children's horror fiction, but R. L. is hip to your silly memes and he doesn't get it.

SEE ALSO: Viral Video Recap: Funniest Memes of the Week

Mediabistro asked Stine about the web phenomenon that has everyone talking like a dog with braces eating peanut butter. Stine didn't seem terribly amused by the brace-faced fangirl, but that doesn't mean he can't have a little fun with it. It's free publicity, after all  or, erfer errll.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Living in a big city means germs bombard you in every subway car, taxi and cramped elevator. Seriously, urban air is like 7.6 percent phlegm  ask science.

While calling a city home means more people are randomly sneezing on your face, it also gives you access to certain services, like food delivery at all hours of the day. This little perk comes in handy when you're stuck in a tiny apartment hacking up mysterious green substances and wiping boogers off your face.

Food delivery service Seamless knows about cold and flu season. Since 2013 began  and flu germs really started flying  Seamless has seen a 35 percent increase in chicken noodle soup orders compared to January 2012. Orders for Gatorade, matzo ball soup and orange juice have all gone up as well.

Not only are sick people hungry, they're also quite miserable. Or at least that what you might conclude after taking a look at some of the special requests entered on their food delivery orders and provided to Mashable by Seamless.

I know I'm 20 feet from your side door but I've been sick in bed all day and I can't stand the idea of going outside! I'm really sick, can you write me a funny joke. please do not forget any of the condiments- you may charge for the onion chutney and the brown sauce because it is so important you sent them as we are trying to fight off the flu-thank you very much

And while many sick folks feel gross, that doesn't mean they've lost their courteousness.

I have the flu so please tell your delivery person so they can be careful about not getting sick from me. I apologize for making you walk all the way to the 5th floor! Please knock on door and leave bag outside next to door - I'm sick and don't want to get delivery person sick. Please ring intercom and leave food on porch! We are sick and don't want to spread germs :-). Feeling sick! Leave it just inside the front door (perhaps on the dryer, which sits on the porch) if you'd like to avoid contact.

Some sickies even have really nice friends that order food for them.

Please give him a hug. He is sick. Can you write a card? Please say: Roses are red. Violets are blue. I love chili all over you. My friend is sick and I am surprising her with this soup. She is not expecting it. Please tell her I love her. Please note that this is a get well present for a sick friend. Please assure him that the payment has already been made and tell him: "Your friends and colleagues wish you a speedy recovery''

And then there's the people who just want the delivery person to hurry up, bring some napkins and pack an extra side of love.
--------------------------------------------------------------
How many Facebook Likes does it take to get a puppy? Only a million.

Just two days after a pair of sisters launched a campaign on the social network to convince their father to get a puppy, the girls posted a picture and video of their new dog, Millie.

Earlier this week, the sisters encouraged Facebook members to Like a picture on their page titled Twogirlsandapuppy: "Hi World," read the message. "We want a puppy! Our dad said we could get one if we get 1 million likes! He doesn't think we can do it! So 'LIKE' this!"

It took just seven hours to reach their goal. It also catapulted the family into viral fame, with appearances on shows such as Good Morning America. On Thursday, the family visited the North Shore Animal League America on Long Island to see some of their rescued puppies.

SEE ALSO: 10 Things That Weren't Exactly What You Thought

"We had a great visit with five great dogs and the girls chose to take Millie home!" the sisters wrote on their Facebook page. "Thanks to those of you who suggested Millie for a million-vote puppy. We're so excited to welcome this new member to our household."

For a video of the family with their new puppy, click here.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Sony Corporation of America (a subsidiary of Sony Corporation) is selling its U.S. headquarters building in New York City to a consortium led by The Chetrit Group, the company has announced.

The price for the building, located at 550 Madison Avenue, is $1.1 billion. Sony will remain in the building for up to three years under a leaseback arrangement with the purchaser. The transaction is expected to close in March 2013.

Sony doesn't hide the reasons for the sale: it wants to "strengthen its financial foundation" and "improve its cash flow by carefully selecting investments, selling assets and strengthening control of working capital such as inventory."

The company has been piling up losses quarter after quarter in recent years. After paying off debt related to the building and other transaction costs, Sony expects to gain approximately $685 million, which will pump some blood into its balance sheet.

Sony doesn't plan to stop at this sale, though. Reuters reports the company is looking to sell its headquarters in Tokyo as well, for a similar price - $1.14 billion.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Jesse Draper is creator and host of The Valley Girl Show, through which she's become a spokesperson for startups and helped pioneer the way of new media content distribution. Formerly a Nickelodeon star, Draper is now CEO of Valley Girl, where she oversees the show and runs technology blog Lalawag.com.

In addition to Siri, Chevy added Tunein radio to its Spark and Sonic cars last week. Already available in the latest Ford and Tesla vehicles, this app appears to be all the rage in the auto industry right now.

Tunein is an app that streams radio stations from around the world. You can listen to all your favorite radio stations, including CBS, which recently extended its licensing agreement to include music stations. You're not limited to the stations within your local area, so you can listen to any of the local radio stations from your hometown whenever you are feeling nostalgic.

With stations spanning around the world, including Antarctica, Tunein currently has more than 40 million monthly users and 70,000 stations on AM, FM, HD and Internet radio.

One this episode of the Valley Girl Show, CEO Jon Dunham sits down with Jesse Draper to talk about the future of radio. How does he brainstorm? "You plaster a white board with everything you possibly can!"

More Video from the Valley Girl Show
--------------------------------------------------------------
Startups in the U.S. had a tougher time getting funding in 2012 than the year before, a new report suggests.

VCs invested $26.5 billion in just under 3,700 deals last year, a 10% decline in funding dollars and a 6% decline in the number of deals, according to a MoneyTree report by PricewaterhouseCoopers and the National Venture Capital Association, using data from Thomson Reuters. This the first time annual VC investments have declined in three years.

Cleantech and life sciences companies experienced the biggest dip in funding year-over-year  a decline of 28% and 15%, respectively. Meanwhile, Internet-specific companies  which accounted for 25% of all VC dollars for the year  received $6.7 billion in investments, down 5% from 2011. The number of funding deals for these companies also declined by 5% to 976.

Just as importantly, the number of young companies who received venture capital for the first time declined by 11% to 1,163 and the total amount of first-time financing given to these companies was down 24% year-over-year to $4.1 billion.

Tracy Lefteroff, the global managing partner for VC practice at PricewaterhouseCoopers, pinned the drop in funding to "general economic uncertainty" from the fiscal cliff and elections as well as investors "being more discriminating" with their funds, particularly when it comes to newer startups. "They're holding on to reserves to continue to support the companies already on their portfolio," Lefteroff said in a statement.

That doesn't necessarily mean the boom times are over for startups just yet. Software companies experienced a 10% increase in VC investments and an 8% rise in the total number of deals. Likewise, Internet companies still fared well overall. As the report points out, 2011 was a record year for investments in this category and even with the decline, 2012 still had the second highest annual investment in Internet companies since 2001.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Microsoft launched Windows 8 in the fall with attractive pricing  just $39.99 for Windows 7, Vista or XP users  but come February the price goes up. Way up.

After the promotional upgrade offer ends on Jan. 31, anyone running an older version of Windows will have to pay $119.99 for the privilege of running Windows 8, a Microsoft blog post reveals. And that's just the basic edition; if you want Windows 8 Pro, it'll cost you $199.99.

While it's a steep increase, jacking the price up on Windows 8 upgrades makes some sense. Although Microsoft has provided few details about how many machines are actually now running Windows 8, reports suggest the platform isn't performing as well as expected. By giving users a deadline, it encourages anyone on the fence to buy now, potentially giving adoption of the new OS a final big push.

SEE ALSO: The Problem With Windows 8

The new pricing plan has options than just the basic and Pro upgrade products. If you buy a PC with basic Windows 8 and decide to upgrade after the deadline, that'll cost you $99.99. And Windows 8 Pro users can add Windows Media Center and DVD playback via the Media Center Pack for $9.99.

If you're building a PC from scratch, none of these options are what you're looking for. Microsoft says you'll want the Windows 8 System Builder  a product usually reserved for OEMs  which typically runs around $100-$165.

If you're interested in upgrading to Windows 8 for cheap, there's still time. Windows 8 Pro costs just $40 for the next 13 days, or if you really want the DVD copy, you can buy one at retail for $69.99.

The full breakdown on the new pricing is below. Tell us what you think of Microsoft jacking up the price in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
During the winter months we're especially grateful for the technology that keeps us cozy. We have found 10 great gadgets, gizmos and geeky accessories that will help you beat the chill.

Whether you want to keep snug on the sofa or stay warm at your workplace, we think you'll find something to suit in our selection.

SEE ALSO: 10 Wicked Cool Snow Toys to Kick Winter's Butt

Take a look through our toasty-tastic selection of winter warmers in the gallery above. Let us know in the comments below how you stay warm when the cold weather hits.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Childhood obesity has tripled in the U.S. since 1980 for children and teenagers ages 6-19. Now, the CDC reports approximately 17% of children and adolescents ages 2-19 years old are obese.

One way you can make sure your children have a healthy start from infancy is to monitor their weight. A new scale from Withings, for babies and children, features Bluetooth and Wi-Fi technology so you can keep a record of all your child's weigh-ins. The Smart Kid Scale can be used from infancy to eight years old, and sends all weight information to an app on your smartphone. You can keep track of you child's growth and share that information with doctors. The app also allows you to enter your child's height and compare that to typical ranges for their age.

"With the Smart Kid Scale, we're hoping to bring the same positive outcomes we've seen in adults with weigh tracking to the adults of the future," cofounder of Withings, Cedric Hutchings, said in a statement. "We've made it very simple for parents to track the weight progress of their children and therefore giving them a tool that will assist in turning their children into healthy adults."

You can use a two piece interlocking baby basket that comes with the scale and remove it as your child gets older.

The Smart Kid Scale retails for $179.95. It works with the Withings Baby Companion app.

The Smart Kid Scale is Withings second product made for children. The first was the company's app-connected Smart Baby Monitor and Smart Baby Scale.

What tech gadget do you use to keep track of your child's growth? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It can be tough to keep up with all the new apps released every week. But you're in luck  we take care of that for you, creating a roundup each weekend of our favorite new and updated apps.

This week an addictive mobile game released a sequel, and a popular musical artist became the hero in another.

One airline released an app that's bound to make your next flight much more interesting, and another company unveiled a newsreader app that will make keeping up with things that are important to you even easier.

Take a look at the gallery above for a look at this week's app highlights.

Still looking for more? Check out our top apps from 2012 for more great apps worth a look. Think we left a great new app off the list? Let us know about your own app highlights from this week in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Hoping to create an AIDS-free generation and raise awareness of HIV/AIDS, a new social-media campaign is displaying tweets on a Times Square billboard and in an interactive art installation in midtown Manhattan.

When you tweet with the hashtag #ArchesofHope, your tweet will be part of an LED ticker tape (in the image above) in the installation and will be beamed onto jumbo screens in Times Square. The campaign is a joint effort between Lifebeat and the MTV Staying Alive Foundation.

"This is where we're at, it's all about social media. We're trying to promote safe sex and getting tests since that's not being talked about in the schools or the church or probably for some at home," said campaign spokesperson Sandra "Pepa" Denton, of "Salt-N-Pepa." She continued, "We encourage everyone to start tweeting and getting the message out."

SEE ALSO: Facebook Wants to Put You on a Times Square Billboard

The art installation, called Arches of Hope, consists of three white arches representing three decades of HIV/AIDS. The installation emcompasses the past (30 million deaths), present (34 million people infected) and future (zero infections) of the disease. The installation was designed by Italian architect Antonio Pio Saracino and conceived by Patrick Duffy, creative director of The Out NYC, where it's displayed. Arches of Hope is on display from Jan. 17 through Jan. 24 and the billboard will be illuminated for the same period of time.

"We've always tried to utilize music celebrities to put the message out there. Now the way the people we're talking to is through social media, through Facebook and through Twitter," said Lifebeat president Gary Dell'Abate. "We have to continue to grow and adapt to get our message out to the youth the best way we can, and social media would be it."

Is social media a good way to create an AIDS-free generation? Let us know in the comments if you think Lifebeats is onto something.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Is this what an assassination looks like? If this assailant's gun had fired, yes. But Bulgarian politician Ahmed Dogan was unhurt after an as-yet-unnamed assailant rushed the stage and attempted to shoot him with a small handgun.

Dogan is the leader of Bulgaria's opposition movement for Rights and Freedoms. As he addressed that group's congress on Saturday, an attacker attempted to shoot him but the gun reportedly "misfired," according to the Sofia, Bulgaria news agency.

The agency said Bulgaria's Socialist party (one of several parties in opposition to the Movement for Rights and Freedoms in Bulgaria) issued a statement condemning the assassination attempt. "What happened cannot be downplayed. This is an assault on democracy in Bulgaria and against everyone in Bulgaria," said the Socialists. They added, "We are deeply alarmed at the processes going on in society and at the possible destabilization of the country."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Boeing chose to use the most combustible of the standard lithium-ion chemistries on the market in its flagship 787 Dreamliner. The advanced aircraft is grounded around the world after a battery burst into flames.

The suspension of all 50 working Dreamliners follows a Jan. 16 emergency landing by an All Nippon Airways pilot after he smelled something burning, and saw a cockpit warning light up indicating a battery problem. It turned out that one of the plane's batteries had caught fire. Investigators are working to determine why  faulty wiring, design, system assembly, or the battery itself.

In the photo above, a leaking battery is carried out of an All Nippon Airways (ANA) Boeing 787 Dreamliner plane at Takamatsu airport on Janaury 17, 2013 after the plane made an emergency landing at the airport the day before.

Boeing, for whom the Dreamliner is key to the company's growth plans, has been the target of scrutiny because of a long series of failures in the aircraft. Now the glare is focused on its lithium-ion batteries. But blaming this type of battery for the fault would be like scorning all automobiles because of the Ford Pinto. In fact, lithium ion batteries are not all the same.

Experts note that Boeing chose to rely on a lithium cobalt oxide battery configuration for the 787, a chemistry that, while delivering powerful performance, has in the past been responsible for fires in laptop computers and cellphones. The 787 battery is manufactured by Japan's GS Yuasa, one of the most respected lithium ion battery makers in the world.

In its hybrid-electric Volt car, for example, GM chose to use a battery combining lithium with two ion chemistries  nickel manganese cobalt, and manganese spinel. China's BYD uses yet a third chemistry: lithium iron phosphate. What all three have in common, experts say, is that they are far less flammable than lithium cobalt oxide. "It's essentially due to the crystalline structure," Shu Sun, an analyst with Bloomberg New Energy Finance, told me in an email exchange. "The olivine and spinal structure of [lithium iron phosphate and manganese spinel] make them safer."

All five experts interviewed for this post also emphasized that, while the chemistry is important, safety comes as well in the design of the battery system and the electronics installed to govern its use. "I suspect the real problem lies in the cell assembly by [GS Yuasa] and, perhaps more important, the control circuitry design," said Ralph Brodd, one of the world's most respected battery experts.

Brodd said that Tesla, for example, uses a nickel cobalt aluminum chemistry. "Tesla developed a sophisticated algorithm to measure voltage, current and temperature for each cell in their pack," Brodd told me. "If one fails or acts up, it can disconnect that individual cell without interrupting the operation of the battery. That is what Boeing needs to do."

A Boeing spokeswoman, asked to respond to this, said, "Lithium ion batteries were selected after a careful review of available alternatives because they best met the performance and design objectives of the 787. There are multiple backups to ensure the system is safe. These include protections against over-charging and over-discharging."

The makers of vehicles and electronic devices make a choice in their battery selection, depending on their requirements: What chemistry will deliver electricity the fastest, with the most punch, and the longest period of time? Electronics can help correct for error if you get greedy and demand too much. But the chemistry does in fact matter. As one battery expert told me, "Batteries are inherently unstable devices (we call them 'charged' for a reason!)."

This article originally published at Quartz here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Another busy week is wrapping up, with big announcements from MySpace and Facebook, as well as shocking revelations from Lance Armstrong and Manti Te'o. If you missed any tech and social-media news, this weekend is the perfect time to catch up.

Luckily, Mashable has got you covered. We've compiled a list of the most important stories from the last seven days, including information on new apps, social-media updates and digital resources. So, sit back, relax and read on.

For more social media news and resources, you can follow Mashable's social media channel on Twitter and become a fan on Facebook.

For more business news and resources, you can follow Mashable's business channel on Twitter and become a fan on Facebook.

For more tech news and resources, you can follow Mashable's tech channel on Twitter and become a fan on Facebook.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Josh Tolan is the CEO of Spark Hire, a video powered hiring network that connects job seekers and employers through video resumes and online interviews. Connect with him and Spark Hire on Facebook and Twitter.

All your hard work and perseverance has finally paid off. The hours spent scrolling through job boards, the numerous takes on your video resume and the nights you stayed home to take part in an industry Twitter chat have all been leading up to this moment: You have a job interview with your dream company. Congratulations!

Take a moment to savor in your victory, but make sure it's just a moment. After all, there are still plenty of ways you can screw up this huge opportunity and lose out on the job of your dreams. Now is not the time for complacency. With an average of 118 applications for every open position being posted, it's a good bet you're not the only superstar candidate who made it to the next level.

Your resume, credentials, and networking powers have gotten you this far. But now it's time for the interview, which means a different sort of preparation. If you want to really kill it in the interview, whether that interview is in-person or through online video, here are some things you need to think about.

This might seem like old news, but just because it's obvious doesn't mean it's not important. You need to dress to impress when it comes to your interview. If your interview is through online video, you might think you can dress down a bit and worry a little less, but this certainly isn't true! Dress just as nicely as you would for an in-person meeting.

You'll also want to pay attention to the colors you choose before heading out the door or turning on your webcam. This isn't a fashion show, and some colors won't be right for an important job interview. You'll want to stick to conservative and neutral colors like browns and blacks. If you want to throw a little color in there, think about green, which is the color of money and can send a subconscious message that you'll be able to bring real dollar value to the company. Stay away from bright primary colors like red and yellow because you want your interviewer focused on your words, not your outfit.

However, if everyone is running around the company in t-shirts and jeans, it might be tempting to wear your best sneakers to the interview. But, keep in mind that you want to make a professional first impression, and always dress for a position several notches above the one for which you're interviewing. If you're interviewing at a creative, casual agency, make sure the attire you settle on is professional and conservative (although perhaps don't show up looking like a Wall Street power broker). Wait until you're hired to show off your more fashionable and fun side.

Now that you've decided on your interview attire, it's time to dig deeper into the organization. Read the company's stated values and objectives on its website. Search on the web and in trade publications to see if the company has achieved anything noteworthy recently, whether an industry award or opening a new branch. Look at the larger issues in the overall industry and compare your company of choice to see how they stack up. All of this research can give you great ideas for tailored questions to ask about the organization when the interviewer turns the floor over to you at the end of the meeting.

Perhaps another employee's experience can help you avoid a huge misstep or prepare you better for tricky questions. Ask questions on social sharing sites like Quora and LinkedIn Answers to see what experiences others have had at the company. You might also want to see what users have posted about the company on Glassdoor, where employees and candidates alike go to share information about companies from interview tips to salary ranges.

You can also use social media to connect with current and former employees to get the inside scoop. Send a polite message asking the contact if they have time to discuss the company and then pick their brains about the organization. This will help you get a better view of what the day-to-day life would be like at your dream job. Make sure you ask good questions, but always be tactful. You don't want to phrase your questions too negatively for fear you'll get evasive answers.

You might also want to consider asking those current and former employees you connected with about their working relationship with the boss. The leadership style of the boss can really impact the company culture, whether negatively or positively, so this is important information to know before heading into your interview. You want to enjoy your job, after all, which might be hard if you're managed by The Office's Michael Scott.

Finally, it's also important to do some research into your interviewer. Look them up on the web, read their company bio and find them on social media. Their social media presence might even help you gain insight into their interview style. Will they be more conversational or stay by-the-book and stick to their questions? Looking at an interviewer's social media profile can help you gauge how to interact with them in the interview setting. Plus, social media can help you connect with your interviewer before ever stepping foot in the office. You can share an interesting article or even discuss a recent trend to make a connection before the job interview begins.

Companies from Google to Amazon like to use tough questions to get candidates turned around during the interview process. This is because companies want to see how well you think on your feet under pressure. If you get a question about filling a bus with golf balls or what kind of animal you would be, don't panic.

Make sure your answer has some form of real-world value and show the employer how you think through a problem. For the animal example, you might say you'd love to be a cat because you like to work independently and set your own goals. You've now answered the question and brought it back to your own skills and qualifications, instead of just providing a wacky answer.

The most important thing to remember with tough questions is to always remain calm and collected. If you seem like you're going to pieces, the interviewer will think you can't handle the stresses of the office.

It's just as important for you to use the interview to find out about the company as it is for the employer to test you. Here are five questions you should make sure you ask to discover a little bit about the company culture before mentally decorating your office.

What do you like best about working for the company?

The answer to this question will tell you a lot about the company culture and the interviewer in general, which is important if your interviewer is also destined to become your boss. If the things they name off sound completely unappealing to you, this is probably not an organization you'll enjoy spending your 9-to-5.

How would you describe your company culture in five words?

This question might seem a bit obvious, but it's also helpful in learning just what the company values. The five words your interviewer chooses will most likely be the most important and prevalent aspects of the company culture.

What is the growth opportunity like for this position?

You want to have room to grow, learn and achieve in your new position. Asking about growth opportunity is both a good way to find out how much you can achieve and also brand yourself as a forward-thinking candidate. If the interviewer is a little light on details for how you can grow in the position or acquire additional education and training, perhaps career growth isn't in the cards at this company.

What are the qualities of your most successful employees?

This question will tell you the most important qualities you should possess in order to succeed in the company environment. For instance, maybe the ability to multi-task and thrive in a chaotic environment is essential. Or perhaps the ability to work as a team and communicate clearly is key. Listen carefully to these ideal qualities and consider what they reveal about the overall organization to see if you'd fit in.

What's a common misconception about the company you would like to clear up?

Almost every company is the victim of common misconceptions, whether it's about the company itself, the larger industry, or a specific department. For instance, a startup company might seem like all fun and games from the outside, but this just covers up the long hours and high stress levels of employees. Don't let perks like free lunch or an office gym stop you from finding out what life is really like at the organization. Your interviewer's answer will tell you both how the outside world views the organization and also how the company views itself.

There's plenty to remember before heading in for your important interview. If you follow this guide, you'll dramatically increase your chance of killing it in your interview and finally landing your dream job.

What are some of your tips for crushing it in the interview? Share in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It's here: Entrepreneur Kim Dotcom's long-anticipated file-sharing site, Mega, is open to the public.

Dotcom broke the news this morning with this tweet:

Mega is a follow-up to the entrepreneur's last endeavor, MegaUpload, which was shut down by the U.S. government one year ago, today. The new service will include mobile access, instant messaging and word-processing  similar to Dropbox  as well as hosting, email and domain-name services.

Basic, non-paying users of the site will get 50GB of space to use. Premium users can choose between three tiers of storage: 500GB, 2TB and 4TB, which respectively cost $13.29, $26.59 and $39.90 per month.

Traffic to the site is already overwhelmingly high. Dotcom tweeted an update, less than an hour after its launch, that said registration was flying in at thousands per minute:

Two hours in, he tweeted that the site's server capacity was on maximum load with 250,000 registrations:

You can register for yourself here. (It might take a few attempts; just keep hitting "refresh" if you have trouble.)

Here's a chart, courtesy of Statista, that shows the storage capacity of other free cloud services, compared with Mega.

Do you plan to use Mega? Tell us what you think about it, below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Paramount Pictures and Bad Robot Productions have picked up the rights for a movie about disgraced cyclist Lance Armstrong, Deadline reports.

The film will be based on the upcoming book Cycle of Lies: The Fall of Lance Armstrong by New York Times reporter Juliet Macur. She has covered Armstrong for more than a decade, from his original battle with cancer to his seven Tour de France titles.

SEE ALSO: Lance Armstrong Interview Stirs Outrage on Social Media

Bad Robot is owned by director J.J. Abrams, best known for his work on the newest Star Trek movies, Lost, Cloverfield and Super 8. It's unclear if the film will focus on Armstrong's life as a whole or just the recent string of controversial events.

The second of Armstrong's two-part confessional interview with Oprah Winfrey aired Friday night. Watch it in full here.

What do you think? Does this sound like something you'd watch?
--------------------------------------------------------------
It's the iPhone-case equivalent of Jennifer Lopez's infamous green Versace dress at the 2000 Grammy Awards: barely there.

The Radius is a minimalist covering that highlights the iPhone 5's design: "precise, simple and beautiful," according to its creators.

Designed to look like an "X," the case's frame is made entirely out of lightweight aluminum, and comes in either slate or silver. Its four "modules," which attach to the iPhone's four corners, are available in polished aluminum, red, cyan and slate.

The Radius' Kickstarter campaign ended Saturday, and raised around $56,000  more than double its original funding goal of $25,000.

Would you use this case for your iPhone 5? Tell us in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A new documentary on the rise and fall of Napster, the peer-to-peer file-sharing service that revolutionized the music industry, is set to debut at South by Southwest.

Downloaded will have its world premiere on March 10 at the Texas festival, according to VH1, which financed the film. A panel including director Alex Winter (best known as Bill of Bill and Ted fame), as well as Napster co-founders Shawn Fanning and Sean Parker, will follow the screening on March 12.

The film focuses on the birth of digital-media sharing, and charts Napster's tumultuous journey from its founding in 1998 to its acquisition by online music store Rhapsody in 2011. It also looks at how the service paved the way for iTunes, Spotify and other online music services.

"After more than a decade of declining sales of recorded music and imperfect attempts to present a licensed alternative, the influence of Napster continues to be felt," according to a SXSW description of the service.

SEE ALSO: The Social Music Network: Napster Documentary in the Works

Fanning and Parker teamed up again in 2012 to launch Airtime, a social video network that's reportedly suffering from a stagnant user base.

Parker, a major investor in Spotify, recently shared the stage with Metallica's Lars Ulrich, who famously spoke out against Napster. The two parties have an acrimonious history, with Ulrich filing a copyright-infringement lawsuit against Napster in 2000. The drummer also testified in front of the U.S. Congress, condemning online file-sharing at large. (Interestingly, Metallica has now put its entire catalog on Spotify.)

Do you plan to watch Downloaded? Tell us in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Think twice before skipping out on tipping your contractor, or else small businesses may end up blacklisting you.

A former landscape company owner created NastyClient.com, a rating and review website that lets businesses file reports against its customers. Turning the tables on consumers, creator Matt Stachel allows owners to tell their side of the story.

Sites such as Yelp or Angie's List give an open forum for consumers to rave or rant about their experiences, but platforms for business owners aren't as accessible.

After dealing with his fair share of nasty clients for more than 20 years, Stachel started the site two years ago.

"It wasn't necessarily one person or one story, it was a culmination of years of frustration and not having a resource for me that could help," Stachel tells Mashable.

Users on Nasty Client can file a report detailing their unfavorable experience, as well as a customer's name and location. At least 80% of reports deal with unpaid bills, Stachel says.

A cheated worker can have some harsh words to share, so reviews are edited for profanity and slang to prevent slander. Businesses can mail reports to the rogue client to make them aware of their Internet shame, and to inform them that other companies may not be too keen on working with them in the future.

The site also serves as a pre-screener. Users can look into a database of clients before making any deals. Similar to the infamous wall of shoplifters at your local supermarket, Nasty Client features an ever-changing "Top Offenders" list that highlights every business owner's worst-case scenario.

Professionals can share their woes for $15.99, which grants a one-year membership.

"Companies are so excited; they've had bad customers for years. It's painful to lose money, and you don't forget names," Stachel says.

He hopes to add an offline alert that informs users each time a new offender is added in their area. More than 3,000 businesses have signed up, with 6,000 reports submitted. Stachel says the site has garnered positive feedback from users through social media.

"There's always people on Facebook or email saying how much they love it and how it really helps, or how they had the same idea two years ago. It just goes to show how much something like this is wanted and needed."
--------------------------------------------------------------
On March 4, 1913, Woodrow Wilson took the oath of office. Nearly 100 years later, Barack Obama will take that same oath.

The U.S. presidential inauguration looks a tad different than it did a century ago. In 1913, women still did not have the right to vote and Wilson rode to the Capitol in a horse-drawn carriage. And don't expect to see President Obama wearing a silk top hat like Wilson either.

SEE ALSO: Watch Every President's Inauguration Since Reagan in 36 Seconds

Thanks to the digital archiving of government images, zipping through 100 years of presidential history doesn't even require a trip to the library. We've compiled the most memorable photographs and videos taken at presidential inaugurations since 1913 for a scrollable history lesson.

If you like your history well-aged, then there's also a special gallery at the bottom featuring images from inaugurations that occurred before 1913  including those of Abraham Lincoln, Theodore Roosevelt and Ulysses S. Grant.

"President-elect Wilson and President Taft, standing side by side, laughing, at White House prior to Wilson's inauguration ceremonies" Image courtesy of Library of Congress

"Telegram from Evangeline Booth, Commander of the Salvation Army" Image courtesy of Library of Congress

"Woodrow Wilson, Warren G. Harding, Philander Knox and Joseph Cannon, in convertible" Image courtesy of Library of Congress

"President Coolidge, Mrs. Coolidge and Senator Curtis on the way to the Capitol" Image courtesy of Library of Congress

Inaugural Program, Inauguration. Franklin D. Roosevelt President of the United States. John N. Garner Vice President of the United States. Image courtesy of Library of Congress

"Ticket for the 1937 inauguration, the first to take place on January 20th." Image courtesy of FDR Library

"Eleanor Roosevelt poses in her inaugural gown at the White House." Image courtesy of FDR Library

"Franklin and Eleanor Roosevelt riding in an open car, returning to the White House from FDR's third inauguration." Image courtesy of FDR Library

Excerpt from home movie of FDR driving and walking with assistance to take the Oath of Office on January 20, 1941.

"Crowd stands in snow for inauguration" Image courtesy of Library of Congress

"Truman and Barkley during Inaugural parade." Image courtesy of Truman Library

"Ike responds to cheers of crowd." Image courtesy of Library of Congress

"With smiles and a wave, President Harry Truman and his successor, Dwight D. Eisenhower, leave White House in an open car on way to Capitol for inauguration ceremonies." Image courtesy of Library of Congress

"President Eisenhower waves to the crowd" Image courtesy of Eisenhower Library

"Dwight Eisenhower and Richard Nixon watching inaugural parade with Anne & David Eisenhower and Julie & Tricia Nixon" Image courtesy of Eisenhower Library

"Dwight and Mamie Eisenhower attend the Inaugural Ball with John and Barbara Eisenhower" Image courtesy of Eisenhower Library

"President-elect John F. Kennedy shakes hands with Father Richard J. Casey, the Pastor, after attending Mass at Holy Trinity Church ... prior to inauguration ceremonies." Image courtesy of Library of Congress

"President Lyndon B. Johnson, Lady Bird Johnson, Lynda Bird Johnson, and Luci Baines Johnson preparing for Inauguration ceremonies." Image courtesy of LBJ Library

"Secret service agents try to hold back the crowds that surge forward to watch President Johnson dance with the First Lady at the inaugural ball at the National Guard Armory" Image courtesy of Library of Congress

"President and Mrs. Nixon waving to the crowd from the Presidential limousine in the inaugural motorcade" Image courtesy of Library of Congress

"1985 Inaugural Ball: President and Mrs. Reagan in National Air and Space Museum" Image courtesy of Smithsonian

"While the Clintons and Gores watch, Chelsea Clinton rings a replica of the Liberty Bell during festivities kicking off the Clinton/Gore 1993 Inaugural events." Image courtesy of Smithsonian

"George Bush and Bill Clinton shake hands just after the inaugural ceremonies at the U.S. Capitol." Image courtesy of Smithsonian

"President Barack Obama is given the Oath of Office for a second time by Chief Justice John G. Roberts" Image courtesy of Pete Souza/White House

"President Barack Obama and First Lady Michelle Obama share a private moment in a freight elevator at an Inaugural Ball" Image courtesy of Pete Souza/White House

"President Barack Obama and First Lady Michelle Obama ride in a golf cart at an Inaugural Ball" Image courtesy of Pete Souza/White House
--------------------------------------------------------------
A group of Michigan State University researchers have developed a robotic fish that, according to them, can swim practically indefinitely, gathering data on lakes and riverbeds.

The robot is called Grace, an acronym for Gliding Robot ACE and it's equipped with sensors to gather data and measure water's temperature and quality. Grace is able to autonomously swim both by flapping its tail as well as gliding through the water. This combination lets it travel long distances.

"Swimming requires constant flapping of the tail, which means the battery is constantly being discharged and typically wouldnt last more than a few hours," said Xiaobo Tan, the project's leading researcher. "This is why we integrated both locomotion modes  gliding and swimming  in our robot, Tan said. Such integration also allows the robot to adapt to different environments, from shallow streams to deep lakes, from calm ponds to rivers, with rapid currents."

SEE ALSO: Startup Wants to Use Drones to Deliver Medical Supplies

The researchers tested the robot fish last year in a Kalamazoo lake, where it swam and sent back its sensors' readings wirelessly.

If you want to know more about this underwater robot, check out the video above.

UPDATE: An earlier version of this article stated that the researchers who developed the robot were from the University of Michigan, they're actualy from Michigan State University.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Two of Samsung's best-selling tablets, the Galaxy Note 10.1 and Galaxy Tab 2, are finally getting the latest version of Google's Android 4.1 operating system, the so-called Jelly Bean version.

But Samsung has made it worth waiting for with the addition of Premium Suite, which the company says includes "dramatic improvements" to the tablet's multitasking features, as well as improvement to the S Pen stylus included with each device.

On the multitasking side, Samsung has now added several features that leverage the Galaxy Note 10.1's Multi Window view that lets you run two apps side-by-side.

The new Cascade View feature lets users freely resize, move and pin selected applications in multiple views, running them simultaneously or while operating the home screen.

Air View lets lets users easily preview content such as video, email attachments and photos without having to open the related apps.

And a new Quick Command lets users create customized and use preset shortcuts for the S Pen, using designated S Pen strokes, to launch apps and services.

Other new features include enhancements to the Galaxy's handwriting software that now lets you send handwritten notes via email as well as hand-write directly in the software's S Planner. So you could, for example, circle the date of an important upcoming appointment and write directly on the S Planner calendar (in monthly view only), just as you would on a paper version.

Samsung has also added templates for S Note designed to let users add effects to their digital content with Idea Sketch and also insert video directly into not only Note templates but also other templates.

This article originally published at TabTimes here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Since its public launch in mid-2011, Storify has become a favorite tool for digital journalists to compile photos, videos and status updates from across the web into an easy-to-read format.

But what about the information that's meant to remain private?

AGBeat reported that Julie Pippert, founder of Artful Media Group, discovered what she's calling a loophole in the process: private Facebook status updates that can still be collected and displayed on Storify.

Pippert came across the apparent glitch while using the Storify app. She said she was able to share a friend's private update, by clicking the "Storify" icon next to the "Like" and "Comment" links, and display it directly into her Storify feed  showcasing her friend's name and picture.

"I felt so terrible about what happened that I started digging and checking ... I figured out that although anything can be copied, screen captured or otherwise shared, anyone who installs the Storify app can do it with one click, even if it is marked or otherwise set to be private."

Storify users have always been able to pull information from people they're connected to on the web. The concern here, Pippert said, is that users of the app are able to bypass what's otherwise private on Facebook (say, a personal post in a private group.)

SEE ALSO: What Facebook's New Graph Search Means For Your Privacy

A Facebook spokesperson told Mashable via email that it isn't a "loophole," but instead a process similar to screen grabbing and reposting. Storify isn't getting any of the data through Facebook's APIs, the spokesperson said.

"The behavior appears to result from Storify users utilizing a browser extension that essentially cuts and pastes content available to that user to the Storify site ... This is not a result of the Storify application for Facebook."

Are you comfortable with your private Facebook posts being shareable through Storify? Tell us in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It was CES 2013 "hangover week" in the tech world this week. With the gadgets bonanza in the rear-view mirror, the top tech news stories were understandably lacking some gizmos. But fear not  the world of tech was still filled with exciting news.

The biggest announcement of the week was probably that Google Glass will finally be available for developers this very month, with two events planned in San Francisco and New York. So we'll soon know more about Google's secretive and futuristic project. The search giant also has new ideas regarding computer security. Or, more precisely, on how to replace passwords.

There were also a lot of somewhat weird tech stories, like the invention of ice cubes that can tell you when you've had a little bit too much booze  and text your friends to warn them. Or an alarm clock that sends you an electric shock to wake you up.

Oh, and Chevrolet unveiled the new version of its iconic Corvette, the 2014 Stingray.

Take a look at our Top 10 Tech This Week to see what else happened this week in the world of technology.
--------------------------------------------------------------
In the opening scene of 1997's Wild America, a young Jonathan Taylor Thomas nervously wades into a pool while his older brothers throw firecrackers at him. The guys are shooting a film, under the strict motto "Every Good Movie Needs an Explosion." Thomas, being the youngest, becomes the automatic stuntman.

Thankfully, those kinds of stunts aren't necessary anymore for cool effects  we've got YouTube instead.

Here at the office, we underwent the oh-so-strenous task of surfing the Internet to track down the best channels for DIY video effects (VFX) tutorials. (You're welcome, younger siblings.)

Many use high-end programs, like Final Cut Pro and Adobe After Effects. But if you don't have either, don't sweat it  you can download a free 30-day trial of After Effects on Adobe's website. For basic editing, the standard programs that come with Macs and PCs  iMovie and Windows Movie Maker, respectively  do the trick just fine.

SEE ALSO: 8 Essential Photoshop Tutorials on YouTube

Be warned: These guys make it look easy. If you're new to editing, it might take awhile to move as quickly as the videos. Regardless, the outcome will still be awesome  and you won't have to worry about losing a finger either.

The skinny: Freddie Wong, known best by the Internet as "Freddie W," is a Los Angeles-based filmmaker and VFX artist. He hosts two YouTube channels: freddiew and freddiew2. The first is a collection of his personal videos, and the second hosts his behind-the-scenes shots and tutorials. His movies generally include high-energy action sequences with gunfire, explosions and plenty of gaming culture references.

The skinny: Zach King launched the "Final Cut King" channel during college at Biola University Film School after noticing a lack of easy, DIY tutorials for Final Cut and related programs. Currently, his channel  which features both original videos and tutorials  has more than 225,000 subscribers. He takes editing related questions from fans  sometimes, he told Mashable, he'll get as many as 100 emails a day.

"I love doing these kinds of things because it's a really fast turn-around. You can be on to a next project in a couple of days," he said. "I'm A.D.D. like that."

Similar to Wong, King's videos include a handful of gaming and app references.

The skinny: VFX BRO, also based in Los Angeles, has been posting special effects tutorials on his channel since 2010. The tutorials focus heavily on background effects  3D, slow motion and object tracking  and give great introductions to a variety of editing software in addition to After Effects, such as Cinema 4d, Mocha Pro and Pixel Farm PFTrack.

The skinny: Corridor Digital's website bio,"Crazy action and visual fx? Heck yeah," sums it up nicely. The hosts, Niko and Sam, cover a wide range of action special effects  like explosions, muzzle effects and bullet hits  with their appropriately titled tutorial series "Shoot Your Friends."

The skinny: Surfaced Studio, like the others mentioned above, specializes in tutorials for action effects. Points of interest include zombie-like running effects, "blood hits" and 3D integration.

A few videos highlight the program Autodesk 3ds Max  originally, the software runs for around $1,000, but you can download a free trial on the company's website.

At Mashable, we're all about trying things out for ourselves.

We made our own short video, with Final Cut Pro and a free downloaded version of After Effects, using a few of the tips above. Again, if you don't have Final Cut, iMovie and Windows Movie Maker work just as well.

Using Freddie W.'s "Realistic Muzzle Flare" tutorial, we added a muzzle flare effect to the end of a Nerf gun. For extra fun, we even gave our adorable office dog, Holly, a fire-breathing makeover:

The sound effects and inserted images were all free from the Internet. Sweet Sound Effects, which is actually operated by Zach King, was where we found the audio clips, and we took the explosions from Detonation Films. We surfaced the muzzle image from a quick Google search.

Are there any good channels we forgot to include? Or, do you have any cool VFX videos you've shot yourself? Share them with us below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It's cold out and the days are short. What better time than January to get some quality time in on your favorite games?

While there weren't a lot of big retail releases over the last week, we rounded up five of the best things for you to spend your time and money on. There's something for everyone, including new offerings and games we've just recently discovered.

SEE ALSO: 'Temple Run 2' Is Necessary and Beautiful

Take a look at the list above for this week's suggestions. Let us know in the comments what you've been playing, whether it be on console, PC or mobile.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It starts with a fanny pack. Maybe the word "hip" or "rad" used in a misguided manner. If you're lucky, it stops there.

If not, you move on to the next round: cell phone clips, socks with sandals and tucked-in polos. Worst, of course, is the outdated dance moves in public ("Coolio Dogg  that's a thing, right?  I love his new CD cassette. It's totally fly, if you hear what I'm talking about, fellas. YOLMO!").

SEE ALSO: Somewhere Out There, Local News is Embarrassing Itself

Dads try their best. To be fair, it's not easy keeping up with the latest youngin' trends. We're just happy that, when the brave ones do try to keep up, there's always someone filming it.

If anything, we can take solace in knowing we'll reach that point someday ourselves. Hopefully we'll be too comfortable in our sweatpants and Crocs to care.

What's your most embarrassing dad story? Relive those blush-worthy moments in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Think you've mastered the dance moves to "Gangnam Style" from international phenomenon Psy?

This 7-month-old just might beat you in a dance-off. While the average baby this age is yet to master walking and talking, this tyke can surely be proud of his dance moves.

SEE ALSO: Gangnam Style! The Anatomy of a Viral Sensation

Watch above as he lassos and gallops along with the music. We just might have found the next great pop dancer.
--------------------------------------------------------------
When Facebook CEO Mark Zuckerberg rolled out Facebook Graph Search this week, what was he really thinking? Our friends Nitrozac and Snaggy at The Joy of Tech were somehow able to eavesdrop on his darkest thoughts, which they faithfully reproduced here in all their glory:

And we're not stopping there. In this very special Sunday Comics double feature, we also get the reaction of some ungrateful users of Facebook Graph Search:

And now, without even a hint of irony, feel free to share these comics on Facebook.

Comic illustrations provided by The Joy of Tech. Published with permission; all rights reserved.
--------------------------------------------------------------
In Silver Linings Playbook star Jennifer Lawrence's opening monologue on Saturday Night Live this weekend, she took material from her infamous Golden Globes moment when she said "I beat Meryl [Streep]" and many onlookers thought she was trash-talking the iconic American actress.

Lawrence explained that she was simply quoting from the movie The First Wives Club, and was not in fact defaming Streep.

"I would never trash-talk any of my fellow nominees at the Golden Globes, but the Oscars are another story. Ladies, I love you all, but you're about to get served," Lawrence said in her opening monologue.

Lawrence's fellow Oscar nominees for Best Actress include the oldest and youngest women ever to be recognized for the award  9-year-old Quvenzhan Wallis and 85-year-old Emanuelle Riva. The actress used the two ladies' ages as meat for her sketch.

SEE ALSO: 20 Hilarious 'Hunger Games' Memes Taking Over the Web

Directed toward the youngest-ever nominee, she said, "It's 9-year-old Quvenzhan Wallis, you think you can beat me, whatchu talkin' bout Wallis? Also the alphabet called they wants its letters back. Kabaam!"

And slamming the oldest ever women to be nominated, Lawrence said, "Emmanuelle Riva, from Amour: an 85-year-old French lady. Um, yeah, I think I can take you. You know what I say to your Oscar chances? Emanuelle Rivederci!"

How do you think Lawrence did in her first SNL appearance? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Stargazers looking up as darkness falls on Monday (Jan. 21) will notice an eye-catching pairing-off between two of the brightest objects in the nighttime sky, weather permitting.

The moon, appearing as a waxing gibbous phase, 78 percent illuminated, will appear to stand close below a very bright, non-twinkling, silvery "star." But it won't be a star that will be keeping the moon company on America's Inauguration Night, but the largest planet in our solar system: Jupiter.

Across much of the United States and southern Canada, this will be closest that the moon and Jupiter will appear relative to each other until the year 2026. On Monday night, the moon will be about of 248,700 miles (400,500 kilometers) from Earth, while Jupiter will be nearly 1,664 times farther out in space at a distance of 413.8 million miles (665.9 million km).

During Monday's stargazing event, observers have the chance to see what astronomers call an appulse  a very close approach of the moon to Jupiter. An appulse is a phenomenon caused by perspective only. There is no close physical approach in space between the two objects involved. Astronomers insist that appulses have no direct effect on the Earth.

The moon, moving around the Earth in an easterly direction at roughly its own diameter each hour, will creep slowly toward and ultimately pass just below the giant planet. Jupiter, meanwhile, will be shining about three times brighter than the brightest star, Sirius, offering a commanding sight for stargazers despite its close proximity to the moon.

Although it will be the moon that will be moving in Jupiter's general direction, the illusion will be that it is Jupiter that is moving, appearing to glide slowly along on a path taking it above the moon. A similar illusion occurs during a lunar eclipse when the dark shadow of Earth appears to be slowly creeping across the face of the moon. In reality it is the moon itself slowly creeping into the Earth's shadow.

After their closest approach Monday, the moon will spend the balance of the night moving slowly away to the left (east), leaving Jupiter behind.

From Boston, closest approach between Jupiter and the moon is at 11 p.m. EST. Separation is 0.62 of a degree or one and a quarter times the apparent width of the moon from Jupiter to the moon's upper edge. From Miami, closest approach is at 11:02 p.m. EST, the separation is listed as 0.33 of a degree or two-thirds of a moon's width separating Jupiter from the moon's upper edge.

From Halifax, Nova Scotia, an asterisk indicates that the closest approach between Jupiter and the moon comes after midnight on Tuesday (Jan. 22).

And here's another interesting illusion: For many places in the United States and Canada, Jupiter will be separated from the moon's upper rim by at least a half-degree (0.50)  equal to the apparent width of the moon. And yet visually to the eye, Jupiter will appear to be much closer; in fact, seemingly impossible that the gap that separates Jupiter from the moon's edge would be large enough to accommodate an object that is equal to the size of the moon itself.

Even from places like Boston, Montreal and Edmonton where the gap exceeds a half-degree, Jupiter will appear much closer relative to the moon's edge. Check it out for yourself.

If you own a small telescope, there are several stargazing opportunities to get a close look at Jupiter during Monday night's appearance.

According to Sky & Telescope magazine, Jupiter's Great Red Spot, a colossal storm bigger than the Earth, can be visible in amateur telescopes from 9 p.m. to 10:40 p.m. EST (6 p.m. to 7:40 p.m. PST/0100 to 0240 GMT). And Jupiter's icy moon Europa will cross in front of the planet, as seen from Earth, between 8:13 p.m. and 10:37 p.m. EST (5:13 p.m. and 7:37 p.m. PST/2213 and 2337 GMT). The best time for amateur astronomers to try and spot Europa's shadow on Jupiter via telescope will be between 10:22 p.m. and 12:46 a.m. EST (7:22 p.m. and 9:46 p.m. PST/0222 and 0546 GMT), the magazine's stargazing experts said.

"You'll also get an opportunity to attempt an unusual feat: spotting Jupiter in the late afternoon, before the Sun sets," said Tony Flanders, associate editor atSky & Telescopemagazine and host ofSkyweek on PBS, in a statement. "First locate the moon medium-high in the east; then look a few moon-widths left or lower left of the Moon for Jupiter. It should be easy to spot with binoculars if the air is clear."

Lastly, if you are lucky to be situated across a broad swath of central South America including French Polynesia, Pitcairn and Galapagos Islands an even more spectacular event will take place, when the moon will hide or eclipse Jupiter (called an occultation).

But don't fret if you miss the moon's occultation of Jupiter Monday night. Another one will occur on March 17, according to Sky and Telescope.

Photo via iStockphoto, JLuizmail. Composite/simulation of Jupiter's position on Monday night by Mashable.

This article originally published at Space.com here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Zach Supalla is founder and CEO of Spark, a hardware startup making products for the connected home, starting with connected lights. Zach has a background in product design and development, and he formerly worked at Groupon and McKinsey & Company.

On November 13, 2012, my company launched on Kickstarter. Thirty days later, on December 13, 2013, our Kickstarter campaign closed, with $125,588 raised from 1,601 backers. Because we had a funding threshold of $250,000, that means that the campaign was unsuccessful; credit cards will not be charged, and in a way, it's as if the campaign never happened.

However, in our first three hours of re-launching with our own pre-order site, we had $20,000 in pre-orders. In our first two days, we sold half as many units as we sold in our entire 30-day campaign on Kickstarter. And our startup is most definitely not the same company it was before the campaign. We've been featured on tech and gadget websites, we've been accepted into a hardware-focused incubator called HAXLR8R and we"re speaking with a number of interested investors and business partners. It"s pretty great.

In many ways, our Kickstarter campaign, despite not hitting our goal, was exactly what we needed. We got enormously valuable feedback directly from consumers and early adopters; we got great visibility; and perhaps most importantly, we learned a ton. Today I'm here to tell you what went well, where we struggled, and what we learned.

General reception to product. Before the campaign launched, I wrote in a blog post that the biggest question I wanted to answer was: When push comes to shove, will people take out their wallets, their hard-earned money, and actually buy our product? I am happy to say that the answer is a resounding yes. People like the product, they're excited about this space (the connected home), and they want more. We know our initial efforts weren't perfect (see below), but we now know that we should move forward with this product because people want it. Visibility. We were featured pretty much everywhere you could ask to be featured with a product like this. Lots and lots of people learned about us through articles in a variety of online publications, and we've got more lined up, including some long lead-time publicity-like magazines (I know; apparently some people still consume content on paper). Mostly, this happened through good old-fashioned hard work; we sent out a lot of emails (apologies to any journalist who saw me as one more email to deal with in their inbox. I love you all). Some of the publicity we got came from warm connections through investors and advisors; it's always good to have a warm lead. But mostly we got press because the journalists we spoke to said "This looks cool," which proved to us that our product is cool enough to generate buzz on its own. Investors. We created a $10,000 partner level on the campaign that said, "Hey, big spender. Let's talk." While we did not take any equity investments during the campaign, just having this on our Kickstarter site was enormously valuable, because it helped us start conversations with a dozen different angel investors, most of whom we are continuing conversations with today. Signaling that we were interested in and open to investment was big. Branding. We want our product to represent simplicity  a new, powerful technology that's incredibly easy to use. I think we did a good job expressing this in our Kickstarter video and campaign, and when we got comments about why people prefer our product to competitors' offerings, it was often this simplicity that mattered most. We've also got some press coming up that highlights this, where our product is being featured as a "tech product for non-geek.". As a geek myself I hope that it's also great for geeks, but when we want to see our product on the shelves at Target, the Apple store and Best Buy, it's important that we are perceived as an elegant and accessible technology.

We couldn't sell multiple units. A few weeks before we our campaign went live, Kickstarter published that Kickstarter Is Not A Store post and tightened the rules and restrictions on hardware products. Most of these changes didn't affect us, but the one that hit us hard was disallowing orders of multiple units. No matter how enthusiastic our backers were, they couldn't order multiple products. Right now on our pre-order site, the average order is for 2.3 units; if the average Kickstarter backer had ordered 2.3 units, we would have blown past our goal. I respect the changes that Kickstarter made and their reasons for doing so, but it's frustrating that we can so clearly point to this rule as being the make-or-break factor for our campaign. Our funding threshold was too high. Going on Kickstarter without funding in hand is incredibly risky. Too many products fail because they realize that the funding they asked for was not enough to cover their project expenses. We worked with Dragon Innovation to come up with a realistic budget, and there was no way to get the goal down below $250,000. Why so high? Well, we were conservative with some of our assumptions, because we didn't want to take risks with customers' money. We also excluded low volume manufacturing from the get-go because our product has an integrated, custom power supply, and that is not something you want us making in our garage. In the end, we decided that the risk of not being able to deliver to backers was more important than the risk of not hitting our goal. I'm glad that we made this decision, because if we had taken a risk and set a lower goal, although we would have looked more successful, we would now be scrambling to figure out how to deliver. Our price point was too expensive. One of the challenges of being a small hardware startup is managing your Bill of Material cost; it's hard to be cost-competitive with big companies when you're manufacturing in low volumes, as every component is more expensive, and you may not have access to some low-cost technologies that require very high volumes (in our case, Wi-Fi chips). There are two strategies for managing this; either charge a higher price, knowing that you'll reduce the price point over time, or subsidize the product until you can get the costs down enough to make it profitable. As a mostly-bootstrapped startup, we couldn't subsidize our product, so we were only able to charge a higher price than we would have liked. However, during our Kickstarter campaign, we made some cost reductions to our product that made it possible for us to sell the product at a lower price of $49. Launching our product weeks after two similar products (LIFX and Philips Hue) were announced wasn't the best timing. We've got a number of advantages over both LIFX and Hue (lower cost; the ability to use any type of light bulb; better software, and a stronger app-development environment that will lead to more and better apps; no need for a "hub" and a new wireless technology to manage in the home). But launching directly after both of them was unfortunate bad timing. In the world of hardware launches, products are often considered on tech specs alone, and, at face value, some folks would say that because LIFX and Hue each include an LED bulb, they're better products. In the real world, user experience, distribution and reviews and references from trusted sources matter a lot more than tech specs. We're confident that we'll be able to deliver a better experience than either Hue or LIFX, but we'll have to wait until the product is delivered to prove that to our customers. And in the meantime, the feedback we've gotten helps us understand how best to communicate our differences and our advantages.

In the end, I am ecstatic about the potential of our product, and I don't think I would have done anything differently with the Kickstarter campaign. We didn't do everything perfectly, but we did a lot of things right, and we're learning from our mistakes and making changes to improve our product. Although other crowdfunding platforms (most notably Indiegogo and Lockitron's fabulous Selfstarter) offer a lot more flexibility, the visibility we got on Kickstarter was unmatched, and it's that visibility and traction that is exactly the rocket fuel we needed to take our company to the next step.

So what is our next step? Moving to China for four months with HAXLR8R to set up manufacturing operations; raising a private investment round; growing our company and our team. We've got big plans and we're excited about where things are going, and we wouldn't have been able to do it without Kickstarter.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Chris Crowell is a veteran kindergarten teacher and contributing editor to Children's Technology Review, a web-based archive of articles and reviews on apps, technology toys and video games. Download a free issue of CTR here.

This week's top apps are all about involvement. Using them, your kids will be gardening, jumping, going on field trips and starring in their own TV episodes  all from the comforts of home.

SEE ALSO: Why Being Young Doesn't Make You a Social Media Expert

Our friends at Children's Technology Review shared with us these 5 top apps from their comprehensive monthly database of kid-tested reviews. The site covers everything from math and counting to reading and phonics.

Check back next week for more Top Kids Apps from Children's Technology Review.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Paul Spain is the host of the weekly NZ Tech Podcast, one of New Zealand's leading locally produced podcasts and often appears on TV and video as a commentator on consumer and business technology topics.

AUCKLAND, NEW ZEALAND  Its been said that Kim Dotcom is a villain. Many, particularly those in the film industry and law enforcement, believe it. To others, he is a hero standing up for the rights of Internet users everywhere.

I wanted to find out for myself where he stood.

I arrived at the Dotcom Mansion early Sunday afternoon New Zealand time. It was just a few hours after the launch of Kim Dotcoms new website Mega.co.nz and one year since his mansion was raided and he was arrested by New Zealand police in conjunction with a U.S. request to extradite him.

A friendly Kim Dotcom greeted each of us in a small media gathering, before sitting at the head of the table flanked by Ira Rothken, his California-based attorney.

I expected a prepared statement. That wasnt the case. Dotcom shared his excitement about the 250,000 Mega signups in the first two hours and soon led into Q&A session for the remaining 45-minutes. He proved to be extremely adept in the way he responded to questions, working effortlessly to position Mega as an innovator. He indicated a desire to help the film industry succeed in the world of digital downloads and streaming  rather than being just a company out to line its own pockets.

Dotcoms opinions and arguments for his cause were strong and generally well thought out, though on occasion seemed less robust. For instance he suggested hed found a great way films could be funded in the future. His concept involves studios signing up digital streaming distributors around the world to fund a movie ahead of its production.

He felt distributors might pay for streaming rights before production, thereby funding the production. Unfortunately, I feel revenues from streaming (now and for the foreseeable future) are typically so low this would only provide a small fraction of the funds needed to produce a movie. And who wants to risk paying up front for a movie that might be a flop?

When asked about whether he would stay in New Zealand if he succeeds in stopping his extradition to the U.S. later this year, he was non-committal. On one hand he said he loved the country but on another he was worried hed be persecuted by authorities, and in that case hed leave. He spoke of journalists, music and movie producers on their way to visit him being harassed by customs officials upon arrival in the country - including strip searches and even a request to view the content of one visitors laptop. Ive not been able to verify these rather extreme occurrences.

Dotcom has positioned Mega as a service that sits between Dropbox and his previous site Megaupload - with the added benefits of end-to-end encryption. He and Rothken went to great lengths to highlight that Mega would operate entirely within the law.

Dotcom made little effort to suggest Mega would be less prone to being a haven to copyright materials than Megaupload was. It seems there will continue to be a game of cat and mouse afoot as Dotcom and authorities try to outwit each other.

In a one-on-one setting with Dotcom, I tried to gain more understanding about the open source elements of the Mega service and his commitment to New Zealand. Interestingly he was reticent to provide solid answers to either question and provided what I felt were just pat answers aimed at fobbing me off.

As we left the compound mid-afternoon, we saw Kim on stage rehearsing for the evening performance he would lead, with the support of musicians, his co-accused and investors in the new Mega. That performance included a dramatization of the raid on his home one year before. It was a gathering filled with media from around the country and a few from abroad. In the public context he continued to sell Mega extremely well - to the point where someone commented to me that the event at times felt like a religious or marketing conference.

Dotcom currently remains on bail until his extradition hearing due in September. Amongst those in attendance, it appeared widely accepted that the bid to extradite him from New Zealand to the U.S. is likely to fail because of mistakes made by law enforcement and New Zealand spy agency GCSB.

After my visit, Im left with a number of fairly clear impressions about Kim Dotcom and Mega. How you take these will depend on which side of the fence you stand:

Love him or hate him, Kim Dotcom is back in business and, if hes to be believed, no fair court will be able to stop him.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Following Lance Armstrong's doping confession to Oprah on Thursday, an Australian library has moved all books about the American cyclist from the nonfiction section to the fiction section.

Manly Library in Sydney posted a notice to all readers informing them that all books about Armstrong would be recategorized, The Australian reports.

"All non-fiction Lance Armstrong titles, including Lance Armstrong: Images of a Champion, The Lance Armstrong Performance Program and Lance Armstrong: World's Greatest Champion, will soon be moved to the fiction section,'' the sign says.

SEE ALSO: Lance Armstrong Movie in the Works

The library was not alone in its reassessment of the numerous printed books about Armstrong. The cyclist's autobiography, It's Not About The Bike has been the target of many disappointed reviews on Amazon this week.

"It is now clear that most everything Armstrong says is a lie," wrote online reviewer Jesper. "Most of this book is based on lies and readers should consider a class action lawsuit against Armstrong, Jenkins and the publisher Berkley to get our money back for the book."

Do you think the Armstrong titles should not be categorized as fiction? Let us know in the comments.

UPDATE: A council spokesperson said in a statement Monday that the sign had been a prank and libraries cannot reclassify books.

 

Photo via Getty Images
--------------------------------------------------------------
NASCAR enthusiasts can soon take their fandom to a new level for the first exhibition race of this season, by determining how several elements of the Sprint Unlimited at Daytona will look.

As of Jan. 21, fans can vote through the NASCAR Mobile '13 app for Android and iOS or via NASCAR.com/SprintUnlimited to choose the race's format. They can also select how many pit stops drivers are allowed, the type of pit stops, the number of cars eliminated after the race's second segment and the outfit worn by Miss Sprint Cup for Victory Lane, NASCAR's post-race show.

NASCAR and Sprint officials say the promotion was born out of a desire to find a breakthrough way for sports fans to interact with a live event.

"Our guiding vision since we partnered with NASCAR in 2004 has been to use technology to bring fans closer to the sport," Tim Considine, Sprint's director of sports marketing, tells Mashable.

"We think the ultimate expression of fandom is actually getting to determine what exactly you're going to see," says Steve Phelps, NASCAR's chief marketing officer.

Fans can begin voting on Jan. 21, and votes cast through the mobile app will have twice as much value. Voting for the race format ends on Feb. 13, while voting for pit stops, number of cars eliminated and Miss Sprint Cup's Victory Lane attire won't end until after the race itself has begun on Feb. 16.

NASCAR fans are extremely passionate about their sport and also very active on social media, so this is a pretty slick promotion to get them involved. It may also start a new era of fan interactivity that will extend beyond exhibition events. Just how many fans partake in the voting, of course, remains to be seen.

Do you think this will be a hit with fans, or will it fall flat? Give us your take in the comments, below.

 

Thumbnail image courtesy Sprint Unlimited at Daytona
--------------------------------------------------------------
Winter-weary New Yorkers took their dreams of warm, sunny islands in tropical locations to the New York Times Travel Show this past weekend. The show, in its 10th year, showcases more than 500 travel destinations from all over the world.

There were seminars on travel and social media, the latest mobile travel apps, as well as ways to use the Internet to research and book your next vacation. The floor was divided into sections by country and type of travel. Given the number of people standing in line for cruise information, vacationing on the high seas is clearly a popular travel option.

SEE ALSO: 7 Tech Essentials for Any Kind of Travel

For those who prefer land  whether you're looking for the ultimate African safari, or rest and relaxation on a Caribbean Island  the show did not disappoint. Travel experts offered tips for bookings and family-friendly vacations, while hotel lines showed off their latest properties. We even found a man in the Dominican Republic booth hand-rolling cigars to show off the flavor of his country.

And as always, the show featured useful gadgets to take on vacation. Click through the gallery, above, to see what caught our eye.

Do you use social media to plan trips? What types of tech do you bring on trips? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
President Barack Obama was sworn into office for his second term on Sunday, Jan. 20, by U.S. Supreme Court Chief Justice John Roberts Jr.. The ceremony took place in the White House's Blue Room, where Obama and Roberts were joined by First Lady Michelle Obama and the president's two daughters, Malia and Sasha.

In the ceremony, which took less than one minute, Obama swears to "faithfully execute the office of President of the United States" and to "preserve, protect and defend" the Constitution of the United States.

Vice President Joe Biden also took his oath of office on Sunday, sworn in by U.S. Supreme Court Justice Sonia Sotomayor. The ceremony took place at the Vice President's residence, located on the grounds of the United States Naval Observatory. At the end of the ceremony, Biden joked with the crowd and thanked Justice Sotomayor for coming from New York.

The public inauguration ceremony will take place on Monday at 11:30 a.m. ET, but the president must be officially sworn in by January 20, according to the Constitution.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Gil Dudkiewicz is the CEO of StartApp, a platform that helps Android developers monetize and distribute their mobile app creations.

 

Paul Graham, a programmer, writer, investor and founder of Viaweb, the first software-as-a-service (SaaS) company, recently wrote an essay discussing just what makes startups uniquely poised for rapid growth. Although a startup may generally experience an initial period of slow growth while it gets its bearings in the market, once the company determines how to make something people want and how to reach them, the business will experience rapid growth  eventually growing into a very big company.

During this quick-growth phase, who you hire is crucial. Here are some ways to recruit top talent.

Startups can take a cue from other industry contenders to come out on the other side of the growth phase with a winning team. Often, a period of rapid growth makes hiring the best candidates difficult. But the key to making successful hires is focusing 90% on networking and only 10% on headhunting and HR companies.

 

Networking does magic in terms of landing the right fit for a company's culture. The best strategy is to first ensure employees really believe in your mission and enjoy working there. If they do, they'll act as your ambassadors. They'll bring their friends, and all will feel committed to the company's mission and to growing your team.

 

Groupon, which grew from 37 to 7,100 employees in 21 months, also recommends using employee networks to gather referrals.

 

"About 40% of new hires come from employees  that works especially well from top performers," Dan Jessup, head of hiring at Groupon since 2009, told CNN. "Equip yourself with as much data as you can, then acknowledge that the hiring decision will still be subjective."

 

For networking purposes, Groupon also uses tracking software that easily integrates with sites like Twitter, LinkedIn and Facebook  something any rapidly-growing company can take advantage of.

Other startups face the challenge of landing talent who are also being recruited by other companies. Megan Hopkins, director of human resources at VigLink, a startup web monetization company, says there are no guarantees in the world of tech startup recruiting. Viglink recently landed an impressive $5.4 million in startup funding, meaning the company has to continually compete with other rapidly growing startups for the best candidates.

 

When trying to land all-star talent, you have to go the extra mile, Hopkins says. Her team recently signed and sent a birthday card to a candidate who wouldn't start for another two months. Hopkins also suggests making friends in the industry so as to avoid being badmouthed by competitive recruiters. If a candidate doesn't work out for you, refer them to another startup to build your reputation as an ally in the industry.

This may seem like a strange strategy, but it's worked for rapidly-growing blog icanhazcheezburger.com. The popular blog  which boasts 16.5 million unique visitors per month and more than 375 million page views  recently snagged $30 million in a round of venture funding, which it will use to build its staff. Ben Huh, CEO of Cheezburger, believes that companies can find the best employees if they advertise a job with low pay.

"We advertise lower wages for entry-level positions because the worst candidates focus on money the most," Huh explained on his blog. "Believe it or not, advertising lower-than-market wages actually helped us yield better candidates. Higher advertised wages resulted in much higher level of noise from candidates who really didn't care about the job. (FYI: Advertised pay and actual pay are two different things.)"

 

Bad candidates focus on money, Huh contends, and the best candidates just want to land a job that will make them feel happy and accomplished. This is one strategy rapidly-growing companies can use to weed out the wrong candidates.

Although competition to land top candidates can be fierce, dealing with the continuous internal changes of a rapidly-growing company can be the hardest part about recruiting for a startup. For example, my company has doubled its team every six months since its founding in 2010, making managing new candidates difficult.

 

In many cases, managing growth is harder than managing crisis. An important tip is to not be afraid to hire people who are better than you. Nearly everyone I've hired is better in what he or she does than I am. It may be challenging at times, but hiring candidates who are better than you will help your company's growth throughout time.

At Groupon, some Saturdays are set aside for mass interviewing, so every hiring manager is focused. "Groupon hires fast by having internal recruiters partner with hiring managers," Jessup explains. "I am also always identifying and moving roadblocks. What worked seven months ago won't work today."

 

Rapidly-growing startups need to consider all of these implications when scouring for new hires. Networking, forging industry contacts, building your reputation, and not being afraid to hire those who are smarter than you can be the key to landing the best fit. Though these moves can be difficult, nothing will compare to the feeling of finally creating a solid team that will help your startup succeed throughout its growth phase and beyond.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Civil War history and strange meat packaging techniques await you in this week's issue of Reddit Facts.

What have you learned from the front page of the Internet lately?
--------------------------------------------------------------
You know all about getting your resume noticed. Clean layout! Accomplishments, not duties! But do you know what's on the flipside? What could you be doing that could cause recruiters to overlook your resume  or worse, toss it in the trash?

Gasp! The trash? I know what you're thinking, but the truth is, recruiters have dozens, even hundreds, of resumes to comb through every day. So, in an effort to cull them down to a reasonable amount, they'll simply toss any that don't meet what they're looking for.

To learn more, I sat down with a few recruiters and asked them about the resumes that make the cut and those that get tossed. Here are three of their deal-breakers.

First and foremost, review the requirements listed in the job description and confirm that you have the skills and experience the recruiter is looking for. This is the "first knockout factor" for many, says Christina Lord, a technical recruiter at Dealer.com. "Make sure you look at the requirements before applying to the job, and identify if your skills are a match," she says.

Sounds basic, but job seekers make this mistake more often than you might think, thanks to career counselors and advice websites that say to go ahead and apply for a job even without all of the qualifications. And while you shouldn't be afraid to aim high, no amount of resume tailoring will cover for the fact that you only have three years of management experience, not 10, or don't have the technical skills required to do the job. "Resumes just won't be considered if the basic skills aren't there," agrees Joanna Thomas, a human resources professional at an agency in Burlington, VT.

A similar mistake: You have the basic requirements, but they're obscured by extra or unnecessary information. "Lay it out simply for me  that means less investigation I'll have to do," says Thomas. For example, if you're applying for a position in marketing, but your experience is a combination of marketing and sales, tailor your resume to focus on your marketing experience and skills, and minimize  or even remove  the sales information.

It's of utmost importance to recruiters to find a candidate who's a "cultural fit as well as a skill set fit," according to Thomas. They love when a candidate "gets it"  and they'll toss your resume if you look like "just someone looking for a job." (Think summary statements that cover a wide range of skills and industries, or cover letters that don't mention the company by name  or at all.)

To avoid the circular file, you'll want to tweak your resume based on the position and company. You need to make deliberate connections of how your experience, skills, and personality are a perfect fit for the job. Use industry terms, spell out accomplishments that you know will make an impact, and don't be afraid to let your personality shine through. Thomas remembers an applicant who listed, "I'll drink an iced Americano any time, day or night" under the interests section, which not only revealed the applicant's "personality and sense of humor," it was a great fit for Thomas' agency, a highly creative design firm with its own specialty coffee shop in the basement.

When it comes to your resume, the devil is quite often in the details. Recruiters get annoyed by small things that you may not think of  like whether or not the text on your cover letter and resume is the same font and size (it should be), if your margins are off (makes it tricky for us to print), or to whom you've addressed the cover letter (it should be the recruiter's name, not "sir," "madam," or "to whom it may concern". And be sure to avoid the worst typo in history: "Dear Sir or Madman:".

They'll also take note if you don't include everything the job posting asks you to send. A cover letter and resume? What about work or writing samples? Be sure to include everything that's asked of you. Also, does the job posting refer to the position as Project Manager II? If so, state that in your cover letter, exactly  don't write Proj. Mgr. or Project Manager. Companies put a lot of time into determining job titles, and when a recruiter is looking to fill both the Project Manager and the Project Manager II positions, any ambiguity from you will make it harder for them.

And, it should go without saying, but "one spelling error and I'm out," says Thomas. Proofreading your own resume is a must, but don't rely on spell check and grammar check alone  ask family or friends to take a look at it for you. Lord recommends that you "always, always have several eyes look at your resume."

Applying for a job can often feel like a huge challenge, and knowing that there are so many applicants out there can be daunting. But if you follow these simple rules, you'll make sure your resume gets past the first hurdle: the trash can. Better yet, if you tailor your resume and make sure it's a fit to the company and job, you'll definitely increase your chances of getting to the top of the pile.

This article originally published at The Muse here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Imagine waking up in a fully automated home. The light on your nightstand gradually begins to brighten, your blinds unfold to welcome the morning light, coffee brews in the kitchen and music begins to play, all without you lifting a finger.

Until recently, even partially automated homes were exclusive to the domains of engineers and home owners wealthy enough to hire them (or creative students with some extra time on their hands). But now those systems are becoming more affordable and easier to manage, thanks in part to Kickstarter-fueled interest in "The Internet of Things," as well as integrations with SMS, smartphones and web-based applications like Twitter and Dropbox.

SEE ALSO: Even Your Toilet Seat Will Be Intuitive With Smart Home Tech

We rounded up five objects to help smarten up your home. We've focused primarily on affordable, tested devices already available on the market, but also included a few high-ticket and soon-to-be-released products to ignite your imagination. If you're interested in more DIY, check out Lifehacker's roundup.
--------------------------------------------------------------
We all know the drill at Starbucks  we order drinks and get served lattes with awkward derivatives of our names scribbled on their paper cups.

Saturday Night Live parodied the phenomenon in this sketch about Verismo, Starbucks' at-home brewing system. How do you think they did?
--------------------------------------------------------------
On Feb. 3, big brands and their agencies will line up to compete for what they hope will be remembered as the best TV commercial for Super Bowl XLVII, spending tens of millions of dollars in the process. One major retailer, Target, will be sitting on the sidelines, having developed a more modest (and budget-friendly) mobile game instead.

Snack Bowl, which can be played on mobile web browsers as well as downloadable apps for iPhone and Android devices, is pretty basic. You're awarded points for tossing a carousel of branded snacks, including DiGiorno pizza and Coke Zero, to your jersey-wearing guests, who are inexplicably running across your living room one by one. Your guests move faster and faster, making the game increasingly difficult. Fail to feed three of your guests and it's game over.

To spread awareness of the game, players are encouraged to challenge their Facebook friends to beat their high scores.

The idea for Snack Bowl was developed internally, fed by the success of earlier mobile games Target has developed for various holidays, Eddie Baeb, a spokesperson for Target, told Mashable. "We're viewing digital as a lot more than shopping online  it's an opportunity to connect with guests better," said Baeb.

The game will be promoted on the landing page of Target's mobile site and on its flagship mobile apps, as well as through paid mobile advertising, including search.

Although the game really falls in the branding (rather than direct-selling) category, its landing page does link to shopping pages for TVs and fan gear on Target's website.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Can you tell the difference between James Polk and Franklin Pierce? Hmm, how about William McKinley and Calvin Coolidge? Fret not, novice presidential historian  200 years of men with powdered wigs, bushy facial hair and/or stern smirks can all blur together in the old noggin.

SEE ALSO: 100 Years of U.S. Presidential Inaugurations [PHOTOS]

Consider this your opportunity to acquaint yourself with the faces of past U.S. presidents just in time for the inauguration. And to make this whole "learning" thing more fun, we've pinpointed the oddest presidential doppelgangers this side of Pennsylvania Ave.

Mashable composite. Images courtesy of Animation Shops and Library of Congress

Mashable composite. Images courtesy of Etsy, InkBandit and U.S. Government

Mashable composite. Images courtesy of Flickr, kellinahandbasket and U.S. Government

Mashable composite. Images courtesy of Colonel Meow and Library of Congress

Mashable composite. Images courtesy of Flickr, nottsexminer and Library of Congress

Mashable composite. Images courtesy of eBay and Library of Congress

Mashable composite. Images courtesy of YouTube, denisfarmer and U.S. Government

Mashable composite. Images courtesy of eBay and Library of Congress
--------------------------------------------------------------
This week's Viral Video Recap features the regular cast of entertaining characters.

In this edition, we see Bad Lip Reading figure out what NFL coaches are yelling from the sidelines, The Slo Mo Guys shoot fireworks from paint cans, an alternate Hobbit ending, plus some additional viral goodies.

SEE ALSO: MORE VIRAL VIDEO RECAPS

What was your favorite video this week? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Barack Obama's second inauguration ceremony is happening Monday, Jan. 21 at 11:30 E.T, followed immediately by the inaugural parade, the commander-in-chief's ball and the inaugural ball. Looking for a place to watch online? Mashable has rounded up nine options for you.

Note: Obama's official swearing-in happened Sunday morning in a small event at the White House.

The aptly named Politico LIVE will be livestreaming throughout the event, featuring analysis from the likes of Jim VandeHei, John F. Harris, Maggie Haberman, Mike Allen and more at politico.com.

The stream will also be available on Politico's iPhone and iPad apps. Join Politico's Twitter conversation at #politico, and if you're going to any inaugural events, tag your Instagram photos with #inauguration for a chance to be featured in Politico's coverage.

ABC News and Yahoo News are livestreaming the inauguration ceremony through ABCNews.com, Yahoo News, GoodMorningAmerica.com, ABC News' YouTube channel and ABC News' iPhone and iPad apps. Coverage will include anchored reports combined with interviews of attendees in the crowd.

ABC News will also also have interactive features, including a "Who's Who at the Podium" explainer and a parade route tracker.

The New York Times' Inauguration Day coverage will be anchored by Washington Bureau chief David Leonhardt and streamed on the homepage as well as the Times' YouTube channel. Coverage will include interviews with voters on either side of the political spectrum, analysis of the politics of the Inauguration and a profile of the Chicago drill team performing during the event.

The Times' coverage marks the first event in Acura's new year-long sponsorship of Times video content.

NPR will have special coverage of the Inauguration, all of which will be streamed online and through NPR's mobile apps. An interactive Tumblr blog, "Dear Mr. President," invites users to post photos showing Obama which issues they feel should have his focus during his second term.

Reuters will be livestreaming the Inauguration along with a liveblog featuring analysis of the event at Reuters Live.

FoxNews.com will have a stream of Obama's inaugural address and Fox coverage of related events, such as the inaugural parade. Fox News is also joining up with Twitter, mentioning exclusively provided Twitter trends related to inaugural events on air.

NBC News will be livestreaming Inauguration coverage on NBCnews.com, via NBC News' iPhone and iPad apps and on Facebook.

NBC News will also be curating social content from around the web, including user-generated photography. NBC News viewers with social television app Zeebox will get an extended experience with more social curation and interactive elements. Tweets with the hashtag #NBCpolitics could appear on live air. Want images from the scene? Be sure to follow @NBCNews on Instagram.

NewsHour's livestream and live blog will begin at PBS.org/newshour with Obama's official swearing-in at the White House on Sunday and continue until the end of the parade Monday. Among its coverage will include the "Hat Cam Channel," featuring a GoPro helmet-equipped reporter roaming the Inauguration crowds:

The Presidential Inauguration Committee will provide an official livestream of inaugural events through its mobile apps and at 2013pic.org/live.

Mashable will also be curating social content from around the web. How will you watch the inauguration? Share in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
In a series of tweets, Wikileaks claimed Saturday that late Internet activist and hacker Aaron Swartz was an ally and possible source for the organization.

It also disclosed that Swartz, who committed suicide last week, was "in communication" with founder Julian Assange during 2010 and 2011.

Wikileaks, which exposes classified information provided by anonymous sources, said it decided to reveal these details in light of the U.S. Secret Service's involvement in Swartz's case. At the time of his death, Swartz was awaiting trial for allegedly harvesting millions of scholarly articles over the Massachusetts Institute of Technology's network. He was charged with computer fraud and other crimes in July 2011, and faced up to 35 years in prison.

The Secret Service took over Swartz's case two days prior to his arrest, according The Verge.

Although Wikileaks doesn't elaborate on its decision, the organization has a policy of maintaining anonymity for its sources.

"As far as we can ascertain, Wikileaks has never revealed any of its sources," according to its website. "We cannot provide details about the security of our media organization or its anonymous drop box for sources because to do so would help those who would like to compromise the security of our organization and its sources."

Check out Wikileaks' tweets about Swartz, below:
--------------------------------------------------------------
Al Roker has an inauguration parade tradition  the NBC weatherman and anchor waits on the sidelines for the president and vice president to pass and tries to get them to acknowledge his presence. Or, better yet, actually reply.

In 2009, Roker got President Barack Obama to crack a joke about the weather. This year, Roker went two for two, getting a thumbs-up from the president and a full-on handshake from Vice President Joe Biden.

Both moments lit up the Twitterverse. Watch them online (alas, the videos don't work on mobile devices):
--------------------------------------------------------------
Google built its $38 billion business selling ads based on how people search and browse the web. Facebook, too, uses what it knows about its one billion users to sell targeted ads. But when it comes to what many advertisers value most  what people actually buy, or what they may want to buy soon  there may be no better data than the information in Amazon's 152 million customer accounts.

Since last year, the world's largest online retailer has been packaging information on what it knows about consumers so that some marketers can use it to make split-second decisions about where to buy ads online and how much to pay for them. This automated process occurs on real-time ad exchanges that sell ad impressions as a person loads a web page.

When this process began, Amazon used third-party technology, and its experiments were limited. Now it has developed an in-house platform for targeting ads to people who have visited and then left Amazons sites, making it likely that the company will open up these advertising services more widely over the next year.

"Today, if youre browsing the web, you might see an Amazon advertisement based on Amazons data. Tomorrow, you may see an ad from Coca-Cola based on Amazon data, and itll run through the Amazon platform," says Jeff Green, CEO of the Trade Desk, which helps guide spending decisions by ad agencies.

Amazon did not respond to a request for comment about its advertising business, and the company does not break out its advertising revenue. But its clear that compared to Google and Facebook, advertising has been a relatively small and low-key business for Amazon. It brought in about $500 million of Amazons $48 billion in revenue in 2011, Baird & Co. senior research analyst Colin Sebastian estimates. Mostly this came from selling ads on its own websites.

But Amazon could soon generate much more than that with an advertising network that reaches onto many other sites.

For years, Amazon has put algorithms to work in order to recommend products to people who are on its sites. Now other companies are eager to find out exactly how Amazons knowledge about consumers can help them find the best audiences for their ads, says Kip Voytek, digital innovation director at the advertising firm MDC Partners.

Amazon would be unlikely to directly give advertisers access to its trove of information about individuals browsing, purchasing, and product review histories, both because of its privacy policies and a desire to keep its valuable data proprietary. Instead, Amazon would create target audiences, such as people who recently purchased digital cameras. A marketer selling digital camera accessories could then use Amazons technology to bid for the ability to show ads to a person in that category.

Green points out that while Google might have more overall data about consumers, Amazons data could be more valuable for advertisers. Amazon has a pretty clear understanding of the things I buy. Theyve learned a lot about me. Every time Im convinced I have another medical ailment, I go to Google. But Amazon, what they have is really about my purchase intent, he says.

Using its data to expand its advertising business could open up new fronts of competition with Google, which also owns a real-time bidding exchange and an ad-delivery network. But Amazon might be mainly interested in using its ad technology to help the retailers that sell products on its sites and through its Kindle tablets and e-readers. Voytek put it this way: The question that is open: is this Amazon competing with Google or is this Amazon competing with Walmart?

This article originally published at MIT Technology Review here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Classic video game maker Atari filed for bankruptcy late Sunday night in an attempt to break away from its financially troubled French parent company.

According to a press release from Atari, its Chapter 11 bankruptcy filing is a move to distance itself from Atari S.A., formerly called Infogrames, which it has been affiliated with since 2003. Atari seeks to find a new buyer for its classic video game franchises, including Pong, Breakout, and Centipede, and its logo, one of the most recognizable video game logos to consumers.

Atari has recently switched its focus into the mobile space, releasing remakes and collections of its franchises on iOS and Android. Some of the more popular releases include Atari Greatest Hits and Astroid Gunner. Atari also licensed Breakout to social game giant Zynga to make Super Bunny Breakout for mobile.

These successful mobile games helped Atari S.A. to remain profitable during 2011 and 2012, but the company is still mired in debt, according to the Los Angeles Times.

SEE ALSO: The History of Atari [INFOGRAPHIC]

Atari has had a tumultuous history as company. Started by Nolan Bushnell in 1972, it was originally responsible for putting Pong machines in bars and other businesses around the country, and popularizing video games in America. They created one of the most popular home consoles of the time: the Atari 2600. When the video games market crashed in 1984, the company was split and sold off. After several failed attempts to repeat its console success, the company was then sold to Hasbro in 1998. That arrangement only lasted a few years, until Hasbro Interactive was purchased by French company Infogrames, which then changed the name to Atari.

Atari will operate business-as-usual while the bankruptcy proceedings continue.
--------------------------------------------------------------
RIM is set to announce the first devices running its new BlackBerry 10 operating system at an event on January 30. A lucky few, however, have already gotten their hands on what looks to be the new hardware, including German site TelekomPresse.

The site has the BlackBerry Z10, a touchscreen device with a similar look to some of the other popular smartphones out there  especially the iPhone 5.

Curious to see how the two compared, they put them side-by-side in the video above, running through both the physical design of both devices as well as some of their features.

Notably, the video shows a Siri-like voice control functionality in BlackBerry 10, that we havent seen previously. As you can see in the test above, it beats Siri for speed.

SEE ALSO: RIM Adds 15,000 BlackBerry 10 Apps in a Weekend

While similar at first glance, design-wise the two phones do have some differences. The Z10 has a 4.2-inch screen, slightly larger than the iPhone 5s 4-inch display. Both phones have a power button on top, however, the button on the BlackBerry is in the center of the top of the phone, while the iPhones is on the right on the device.

The volume controls are on the right side of the Z10, and left side of the iPhone 5. When it comes to power, the connection for the iPhone 5 is on the bottom of the device with the headphone jack, while the HDMI and USB connections on the Z10 are located on the left.

Check out the video above for a look at the full comparison of the two devices. Are you looking forward to BlackBerry 10? Can the new OS save RIM? Let us know your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Barack Obama's second inauguration ceremony is set for Monday, Jan. 21 at approximately 11:30 a.m. ET. About 800,000 people have descended on Washington, D.C. to watch the president's ceremonial swearing-in, listen to his inaugural address, watch the parade and perhaps attend an inaugural ball or unofficial party.

Mashable will be curating the best social media content related to the inauguration throughout the day. If you're at the inauguration, send your photos or video to @MashUSWorld on Twitter and we will consider including your content in our story.

The White House live stream of the inauguration is above.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Hollywood's funniest showgirl sure had a lot to say during Monday's U.S. Presidential Inauguration. She and her whole "hungover" family sat down to watch the event, during which she tweeted about bangs, potholes and chewing gum.

Oh Bette, did you ever know that you're our hero?
--------------------------------------------------------------
Pop star Beyonc Knowles closed out the 2013 Presidential Inauguration ceremony on Monday with a performance of the "Star-Spangled Banner."

The singer had audio problems midway through the song, causing her to remove an ear piece. Despite technical difficulties, shown in the video above, Beyonc delivers a soulful version of the national anthem.

Kelly Clarkson also performed at the ceremony, singing "My Country 'Tis of Thee" and James Taylor opened the program with "America the Beautiful."

SEE ALSO: Watch James Franco Read a Strange Inauguration Poem From His Bed

At President Obama's first Inaugural ceremony in 2008, Aretha Franklin (and her awesome hat) sang "My Country, 'Tis of Thee" and the United States Navy Band "Sea Chanters" chorus performed "The Star-Spangled Banner."

Beyonc is also set to perform during the Super Bowl XLVII halftime show on Feb. 3, 2013.
--------------------------------------------------------------
RIM is going head-to-head against Google this May, holding its main yearly conference in direct competition with Googles the third week in May.

Renamed BlackBerry Live, RIM will be using the conference to let developers get more hands-on time with BlackBerry 10, meet the leaders behind the platform and to talk about whats next for BlackBerry.

Registration for the event will be open soon.

Google I/O, Googles annual developer's conference, will be taking place at roughly the same time, May 15-17, 2013, at the Moscone Center in San Francisco. As I/O is known for huge announcements and product giveaways, RIM will have a lot to compete with.

At last years conference, Google announced Android 4.1 Jelly Bean, the Nexus 7 tablet and the Nexus Q media-streaming device. Google co-founder Sergey Brin also demonstrated the company's new Google Glass by skydiving onto the Moscone Center wearing a pair of the futuristic glasses.

BlackBerry 10 is expected to launch on Jan. 30th.
--------------------------------------------------------------
If you own one of the fitness-tracking armbands by BodyMedia, you can now sync that information to the free website, SparkPeople, thanks to a partnership between the companies.

On SparkPeople you create a fitness profile where you track your goals and progress. The BodyMedia armband tracks your calories burned throughout the day. You can also wear it at night to track your sleep.

BodyMedia currently sells two armbands that will sync to the SparkPeople online tracking website. You can no longer buy the original Armband Advantage, but it also will sync to SparkPeople.

BodyMedia sells the LINK armband, which is Bluetooth enabled and costs $149. The BodyMedia CORE is one-third the size of the LINK and does not have Bluetooth. It costs $119. BodyMedia will release a Core 2 in August. The Armband Advantage and CORE do not have Bluetooth but you can sync data to SparkPeople with a USB cable.

"This partnership with SparkPeople offers our users another way to integrate a reputable resource into their BodyMedia experience," Gwen Smith, marketing manager at BodyMedia tells Mashable. "SparkPeople offers benefits like community boards for support, along with fitness and nutrition experts in Coach Nicole and Chef Meg. Now BodyMedia users can combine all of SparkPeople's resources and can use it in tandem with the data from their armbands for successful weight loss and healthy living."

We've seen lots of other devices that sync to websites and apps, either of the same brand name as the product, or a partner website. Most fitness trackers sync to an app, but it's always nice to view your data from a web application or site, too.

What do you think about the BodyMedia armbands and the SparkPeople website? Do you use either product? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Welcome to this morning's edition of "First To Know," a series in which we keep you in the loop on what's happening in the digital world.

Today, we're looking at three particularly interesting stories. Sony has launched the Xperia Tablet Z, possibly the world's thinnest and lightest 10.1-inch tablet. Eric Schmidt's daughter Sophie Schmidt has given a very interesting account of their widely criticized trip to North Korea, and a Dutch architect wants to create a 3D-printed home by 2014.

Check out the video above for more on these stories.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A photo of an elderly couple with flashcards has tugged on Internet users' heart strings after the story behind it was shared online

The man in the photo, named John, was sitting with his girlfriend, Linda, in a Starbucks. John was teaching Linda the alphabet

"You see, I've lost my memory and I'm trying to get it back," Linda explained to Matthew Ballstero, who took the photo and shared the full story on Facebook. Ballstero also shared the photo Reddit, where it quickly rose to the front page. It has been viewed by more than 2.5 million people.

Ballstero described the moment as "patience, love and understanding at its finest."

SEE ALSO: Sisters Reunite After 72 Years With the Help of Facebook

"John's unwavering love, patience and understanding for the woman he chose to give his life to. Linda's endless positive attitude, eagerness to (re)learn and mostly her uninhibited joy in expressing love to other. You may be losing your memory, Linda, but the love that you and John have for each other will never be lost. Thank you for your beautiful example, Linda and John!" wrote Ballstero on Facebook.

Employees at the local Starbucks commented on the photo, claiming that the couple were regulars.

"They were dating until she had a stroke. Now he takes her out during the day and has been helping her relearn all her skills. They are truly amazing people," wrote Marissa Gaschen.

Since the photo was taken, Ballstero told Mashable that he has seen Linda and John a few times, and the couple is aware of the huge positive effect they've had on millions of people.

"When I told them that the photo had gone viral they were overjoyed, confused and in shock... the good kind of shock! John and Linda have so much love, respect and compassion for each other and the people they meet, it's inspiring just to be in their presence."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Not everyone was happy with Google Executive Chairman Eric Schmidt's trip to North Korea or its secretive nature. Now we have details about what the whole thing was about.

Schmidt posted on his Google+ account this morning, and said the goal was to talk to North Korea about a free and open Internet. The reason many people suspected Schmidt was making the trip was to increase Google's market into the country, but why can't it be both? Google would no doubt get one of its many fingers into an open North Korean Internet, so it could be a classic win-win for Google and the North Korean people.

In his Google+ post, Schmidt said that he was shown the mostly Linux-based software and technology that controlled the supervised Internet in North Korea, and mentioned that only the government, military, and universities had access to it.

When Schmidt said the Internet was supervised, it seems he meant it literally. He wrote, "There is a supervised Internet and a Korean Intranet. (It appeared supervised in that people were not able to use the Internet without someone else watching them). There's a private intranet that is linked with their universities. Again, it would be easy to connect these networks to the global Internet."

It seems like to use the Internet in North Korea at all, someone has to physically stand over your shoulder and watch what you are doing. That adds a real level of tension when you're trying to communicate about sensitive subjects, or watch adorable cat videos.

There is an existing 3G network in the country, but it is not currently connected to the Internet. Making that connection, Schmidt says, would be "very easy" and he notes that there are already one and half million phones in the country that would be able to access the Internet through a 3G connection, with growth planned in the future.

Schmidt obviously has something to gain by North Korea opening up the Internet, since it's likely that citizens would start using some Google products, but he also says it's good for North Korea itself to open up. Schmidt wrote, "As the world becomes increasingly connected, the North Korean decision to be virtually isolated is very much going to affect their physical world and their economic growth. It will make it harder for them to catch up economically."

An open Internet allows growth and communication, and Schmidt says that if North Korea doesn't open its Internet to citizens they will fall behind.

This article originally published at Geekosystem here
--------------------------------------------------------------
On Dec. 21, Facebook released Poke, a messaging app with a built-in self-destruct feature that was intended to take on Snapchat. Facebook Poke hit #1 on Apple's list of free apps in the U.S. the following day, but it didn't hold onto the top spot long, dropping out of the top 25 less than a week later.

Now, one month after it launched, Poke has fallen out of the top 50, the top 500 and is well on its way to falling out of the top 1,000 free apps. As of Monday, Facebook Poke had dropped to number 706 on the list of Apple's top free apps, according to data from App Annie, a service that tracks app rankings.

Snapchat, far from being killed off by Facebook, enjoyed a big boost from all the extra attention on its app. As Facebook Poke fell out of the top 25, Snapchat managed to crack the top 5 apps, rising to as high as #3. Snapchat has since declined somewhat in the rankings, but is still firmly in the top 20 at #14.

Snapchat's continued popularity suggests that the demand is still there for this kind of messaging app  just not for Facebook Poke.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Twenty-five positions will be eliminated at the Financial Times as the paper shifts resources from print to digital, FT Editor Lionel Barber announced Monday.

In a memo e-mailed to staff, Barber said the FT needs to spend less money (and time) producing the paper so it can invest in improving its online presence. "We need to ensure that we are serving a digital platform first, and a newspaper second," he wrote.

"Our common cause is to secure the FT's future in an increasingly competitive market, where old titles are being routinely disrupted by new entrants such as Google and LinkedIn and Twitter," he explained. "Our competitors are harnessing technology to revolutionise the news business through aggregation, personalisation and social media. Mobile alone, for example, now accounts for 25 per cent of all the FT's digital traffic. It would be reckless for us to stand still," he said, adding that "deep and original reporting" based on "multiple sources" and a "sharp eye for scoop[s]" would remain important.

As part of the shift, the FT will hire for 10 new digital positions, and alter time schedules so that less people are working at night on the next morning's edition, and more are publishing online during the day.

If 2013 seems like a late date for a newspaper to announce a "digital-first" strategy, you're right. The Atlantic Media Company has been singing that slogan for more than six years now, and annual spending on digital advertising has already surpassed print, according to eMarketer's calculations. Heavy revenue losses have forced others, in a way, to act more quickly than the FT, which fought the ongoing slump in print advertising by installing an online paywall as early as 2001 and raising subscription prices in the years since. Though the FT's operations have continued to prioritize print, the paper already has more digital-only subscribers than print ones.

The FT is asking for voluntary buyouts, and will take "further steps" to reduce staff by 25 if necessary, Barber said.

Photo courtesy of The Financial Times
--------------------------------------------------------------
How much would you pay to be the first owner of the all-new Corvette Stingray? Whatever your price is, it's probably not as much as NASCAR team owner Rick Hendrick's, who just laid down more than a million bucks for the car.

Hendrick bid $1.05 million for the first Stingray to come off GM's production lines  model 0001  at the Barrett-Jackson car collector event in Scottsdale, Az., Road & Track reports. The money will be donated to the College for Creative Studies in Detroit.

Charitable contributions aside, the price is exorbitant. While Chevrolet hasn't announced the final price of the new Corvette, it has said it'll be close to what current Corvettes cost now, which run about $50,000.

Hendrick has paid a lot of money to be first in line for other Chevy cars, according to the Latinos Post. His winning $350,000 bid at a Las Vegas auction got him the first 2010 Camaro SS, and he also won the first 2011 Corvette Z06 Carbon Edition.

SEE ALSO: Carbon Fiber: The Secret of the 2014 Corvette Stingray

GM unveiled the 2014 Corvette Stingray last week. Released for the 50th anniversary of the car, the new model is the seventh generation of the iconic sports car and shares just two parts with the previous generation. The new Corvette departs from its predecessors with muscular lines, carbon-fiber parts, redesigned (and controversially rectangular) tail lights, and a retractable dashboard LCD.

We got a chance to check out (but not drive) the new Corvette when it paid a visit to New York City, and although it's a beautiful car, we wouldn't pay a million bucks to be the first person to drive one.

Would you? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Have you been sidelined by the flu yet? If so, you have our sympathies. It's a particularly bad year  so bad that many of you have taken to social media to complain heartily about it.

If you've managed to avoid coming down with the flu thus far, good for you! If you want to stay healthy, you'll want to follow traditional advice and perhaps take a close look at these devices in the gallery above that promise to zap the flu germs from the items you use every day.

We know the flu can spread every time you touch something that has the pesky germs on it, and then touch your mouth or nose. Experts say the flu bug can live on surfaces anywhere from a few minutes to a few days. Luckily, there are devices like the Pocket Purifier which let you zap a cellphone or desk area with UV light, killing 99.9% of the germs. Use these on your phone, your keyboards, or any hard surface.

Technology is all around us, and so are surfaces just waiting to host the bacteria and transfer it to your warm hands. Think about all the things you touch in a day. Keyboards, on average, have 60 times more germs on them than toilet seats. It might be the season for a washable keyboard.

While you probably won't be waving a UV scanner around a crowded subway car, you can protect yourself in other ways. Personal contact with an infected person is the most common way these germs spread so if you hang onto a subway poll or touch stair rails and doorknobs that others have touched, you're going want to wash your hands a lot. For items you come in contact with more frequently, check out the gallery above to see what you can use to keep your stuff germ-free, and you healthy.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Smartphones and extreme sports are natural enemies, as bringing your prized iPhone on that mountain-biking trip is a surefire way to get it lost or broken.

For this reason, thrill-seekers have often turned to GoPro for action cameras that can capture footage while on-the-go. But one company is challenging the status quo by developing a case that it says can turn a standard smartphone into a rugged camera.

SEE ALSO: 10 Crazy Ways to Use a GoPro

G-Form, which creates protective cases for tech gadgets, has unveiled the G90 Action Sports Camera for the iPhone 5, the latest iPod touch and other devices. Check out the video, above, for more.

"The G90 case integrates unique, multiple proprietary and patent-pending technologies allowing smartphones and iPods to be flat mounted as extremely low profile, aerodynamic and sleek as sports action cameras," the company said on its website.

G-Form's GoPro alternative will be available starting this June.

Would you use the G90? Tell us in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Oh cruel Internet, where no high-profile slip of the tongue passes without notice  or, of course, mockery.

Then again, ABC News anchor George Stephanopoulos deserved the digital roasting he got on Monday morning after flubbing the ID of a very famous spectator at President Obama's inauguration ceremony.

"That's Morgan Freeman, I think," Stephanopoulos eagerly exclaimed as ABC's cameras zoomed in on the white-bearded African American man pictured above.

The only problem? That is, in fact, Bill Russell  who, despite also being African American and sporting facial hair is a pretty famous fellow in his own right. Russell is an NBA Hall of Famer who was the centerpiece of 11 championship teams for the Boston Celtics in the 1950s and 1960s  which is why that Celtics cap atop his head makes perfect sense for him, but would be a rather strange fashion choice for Mr. Freeman.

After a brief moment of realization  or prodding from ABC's production truck  Stephanopoulos quickly corrected his mistaken ID. But it was already too late, as the Internet's frothing crowd of gleeful correctors was off and running. Clips and the close-captioned screenshot above have circulated widely on sports blogs and Twitter.

For Stephanopoulos, a momentary slip-up. For the social web, a fleeting moment of happy derision. And for white people everywhere, just one more addition to a long standing tradition of cringe-inducing un-coolness.

You can relive the snafu in its brief entirely here:
--------------------------------------------------------------
Google Glass sightings are still pretty rare these days. Rarer still is an in-the-wild sighting of Google co-founder Sergey Brin wearing said futuristic specs. Rarest of all, though, may be the random intersection of a New York City subway rider and Google Glass-wearing Sergey Brin.

Self-described wearable computing enthusiast and New York City resident Noah Zerkin apparently looked up at the seat opposite him on a NYC subway to find Brin sporting a wool cap and his now-trademark eye wear.

For those unfamiliar with Google Glass, it's the product of Google's long-gestating Project Glass and are head-mounted, augmented reality glasses that offer a single, tiny view screen, voice recognition, and photo and video capture. A team of sky-diving daredevils famously demonstrated them last year during Google I/O, where Brin was delivering the keynote.

Zerkin grabbed a twitpic, which has since been retweeted hundreds of times and reported on dozens of others.

Despite their shared interests, Zorkin reported on Twitter that the meeting was entirely coincidental. The universe is funny that way.

Out at CES 2013 earlier this month, I stumbled on a gentleman wearing an orange version of Google Glass. He turned out to be Russ Mirrov, Electrical Lead for Google Glass project. He was amiable and reminded me that Google Glass is still a research project. Naturally, I asked to wear them, but Mirrov declined, though he did snap of photo of us using only his voice.

Mirrov was more interested in how I might want to use Google Glass. I told him that Id use them to augment my terrible memory for peoples names: I'd see someone and quietly ask Google Glass to identify them before they came within earshot. Mirrov seemed to like the idea.

Where  and on whom  have you spotted Google Glass? Share your story in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
"Make Me Asian," an app that allowed users to slant their eyes and don a rice paddy hat, received much backlash over its stereotypical depictions. On Thursday, Google pulled the app from its Play Store after thousands signed an online petition calling for its removal.

App developer KimberyDeiss created the face-changing application which yellowed users' skin and decorated faces with a Fu Manchu mustache.

"You can for a few seconds to make (yourself) a Chinese, Japanese, Korean or any other Asians," the description said, according to CNN.

Another app by the same developer, called "Make Me Indian," broadened a person's nose, gave them long black hair, war paint and a feathered headband.

Peter Chin, a pastor in Washington D.C., organized an online petition on change.org, calling out Google for perpetuating racism.

"I've seen characterizations like this before, but I thought it particularly dangerous that it was an app and on Google Play," Chin tells Mashable. "It made me afraid that the characterizations would be normalized more than I would like."

Online activist group 18 Million Rising joined the effort with their own petition and spread of the hashtag, #makemeracist. More than 10,000 people signed the petitions, and activists tweeted the campaign to Asian-American celebrities, including Aziz Ansari and Kal Penn.

Though it is unconfirmed whether or not Google removed the apps as a direct result of the petitions, Google released a statement to CNN saying, "We don't comment on individual apps. We remove apps from Google Play that violate our policies."

Their developer program policy prohibits hate speech, specifically the promotion of hatred toward groups of people based on factors including race and ethnic origin. No apps were found on Google Play Store under KimberyDeiss' username.

Chin was unable to reach anyone directly at Google, despite numerous attempts over more than three months. Pairing social media with the online petition set the foundation of the effort, he says.

"It was clear it was a very opaque process with no feedback or way to gauge that anyone was listening," Chin says. "I completely understand Google's concerns about free speech but at the same time they have corporate responsibilities and they have to balance things out. I'm really thankful it all came together and am encouraged to hear their response actualized."

Does this hold any changes for apps like "Fatbooth" or "Make Me Old?" Let us know what you think in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
While GoPro action cameras are typically used to capture daredevil stunts, users have also filmed more mundane activities  such as playing the trombone and spinning a hula hoop  to give them a fresh perspective.

SEE ALSO: Turn Your Smartphone Into a Rugged Camera With This G-Form Case

A new YouTube video, however, takes GoPro experimentation to a new level by showing one dog's point-of-view. The nearly two-and-a-half-minute clip follows the golden lab, Chase, as he swims in a pool and retrieves yellow tennis balls for his owner. Since going online Sunday, the above video has attracted close to 20,000 views.

Do you think this is an interesting way to use a GoPro camera? Tell us in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Following The New York Times' recent success, online paywalls (particularly the metered-access kind) have been popping up on newspaper websites across the globe. In the U.S. alone, nearly half of all newspapers now have some sort of online paywall, according to estimates from the Alliance for Audited Media. In the UK, adoption has been slower, though many of the country's leading dailies  The Times, The Independent, The Financial Times and The Daily Telegraph among them  now require a paying subscription for full digital access, including mobile.

As mentioned, the uptake in paywalls, particularly in the U.S., can be largely attributed to the NYT's widely publicized success with its metered-access subscription model. According to Evercore Partners, the strategy generated $91 million for the paper in 2012, helping offset continuing declines in print and digital advertising, and ensuring that the NYT's financial future is less dependent on the ups, downs and whims of the advertising industry.

The Guardian, however, is taking another route. In a refreshingly lucid statement published to The Economist's Leanback 2.0 blog, Andrew Miller, CEO of the Guardian Media Group, explains why a paywall isn't "one size fits all," and why it doesn't fit with the Guardian's current plans  namely, to significantly boost its readership and advertising revenue internationally, and to reduce its cost base by 25 million over the next five years.

In some news organisations where growth in readership may not be so important and in particular where there is a strong existing print subscriber base to build on, a pure paywall may make excellent business sense. The Economist and perhaps the Times spring to mind here. It also makes sense in other publications which feature business-critical information  for example, the Financial Times and, in the Australian context, the AFR.  At the Guardian we will continue to look at, monitor and offer a blend of options, including paywalls, depending on the product we are offering. But at the same time we have to recognise that digital advertising is not yet able to fill the substantial gap between any paywall revenues and the cost of the operation  not least because advertising agencies have not yet fully aligned their spend with changing patterns in media consumption. But how to get from where we are today to where we need to be? The main thrust of our strategy is to invest in our digital audience and revenue growth, while optimising the newspapers contribution in terms of both format and pricing and, crucially, managing our cost base to a level that is sustainable in the long term.

Miller's explanation accompanied the Guardian's announcement that it plans to set up an online operation in Sydney, Australia, later this year.

The move into Australia, which is being funded in part by entrepreneur and Global Mail chair Graeme Wood, follows the establishment of a newsroom in New York less than two years ago. Since then, the Guardian has grown its online American readership by nearly a quarter  from 8 million uniques in Feb. 2011 to 10.9 million in Dec. 2012, according to comScore. (The publication brought in a record 11.8 million uniques in Oct. 2012, surpassing the BBC's American audience for the first time, comScore said.) The Guardian now has 40 staffers in the U.S., roughly two-thirds of which are in editorial, according to Miller.

Why Australia, and why now? In a phone interview earlier this week, Miller recalled that when he joined the Guardian two years ago, he was struck by the fact that two-thirds of its readership was outside the UK. The largest international audience "by a long way" resided in North America, followed by Australia; so, it made sense to try to grow audiences in those areas first. The launches have also been timed to align with political elections in each country  the perfect moment for the Guardian to strengthen its voice in each region, Miller said.

In a follow-up conversation, I asked Miller if he was at all nervous that the Guardian is currently so dependent on advertising for revenue when other publications, such as the NYT, have made efforts to diversify their revenue streams through circulation income. He said he was confident in the Guardian's knowledge of its audience and its ability to "sell [that] audience properly to the advertising community."

He added that the publication is also bringing in revenue through events, as well as through e-commerce offerings (such as this one).

What's more, the Guardian may not always be "closed off to paywalls," particularly on handsets, Miller said. (At present, UK readers must have a Guardian subscription for access to its iPhone and iPad apps, but elsewhere  including the U.S  access is free.) A browser paywall simply wouldn't align with the Guardian's current aim to grow its readership.

I asked Miller what he'd learned from the U.S. launch that he now planned to apply to Australia.

"One of the most important things is to do really interesting editorial content," he said, pointing to a number of interactive graphics (such as this one on gay rights, shown above) that were built locally by the Guardian's U.S. team. To do it, "you've got to find local talent and build [that content] locally," he added.

Where could the Guardian go next? "There's obviously a few ideas, but we're building out where we can afford," Miller said. After the U.S. and Australia, the Guardian's largest foreign audience resides in Canada, and then in continental Europe and India.

"The English-speaking spine is where the audience is," he said, adding that there may also be opportunities in translated coverage, something the Guardian has experimented with in the past.

Images courtesy of Flickr, Michael Bruntonspall and the Guardian
--------------------------------------------------------------
Last-minute hotel booking app HotelTonight has seen tremendous growth since its launch in January of 2011. The company announced Monday that it has reached four million downloads over the past 2 years, and is now expanding the service further into Europe.

Starting today, you can book a hotel using the service in two new countries: Germany and Switzerland, with initial hotel offerings available in Berlin, Munich, Zurich and Geneva. Hotel offerings in Hamburg will be available in February.

"Mobile technology has revolutionized the way we plan our lives, totally shifting our mindset and approach to travel. We are no longer tied to pre-planned itineraries, but empowered to make spontaneous decisions about where to go and for how long," HotelTonight CEO Sam Shank said in a statement.

Last-minute booking is really where HotelTonight shines. The app offers just three hotel selections each night in each of the cities where it operates. Each selection is hand-picked by the company, and is labeled with the type of experience you're likely to have there: Luxe, Hip or Basic. Suggestions are also personalized by user. Unlike other discount hotel services, hotels with the app can be booked up to 2 a.m. local time.

The app was named by Apple as one of its Best of 2012, calling it one of the most disruptive services of the year.

HotelTonight is currently available in 10 countries and 80 destinations around the world.

Have you ever used HotelTonight to book a last-minute hotel room? Let us know about your experiences in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Technology that blocks or skips TV ads is becoming ever more controversial and more widely known. And with the recent launch of a Chrome extension, it got personal.

No Hulu Ads, which is free, isn't the first browser extension to black out TV commercials for your viewing pleasure. It isn't the first to offer notifications letting you know when the blacked-out commercial break is over, pausing the show automatically until you return to that tab.

But it is the first to block the warning Hulu has put in place  the one that asks you to disable your ad blocker, and that strongly suggests you might not be able to see the service if you don't.

It's also the first extension we've seen to call out an online TV service by name  one that increasingly relies on ad revenue. (Hulu won't say if it intends to take any action against the developer; we've reached out to the developer for comment.)

It couldn't come at a worse time for Hulu. The service is plummeting in the comScore rankings of online video services, where according to last week's comScore numbers, Hulu is now out of the top 10. It still reaches less than 8% of U.S. viewers. Still, Hulu Plus subscriptions have doubled in the last year and annual revenue is up to $700 million, according to the CEO.

Meanwhile, Hulu's ads per user was the highest in the comScore rankings. The average Hulu viewer saw 65 ads in September, versus 20 for Google platforms such as YouTube.

Hulu's increase-the-ads strategy, which began back in 2011, was meant to make it an attractive online alternative for TV networks to sell ads on.

But could it be turning viewers off just as fast  so much that they'll download extensions to block the ads? Browse the Hulu discussion boards and you'll find a healthy number of comments attacking the service's ad frequency.

Meanwhile, the next frontier of ad-blocking technology lets you skip straight ahead to the next segment of the show.

You may recall CBS barred its journalists at CNET from awarding the Dish Networks' Hopper their Best in Show at CES 2013 accolade. The CNET writers hadn't been particularly excited about this set-top box, but its ability to skip ads made it the best of a bad bunch of gadgets up for the award.

CBS saw red. TV ads are the network's lifeblood, and they were in the middle of suing Dish over the Hopper's "Auto Hop" feature. Execs ordered CNET to rescind the award. By overriding the journalists, however, they forced a high-profile resignation  and made the whole story a good deal more damaging.

The Hopper is far more widely known today than it would have been had CNET simply issued the award. Dish made hay with a marketing campaign; it released ads stating it had won Best of CES anyway. The ads bore a giant asterisk.

Where is ad-blocking tech going next? Which side will the courts come down on? Give us your predictions in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
President Barack Obama has the middle name Hussein, one that has caused controversy because of its Arabic roots and America's uneasy relationship with Islam.

During today's inauguration, Twitter lit up with a discussion of the name  the willingness of some to finally say it, and the reluctance of others, most notably the event's emcee, Sen. Chuck Schumer, to utter it.

"I am proud that my President's middle name is Hussein. I am proud of diversity and of our eclectic cultural heritage," wrote Twitter user Brandon Hamilton bran_hamilton.

"Schumer referred twice to "Barack H. Obama" - doesn't want to say Hussein," wrote user dan Danmable. (It's not clear whether it was the Senator's own decision to say "Barack H. Obama.")

Obama himself and Chief Justice John Roberts used the president's full name during the official swearing-in ceremony on Sunday and in the public ceremony today. Both times, the president began with the phrase, "I, Barack Hussein Obama, do solemnly swear"

The president may have also touched on the issue in his address, saying "We recall that what binds this nation together is not the colors of our skin or the tenets of our faith or the origins of our names."

SEE ALSO: Top 5 Tech Initiatives for Obama's Second Term

Another prominent name was that of "Roots" author Alex Haley, whom Republican Sen. Lamar Alexander quoted when introducing Supreme Court Justice Sonia Sotomayor for the vice president's swearing in. "The late Alex Haley, the author of Roots, lived his life by these six words: 'Find the good and praise it,'" Alexander said.

Liberal users on Twitter kept the conversation about Alexander among the top trending topics long after traffic on the "Hussein" topic had dwindled.

"I have never and will never vote for Lamar Alexander (R-TN), but his speech was a perfect placement of thoughts and words," wrote Becky Brewster Sain beckysain.

Ana Marie Cox (anamariecox), the original "Wonkette" political blogger, mused that conservatives must have been reeling at Senator Alexander invoking the name of Alex Haley.

In fact, the two Tennesseans, Alexander and Haley, had been long-term friends.

Photo of President Obama and Sen. Lamar Alexander, R-Tenn. by Pete Souza, White House

This article originally published at TechNewsDaily here
--------------------------------------------------------------
George Washington's inauguration was probably really boring because the Internet didn't exist. Martha could have targeted John Adams with the stink eye, but no one could GIF it and then share it on Tumblr. Bummer, right?

Thanks to the magic of modern technology, we never have to worry about missing those most excellent moments again.

SEE ALSO: 10 People Annoyed That Inauguration Poem Didn't Rhyme

Barack Obama's second inauguration provided plenty of moments worthy of giggles and, because of the web, we can all enjoy them until we break the share button. God bless America (and the Internet)!

Red fedora guy and his iPad camera remind us how silly taking photos with a tablet looks.



Scalia is the new Aretha.

Sleepy Sasha probably wished that poem rhymed too.

"I thought Jay-Z was going to read the poem. #99inaugurationproblems"

Malia gets in on the photobombing action.

BONUS: 12 Weirdest Things That Look Like U.S. Presidents
--------------------------------------------------------------
Twitter users were apparently expecting something like "Do you like green eggs and ham? Here's Obama with a yam." While Blanco has won accolades and awards for his poems in the past, he failed to win over the 140-character criticism crafters.

SEE ALSO: 12 Weirdest Things That Look Like U.S. Presidents

It wasn't all bad news for Richard Blanco though:

BONUS: 12 Weirdest Things That Look Like U.S. Presidents
--------------------------------------------------------------
The 2013 Inauguration in Washington D.C. was an anticipated event, with many guests lining up hours in advance to wait for the president in below-freezing temperatures. Check out our selection of the best photos from the inauguration of the 44th President of the United States, Barack Obama.

1. People line up at dawn 

 

Visitors line up at the Blue Gate before sunrise on Inauguration Day for U.S. President Barack Obama. (Photo via Allison Shelley/Getty Images)

2. Crowds wait in front of the Washington Monument

 

People gather near the U.S. Capitol building on the National Mall for the Inauguration ceremony. (Photo via Joe Raedle/Getty Images)

3. Newspapers for sale

 

A vendor sells newspapers at the 57th Presidential Inauguration on January 21, 2013. (Photo via Mladen Antonov/Staff/Getty Images)

4. Veterans arrive early

 

War veterans line up as they gather at the US Capitol for the 57th Presidential Inauguration on January 21, 2013 in Washington, DC. (Photo via Jewel Samad/AFP/Getty Images)

5. Obama steps out

 

U.S. President Barack Obama arrives during the Presidential Inauguration on the West Front of the U.S. Capitol. (Photo via Win McNamee/Getty Images)

6. Obama Girls

 

Rickita Glass and Kelly Grimes and others gather near the U.S. Capitol building on the National Mall for the Inauguration ceremony. (Photo via Joe Raedle/Getty Images)

7. The Oath

 

U.S. President Barack Obama is sworn in during the public ceremony as first lady Michelle Obama looks on during the Presidential Inauguration on the West Front of the U.S. Capitol January 21, 2013 in Washington, DC. (Photo via Alex Wong/Getty Images)

8. Team huddle 

 

School children attend the 57th Presidential Inauguration on January 21, 2013 in Washington, DC. (Photo via Mladen Antonov/AFP/Getty Images)

9. Freedom flags

 

People wave American flags as people gather near the U.S. Capitol building on the National Mall for the Inauguration ceremony. (Photo via Joe Raedle/Getty Images)

10. A couple kiss

 

Gustavo Cinfuentes and Greg Josken hug near the U.S. Capitol building as they stand on the National Mall waiting for the start of the Inauguration ceremony. (Photo via Joe Raedle/Getty Images)

11. Cheer

 

People wave and cheer at a television camera near the U.S. Capitol building on the National Mall before the Inauguration ceremony. (Photo via Mario Tama/Getty Images)

12. Tree people 

 

People attend the public ceremonial swearing-in ceremony for President Barack Obama as they stand on the National Mall during the Inauguration ceremony. (Photo via Joe Raedle/Getty Images

13. Obama buttons

 

Lisa Hogue wears pins as she and others gather near the U.S. Capitol building on the National Mall for the Inauguration ceremony on January 21, 2013 in Washington, DC. (Photo via Joe Raedle/Getty Images)

14. Obama waves

 

U.S. President Barack Obama waves during the public ceremonial Inauguration on the West Front of the U.S. Capitol. (Photo via Rob Carr/Getty Images)

15. Beyonce and the First Lady

 

First lady Michelle Obama greets singer Beyonce after she performs the National Anthem during the public ceremonial Inauguration on the West Front of the U.S. Capitol. (Photo via Rob Carr/Getty Images)
--------------------------------------------------------------
Earlier this month, President Obama chose the nation's fifth inaugural poet, Richard Blanco, to recite an original poem at Monday's inauguration ceremony. Yahoo News, however, commissioned its own inaugural poems from five different writers, aiming to highlight the various ways one can write about the occasion.

James Franco was among the five writers commissioned, and his poem is picking up a lot of steam on the web. Maybe it's because he rambles on and on about not knowing how to write about Obama. Maybe it's because he reveals that Obama knew him from Spider-Man. Or, most likely, because he appears to recite his poem in front of a webcam while lying in bed.

SEE ALSO: How Is Google Like Poetry? Let Me Autocomplete the Ways

Yahoo said it included Franco "for good measure  and yes for a little glamour."

In addition to the line, ""All that stuff on CNN and [T]he Huffington Post," here's one of our favorite excerpts:

Im not up there, but Obama is. I was asked to write something

For the inauguration of his second term, but what could I write?

I was in Asheville, studying writing, but not the political sort;

I write confessions and characters, and that sort of thing. I wrote my friend Frank about what I could do, but he was unresponsive.

I went to class and then the little burrito place where they know me,

And finally at night I got Franks email on my phone and pulled over

On the side of Warren Wilson Road, past the school barn with the WWC...

The general consensus on Twitter is that the poem is pretty terrible:

And, in case you were wondering:

Read Franco's inaugural poem in its entirety here. What do you think of it? Let us know in the comments.

BONUS: 12 Weirdest Things That Look Like U.S. Presidents
--------------------------------------------------------------
Mashable's mission is to inform the connected generation; but we can help you put that knowledge to work, too.

Since 2005, Mashable has been committed to bringing the top digital, social and tech news and resources to our readers. Over time, we've built a readership of 20 million people who are well versed in digital trends, social media and all the hottest technologies. So when the world's best companies are looking to fill open positions, they post them on the Mashable Job Board. New jobs are added every day, and many positions are exclusive  employers know that if they're going to find the right person for the job, they're going to find them reading Mashable.

Below, we've rounded up five recently posted jobs; check the Mashable Job Board daily for more open positions, and be sure to read our Job Search Series for tips on how to land your dream job.

"New York City Ballet seeks a full-time Manager, Digital Marketing to join an expanding marketing department. Position will play a vital role in the digital marketing efforts of New York City Ballet to further the institutional brand, and promote the Companys 112-performance annual repertory season and holiday presentation of George Balanchines The Nutcracker at Lincoln Center, as well as touring activities nationally and internationally. The Manager, Digital Marketing will work closely with all members of the marketing department to grow audiences and meet revenue goals."

"We are currently looking for a creative project manager. At Column Five, these creatives are dubbed Producers and wear many hats: they are journalists and creative writers; they are liaisons to a dedicated list of clients; they have good senses of humor; they are technologically adept, self-motivated, and generally excited about life."

"Whats unique about Digitas? We are the top integrated brand agency with digital at our core and offices in 19 countries. We build active brands that inspire people to take action. We create business impact for Fortune 500 multi-national brands by pairing marketing, technology, creativity, media, and analytics. Were leading the industry in mobile and social. What else? We have fun. We celebrate talent, we eat bagels together on Fridays, we let loose during creative recess, we compete at Digibowl tournaments, and we get dirty volunteering together in our communities. We have a one-of-a-kind culture. Its the reason that, in the last two years alone, weve earned spots on over 20 awards lists like Coolest Places to Work and Best Companies to Work For. We have an environment at Digitas that fuels us to stay at the forefront of our industry."

"Were searching for a Media Planner who can establish themselves within the company and with clients as an expert in the field of media. Youll negotiate with media vendors and work with the media supervisor to develop strategic recommendations that meet client-marketing objectives."

"Digital Brand Architects is looking for interns interested in social media for both their fashion and lifestyle divisions. This is an EXCELLENT opportunity for students who are interested in learning how a social media agency works and want experience assisting in the development of engaging content for fashion, beauty and lifestyle brands social media channels. We are looking for interns who can start immediately."

"Veetle is a well-funded startup thats fundamentally changing how people connect and communicate using live video. Veetle has created a service that lets people easily and quickly share live video in stunningly high quality. Started by a couple of Stanford graduate students frustrated by the poor online live video experience, Veetle is now used by tens of millions people each month. And with the sea change in how people use technology to interact with each other, Veetle is poised to create a whole new paradigm for live, instant communication."

"With real users and several upcoming exciting products in development, we are looking for passionate, brilliant, and creative people to join our team and tackle problems not found anywhere else. As part of a fast-growing start-up, you will have the opportunity for tremendous career growth, in either technical or management capacity."

Check out these and other jobs on Mashable's Job Board. New positions are added every day, ranging from entry-level to C-suite positions.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Joe Biden's big Bible had Twitter distracted during the inauguration on Monday morning. The Bible measures five inches thick and has been in the Biden family since 1893, according to ABC News.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Justin Bieber cracked the weirdest joke on Instagram, but you might have missed it.

On Saturday, the 18-year-old star dropped trou and posted a picture of his bare Canadian butt to his six million followers on Instagram. The moon shot landed 100,000 likes before it was taken down and prompted a response from his manager, Scooter Braun.

"As a prankster u have to respect another good prank. only makes sense. #crackdealer," tweeted Braun suggesting the picture was a joke. Some are speculating that it's a publicity ploy by Bieber for his new acoustic album releasing Jan. 29, but if the full-moon photo is an attempt to shock Bieber fans, its way tamer than the horrific #cutforbieber campaign engineered by 4chan earlier this month.

Bieber's pictures regularly rack up hundreds of thousands of likes no matter how mundane the image is, thus not making thissurprisinglynot one of his most-liked photos. A picture of Bieber and his on-and-off girlfriend Selena Gomez received 149,000 likes, but his recent uploads regularly earn three to four times that. A selfie he took last week earned 600,000 likes.

However, his joke was a clear violation of the Facebook-owned services rules. On the Community Guidelines page, there's a dictation that no nudity is permitted to keep the app "in line with [Apples] App Store's rating for nudity and mature content."

This article originally published at The Daily Dot here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Singer Justin Timberlake strolled into the record books with "Suit & Tie," the 'N Sync alumnus' first single since 2006.

The song, which came out Jan. 13, ranked number 14 on Billboard's Pop Songs radio airplay chart with the most debut-week plays ever in the U.S. since the chart's creation in 1992.

Billboard notes that the ranking for "Suit & Tie" is the highest debut rank by a solo male artist.

The first-week radio spins for "Suit & Tie" totaled 9,394, according to RCA Records. It had the largest first-week audience of 93.4 million people, airplay monitor Mediabase reports.

Meanwhile, RCA Records also says Timberlake sold 310,078 digital singles of "Suit & Tie" (featuring Jay-Z), which marks his best premiere-week sales ever, for a song. It reportedly reached the top spot on iTunes' singles charts in 31 countries.

Timberlake had teased a musical comeback only several days before releasing the song on iTunes on the same night as the Golden Globes.

In conjunction with the release, he put this letter on Countdown.JustinTimberlake.com:

I hope this gets to you the right way. It's the only way I know to do it. Some people may criticize me for the last 3 days. But it was fun, right?? Right?!?! Besides, I'd rather speak directly to all of you. And, who can knock me for having a little bit of fun with it? Well... No more teasing. Although, it was A LOT of fun. (Did I mention that I'm having fun with this?? Ha!) This year is an exciting one for me. As you probably have heard through the "grapevine," I'm gearing up for a big 2013. Back in June of last year, I quietly started working on what is now, my next journey with that thing I love called MUSIC. The inspiration for this really came out of the blue and to be honest, I didn't expect anything out of it. I just went into the studio and started playing around with some sounds and songs. It was probably the best time I've had in my career... Just creating with no rules and/or end goal in mind and really enjoying the process. What I came up with is something I couldn't be more excited about! It is full of inspiration that I grew up listening to and some newfound muses that I've discovered along the way. I'm calling it "The 20/20 Experience," and it's coming out this year. I hope you enjoy listening to it as much as I enjoyed making it. That's all I'm giving you for now... I know, I know! Again, with the teasing!!! Get ready. This is going to be fun (well, at least it is for me).
--------------------------------------------------------------
If one of your resolutions for 2013 is to move your job skills to a new company, our Dream Job series may help you achieve just that. We've already brought you the lowdown on job openings and company culture at hot startups Spotify and Birchbox.

Now, let's look at Klout, the San Francisco-based startup that since 2008 has measured engagement and activity on social networks to determine people's online influence.

Klout  which had a busy 2012 unleashing an app, brand pages and a new API  is continuing to grow its team of employees a.k.a. "Kloutlaws."

"We move like lightning to produce, test and iterate," Eric Jorgensen, a Klout copywriter, tells Mashable. "But it's all part of the chase, and that chase is fun."

The Openings: Klout employees have worked at such places as Facebook, Google, Twitter and Zynga. The startup's recruiters are currently looking for more talent to join the engineering, marketing and operations teams.

Hiring Process: People interested in working on Klout's engineering team can apply here. Recruiters will call candidates for a phone interview, and if that goes well, they will schedule a "technical phone screen" with an engineer. Top candidates will then face a half-day of onsite interviews and eat lunch with engineers. Applicants for business positions will go through one phone interview and a few hours of onsite interviews.

The Ideal Candidate: "We believe everyone has influence and has the ability to drive action. We are looking for people who believe in our mission and are passionate game changers."

Perks and Benefits: "Competitive pay, 100% paid health premium benefits and 50% dependent premiums; 401K plan; stock options; three weeks of vacation; catered lunches, snacks, drinks; passionate people building great products; fun environment where people get the job done; appreciation of exceptional science and engineering; doing something no one has ever done before."

Kloutlaws also get nine paid holidays, commuter benefits, Zipcar discounts and breakfast. The dog-friendly office also boasts ping pong and video games.

The best part about working here is:

"It's super clich, but it really is the people. Do you know how incredible it is to be able to rely on every single person in the office to do their job efficiently? It keeps our process nimble and expands our creative license." - Eric Jorgensen, Copywriter "Being part of the small, fast-moving team that is bold enough to tackle some if the hardest problems in the industry  the scale of data, problem difficulty/diversity." - Nemanja Spasojevic, Engineer " ... being a part of something that is truly special and unique. We're making history, and we all get to put our fingerprint on the final product." - Shanti Googins, Executive Assistant

When I started working here, I was surprised by ...
--------------------------------------------------------------
Rapper Lupe Fiasco was escorted off stage during a performance at an inauguration bash on Sunday in Washington, D.C.

The event was organized by StartUp RockOn at the Hamilton Live theater. Allegedly, Fiasco  well known for his outspoken political statements  was asked to leave after he performed an anti-war song, directed in part at President Obama.

Here are a few of the lyrics:

In the video above, it appears the lights are cut out mid-performance as three security guards walk on stage to remove Fiasco.

StartUp RockOn released a statement today that assured the rapper's removal was instead the result of an unsatisfactory performance on his part:

" ... as you may have read, he left the stage earlier than we had planned. But Lupe Fiasco was not 'kicked off stage' for an 'anti-Obama rant.' We are staunch supporters of free speech, and free political speech. This was not about his opinions. Instead, after a bizarrely repetitive, jarring performance that left the crowd vocally dissatisfied, organizers decided to move on to the next act"

SEE ALSO: 9 Ways to Watch Obama's Inauguration Online

Foreign Policy reporter Josh Rogin, who apparently attended the event, tweeted that Fiasco's song went on for 30 minutes before he was asked to move to the next one.

Watch the video for yourself. What do you think? Was this reason to be escorted off stage? Or, better yet, were you at the event? Tell us your thoughts below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
New photos of a huge crater on Mars suggest water may lurk in crevices under the planet's surface, hinting that life might have once lived there, and raising the possibility that it may live there still, researchers say.

Future research looking into the chances of life on Mars could shed light on the origins of life on Earth, scientists added.

The discovery came from a study of images by NASA's powerful Mars Reconnaissance Orbiter that revealed new evidence of a wet underground environment on the Red Planet. The images focused on the giant McLaughlin Crater, which is about 57 miles (92 kilometers) wide and so deep that underground water appears to have flowed into the crater at some point in the distant past.

Today, the crater is bone-dry but harbors clay minerals and other evidence that liquid water filled the area in the ancient past.

"Taken together, the observations in McLaughlin Crater provide the best evidence for carbonate forming within a lake environment instead of being washed into a crater from outside," study lead author Joseph Michalski, of the Planetary Science Institute in Tucson, Ariz., and London's Natural History Museum, said in a statement.

SEE ALSO: Search for Water on Mars (Photos)

Space agencies have deployed many missions to Mars over the decades to explore how habitable its surface may have been or is today. However, the Martian surface has been extremely cold, arid and chemically hostile to life as we know it for most of the history of Mars.

Instead of scanning the surface of Mars for life, scientists have suggested the most viable habitat for ancient simple life may have been in Martian water hidden underground.

On Earth, microbes up to 3 miles (5 km) or more underground make up perhaps half of all of the planet's living matter. Most of these organisms represent some of the most primitive kinds of microbes known, hinting that life may actually have started underground, or at least survived there during a series of devastating cosmic impacts known as the Late Heavy Bombardment that Earth and the rest of the inner solar system endured about 4.1 billion to 3.8 billion years ago.

Since Mars has less gravity  a surface gravity of a little more than one-third Earth's  its crust is less dense and more porous than that of our planet, which means that more water can leak underground, researchers said. Wherever there is liquid water on Earth, there is virtually always life, and microbes underground on Mars could be sustained by energy sources and chemical reactions similar to those that support deep-dwelling organisms on Earth.

"The deep crust has always been the most habitable place on Mars, and would be a wise place to search for evidence for organic processes in the future," Michalski told SPACE.com.

SEE ALSO: Search for Life on Mars: A Timeline

While researchers currently have no way to drill deep underground on the Red Planet, they can nevertheless spot hints of what subterranean Mars is like by analyzing deep rocks exhumed by erosion, asteroid impacts or materials generated by underground fluids that have welled up to the surface.

Such upwelling would first occur in deep basins like McLaughlin Crater  as the lowest points on the surface, they would be where underground water reserves would most likely get exposed.

Scientists focused on McLaughlin Crater because it is one of the deepest craters on Mars. McLaughlin is about 1.3 miles (2.2 km) deep and is located in Mars' northern hemisphere.

The mineral composition of the floor of McLaughlin Crater suggests there was a lake made of upwelled groundwater there. Channels seen on the crater's eastern wall about 1,650 feet (500 meters) above its floor also hint at the former presence of a lake surface.

Michalski was actually originally trying to disprove the idea that groundwater breached the surface in many locations on Mars.

"Lo and behold, there was strong evidence for that process in this crater," he said. "Science is special because we are allowed to change our minds."

The researchers estimate that a lake existed at McLaughlin Crater for an unknown duration between 3.7 billion and 4 billion years ago. "That makes the deposits as old as or older than the oldest rocks known to exist on Earth," Michalski said.

Mounds seen on the crater floor may have come from landslides or subsequent meteor impacts. These are important because they may have rapidly buried crater floor sediments.

"That is really cool because rapid burial is the scenario that is most advantageous for preservation of organic material, if any was present at that time," Michalski said.

Since life on Earth may have begun underground, learning more about any underground life that might have lived  or may still live  on Mars could shed light on the origins of life on Earth, researchers said.

"We should give serious consideration to exploring rocks representing subsurface environments in future missions," Michalski said. "That doesn't mean drilling, but instead exploring rocks formed from upwelling groundwater, or rocks naturally exhumed from the subsurface by meteor impact."

Michalski noted that some people may ask, "'Why do I hear about the detection of water or possibility of life on Mars all the time?' The answer is because Mars is habitable in more ways than we ever realized for many years, and we are finding water in many forms and environments on Mars  many more than we predicted for a long time."

The ingredients for life the researchers describe, "including energy sources, would have been more available early in Mars' history, but it doesn't take too much imagination to picture a scenario in which the subsurface is habitable today," Michalski said. He cautioned, however, "that is much different from saying that life is there today."

The scientists detailed their findings online Jan. 20 in the journal Nature Geoscience.

This article originally published at Space.com here
--------------------------------------------------------------
With the help of social media, people can now share ideas much faster than in Martin Luther King Jr.'s "I have a dream" era. It is unlikely, however, that any of the hundreds of millions of ideas we share each day will ever have as much of an impact or longevity as King's.

SEE ALSO: 'I Have a Dream' Posted in Defiance of Copyright for Internet Freedom Day

Even 40 years later, King's pleas for peace and equality of opportunity are fresh in our nation's social consciousness. On his eponymous holiday Monday, Twitter users celebrated King with some of his best quotes.

Scroll through the gallery above to read these famous words. Which King quote is your favorite? Let us know in the comments below.

Mashable composite: Images via Twitter and courtesy of of Marion S. Trikosko [Public domain], via Wikimedia Commons
--------------------------------------------------------------
Artists capture the spirit of Martin Luther King, Jr. and his legendary words with pictures. Their paintings, sketches and mosaics are one of the many creative ways people paid tribute to the historic figure that forever changed America.

SEE ALSO: 11 Martin Luther King Quotes to Keep the Dream Alive

Take a look through the gallery to see some of the inspirational art people have shared online.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The new Myspace is now open to all, shifting the aging social network's focus toward building connections between musicians and fans. With an updated design and the star power of Justin Timberlake (one of the company's backers), the site has garnered a lot of attention. Now it has its first official complaint.

Merlin, an U.K.-based agency that represents many independent record labels, says Myspace is using the music of its artists without permission. The group used to have a deal with the old MySpace and its MySpace Music service, but the agreement expired over a year ago.

"What we've taken issue with is the service launched without a license from us, yet with our music all over the service," Merlin CEO Charles Caldas told Mashable. "It's launching with hundreds of tracks and offering them free, on demand to consumers without the permission of the people who own the material, and certainly without remunerating them for it."

Searching for Arcade Fire and Vampire Weekend  two artists on music labels that are part of the Merlin Group  on MySpace turns up multiple tracks.

A spokesperson for Myspace told The New York Times that if any music from the Merlin group is on Myspace that it was "likely" uploaded by individual users. The rep also said Myspace would remove any songs if Merlin requested it.

That explanation doesn't sit well with Caldas, who said Merlin is preparing a legal response.

"I don't see ignorance as a justification for piracy," he says. "If you're offering music, without permission, that belongs to a copyright holder in a commercial environment, the onus is on you, the business, to make sure those rights are cleared."

SEE ALSO: The New Myspace: Music Meets Social, Done Right

Music is the primary focus of the new Myspace, with an emphasis on mainstream artists. The service has a built-in music player and users  whether fans or musicians  can easily share songs, albums and playlists with followers. Users can also associate songs with their profiles, although unlike Classic MySpace, the songs don't auto-play.

The new Myspace launched last fall in limited beta and last week shifted to an open beta, timed to coincide with the release of Timberlake's latest single, "Suit & Tie." The service has not yet had an official launch.

Do you think Myspace should renew its deals with Merlin and other independent artists? And should it more aggressively police potential copyright violations? Share your reactions in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
There were many memorable moments during President Obama's Second Inauguration Ceremony on Monday  from the President's historical speech to Vice President Joe Biden's enormous bible.

Especially impressive were the performances by Beyonc and Kelly Clarkson. Both women were able to put their own personal spins on songs that many Americans learn at a young age. What other artists have performed at inauguration events in the past?

In honor of the inauguration on this Music Monday, we've compiled a list of some of the performers at inaugural ceremonies, galas, and celebrations since Franklin D. Roosevelt's inauguration in 1941.

Since many of them are popular musicians of their era, we've compiled a Spotify playlist of some of their most well-known songs to take a musical trip through decades past.

SEE ALSO: Watch James Franco Read a Strange Inauguration Poem From His Bed

Franklin D. Roosevelt  1941

At FDRs record-breaking third inauguration, Mickey Rooney performed.

Dwight D. Eisenhower 1957

Contralto Marian Anderson sang The Star Spangled Banner, at the Capitol during Dwight D. Eisenhowers inauguration

John F. Kennedy 1961

Marian Anderson performed at the Inauguration ceremony, while Frank Sinatra performed at the Inaugural Gala. 

Lyndon B. Johnson 1965

His inauguration included performances by the US Marine Band and the Mormon Tabernacle Choir

Richard M. Nixon 1969

The U.S. Marine Band and the Mormon Tabernacle Choir performed at the ceremony. 

Richard Nixon  1973

Ethel Ennis performed The National Anthem.

Ronald Reagan  1981

Ethel Merman performed God Bless America at the Inauguration Ceremony. 

Ronald W. Reagan  1985

Jessye Norman performed "Simple Gifts" from Aaron Copland's "Old American Songs" at the Inauguration Ceremony. 

George H.W. Bush  1989

Barbra Streisand performed at George H.W.s Inauguration Gala.

Bill Clinton 1993

Marilyn Horne was a personal friend of Bill Clintons and performed an American medley at his Inauguration Ceremony that included that included Simple Gifts by Aaron Copeland and Make a Rainbow by Portia Nelson. 

During his 1993 presidential campaign, Bill Clinton dubbed Fleetwood Macs Dont Stop his official campaign song. Although they hadnt performed together since 1982, they agreed to play at his 1993 Inauguration Gala. 

During Clintons Inaugural Concert, Bob Dylan stood in front of the Lincoln memorial with an acoustic guitar and performed Chimes of Freedom. 

Bill Clinton  1997

Jessye Norman performed a musical selection at the Inauguration Ceremony once again. Her first time performing was about ten years earlier, during Reagans inauguration. 

George W. Bush  2001

While the majority of the Inauguration was performed by choirs and military members, President George W. Bush held a star-studded Inauguration Concert, with artists ranging from Ricky Martin to Jessica Simpson to 98 Degrees (as requested by his daughter). 

George W. Bush  2005

Performers at this Inauguration Ceremony included Susan Graham, Denyce Graves, and Bradley Bennett.

Barack H. Obama  2009

Aretha Franklin performed My Country Tis of Thee during President Obamas inauguration. 

Barack H. Obama  2013

Today, Kelly Clarkson wowed the audience with her rendition of My Country Tis of Thee, while Beyonc stunned with The National Anthem.

Do you have fond memories of a particular performance at an inaugural event? Share it with us in the comments.

Sources: The Joint Congressional Committee on Inaugural Ceremonies, CBS Inauguration History, and MTV News
--------------------------------------------------------------
Barack Obama made history Monday, when he became the first president to mention gay rights in an inaugural address. The socially progressive remark drew mixed reactions on Twitter, as some users applauded his words and other's found them out of place.

"It is now our generations task to carry on what those pioneers began. For our journey is not complete until our wives, our mothers, and daughters can earn a living equal to their efforts. Our journey is not complete until our gay brothers and sisters are treated like anyone else under the law, for if we are truly created equal, then surely the love we commit to one another must be equal as well," Obama said in a widely quoted moment of his second inaugural address.

President Obama first declared his support for marriage equality in a May 2012 TV interview. For many Twitter users, Obama's mention of gay rights in the inaugural address provided hope for the work the President will do in his second term.

Other Twitter users disliked the inclusion of gay rights in the President's speech, on the basis of religion or due to the belief that gay people already are treated equally by law.

In addition to gay rights, the 44th President spoke of socially liberal issues such as responding to climate change, expanding voting rights and developing clean energy solutions.

Do you expect the issue's highlighted in Obama's address to be the focus of his second term? Let us know in the comments what you thought of the President's remarks.
--------------------------------------------------------------
With President Barack Obama taking the oath of office to begin his second term today, it kicks off four more years for NASA to pursue its audacious goal of sending astronauts farther into deep space than ever before.

Two major pieces of NASA's deep-space exploration program  full-size replicas of the agency's new Orion space capsule and Mars rover Curiosity  made an appearance during Obama's inaugural parade on Jan. 21.

NASA's "Mohawk Guy" Bobak Ferdowsi, a Curiosity flight director renowned for his hairstyle, also marched in the parade, sporting a new hairdo to mark the event. Several NASA astronauts, including Michael Massimino  the agency's most followed space man on Twitter (@Astro_Mike)  appeared in the parade, too.

In his first term as president, Obama canceled NASA's moon-oriented Constellation program and directed the space agency to pursue a new vision of deep-space exploration, a program that aims to send the first manned mission to an asteroid by 2025. By the mid-2030s, the target is Mars.

Obama unveiled the space exploration vision in April 2010 at NASA's Kennedy Space Center in Cape Canaveral, Fla. A year later, NASA's space shuttle program  already winding down by the time Obama first took office  flew its final missions. In 2012, the iconic winged space planes were delivered to museums across the country.

At the same time, NASA was busy developing a new spacecraft for deep-space exploration, the Orion space capsule, as well as a giant rocket called the Space Launch System to boost the capsule off the planet. The agency is developing another craft, the Space Exploration Vehicle, designed to make the trip to a near-Earth asteroid or other deep-space destination.

Here's a look at NASA's human spaceflight projects that will be under way during Obama's second term.

Construction has already begun on NASA's first Orion space capsule to fly and will continue throughout this year. That prototype is expected to launch unmanned atop an existing Delta 4 Heavy rocket in 2014 for an initial test. A more ambitious unmanned test flight around the moon is planned for 2017, when an Orion capsule will make an unmanned trip around the moon after launching on the first Space Launch System booster.

The first operational flights of the complete Orion and Space Launch System designs are expected by 2021. By that time, Obama's second term will have been over for several years.

SEE ALSO: Curiosity Rover Rolls In Inauguration Parade

Last week, NASA finalized a deal with the European Space Agency on the Orion capsule's service module, which will provide power, propulsion and other vital systems for the space capsule beginning with the 2017 test flight. The move, NASA officials said, sets the stage for a true international approach to space exploration beyond low-Earth orbit.

"Space has long been a frontier for international cooperation as we explore," Dan Dumbacher, NASA's deputy associate administrator for Exploration System Development, said in a Jan. 16 statement. "This latest chapter builds on NASA's excellent relationship with ESA as a partner in the International Space Station, and helps us move forward in our plans to send humans farther into space than weve ever been before."

In addition to exploring a near-Earth asteroid and Mars, NASA is also eyeing a potential plan to build a deep-space station on the far side of the moon that could serve as a stepping stone to the asteroid or Mars flights.

While NASA works on new spacecraft for deep-space missions, the agency is also supporting the development of new private manned spaceflight vehicles that could ferry American astronauts into and from low-Earth orbit.

NASA hopes the commercial spacecraft will be ready by 2017. Until then, the space agency is dependent on Russia's Soyuz spacecraft for flying Americans into orbit.

NASA already has billion-dollar deals with two private companies, SpaceX of Hawthorne, Calif., and Orbital Sciences Corp., in Virginia, to provide commercial cargo deliveries to the International Space Station aboard robotic spacecraft.

Last year, SpaceX flew two missions to the space station using its Falcon 9 rockets and Dragon spacecraft, and plans to launch its third flight sometime in March under a $1.6 billion contract for 12 missions. Orbital Sciences is planning to launch the first test flights of its Antares rocket and Cygnus space capsule later this year as part of a $1.9 billion contract for eight missions.

In December, NASA awarded a total of $30 million in funding to three different private spaceflight companies to support their work on new commercial spaceships. SpaceX, aerospace veteran Boeing and Sierra Nevada Corp. received different amounts of the funding package to spur their individual projects.

SpaceX is working to scale up its Dragon capsule to carry seven astronauts on roundtrip orbital flights. Boeing, too, is working on a space capsule (called Commercial Space Transportation 100), while Sierra Nevada is developing a small space plane dubbed Dream Chaser for its entry. A fourth contender, the company Blue Origin founded by billionaire Amazon CEO Jeff Bezos, is also competing for NASA funding.

NASA provided an update on the four companies' projects last week, with each firm promising big steps forward for their space vehicles in 2013.

"I think the partnership between NASA and each of these companies clearly shows that we have a very vibrant space industry in the United States," said Ed Mango, NASA's manager for the commercial crew program. "The four companies here today are capable and are the leading edge of what it takes to get folks back into low-Earth orbit over time."

This article originally published at Space.com here
--------------------------------------------------------------
President Barack Obama was sworn into office Monday marking his second term in the Oval Office.

In his inauguration speech, Obama referenced the polarized politics that took hold of the election season and asked the American people to begin calling upon collective action.

The speech, held at the Capitol, went on to mention the founding fathers, quoted the Declaration of Independence, and discussed the economy, climate change and gun control. Obama even became the first American president to use the word "gay" in an inaugural address.

Our friends at NowThisNews condensed the 18-minute speech into just 163 seconds to highlight some of Obama's most inspiring, powerful and important messages of the day. Watch it above.

What did you feel was the most interesting thing Obama said in his speech? Share in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Attendees and viewers of President Barack Obama's Inauguration Ceremony sent 1.1 million tweets between 11:27 a.m. ET and 12:34 a.m. ET, according to Twitter.

The most tweeted-about moment? Obama's line saying that "we cannot mistake absolutism for principle. . .," which drew 27,795 tweets per minute. The beginning of Obama's address hit 24,760 tweets per minute and Obama's first appearance hit 14,062 tweets per minute.

The 1.1 million Inauguration tweets don't come close to beating the Twitter politics record of 20 million set on election night last November. However, the 2013 Inauguration certainly trounced the 2009 Inauguration, when only 82,392 tweets were sent and Obama's swearing-in hit a mere 3,210 tweets per minute.

SEE ALSO: Follow Barack Obama's Second Inauguration on Social Media

That difference certainly speaks to Twitter's growth in popularity over the last four years. What did you tweet about during the inauguration? Share in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Alright, everyone whose New Years' resolutions included spectacularly photobombing their friends and family: you can go home. It's over. Malia Obama has won.

The first daughter jumped into the path of her sister Sasha, who was attempting to take an iPhone snap of her parents smooching. The image above  a screengrab from CNN  was rapidly shared on social networks. "Sasha and Malia", "first family" and "Obamas" quickly became top Twitter trends in the U.S.

Here's a GIF of the whole perfectly-timed moment, courtesy of Now This News and NBC. The slightly curious look from Dad at the end is priceless.

Admittedly, Malia had the best seat in the house with which to photobomb. But we're glad she took the opportunity. And Apple is probably pretty glad that the Obamas are flashing their iPhones.

Sasha had her own moment in the inaugural meme spotlight Monday, sporting a fetching yawn during the reading of the Inaugural poem. Meanwhile, Bill Clinton had an apparently unintentional photobomb of his own, behind singer Kelly Clarkson. Check out our full range of memorable GIFs and photos from the day here.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Scott Gerber is the founder of Young Entrepreneur Council, a non-profit that promotes youth entrepreneurship. The YEC recenty launched #StartupLab, a free virtual mentorship program that helps millions of entrepreneurs grow businesses via live video chats.

The online coupon seems like a simple, straightforward way to increase conversions, but that's not necessarily the case. Rock-bottom discounts (see: Groupon) can actually have a negative effect on a booming web business.

Instead of using coupon codes to spur sales at checkout, savvy business owners are finding ways to leverage discounts to track customers, build affiliate relationships and more.

SEE ALSO: ZenDeals Solves the Biggest Problem With Online Coupons

A panel of successful young entrepreneurs shares the strategies that are actually working. Here's what they had to say.



Coupon codes are essential to an ecommerce startup if it is in a competitive market. Business owners can use coupons wisely in their marketing strategies by retargeting with banners or shopping cart abandonment emails to lure shoppers back to a website. Nevertheless, if you want to build a sustainable business, never make discounted product your only value proposition. - Pablo Palatnik, ShadesDaddy.com



Here's how we've used coupons and special discounts with great results in our business: We provide partners with special discount offers they can distribute to their audiences. We set a time-based deadline or quantity-based limit. And we provide partners with commissions on sales, so they have an extra incentive to promote the offers. - Pete Kennedy, Main Street ROI



Coupon codes are an excellent way to track and measure your advertising ROI. Simply use a different code for each ad outlet (i.e. Google vs. Bing vs. Facebook) so you can see exactly how many sales each campaign generated. With a little bit of tech work, you can also use coupon codes to track  down to the keyword level of your search ad campaigns  which is critical for optimization. - Phil Frost, Main Street ROI





 On your Facebook fan page, you can offer coupons and discounts to your fans right through Facebook, or you can choose to use third-party apps. Instead of just offering a coupon to everyone, I think it's neat to reward your most loyal fans, as one company called Earthegy does. The gemstone jewelry company offers discounts and promotions, but only to their top fans, which it determines through an app. - Natalie MacNeil, She Takes on the World



Discount codes are great for tracking which sales channels are performing the best for you. For our Entrepreneurs Unpluggd events, we give our marketing partners unique discount codes to distribute, so we can see which channels refer the most sales and concentrate on optimizing those channels. - Tim Jahn, matchist



Use online discount or coupon codes to offer discounts to the first buyers. This creates scarcity, so more people take action quickly and move forward with their purchase decisions. A scarcity component drives the people who may be on the fence to take the leap. - DC Fawcett, Paramount Digital Publishing



Many businesses make the mistake of simply using coupons to increase conversions. The bigger opportunity is to utilize them to also learn more about your customers' behavior along the way. Create unique codes to be used through a variety of channels, create custom codes for partners and then test different discount formats to maximize conversions based on real data. - Anderson Schoenrock, ScanDigital



The problem with coupon codes is that you've jumped into the game of competing on price. That might not be a good strategy for service providers or those businesses with a unique product that is only distributed on their sites. However, coupon codes can be very smart for retailers that compete with other sites to sell the same items. An extra 10% off can make a customer choose your site over the competition. - Laura Roeder, LKR



Consumers today are programmed to find a deal, so discount coupon codes are a must-have for any online business. Our best coupon conversions come from a prominent tab labeled "coupon" on the left side of our homepage. When clicked, our email club sign-up form pops up. Customers can then submit their info. Shortly thereafter, they receive a discount coupon code via email. - Anthony Saladino, Kitchen Cabinet Kings



Late last year, we had pro athletes retweet a coupon code to their followers. Cumulatively, our discount went out to 2 million Twitter users. But our conversions from that campaign were less than our current strategy, which is to give a discount to anyone who asks. We encourage people to ask us for a code in our social media bios. Our conversions are higher when people ask, rather than us doing the asking. - Brett Farmiloe, Markitors



Give your employees a handful of discount codes in varying increments, and let them surprise customers with them. You can teach them to say: "We appreciate your business so much! You know  I'd like to give you $50 off your next order. Thanks for being such a great customer!" Acts of kindness like this go a long way toward building brand loyalty. - Robert Sofia, Platinum Advisor Marketing Strategies, LLC



Never offer discount or coupon codes unless you understand the unit economics of your business. I've seen friends get buried by deal sites  not because deal sites are bad, but because the business itself did not understand its own unit economics. Before you offer any sort of discount, know your customer lifetime value (CLV), and whether offering a discount will pay off in the long run. - Sunil Rajaraman, Scripted.com



Want to encourage affiliates to market for you? Give them a coupon code they can give to their audience. When the coupon codes are redeemed, track the affiliate's sales. In the end, users get discounts, your affiliates get commission and you get new customers. - Sean Ogle, Location 180, LLC
--------------------------------------------------------------
Someone dreamed a dream that footage from the Academy Awards' nine Best Picture nominees were spliced together to create a simple short film.

The dream spawned Les Zero Silver Djargo of Southern Pincoln, a 141-second mashup of clips from Amour, Life of Pi, Argo, Lincoln, Beasts of the Southern Wild, Silver Linings Playbook, Django Unchained, Zero Dark Thirty and Les Misrables.

3 Kickstarter-Backed Films Earn Oscar Nods SEE ALSO: List of Oscar Nominees

"What do these movies all have in common?" Official Comedy asks in the video's description. "EVERYTHING."

The Oscars will air Feb. 24 on ABC with Seth MacFarlane as host.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Crafting the perfect password isn't easy. Some things, like pet's names, birthdays and ascending number sequences, should definitely be avoided. (The word "password" is strongly discouraged, too.)

But what about good grammar? According to a new study, you should probably steer clear of that as well.

Researchers from Carnegie Mellon University have created an algorithm that they say can crack long passwords that make grammatical sense. The algorithm combines words and phrases from password-cracking databases into grammatically correct sentences  so passwords arranged as phrases, like "thispasswordrules" or "mynameisjudge," are becoming more crackable, they say.

SEE ALSO: 'Password' Tops List of Worst Passwords of 2012

Best take the safe route on your new password, then, with a phrase like "stringcheesealbuquerquepurple." Or something.

You can read the full report here. What are some of the best password tips you've heard? Share comments us with in the them!
--------------------------------------------------------------
RIM has changed the name of its app store, BlackBerry App World, to BlackBerry World, promising new types of content, such as music and videos.

The change comes days before the planned launch of RIM's new mobile platform, BlackBerry 10.

The new name reflects the new kinds of content RIM will make available to the store, which will be available under "Videos" and "Music" sections, though at the time of this writing those types of content still aren't available for purchase. RIM claims the new store will be a "one-stop shop for all of your entertainment needs."

The change to RIM's online store is rolling out now, and should be available to everyone in the next 24 hours. It will be rolled out to the BlackBerry PlayBook tablet and BlackBerry smartphones in the coming weeks.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Research in Motion could end up applying the Windows model of licensing its mobile operating system to other hardware manufacturers after BlackBerry 10 gets off the ground, the company's CEO told a German newspaper. RIM may also get out of the hardware business altogether at some point.

The German national newspaper Die Welt published a lengthy Q&A with RIM CEO Thorsten Heins, in which the leader of the beleaguered Canadian company said he was keeping all options on the table to steer the company toward success. When asked directly about licensing BlackBerry 10, Heins said it was "conceivable" if the platform showed the world it has "large potential."

RIM is scheduled to launch BlackBerry 10 at the end of January. The new OS represents a generational shift in BlackBerry software and devices, finally giving the company a credible response to the smartphones running iOS and Android. RIM will only offer touch-screen devices initially, and BB10 handsets sporting QWERTY keyboards will follow in the ensuing weeks or months.

SEE ALSO: RIM Loses BlackBerry Subscribers But Grows Cash Pile

Heins went on to tell the paper that his broad strategic review of the company is ongoing. He then suggested RIM may sell off its hardware production business without even being directly asked. However, he cautioned that any big strategy decisions would have to wait until the market's initial response to BlackBerry 10 becomes clear.

It's anyone's guess how popular BB10 devices will be, but RIM has built some differentiating features into the new devices. There's an onscreen keyboard that predicts what you're typing in an innovative way as well as a BlackBerry Hub that lets you access often-used functions like contacts and calendars without switching between apps. Heins also describes BB10 phones as having completely separated environments for work an personal use, with different encryption. There can be "no exchange" between the two areas, he says.

How are you feeling about BlackBerry 10 and RIM's chances to rekindle its success? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Apple will launch not one, not two, but three new iPhones in 2013, one of which will have a 4.8-inch screen, a new rumor claims.

According to the China Times, which cites sources from Apple's supply chain, Apple will launch a next-generation "classic" iPhone and a 4.8-inch device, halfway between a smartphone and a tablet, codenamed "iPhone Math". Furthermore, the rumor claims Apple will also launch a third iPhone model with a 12-megapixel camera towards the end of the year.

Very little is known about either of these, except for the camera on the 4.8-inch device, which should be of the 8-megapixel variety, with Largan Precision building the lenses.

The report should be taken with a large chunk of salt. Apple's 7.9-inch iPad mini and the 4-inch iPhone 5 have shown the company is willing to explore different form factors, which sparked the iPhone-tablet hybrid rumors. There has been no official word or indication that such a device is indeed being built, though it could arguably help Apple deal with competing large-screen Android smartphones which are selling extremely well, most notably the 4.8-inch Samsung Galaxy S III.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It looks like Samsung is turning its ad machine against a new competitor: RIM.

In a new ad that aired during the NFC Championship game Sunday night, Samsung promoted its Galaxy Note II smartphone as "the next big thing for business" and made fun of BlackBerry phones in the process.

The ad shows an office team working on developing a game called Unicorn Apocalypse on a tight deadline. At the same time, the team is told they can finally use any smartphone they want at work. That's when the real battle starts. Most in the office switch to using Samsung's phablet, but a handful of holdouts have trouble ditching the BlackBerry device they've always used at work, worried about whether Samsung's phones are as secure or useful.

SEE ALSO: Samsung Galaxy Note II: A Giant Phone That Grows on You [REVIEW]

Samsung uses the ad to debunk these concerns while poking fun at the BlackBerry users. One woman in the office says she has always relied on a "system" of using a BlackBerry at work and another smartphone at home. When another employee suggests she can just use a single Samsung phone instead, the woman says sternly, "Respect my system."

In recent months, Samsung has mainly targeted Apple with its print and TV ads. Perhaps RIM should take this as a compliment. After months of being written off by many, RIM is finally set to unveil its BlackBerry 10 products later this month. Given the timing of the ad, it appears that Samsung, a market leader, views this as enough of a potential threat to merit advertising against.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A Samsung executive confirmed to a group of reporters that the company will unveil a smaller version of its Galaxy Note 10.1 tablet at a trade show next month, a Korean news site reports. The new tablet will be Samsung's direct competitor to the iPad mini.

Jong-Kyun Shin, the president of Samsung's mobile business (pictured), told reporters attending a dinner in Seoul, Korea, that the Samsung Galaxy Note 8 would be fully revealed at Mobile World Congress in Barcelona, Spain, at the end of February, according to iNews24 and reported by Engadget. As the name implies, it'll be an 8-inch tablet, very close in size to the iPad mini (which sports a 7.9-inch screen) as opposed to the 7-inch size of the Samsung Galaxy Tab 2 7.0.

Other features and specs of the device remain a mystery, but it'll certainly include the Note line's trademark stylus. Once the subject of ridicule, the Note stylus has become a key differentiator for Samsung, with many novel abilities such as translate handwriting to text and previewing emails by hovering over the subject line in the inbox.

SEE ALSO: Sh*t People Say About the Samsung Galaxy Note [VIDEO]

Currently Samsung's Note products include the 10.1-inch Galaxy Note 10.1 tablet and 5.6-inch Galaxy Note II smartphone. Samsung just updated the Note 10.1 to Jelly Bean, though it missed its own deadline to do so before the end of 2012. The Note II already runs Jelly Bean, and the original Note (a.k.a. the Note I) was promised an as-yet-unreleased update to Jelly Bean as well.

And what about the rumored Samsung Galaxy S IV smartphone? For now, that product remains unconfirmed, and Shin even implied it would not make an appearance at MWC. That's not a surprise, since Samsung tends to launch its flagship Galaxy phones at standalone events. Last year, the company unveiled the Galaxy S III in early May.

What's your take on the smaller-screen Note tablet? Does an 8-inch screen sound more attractive than the other options? Let us know your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Sony has launched a new flagship tablet in Japan: the 10.1 Xperia Tablet Z.

The device is very thin and light for a tablet with a 10.1-inch screen: it is 6.9mm thick and weighs 495 grams. For comparison, the 9.7-inch, Wi-Fi-only iPad weighs 652 grams.

The Xperia Tablet Z is no slouch when it comes to specifications, either: it sports a Qualcomm 1.5GHz quad-core processor, 2GB of RAM and 32GB of storage memory, further expandable via microSD memory cards. Its screen has a full HD (1920x1200) resolution, and it comes with an 8.1-megapixel camera, NFC, LTE, and Sony S-Force virtual surround sound.

Last but not least, the device is also dustproof and waterproof, all of which makes it one of the most versatile Android tablets we've seen.

There's no word on pricing and availability yet.
--------------------------------------------------------------
When your PC starts its steady decline into sloth-like speeds, the first thing youd love to do (besides beating it Office Space-style) is head straight to the mall for a fancy new machine. But the reality is there are easy changes you can make to speed up your computer.

SEE ALSO: 10 Gchat Tricks and Tips for Power Users

From startup to surfing to gaming, here are five ways you can clean up an old PC to make it look young again.

If an entire pot of coffee can brew in the time it takes for your computer to boot, its time to make some changes. Most likely your computer is not slow  its the dozens of programs turning on during startup that are slowing it down.

Download a comprehensive tool like Autoruns to easily disable certain programs during your startup. Or try Windows slightly less thorough, built-in utility, MSConfig. To find it, go to Search or Run under Start and type msconfig. Under the Startup tab, uncheck the boxes of the programs you dont need to run every time your computer is turned on, for instance, iTunes or your printer. If you dont recognize a program, leave it be. Restart your computer and watch it fly.

If painfully slow surfing is your main problem, there are a couple quick changes you can make.

Are you an Internet Explorer user? Get rid of it. Google Chrome is the best browser on the market now, known for speedy surfing. Under Chrome, go to Clear Browsing Data and check the boxes of temporary Internet files like cookies, cache, download history and browsing history.

To take further precaution, try a program like CCleaner from Piriform. The free software program removes temporary files from all of your browsers, as well as Windows and the registry, to make your PC run faster.

This involves more than just uninstalling programs you dont use anymore. If youre not totally committed to the usual suspects, like Windows Media Player and Microsoft Office, switch to something that requires less computing power. Free applications can easily replace go-to programs, while speeding up your PC and giving you additional features at the same time.

VLC Media Player is a lightweight, open source media player that rips DVDs, streams video and recognizes any unprotected media format. FoxIt Reader, an alternative to Adobe Reader, does more than just open PDFs all while using less RAM. Edit documents, open multiple PDFs in tabs and more. AbiWord, a free and open source word processor, and Apaches Open Office, a free and open source full-fledge suite, can easily fill the void of Microsoft Office.

Updates are annoying. Its easy to click remind me later and avoid the notifications, until youre so frustrated with your computer that you finally set aside an entire afternoon to update everything.

Lets solve this. Go to My Computer > Properties > Automatic Updates. Make sure this is set to Download and Install Automatically. To completely cover your bases, find out if any programs need to be updated manually by downloading Update Checker from FileHippo.com. The fast and free program scans your computer and reports back with any available updates in seconds.

If youre into gaming, a $150 investment in a graphics card might be worth your while. Forewarning: Youll have to toy with your motherboard to make this upgrade happen, but there are a lot of online tutorials you can follow.

Finally, the most effective way to speed up your PC  which also requires tinkering  is to add more RAM (random access memory). You can find 4GB of memory for under $50 online. If you have less than 2GB (go to My Computer > Properties to find out), an upgrade should be in your future.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Stan Lee, creator of Marvel Comics and hero to many, went out of his way to send a special message to one of his fans.

Bowe Cleveland was shot in the Taft Union High School shooting on Jan. 10. When Lee found out Bowe was a huge Marvel fan, he took to YouTube, created an account and recorded this message. Lee also sent Cleveland signed posters and comics, and assured him that if he needs anything he should just yell "Avengers assemble!"

Were no Stan Lee, but for what its worth, Bowe, we hope you have a speedy recovery and enjoy those comics.

This article originally published at Geekosystem here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Your private Facebook statuses aren't as private as you thought  when it comes to Storify.

A vulnerability in the popular online content-curation platform allows individuals to pull and publish statuses from any Facebook account or group regardless of privacy setting.

The first to notice this was Julie Pippet, a communications and public relations professional who stumbled into the privacy breach by accident. Using the Storify extension for the Google Chrome browser, which helpfully adds a Storify button to Facebook and other social Web pages, Pippet was able to add a friend's Facebook status about Superstorm Sandy into her public Storify feed.

"I felt so terrible about what happened that I started digging and checking," Pippert told AGBeat, "and I figured out that although anything can be copied, screen-captured, or otherwise shared, anyone who installs the Storify app can do it with one click, even if it is marked or otherwise set to be private."

The Daily Dot confirmed Pippet's assertion by taking a comment left in a private Facebook group and Storifying it using the Chrome extension. But when we tried to do the same using the Storify web page, it didn't work. And when we tried to Storify a private tweet, that failed too.

As far as we can tell, the privacy loophole only works with Facebook statuses and only works with the Chrome extension.

A Facebook representative was unavailable for comment as of this story's publication.

Even if this was intentional on Storify's part, it should give Facebook users a reason to take time to truly understand their privacy settings on the social network. These can be confusing at times, as evidenced by a recent incident where Randi Zuckerberg, sister of the site's founder, had a "private" picture go viral on Twitter.

This article originally published at The Daily Dot here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Temple Run 2 was downloaded more than 20 million times since its release Apple's App Store last Thursday, according to data released by developer Imangi Studios.

The successful free-to-play sequel [iTunes link] to Temple Run became the #1 Free App in just six hours, and is currently the third-highest grossing app available thanks to its freemium content.

The response from fans has been overwhelming, says Keith Shepherd, co-founder of Imangi. We are thrilled players want more of the Temple Run universe, and we hope to grow and expand the game over the coming months.

SEE ALSO: 'Temple Run 2' Is Necessary and Beautiful

The original Temple Run was downloaded more than 170 million times on iOS and Android devices since its release in 2011. It was downloaded more than 2.5 million times on Christmas Day of 2012 as people unwrapped new devices.

To compare, all of the Angry Birds games were downloaded about 8 million times on Christmas Day, according to data release by Rovio.

Temple Run 2 players are also playing a lot. There have already been 210 million sessions of the Temple Run 2 and 1,775 years of gameplay since Thursday.



Have you downloaded Temple Run 2? Let us know in the comments.



 



Image courtesy Temple Run 2
--------------------------------------------------------------
Last week was full of major announcements: Facebook unveiled its new Graph Search, Google's CEO, Larry Page, shared his opinion of Facebook's products, and (perhaps most importantly) Destiny's Child debuted a new song, "Nuclear."

The Obama administration responded to a petition it received that asked for the U.S. government to begin building a Death Star for 2016.

SEE ALSO: 10 Things We Learned From Facebook's Graph Search

Another notable and highly discussed story was about a U.S. employee outsourcing his job to China. While many of our readers applauded the move, others argued that he was only doing what many do as a company-wide practice.

Finally, Mashable's Christina Warren responded to news of Aaron Swartz's passing in a personal post. Our readers reacted strongly, thanking Warren for voicing her story and sharing their own struggles with depression.

What were your top stories on Mashable this week? You can be part of the discussion by signing up with one of your social networks, and joining the conversation on our site. Next week, your voice could be featured in the Top Comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Launchpad is a series that introduces Mashable readers to compelling startups. If you would like to have your startup considered for inclusion, please see the details here.



One-Liner Pitch: An e-bookstore and e-reading platform that lets you pay only for what you read.

Why It's Taking Off: Total Boox lets you sample e-books, and take in single pages or chapters, without forking over the full purchase price.

In the days when books were only available in wearable and tearable bound editions, it made sense for buyers to pay money upfront. But with the advent of e-books, that model may no longer be desirable or even necessary, contends Israel-based entrepreneur Yoav Lorch. Lorch, who is also a published author, is the founder and CEO of Total Boox, a web and app-based system in early beta that lets you "read first, pay later."

Sign up for Total Boox through its app for Android tablets and you'll receive $2 in book-buying credit. (An iPad app is scheduled to hit the App Store in mid-February.) You can then download any e-book in the catalog. You can also browse other readers' book "playlists" and download them with a single tap, and create your own. Selection is limited to 10,000 e-books at present, as only a handful of small publishers, including F+W Media and Chicago-based Sourcebooks, have signed on to the platform. Lorch says he is currently in discussions with Penguin about bringing its titles to Total Boox  a deal that could bring both quality content and other big publishers to the system.

After downloading an e-book, you're welcome to flip through it from beginning to end for free. Only if you stay on a single page for more than six seconds  the minimum amount of time Lorch argues you would need to "read" a significant part of a page  will you be charged, and then only for what fraction of a book you read. So if you read 10 pages of a 100-page book that costs $10, you'll only pay $1. Those pages don't need to be consecutive either; you could read the first chapter and the last chapter, and won't be charged for any of the content in the middle. After you've exhausted your $2 credit, you can purchase additional credits starting at $10 using a credit card or PayPal, just as you would with Skype or the Paperless Post.

The advantages for consumers are clear: Just as you might in a physical bookstore, you can download and explore a wide variety of books without committing to purchase. It's a less restrictive system for e-book discovery than Amazon's, which will often only let readers sample the first chapter of a book. The opportunities for the education market are perhaps even greater, when you think of all the students and researchers who may only require access to a single article or chapter of a book. It's easy to imagine a system  perhaps subsidized by university libraries  where they could pay for just the portion they need.

Some publishers may dislike the notion of receiving only partial payments for the books they distribute, but Lorch thinks it will encourage people to explore more and read more, confident in the belief that what they do pay for they will enjoy. "Buying first creates a barrier," Lorch said in a sit-down interview with Mashable last week. "[With Total Boox], readers may be paying smaller amounts, but there will be more of them."

Lorch also thinks there are interesting data possibilities. Total Boox could build a recommendation engine based not on what e-books you've purchased, but the ones you've actually read. Authors and publishers could see what sections are the most and least read, allowing them to expand or nix a chapter in a future edition.

With limited publisher sign on, Total Boox is, at present, more interesting as a concept than as an experience. But after having tested its iPad and Android apps, both of which are pleasingly designed and easy to navigate, I can say that the experience is very promising. The real threat is the more established players in the space, like Amazon and Barnes & Noble-backed Nook, which, should Total Boox's model prove successful, could rather easily copy it themselves.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Any early 2000s Nickelodeon fans out there?

Drake Bell, former star of the Nick hit show Drake and Josh, tweeted a picture of the show's cast earlier this week. They're a bit older, sure, but hopefully just as goofy as before.

SEE ALSO: Can Storify Publish Your Private Facebook Updates?

The friendly folks over at Skylines sorted through 34,734,096 unique Twitter photos from the week and compiled the most retweeted and shared. Check out the gallery to see the top 10.

What were your favorite photos shared on Twitter over the past week? Share them with us below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
From high up on the International Space Station, Canadian astronaut Chris Hadfield snapped this picture of Washington D.C. as the city prepared for President Obama's inauguration Saturday night. Look closely to see the lights of the parade route.

President Obama was officially sworn into office for his second term yesterday afternoon. The public inauguration ceremony will take place Monday, January 21, at 11:30 a.m. ET.

SEE ALSO: 9 Ways to Watch Obama's Inauguration Online
--------------------------------------------------------------
"Wow," proclaimed New York Sen. Chuck Schumer after Kelly Clarkson's performance of "My Country, 'Tis of Thee" at Barack Obama's Inauguration ceremony on Monday.

With her emotional rendition of the patriotic song, Clarkson impressed Schumer, the Obama family, the roughly 800,000 people in attendance and the millions more watching the ceremony remotely on TV or via a live stream online.

Clarkson  who earned the first American Idol title in 2002  belted "My Country, 'Tis of Thee" as the U.S. Marine Band accompanied her. Afterward, she received comments from the president and then seemingly trotted away in awe.

She followed her performance with several tweets about her Inauguration experience:

Artists Beyonce and James Taylor also performed during the Inauguration ceremony.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Ray Lewis and the Baltimore Ravens knocked off Wes Welker and the New England Patriots on Sunday for a Super Bowl berth, and Welker's wife apparently took to Facebook after the game to bring up Lewis' controversial off-field history.

Screenshots of the posts were taken by a reader and sent to sports blog The Big Lead.

"Proud of my husband and the Pats," Wrote Anna Burns Welker (pictured above in 2005 as she was crowned Miss Hooters International). "By the way, if anyone is bored, please go to Ray Lewis' Wikipedia page. 6 kids 4 wives. Acquitted for murder. Paid a family off. Yay. What a hall of fame player! A true role model!"

Lewis will retire after the Super Bowl, ending a legendary 17-year-career. He is a controversial figure, however, for his role in a fight following Super Bowl XXIV in 2000. Two men were stabbed to death but murder charges against Lewis were dropped after he agreed to testify against two friends who were later acquitted of murder. Lewis was sentenced to 12 months probation, while the NFL fined him $250,000.

His reputation as an extremely hard worker and fearless, peerless leader and pep-talker, however, has rehabbed his image in many fans' eyes over the 13 years since. On the field, Lewis has put up sterling stats and is a surefire Hall of Famer. He's totaled more than 2,000 tackles since 1996 and was twice voted the Associated Press Defensive Player of the Year.

Do you think Burns Welker was right to blast Lewis' life off the field via Facebook, or should she have dealt with the Patriots loss some other way? Give us your take in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
While President Barack Obama was busy delivering his inaugural address from the steps of the Capitol on Monday afternoon, the White House's new media team spent its time live-tweeting some of the best lines from Obama's speech.

All told, the White House sent dozens of tweets. Staff also included several visual elements clearly intended to be easily sharable on social media.

It's not an entirely new phenomenon: Obama's campaign staff often live-tweeted the president's campaign speeches, rallies and other events.

SEE ALSO: Follow Barack Obama's Second Inauguration on Social Media

Along with providing video live streams of presidential events (the inauguration included), the White House's live-tweeting is an example of the government's use of social media to bypass the filters of traditional media.

Check out Mashable's Storify of the White House's inauguration live-tweeting. Do you think it was smart for the White House to live tweet the address? Share in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Are you trying to get a bit fitter in 2013? If you can't afford a gym membership and don't want to brave the cold, fitness videos can help you shift some pounds and tone up, all from the comfort of your own home.

We have scoured YouTube to bring you the 10 best fitness channels offering free workouts of all varieties, from pumping iron to Pilates.

SEE ALSO: App Game for Kids Encourages Healthy Eating

Take a look through a sample video from each channel in the video gallery above. Share in the comments below any other YouTube exercise gurus you subscribe to.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Cold weather doesn't stop two comedians from commemorating the final season of 30 Rock.

Like Tina Fey's character Liz Lemon high-fiving a million angels (see clip below), funny folks Mark Malkoff and Kerri Doherty challenged themselves to high-five as many cast members of the NBC comedy as possible. But how?

The two stood outside the studio where 30 Rock is taped  Silvercup Studios in Long Island City in Queens, N.Y.  and held up signs emblazoned with their fan messages. 

 

"Kerri and I were outside for about three hours  it was absolutely freezing," Malkoff tells Mashable. "30 Rock craft service bringing us hot chocolate helped a lot."

Soon after crew members brought the duo warm drinks, an autographed poster and 30 Rock DVDs, some actors emerged from the studio to meet the comedians. The first high-five went to Jane Krakowski. And after waiting a bit longer, Fey slapped their hands.

"Kerri thanked Tina for seven amazing seasons of 30 Rock," Malkoff says. "Jane Krakowski mentioned that fans have never done anything like this before."

SEE ALSO: Adam Carolla Launches 'Video Podcast Network' on YouTube

Missing from the high-five action was Tracy Morgan, who Malkoff notes Morgan's brother saying, "Tracy doesn't like to walk. Maybe he'll come out on his Segway."

This isn't Malkoff's first time doing something quirky on camera. He previously lived in an IKEA store for a week, hit up 171 Starbucks within 24 hours, brought a goat to an Apple Store, slept or napped in 13 Hollywood locations and watched 252 Netflix movies in a month.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Consumers are always on the lookout for truly innovative products, and this is no different with Formlabs, maker of a low-cost 3D printer that was embraced before it even came to market. But along with innovation often comes ethical or legal issues, and for the founders of Formlabs, that issue is the potential to use printers to create plastic guns.

The Formlabs team behind this innovative product are three MIT graduate students Maxim Lobovsky, David Cranor and Nate Linder. The three met in 2009 in MIT's "How to Make (Almost) Anything" class, and founded Formlabs together in September 2011.

Formlabs shattered its $100,000 goal on Kickstarter, and raised $2,945,885  making the Form 1 3D printer the highest-funded tech campaign in Kickstarter history. The Form 1 can be pre-ordered at the discounted price of $3,299 through its website. Your products will be delivered in May; all pre-orders for April delivery are already sold out. Most 3D printers cost tens of thousands of dollars, so $3,299 is extremely low-cost, to put that price in perspective.

If you've ever wanted to print 3D objects at home on-demand, now is your chance. Formlabs has completed development of the Form 1 3D printer, which is said to revolutionize the 3D printing landscape. Although there are a lot of 3D printers in the market today, the Form 1 is innovative and affordable compared with similar products  it is the highest-resolution low-cost 3D printer and uniquely uses a process called stereolithography.

We chatted with Maxim Lobovsky, who comments on Formlabs' Kickstarter success, offers some advice for aspiring tech startups and briefly touches on potential legal issues with 3D printing. Read on for the highlights.

These days, we're seeing more and more 3D printers on the market  what differentiates the Form 1?

The Form 1 is interesting for a couple reasons: 1) It is the highest resolution desktop printer available by far, and the reason for that is it uses a different process than any of the other desktop printers out there. It uses a process called stereolithography, as opposed to all the other low cost machines that use a process called fused deposition modeling (FDM) and our process allows for much higher accuracy and smaller features, and smoother surfaces than the FDM process does. We brought the technology which is gold standard to 3D printing and was only available in more expensive printers; we brought that down to a desktop and low cost. The other reason is that we made a complete end-to-end system with the software, machine, materials everything designed to work together, work out of the box; it's not meant to be maintained by the user. And in the end it is in a different class from the other desktop machines out there which are really kind of hobbyist, with our machine the goal is the get great quality output and use it in some other project.

How do you see the Form 1 changing the tech landscape?

I think there are a lot of applications for 3D printing and Form 1 will contribute to all of those: prototyping for new products, one-off parts for manufacturing and research, art or jewelry applications; we'll do all of those things but what we're most excited about is how we'll actually help people doing what we did, which is doing product development on a shoestring budget, launching on Kickstarter and stuff like that. This is actually the perfect tool for people doing a lot of work like that, so it's kind of a virtuous circle that we've built.

Can you shed some light on your incredible success with Kickstarter?

I think Kickstarter worked really well for us. Initially we were worried that Kickstarter wasn't perfectly aligned for the prosumer, higher-end product that we wanted to produce because it sort of looks a little hobbyist and informal. But I think it worked out great. We really focused on looking professional and showcasing the product and why it's innovative. We put a lot of effort into nice photography and a good video, but you know in the end it really comes down to people recognizing that this is a new and interesting product, and that's the most important thing.

SEE ALSO: Everything You Wanted to Know About 3D Printing But Were Too Afraid to Ask

Why did your team decide to use Kickstarter instead of similar platforms, like IndieGoGo?

I think Kickstarter is the premier platform at this point; it has the biggest user base and more importantly for us, because it does some amount of curation of its projects it generally has higher quality content I would say, and it's important for us that we're seen in that light.

What social platforms did you leverage to build awareness of the campaign?

We tried to build it up before the launch by putting up the pre-launch website and doing teaser stuff on Twitter and that helped to get a number of people ready to go for when we launched. I think that is important because Kickstarter is a self-fulfilling prophecy, if you do well on the first day you get press not just about your product but about how well you did on the first day. I don't know if it's true, but it seems like how well you do on the first day really defines the rest of the campaign. So it is important to be ready to go.

What tips could you give to other tech campaigns using Kickstarter? Tech campaigns are the second category least likely to reach their funding goals on Kickstarter, only above dance.

Honestly I think that's a good thing and maybe the ratio needs to be even lower, because I think typically people aren't raising enough money or charging high enough prices for their actual hardware products on Kickstarter. Especially if it is your first product, people categorically always underestimate all the costs it's going to take to deliver their product. To generalize, some advice I could give is you have to prove that you can deliver on your product and it will do what you say.

Most people have a good idea for a product that somebody wants, and that part is maybe the less hard part, the harder part is convincing people that you can do it and it really is what you say it is. The biggest thing is to do everything well from the graphic design to the video  high production quality is important. One thing we did and what other successful campaigns have done was to get industry experts or people recognized in the field to talk about your video and your product, I think it helps to get a lot of third party approval. The biggest thing is tech projects need to get more serious about thinking about what is it actually going to take to deliver the project they want and on what timeframe.

Are you worried about any upcoming legal action on 3D printers? Could Joe Schmoe be allowed to print a gun, for example?

I think 3D printing is definitely going to bring up some interesting questions, copyright and things like that; we're following it as closely as anybody. Honestly, I think people may be overblowing the whole situation, I'm generally optimistic and I think things will work out generally positively. On the gun issue, 3D printers will change some of that, but generally you can do with 3D printers what you could do with other tools before, so I don't think 3D printers in everybody's home means there are going to be guns everywhere. That's not the case.

Watch the video below to see the Form 1 3D printer in action. What would you print if you had a 3D printer? Let us know in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
On the 40th anniversary of the Supreme Court's historic decision about a women's right to chose, the National Association for the Repeal of Abortion Laws is kicking off a social-focused campaign targeting millennials. NARAL released the short film 40 on Tuesday to launch its new Choice Out Loud campaign.

"40 is the beginning of a dialogue with a younger generation," Jeff Martin, 40's creative director told Mashable. "We're going to have millennials be the core of the voting population in the next 15 years, and the dialogue about women's reproductive rights is a different dialogue than it's been in the past."

40 is a stop-motion portrait of choice, incorporating the work of 40 photographers who shot (pro-bono) 40 pro-choice millennial women to make the film. While some of the subjects are models, others are teachers, activists and students. Martin said the photographers were given the freedom to shoot between 60 and 80 stills of their subjects of choice.

"We wanted to look at what choice looks like in America now," he said.

The campaign aims to encourage a more personal and less political discussion about choice, NARAL said.

"This is a very personal topic; people don't talk about this in terms of politics," said Tarek Rizk, NARAL's communications director. "We want to build a platform for a new conversation about choice, and find a place on the Internet for a conversation that's more personal and non-political. We're trying to meet people on their grounds, since there's new ways of thinking and new conversations happening."

Following the film's launch, Choice Out Loud will be screened on college campuses across the country with the hope of sparking personal conversations about reproductive rights.

Watch 40, above, and let us know in the comments what you think of the campaign.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Remember the days of disposable cameras and dialing *69 to see who called you? Talk about ancient times.

As modern technology evolves and pushes out the old, it's fascinating to look back at what's been replaced in the past few years thanks to tech advancements. The folks at Mozy have put together an entertaining infographic that highlights just how far we've come over the years and what items got the boot along the way.

SEE ALSO: Obama's High-Tech Limo Is a Fortress on Wheels

What things do you think are currently on the way out? Will smartphones and tablets be old news in just a few years? Let us know your thoughts in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Apple hasn't officially made an appearance at Macworld since 2009. But this year, Steve Jobs and Steve Wozniak will still be there, or at least the actors who play them will be, according to Macworld.

Ashton Kutcher and Josh Gad play Jobs and Wozniak in the upcoming movie, jOBS. To promote the motion picture, both will help kick off next week's Macworld/iWorld conference in San Francisco. They will attend a session where they will talk about portraying two of the three Apple co-founders. Also in attendance will be musician Will.iam and Intel's Brian David Johnson.

The first Macworld Expo was held in 1985 in San Francisco. It was often used by Jobs as a forum to announce new Apple products. For example, the first iPhone was announced at Macworld 2007. In December 2008, Apple announced that they would no longer attend Macworld, and instead focus on their own events.

The biopic, jOBS debuts in theaters in April.

This article originally published at AppAdvice here
--------------------------------------------------------------
After more than 30 years of shaping the video game industry, Atari could very well be facing its last hurrah, unless someone picks up the rights to its properties for them to live on.

The company's U.S. division has filed for Chapter 11 bankruptcy, a move that is an effort to break away from its French parent company, Atari SA (formerly Infogrames), which acquired the company in 2008. A press release issued by Atari U.S. indicates that the company is looking to "secure independent capital for future growth, primarily in the areas of digital and mobile games."

The company hasn't been pushing many retail releases as of late: Its last packaged game was the racer Test Drive: Ferrari Racing Legends for Xbox 360 and PlayStation 3last year. However, it's been highly active in the digital download and mobile markets, with such releases as the Xbox Live/PlayStation Network multiplayer battle game Warlords and mobile releases like the shooter Centipede: Origins and Circus Atari (which resembles the game Doodle Jump).

Though Atari sees the bankruptcy as a reorganizational move, all of its assets are up for sale, including its game franchises (like Asteroids, Tempest and Test Drive), as well as its classic Atari logo.

SEE ALSO: Atari Legacy Still Going Strong At 40 Years

The company didn't have any blockbuster games lined up at the time of its filing, but it released quite a few in the past, including Ghostbusters, a game that reunited the cast from the film (including Bill Murray and Dan Aykroyd, who lent their voices and likenesses to their characters) as playable video game characters fighting all-new spiritual entities.

Considering the trouble that Atari has seen over the years  namely the 1983 video game market crash led by its poor video game treatment of E.T. the Extra Terrestrial  it's hard to see what its future could be like at the moment. Perhaps it will come up with a new business plan, one that forgoes blockbuster retail game releases in favor of more independent digital and mobile downloads, as it's been doing over the past few months.

Atari could also find a better publishing partner, one who knows how to push a franchise into the current game scene. Ubisoft immediately comes to mind, considering the growth of its Rayman and Splinter Cell games, both of which will see new releases in 2013.

Coming back from bankruptcy is always a road filled with bumps. But Atari has come back from failed partnerships and even a video game crash caused partly by its own blockbuster failure. There may be a bonus round yet.

This article originally published at TechNewsDaily here
--------------------------------------------------------------
AT&T announced plans to purchase more wireless spectrum by acquiring the U.S. retail wireless operations of carrier Atlantic Tele-Network (ATNI), which is operated under the Alltel brand.

The deal, which still must get regulatory approval, will cost the second-largest carrier in the U.S. $780 million in cash. Under terms of the agreement, AT&T will acquire wireless properties, including licenses, network assets, retail stores and approximately 585,000 subscribers.

The acquisition includes spectrum in the 700 MHz, 850 MHz and 1900 MHz bands and is said to be largely complementary to AT&T's existing network. Under the Alltel brand, ATNI offers service to approximately 4.6 million people across six states. These include Georgia, Idaho, Illinois, North Carolina, Ohio and South Carolina.

Once available in 34 states, most of Alltel was sold to Verizon Wireless in 2008. One year later, AT&T purchased additional parts of the company. In 2010, ATNI acquired the remaining 26 divested Alltel markets, including licenses, network assets and subscribers.

AT&T will announce the companys quarterly earnings on Jan. 24.

This article originally published at AppAdvice here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Beyonce reportedly lip-synced her way through the national anthem during President Obama's inauguration ceremony Monday.

What people heard was a pre-recorded studio track of her singing the "Star-Spangled Banner," The Times, TMZ and CNN confirmed. Before Monday's event, this photo on Beyonce's Instagram account showed her in what appears to be a recording studio.

The Presidential Inaugural Committee (PIC) requested that the Marine Band accompany Beyonce Knowles-Carter in the performance of the Star-Spangled Banner at the 2013 Inaugural Ceremony. However, there was no opportunity for Ms. Knowles-Carter to rehearse with the Marine Band before the Inauguration so it was determined that a live performance by the band was ill-advised for such a high-profile event. Each piece of music scheduled for performance in the Inauguration is pre-recorded for use in case of freezing temperatures, equipment failure, or extenuating circumstances. Regarding Ms. Knowles-Carter's vocal performance, no one in the Marine Band is in a position to assess whether it was live or pre-recorded.

Kelly Clarkson and James Taylor also performed during the inauguration, and TMZ's source with the U.S. Marine Band says Clarkson sang live.
--------------------------------------------------------------
There's no shortage of food and drink apps, but few rarely pack as many features as BigOven, well-beloved among online foodies for its practicality and ease.

BigOven, available for free on Android, iOS, Windows Phone and Kindle Fire, is simply one of the most comprehensive food and cooking apps around, garnering accolades and honors for its wide array of features and overall usefulness.

It's essentially a giant recipe box that makes it easy and simple to access recipes tailored to nearly every occasion and taste: Through the app, you have access to a wide array of dishes and menus, which you can search by keyword, course and ingredient.

Beyond a finely tuned search mechanism, the app can also help you with ideas on how to use up leftovers. You enter what ingredients you have on hand in your refrigerator or pantry, and the app delivers recipes featuring those elements.

There's also a menu planning feature that will help you map out your week's cooking for the week, helping to plan and keep the kitchen running smoothly. There are also tools that help you scale recipes up and down, and convert them to and from metric.

Going beyond cooking, the app also offers a wide array of shopping features at the in-app Pro subscription level. The app will automatically generate a grocery list for any recipe, menu or day in the menu planner, as well as sort the shopping list into store sections and aisles to help you breeze through the crowded grocery store. The paid subscription also offers full nutritional information as well as access to recipes and menus for special dietary preferences and needs.

A paid subscription also enables the ability to add your own recipes through mobile technology  you can simply snap a picture of a handwritten or printed recipe in a magazine or on paper, and the app will convert it into digital form and save it to your BigOven account.

It's a great feature if you're always scavenging recipes from newspapers, backs of products or Grandma's dog-eared recipe books, offering a digital shortcut to collating and sorting through all different sources of information. (If you stick with the free version, you can add recipes via BigOven.com.)

You'll Want It If...

You're looking for a comprehensive cooking and shopping solution that suits nearly all levels of culinary interest from everyday foodies to practical working parents trying to shop and cook smart for their family. BigOven is packed with functionality, making it a great on-the-go shopping assistant and a great research resource in the kitchen.

Sometimes a wide array of features can overwhelm an app, making it hard to navigate, but BigOven remains easy to use and accessible, with a simple user interface and straightforward design.

It's Not My Thing  What Else Ya Got?

BigOven emphasizes the more practical, everyday aspects of domestic culinary arts, and has a fairly utilitarian look-and-feel to match its approach. Its lack of visual razzle-dazzle may not appeal it to more serious gourmands, who revel in more arcane ingredients as well as an equally elegant visual presentation to match.

These users might prefer something like Gojee, which has some of the same features but offers a more adventurous, though limited, array of recipes, presented in a visually gorgeous format.

This article originally published at Mobiledia here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Bill Gates, one of the richest men in the world, is known to be decidedly non-religious. In an interview this weekend, he broke from his usual tune with an uncharacteristic mention of God.

In an interview with UK newspaper The Telegraph, Gates addressed the consequences of his foundation's work in Pakistan. The Bill and Melinda Gates Foundation has been working for the past few years to eradicate polio, which only remains in Nigeria, Pakistan and Afghanistan. In Pakistan, some health workers have paid with their lives for distributing the vaccine, because Islamist groups have spread a belief that the vaccine is a Western evil.

"Its not going to stop us succeeding," Gates says. "It does force us to sit down with the Pakistan government to renew their commitments, see what theyre going to do in security and make changes to protect the women who are doing God's work and getting out to these children and delivering the vaccine."

The Microsoft co-founder rarely speaks in religious terms and previous discussion of his own beliefs have danced around the topic of God. His wife Melinda is a Roman Catholic, though she advocates for contraception in many cases against the church's teachings.

SEE ALSO: Gateses Suggest 5 Tech-Savvy Ways to Give This Holiday Season

In a 1995 interview with PBS's David Frost, he said he believed in the values derived from religion, though not the ritual itself.

"I'm not somebody who goes to church on a regular basis," Gates said. "The specific elements of Christianity are not something I'm a huge believer in. There's a lot of merit in the moral aspects of religion. I think it can have a very, very positive impact."

The following year, he told Walter Isaacson for Time magazine that he found organized religion to be a waste of time.

"Just in terms of allocation of time resources, religion is not very efficient," he said. "There's a lot more I could be doing on a Sunday morning."

Are we witnessing a spiritual change in Gates or is "God's work" just an idiom the Microsoft co-founder has embraced? Let us know what you think in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Lance Armstrong says it helped scare him off performance-enhancing drugs forever. It's already been implemented in track and field as well as cycling, and world tennis authorities are now considering adding it to their arsenal as well.

It's called the "biological passport," a DNA fingerprint of sorts that may well be the next high-tech weapon to gain widespread use against doping in sports.

In his recent highly anticipated interview with Oprah Winfrey, Armstrong pointed to the biological passport as one of the main factors that thwarted his ability to take performance-enhancing drugs without detection.

"It's a question of scheduling," Armstrong said. "I know that sounds weird, but two things changed this. The shift to out-of-competition testing and the biological passport. And it really worked."

Now Stuart Miller, who runs the International Tennis Federation's anti-doping efforts, tells USA Today that similar testing is "being considered seriously" in his sport, and that it could be put in place as early as next year.

The recent increase in attention raises a couple of obvious questions: How exactly does the biological passport work? And how effective could it really be?

In a nutshell, here's how the technology works: Rather than directly search for evidence of PEDs in an athlete's system, the biological passport method of enforcement uses a more comprehensive overview of athletes' individual biochemistry to search for abnormalities particular to them. Multiple samples are collected over time and stored electronically to create personal profiles, and those parameters are then used to judge future drug tests.

That, says the Canadian Centre for Ethics in Sport, allows regulators "to see the big picture  any deviations from the athletes test-established norm that might result from doping, even if the specific drug or tactic remains unknown."

Many see the biological passport as an important step forward in the war on sports doping. And while it's gained a bit more notice in recent days, the system isn't that new. World cycling's governing body adopted it in 2008, while track and field's regulatory commission followed suit in 2010.

Many cyclists have been punished for results detected under the program, and the Australian Football League just implemented a passport system of its own.

Its personalized and "big picture" nature, supporters say, make it better and more effective than other forms of testing. Many believe that the passport's high level of science acts as a powerful deterrent and detection tool. Armstrong, one of the most notorious dopers in sports history, seemingly confirmed that last week.

Nonetheless, skeptics do caution that one be-all-end-all drug test will likely never exist in sports. As hard as regulatory bodies work to kill doping, athletes and their handlers will just as feverishly try to gain a competitive edge through whatever means possible.

Ross Tucker, a South Africa-based scientist who specializes in exercise physiology, has analyzed the biological passport on his website, The Science of Sport. He compares it to a set of well-positioned cameras placed in an area known for dangerous, speeding motorists. People will still find ways to drive faster than allowed, he argues, but overall instances of abuse will be curbed.

"Will people still speed? Of course," Tucker writes. "But will they speed less severely, and try to speed only when not being observed? Yes, and the end result is positive. Similarly, cyclists will dope, there is no doubt of this. But they will be more careful, and that has positive consequences."

How do you think sports doping should best be addressed by regulatory bodies? Give us your take in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Fans wanting to know more about the world of BioShock Infinite will be able to dive deeper into the game's world thanks to an e-book coming out February.

BioShock Infinite: Mind in Revolt was authored by Irrational Games writer Joe Fielder with assistance from creative director Ken Levine and will focus on the backstory of floating city Columbia. It will be published on Amazon for the Kindle, and will also be given to players who preorder the game on Amazon.

Columbia is a part floating city, part battleship that exists somewhere above the United States in the early 1900s. While BioShock Infinite's story takes place in 1912, the e-book will focus on what happened before the city was overrun with fighting between the ruling class and a group of rebels.

"Since we first announced BioShock Infinite, our fans have asked for more information about Columbia and the complex cast of characters that inhabit the floating city," said Fielder in a statement. "After reading the e-book, players will have a better understanding of BioShock Infinite's world, the struggle between its factions, and the motivations of key characters, like rebel leader Daisy Fitzroy, without spoiling the mysteries of BioShock Infinite."

BioShock Infinite is out on March 26 for Xbox 360, PlayStation 3 and PC. The BioShock Infinite: Mind In Revolt e-book will be out Feb. 12.
--------------------------------------------------------------
An Amsterdam-based travel site is looking to make a bigger name for itself in the U.S. with an estimated $35 million ad campaign that makes "booking" sound like a dirty word.

The campaign, via Wieden + Kennedy, Amsterdam, seeks to illustrate the feeling you get when you've booked well  especially when your friends and family are depending on you. The 60-second ad above shows various travelers experiencing that moment and presents a new use of the word "booking," as in "You've got it booking right" and "It doesn't get any booking better than this."

Founded in 1996, Booking is a unit of Priceline, but one that competes with its parent company. Booking has been offering deals to U.S. customers for the past six years, but felt this was the time to draw more attention to its offerings. The brand faces a crowded list of competitors, though, including Orbitz, Travelocity, Hotels.com and Priceline. While those brands have run campaigns with memorable mascots (like the Travelocity gnome and Priceline's William Shatner), Booking is outlining some real pain points for U.S. travelers, who, after all, have the fewest average weeks of vacation per year of anyone in the industrialized world and are therefore under a lot of pressure to get it right.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Mars One will soon open the application process to be part of the first Mars colony in 2023, and it recently released the basic requirements to become a future member of this Red Planet community.

Are you at least 18 years old? Proceed. Do you have a "can-do" attitude? Keep reading. Are you in good physical health? Check.

Are you willing to spend the rest of your life on Mars without the possibility of returning to Earth? Pause. Re-read that sentence. Your future home on Mars is permanent, and understanding that is the most important criteria of an applicant.

This isn't the first we've heard of colonizing Mars without the possibility of return. In fact George Herbert first introduced the concept in 1990 with a plan called "Mars to Stay." It proposed sending astronauts on a one-way mission to Mars to avoid the technological hiccups and costs associated with launching a return flight.

Mars One, a non-profit venture based in the Netherlands, is headed up by Dutch entrepreneur Bas Lansdorp. It plans to launch at least six groups of four people that will spend at least five years training together before launch. Every two years, another team of colonists will settle on Mars, adding to the overall population.

Other private Mars colonization projects  Mars Society and 4Frontiers are just two examples  operate under a similar lofty plan, with some minor differences. And these movements have their share of big-name supporters, including former astronaut Buzz Aldrin.

Even with a one-way flight, however, many political and technological concerns remain. When it comes to putting a man on Mars  let alone letting him live out his life there  some of the greatest minds in science remain divided on the subject.

Let's assume the technology exists (Mars One and other similar ventures say it does; other experts say it will take longer) and that the funding is there (Mars One estimates it will cost $6 billion. Meanwhile, NASA says it's hard to put a price on it, but for reference, the highly sophisticated Curiosity rover cost $2.5 billion.).

Even if all these seemingly unreachable factors fall into place, there still remains one basic problem that we'll never be able to control: human nature.

Aside from the unknown physical health risks associated with living with 40% gravity, could we psychologically handle Mars without return? That's the question we wanted answered, and it's one that Mars colony supporters don't tend to address. Isolation and depression will be these colonists' darkest demons.

A few years ago, NASA put together a wildly imaginative plan for a round-trip manned mission to Mars. According to this report, one of the key challenges for a mission like this is behavior and performance deterioration during long-term spaceflight missions  and that's for astronauts who will actually return to Earth.

The study points out that "humans have never embarked upon spaceflight missions approaching the scale of exploration now envisioned." So far, the best research that we have regarding this type of isolation comes from Antarctic and undersea expeditions.

Marc Shepanek, lead for aerospace medicine at NASA, has been on one of these Antarctic missions himself. "I prepared for the vast majority of things that I was going to experience," he explains. "I had the benefit of having worked at NSF, working with people who had worked down South. I was very well-read, even for the research I helped report when I went down."

Despite months of training, heavy gear, knowing  and mentally absorbing  the fact that there would be a 90-degree drop in temperature, Shepanek didn't really understand the Arctic until he first stuck his head out the window. "My face hurt from the drop of temperature [...] then it fully registered with me."

"I imagine the first time an astronaut experiences micro-gravity, sees the earth from that great height  no matter how much you have read, no matter how many pictures you have seen  I imagine that it's an experience," he says. "Being human beings  even the most controlled, disciplined, capable human beings  it's going to be different when you do it."

Shepanek does say humans are easily trained when it comes to social skills, and that includes mentally preparing for an extended period of isolation.

Mars One Medical Director Norbert Kraft agrees that no one can really understand how an isolated life on another planet will really affect them until they are actually there  of course by then it's too late.

Kraft says Mars One will do its best to prepare these pioneers with ten years of training that includes spending three months of every year inside an isolated habitat. "Then we will see if they can handle that environment," Kraft tells Mashable. "It's tough for someone to imagine that environment. You have to experience it to know if you're the person that can do this."

Even NASA has trouble assessing astronauts for long-term missions. During selection for a mission of this kind, applicants identified with a psychiatric disorder that would impede on-the-job success are removed from further consideration. As a result, some astronauts hide preexisting psychological conditions that could jeopardize their flight status.

"If someone were to go [into space] and something were to happen, there are regular private psychological conferences every two weeks and more frequent on a long term mission," Shepanek says. "You can always request a private conference, and you always have access to a crew medical officer that's on board every mission."

However, even successful precautionary measures doesn't necessarily guarantee a healthy crew. The average age of onset depression for people who have no family history of depression is 41 years old. Astronauts selected for the Astronaut Corps can be as young as 26. Mars One will consider applicants as young as 18; those participants would be 28 when they land on Mars.

The European Space Agency recently conducted a Mars mission simulation in which six volunteers were locked inside a spaceship for an unprecedented 520 days, making it the longest spaceflight or simulation in history. The results? The crew's overall movement progressively decreased, entering what the researchers called "behavioral torpor." They also experienced notable disturbances in sleep behavior.

"Five of six crew members slept more, and it is usually sleep deprivation that is linked to depressive symptoms. [Of the six] only one crew member showed signs of (self-reported) depressive symptoms," says Mathias Basner, study co-author and assistant professor of Sleep and Chronobiology at University of Pennsylvania.

Basner says insufficient light in the chamber may have contributed to the depressive symptoms in the crew member. A Mars colonist would be subjected to similar indoor lighting conditions and confined spaces, but for an even longer period of time. When asked if, based on the information we currently have about Mars' environment, it's possible to predict how a human would psychologically react once he or she is there, Basner says "absolutely not."

"At this point, it is pure speculation, he says. "The partial gravity and a longer than 24 hour day alone will be very challenging."

Mars One has already received more than 1,000 emails from people interested in this mission, and the application process hasn't even started yet. But how will Mars One  or any Mars colonization project for that matter  whittle down the applicants into a small group of serious people in which private investors will pour billions?

When assessing potential astronauts, NASA not only applies the rigorous background checks that come standard with government jobs, but the agency also puts its candidates through various physical tests and extensive interviews with both psychologists and psychiatrists.

However, Mars One's selection process is quite different. Certified physicians and scientists with years of experience will not select the future Mars colonists  you will. The public will choose the candidates who make it to the final round after a televised gameshow-like reality competition.

There will be a national selection in which 20-40 applicants per country will participate in challenges "that demonstrate their suitability to become one of the first humans on Mars." This whole process will more than likely be broadcast on television, and the the audience will select the one applicant from their respective country that will move forward.

Mars One will still have the final say of who goes to Mars, and crew selection will also depend heavily on how the members get along with each other, a key interpersonal component NASA also looks for when assessing astronaut candidates.

"These people should be comfortable with being observed all the time," says Kraft. "They won't have a lot of privacy."

On paper, a future colonist's day on Mars sounds similar to the life we live on Earth  do a job for eight hours per day, after which they can go "home" to call family or watch television. But, in reality, it's more like an extraterrestrial version of The Truman Show  a life lived under surveillance.

Like the vast majority of federal space agency experts, Shepanek believes that a round-trip manned mission to Mars should precede Mars colonization. An extended stay on Mars "would be something to answer after we go for a short period of time," he says.

The astronauts' health is NASA's No. 1 priority, according to Shepanek. When it comes to putting a man on Mars to live, however, there just simply isn't enough information to guarantee that.

"Working for NASA and knowing astronauts as I do, I want to keep them healthy. If given a choice, we like to bring our people home," Shepanek explains. "It's not unlike the field  we leave no one behind. We will take care of health and safety no matter what. Failure is not an option."

Mars to Stay proponents, though, don't believe this one-way journey is a suicide mission. Its supporters point out that, historically, man has gone to the ends of the Earth without the promise of return in the name of exploration. Columbus, Frobisher and Scott embarked upon their missions at the expense of huge personal risks.

That notion of boundless exploration is one of the only things that both federal agency experts and Mars colony supporters can agree on when it comes to putting humans on the Red Planet.

"If the kings of Spain and England could send people around a world that was potentially flat, I couldn't imagine that we wouldn't be capable of going to Mars and coming back," says Shepanek. "People are flexible; they adapt. There are all kinds of people in history who have survived heroically [...] It's amazing what people can do when they have to."

Mashable composite/photo courtesy of NASA; Image of Mars colony courtesy of Mars One
--------------------------------------------------------------
Coca-Cola is hoping some cross-media storytelling can maximize its estimated $11 million-plus Super Bowl ad spend and that consumers are up for another game during the Big Game.

The cola giant on Monday unveiled a campaign called "Coke Chase" that pits three teams against each other and lets fans determine which of the teams will be featured in a post-game ad. The creative concept is that a group of Cowboys, Mad Max-style "Badlanders" and Showgirls are battling in a hot, sweltering desert for refreshment. The ad, which shows the three teams racing toward a giant Coke bottle only to see that they still have 50 milles to go, asks viewers to go to cokechase.com, where they can vote for the team they like best.

Coke is releasing a 30-second teaser for the ad on Tuesday and will run a 60-second version during the Super Bowl. (Coke will also run a :30 for another, yet-undetermined Coke brand.) The winning ad will run immediately after the game and complete the narrative of the spot. Though voting starts on Tuesday, the final votes will be tabulated during the game, so the winner will be chosen in real time. In addition to voting, fans can also opt to sabotage another team to set them back in the race. For instance, you can opt for a film in which the cowboys get stuck at a stoplight.

This is the second ambitious cross-media campaign from Coke in as many years. Last year, the brand ran ads during the game that featured the brand's iconic polar bears reacting to the action on field. Meanwhile, a live feed during the game showed the bears watching throughout the full four hours or so of the game. The brand later claimed that 9 million people across various platforms checked in to see the polar bears.

"People aren't going to necessarily interact with your product unless you tell a compelling story," says Pio Schunker, SVP of integrated marketing at Coke. "This is the most engaging and compelling way in to talk about [Coke] as the ultimate thirst quencher."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Have you ever been unfortunate enough to crack your smartphone screen? I did  or at least I thought I did.

When I dropped my iPhone 4S on the kitchen floor last month, I told myself it was bound to happen at some point. I've been an iPhone user since the first one came out in 2007 and was pretty lucky until now. It usually landed on its case or a soft surface, but this time I actually heard the crunch as it hit the tile and saw the jagged crack on my screen.

But as it turned out, after weeks of agonizing, my phone wasn't really cracked at all  just the screen protector was.

I've spent years reporting on accessories, including cases and screen covers designed to protect your phone. But I've always used a case to hold my phone more for fashion than function. I finally put on a screen protector about six months ago, but not really for safety. I knew it would help keep the screen scratch-free, but I wanted a purple-rimmed iPhone and Apple doesn't make one. Thankfully, that thin, purple piece of glass saved my phone from the recycle bin.

The below picture is what my phone looked like after it dropped. Looks bad, right? I brought it into work and showed it off in a meeting, which elicited the proper amount of sympathy. However, I showed my son who had less sympathy.

I continued to use it for a week or two and then upgraded to the iPhone 5. When I started to peel the screen protector away from the phone, I was amazed. The screen was perfectly fine  not a scratch on it. But the screen protector, well, that broke into pieces.

The screen protector I was using at the time  called Shell Shock by Cellairis  is supposed to withstand more pressure than a regular screen protector, the company later told me. It's made of impact resistant tempered glass, so it absorbs pressure or damage that would normally scratch or shatter the screen.

Although I didn't realize it was going to lay down its life to protect the phone, I certainly dodged a bullet. Cellairis says in cases like this, customers are able to receive a replacement screen, if the protector is still under the one-year warranty.

Not all screen protectors are the same. Many on the market are shields that protect the screen from scratches from being jostled around in your bag, while others have a sturdy case with a lip that extends to the front. Whatever you opt for, just be sure to consider one that could end up saving your smartphone's life.

Have you ever cracked the screen on your iPhone? How do you protect your screen? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
There has been a lot of conversation recently around the increasing presence of auto-filtering for managing inbox clutter. With companies like OtherInbox, SaneBox and AOL Alto, the reality of your email communication being filtered out of the inbox and into a folder may be a reality you already face. And if not, it will be one you will likely face soon as adoption of these types of tools continues  both by consumers and business users alike.

While there has been a lot of conjecture around this reality, very little has been shared around the considerations we need to make as marketers, such as how it will affect our engagement rates, offer adoption and impressions on subscribers. Let's dive into these considerations a little deeper.

Whether it's a folder or a "stack," your email marketing message has found itself tightly aligned with other email communications from competitors and other vertically aligned organizations. Many systems have default categorizations that look at a variety of information within the marketing message and the email envelope to tuck the message away neatly for the recipient.

There are a number of challenges associated with this, but one of the biggest is that it doesn't matter when you sent that message  you aren't appearing at the top of the inbox. You may be at the top of the "travel" or "shopping" folder  right alongside the likes of your competitors, or the other four messages you sent in the last seven days.

The landscape and view of how and when your subscribers see your email is changing. Does this fact impact your business? For some of you the answer is absolutely. For others, you may be less concerned.

Let's take a more positive look at what this might mean for a marketer. Let's say you are a travel and hospitality organization and your email has been placed into the "travel" category. The act of the subscriber clicking into the "travel" folder means that she is likely already in the mindset to engage with a travel offer or communication  otherwise she would be in the "social" folder or someplace else.

While the impressions may be slightly more limited, it's very possible that a recipient looking at messages with a very specific focus might just be more inclined to engage than if the message were in the inbox.

Every "pro" has its "con." One of the advantages of sending messages that resonate with the customer, leveraging behavior and predictive opportunities, is to "remind" the customer that she wants to engage, subconsciously.

By removing the message from the inbox and placing it in the "travel" folder, the consumer has to make a conscious choice to look in the travel folder. Sometimes the mere act of seeing a great deal in the inbox is enough to drive the engagement  even if the consumer didn't "know" she was looking for it. The ability to engage spontaneously is greatly minimized, if not removed completely, by email auto-filtering.

Unless the consumer is regularly checking a specific folder (or all of her folders), the days of last-minute deals catching the eye of the customer may be gone (or greatly impacted). Imagine if a customer opens up the travel folder only to find a number of deals from you and your competitors that are all expired.

This reality may frustrate consumers. A potential solution here is to use technologies and partners that optimize and render content at the moment of an open (Moveable Ink is an example). While it has historically been applied in very specific situations, the need for such an ability may increase if auto-filtering really takes hold.

Delivery and inbox placement aren't going to be enough to gain proper insight into what is happening with your email. And the reality of an open action occurring days (vs. hours) after a message has been sent is a strong reality. If you're starting to see great lag times in engagement metrics or decreasing engagement, it may be time to consider the possibility that auto-filtering (or auto-foldering) is impacting your performance.

There isn't a lot of fodder out there right now about how to combat, address, or embrace the possibility of auto-filtering really taking off, but it's important to start thinking about it now. Consumers are increasingly fatigued on email clutter. This just may be their solution to it. How are you going to address it?

This article originally published at ClickZ here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Remember back when a scientific study showed that writing more Facebook updates makes you feel less lonely, more at one with the world, even if nobody reads them?

Ah, but that was way back on January 7. This Tuesday, in the ongoing science of social networking, a research team unveiled evidence of "Facebook envy."

"We were surprised by how many people have a negative experience from Facebook with envy leaving them feeling lonely, frustrated or angry," researcher Hanna Krasnova at Berlin's Humboldt University told Reuters.

What Krasnova's team did, in a couple of separate trials, was to record emotional responses to posts in 600 representative Facebook users. No prizes for guessing which emotion came out on top.

The causes of envy were many, and some read like some fascinating conversation-starters: holiday photos started more than half of the envy incidents. People in their 30s were more likely to be envious of scenes of family happiness.

They also found some very bad news for Mark Zuckerberg & Co.: Facebook envy is a very real factor in reducing Facebook usage. "From our observations some of these people will then leave Facebook or at least reduce their use of the site," Krasnova said.

"Our findings signal that users frequently perceive Facebook as a stressful environment, which may, in the long-run, endanger platform sustainability," added the study. User numbers suggesting Facebook is becoming a mature market in the U.S., which could exacerbate the problem. The Facebook honeymoon is over.

So how does "Facebook envy" and "Facebook stress" reconcile with the previous study on "Facebook togetherness?" Quite easily, as it turns out. One experiment focused on people being active on Facebook; they were writing more than the average user. The other was explicitly trying to determine how emotions were linked to passive use.

"Passive following triggers invidious emotions, with users mainly envying happiness of others, the way others spend their vacations and socialize," read the report, called "Envy on Facebook: A Hidden Threat to Users' Life Satisfaction?"

Clearly more study is needed. But here's a sensible conclusion to draw thus far: Either you're creating content on Facebook, or you're consuming it. The former will give you an uplifting sense of community; the latter will make you green with jealousy. Zuckerberg had better hope you feel more than the former.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Viewers of White Collar can now flex their crime-solving skills  just like the TV drama's duo of Federal Bureau of Investigation consultant Neal Caffrey and federal agent Peter Burke.

The FBI and USA Networks have created "Real Life White Collar Crimes" to let people help the FBI solve real crimes revolving around stolen items.

The campaign will live online via photo galleries and investigative tidbits about open cases, while on-air promotions will showcase one stolen item each week. Participants can submit leads to the FBI and earn GetGlue stickers related to "Real Life White Collar Crimes."

One case involves the 286-year-old Davidoff-Morini Stradivarius violin. A thief stole the violin, which is valued at more than $3 million, from its owner's deathbed in 1995.

USA Network tells Mashable the stolen items include "various artifacts, antiques, artwork and other valuables from around the world" such as Walt Whitman's notebooks, Native American Ledger Paintings and paintings by Puerto Rico's Jose Campeche y Jordan.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Mozilla has announced the official Firefox OS developer preview phone  the device that will be used by developers worldwide to test software for the new platform.

The phone, developed by Geeksphone (in partnership with Telefonica), is a mid-range smartphone by today's standards: it's powered by a 1 GHz Qualcomm Snapdragon S1 CPU, has a 3.5'' HVGA multi-touch screen, a 3-megapixel camera, 512MB of RAM and 4GB of ROM memory.

It comes with a microSD memory card slot, Wi-Fi N, MicroUSB slot, plus a variety of sensors, including light, proximity and g-sensor.

Finally, the device supports 2G, 3G HSPA and comes with a 1580 mAh battery.

Those specs are nothing to write home about, but it's in line with Mozilla's idea of making a very accessible mobile platform.

The device should become available in February, at a yet unannounced price.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A giant black hole is thought to lurk at the center of the Milky Way, but it has never been directly seen. Now astronomers have predicted what the first pictures of this black hole will look like when taken with technology soon to be available.

In particular, researchers have found that pictures of a black hole or, more precisely, the boundaries around them will take a crescent form, rather than the blobby shape that is often predicted.

By modeling what these pictures will look like, scientists say they are preparing to interpret the photos that will become available from telescopes currently under construction.

"No one has been able to image a black hole," said University of California, Berkeley student Ayman Bin Kamruddin, who presented a poster on the research last week in Long Beach, Calif., at the 221st meeting of the American Astronomical Society. "So far it's been impossible because they're too small in the sky. Right now we're just getting some details about the structure, but we don't have an image yet."

SEE ALSO: Gallery: Black Holes of the Universe

Black holes themselves are invisible, of course, as not even light can escape their gravitational clutches. However, the boundary of a black hole  the point of no return called the event horizon  should be visible from the radiation emitted by matter falling into the black hole.

"A black hole's immediate surroundings have a lot of really interesting physics going on, and they emit light," Kamruddin said. "Technically speaking, we aren't exactly seeing the black hole, but we are effectively resolving the event horizon."

A new project called the Event Horizon Telescope combines the resolving power of numerous antennas from a worldwide network of radio telescopes to sight objects that otherwise would be too tiny to make out.

"The Event Horizon Telescope is the first to resolve spatial scales comparable to the size of the event horizon of a black hole," said Kamruddin's collaborator, University of California, Berkeley astronomer Jason Dexter. "I don't think it's crazy to think we might get an image in the next five years."

The Event Horizon Telescope already has been gathering some preliminary measurements of the object called Sagittarius A* (pronounced "Sagittarius A-star") at the center of our Milky Way galaxy.

Kamruddin and Dexter have matched this data to various physical models and found that they best fit images that are crescent-shaped, rather than the blob shapes called "asymmetric Gaussians" that had been previously used in models.

The crescent shape emerges from the flat doughnut, called an accretion disk, formed by matter orbiting a black hole on its way to falling in. As gas spins around the black hole, one side of the disk comes toward view on Earth, and its light becomes brighter because of a process called Doppler beaming. The other side, representing receding gas, gets dimmer because of this effect.

In the center of the crescent is a dark circle called the black hole shadow, which represents the black hole itself  an incredibly dense object where space-time is extremely twisted.

"There's really extreme bending of light happening because of general relativity and the extremely strong gravitational field," Kamruddin said.

Knowing that the crescent model best fits the data allows the researchers to discriminate between different models describing the physics around the black hole. Ultimately, the astronomers hope to use the first photos of Sagittarius A* to accurately weigh the behemoth at the center of the Milky Way.

"Just getting an image itself will be mind-blowing," Kamruddin said. "It will provide direct confirmation of the event horizon, which has been predicted, but no one's ever actually seen it. Seeing what it is like will rule out certain physics."

This article originally published at Space.com here
--------------------------------------------------------------
The flu is particularly nasty this year. Flu season is typically the worst at the beginning of the year, but can start as early as October and last as long as May. And this year's virus is especially bad.

On social media, 626,379 people reported having the flu in the last six weeks  a 2,336% increase from the previous month. With the recent outbreaks of both colds and flu, whether you're sick, or trying to avoid getting sick, we're guessing you've turned to Google to search for information. But how much cold and flu information can you trust from a web search?

Dr. Charles Chiu, M.D., Ph.D., an infectious diseases physician at University of California, San Francisco Medical Center, tells Mashable you should be very cautious with any information you find using a Google search.

"I'm actually not in favor of members of the general public searching for online (health) information and making self-diagnoses without sharing this information with their physician," he says. "Theres a lot of inaccurate information out there and in some cases its inconsistent."

However, the online source from which you find your health information is very important, he says. Sites like the CDC website, state and local public health departments, and dedicated medical sites are much more reliable than message boards, for instance. If you're finding information from articles, message boards and forums, that information could be inaccurate. Whereas health information on sites like WebMD, PubMed, UpToDate or MDConsult may have been reviewed by doctors, Chiu says. Those sites could be a good place to find information, but shouldn't take the place of a doctor visit.

Chiu says he thinks it's OK to diagnose yourself so long as you confirm your suspicions by talking to a doctor.

"It is possible, for instance, that the illness is not routine flu but something more serious that needs medical attention," he says. "Such as strep throat, atypical bacterial pneumonia, hantavirus (if history of exposure), etcetera."

A basic Google search is also OK for specific things related to health, like if you want to know if something is covered by your health insurance, or if you want to read others' reviews about which OTC medication is best for treating the flu, so long as you don't diagnose yourself using information from the web.

"I think of it as this can give you important ancillary information so long as you're not using that as your only source of information and not exclusively relying on that," Chiu says.

Dr. Michael Smith, chief medical editor for WebMD tells Mashable, that the information on WebMD is "intended to educate and inform readers on health and wellness issues, so that they can have more efficient and more informative discussions with their doctors."

Smith is confident you can rely on WebMD's information. However, the website also encourages patients to always consult with their physicians.

To ensure the flu information you're reading on the Internet is reliable, make sure there is a physician involved in creating the content, Smith says. And make sure sources are cited. Credible sources include the CDC and NIH, nonprofit health organizations and peer reviewed medical journals. Also, make sure the information is current. Based on how often health information changes, your best bet is to look for flu information that has been reviewed within the last couple of years, Smith says.

"Medicine, just like any other field, is rapidly changing," Chiu says. We have websites that review doctors and healthcare providers, but he predicts that in the future that will expand into rating medical advice, like forums and other health information on the Internet so consumers can find the most accurate information. Regardless of what you find on the Internet, it's probably best to see a specialist if you're experiencing new symptoms or just want to be sure.

Do you search for diagnoses, treatments or other health information on the web? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
France is considering a so-called "Internet tax" on data collection activities by Facebook, Google and other technology companies.

The proposed tax would put a financial value on the personal information scooped up by those firms and used for advertising and other user-based customization. Dues would then be calculated based on the amount of personal data collected, as measured by outside observers.

The idea was proposed in a report on the matter commissioned by French President Franois Hollande delivered Friday, first reported by The New York Times.

Personal data is considered by some to be among the brightest possibilities for Internet-based economic growth. The report acknowledges this possibility, calling data the "raw material" of Internet business.

The French report also argues that users of services such as Google or Facebook are, in effect, working for those companies without pay by providing them with their personal information. Many, however, see that information exchange as the "cost" of using the otherwise free services those companies provide.

There's an economic rationale behind the tax as well: France's technology sector is dominated by well-established American players that pay little in French taxes while trouncing local competition, aggravating some French business owners and lawmakers.

"We want to work to ensure that Europe is not a tax haven for a certain number of Internet giants," France's digital economy minister, Fleur Pellerin, told the Times and other reporters in Paris on Friday.

Google told the Times that it was reviewing Friday's report.

"The Internet offers huge opportunities for economic growth and employment in Europe, and we believe public policies should encourage that growth," a Google spokesperson added.

Google, specifically, has been the subject of a two-year French investigation into its tax practices. Google and other American technology companies have been accused by French officials of dramatically reducing their taxes in part by placing their European headquarters in Luxembourg or Ireland, which have lower tax rates.

"It appears that Google, Facebook or others, who are located in France, are not submitted to the same conditions, as far as tax and [Value Added Tax] are concerned, as the French players, Pellerin said in an earlier interview with Bloomberg TV. "That doesnt set the right conditions for a fair competition."

Google maintains that its tax practices are fully legal.

Google complies with tax law in every country in which it operates and we are confident we comply with French law," a Google spokesperson told Bloomberg.

Should the collection of personal data be taxed? Share your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It looks like 2012 was a pretty good year for Google.

The company hit $50 billion in annual revenue last year for the first time ever thanks in part to the strength of its fourth quarter earnings. Google generated $14.42 billion in the December quarter, an increase of 26% from the same quarter in 2011, and beating Wall Street's estimates of $12.36 billion in revenue for the quarter.

By comparison, Google generated just under $38 billion in revenues in 2011.

"We ended 2012 with a strong quarter, said Larry Page, CEO of Google. Revenues were up 36% year-on-year, and 8% quarter-on-quarter. And we hit $50 billion in revenues for the first time last year  not a bad achievement in just a decade and a half."

Investors had been somewhat concerned about the earnings report in recent days after Google's treasure and chief accountant advised analysts to re-think their estimates to account for the sale of Motorola's set top box business.

While revenues handily beat Wall Street's estimates, not everything in the report was positive. Google's cost-per-clicks declined by 6% from the same period a year ago as mobile ads continue to become more prominent.

Even so, this earnings report went better than the previous quarter, when Google's filing agency accidentally leaked the earnings report early during trading hours. This, combined with a big miss on net revenue and earnings, sent Google's stock crashing down below $700 a share.

Google's stock was up more than 4% in after hours trading following the earnings report.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Groupon has halted all of its gun-related promotions, the company said in a statement.

"All scheduled and current gun-related deals featured on Groupon North America, including shooting ranges, conceal-and-carry and clay shooting, have been placed on hiatus while we review internal standards that shape the deal inventory we feature," Groupon spokesperson Julie Mossler told Daily Finance on Sunday.

"The category is under review following recent consumer and merchant feedback."

Although Groupon provided no further explanation for its decision, some commentators point to last month's shooting at Sandy Hook Elementary School in Newton, Conn. for the sudden move. The tragedy, which left 26 people  including 20 children  dead, ignited a fierce debate on gun control in the United States.

SEE ALSO: Watch: Obama and Biden Unveil Gun Reform Proposals

Texas gun-shop owner Michael Cargill called for a boycott of Groupon after it canceled his deal for a concealed-handgun training course, Daily Finance reported.

A movement to boycott the discount website has since emerged online, including on Twitter.

Groupon did not immediately respond to a request for comment.

What do you think of Groupon's decision to suspend its gun-related deals? Discuss in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A kink within the controversial SnapChat app may let users secretly capture screen shots of private pictures without notifying the sender.

Although SnapChat has developed a reputation as being a sext-friendly platform  allowing people to share sexy or naked pictures before it's automatically deleted a few seconds later  and Facebook has been experimenting with a similar private photo platform with its Poke app, senders are typically notified when the recipient takes a screen shot of the image as a part of a security measure.

But according to University of Michigan student and hacker Raj Vir  and first reported by TechCrunch, it's easy to sneak screen shots of incoming images without the sender knowing.

SEE ALSO: App Turns Smartphone Into a Sex Toy for Couples

"I was curious about how SnapChat detects screen shots and discovered they aren't as secure as you'd think," Vir told Mashable. "If you are a SnapChat user, you just assume it's protected, but it's not that hard to get around."

After taking a screen shot of a picture sent via the SnapChat app, Vir said users can double tap the home button to bring up the multi-tasking bar.

"While taking a screen shot by holding the home and power button at the same time, keep a finger on the screen to hold the picture. When you let go and see the snaps section again, tap the home button twice before the picture disappears," Vir said. "This cancels SnapChat's detection and you can view the picture on your phone as many times as you want."

Vir said there are other ways to get around it too, such as putting the phone in standby mode by making it sleep, and logging in and out of the app to turn on Airplane Mode.

"This work-around occurs because Snapchat isn't officially supported by Apple, so it's a hack in the first place," he said. "Although Facebook does it differently for its Poke app, you can force quit the app and take screen shots this way with Poke too."

Does this hack make you hesitant to use Snapchat or similar apps? Share in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A new Tumblr from HBO called "What Should We Call Girls" (WSWCG) is the official home for GIF animations for the hit TV show. Fans of the show, which follows four women as they navigate relationships and jobs in New York City, are also encouraged to submit their own, only there's a catch.

The blog's right hand column features the "GIF (SPIRIT) Guidelines," a list of requirements that must be followed when submitting animations gleaned from the Golden Globe-winning show, including "All GIRLS content in GIFs must be obtained from authorized sources of HBO programming"

"What Should We Call Girls" borrows its name from a meme, and its format from other successful single serving blogs like #myfriendsaremarried, which feature funny GIFs with funny phrases above them. But in this case, each funny phrase must be "a direct quote from GIRLS."

Despite the strict GIF rules, WSWCG has published more than 100 animations, averaging around 100 notes each. But that hardly compares to unofficial Girls-related Tumblr blogs like Fuck Yeah Girls HBO and Girls Caps, which are stocked with random GIFs and images that have collected thousands of notes.

Such restrictions on how content is shared or interacted with are nothing new for HBO.

Over the past year, HBO has refused to offer its beloved HBO Go streaming service to people who do not have a cable subscription. Currently, HBO Go is free with the purchase of an HBO subscription, but many people are willing to pay between $4 to $40 a month just for the streaming service.

The restriction inspired the poll Take My Money, HBO! in June where people could vent their frustrations and share how much they would pay for HBO Go. The Girls Tumblr blog has not caused any sort of outrage (yet) but has made GIF artist collective Mr. GIF question HBO's intentions.

"It is pretty funny that they put so many constraints on what you can submit," Mr. GIF told the Daily Dot. "It looks like its a legal thing. I mean it seems like a odd barrier for entry though. You would imagine that the goal is to get as many people as possible to submit."

Images courtesy of HBO; What Should We Call Girls

This article originally published at The Daily Dot here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Blizzard released the opening cinematic to StarCraft II's upcoming expansion Heart of the Swarm Tuesday morning.

The expansion brings new units to the competitive real-time strategy game, as well as a single-player campaign focusing on the bug-like Zerg alien race. The Zerg can be seen in the trailer being attacked by Terran, another playable race in the game.

StarCraft II is one of the world's most popular e-sports franchises, with streaming matches watched by millions. Pro players tested out Heart of the Swarm in front of crowds at Major League Gaming's Spring Championship in June of last year.

StarCraft II: Heart of the Swarm is out March 12 for PC.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Jailbreak! Those guys on Prison Break really could have used this horse; he didn't even break a sweat getting out of that stable.

No hands? No problem? These hooves will do just fine  all it takes is a little perseverance and some big teeth.

SEE ALSO: Daring Kitten Escape Caught on Camera

And we really appreciate that while this stallion could've just galloped his way to freedom, he took the time to let some of his boys out of their cells too. After all, it's lonely on the other side.

Next up we'd like to see this magician get out of a pair of handcuffs and pull a quarter out of our ears.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Important people need a kick of caffeine to tackle the morning, just like the rest of us less superior peons.

Illustrator Steven Weinberg offers a look at the java habits of powerful people (and Muppets and dinosaurs) with a quirky series titled "Important People Drinking Coffee."

Pack the cream and sugar, then head to Weinberg's website to take a sip of the full series.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Did you see that Beyonce concert on TV yesterday afternoon? Her opening act was some guy named Barack Obama.

If you shook your head at any time while reading the last two sentences, then stretch your neck before pushing play on the video above. You might just shake your head right into a neck brace.

SEE ALSO: 'So Help Me Internet': Funniest Inauguration GIFs and Pics

Chicago station WGN conducted a facepalm-worthy interview with enthusiastic Obama supporter, Melanie. The flag-wielding inauguration attendee shared her wise observations from the festivities  just don't ask her about what Obama actually spoke about.

BONUS: 12 Weirdest Things That Look Like U.S. Presidents
--------------------------------------------------------------
After Monday's inauguration even President Obama was ready to hand over the keys to the democracy to Queen B. And then Lipsyncgate happened.

The one and only Sasha Fierce lip-synced the Star Spangled Banner. 

 

Yea just, THE NATIONAL ANTHEM. Tell us it's all lies, Beyonce. What would Blue Ivy say?

SEE ALSO: 'So Help Me Internet': Funniest Inauguration GIFs and Pics

Here in America, we're used to the politicians lying  maybe even athletes doping. But our one rock, our nation's symbol of power, betrayed us all. So of course those that felt stabbed in their Bey-loving hearts took to their keyboards for some much needed 140 character catharsis.

Share your reactions to the news in the comment below.

BONUS: 12 Weirdest Things That Look Like U.S. Presidents
--------------------------------------------------------------
Beliebers, rejoice. As if Justin Bieber wasn't famous enough, the pop star stole the Twitter crown from Lady Gaga on Monday night, claiming the top spot as most-followed account on Twitter.

Bieber comes in at No. 1 with 33,337,944 followers at the time of writing, while Gaga's at 33,332,532. Maybe it has something to do with the Biebs' bare butt on Instagram?

Lady Gaga was the most-followed since 2010 and was the first person to pass 10 million, 20 million and then 30 million followers. She tweeted at Bieber last week, saying, "So proud of @justinbieber and all the Beliebers! I'm only happy to see your fans growing in size, you all deserve it! Monsters support you!"

Not to lose out on the social media rivalry, Bieber was the first Instagram user to reach 1 million followers.

The 18-year-old averages 36,502 new users a day on Twitter, according to twittercounter.com, while Mother Monster trails behind at 28,568.

Katy Perry, Rihanna and President Obama round out the top five popular users.
--------------------------------------------------------------
An ad for the new Mercedes-Benz CLA hit YouTube on Monday, starring the buxom model Kate Upton. The spot has prompted a fair amount of buzz on blogs and social media, with many speculating that it's a preview  or even leak  of a spot she's rumored to be starring in for Mercedes during Super Bowl XLVII on Feb. 3.

SEE ALSO: Kate Upton Teaches 'Finger Mechanics' in Latest 2K Sports Ad [VIDEO]

The ad shows Upton standing around and posing in slow motion while a bunch of average-looking dudes in football jerseys wash the new-model Benz. While it's doubtful the video, posted by the official Mercedes-Benz USA YouTube account is an actual leak as speculated by the New York Post, it probably does foreshadow what Upton and Mercedes hope will be a Super Bowl splash.

Either way, the video posted Monday has proven popular, already amassing nearly 75,000 views. Check it out above and let us know what you think in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Etsy has acquired the four-person team behind photo collage-making app Mixel to build up its mobile team, Etsy confirmed on Tuesday.

By all appearances, the online crafts marketplace acquired Mixel not for its product, which allows users to collaboratively create, edit and share photo collages, but for its talent. Mixel's parent company, Lascaux Co., was co-founded in early 2011 by Khoi Vinh, the well-known former design director of the NYTimes.com (who will now assume the role of product design director for mobile at Etsy), and Scott Ostler, co-founder of real-time image sharing site dump.fm. The company's two employees, software developer Akiva Leffert and designer Roy Stanfield, will also be joining Etsy's mobile team.

Given Mixel's double focus on mobile and design, its team appears well qualified to take charge of Etsy's mobile strategy going forward. It's well-timed, too: Etsy expects to receive more traffic from mobile than desktop devices by the end of 2014, according to CTO Kellan Elliot-McCrea.

And what about Mixel? In a note posted to its website, Mixel promised users that they can continue to use the app to make and download collages, but the app's social features will soon be phased out. An Etsy spokesperson said that Etsy, for its part, has no intention of getting into the photo-sharing/collage business.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Try not to cringe, as you watch these iPhones get demolished  they're just knockoffs.

The video, above, does not document the demise of Apple's beloved smartphone, but rather its lesser clone. Before getting flattened by a bulldozer, the boxes of iPhone 4S models looked almost exactly like the real deal, complete with branded packaging and white cables.

Were you fooled by the counterfeit iPhones? Tell us in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
After his Brooklyn Nets eked out a road win against the New York Knicks on Monday night, infamous Kim Kardashian ex and paragon of NBA mediocrity Kris Humphries took to Twitter do a little gloating about how Madison Square Garden "got really quiet on the way out!"

But J.R. Smith, the Knicks' second-leading scorer, wasn't going stand idly by and let Humphries talk that kind of smack. So he RT'd Humphries' tweet while adding a pretty epic little dig referencing Kim's current paramour and soon-to-be-baby-daddy Kanye West:

The zinger quickly went viral with sports fans online, and has since amassed more than 56,000 retweets and 21,000 favorites.

Smith missed a potential game-tying shot at the buzzer, so his tweet required some stones  or just a really short memory. While he may have took the loss on the court, he was Monday night's decided victor on Twitter. And, really, which matters more?
--------------------------------------------------------------
Here's our obligatory don't try this at home warning.

Although, if this guy hadn't tried this at home, we wouldn't have had this fist-clenching footage of him leaping from the roof of one building to another. We probably shouldn't worry too much about anyone daring to attempt this at home though  just watching this is enough to give you a case of vertigo.

SEE ALSO: Watch This Real-Life Spider-Man Leap Across London [VIDEO]

The daredevil used a GoPro HD Hero3 camera to film his perspective (and terrify those of us with a fear of heights).

The mysterious man said he was doing the stunt as a training tool for American Ninja Warrior. But seriously, he needs to quit his day job and head over to Marvel to pose for his own comic book. He doesn't even need a radioactive spider and a web full of Green Goblins and Mary Janes.

Hope you can sew, buddy  no one becomes a vigilante without a cape.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The LG Optimus G was already a powerful smartphone, but now LG is taking it up another notch with the Optimus G Pro. A Japanese wireless carrier just unveiled the phone as part of its new lineup, and the specs are impressive.

The LG Optimus G Pro, announced by Japan's NTT Docomo and spotted by Engadget, has a large 5-inch screen with full HD resolution  1,920 x 1,080. That gives the display a pixel density of 440 pixels per inch (ppi), the same as the HTC Droid DNA. We found the DNA's screen to be extremely crisp, so it's stands to reason the Optimus G Pro will look just as good.

The phone is slightly thicker than the non-pro version  0.4 inch to 0.33 inch  likely to accommodate the larger battery, which holds 3,000 mAh of juice. The processor is a 1.7GHz Qualcomm Snapdragon S4 quad-core design, and it runs Android 4.1 "Jelly Bean." Of course, it's equipped to connect with NTT Docomo's LTE network, and Wi-Fi tethering supports up to eight devices.

SEE ALSO: Hands-On: LG's New Flagship Smartphone, the Optimus G

At 13 megapixels, the Optimus G Pro's camera is in line with the resolution of other top-shelf phones, and the front-facing camera is improved, too, with a 2.4-megapixel sensor.

Although the camera and screen resolution are probably overkill, it's good to see flagship smartphones are moving into quad-core, with larger batteries and better front-facing cameras. It's hitting Japan in April, but here's been no official announcement of the phone from LG, so a U.S. release is still an unknown at this point.
--------------------------------------------------------------
While residents of Bexar County, Texas, may be embracing a proposal for the nation's first local library free of printed books, not all Americans are crazy about the notion, a survey released Tuesday by the Pew Research Center indicates.

The survey reveals just how important libraries are to their communities, and ranks the popularity of the services they offer. According to Pew, six in 10 Americans above the age of 15 either visited a library or bookmobile, or accessed a library website, in the past year. Uses varied: Most (around 73%) visited a library to borrow print books, and nearly as many (66%) used the Internet. More than half stopped by to do research or solicit the help of a reference librarian. Others simply passed the time reading and or studying (49%), checked out DVDs (40%) or CDs (16%), or met with a group (23%).

Although more e-books are now sold each year than hardcover books, e-books are not yet very popular at libraries. As mentioned previously, nearly three-fourths of library visitors go to check out print books. Far fewer turn to their libraries for e-books: Of the 25% of survey participants who visited a library website in the past year, only 22% said they borrowed or downloaded an e-book. That may be partly because many libraries don't yet offer e-books for checkout. In a focus group conducted by few, several said e-book borrowing would "rekindle their interest in the library."

"While many patrons appreciate bring able to access new digital resources at libraries, they also say they value having print books and other traditional resources at libraries and still want a personal connection with library staff," Kathryn Zickuhr, research analyst at Pew, observed in a press statement. "Many libraries are torn between expanding their digital offerings on the latest platforms and still providing quality resources for patrons who may lack experience with technology or the means to own the latest devices."

In addition to use habits, Pew compiled a laundry list of items patrons want from their libraries:

Yet when asked whether they would be willing to give up existing resources to make room for these things  to move some books to off-site storage centers to make sense for a device-testing center, for instance  only 20% of survey participants said they were in favor. Thirty-six percent said libraries should "definitely" not move books off-site.

Which sums up the whole problem, really.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The first thing I did after becoming a smartphone owner in late 2009 was check my email. There were no new messages when I checked that morning, but that didn't matter: After years of using feature phones, nothing seemed more exciting to me than just having the option to check my email on the go. Over time, though, this proved to be more of a curse than a blessing to my email inbox.

I've never considered myself the most digitally organized person, but even I noticed my inbox spiral out of control after getting a smartphone as my friends and I started sending each other more messages and I forwarded myself more articles, tweets and reminders for work.

Within a few months, I went from having hundreds of unread messages at any given time to thousands. Even the best email apps on the market only made it easier to check and send messages, not to organize them.

That's why my ears perked up a couple months ago when I first heard about Mailbox, an as yet unreleased iPhone app from Orchestra  the startup behind the popular to-do list app of the same name  which promised to help users keep their inbox at zero by introducing a scheduling option for when to read and respond to incoming messages.

So for instance, you can opt to have a message resent to your inbox later that night when you get home from work or over the weekend when you have more time to respond.

Prior to this, the only real options for email were to respond immediately or let it sit in your inbox; Mailbox offered a third way. I'm not usually one to get antsy for the launch of an app, but I found myself pinning all hopes for a better future for my inbox on Mailbox  and it looks like I'm not the only one.

The company posted a teaser video (see below) for the app in mid-December, which was viewed 250,000 times in the first day and has since racked up more than 600,000 views. Meanwhile, about 70,000 people have signed up to be on the waiting list for the app. It will still be another "few weeks" before Mailbox hits Apple's App Store, but on Tuesday the company launched a formal reservation system on its website and plans to start rolling out the app to those who sign in the order that they signed up. (The reason for the staggered roll out is just to make sure that there are no server issues with the app as more people sign up.)

So does the app live up to all the hype? I've been testing Mailbox for the past few days and the app is definitely better than any other app on the market in helping to manage the flow of emails, but there is still room for improvement.

Mailbox certainly isn't the first app that has tried to improve on Apple's default email application. Both Sparrow and Gmail launched on the iPhone to plenty of hype, adding more bells and whistles to the standard email app. But the goal of Mailbox isn't just to make Apple's email app better, it's to rethink email for mobile all together.

"For the most part, apps that exist have tried to cram an existing desktop experience into a mobile phone. That's not a very effective way of building a good tool," said Gentry Underwood, CEO of Orchestra. "I think most people have a poor email experience on the phone and are hungry for something better."

Perhaps the biggest difference between checking email on mobile and desktop is that on mobile, people are performing what Underwood calls "triage," meaning they are just trying to make quick decisions about how to handle their messages while away from their desktop.

With that in mind, the team at Orchestra set out to build an app that makes it easier for users to sort messages as they come in. The centerpiece of Mailbox is a feature called "snooze" that lets users swipe across a message in their inbox to schedule being reminded about it at a later date.

When you take this step, the message is removed from your main inbox and placed in a separate folder (think of it as your Read It Later folder) and it will be re-sent to your inbox at the designated time or date.

In addition to scheduling messages, you can also use Mailbox to organize email on the go by swiping to add messages to one of several built-in lists, including "to watch," "to read" and "to buy." Each of these lists also show up as folders in Gmail. All of these features are intended to keep your inbox uncluttered without actually deleting incoming messages.

Sparrow has been my go-to app for the iPhone pretty much since it launched last March  though I will sometimes rely on the Gmail app just to search through old messages and sorting my inbox lists. Sparrow's strength, in my eyes, is that it has intuitive swipe gestures, displays my many Gmail labels, makes it easy to manage multiple email accounts and adds pictures for each of my contacts, all of which somehow make the inbox feel a little more personal and pleasant to deal with.

Mailbox, on the other hand, is missing some of the simpler perks that come with Sparrow and other email apps. You can't see your Gmail lists, or swipe to send messages to an existing Gmail list, which would be very useful for staying organized. You can't add pictures to your contacts, like you can with Sparrow. And there is also no option to select multiple emails at once as you can with Gmail or Apple's mail app, though that's mainly because Mailbox is designed to handle each message as it comes in.

That said, the app has far more potential than any other on the market as an organizational tool and it improves on some basic features as well. For example, email threads are presented more plainly and all on one page, which makes it easier to track long back-and-forth conversations, and the search functionality is on par with Gmail.

Ultimately, the selling point of the app is a single feature  scheduling  which raises the question of what would happen if other competing apps simply decide to copy this feature. Underwood acknowledged this was a potential risk in our interview. "Once you create something that's so obvious, it will change what comes down the road," he said. "We're going to need to continue innovating because other people will almost certainly follow."

The Mailbox team already has several big ideas in place for future updates, which focus on using the built-in strengths of mobile to make the email experience better, including finding ways to automate the organizational process, develop new options for users to respond to incoming messages and perhaps incorporate location and other data for scheduling emails. If Mailbox can implement this suite of features, it may just define email for the mobile era.

The best and worst thing I can say about Mailbox is that it taps into the power of procrastination. I felt a strong sense of relief while using the app just knowing that I had a way to delegate incoming messages for later, but after a few days I found it allowed me to deal with many of my emails by not dealing with them.

In a way, it's fitting that Mailbox refers to its scheduling feature as "snooze." Just as with an alarm, it's nice to have the option to hit snooze once or twice to give yourself a little more time, but there is always the potential for procrastinators like me to abuse this system and mistake the choice to delay being productive for productivity itself.

In the time I've used Mailbox, I've noticed that the number of read and unread messages in my inbox hasn't increased by as much as usual, but I know many additional messages are still hiding out in folders, waiting for a response. Now that we're stuck with email following us everywhere we go, at least we can get a little respite, even if sometimes that means we're just basically playing mind games with ourselves.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Mega  the long-anticipated file sharing and cloud storage site from Kim Dotcom  is now open to the public.

Thanks to its association with the now-defunct Megaupload  and the legal issues facing its founder Kim Dotcom  the amount of press, user interest and hype surrounding Mega is greater than any file hosting/cloud storage launch in recent memory.

According to Dotcom, more than 1 million users signed up for Mega in the first 24 hours. On Twitter, the larger-than-life entrepreneur has continued to share usage stats and traffic graphs that compare Mega with perennial cloud favorite, Dropbox.

If you're curious about the inner workings of Mega, how it works and how it handles security, we've got you covered.

Mega is the spiritual successor to Kim Dotcom's last business, the insanely popular file-hosting service Megaupload. Last year, the U.S. Department of Justice shut down Megaupload and pursued criminal charges against Dotcom. Dotcom, a New Zealand citizen, is actively fighting U.S. extradition orders.

Megaupload was targeted by the DoJ because of its role in illegally distributing copyright material  including digital copies of movies, TV shows, books, music and software.

Rather than try to start a new service eschewing the potential for copyright material to be uploaded and shared, Dotcom is positioning Mega as a service that cares about and protects its user's privacy. In fact, Mega's tagline is "the privacy company."

On the surface, Mega is a bare-bones cloud storage host. After signing up for accounts, users can upload files and folders of all types to the service. Those files can then be shared with others.

The free plan gives users 50GB of file storage. There are no hard limits on file size, meaning users can use Mega as a way to back up photos, documents and other data. Obviously, this means users can use Mega as a way to store media content  video files, music, DVD images  as well.

For now, Mega is optimized to work on desktop web browsers. Mega strongly encourages users to use Google Chrome. And while Mega has big plans for developers and client-side apps, for now, the only way to access files is via the web browser.

Files can be uploaded to the service using drag and drop or a file-upload menu. Users can create folders in the file manager.

Uploads and downloads take place in parallel. If you upload a large number of files at once, each file uploads one at a time. In the future, Mega says users will be able to change the upload order. If you need to upload or download multiple files at once, simply open a new Mega tab in your browser and select that file.

You can upgrade to a higher-tiered storage plan from within your account. Mega doesn't sell these plans itself; instead it has resellers who sell vouchers for a service. A 500GB storage plan with 1TB of enhanced bandwidth is 9.99 euros a month or 99 euros a year (a little over $110 U.S. dollars). That's cheaper than most of its competitors.

It's very important to remember the password you select when setting up your Mega account. The password is a big part of how Mega encrypts data on both ends.

During the sign-up process, Mega uses your password to create a 2,048-bit RSA key. This is the key that tells the system you are who you say you are. If you forget your password, you're not going to be able to get into your account.

Right now, Mega doesn't even have a password reset or recovery feature. In the future, Mega says it will have a reset mechanism but it will only allow users access to files or folders they have file keys for (more on file keys below). Users won't be able to access other files until or unless they remember their password.

Because your Mega password is also your master encryption key, it's important that users choose a secure password. We recommend using a password manager and printing a copy of the password to store in a safe place.

Mega is focused on end-to-end encryption. This means that files are encrypted both on upload and on download. With most traditional file hosts or cloud storage lockers, a public link to a file also includes a file path. With Dropbox, for example, the public or shared link includes the file name.

With Mega, things are a bit different. While users can share specific files to other Mega users or via email, the URL to a file doesn't contain a file name; instead, a cryptographic key is appended to the URL. Without this key, you can't access the file. Once decrypted by the server, a user has the option to download the linked file.

Mega's promise, in other words, is that users control who has access to their files and accounts and no one else.

For important files or folders, users might want to make a note of the file key and keep it in a safe place  if they are worried about getting locked out of their account.

Since Mega is touting itself as "the privacy company," it's important to look at how the company stores files and content.

The end-to-end encryption scheme is only part of how Mega secures data. Still, some are already criticizing the service, noting that it's not as secure as it says it is. An article for Forbes cites two professionals who have problems with Mega's security.

Matthew Green, a cryptography professor at John Hopkins University, is particularly critical of the way Mega uses JavaScript to verify its encryption method telling Forbes that "it makes no sense."

Mega has responded to Green's claims on its own blog, noting that its scheme "basically enables us to host the extremely integrity-sensitive static content on a large number of geographically diverse servers without worrying about security."

Meanwhile, at Ars Technia Lee Hutchinson raises concerns about how Mega comes up with its crypto key at sign-up, as well as how the company handles deduplication, or how it eliminates duplicate copies of data.

Again, Mega has taken to its blog to attempt to clarify its policies and the way it handles data.

While Mega's crypto system certainly doesn't seem any less secure than any other file locker, we do agree with critics who note that the system might be more about giving Mega culpability against claims that it knows infringing content is on its servers, rather than about protecting that data itself.

The service is still in beta and much of its code is available via open source, so security purists might want to watch how Mega's system evolves before trusting it with important, sensitive data.

While security experts can quibble and argue over the way Mega uses cryptography and how it stores data on its array of servers, the bigger issue, for us, is long-term survival.

While I would argue that most users who actively used Megaupload were not using it as a traditional cloud service, the fact remains that when the service was shut down, user files went with it.

Already anti-piracy groups are campaigning to shut down payment processors to Mega's resellers. One of the reasons Mega isn't taking payments itself and is instead using resellers is to prevent those groups from shutting down payment processors or trying to seize funds.

This is worrisome because in addition to outside capital, Mega needs professional accounts to keep its site working.

It's too early to say if Mega will be around for the long haul or not, but our advice is not to use Mega as your only file storage solution. Keep backups of crucial files on disk or other cloud-based services.

What do you think of Mega? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Remember Andrew Kim, the young design student who proposed an extensive rebranding of Microsoft's many products and services? Well, Microsoft hired him.

"I'll be designing for Microsoft as of summer. I promise that Ill make the my greatest work ever while I'm there," he wrote in a blog post.

Kim's ideas for a Microsoft rebranding were noticed by many when he posted his designs online last July. Interestingly, the software giant changed its logo just several months later, releasing a minimalist design similar to Kim's.

By his own admission, Kim was approached by "countless companies" with offers after his Microsoft rebranding project went viral, but he eventually chose to go with Microsoft.

"Working at a company is like getting married, it becomes a fundamental part of your life. I want to work with awesome people on awesome projects that I can get excited about. If youve been watching Microsoft over the past year, its been exciting, regardless of what your ecosystem preference is," he wrote.

Kim will be working in Microsoft's Xbox division, and we're excited to see how his design ideas will help shape a new visual identity for Xbox, which was left unchanged after the company's recent rebranding.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Microsoft CEO Steve Ballmer maintains his top position by forcing out any colleagues who challenge his authority, claims a former executive with the software giant.

In a new book set to launch Tuesday, Joachim Kempim criticizes Microsoft, and says Ballmer is not the right person to lead the company.

"For Microsoft to really get back in the game seriously, you need a big change in management," Kempin told Reuters. "As much as I respect Steve Ballmer, he may be a part of that in the end."

Before retiring in 2002, Kempin worked as the company's senior vice-president, overseeing worldwide OEM sales and marketing activities. He first joined Microsoft in 1983.

Entitled Resolve and Fortitude: Microsoft's "secret power broker" breaks his silence, Kempin's book details how the company botched its entry into tablets, phones and social media, according to Reuters. This mistake, he said, helped Apple and other competitors gain ground on Microsoft.

"They missed all the opportunities they were talking about when I was still in the company."

Kempin also accused Ballmer of intentionally getting rid of executives who he saw as threats. Among them is former Windows chief Steven Sinofsky, whose sudden departure last November surprised many. In an op-ed, Mashable's Lance Ulanoff said, "Maybe Ballmer thought Sinofsky was eclipsing him."

Kempin's call for a leadership change is similar to criticisms made by David Einhorn, founder of the Greenlight Capital hedge fund, in 2011.

"Ballmer is stuck in the past and is, at best, a caretaker at Microsoft," Einhorn said at the time.

Ballmer has been CEO of Microsoft since 2000.
--------------------------------------------------------------
NEC launched the Medias W N-05E for Japanese carrier NTT DoCoMo on Tuesday, and it's definitely one of the most interesting smartphones we've seen.

Its specs are fairly standard: Android 4.1, a 1.5 GHz dual-core CPU, an 8-megapixel camera, 1GB of RAM and 16GB of storage memory that's expandable via microSD cards.

What makes the phone stand out is its two 4.3-inch LCD screens, both with a 540x960 pixel resolution. The device can be folded in such a way that it shows only one screen, but when users need extra space, they can open both and enjoy all that added visual real estate.

What's more, users can stretch one app over both screens, or run different apps on each screen.

The Medias W will be available in Japan this April. What do you think of a two-screen smartphone? Would you use it? Share your thoughts in the comments, below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A new asteroid-mining company launched Tuesday with the goal of helping humanity expand across the solar system by tapping the vast riches of space rocks.

The new firm, called Deep Space Industries, Inc., announced today (Jan. 22) that it plans to launch a fleet of prospecting spacecraft in 2015, then begin harvesting metals and water from near-Earth asteroids within a decade or so. Such work could make it possible to build and refuel spacecraft far above our planet's surface, thus helping our species get a foothold in the final frontier.

"Using resources harvested in space is the only way to afford permanent space development," Deep Space CEO David Gump said in a statement. Deep Space Industries will hold a press conference today in Santa Monica, Calif., at 10 a.m. PST (1 p.m. EST/1800 GMT) to unveil more details of its bold mission plan; you can watch the webcast live at SPACE.com.

"More than 900 new asteroids that pass near Earth are discovered every year," Gump explained. "They can be like the Iron Range of Minnesota was for the Detroit car industry last century  a key resource located near where it was needed. In this case, metals and fuel from asteroids can expand the in-space industries of this century. That is our strategy."

Deep Space is the second company to jump into the asteroid-mining business. The first, the billionaire-backed firm Planetary Resources, had its own unveiling last April.

Deep Space will inspect potential mining targets with 55-pound (25 kilograms) spacecraft it calls FireFlies, the first of which are targeted for launch in 2015.

FireFlies will conduct asteroid reconnaissance on the cheap. They'll be made from low-cost "cubesat" components and will hitch a ride to space aboard rockets that also carry large communications satellites, Deep Space officials said.

"We can make amazing machines smaller, cheaper and faster than ever before," Deep Space chairman Rick Tumlinson said in a statement. "Imagine a production line of FireFlies, cocked and loaded and ready to fly out to examine any object that gets near the Earth."

The FireFlies' work will pave the way for 70-pound (32 kg) spacecraft called DragonFlies, which will blast off beginning in 2016. DragonFlies will bring asteroid samples back to Earth during missions that last two to four years. Some samples will help the company determine mining targets, while others will probably be sold to researchers and collectors, officials said.

The public will get to fly along with both probes, whose activities will likely be funded in some measure by corporate sponsorship, Deep Space officials said.

"The public will participate in FireFly and DragonFly missions via live feeds from Mission Control, online courses in asteroid mining sponsored by corporate marketers and other innovative ways to open the doors wide," Gump said. "The Google Lunar X Prize, Unilever and Red Bull each are spending tens of millions of dollars on space sponsorships, so the opportunity to sponsor a FireFly expedition into deep space will be enticing."

These activities are all precursors to Deep Space's ultimate goal, which is the harvesting and in-space utilization of asteroid resources.

The company intends to begin extracting metals and other building materials from space rocks within 10 years, officials said. These components will first be used to build communications satellites off-Earth, with the construction of space-based solar power stations coming later. Precious metals such as platinum will also be delivered to Earth for terrestrial use.

Deep Space's construction activities will be aided by a patent-pending 3D printer called the MicroGravity Foundry, officials said.

"The MicroGravity Foundry is the first 3D printer that creates high-density, high-strength metal components even in zero gravity," company co-founder and MicroGravity Foundry inventor Stephen Covey said in a statement. "Other metal 3D printers sinter powdered metal, which requires a gravity field and leaves a porous structure, or they use low-melting point metals with less strength."

Deep Space Industries will also focus on extracting asteroid water, which can be split into its constituent hydrogen and oxygen  the chief components of rocket fuel. The company's mining efforts could thus lead to the establishment of in-space "gas stations" that allow satellites and journeying spacecraft to top up their tanks relatively cheaply and efficiently.

"We will only be visitors in space until we learn how to live off the land there," Tumlinson said. "This is the Deep Space mission  to find, harvest and process the resources of space to help save our civilization and support the expansion of humanity beyond the Earth  and doing so in a step-by-step manner that leverages off our space legacy to create an amazing and hopeful future for humanity."

Deep Space Industries' ambitions are similar to those of Planetary Resources, which also plans to tap asteroid metals and water to help open the solar system up to exploration and exploitation.

Planetary Resources could prove to be a tough competitor. It was founded by private-spaceflight pioneers Peter Diamandis and Eric Anderson, and its deep-pocketed investors include Google execs Larry Page and Eric Schmidt.

This article originally published at Space.com here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Children who survived the shootings at Sandy Hook Elementary School have recorded a heart-melting version of "Somewhere Over the Rainbow" with singer-songwriter Ingrid Michaelson for charity.

The 21 students performed the tune with Michaelson on Good Morning America last week.

SEE ALSO: Newtown Students Record 'Over the Rainbow' With Ingrid Michaelson

The song is now available to download on iTunes and Amazon. It is also available for free on Spotify, which you can listen to below.

All proceeds from the sale of the track will be donated to the United Way of Western Connecticut.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Sure, you'd expect President Obama's limo to be bulletproof and carry a few weapons on hand for defense, but did you know it can also be locked down in seconds like a mobile panic room? And that it has a supply of his blood type on board in case of emergencies?

The General Motors-built limousine, which looks like a Cadillac and is appropriately named "The Beast," is as heavy duty as it gets, with a super-strong structure made of titanium, ceramic, steel and aluminum. Not to mention the doors are eight-inches thick and there's even a back-up oxygen supply in the rear of the vehicle in case of a bio-chemical attack.

SEE ALSO: 15 Inspiring Photos from the Inauguration

Meanwhile, the tech features are on another level. According to TheCarConnection.com, The Beast has night-vision cameras, tear gas cannons and steel wheels that work even without tires. Although the cabin is sealed so no outside sound enters, it features external microphones and internal speakers so outside noise can be heard when needed.

There are also a few other bells and whistles that have been reported but not officially confirmed, such as the ability to shoot smoke grenades to hide the limo during an attack and a video system for the driver to see even in bad conditions.

Finally, you must be wondering how the presidential limo is in front of Buckingham Palace in the picture above. According to reports, it's flown on a cargo plane ahead of Air Force One, so it's ready when the president lands. Whoa.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Barack Obama makes bringing sexy back an issue worthy of national attention. Now we know what Michelle sees  clearly his ability to drop a beat better than ol' Justin Timberlake.

And VP Biden? If his plans for 2016 get bulldozed by Hillary, he can fall back on a career as a hype man. What fool says politicians don't have rhythm?

SEE ALSO: The Many Faces of Barack Obama

Take us to the chorus, Mr. President.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Move over, One Direction  the big boys are coming back. New Kids on The Block announced their new summer tour on The View Tuesday, joining boy-band forces with 98 Degrees and best-selling R&B group, Boyz II Men.

NKOTB is also set to release a new album called 10 in April. Their first single, Remix (I Like The), hits iTunes on Jan. 28.

"The Package Tour," which will include more than two dozen shows throughout the U.S., kicks off on May 31. It'll be the first tour for 98 Degrees in more than 12 years.

"Ladies, were coming for you," NKOTB member Donnie Wahlberg said in a press release. "We cant wait to give fans 'The Package!'
--------------------------------------------------------------
Don't be one of those people with lame passwords. We want to help you to pick super secure, ninja-style passwords that will keep you safe online.

These five free tools generate passwords with punch. Check them out in the gallery above and be sure to bookmark the service that suits you.

SEE ALSO: 5 Easy Ways to Speed Up Your PC

Once you've suped up your online security, check out our guide to the five best password management tools to keep them all in order.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The robotic planes more commonly referred to as drones have gone from a secret, rarely covered military and CIA program to a regular fixture on the national media as well as technology websites.

As one of the leaders behind the U.S. drone program, White House adviser John Brennan, gets ready to face confirmation hearings to head the CIA, drones have never been more in the spotlight. Popular science show NOVA hopes to shed more light on these flying bots with a documentary titled "Rise of the Drones."

The documentary will tackle both the military and civilian side of drone technology, exploring how the military trains drone pilots at the Holloman Air Force base in New Mexico, as well as the role drones will play in domestic law enforcement.

There are controversies in both of these worlds. Are drone strikes in accordance with international law? Are they killing too many civilians? "Weve entered an era where were conducting an array of operations using unmanned systems that in a previous generation we would have called war, and we would have treated like war," Peter W. Singer, an expert in the future of warfare, says in the documentary. "When youre conducting more than 300 air strikes in a country, youre conducting an equivalent of at least an Air War campaign. But we dont call it that now."

On the civilian side, most of the questions are related to privacy and security. Can citizens' privacy be respected when there are thousands of eyes in the sky? "I think anybody that can use a device to peer into your activities even if its the air outside your window or the air above your property, I think there is a right to privacy," Rep. Rand Paul tells NOVA. "The worry is that in two [to] three years we will have 30,000 drones crisscrossing the sky accumulating all this information."

SEE ALSO: Student Tweets Entire History of US Drone Strikes

In addition to Singer and Paul, to try to answer all these questions NOVA interviewed the "father" of the Predator drone, the most widely used killer drone in the U.S. arsenal, several drone pilots and Vijay Kumar, a University of Pennsylvania roboticist, particularly known for his studies in the control and coordination of multi-robot formations.

Check out the teaser trailer above to have an idea of what "Rise of the Drones" is all about. The full documentary will air Wednesday at 9 p.m. ET on PBS
--------------------------------------------------------------
This post originally appeared on the American Express OPEN Forum, where Mashable regularly contributes articles about leveraging social media and technology in small business.

Back in college, some of us might have put a couple room-temperature Cokes in the freezer to chill. Had we remembered those cans were nestled precariously between two ice trays, we could have saved them from exploding into a mess of sugary, apocalyptic sludge.

Enter: The reminder app. Had we set a simple countdown on our phones, we wouldn't have had to spend the next half-hour cleaning out that arctic Coca-Cola with paper towels and dish soap.

SEE ALSO: 7 Fantastic Calendar Apps To Keep You on Schedule

Aside from undergrad antics, reminder apps work wonders for the hectic business person or startup founder. You can set reminders to alert when you enter a specific location radius, or to notify you when your assistant picks up the dry cleaning.

Give these four reminder and task apps a try, then share your tips for practical productivity in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Amazon is bolstering its fledgling lineup of original programming with a series based on the 2009 film Zombieland, according to a report.

Broadcast Now reports that Amazon is developing a series based on the horror comic film, though it's unclear when it will be available via Amazon's Prime streaming service. Such a TV show has reportedly been in the works since late 2011. However, originally the show appeared to be headed to CBS. i09 also reports that a casting call just went out for the show, so it wil likely be some time until it is available for viewing.

Last June, Amazon announced a slate of original programming for Prime, including a handful of comedies and a children's program. The comedies include an animated show about Hell, a "mockumentary" about the end of the world and another series about a magician's helpers turned arch-rivals. The children's show features a sheep named Buck with a penchant for high-speed driving.

Amazon vies with others in the streaming video space, including Netflix and Hulu, that are developing their own original program. Netflx's next big move in this arena is season 4 of Arrested Development, which is expected to hit later this year. Hulu, meanwhile, is planning to release The Awesomes, an animated series featuring Saturday Night Live's Kenan Thompson, Bill Hader, and Taran Killam.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Welcome to this morning's edition of "First To Know," a series in which we keep you in the know on what's happening in the digital world.

Today, we're looking at three particularly interesting stories. Google co-founder Sergey Brin was spotted wearing Google Glasses on a New York City subway. RIM has extended the deadline for its "Built for BlackBerry" contest; and director Randy Moore filmed a guerrilla-style indie film called Escape from Tomorrow in a Disney theme park, but without permission from Disney.

Check out the video above for more on these stories.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Want to dress up your electronics like a young Obama?

During Mondays Presidential inauguration, Sasha Obama was repeatedly spotted taking pictures with what looked to be an iPhone in a green turtle case. The case, which is made by Griffin, can be yours for just $14.99 on the companys website. The company also sells an owl and a hippo version.

The case is only made for the iPod touch  so while it may have appeared the tween was sporting a smartphone, it looks like thats a privilege still only held by her older sister Malia.

If you want the case for iPhone, however, there are a few companies on Amazon selling similar cases for under $5.

Michelle Obama recently talked about technology use by the girls, telling the New York Times that the girls are only allowed to use technology on weekends, which includes Malias cellphone use.

Either the Inauguration was an exception to that rule, or the girls have received a Presidential pardon.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Secret Service is shopping for camouflaged sensors that can decipher gunshot details amid city hubbub, contracting documents suggest.

The agency, responsible for guarding inaugurations and other U.S. special events, would exercise sole control over the surveillance system, rather than let private analysts send assessments, as many cities are starting to do.

"Due to the secure nature of these sites, a high gunshot detection rate (more than 95%) is strongly desired while daily, operational monitoring of the system by external parties is undesirable, stated a Jan. 18 survey form for contractors who have products ready to sell.

As prices drop, and geospatial tracking and sound monitoring sharpen, police are embracing gunfire identification technologies. Cities nationwide, includingChicago, Kansas City, Mo., and Palo Alto, Calif., have leased gun detection services online, through the cloud, from security vendor ShotSpotter.

It is unclear whether the Secret Service's system would be stationed in specific locales or moved for each event.

Agency officials said they want "technologies for fixed site surveillance applications," covering from "10s to 100s of acres per site, located within urban areas." But the questionnaire also inquires, "Is the system portable (i.e., can it be quickly relocated to another site)?"

Special event safety increasingly relies on a variety of high-tech monitors, such as city traffic cameras for presidential debates and facial recognition tools for the Super Bowl. Secret Service officials are asking retailers whether their gunfire sensors can be "integrated to communicate with other detection systems."

A deep data dive on each incident apparently appeals to the agency. Officials want to know whether gunfire reports are able to detail, for instance, the caliber of the weapon, route the bullet took, elevation of the shot and projectile velocity of the ammunition.

One challenge with shot detection is that the location of the shooter  be it hidden inside a car or in a wind tunnel  can mask blasts. Potential vendors are asked to disclose factors that might impair a systems perception. And they must address the technologys ability to parse certain tricky situations such as, multiple shots occurring in a short time interval, from the same or different locations.

The Secret Service is pursuing technologies that are "easily concealed" or could "aesthetically match their surroundings," according to the survey sheet.

Shot detectors have sparked privacy concerns because they can pick up ambient noise, like a loud street argument that accompanied a fatal shooting in New Bedford, Mass., according to The New York Times.

ShotSpotter officials told The Times that concerns about privacy are generally unfounded since the detectors "dont turn on unless they hear a gunshot."

Authorities can obtain critical tips about what to expect upon arriving at a crime scene and potential evidence  such as how fast and in what direction a shooter in a car was traveling, the report added.

This article originally published at Nextgov here
--------------------------------------------------------------
All 100 United States Senators are now using Twitter, while 90% of House of Representatives are on the network, according to Twitter.

Those numbers have increased dramatically in the past two years: When the 112th Congress began in 2011, 44% of the Senate and 35% of the House were on Twitter, said the company in a recent blog post.

Some states have adopted Twitter more than others: 29 states have all of their legislators in the Senate and House on Twitter, while every state has at least 70% on Twitter.

SEE ALSO: Only 3 of the 79 New Congress Members Don't Have Twitter Accounts

Lawmakers use Twitter in different ways: Iowa Republican Senator Chuck Grassley is famous for his typos and occasionally bizzarre tweets, which he writes himself. And Democratic Missouri Senator Claire McCaskill recently posted an explanation for why she doesn't follow her constituents back on Twitter.

To celebrate the news, Twitter put together the above map as well as two Twitter lists which you can use to follow the Senate and House members on Twitter.

Do you follow and interact with your lawmakers on Twitter? Who's your favorite tweeting legislator? Share in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
In the near future when you ask your kids what they did at school, they might answer that they played video games.

It was recently announced that a new game inspired by the SimCity virtual reality game is coming to the classroom. Teachers will be able to upload educational content to the game that requires players to build virtual cities.

Launching this March, SimCityEDU was developed by a partnership between game-maker Electronic Arts, Inc. (EA) and GlassLab, a research and development initiative aiming to transform learning practices through digital games. Educators can utilize SimCityEDU in the classroom to teach students STEM (Science, Technology, Engineering and Mathematics) curriculum with virtual lesson plans and games.

"In the classroom, SimCity will be more than a game  it will be a way for the next generation of leaders to hone their skills through urban planning, environmental management and socio-economic development," notes a statement about the game.

SimCity teaches "problem solving skills through imaginative civic gameplay," Lucy Bradshaw, senior vice president and general manager of EAs Maxis Label, said in a statement.

The game will abide by U.S. Common Core standards, which are standards set to provide a consistent outline to teachers of what students should learn and prepare them for college or a career after their education. Forty-five states have adopted these standards.

But will the video game help students learn?

"From its beginning, SimCity has prompted learning by giving players a platform where choices have real consequences, and every decision sets in motion a cascade of developments that require complex analysis and strategic thinking," David Kleeman, president of the American Center for Children and Media, tells Mashable. "A lot of great teachers have used well-developed simulations for deep engagement - perhaps my favorite is John Hunter's 'World Peace Game.' So, much depends on how teachers are supported in using the game, but from what I've read so far, Electronic Arts wisely intends to let teachers share their insights and innovations around SimCityEDU."

This wouldn't be the first time a popular video game was incorporated into students' curriculum. It was recently announced that there would be a classroom version of DanceDance Revolution for physical education classes. And at one college, a video game became a required material for first year students. There's been numerous studies that show responsible gaming can actually be good for kids and encourage learning.

What do you think about SimCityEDU in the classroom? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
If you're an avid sports fan, there's a good chance you're pretty tech savvy. In fact, according to new Nielsen data, you're 52% more likely to own a tablet.

Although the findings  which were released on Tuesday in Nielsen's 2012 Year in Sports report  aren't entirely surprising, it further confirms what we already knew: sports fans are highly connected to tech and digital world.

In fact, about 60% of tablet and smartphone owners who use mobile devices for sports content do so at least once a day.

Sports fans in general are also more likely to have other tech-related tools and gadgets than their non-sporty counterparts, from DVR for taping games (42%) and gaming consoles (33%) to smartphones (21%) and HDTV (20%).

Yes, sports fans love to go on Twitter to discuss news and games in real time, but perhaps one of the most fascinating discoveries revealed in the data is that more than 40% of all TV-related tweets are about sports, even though it only makes up 1.3% of TV programming.

"Live sports are all about real-time action, and mobile devices allow sports fans to keep up and discuss that action, while also providing instant access to the sports content they want  whether that's score updates, fantasy stats or tweets to their favorite athlete," Stephen Master, senior VP of sports for Nielsen, told Mashable. "Smartphones and tablets haven't quite changed the live sports viewing experience yet  TV is still the top platform  but our research shows that more and more people are frequently using these devices while watching TV, indicating that these devices are enhancing that viewing experience."

Sports-related apps are also highly visited by fans. The top sports apps based on average monthly time spent by each user are as follows: ESPN Streak for the Cash (No. 1), Yahoo! Fantasy Football (No. 2), ESPN Fantasy Football 2012 (No. 3), Yahoo! Sportacular (No. 4) and MLB.com At Bat (No. 5).

SEE ALSO: 13 Biggest Sports Social Media Moments of 2012

Nielsen also highlighted the biggest advertisers in sports, with AT&T topping the list with $342.8 million in spending last year. Rounding out the top five in 2012 are Bud Light ($213.3M), Verizon Wireless ($195.5M), Geico ($166.1M) and DIRECTV ($157.8M).
--------------------------------------------------------------
If you liked the Microsoft Surface RT tablet but wished you could run classic Windows apps on it, you won't have to wait much longer. The Surface Pro  the more powerful version of the tablet that runs full Windows 8 Pro  will be on store shelves Feb. 9.

The initial availability of the Surface Pro, explained in a blog post, will be limited to the U.S. and Canada. As Microsoft had previously announced, it'll come in two capacities: 64GB ($899) and 128GB ($999). The famous magnetic Touch Cover keyboard is a $120 option for the Pro tablet, although a specialized stylus is included.

The Surface Pro is also getting a couple of special accessories. Since the Pro is more of a productivity device than the RT version, users will likely want to pair it with a separate keyboard and mouse, and Microsoft will offer a special version of its Wedge Touch Mouse, cosmetically designed specifically to match the Surface, for $69.95. There will also be three "limited edition" Touch Cover designs for $129.99 each.

SEE ALSO: Microsoft Reveals Surface With Windows 8 Pro Price and Specs

Microsoft will stop forcing the Touch Cover on some Surface RT buyers, too. As of Feb. 9, the 64GB version of the Surface RT will be available without one for $599. Previously Microsoft only offered that model with the cover.

Finally, Microsoft says it will be expanding the number of markets the Surface RT is available to more than double. Currently the tablet is available only in the U.S., Canada, the U.K., Australia, China, France, Germany, and Hong Kong.

We got a little hands-on time with the Surface Pro while we were at CES. While the tablet is noticeably heavier than the Surface RT (by half a pound), it struck us as a logical choice for a specific use case: The tablet resides in a workstation most of the time but is easily detached for taking home or into meetings. Battery life, which is rated at half of the Surface RT's approximately 8 hours, could be a concern, though.

Will you be lining up for a Surface Pro? Let us know why or why not in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The technology industry has been ranked most-trusted for the seventh consecutive year, ahead of the automotive, and food and beverage industries, according to the 2013 Edelman Trust Barometer.

"As an industry, I think tech companies pre-anticipate and solve problems for consumers," Ben Boyd, Edelman's corporate global practice chairman, told Mashable. "I also think in today's world where technology is connecting people, it's the companies that get credit for making it happen. It really creates a halo effect for the industry itself."

The findings of the Trust Barometer, an annual survey of 31,000 people in 26 countries evaluating trust in leaders, institutions and industries, were released Monday at the World Economic Forum in Davos, Switzerland. Edelman's primary takeaway from the study of people in 26 countries was an overwhelming distrust in leadership compared to institutions.

The 20-minute online survey was conducted between Oct. 16 and Nov. 29, 2012 by research firm Edelman Berland. The survey was completed by 26,000 general population responders and an oversample of 5,800 informed publics (college educated, high earners who regularly watch the news).

Among respondents, 77% say they trust technology companies, which is down from 79% in 2012. Boyd warns that the tech industry will face more scrutiny should larger data breeches occur.

"It's a double edged sword: As technology enables more data capture and data dissemination, data concerns are going to rise," Boyd says. "For the tech industry, that's how do we continue to deliver value while not compromising things customers' value."

The least trusted industries are media, banks and financial services, which have been embroiled in major recent controversies. The second-ranked automotive industry, Boyd notes, has regained trust after its late-2000s crisis.

Though media institutions, are more trusted in 2013 than they were last year, they still rank less-trusted below NGOs and businesses. This year, 57% of people surveyed trust media, ahead of government institutions (48% trusted), but behind NGOs (63% trusted) and businesses (58% trusted).

Boyd says that distrust in the media industry comes from scandals in recent memory.

"When you think about the BBC scandal, or you think about News Corp., I think the distrust creeps from one enterprise across an industry," he says.

There is a considerable gap between emerging and developed markets' trust in the media industry. Among respondents in emerging markets, 71% trust information found through online search engines, 65% trust traditional media outlets and 58% trust social media. In contrast, just 47% of respondents in developed markets trust online search engines and a mere 26% trust social media.

"In the west we're very computer dependent and I think those emerging markets are so much more mobile savvy as far as the way they consume media," Boyd says. "In those emerging markets you're starting to see info share more quickly and they know it's less controlled by state government than traditional media is."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Laurene Powell Jobs, widow of the late Apple founder Steve Jobs, has long been advocating for immigration reform and the passage of the DREAM Act, which would give undocumented young people a path to American citizenship. Now the wealthiest woman in Silicon Valley has partnered with award-winning documentary filmmaker Davis Guggenheim to launch The Dream Is Now, a video-based web project to bring attention to the stories of undocumented youth.

The Dream Is Now invites undocumented young people to record and post video messages about the ways their situation might change if the DREAM Act were passed. Others who might support the bill, including educators and lawmakers, are also welcome to post video messages of support on the site.

Guggenheim will eventually collect footage from the site and combine it into a documentary on the DREAM Act.

"There needed to be a demystification  to put a face to these people, to hear the individual stories," Powell Jobs told Yahoo News.

The most prominently featured video at launch time includes footage of undocumented youths announcing their immigration status to the world. Their last names have been withheld likely to protect their privacy.

"Today, I am going to take a really big step in my life and I'm going to step out of the shadows and into the public sphere to be part of a larger movement, to be part of a greater cause," says Osmar, an undocumented young man from San Diego, Calif.

"I have a secret that I'm very hesitant to share," says Cendy, from Aurora, Colo.

More personal videos can be viewed below the home page's main player. The site also includes a petition which supporters of the DREAM Act can sign. Supporters are also asked to tweet or post to Instagram about the campaign using the hashtag #TheDreamIsNow.

Visit The Dream Is Now.

SEE ALSO: New Bill Welcomes High-Tech Entrepreneurs to the U.S.

The DREAM Act, first introduced in 2001, would legalize undocumented residents who arrived in the U.S. as minors and have lived in the country for at least five years. Applicants who keep a clean criminal record and attend college or serve in the military would be granted a path to American citizenship.

The DREAM Act has bipartisan support but has never passed, coming closest to doing so in December of 2010. The timing for The Dream Is Now is no accident: President Barack Obama has said that immigration reform will be among his top priorities during his second term, which began Sunday.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The camera sure does love President Obama.

During his time in office thus far, Obama's managed to handle the spotlight pretty well. He's had a few shots of his bad side, but managed to mask any bad hair days, keep those pearly whites camera-ready and knows what light he looks best in.

And smizing? Please! The Leader of the Free World had that down back in the '08 primaries.

SEE ALSO: 'So Help Me Internet': Funniest Inauguration GIFs and Pics

And although we're not sure if Obama's got all his beauty shots framed for later admiration, patriotic video editor Jeremy Tubbs has created a dizzying compilation of all the prez's mug shots for easy reference.

Anyone else pretty sure this video montage will be playing on repeat during the big B's next birthday?

Video via Vimeo, Jeremy Tubbs. Photo via Flickr, The White House.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Sometimes it's hard to tell the difference between Joe Biden, the vice president of the United States, and "Diamond" Joe Biden, his doppelganger on The Onion.

One instance was Monday, when the real VP was running zigzags down the inaugural-parade route, gesturing toward the crowd as though he was the star of the show. They are both larger-than-life characters, and there are times when headlines about one could be written about the other. For instance:

Real Joe Biden: Hangs out with bikers at a campaign stop and nuzzles one on the head.

Onion "Diamond" Joe Biden: Asks White House visitor if he wants to "check out the roof."

Real Joe Biden: Flirts with senators' mothers during swearing-in. Swears in a baby.

"He's one part 1980s high school dirtbag, one part your disgusting uncle, and there's a part of him that has a natural charm, says Chad Nackers, an Onion writer who has been on the Biden beat for five years and a lead writer on a new Biden "autobiography" released last week.

In another breath, he described Biden as being akin to those rebel teenagers who stand outside high schools smoking cigarettes. You know, "those kids out there with their Pantera shirts talking about metal concerts."

In reality, that description doesn't make any sense at all. The vice president is a straight edge: He never drinks, he's a devout Catholic and he is very much a family man. He likes folk music, for heaven's sake. But on The Onion, Biden has become a swashbuckling, ponytail-wearing dirty uncle, someone who slacks off from work, "ignoring his responsibilities, cruising for chicks."

It's not just The Onion; the vice president has proven to be a political character with an uncanny Internet appeal. For instance, when he used a funny word at the VP debate, malarkey, we got this. White House petitioners have even called for a Biden reality show.

But you wonder at times if the vice president is also aware of his pull on the web. For instance, is he aware that when he goes to Costco, the pictures of him shopping around the store will go viral? Especially seeing how that November trip to the wholesaler was used as a platform to discuss middle-class taxes (not to mention a possible kickback to Costco cofounder Jim Sinegal, a longtime Democratic supporter who spoke at last year's Democratic National Convention).

The Onion version of Joe Biden is a character who both wildly diverges from, yet reflects, the real living vice president. Their writers take the Biden who hangs out with bikers, but they make him a drunk. They take the Biden who swoons women and have him make out with Janna Ryan after the VP debate.

"I'm sure Joe Biden would deny most of our coverage," Nackers says. But he seems to like it. Last January, Biden told Yahoo News that he thought the spoofs were "hilarious." Then, on Friday, while the fake Joe was taking questions on Reddit, the real VP sent this tweet insulting the former's taste in cars:

The Onion's new e-book, The President of Vice, follows the tale of the dirty-uncle Biden, the one who, in that glorious summer of 1987, had a "mystical experience" in the New Mexico desert.

"I think it's brought on by sniffing Oxycontin or something," Nackers says. "But the whole time he's talking about this perfect time that he could light up a joint in front of a cop and that cop can either ask for a hit off of it or throw him in the clink for the night, and then he'd make some awesome friends while he was in jail. No matter what, it was all kind of smooth sailing for him."

With section titles such as "Places I've Gotten Down and Dirty in D.C.," there aren't many passages in the book that are safe for work. Here's "Diamond" Joe talking about his congressional legacy:

We asked Nackers how The Onion conceives of such adventures. It's not exactly scientific. Here's his description of the pitch meeting when the shirtless Trans Am idea came up.

"I think originally there was a headline that was pitched that was a little more intense, like he was hammered or something, and crashed his car," he says. "And we were thinking theres more of a story to be told if he's hanging out. And a lot of times that's how an idea is pitched, and then it transforms into something else."

That story transformed further when the publication set out to find a body double for the veep, "on Craigslist or something," and lucked out to find a white Trans Am owner who also "was quite like Joe Biden in a way."

Perhaps the publications affinity for Biden echoes its own editorial roots. The classic Onion story is a spoof on the "local man" story that you might see in the pages of a small-circulation paper. Such as "Area Man Winded After Particularly Lengthy Wendy's Order."

Biden's that guy to them, but in Washington.

"He's like the real guy in Washington," Nackers says. "A lot of politicians hide that, they're kind of glossy and they're all about reaching out to their constituents or whoever, or climbing up that D.C. ladder, and Joe is just a real guy."

This article originally published at National Journal here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Fans of Joss Whedon's cult TV sci-fi hit Firefly will be glad to know the show lives on  as the name for a new kind of one-way exploratory vehicle launching in 2015.

That's if the newest space startup, Deep Space Industries, gets the commercial sponsorship it is seeking. A scrappy collection of NASA veterans, entrepreneurs, aerospace and mining consultants, with as-yet unknown sources of funding, DSI seems to embody much of the spirit of Firefly.

Like the motley crew of the good ship Serenity, this asteroid mining company is talking a bigger game than it currently has. It's running an angle on the best intersteller plunder available, while trying not be outfoxed by its wealthier competitors. Shiny.

The company launched Tuesday as a direct competitor to Planetary Resources, which was up until now the only company on the planet seeking to mine those $20 trillion-dollar rocks flying around far above our heads.

Planetary Resources has an impressive roster of billionaires (such as Larry Page and Eric Schmidt) backing it, and some lofty plans. But DSI may have gone it one better in the budget and innovation departments.

It plans to send inexpensive CubeSats on one-way missions of up to six months. They will prospect for the richest asteroids up close, rather than send up space telescopes to scan them from afar, which is Planetary Resources' goal.

The new startup also says it has a patent on a space foundry, a 3-D printer that can use asteroid metals and minerals as its raw materials. "The MicroGravity Foundry is the first 3D printer that creates high-density, high-strength metal components even in zero gravity," DSI co-founder Stephen Covey said in a statement.

If you need a primer on near-Earth asteroids, or how easy much easier it is to grab one of these near-Earth rocks than to go to the Moon, read this story. Or check out DSI's fantastically overproduced CGI movie trailer of a promotional video:

The launch came just two days after Planetary Resources issued a rather more down-to-Earth vid, in which it boasted that it was under contract to NASA to produce its asteroid-finding space telescope, the Arkyd-100:

Competing companies. Competing business models. Trillion-dollar resource goals. And just like that, ladies and gentlemen, the second space race is on.

The first space race, between the USSR and the USA, was primarily political. It was Cold War rivals flexing their exploratory muscles. The only reward was worldwide kudos and bragging rights to the Moon. This one will be primarily economic, and the potential rewards are incalculable.

Neither DSI nor Planetary Resources are the first companies to be founded around the goal of asteroid mining. But they are the first companies to compete for it. That sound you heard is Adam Smith's invisible hand of the market reaching into Near Earth orbit.

Just as in the first space race, there's no guarantee either side will succeed. Space itself may present insurmountable challenges, not least of which (now as in the 1960s) is funding. But DSI's CubeSat-based proposal seems to do everything it can to get over the funding hurdle.

The whole idea of CubeSats is that they can hitch a ride on any space-bound rocket for a nominal fee; it's the province of university engineering departments the world over. Six nations successfully launched the new class of micro-satellites for the first time in 2003.

There have been dozens of similar launches since then, most recently in October. The first Kickstarter-funded Cubesat, ArduSat, is set to be launched this July. (The project asked for $35,000 in funding, and got more than $100,000.)

Planetary Resources has tentative plans to launch its first Arkyd in 2014. The pictures that produces should spur more interest and investment. If DSI launches the next year as planned, marking the first time a private company has sent a mission to an asteroid, that should goose interest still further  and both companies will find it easier to go on to their respective next stages, gathering samples from promising-looking rocks.

This is the most important way in which the second space race differs: if one of these companies wins in any way, they both do  as do more potential competitors. A rising tide lifts all asteroid miners.

"There are 2 to 3 million near-Earth asteroids," DSI CEO David Gump pointed out. "There's room for everyone to prosper." He estimated that each ton of asteroid minerals would be worth $1 million in orbit.

At that rate, it wouldn't take much for DSI to become wealthier than the wildest imaginings of the Serenity crew.

Intrigued? Let us know in the comments, and watch the whole Deep Space Industries press conference here:
--------------------------------------------------------------
Posing for a photograph means risking your reputation with every "say cheese." Taking a bad photo tells your Facebook friends that maybe you don't always look as perfect as your profile pic.

Photographer Rut Mackel can provide a bit of solace for all you worried photo subjects with his deliciously disfigured photo series, "The Ugly Truth." Mackel has his subjects squish their faces against panes of glass to create contorted portraits that look like the cousins of the Hunchback of Notre Dame.

SEE ALSO: Sip on Whimsical Illustrations of Important People Drinking Coffee

On his website, Mackel explains his motivation behind the series:

The project explores the ugliness and the beauty that exists within each of us. By drastically transforming faces from aesthetically attractive to unpleasant appearance. I wanted to change our perception of aesthetic appearance.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A school shooting at the North Harris campus of Lone Star College near Houston, Texas was reported Tuesday afternoon. One student, currently identified only as "Amanda," was stuck inside the building  but she managed to send messages to friends, family and reporters via Twitter during the ordeal.

KPRC-TV in Houston has reported multiple people were shot and one person was detained. A search is ongoing for a possible second suspect.

Below is a curated list of Amanda's tweets:
--------------------------------------------------------------
Now embedded tweets look more like tweets you see on Twitter.com. Embedded tweets include photos, videos, and article summaries below the text of the tweet, and the embedded version will also include an accurate retweet and favorite count, so readers can instantly see how popular a particular post might be.

Content shown in embedded tweets is limited to that you see on Twitter cards on the website, so article summaries are limited to certain outlets, and Instagram photos will show as a link, while Twitter photos show as the full photo.

Embedding tweets is also a little easier now. Now, to embed a tweet, you simply click on the "More" button below it and select "Embed Tweet" to get the short code for your website. Previously the process required you to select Expand, then Details, before you were able to get to the embed option.

Embedded tweets have also now been optimized, allowing for faster loading.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Evernote just took another step towards being a more useful tool for businesses.

UberConference, one of the better apps out there for conference calls, announced Tuesday that it has integrated Evernote and Box into its service to allow for more ways to share documents during calls.

Evernote rolled out a premium version of its note sharing app last month called Evernote Business that is specifically geared towards helping teams share meeting notes, research and more through Business Notebooks. UberConference is one of the first to integrate with Evernote Business and this partnership should make it easier for employees to share and edit Evernote documents in groups and search for notes that may be relevant to the call.

"By adding seamless note sharing, UberConference has made it dead simple to quickly exchange ideas and information during a collaborative call, said Seth Hitchings, Evernote's VP of Platform Strategy, in a statement. "Combined with the integrated Evernote Related Notes feature, UberConference is a great solution for Evernote Business users looking for the smartest ways to work."

UberConference's app is available for free on Android and iPhone.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Emoji was the biggest thing to happen to texting since... texting. The mobile communicators of the modern age have found all sorts of creative uses for the iPhone's Unicode pictographs, but there are a couple more inventive applications for Emoji that you might not know about.

We've got the scoop on three unexpected uses for Emoji that'll make your iPhone a more fun  and organized  place to be.

1. Contacts  Add appropriate Emoji based on your favorite people's interests. It adds personality, and it's a good memory-triggering device, too. Met a fellow skier at a party? Stick her number in your phone with little skis. Emoji is also a good way to find groups of friends. Add a little cocktail emoticon by all of your girlfriends. When you want to go out on Friday night, search for the cocktail in "All Contacts," and there they are.

2. App Folders  Instead of having random apps strewn about your phone, you can organize them into "folders," which are essentially collections of similar applications. But some category names, like Photography, are long and clutter the home screen. Using a camera emoticon instead keeps home-screen chaos down to a minimum.

3. Alarms  Trouble waking up, sleepyhead? Maybe a sunshine Emoji will inspire you. Try it for doctor or dentist appointments and as weather reminders when the forecast predicts rain or snow.

BONUS: 5 Emoji Meanings That Might Surprise You

This article originally published at GeekSugar here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Whole Kids Foundation, PACT and Indiegogo have joined forces to create an inspiring crowdfunding initiative: building 100 urban gardens across the United States. This is the first time a non-profit, a brand and a global crowdfunding platform have partnered to help drive change in local communities around the country.

Whole Foods' non-profit arm will facilitate each grant and provide online resources, while PACT, an organic apparel company supporting global causes, will provide physical perks in exchange for donations. Indiegogo will provide the platform through which donations can be made until Feb. 28.

SEE ALSO: A Look Back at Indiegogo's Successful Year in Crowdfunding

The main goal of the partnership is to increase accessibility and consumption of fresh produce in local communities through sustainable gardening. The initiative also aims to inspire community members to become activists and raise money through crowdfunding.

The idea isn't just to build gardens, but also to equip community members with a working knowledge of gardening in order to sustain them.

"[This is] awesome, because it's not just a non-profit spending its own dollars to fund gardens as an attempt to educate the country of the importance of healthy eating," Danae Ringelmann, co-founder of Indiegogo, told Mashable. "It's a non-profit foundation  Whole Kids  partnering with PACT and Indiegogo to unleash action and inspire supporters not just to fund gardens, but actually raise money for their own local gardens."

Whole Kids Foundation and PACT reached out to their networks and organized 78 people across the country wanting to take action and take the lead. Over the course of the Urban Gardens Across America initiative, these activists  dubbed "PACTivists"  will run campaigns side-by-side, raising $2,500 for each garden. All of the local garden campaigns are housed on a partnership page on Indiegogo.

"So, if you're someone who is living in New York City, but you're from Wichita, you can go on and fund the garden in Wichita and the garden in New York," Ringelmann said. "Or, if you have a sister who has a husband and kids living in San Francisco, you can go on and fund the garden for them as well."

As the non-profit arm of a major brand, Whole Kids Foundation probably could have funded the gardens itself, but Ringelmann explained that partnering with PACT and Indiegogo, and educating community members, is far more sustainable, and also helps large brands engage customers on a local level.

"You know the saying: 'Give a man a fish and he'll eat for a day; teach a man to fish and he eats for life.' We're going a step further and we're empowering people to teach their own communities how to 'fish' so their whole communities will be self-sustaining and will be able to eat for life," she said.

Whole Kids Foundation launched a similar initiative, its school garden grant program, in 2011, receiving 3,000 applications for $2,000 grants. The non-profit was able to fund 1,000 of those applications.

"The need for support and opportunity to connect kids to the roots of food became clear to us," Nona Evans, president and executive director of Whole Kids Foundation, told Mashable. "And we have, in partnership with FoodCorps, continued to fund school gardens in the U.S., Canada and the U.K."

While Whole Kids Foundation works with experts in many fields, the Urban Gardens Across America campaign is the non-profit's first experience with crowdfunding.

"When we discovered that together our work and passion could support dozens of gardens for deserving schools and community organizations, we knew we had an invaluable partnership. Clearly both PACT and Indiegogo are leaders in their fields," Evans said.

The gardens will be built after the campaigns are complete, and the unique partnership between the three entities will help move each campaign toward its goal through motivation, collaboration and empowerment.

"I just think it's really exciting that we're coming together," Ringelmann said. "We're changing cause marketing, we're changing non-profit fundraising and we're showing how a foundation, a brand and a crowdfunding platform can work together to make change and empower the country to make its own change."
--------------------------------------------------------------
We just got our first glimpse at iPhone 5 sales for the fourth quarter.

Verizon revealed during its earnings call Tuesday that it activated 6.2 million iPhones in the fourth quarter, almost half of which were LTE-enabled iPhone 5 devices. That means Verizon sold about 3 million iPhone 5s in the December quarter, up from 651,000 in the previous quarter (when the device had only been on sale for nine days).

In total, the carrier activated 9.8 million smartphones in the fourth quarter, a new record for quarterly smartphone activations. In a pre-earnings estimate earlier this month, Verizon credited the higher number of activations to a "higher mix of Apple smartphones."

Despite the record number of activations, Verizon reported a whopping $1.93 billion loss for the fourth quarter due to charges incurred from pensions and Hurricane Sandy.

AT&T and Sprint haven't reported their iPhone sales figures yet, though AT&T did reveal that it too had a record quarter for smartphone sales  with 10 million smartphone activations  which many assume is due to demand for the new iPhone. Apple's earnings report for the December quarter will be released on Wednesday.

Apple's stock was up by about half a percent pre-market following the positive iPhone sales figures.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Winter is the worst. The nippy temperatures, leg-breaking ice patches and booger icicles  no matter how many layers of fleece you pile on, you can't escape Jack Frost's favorite season.

As humans grumble and shiver through January and February, our best furry friends delight in winter's chilly offerings. Be it snow or ice, dogs find a way to have fun and make winter look easy.

BONUS: Woof! These 15 Slush Puppies Are Crazy About Snow
--------------------------------------------------------------
Beyonce's spectacular performance of "The Star-Spangled Banner" at President Barack Obama's inauguration Monday was too good to be true.

The songstress did indeed lip-sync the words to the national anthem, Kristin DuBois, a representative for the United States Marine Band, told the New York Post.

"All music is pre-recorded for the ceremony because there are so many eventualities and conditions that day," DuBois said. "We performed, live, the band. But we received last-minute word that Beyonce was going to use the pre-recorded vocal track. Those were the instructions we were given. We don't know what the (sic) reason why."

Beyonce and the National Anthem have become Twitter trending topics Tuesday with more than 90,000 people combined freaking the heck out for no apparent reason (or just having some fun at the expense of the pop idol).

"Beyonce lip-synching the Star Spangled Banner makes me question fundamental truths of human existence," tweeted Chris Cillizza of the Washington Post.

So the question is, how does Beyonce's performance match up against other famous lip syncing fails? You be the judge.

This article originally published at The Daily Dot here
--------------------------------------------------------------
YouTube probably isn't your number-one option when you're looking for an entertaining series. With the amount of professionally produced content available on Netflix and Hulu+, it doesn't make sense to pour through YouTube's seemingly endless archives in search of something resembling a TV show.

And anyway, even if there are great indie shows out there somewhere, YouTube doesn't offer a really intuitive way to find them. Well, save the hugs for later  we did it for you.

SEE ALSO: 10 Epic Office Pranks Caught on YouTube

After much digging (aka, sitting on the couch, watching shows), we've produced a list of nine YouTube shows very worth checking out. Most have short, highly entertaining episodes that keep your attention. Just don't blame us when you get sucked into a marathon.

Best of all, most of these shows are independently produced, giving them a sort of DIY charm you won't find on TV.

Scroll through the gallery above for a hand-selected intro episode to each of the shows. If any piques your interest, follow the link to the show's episode page. If we left out one of your favorites, let us know in the comment section.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The versatility of 3D printing is pretty incredible. So far, we've seen robots, self-vaccination kits and personalized action figures created solely through 3D printers.

But a full-sized house? That's impossible. Right?

Janjaap Ruijssenaars, a Dutch architect with Universal Architecture, doesn't think so. He's planning on constructing a two-story, futuristic Landscape House using a custom-designed 3D printer.

The house, pictured below, will resemble an ever-looping Mobius strip, allowing landscape to "flow through and under the house," he says.

The Los Angeles Times reports that Ruijssenaars will use what's called a D-Shape printer. The machine combines thin layers of sand with a bonding agent to create a material similar to marble. The house, then, will be printed in chunks  about 20 feet by 30 feet  and be constructed from the ground up.

SEE ALSO: Print Your Own 3D-Printed Robot

And the project won't come cheap. The BBC reports the house will cost between $5 million and $6 million to build. Ruijssenaars plans to have it finished by 2014.

Watch the video, above, to learn more. What do you think? Should more houses be constructed using 3D printers?
--------------------------------------------------------------
Weve seen a few instances over the years of high technology colliding with high fashion, but maybe never in a way as direct and striking as this.

3D printing has come to the world of fashion, and the latest example of this collaboration is the Voltage collection, which is currently on display at Paris Fashion Week.

Three-dimensional printing refers to a very new way of creating goods  a model is designed using a CAD program, which is then sent to a 3D printer. There are tons of different 3D printers out there, all of which can use certain materials to build the desired product, layer by layer. Usually, the material in question is something hard, like plastics or metals, but lately the range of materials has been expanded to include softer materials like rubber and polyurethane. Its that latter development that has made 3D-printed fashion a possibility.

The Voltage collection is an 11-piece set from designer Iris van Herpen, 3D printer manufacturer Stratasys and Materialise, which brands themselves as a software company dedicated toward working with additive manufacturing. Additive manufacturing refers to the fact that 3D-printed objects are made from the ground up, layer by layer, as opposed to traditional fashion being cut from a larger piece of cloth, or a sculpture being created by chipping away pieces of marble or metal (subtractive processes).

The collection features a wide array of apparel, including a combination skirt and cape and a form-fitting dress. This was a collaborative design with Julia Koerner, who is an architect and a UCLA professor. Both of those articles feature both hard and soft materials, and it sounds like thats going to open up some new avenues in fashion.

"The ability to vary softness and elasticity inspired us to design a 'second skin' for the body acting as armor-in-motion," says Co-designer, Neri Oxman. "In this way we were able to design not only the garments form but also its motion."

Oxman was largely responsible for the Imaginary Beings collection, a host of 3D-printed articles based on mythology that debuted last year. This year's Voltage collection aims to be a little more practical, producing articles that could actually be worn in daily life.

This article originally published at Chip Chick here
--------------------------------------------------------------
The removal of 500px from Apple's App Store raises questions over review equity, fairness and API functionality.

When Evgeny Tchebotarev started the day, he wasn't expecting to end up spending so much time fielding calls from the media. Tchebotarev is the COO and co-founder of 500px, a popular photo site and community for professional and amateur photographers.

Yet that's exactly what happened after Apple removed the 500px app from the App Store. After more than 16 months in the App Store and over 1 million downloads, a routine app update had unintended consequences.

On Monday night, Tchebotarev tells Mashable that he received a call from Apple. There was a problem with 500px. Like many other apps with photo communities, including Tumblr and Flickr, some of the photographers who use 500px use it to take photographs that contain nudity  not pornographic images, but nudity nonetheless.

According to Tchebotarev, Apple reps told him that it was too easy for users to find nude photos using the app. As a result, the app was in violation of Apple's content policy and would be removed from the App Store. Tchebotarev offered to make the necessary changes to the app to comply with Apple's rules, but it was too late. As of Tuesday morning, 500px was gone from the App Store.

A few hours later, TechCrunch reported on the story. Other outlets followed, including CNET, MacRumors and The Verge. Soon, the story was viral.

The general reaction from both 500px employees and app users was disbelief. For one thing, 500px actually makes it difficult for new users to browse or search for nude photos. A user who signs up using the app can't see those types of photos; instead, he or she must log in through their desktop, and turn off a safe-search setting.

For another, 500px is hardly the only app that could potentially expose users to nude images. Web browsers  including Apple's Safari  can display nude photos of all types. Plus, the aforementioned Tumblr and Flickr apps are much easier to use to track down nudes. To add insult to injury, while 500px is gone, a dozen apps that use 500px's API and replicate the functionality of the official app are still available.

Then, Apple released its own statement on the matter. It said:

This statement was confusing to Tchebotarev and other 500px execs because it was the first any of them had heard about complaints regarding "possible child pornography." Apple never mentioned that to the company before pulling the app, Tchebotarev said.

He added that 500px has made the necessary changes to its app, and re-submitted to the App Store. With any luck, the app will be back in the store very soon.

Normally, this is where the news story would end. But what the 500px incident showcases, however, is that although more than four years have passed since the App Store opened, Apple's app-review process is still occasionally hampered by incongruities and unclear policies.

My initial guess was that 500px was removed for not having the correct content rating. Apple assigns content ratings to apps to give users an idea of who the app is suitable for.

A rating of 4+ means that there is no objectionable content in the app; a 9+ means there might be cartoon violence; a 12+ means there may be infrequent or mild sexual content/nudity and mild violence; and a 17+ means the app may contain heavy violence and mature themes.

These content ratings can be arbitrary at best. Tumblr has a rating of 4+ despite the fact that it's very easy to find hardcore pornographic images using the tag search function within the app. Third-party web browsers such as Chrome and iCab have 17+ ratings because they can be used to access any site on the Internet (assuming it doesn't use Flash).

Before Monday's incident, 500px had a content rating of 4+. Tchebotarev told me that the copy of the app in the submission queue has a rating of 12+.

Based on feedback he's heard from other developers, Tchebotarev's theory is that Apple's review team (a team that is notoriously overworked) doesn't always check to ensure that apps have the proper content rating. Instead, it takes a series of complaints or a particularly conscientious review-team member to force an app to change its rating.

This makes sense to me. Still, I'm utterly unsure how Tumblr, of all apps, has managed to avoid even a 12+ rating.

Another issue raised with the 500px case is the role of an API within the app-review process.

Apple initially said it was going to pull Pulpfingers' ISO500 app from the App Store. 500px acquired Pulpfingers (and ISO500, by extension) last month.

As of this writing, ISO500 is still in the App Store, and doesn't appear to have been pulled.

It wasn't clear why ISO500 was going to be removed, but some pundits worried that it was because the app uses 500px's API. The API allows read-access to the site and search, including, presumably, access to nude photos.

This opens up an interesting question when it comes to third-party apps that use 500px's API, such as Flipboard. Flipboard can do virtually everything the official 500px and the ISO500 apps can do (at least, as far as displaying content), so would it be at risk?

Right now, that seems unlikely, but it does raise some interesting questions that few of us have considered over the years: Is an app that plugs into another app's API going to be rated based on the functionality of that API?

At the time of this writing, 500px is still missing from the App Store. While I fully expect the app to appear within the next day or two, I can't help but feel empathy for the startup caught in the middle of this.

What do you think of the latest App Store hijinx? Let us know in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
President Obama and First Lady Michelle delighted White House visitors recently with a surprise meet-and-greet. The White House live streamed the ho-hum-turned-awesome tour and captured the sightseers' wonderful reactions.

Turns out an unexpected appearance by the commander-in-chief can send regular folks to tears or goofy giggle fits.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Allowing your kids screen time is not necessarily a sedentary activity depending on what they're doing. A new study shows that playing video games is probably better for your young ones than letting them sit in front of the television.

Researchers in the Games Research and Interaction Design Lab at Queensland University of Technology examined the effects of games and television shows for children ages 2-5. They separated the media into two categories: passive or active. Active experiences can refer to content that stimulates them either physically or mentally. It turns out video games can stimulate kids both mentally and physically, and therefore are probably a better option, at least according to this study, than television.

Some games require light to moderate physical activity, while others require children to interact with the game.

The researchers determined active games can encourage young children to be physically active, and can also exercise their cognitive skills. Such games "can improve academic performance, social skills and self esteem," says Dr Penny Sweetser, who was involved with the study, reported The Border Mail.

Still, this isn't a free pass to let Angry Birds babysit your child. Dr. Sweetser says parents need to engage with their children to really enhance their cognitive skills. But next time you need to let the screen distract your child long enough to make some food or brush your teeth, letting them play a video game might be a better option than plopping them in front of the television.

Keep in mind, though, there have also been reports that parents blame video games in particular for exposing their children to violence. And just this month, President Obama suggested more research be conducted to see the impact of violent video games and other media on children.

Parents: what media do you prefer your child to take-in  video games or television? What programming and/or games do you think are acceptable for your kids to watch or play? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Time to triple check those privacy settings, Facebook users. As Graph Search slowly rolls out to the billion-strong user base, we're learning more about the bizarre, and somewhat disturbing, liking habits of users.

Enter the "Actual Facebook Graph Searches" Tumblr page, a collection of surprising results found by using the social network's fancy new feature. The man behind the Tumblr page, Tom Scott, told Mashable that all the results are legit  though some Graph Search skeptics have raised an eyebrow towards the Tumblr. In the page's FAQ section, he also claims to have found even more disturbing results that he didn't share.

SEE ALSO: How Facebook Graph Search Can Descend Into Creepiness

As Scott so perfectly puts it: "If itd be awkward if it was put on a screen in Times Square, dont put it on Facebook."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Grammy-award winning singer Adele will perform "Skyfall," the latest James Bond theme song, live for the first time during the 85th Academy Awards on Feb. 24.

The performance will be her first televised one in the U.S. since the Grammys in 2012.

"It's an honor to be nominated and terrifyingly wonderful to be singing in front of people who have captured my imagination over and over again," Adele said in a statement. "It's something I've never experienced and probably only ever will once."

The song is nominated for Best Original Song against "Before My Time" from Chasing Ice, "Pi's Lullaby" from Life Of Pi, "Suddenly" from Les Misrables and "Everybody Needs A Best Friend" from Ted. Adele recently won Best Original Song for "Skyfall" at the Golden Globes.

In October, Adele teased "Skyfall" on Twitter with a photo of what appeared to be a pile of sheet music, and Adele's Facebook page revealed the single's artwork. Soon after, audio leaked, and a radio station played "Skyfall" too early before the studio version came out.

Adele recorded the song along with a 77-piece orchestra at Abbey Road Studios in London.

"When we recorded the strings it was one of the proudest moments of my life," Adele previously said. "I'll be back combing my hair when I'm 60 telling people I was a Bond girl back in the day I'm sure.

In 2012, the Oscars didn't have any performances from the Best Original Song category.

"We have enormous respect for Adele's unique artistry as a songwriter and a singer," Craig Zadan and Neil Meron, producers of the 2013 Oscars, said in a statement. "She is currently one of the most successful recording artists in the world, and we believe that her performance of 'Skyfall' will be an exciting Oscar moment for audiences watching at the Dolby Theatre and on television screens around the world."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Alicia Keys  who recently sang at President Barack Obama's inauguration ball and was chosen to perform at next month's Super Bowl  has just launched her Pinterest account.

With a does of musical flair, Keys on Wednesday unveiled her 21 Pinterest boards, 13 of which are named after tracks from her chart-topping fifth studio album, Girl on Fire.

"I'll admit  I'm a bit of a social media junkie and I'm so excited to move into the world of Pinterest," Keys told Mashable. "I can't wait to ... bring everyone into my creative space through pictures and vibes that express the ways in which my songs came to life."

The song boards give a glimpse into what inspired her music and what each song may look like during her "Set The World On Fire" concert tour, which begins in March. The "Tears Always Win" board (above), for example, is visual representation of the song's lyrics.

"It's such a cool platform for me to explore as an artist because these unique boards are really going to let you all visually feel the themes behind the album," Keys said.

"They'll give you an idea of the mood, style and inspiration behind every song."

Ever prone to hop on a piano, Keys fittingly has a "Play" board filled with piano art.

Keys also created boards for stages, inspiration, home and heroines, among other subjects.

SEE ALSO: Alicia Keys Unleashes Interactive Storytelling App for Families [VIDEO]

Keys has been populating her boards with more than 600 pins for several months, but she didn't add her name to the account or label her boards until Wednesday. At launch, the account already has 42 followers, but anticipate the number to increase rapidly.
--------------------------------------------------------------
There are fewer than 100 miles between Amazon's Seattle headquarters and the Canadian border, but Canadians are only now getting access to Amazon's latest e-readers, the Kindle and Kindle Paperwhite. Although Amazon has already launched local Kindle stores in Europe, Asia and South America  the first as early as 2010  Canadians didn't get their own e-bookstore until December, and access to Amazon's two-day shipping program until earlier this month.

Amazon's entry-level E Ink reader, the Kindle, costs CDN $89, the same price as the ad-free version of the Kindle sold in the U.S. (the exchange rate is currently roughly equal). The two versions of the Kindle Paperwhite  one with 3G, and one without  have also been priced to match their U.S. counterparts, costing CDN $199 and CDN $139, respectively. They are available for purchase on Amazon's website, as well as around 1,000 other retail locations, including The Source, Staples, and Shoppers Drug Mart, an Amazon spokesperson tells Mashable.

Now that Canada has its own Kindle store  which is said to offer 1.5 million e-books, 50,000 of which are French-language titles  Kindle owners can buy e-books directly from their devices, as well.

If you've just purchased a Kindle or are planning to, make sure to bookmark our getting started guide.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Wearable sensors or fitness-tracking bracelets, such as the Nike+ FuelBand or Fitbit Flex, are starting to go mainstream. But now, there's a new competitor in town  the Amiigo.

The team of entrepreneurs behind this new wristband claims their product is better than the others because it can automatically tell what kind of exercise you're performing. Amiigo will also be able to differentiate more than 100 exercises, track your movements and collect a number of physiological metrics like heart rate and blood oxygen levels.

"Amiigo provides a more personalized fitness tracking experience because we can detect exactly what you are doing and how your body is responding," the group states in their Indiegogo campaign.

Amiigo offers two sensors, a wristband and a shoe clip. They both collect data independently and users won't need both to track their fitness activity, although using them together will increase accuracy. One collects data from upper body activity, while the other focuses on the lower body.

The sensors pair up with the iOS and Android apps to give you a detailed breakdown of your exercise as well as the ability to share your workout on social networks. "Our main focus is to make fitness more fun," Abe Carter, one of the co-founders, told Wired. "That whole social environment is a lot better and engaging if you have more data to share and you can use your actual workouts to compete."

SEE ALSO: With Fitbit Flex You Never Stop Monitoring Your Fitness

The team has recently launched a crowdsorucing campaign on Indiegogo to raise money to fund the project. Depending how much you donate, you will receive an Amiigo in return. At the time of writing, the campaign has reached more than $160,000, easily surpassing the initial goal of $90,000.

To find out more about this tracking sensor, check out the video above.


--------------------------------------------------------------
Saturday Night Live alum Amy Poehler will star in Best Buy's Super Bowl ad, though the retailer is mum about what exactly she'll be doing.

Scott Durchslag, president of online and global e-commerce, told The San Jose Mercury News that the company chose Poehler because she's relatable. "Because of the complexity of technology today, folks have lots of questions," he said. "Amy is this comedic everyperson who can make things simple. And Best Buy is trying to accomplish the same thingmaking technology simple." The retailer will run another ad after the game detailing sales offers.

This is Best Buy's third Super Bowl spot in as many years. Best Buy's 2011 Super Bowl spot featured both Ozzy Osborne and Justin Bieber. Last year's ad switched course and instead focused on tech innovators like Instagram Founder Kevin Systrom and Jim McKelvey, co-founder of Square.

The latest ad comes as Best Buy is in turnaround mode. The company hired a new CEO, Hubert Joly, last August.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Apple had record sales in the December quarter, but the numbers were still not strong enough to please Wall Street.

Apple sold 47.8 million iPhones in the quarter, compared to 37 million in the same quarter a year ago and a new record for the company. However, it missed Wall Street's estimates of 50 million iPhones. Meanwhile, the company reported selling 22.9 million iPads for the quarter, which came in just shy of the 23 million iPads analysts had expected Apple to sell.

Apple reported revenue of $54.5 billion  more than the entire annual revenue of Google in 2012 and a new record for the company  but it still came in slightly below analysts' estimates for revenue of $54.7 billion. On the bright side, Apple's profits beat estimates with earnings-per-share of $13.81 compared to estimates that it would fall to $13.44 per share.

"We're thrilled with record revenue of over $54 billion and sales of over 75 million iOS devices in a single quarter," said Tim Cook, Apple's CEO, in a statement. "We're very confident in our product pipeline as we continue to focus on innovation and making the best products in the world."

The company's stock has taken a beating in recent months, declining by about 30% since September on concerns about iPhone supply issues, management changes and a potential decline in the company's profit margin. In recent days, Apple's stock has hovered around the $500 mark as investors appeared unsure whether the company was heading back towards its high of $705 a share or lower into the 400s. These earnings numbers appear to have confirmed investor fears of the latter.

Shares of Apple declined by nearly 5% in after hours trading to $490 following the earnings report.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Every Apple earnings report is a big event, but today's earnings report is especially significant.

Apple's September quarter earnings report disappointed investors. Though the company beat expectations for iPhone sales by a decent margin, it fell short on iPad sales and perhaps more importantly, Apple projected that it would report a significantly lower profit margin in the following quarter than analysts had expected. Apple's stock fell below $600 the next day for the first time in three months and has continued to decline, falling to as low as $483 a share in intraday trading last week.

In recent days, Apple's stock has hovered right around the $500 mark, as investors appear unsure whether the stock is set to skyrocket back towards its high of $705 just after the iPhone 5 was released or plummet lower into the 400s. That, in a nutshell, is what hinges on the December earnings report. Investors are waiting to see how well Apple's new products have sold and how much they have started to cut into the company's profit margin.

Much of the focus will be on the iPhone 5 in particular. Ever since the device was released in mid-September, there have been reports that Apple's suppliers were struggling to manufacture enough phones to meet demand. More recently, there have been multiple reports that Apple has cut its supply orders for iPhone 5 parts in half for the March quarter, suggesting to some that demand is lower than expected. Even so, analysts are expecting a record quarter for iPhone sales, but the range of estimates varies from as low as 43 million to more than 60 million, with a median estimate of about 50 million.

Apple is also expected to have strong iPad sales of 23 million, according to Piper Jaffray analyst Gene Munster, 9 million more than were sold in the previous quarter thanks largely to the release of the iPad Mini in October.

Based on the strength of iPhone and iPad sales, Apple is expected to report record revenue of $54.73 billion, according to analysts' estimates compiled by compiled by Thomson Reuters. While that's an impressive figure, it would represent the slowest growth in Apple sales since 2009. To make matters worse, Apple's net income is expected to decline for the first time in a decade due to higher costs associated with producing new products like the iPhone 5 and iPad Mini and lower price tags for older iPhone models and the iPad Mini. Right now, the consensus estimate is that Apple will report earnings-per-share of $13.44 for the quarter, down from $13.87 per share in the same quarter a year ago  a decline of about 3%.

Apple's stock was up by about 1% in early trading Wednesday.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The world's most valuable company does everything at a grand scale. For instance, consumers send some 200 million iMessages a day.

Not all of Apple's numbers were mind-blowing, though. The company's stock price fell as much as 10% in afterhours trading after narrowly missing some Wall Street targets for its fiscal first quarter. However, as usual, Apple's conference call with analysts gave a glimpse into how big exactly the company has become. Below are some numerical highlights:

Apple sent 4 trillion notifications to customers in the quarter. Some 450 billion iMessages were sent. Apple has $137.1 billion in cash on hand. The company sold 22.9 million iPads in the quarter. Mac sales for the quarter were 4.1 million, compared to 5.2 million in the comparable quarter in the previous year. Apple has 401 Apple Stores; 150 are outside the U.S. The company sold 2 million Apple TVs in the quarter, a 60% jump over the comparable year-ago quarter.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Vice President Joe Biden will discuss the Obama administration's position on gun control in a Google Hangout on Thursday at 1:45 p.m. EST, Google and the vice president's office announced Wednesday.

Biden's hangout will be a resurrection of the so-called "Fireside Hangouts," the White House's series of conversations with top officials via the video chat feature on Google+. The name is a play on the radio-based Fireside Chats famously held by President Franklin Delano Roosevelt between 1933 and 1944.

Joining Biden on Thursday will be Guy Kawasaki, one of the original Apple employees, video blogger Phil DeFranco and moderator Hari Sreenivasan of PBS NewsHour. Questions can be submitted ahead of the panel by replying to Google+ posts from the participants or from the White House (Biden notably doesn't have an active Google+ profile).

SEE ALSO: President Obama's First Google+ Hangout: How'd He Do?

Biden was charged with leading a gun reform task force by President Barack Obama following the December shooting at Sandy Hook Elementary School in Newtown, Conn., that claimed 27 lives including that of the shooter.

The Obama administration is pushing for Congress to pass criminal background checks for all gun sales, reinstating the Federal Assault Weapons Ban, limiting magazine rounds to 10 rounds and other reforms. Last week, Obama took more than 20 executive actions in an effort to reduce gun violence.

What would you ask Biden in the Google Hangout? Share in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Ahead of its BlackBerry 10 launch later this month for its new line of smartphones, Research In Motion (RIM) announced on Wednesday the latest version of its mobile management solution for businesses.

The BlackBerry Enterprise Service 10, which is now available for download, will run on BlackBerry 10 smartphones and is compatible with Android and iOS devices. The software will be instrumental in how BlackBerry 10 will be publicly received and could determine the overall future of the struggling company.

As of now, the software is available to government agencies and corporate clients. Among the key functions is a separation of work and personal applications on individual devices, as well as data, to make it easy for those using the same phone for corporate and individual use to separate work and play.

SEE ALSO: RIM May License BlackBerry 10 to Other Manufacturers

The company also promises better support for work email, content and secure connectivity to behind the firewall applications and data. The software will also come with BlackBerry World for Work, the new corporate app storefront for BlackBerry 10 smartphones that allows organizations to set up their own app stores for employees.

BlackBerry Enterprise Service 10 empowers employees to be more productive and better equipped to serve customers while it provides business and IT leaders with the confidence that corporate data is protected and manageable in the same way they have long enjoyed with BlackBerry, said Peter Devenyi, senior vice president of enterprise software at Research In Motion, in a statement. BlackBerry Enterprise Service 10 makes mobility easy for businesses to help keep them moving.

The news also coincides with the ending of the company's mobile device management software Mobile Fusion as a standalone product. Moving forward, it will be a part of the new BlackBerry Enterprise Service, and the company specified an upgrade path on its official blog.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Bloomberg on Tuesday launched a new Bloomberg Billionaires data visualization and research tool, giving users an easy-to-use interactive way to track the world's wealthiest people.

The Bloomberg Billionaires index previously listed the name, estimated net worth, country and daily financial changes of the top 40 wealthiest people. The new index takes the same core principle but adds a wealth of additional data displayed in maps and charts with options that turn the index into an interactive encyclopedia of knowledge about the richest people on Earth.

The new Index's opening view shows headshots of the world's richest people. Hovering your mouse over a billionaire's face reveals their name and some other data, while clicking takes you to a biographical page with the person's history, net worth, Bloomberg stories about him or her and other information updated daily. Note that some faces are left blank due to a lack of current photographs of some individuals. Also note that Bloomberg founder Michael Bloomberg is not on the list as it's company policy not to cover Bloomberg L.P.

It's the new graphical displays, however, that are most interesting to play around with. A "ranking" option lets you track billionaires' wealth compared to one another over time. A "plot" option gives you the ability to plot any of the available data points on individual billionaires against other data points, i.e. net worth rankings against percentage of wealth held in private assets. And a "map" option shows a heat map of the concentration of wealth across the planet.

All of the options, too, are highly customizable: One may isolate billionaires based on home country, industry, age, gender and source of wealth (whether it was inherited or self-made). Users can also define a range of dates for which to search, revealing interesting trends about billionaire's fortunes over time, the transfer of wealth and the planet's overall economic health.

Bloomberg has previously held this data internally, but is now providing it to the public free of charge. The idea, Editor of Bloomberg Billionaires Matt Miller told Mashable, is to provide Bloomberg's data on global billionaires to a mass audience. Accordingly, the new data visualization tool should prove useful in the hands of reporters, students, researchers and anybody who just happens to be curious about the wealthiest people on the planet.

Access the new index here: Bloomberg Billionaires.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The hipKey, a new Bluetooth device designed to keep track of your personal items, is now available in the U.S. Apple Online store. We first saw hipKey at the 2013 International CES and, while it's not the only Bluetooth tracking device out there, we were impressed with its design and function.

The hipKey is shaped like a tiny crescent moon, made of smooth aluminum that attaches to your bag or keys. Or, as some have pointed out, you can attach it to a child who has a tendency to wander, or perhaps a pet. We like the design because the function keys are hidden inside the crescent, making them difficult to press by accident.

By using low-energy Bluetooth 4.0, it has a range of about 50 meters, or 164 feet, and battery life is purportedly between three and four weeks. The battery can be recharged via micro-USB.

The hipKey app offers a little more functionality than other Bluetooth trackers we've seen, like the SticknFind. Like the others, it has an Alarm mode which warns you if your iPad or iPhone leaves your side. However, it also has a Safe Zone feature that lets you control and personalize locations. So if you're engrossed in texting on your phone and your iPad slowly leaves your side, the alarm will sound. But if you're home and your partner or kid grabs the iPad to look something up, it won't sound because that's been designated a safe zone.

The Find Me mode is helpful for those of you who constantly forget where you put things. Pushing the button triggers an alarm that sends you the location of your bag or iPad. The Motion mode alerts you if someone moves the item attached to the hipKey, helpful if you're not in a position to keep an eye on things.

SEE ALSO: Did You Know Bluetooth Was Named for a Danish King?

Lastly, the Child mode helps keep track of your kids in a crowded public place. Or if you want to cheat at Hide-and-Seek. You can set a perimeter that the kids are allowed to be in, but once they leave that area, the alarm sounds to warn you they're out of range. You can then use the Find Me feature to locate them.

I haven't used these tracking devices on kids but having seen enough toddlers walking around busy streets and malls with a real leash or tether tied around their waist that I think this might be a good option.

The hipKey first launched in European Apple Online Stores in December and quickly sold out. The U.S. version will cost $89.

Have you used a Bluetooth tracker to help locate kids or personal devices? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
In the 21st century, a small business in Kansas City, Mo., has at least one very important thing in common with a small business in Seoul, Korea: Both have access to ultra high-speed Internet  Kansas City via Google Fiber and Seoul on account of its government championing the rollout of fiber optic internet for over a decade.

Thats one way to look at Akamais quarterly "state of the internet" report, in which the content serving company samples requests to its own servers to reveal internet connectivity speeds all over the world.

As usual, countries with the most people with Internet connections faster than 10 megabits per second are the densely populated, rich economies of Asia (South Korea, Japan, Hong Kong) and Scandinavia (Switzerland, Netherlands, Denmark, Sweden, Finland). There are also a couple of surprises: Latvia and the United States. The U.S. is both sprawling, making connectivity more expensive and beset by broadband monopolists.

The list of countries by average connection speed is similar, although the Czech Republic squeezes Sweden off the list. This measure of internet speed can be skewed by a small number of much faster Internet connections, so it's arguably a less democratic measure of high-speed Internet access.

One thing these rankings don't show is the distribution of Internet speeds within a country. In the U.S., for example, it varies a great deal depending on whether you're in an urban area with access to a fiberoptic hookup from Google or Verizon or in a remote area with nothing but the a rural telephone collective to connect you.

It's difficult to disentangle cause and effect when it comes to broadband. Do rich countries spend on it so their citizens can stream more movies, or does having broadband make you rich? But it seems likely that broadband is a great enabler, like mass transit, good ports, a system of functioning courts and other hallmarks of developed economies.

As Daniel Ek, CEO of Spotify, emphasized to me the last time we spoke, the one reason a country as small as Sweden has a disproportionate share of successful Internet startups is that Swedish teenagers grow up taking gigabit Internet connections for granted.

And it's not just traditional web startups and IT giants that need fast internet connectivity. Arguably, as businesses move more functions to the cloud and mobile becomes increasingly important, everyone needs fast Internet connectivity.

Whether youre a manufacturer who has to conduct remote meetings with suppliers in distant countries or a sales department that requires its cloud-based customer relations management software to be fast and responsive, fast broadband Internet is now a core infrastructure requirement not unlike reliable transportation and energy.

This article originally published at Quartz here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Have you ever left a restaurant after experiencing either fabulous or really lousy service and went online to write a review of it? Congratulations, you too can now be a restaurant reviewer.

Self-described "lifelong entrepreneur" Brad Newman says his ReviewerCard program is a great way for people to let a restaurant or business know they'll be writing a review about it. He's selling Reviewer ID cards for $100 bucks a piece to bloggers he thinks merit ReviewerCard status. He tells the LA Times he screens the applicants to make sure they only go to worthwhile applicants.

Newman says he got the idea for the card after he was treated rudely by a waiter on a trip to France. When he complained, he mentioned he planned to post a negative review on travel site TripAdvisor. That brought a visit from a manager who apologized and comped his breakfast.

And therein lies the issue of the threat of a negative review. With our reliance on social media and review sites like Yelp for restaurant suggestions, most anyone can be called a "reviewer" these days. And when you read a review, if you're like us, you'd probably rather get an honest account of how the average person is treated. If someone walks in carrying the threat of a bad review with them, they may get preferential treatment, or something the average Joe may not ever taste or see.

In fact before the Internet, NY Times restaurant critic Ruth Reichl went out of her way to make sure her identity wasn't known when she entered a restaurant. That way she was assured an unbiased experience  no preferential treatment or special food. In this video from 2001 she describes using wigs and make-up to conceal her identity.

Newman defends his cards saying they "empower reviewers and protect businesses." He says businesses want to know when a review is coming but the flip side of that plays on the fears of the restaurant owner who might be worried about a negative review.

Consumers want to read real accounts, not fakes. Yelp already began an effort to crack down on fake reviews by introducing a consumer alert label that appears on the pages of businesses who are caught buying reviews.

So what do you think? Is this extortion  a way for people to get free food and bully their way into good service? Or is it a great idea that will help restaurants and lead to better reviews? Watch the video from the ReviewerCard site and let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Despite some lingering concerns about its transition to mobile, Google had a terrific fourth quarter. As the company reported yesterday, its full-year revenues for the first time topped $50 billion. Google's profit for the year was also a record-breaker: $10.75 billion.

To put this growth in context, Statista has created the infographic below. As this data visualization illustrates, Google has been growing at a steady pace, though its stock price has followed a more circuitous route.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Secretary of State Hillary Clinton spent Wednesday in Congress, splitting her time between Senate and House hearings on the September 2012 attack against an American consolate in Benghazi, Libya.

Her treatment in both hearings was split along party lines: Most Democrats praised her service while many Republicans criticized her for what they see as a failure to prevent the attack that took four American lives including that of Ambassador John Christopher Stevens.

Clinton choked up discussing the State Department's lost employees during her opening statement during the Senate hearing:

She defended U.S. Ambassador to the United Nations Susan Rice, who appeared on Sunday talk shows following the attack and claimed the consolate attack was in response to an anti-Islam YouTube video:

Clinton brushed off further criticism from Ron Jonhson (R-Wis.), who aggressively questioned her over the video.

"With all due respect, the fact is we had four dead Americans," responded Clinton amid Johnson's interruptions. "Was it because of a protest or was it because of guys out for a walk last night who decided to kill some Americans? What difference at this point does it make? It's our job to figure out what happened and do everything we can to prevent it from ever happening again, senator."

And here's what Clinton looked like while rebuking Johnson:

Rand Paul (R-Ky.) said that Clinton's upcoming depature from the Secretary of State position means that she accepts "the culpability for the worst tragedy since 9/11."

"Had I been president and found you did not read the cables from Benghazi and from Ambassador Stevens, I would have relieved you of your post," Paul told Clinton after she said she hadn't read every document related to the attack.

A few hours later in the House of Representatives, the non-voting delegate from American Samoa, Eni Fa'aua'a Hunkin Faleomavaega, Jr., all but insisted Clinton run for president in 2016:

Clinton later revealed that some members of Congress saw surveillance video of the consolate attack during a classified briefing:

Clinton also took heat from Republican Rep. Jeff Duncan, who accused her of letting the Benghazi consolate become a "death trap."

All told, Clinton's attitude towards Congress is summed up nicely by this:
--------------------------------------------------------------
Time to deal with the prospect of two more solid months of winter. That's 60 days of snow, slush and eyeball-freezing temperatures. Make the best of an icy situation by venturing outside armed with warm mittens and artistic skills.

SEE ALSO: 10 Dogs That Are Better at Winter Than You

If you can't decide how to tackle the pile of white fluffy stuff, find inspiration  no wool socks needed  in the gallery above.

Alternately, you can just stay inside curled up in a Snuggie flipping through photos of what other people did outside.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Music can make or break a TV show, movie or even an advertisement. In entertainment media, a perfectly selected song will complement the visuals and dialogue, and enhance the overall impact.

If you begin to notice more of those befitting songs in the coming months and years, a new web app released Wednesday could be the reason why. Extreme Music, a popular music production library, just introduced a new feature called Customix to its website.

Customix lets music supervisors quickly edit songs they plan to license. The app allows users to adjust the volume to individual elements of a track (vocals, drums, guitar, bass, etc.), change a song's tempo without changing its pitch and edit the length of a song without cutting it into pieces.

"This is a really dramatic change in the way in which we work and in which our clients work," Extreme Music CEO Russell Emanuel told Mashable. "The whole ethos behind this is that it breathes many different lives into one single musical track."

Customix works with many of the 13,000 songs in Extreme Music's library, which includes tracks from artists like Hans Zimmer, Quincy Jones, George Martin and Snoop Lion. One doesn't need one of those producer's acumen to use Customix, however  it was designed as an easy-to-use tool.

"One of the powers of this application is that it turns you into a music editor without needing the deep music knowledge that a skilled music supervisor would need," Emanuel said.

SEE ALSO: The New Myspace: Music Meets Social, Done Right

Given a demo version, I was able to customize a track in under five minutes. After logging in, I first selected a type of music  "Celtic Punk." Then I picked a song called "Craic Addict" (craic is an Irish term for fun). I entered that I wanted the song to be one minute in length, at which point the app smartly adjusted. Then I muted the vocals, drums, electric guitars and lowered the volume on the bass. Lastly, I dropped the tempo to 120 beats per minute.

In just a short time, I turned an agressive song with a driving beat, which sounded like it should have been in The Departed, into a mellow and sweet tune, perfect for my imaginary one-minute clip. Check out the screenshot below to see my customized "Craic Addict."

Songs from Extreme Music's library grace the soundtracks of works such as Lincoln, Mad Men and Dexter. Kevin Edelman, of Metalman Music, is the music supervisor for several shows, including Homeland and Criminal Minds. He recently demoed a beta version of Customix.

To be able to create my own mix on the fly, plus the ability to change the speed of a track, makes my life so much easier," Edelman said in a press release. "This really is a giant leap forward and seriously changes the game.

According to Emanuel, Extreme Music is the only production library that offers anything like Customix, but that will not last long.

"There's no question in my mind that everyone will be working this way," Emanuel said. "It's a dramatic change in the industry."

Information about Customix leaked last week. Immediately UJAM, the app's developer, began getting requests from other companies for similar products.

"We cannot disclose who we are in negotiations with, but we have seen enormous interest since the Customix information has leaked," UJAM CEO Axel Hensen told Mashable. "Businesses in this space realize this technology is essential for a competitive advantage."

Customix is only available to Extreme Music's subscribers, which means it's probably not for you unless you're an industry pro, or if you're independently producing high quality content for digital distribution. On the bright side, that means you can just kick back and relax, knowing that more felicitous music is on its way to the shows and movies you love to watch.

Images courtesy of Flickr, Anders.Bachmann, and via Extreme Music
--------------------------------------------------------------
Everyone has a hobby, whether it's reading, writing, dancing, playing music or sports. Mary Helen Saba's hobby is costumes.

Saba, dubbed by friends as "the costume queen," decided to dress as a different theme each day for a year. The 26-year-old is documenting the challenge on her blog, Theme Me.

"Even before I started this blog I wouldnt throw out an item of clothing or a prop if I thought Id be able to use it for a costume. Basically, Ive been preparing for this my entire life (watch this space  in five years Ill be on Hoarders)," writes Saba.

Currently seven months into the project, Saba's blog receives more than 2,000 monthly visitors on average. Readers can submit suggestions, which Saba takes into consideration when she's feeling strapped for ideas.

SEE ALSO: 25 Crazy Pet Costumes That Put Yours to Shame

"The hardest days are the ones where I haven't planned something from the weekend before because there was no obvious holiday or celebrity birthday, and suddenly it's 11pm the night before and I don't have what I need to pull off any user-suggested themes," Saba tells Mashable.

When Saba gets stressed over lack of inspiration and reader submissions, she usually scrounges the Internet. Sometimes, it's led to more conceptual costumes, like day 141, when her muse was Nickelback front man Chad Kroeger. Instead of just being the singer, she used a pickle, a green blanket and a blonde wig  partially resembling a Pickleback, the drink named after the band.

"It's not the best executed costume I've done, but the concept is funny enough (I hope) to make it acceptable," explains Saba.

With five months to go, Saba's dream is to capture the attention of a celebrity known for dressing in kooky costumes as well  Ellen DeGeneres.

"I'm still keeping my all my fingers and toes crossed for that one," says Saba.
--------------------------------------------------------------
DNA could someday store more than just the blueprints for life  it could also house vast collections of documents, music, or video in an impossibly compact format that lasts for thousands of years.

Researchers at the European Bioinformatics Institute in Hinxton, U.K., have demonstrated a new method for reliably encoding several common computer file formats this way. As the price of sequencing and synthesizing DNA continues to drop, the researchers estimate, this biological storage medium will be competitive within the next few decades.

The information storage density of DNA is at least a thousand times greater than that of existing media, but until recently the cost of DNA synthesis was too high for the technology to be anything more than a curiosity. Conventional methods of storing digital information for prolonged periods continue to pose problems, however.

The magnetic tapes typically used for archival storage become brittle and lose their coating after a few decades. And even if the physical medium used to store information remains intact, storage formats are always changing. This means the data has to be transferred to a new format or it may become unreadable.

DNA, in contrast, remains stable over timeand its one format thats always likely to be useful. We want to separate the storage medium from the machine that will read it, says project leader Nick Goldman. We will always have technologies for reading DNA. Goldman notes that intact DNA fragments tens of thousands of years old have been found and that DNA is stable for even longer if its refrigerated or frozen.

The U.K. researchers encoded DNA with an MP3 of Martin Luther King Jr.s I Have a Dream speech, a PDF of a scientific paper, an ASCII text file of Shakespeares sonnets, and a JPEG color photograph. The storage density of the DNA files is about 2.2 petabytes per gram.

Others have demonstrated DNA data storage before. This summer, for example, researchers led by Harvard University genetics professor George Church used the technology to encode a book.

The difference with the new work, says Goldman, is that the researchers focused on a practical, error-tolerant design. To make the DNA files, the researchers created software that converted the 1s and 0s of the digital realm into the genetic alphabet of DNA bases, labeled A, T, G and C. The program ensures that there are no repeated bases such as AA or GG, which lead to higher error rates when synthesizing and sequencing DNA.

The files were divided into segments, each bookended with an index code that contains information about which file it belongs to and where it belongs within that fileanalogous to the title and page number on pages of a book.

The encoding software also ensures some redundancy. Each part of a file is represented in four different fragments, so even if several degrade, it should still be possible to reconstruct the data.

Working with genomics company Agilent Technologies of Santa Clara, California, the researchers synthesized the fragments of DNA and then demonstrated that they could sequence them and accurately reconstruct the files. This work is described today in the journal Nature.

Goldmans group estimates that encoding data in DNA currently costs $12,400 per megabyte, plus $220 per megabyte to read that data back. If the price of DNA synthesis comes down by two orders of magnitude, as it is expected to do in the next decade, says Goldman, DNA data storage will soon cost less than archiving data on magnetic tapes.

Victor Zhirnov, program director for memory technologies at the Semiconductor Research Corporation in Durham, North Carolina, says that because the current cost is so high, data-storing DNA will probably find its earliest use in long-term archives that arent accessed frequently. Looking ahead, he says, he can envision a more aggressive technology to replace flash, the nonvolatile memory technology found in portable electronics, which is already reaching its scaling limits. The key will be developing entire hardware systems that work with DNA, not just sequencers and synthesizers.

Harvards Church says he is working on this very problem. We can keep incrementally improving our ability to read and write DNA, but I want to jump completely out of that box, he says. Church is currently developing a system for directly encoding analog signals such as video and audio into DNA, eliminating conventional electronics altogether.

This article originally published at MIT Technology Review here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Facebook's Graph Search, which the social-network giant rolled out last week, is an undeniably cool new feature.

The internal search system sorts through user data to unearth information shared by your friends, as well as what's publicly available on Facebook. So you can look up, say, "Which of my college friends like Metallica?" and other very detailed questions.

SEE ALSO: 10 Things We Learned From Facebook's Graph Search

But one humorous video demonstrates how Graph Search can quickly degenerate into something creepy. In it, Slacktory editor Nick Douglas "uses" the system, and suggests a series of increasingly weird (and funny) search terms.

"Girls who look like my ex, but are nice" Watch the whole video, above; then tell us in the comments: How do you plan to use Graph Search?
--------------------------------------------------------------
Facebook posts and reader comments are more memorable than human faces or sentences from books, a new study says. Researchers found that status updates are one-and-a-half times more memorable than sentences from books and two-and-a-half times more memorable than faces.

The same researchers from the University of California, San Diego, and the University of Warwick are looking into how microblogs relate to human memory, with the same results applying to tweets, and most likely text messages.

The succinct, unedited tone of microblogging brings people closer to natural language, making it "mind-ready," says cognitive psychologist Laura Mickes.

"I think this works across the board," Mickes tells Mashable. "It's not just who you're writing to, it's your audience. It's how you sit down and write these things with unfiltered, spontaneous language."

All those seemingly-trivial snippets all over your news feed aren't as forgettable as you may think. Shared information does have a privileged status and is remembered more readily, the study says.

Mickes and her colleagues gathered 200 anonymous Facebook posts and removed emoticons, all-CAPS, multiple exclamation points and other distractions. Statuses included philosophical musings such as, "i am 7,689 days old..." and "Bc sometimes it makes me wonder."

Random sentences from books were also given to subjects, including "Cody raised his .40 Sig Sauer in a shooters grip," and "Even honor had its limits." The self-paced recognition tests showed that posts were more memorable.

SEE ALSO: How Facebook Can Make You Envious

The same type of method was applied with faces, but Facebook posts trumped facial recognition. In a similar fashion, CNN news headlines were tested with reader comments. User posts like "I am an unemployed teacher in the deep south" won out over breaking news sentences of the same length.

Entertainment headlines with a "gossipy" tone, much like Facebook posts, were also easily recalled. Users who posted were of all ages, showcasing that the effectiveness of "mind-ready" language is not limited to the young.

What impact do you think microblogs have on your memory? Share your thoughts in the comments (which may be more memorable) below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Facebook is the most popular mobile app in the U.S. in terms of unique users  at least for now.

The signature Facebook app passed Google Maps in October of last year to become the most used mobile app in the U.S. and held onto the top spot through the end of the year, according to data released Wednesday by comScore Mobile Metrix.

Facebook's app enjoyed strong growth in 2012 with 85.5 million monthly unique users in the U.S. in December across iOS, Android and RIM's mobile platforms, up from just under 65 million in March, when comScore first started tracking mobile app data. (In October, Facebook reported 604 million monthly mobile users worldwide.) Google Maps, on the other hand, saw its active user numbers dip from about 80 million in August and September to a little more than 70 million in October after it was removed as a default app on iOS 6.

"Both Google Maps and Facebook were growing nicely throughout the year until that happened," Andrew Lipsman, VP of industry analysis at comScore, told Mashable. "Facebook continued that trend and Google Maps took a dip that one month and now it's climbing back." Google launched a new Maps app for iOS 6 in mid-December, and Lipsman says it's likely Maps will grow its user numbers at a faster rate going forward, though it's unclear whether and when the app will return to the top spot.

ComScore's mobile app data is based on browsing behavior tracks from a panel of users as well as supplemental data from publishers showing app usage. The numbers represent active visitors to apps  rather than app downloads  similar to the way that comScore tracks visitors to websites.

While Facebook currently held the top spot at the end of the year, Google had the next five most used apps, including Google Maps, Gmail and YouTube. Lipsman credited this to the growth of Android and the popularity of Google services in general.

Aside from having the largest audience, Facebook's app also has by far the highest level of engagement. According to comScore, Facebook's app accounted for 23% of time spent on mobile apps while all of Google's apps collectively account for 10% of time spent.

Who says Facebook doesn't get mobile?
--------------------------------------------------------------
No one ever said staying or getting fit was easy  or cheap.

There are so many fitness tracking gadgets to chose from these days, and many more reasons why you might want one. Wearable trackers offer convenience and constant motivation. But price-wise, how do they compare to your gym membership? How do they compare to each other?

Nike+ Kinect, naturally, wants to convince you its Xbox-based system is an effective price proposition. Below is their gym cost infographic; we've gone further and added the details and cost of other fitness gadgets.

The fee listed for an average gym membership seems high to us (living in San Francisco, I still pay slightly less than that and go to a pretty good gym). A spokesperson for Nike+ Kinect said they were surprised at the high number  but when they factored in high-end gyms (like Equinox), it added up.

A site called Statistics Brain suggests the average gym cost is $55 per month, seconding that information. Also, keep in mind many gyms have an initiation charge of about $100.

We also compiled a cost breakdown of gadgets and game consoles that you can use in place of, or along with, your gym routine. And this isn't an either/or situation, you can take your Fitbit tracker or LINK armband to the gym, or workout using Wello while you're on vacation.

Check out how the prices of these gadgets and consoles compare:

Wii Fit: The Wii Fit requires you to buy the Wii console, plus a balance board. The console costs about $165 and the board retails for about $100. The Wii Fit will certainly make you sweat, and it's a lot of fun. You can workout with up to 8 people, so long as everyone has a balance board. It comes with preloaded workouts, like yoga and strength training. larklife: From company Lark, the larklife is a two-wristband system to track your steps/calories burned, and another to track your sleep. The larklife system comes with a daytime band, a nighttime band, one larklife core (the brains that you move from the day to the night band), a micro-USB charging cord, a USB AC adaptor and syncs to the free larklife app for iOS devices. It retails for $150. Fitbit: This company offers a number of fitness trackers that all sync using Bluetooth to the free mobile and web applications. The Fitbit Zip costs monitors steps, distance and calories burned. It costs $60. The Fitbit One tracks what the Zip does, plus stairs and you can wear it at night to track your sleep. It costs $100. Launching this spring is the Fitbit Flex, a wristband that monitors activity and sleep. It costs about $100. MOVband: You wear this tracker like a watch; you can even buy changeable wristbands for about $5 each to mix-up the colors. The MOVband tracks all your movements and syncs that data (via USB) to your free online account where you can monitor your activity level. The tracker costs $30. Nike+ Kinect: Kinect for Xbox 360 is a pretty intuitive device. It uses a sensor to read your steps, so unlike the Wii, no board is needed. Just place the Kinect on a shelf by your TV or on your media stand facing you. Combine that technology with Nike's fitness know-how and you have a kick-butt at-home workout. Create a custom workout on Nike+ Kinect that matches your fitness level. It retails for $50, and the Xbox 360 plus the Kinect devices costs as low as $99 plus a two year contract for about $15 per month, or buying the Xbox 360 4GB with the Kinect without a contract costs about $300. Wello: This is not a gadget or device, but a website where you can connect with a personal trainer and workout together live via video chat. It's important both people have a good Internet connection for this to work. Training sessions are offered in 30 or 60 minute sessions, and prices depend on the level of training the instructor has and range from $19-119 per session. BodyMedia LINK: The LINK armband is the only armband BodyMedia sells with Bluetooth (a must-have feature on a tracker). The LINK counts steps, calorie burned, sleep and it can sync to a heart rate monitor. It retails for about $150. You can sync the data the LINK tracks to the free SparkPeople website, a massive community of fitness enthusiasts, where you'll also find lots of health and fitness information. Or to the free BodyMedia FIT app on your iPhone or Android device. BodyMedia also gives you three months free access to its web application as part of the LINK purchase price. If you want to continue using the web app after three months it costs $7 per month. Up by Jawbone: This waterproof wristband tracks sleep and exercise habits. You can also track calories by entering food items, or for a faster way to record your eating habits, Up lets you take pictures of your meals and write how you felt afterwards. It retails for $129.99. There have been complaints, though, that the end cap on the wristband falls off easily. And you need to take the cap off when charging or syncing the device (it does not have Bluetooth). The iOS app has a 4+ rating, and reviews for the Up are mixed on Amazon (keep in mind the newest model seems to have much better reviews that the original). Nike+ FuelBand: This wristband tracks your activity level with an accelerometer. You can set a goal and monitor how close you are to reaching that goal through the app. The data from the wristbands syncs to a several apps. It costs $150.

Have you swapped your gym membership for a fitness gadget? Do you use both? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
So you want to expand your real screen estate but dont have the money for a second monitor? You can instead use your iPad as a second monitor with one of these free iPad apps.

Splashtop has a collection of second-screen tablet apps, but its free SplashtopXD more than does the job. But with the free version, you will have to make some sacrifices when it comes to features, like remotely wiping the screen.

Setting up the application is relatively simple. Just download both the app and the Splashtop Streamer PC software, and the two will communicate with each other. The app should recognize your PC on opening. After setting a password, you'll have options to tweak and improve video, audio or bring up the virtual keyboard. The app also gives you hints and tips, but these can be turned off if you wish.

In terms of performance, there is not much between Splashtop XD and other second-screen iPad apps like DisplayLink, although we did find that Splashtop XD occasionally lagged when moving the cursor on a web page.

AirDisplay Free is similar to the paid-for AirDisplay iPad app, but does compensate for being free by featuring a number of ads on the second screen. On installing the desktop client (from Avatron.com/d) and the iPad app, we found AirDisplay to be OK, if slightly fiddly.

Sharing between PC and iPad is not as fluid as it could be and re-sizing file windows is difficult because of the banner ad - which cannot be moved  at the top of the screen, and the keyboard option at the bottom.

Nonetheless, it is functional and does support AirSharing with other iOS users and PrintSharing with compatible AirPrint printers. The display arrangement can support the option to run Retina resolution when available.

This article originally published at TabTimes here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Just how bad do you have to be to get banned from Gmail? How many policies and terms do you have to violate to warrant suspension, or worse, Google termination?

Google has discretion on the site, with the sole power to warn, suspend or terminate those in violation of its policies at any time.

SEE ALSO: 9 Things We Wish Gmail Could Do

In order to ensure your continued ease of access with Gmail, we've compiled a list of things you shouldn't do  unless you want to lose your account.

1. Impersonate another person (via the use of an email address or otherwise) or otherwise misrepresent yourself or the source of any email.

Don't use someone else's Gmail account and write emails pretending like you are him or her. According to Time, there are nine states with online impersonation laws, and in New York and California online impersonation is a misdemeanor punishable by thousands of dollars in fines and up to a year in jail. So just don't create fake Gmail accounts in the first place. Ahem, Lennay Kekua, cough cough.

2. Send emails to users who have requested to be removed from a mailing list.

If you are still receiving emails from an address you unsubscribed from, try the troubleshooting advice in this Google blog post: unsubscribing made easy. Google launched a service that messages senders on your behalf, asking them to unsubscribe you from their list. Unfortunately it doesn't work for all senders right now, but Google is encouraging senders to support auto-unsubscribe.

3. Sell, exchange or distribute to a third party the email addresses of any person without his or her knowledge and consent.

The going rate for 1 million U.S. email addresses is $25, making your personal email address worth $0.000025. Besides the fact that selling email addresses without the person's knowledge or consent is illegal, it's not very lucrative. Trying to make a quick buck? Don't do it this way.

4. Send unsolicited emails to significant numbers of email addresses belonging to people you don't know.

Not only is selling email addresses illegal, but sending emails to a bunch of people you don't know is also illegal. So no, you cannot email blast the cast of Downton Abbey to ask about Matthew Crawley and Lady Mary's nuptials, or where Dan Stevens is eating dinner tonight...

5. Send, upload or distribute any unlawful, defamatory, harassing, abusive, fraudulent, infringing, obscene or otherwise objectionable content.

Email fraud has become rampant as technology continues to develop, but sending harassing or obscene content is also illegal. The U.S. government has drafted up a helpful manual for recognizing fraudulent content with tips on what to do when you encounter it. This list of illegal content seems pretty all-inclusive, so just send, upload and distribute only cute pictures of cats, okay?

6. Conduct or forward pyramid schemes and the like.

In order to avoid inadvertently becoming part of a pyramid scheme, check out some helpful tips. The old adage "If it sounds too good to be true, it probably is" works well in this situation. (Sorry, Bernie.)

7. Transmit content that may be harmful to minors.

In email and in life, ya heard? That includes child pornography, correspondence of a threatening, violent or graphic nature and age-restricted content, such as alcohol, drug or dating site material.

8. Illegally transmit another's intellectual property or other proprietary information without such owner's or licensor's permission.

Go to Tumblr; it's called a "reblog." Just make sure you have permission before sending anyone's work through the Gmail service, or else face the consequences.

9. Interfere with other Gmail users' enjoyment of the service.

10. Sell, trade, resell or otherwise exploit for any unauthorized commercial purpose or transfer any Gmail account.

If you can't sell your account in the first place, how can you resell it? Besides that point, you can't make money from your domain name  even if it is really, really cool.

11. Use the Gmail service in connection with illegal peer-to-peer file sharing.

If you are illegally downloading music, movies, or TV shows (tsk, tsk), don't use the Gmail service to share the content with your friends. But remember: Friends don't let friends illegally peer-to-peer file share.

12. Modify, adapt, translate or reverse engineer any portion of the Gmail service.

Reverse engineering involves reproducing a manufacturer's product using a detailed examination of its construction. Basically, you can't take the structure of Gmail, copy it and then create your own email service.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Welcome to this morning's edition of "First To Know," a series in which we keep you in the loop on what's happening in the digital world.

Today, we take a look at three interesting stories.

Google announces its fourth-quarter earnings with $14.42 billion in revenue, a 36 percent increase from last year. Apple pulls photo app 500px from its store on Monday, citing claims of pornographic content; and Beyonce is still buzzing through the Twitterverse with reactions to her lip-syncing the National Anthem, along with celebrities putting in their two cents.

Check out the video above for more.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It's 2015 and you've just arrived back in New York City from a weekend trip. You're standing in Times Square when it occurs to you that you're hungry. So, literally in the blink of an eye, you call up information about all the nearby restaurants. You realize, however, that you could also use some companionship so you say "friends nearby restaurants." Just then you see that a pal of yours has checked in to Fannelli Cafe in SoHo. You quickly text him and arrange to meet. When you call up directions, you get an offer for $2 off your first Guinness. All thanks to Google Glass.

No, that's not an officially sanctioned use for Google's ambitious pair of Internet-connected spectacles. In fact, Google has stressed repeatedly that there will be no ads on Google Glass. "There are no plans for advertising on this device," says a Google rep. "Were more interested in making the hardware available."

But ad execs can dream. Those who make their living via augmented reality have even more vivid dreams. For them, Google Glass isn't some weird 20% project, it's the future of advertising. "Stop thinking of [augmented reality] as a business. It's a browser," says John Havens, founder of the H(app)athon Project. "If this was 1992 and I told you there was something called a web browser that was going to change advertising, would you believe me? Yet that's what happened."

That may not be just wishful thinking. If Google Glass and its imitators take off, it could literally change the way we see the world and the way we interact with brands. Just as the Internet completely overhauled marketing over the past 20 years or so, so can the "Outernet." In the process we'll move a step away from the arms-length relationship we consumers have had with brands and a step closer to a consumer-brand mind meld.

Is this possible? Those who are bullish on Google Glass point to the revved up adoption rates of new technologies. As Flurry Analytics reported last August, smartphones have taken off 10 times faster than the 80s PC revolution, two times faster than the 90s Internet boom and three times faster than the social networking revolution. "If we go back look at how fast things are adopting lately compared to 10 to 15 years ago, we're looking at [mass adoption in] 2015 or 2016," says Andrew Couch, CEO of Candy Lab, an AR provider.

Before we explore the fever dreams of AR ad execs though, a few caveats: One is that the idea of everyone in the late 2010s walking around with Sergey Brin's favorite piece of eyewear seems a little unrealistic. Who, beyond hardcore techies, would want to sport such a look? And even if Google Glass inevitably becomes indistinguishable from regular glasses, who would want to go through life surveying the world like the Terminator? Another is that Google hasn't given out much information about Google Glass. The company plans to launch an API for the device at some point and Google is looking to include phone functions, email and calendar features, but that's about it.

For argument's sake, however, let's assume that Google Glass does take off and that it has everything advertisers are looking for. Now that the Outernet has really become a thing, how will we be carrying out our lives? How will brands inevitably colonize this new frontier? Here are a few potential scenarios:

The idea of using Google Glass to scout nearby friends for an impromptu lunch date isn't fantastical at all. In fact, the technology already exists. Last June, Facebook released a "Find Friends Nearby" feature that it quickly took down because of copyright concerns. That may not be the only reason, though. Another issue with the feature is that it could also be a tool for stalking.

But Couch says Google can get around such privacy concerns if people opt in like they do with Foursquare check-ins. And one motivation to opt in would be discounts. Imagine, for instance, if you get a third meal free if you bring two friends. As the Guinness example shows, such offers can be triggered by a search for directions. The result would be something of an ideal scenario for advertisers  getting in front of a consumer just as they're ready to buy your product or a rival product.

In their current incarnation, billboards are a blunt instrument. An ad for a female-skewing product like makeup will alienate about 50% of the population. An ad in a high-traffic area like an airport is likely to be aimed at a broad group of people who fit under the heading of "business traveler" even though you don't fit that description.

But what if the ads you saw were different than the person next to you? What if, like the ads you see online, they are based on a composite sketch of you created by all the searches you've done and the websites you've visited? In other words, what if you looked up and instead of seeing an ad for something you would never buy  like women's shoes  you saw an ad reminding you of that Amazon search you did a few days ago?

Dave Elchoness, co-founder and CEO of Tagwhat, takes the idea further: "You can even monetize vertical," he says. "You'd see something different if you look up at a 45-degree angle than you would if you look straight up." (As Havens has previously pointed out, there's currently no restriction on such "virtual air rights;" two or more brands can occupy the same space, though what you'll see depends on who you are and what technology you're using.)

Elchoness acknowledges that these kind of literally in-your-face ads may not appeal to everyone. "With the current approach, you can sort of ignore a banner ad," he says. Another obstacle is that behavioral data. Apple's iOS doesn't allow for tracking of third-party cookies, meaning that an advertiser can't follow your path on the web. Google allows for third-party tracking, but the technology is new and advertisers are still just figuring it out. Still, consumers might decide that they don't mind being tracked if they're served up more relevant ads. On the other hand, they might find the whole thing creepy.

Where does this leave traditional billboards? Likely they'd remain as they are for some time, just as newspapers coexist with the web. However, over time, they'd become less relevant and effective. After all, you don't need a physical billboard to project the AR ads that Elchoness refers to.

It's one thing to play Mario Bros., but what about living it? "What if you were Mario?" asks Couch. In this scenario, you might be walking down the street when you get an invitation to open a box or grab a medallion. Doing either allows you to earn points in a game to, say, get a free coffee at the Seattle's Best coffee shop, which happens to be just a few feet away.

As far-fetched as this may seem, Cachetown, a unit of Candy Lab, is already offering such games. However, with those you have to use your smartphone or tablet. The video below outlines how such programs work. Though it takes creative license at one point and lets the girl see the objects without a phone, tablet or Google Glass, Couch says that with Google Glass it would be pretty much the same. "Take the tablet out of that girl's hand and have [Google Glass] on her face. How much more fun would that be?"

One interesting Google Glass feature is the ability to record what you're seeing. You can shoot video with your smartphone too, of course, but recording from your eyes' vantage point will conceivably result in more professional-looking videos. So not surprisingly, Vivian Rosenthal, the founder and CEO of GoldRun, another AR firm, sees a day in which user-generated videos become more common and more useful. One possibility is that instead of a Sponsored Story, you can shoot a quick video of yourself raving about that new Toyota you bought, which can be distributed to your Facebook friends in return for a discount. (This is assuming that a rival, Facebook-friendly alternative to Google Glass emerges. Another possibility is that Google introduces a similar product for Google Plus.)

Havens also thinks that Google Glass could redefine the focus group. Instead of an antiseptic environment with two-way mirrors, Havens pictures the following vision: You and your friends are talking about that hot new HBO series. Remembering an offer you got from HBO, you ask if you can record the conversation. In return, you say, everyone will get DVD copies of the show's first season.

Of course, that treads into some murky waters. Is this still a real conversation? Are you using your friends for marketing purposes? But just as Google Glass could eventually blur the line between reality and the augmented kind, it can also ironically provide less transparency between marketing and your natural behavior. In short, once you look through Google Glass, you may never see things the same again.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Global law enforcement requests for Google user data are up more than 70% since 2009, the company said in a blog post revealing its latest Transparency Report posted Wednesday.

Google has also for the first time in this edition of its report broken down the types of legal mechanisms used by U.S. law enforcement in requesting Google user data.

From July through December of 2012, the company received a total of 8,438 user data requests in the United States, up 6% from the first half of 2012, for about 14,868 users, down 9% from the first half of 2012.

Electronic Communications Protection Act subpoenas accounted for 68% of those requests, which do not require a judge. ECPA warrants, which do require a judge and are issued when there is probable cause that user data is related to some crime, were behind 22% of requests. The other 10% were assorted ECPA court orders and "other processes that are difficult to categorize," per Google.

Google complied with 88% of the U.S. user data requests it received during that time period, the lowest compliance rate since it began posting that data at the end of 2010.

Globally, Google received 21,389 law enforcement requests for user data from 33,643 users or accounts during the second half of 2012. It complied with 66% of requests globally.

See the report for yourself here: Google Transparency Report.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Google reported its quarterly earnings yesterday, and although the company's Motorola division posted a big loss, executives pointed out that the hardware maker had a 12- to 18-month product pipeline already in place when Google acquired it in 2011. That roadmap is now nearing its end, and attention is turning to what comes after  specifically, the rumored Google X phone.

Rumors of the Google X phone began last fall when the Wall Street Journal ran a piece declaring its existence, citing "people familiar with the matter." The Google X phone is said to be the most advanced Android hardware the company could possibly make, which will "stand apart" from all other phones on the market. A Google X tablet is supposedly also in the works.

The specific features of such a device have been the subject of intense speculation since the rumors began. While everything about the phone remains unconfirmed, there have been some hints about what the key features of the Google X phone might be.

SEE ALSO: Google X Phone: Long on Mystery, Short on Details

There's a good chance Google X will be much more durable than the phones of today. Rumors about the phone center around the screen being bendable, similar to a prototype device Samsung unveiled at CES. The benefits of a "bendy" phone are questionable, but using a flexible display would result in a phone that's much more immune to shattering, unlike the relatively fragile touch screens of today.

Another source points toward an ultra-durable Google phone, and that's CEO Larry Page himself. In a lengthy interview with Wired, Page strongly suggested that device durability was of strong interest to Google.

"Theres a lot of room for innovation in hardware," Page said. "The phones we use now have glass that everyone worries will break if they drop the device. Five or 10 years from now, that will be different."

What other features might be on board the Google X phone? That's anyone's guess, but other rumors suggest extra-long battery life. That truly would be a breakthrough but probably less likely. Battery technology has only progressed incrementally in recent years, and big improvements are still likely years away. Fuel cells, which could power devices for weeks, are a possibility, but bring with them a host of new issues, such as supporting infrastructure.

The biggest problem Google faces in mobile innovation is competition. Apple, Samsung, Nokia, HTC and Research In Motion (among others) are in a never-ending race to be the first to market with any particular problem-solving feature. Some of the rumors surrounding the Google X phone included a panorama mode and better color saturation for photos, but those features have already appeared on devices like the iPhone 5.

Do you think Google X will live up to the hype? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Three people were indicted Wednesday in New York for being behind a complex international operation that used a virus called 'Gozi' to infect thousands of computers worldwide, stealing citizens' bank information.

The FBI has disclosed details of a two-and-a-half-year investigation that has led to the indictment of three Eastern Europeans: Nikita Kuzmin, Mihai Paunescu and Deniss Calovskis. The three have been charged with various counts involving bank and wire fraud, access device fraud and computer intrusion, and are facing a maximum penalty of 95, 60 and 67 years in prison, respectively.

According to the FBI, Gozi "infected at least 1 million computers worldwide and 40,000 in the U.S., and resulted in the theft or loss of tens of millions of dollars," and the virus even hit NASA computers. As potential evidence, the feds have been able to retrieve 51 servers in Romania as well as laptops, desktops and external hard drives. The data seized amounts to 250 terabytes  or 250 million megabytes.

The criminal operation started somewhere in 2005 when Kuzmin, a Russian citizen, developed a virus named Gozi with the help of a programmer he hired to write the code. The virus was first spotted in Europe in 2007 and started infecting American computers in 2010.

The malicious software, which was delivered by various means, including infected PDF files, was designed to steal bank account log-in information and send it back to a server operated by Kuzmin, who could then access the victims' bank accounts and siphon off money.

Kuzmin not only designed the malware, he's also accused of marketing and distributing it through online criminal channels. Initially, according to the FBI, he rented it for a weekly fee. A customer who wanted to use Gozi would be granted access to the server for a limited time, based on the rental terms.

Since he "marketed Gozi as a rent-a-virus, Kuzmins customers didnt need the level of computer savvy he and his co-conspirators had," reads a prepared statement by George Venizelos, the FBI's assistant director in charge of the New York field office. "Instead of 'This Gun for Hire,' Kuzmins operation was 'This Virus for Hire.'"

Then, in 2009, Kuzmin started selling the source code for $50,000 and a cut of any eventual profits the customer would make. In November 2010, however, Kuzmin was arrested and started cooperating with the authorities after pleading guilty to federal charges. It was with Kuzmin's help that the FBI reached Paunescu, a Romanian citizen, and Calovskis, who is from Latvia. They have both been arrested in their respective countries and are now awaiting extradition to the U.S.

Paunescu, also knowns as "Virus," is accused of operating a so called bullet-proof hosting service, which provided criminals with safe IP addresses and servers that protected their anonimity. His service, the FBI notes, was used for many more malware and DDoS operations, not just Gozi.

Calovskis, who went by the name "Miami," was purportedly hired by Kuzmin to develop "web injects." His injects modified how a particular banking site would appear to a victim in order to trick them into providing even more personal information like his or her date of birth, Social Security number, and ATM card pin.

SEE ALSO: Mystery Online Theft Operation 'Red October' is Winding Down

Paunescu and Calovskis are just two of an unknown number of cooperators who worked on a complex cybercriminal operation that not only consisted in marketing the virus but also giving support to clients and updating the malware constantly to avoid detection by antiviruses.

According to an FBI complaint obtained by Wired, federal officials got to Kuzmin thanks to some Jabber chats they obtained through a warrant. In one of the conversations, a user identified as Kuzmin tries to convince a client to buy his virus over a competing one. "Take my trojan," he wrote. "Mine is much cooler, it doesnt get burned by proactives [a detection method used by antivirus software] and works with win7 and vista.

In other chats, he refers to personal information like the car he's using, his bank account and his email address, which led authorities to his social media profile on the Russian website Youdo.ru and helped them confirm his identity.

In a chat on Nov. 19, 2010, Kuzmin revealed a trip to Thailand, after which he would go "somewhere else and get lost. Authorities were later able to spot him in the States by reviewing U.S. immigration and customs records. That's when he was arrested in San Francisco.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Banning sex offenders from using social media networks like Facebook is unconstitutional, according to a federal court.

The 7th U.S. Circuit Court of Appeals in Chicago struck down an Indiana law passed in 2008 that prohibited certain sex offenders from accessing and using social media networks, if those sites were used by minors. The judges held that such a prohibition was a "blanket ban" that went too far by restricting free speech.

The law "broadly prohibits substantial protected speech rather than specifically targeting the evil of improper communications to minors," the judges wrote in the ruling, according to the Associated Press. "The goal of deterrence does not license the state to restrict far more speech than necessary to target the prospective harm."

A federal judge previously upheld the law, ruling that it was "narrowly tailored" enough that it didn't infringe on the first amendment rights of those convicted of sex offenses. The law was initially challenged by an Indiana resident who claimed it would restrict his free speech rights, forbid him from checking his children's online accounts, advertise his business, and connect with friends and family.

The decision was applauded by Hanni Fakhoury, an attorney with the online rights advocacy group Electronic Frontier Foundation. Fakhoury noted in these cases, even if there are "very compelling interests in protecting children," sometimes the law goes too far.

"The real problem is the methods by which governments are doing it to kind of protect minors from online predators, if you will, are far far far too expansive and not really narrowly tailored to the purpose that they're ostensibly enacting these laws for, he told Mashable.

The Indiana law tackles the same issues as California's Proposition 35. The Californians Against Sexual Exploitation Act required anyone who is registered as sex offender  which includes those convicted of minor offenses like indecent exposure  to turn over to law enforcement all their online identities, basically prohibiting them from posting online anonymously or with a pseudonym.

On January 12, a judge halted the enforcement of the law, considering it too broad. "The government may not regulate expression in such a manner that a substantial portion of the burden on speech does not serve to advance its goals, he wrote.

"I think it's good that judges are being kind of critical with what's going on and saying that governments need to really dig in and do some work and narrowly tailor these types of laws so that they don't enact blanket prohibition that prohibit a whole class of people from being able to speak online, said Fakhoury, who worked on the California case on behalf of the EFF and has also penned an op-ed on Wired, explaining why they are defending the online free speech rights of sex offenders.

The American Civil Liberties Union, which filed the suit along with the Indiana resident, argued that even though the rest of the web would be accessible to these type of sex offenders, social media networks are now indispensable in our digital lives, and that the ban would prevent them from using Facebook or other websites for legitimate uses.

"Indiana already has a law on the books that prohibits inappropriate sexual contacts with children," including penalties for online activities, the ACLU legal director Ken Falk told the Associated Press. "This law sought to criminalize completely innocent conduct that has nothing to do with children."

Apart from the laws in Indiana and California, other states like Nebraska and Louisiana have tried to enact similar regulations and have already encountered opposition in the courts. The one in Nebraska was partially struck down last October, while in Louisiana, the legislators had to pass a narrower statute.

"There is certainly a growing chorus of concern over the constitutional problems of these type of laws," Fakhoury said.

SEE ALSO: Imprisoned Sex Offenders Banned From Facebook
--------------------------------------------------------------
A portable wand that uses Near-Infrared (NIR) technology can detect hemorrhaging in the brain and help medical professionals assess if a person needs a CT scan or surgery.

The Infrascanner Model 2000 looks like a large remote control and can be held against the head to determine if a person might have brain hemorrhaging. The device can spot the difference between normal brain tissue and hematomas using infrared light absorption. It doesn't take the place of CT scans, but can be used to monitor head trauma patients or assess people at the scene of an accident.

The device was recently approved by the FDA for military and civilian use.

The company suggests it could be used for monitoring hospital patients with head injuries; people intoxicated with drugs or alcohol; or screening players of sports like boxing, football, soccer and rugby, where head injuries might occur.

The Infrascanner Model 2000 was designed like the previous model, the Infrascanner Model 1000, with specifications from the U.S. Marine Corps. The new model includes a few key changes including being powered by two AA batteries in addition to a rechargeable battery pack, plus it's more durable.

Each year 1.5 million people sustain a new traumatic brain injury, and more than 5 million Americans live with long-term disability due to traumatic brain injury, notes the National Institutes of Health.

Do you think the Infrascanner Model 2000 could save lives if used at the scene of an accident? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Intel will stop making desktop PC motherboards after the next generation of its chip technology arrives, the company has announced. The fourth-generation Core processors, codenamed "Haswell," will be the last line of chips for which Intel will build desktop motherboards, and it will fully wind down the business over the next three years.

To clarify, Intel is halting the manufacturing of motherboards  the component of a PC that holds the CPU, RAM and connectivity elements  not desktop processors themselves. Various manufacturers  such as Asus and Gigabyte  will continue to make desktop motherboards, AnandTech reports, and enthusiasts who build their own PCs already have many third-party suppliers to choose from.

Still, the move can only be interpreted as an acknowledgment that desktop PCs are dying off (a key trend my colleague Lance Ulanoff predicted for 2013). The desktop market has been declining for years, mirroring the shrinking of the overall PC market as consumers shift their digital lives to smartphones and tablets.

SEE ALSO: Google: Desktops Will Be Irrelevant in Three Years' Time

However, recent numbers show demand for desktop computers hasn't declined as fast as the demand for PCs in general, according to reports from research groups Gartner and NPD. The desktop market is likely being helped by the rise of all-in-one designs such as Apple's iMac. Also, the laptop market has been hurt by the implosion of netbooks, the mild demand for ultra-thin designs and the public's lukewarm reaction to Windows 8.

Besides weak desktop-PC demand, Intel has other reasons for halting its desktop motherboard business. The trend in chip design  particularly at Intel  is toward system-on-a-chip (SoC) designs, with the CPU, RAM and graphics all on one chip. In addition, the market for motherboards has consolidated to a few very competent manufacturers, and the need for Intel to introduce a "reference" design is less necessary.

Finally, there's the most obvious reason: The margins are thin on the products, and it's difficult to make money on them. As Intel gears up to expand its presence on mobile devices with its Atom processors, getting out of low-performing businesses should improve its focus.

Will you miss Intel's desktop PC motherboards? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Who's got it better than us? Screech!

Long before Jim Harbaugh became head coach of the San Francisco 49ers and his rah-rah locker room slogan became an unavoidable catchphrase here in the Bay Area, the coach delivered a motivational pep talk to a different group of young men  characters from the show Saved by the Bell: The New Class.

Harbaugh was quarterback for the Indianapolis Colts when he appeared in the 1996 episode playing himself as an older, cooler cousin of the legendary Screech.

The clip above first hit YouTube in early December, but is definitely worth sharing again as Jim prepares to face off against older brother John  head coach of the Baltimore Ravens  in Super Bowl XLVII on Feb. 3.

Harbaugh told the San Francisco Chronicle that meeting ol' Screech was a seminal lifetime moment that has been hard equal.

"Its a highlight," he said. "Everythings been downhill since then.

Somehow, we suspect a Super Bowl win in two weeks would bump Screech down the list.

How would you rate Harbaugh's performance? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
UPDATE: You can now watch the full lyric video of "Suit & Tie" here.

A lyric video for Justin Timberlake's "Suit & Tie" will premiere Thursday at 6 a.m. EST on MTV, mtvU and MTV Hits, but you can watch a sneak peek of the lyric video right here.

The song featuring Jay-Z recently broke airplay records and globally charted atop iTunes top-selling singles rankings in its debut week.

Timberlake had teased a musical comeback this month only several days before releasing the song on iTunes on the same night as the Golden Globes.

In conjunction with the release, he put this letter on Countdown.JustinTimberlake.com:

I hope this gets to you the right way. It's the only way I know to do it. Some people may criticize me for the last 3 days. But it was fun, right?? Right?!?! Besides, I'd rather speak directly to all of you. And, who can knock me for having a little bit of fun with it? Well... No more teasing. Although, it was A LOT of fun. (Did I mention that I'm having fun with this?? Ha!) This year is an exciting one for me. As you probably have heard through the "grapevine," I'm gearing up for a big 2013. Back in June of last year, I quietly started working on what is now, my next journey with that thing I love called MUSIC. The inspiration for this really came out of the blue and to be honest, I didn't expect anything out of it. I just went into the studio and started playing around with some sounds and songs. It was probably the best time I've had in my career... Just creating with no rules and/or end goal in mind and really enjoying the process. What I came up with is something I couldn't be more excited about! It is full of inspiration that I grew up listening to and some newfound muses that I've discovered along the way. I'm calling it "The 20/20 Experience," and it's coming out this year. I hope you enjoy listening to it as much as I enjoyed making it. That's all I'm giving you for now... I know, I know! Again, with the teasing!!! Get ready. This is going to be fun (well, at least it is for me).
--------------------------------------------------------------
I stubbed my toe last week. It really hurt. There wasn't any blood or broken skin that I could see  but, rest assured, I cursed out the edge of that coffee table with all the energy I could muster.

Everyone handles pain in different ways. Some, ahem, cringe when running into furniture; others take punches to the face without even flinching. But there's one type of pain, above all else, that's inarguably the worst: giving birth. Mothers understand it, men never will. And that's that. Simple.

Dennis Storm and Valerio Zeno, hosts of the Dutch TV show Guinea Pigs, weren't quite buying that idea. The pair underwent an electro-simulation of labor pains to see for themselves what it felt like. Both men had four electrodes strapped to their abdomens and, over a two-hour period, were administered intermittent electrical shocks to simulate contractions.

The result? Not so pretty. At first, the two are able to laugh off the initial pains. Around the 4:30 mark, though, the agony sets in.

In the end, both seem to have changed their minds. "It was torture for me," says an exhausted-looking Zeno. "I don't know if I dare make my wife pregnant."

SEE ALSO: This Is the Best Soda Drinking Simulator You'll Play All Week

Watch it for yourself above. (It's in Dutch, but you can click the "CC" icon in the lower right side of the screen for English captions.)

And, sincerely, hats off to women everywhere. I'll take toe-stubbing over this any day.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The "largest and oldest" collection of natural sounds in the world is now digital and available online, Cornell University announced.

The Macaulay Library at the Cornell Lab of Ornithology houses a scientific archive of biodiversity audio and video recordings. Previously in analog format, the recordings  which go back to 1929  are now completely digitized, and can be heard at MacaulayLibrary.org.

"In terms of speed and the breadth of material now accessible to anyone in the world, this is really revolutionary," Greg Budney, Macaulay's audio curator, said in a statement.

It took archivists 12 years to finish digitizing the collection, which has nearly 150,000 audio recordings that run a total of 7,513 hours, according to Cornell. The library features 9,000 species, including mostly birds, as well as whales, elephants, frogs and primates.

Listen to a sampling of fascinating sounds, selected by the Macaulay Library, below:
--------------------------------------------------------------
Streaming live on Mashable, PerBlue founder Justin Beck will answer questions from readers at 3 p.m. EST (12 p.m. PST) Thursday, Jan. 24. As part of the Young Entrepreneur Councils #StartupLab initiative, a virtual mentorship program, Beck will appear live via video chat broadcast on this site.

Justin Beck is the co-founder and CEO of PerBlue, a mobile and social gaming company in Madison, Wis. The company is best known for its flagship product, Parallel Kingdom, the first location-based RPG. Beck is a passionate software developer and entrepreneur. As CEO, Beck has grown PerBlue from a group of five college friends to a team of 40 full-time employees.

Prior to starting PerBlue, Beck held software engineer and program manager positions at Microsoft and Google. He graduated from the University of Wisconsin with degrees in computer engineering and computer science.

#StartupLab is a free virtual mentorship program created by The Young Entrepreneur Council (YEC), an invite-only organization comprised of hundreds of Americas most successful young entrepreneurs. #StartupLab takes YEC's mission to help more people start successful businesses to the next level by offering millions of entrepreneurs direct access to YEC members through interactive video chats, email lessons and a library of how-to articles, videos and eBooks. Whether you're just starting up, a current business owner, or you run an organization that supports entrepreneurs, sign up for #StartupLab today for real-world advice from some of the coolest entrepreneurs on the planet.

Check Mashable tomorrow afternoon at 3 p.m. EST (12 p.m. PST), when Justin will answer questions from the audience live via video chat.

You can also sign up for an email reminder of the chat by visiting this registration page
--------------------------------------------------------------
London's transit agency, Transportation for London, announced the rollout of contactless credit card readers on all of the city's 8,500 buses last month, allowing riders to charge their bus fare directly to their bank accounts.

Previously, Londoners had the option of paying a discounted fare with a prepaid Oyster card or handing over an extra pound and paying in cash. Now, anyone with one of Britain's 30 million contactless credit cards can avoid being one of the daily 36,000 people who "[dash] to board a bus only to discover that [their] Oyster card has run out of credit" and then have to "scrabble for change" and pay a higher fare, as London's Mayor Boris Johnson press release explained. Transportation for London expects that Londoners will be able to use this technology on the underground Tube and aboveground trams by the end of 2013.

In theory, this is exciting news for London commuters who loathe change-scrabbling, but even more so for credit card companies, who will now ostensibly have access to data about where and when people are traveling to different parts of the city. In practice, however, this will be an interesting test case for the future of contactless payments in public transportation systems, particularly in the U.S.

Will public transit riders really use contactless credit cards enough to meaningfully change the way that people pay for their transportation? And what can and will credit card companies do with the resulting data?

To answer these questions, a quick primer in credit-card speak is necessary. First, because contactless credit cards don't require a pin number or signature  or even the time it takes to remove the card from a wallet  the "contactless" part is only usable for small purchases: The limit is 20 in the UK and $20 in the U.S. Each card has an embedded chip which detects card readers without having to be tapped or swiped, as long as they are only one or two inches away.

The chip technology that enables contactless purchases was created as part of a wider effort by Eurocard, Mastercard, and Visa to do away with magnetic strip credit cards; according to proponents of the technology, "EMV" chip-based cards are more secure than regular cards and could eventually carry multiple applications, like having a credit and debit card function on one card. (The broader set of 'contactless' technologies fall into the realm of near-field communication, often abbreviated as NFC.)

Figuring out how widely used contactless cards is tough. According to the UK Card Association, more than 30 million contactless credit cards had been issued in the country by the end of September 2012, and, not counting London's 8,500 newly-updated buses, more than 135,000 payment terminals have been installed. A report released in May by an independent research firm, though, indicated that only 5% of Brits have ever made a contactless payment, and millions of credit card users were "unsure" about whether their card had the technology.

Though Visa tried to spark the contactless revolution during the 2012 Summer Olympics, the results were limp: The company admitted that only 150,000 purchases had been made with contactless cards during the Games. Moreover, according to a survey conducted by an ATM operating company, 55% of Brits indicated that payment hiccups during the 2012 Games made them less likely to support a "cashless economy," which is exactly the future that many contactless card proponents envision.

In the United States, the story of contactless credit cards has unfolded a bit differently, and it doesn't seem likely that New York or D.C. are going to roll out direct credit card payments on buses or underground rail systems any time soon.

Card companies and banks have introduced test markets for contactless cards in a few areas, like New York City, Atlanta and Denver, and card companies report that millions of cards with contactless capabilities have been issued. But of the more than 5 million businesses in the United States, only 30,000 have the equipment required to accept contactless payments.

While the penetration of EMV chip technology has been slow in Europe, it has been even slower in the United States, and over the past year or so, almost every major credit card company has released an official plan of action for jumpstarting the use of the technology.

The bright future credit card companies see in contactless payments could be cut short by the rapidly developing mobile payments market, which tech gurus like Marc Andreessen see as a huge area for future growth.

In countries outside of the U.S., this has certainly been the case: In just four years, 80% of people in Kenya started using mobile payments services, provided mostly by phone companies  how's that for growth? According to the Communications Commission of Kenya, the number of mobile payments users has continued to rise in large part because of the lack of financial services in the country, providing an alternative form of banking for lower-income Kenyans.

Here in the U.S., companies like Square, which sells a unique card reader that can automatically detect and take payments from any mobile device with its app, have also been making a splash in the market, albeit not in Kenyan proportions. In November, Square announced via Twitter that it now sees more than $10 billion dollars in transactions being made through the service. That does not even include the transactions that will be generated thanks to the company's new deal with Starbucks.

But for now, the idea that contactless payments would become mainstream enough to be used for public transportation is still far-fetched. Although London officials have tested out mobile payment prototypes for the underground several times, none have taken hold. The most recent effort was rejected because the NFC technology it used was deemed too slow.

In the mobile gadgets world, debates have raged about NFC, which uses radio waves to let devices  like two smart phones, or, potentially, a smart phone and a digital cash register of some sort  communicate instantly. Critics say the technology does not improve efficiency enough to gain widespread popularity, and unless it is used in a broad ecosystem of consumers and businesses, it won't make noticeable changes in the mobile payments space.

Perhaps there's a future for Silicon Valley companies like Square in San Francisco's public transportation system (which happens to be in particular need of technology overhaul), but it's a future that will likely take a long time to come. In the fall of 2011, New Jersey Transit became one of the first transit authorities in the U.S. to accept Google Wallet and other forms of contactless payment at certain bus stations, which expanded to the Port Authority in 2012.

According to a spokesperson, they see around 10,000 contactless "taps" per month, which could be payments for single or multi-fare transactions. But across 12 rail lines, 260 bus routes and three light rail systems, NJ Transit serves just under 900,000 customers per day. While they are in "testing phases related to contactless payments," a full-scale roll-out is a distant possibility. (Excitingly, Boston has just introduced a new system of mobile ticketing.)

Regardless of the path that U.S. mass transit systems ultimately take to make their payment systems more efficient, those changes seem to be in everyone's best interest. In a perfect world, in which a contactless or mobile payments ecosystem has been well-established, these kinds of payment systems would significantly decrease the inefficiencies of current fare systems. Costs associated with operations like producing and maintaining card machines and even transporting and counting hundreds of thousands of coins every day would be virtually eliminated.

And what might make capturing those efficiencies more attractive? The amount of data that could be gathered and directed toward targeted marketing is staggering. According to 2011 data from the U.S. Census Bureau, the average public transportation user spends 95.4 minutes commuting every day, and this represents only a percentage of the total time Americans spend on buses, trains and underground rail.

If even a small chunk of riders started using contactless cards or mobile payments to pay for the bus, credit card companies or start-ups like Square would gain access to daily information about when and where their customers are traveling. Harnessed correctly, this kind of data could be used to tailor advertising to fit a subway rider's morning commute perfectly  who wouldn't use a coupon for coffee at the Cosi near Dupont Circle if it popped up on their phone as they exited the metro?

Of course, this kind of "secondary use" of consumer data raises red flags about privacy concerns. In some ways, the interests of a private credit card or mobile payments company would be aligned with that of the bus rider. In a perfect world, companies could provide riders with more tailored and relevant information (i.e. advertising) about the world around them.

Then, again, the world of targeted marketing hasn't always been perfect. One can imagine ways in which uses for this kind of location data would not align company and consumer interests, which is somewhat more problematic.

In a conversation with Ryan Calo, a law professor at the University of Washington and privacy expert, he pointed out that if companies use information about how people ride public transportation against them, say to create a system of price discrimination so that coffee at Cosi is more expensive during the hours of the bleary-eyed commute, that would constitute a kind of harm to the consumer.

The online world "is a mediated environment, in that there's a layer between what you do and your experience," Calo said. But when this kind of data use "begins to spread to the offline world...[it] blurs the distinction that we have between the online world and the brick and mortar world."

This highlights the important distinction between "push" versus "pull" data transactions, to borrow email terms for a moment. If we automatically give up ever more information about our location and traveling habits every time we ride the bus, then morning commutes become just one more space in which profitable information about our private lives becomes thoughtlessly available to private companies who might not have our best interests in mind.

Despite these cautions, there are responsible ways to deploy more efficient public transit payment systems, especially if consumers are aware of how their information could be used if they choose the convenience of a contactless or mobile swipe. But at this point, at least in the United States, this potential is a long way from being realized  the technology market is too fractured to support a major shift in the way we pay for the bus any time soon.

This article originally published at The Atlantic here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Unfortunately your browser does not support IFrames.

Manti Te'o continued to perpetuate the myth that he led Notre Dame to within one win of a national championship in the wake of his girlfriend's death for weeks after he found out that the woman in question didn't actually exist.

In an interview with ABC's Katie Couric, the controversial football star admitted that he learned of the deception in December but was too embarrassed to come clean.

"Katie, put yourself in my situation," Te'o said.

Te'o's story of love and loss with "Lennay Kekua" captured the hearts and minds of hardcore and casual sports fans alike last fall, helping propagate Te'o's image as a paragon of virtue and character as he became a football superstar and Heisman Trophy contender. Last week it was revealed that Kekua was nothing but a hoax, an elaborate "catfishing" scam cobbled together by using images from an oblivious woman's social media profiles.

After the bizarre con was uncovered, debate raged about whether Te'o was an unwitting victim of the scam or a conniving accomplice.

He told Couric that he was legitimately in love with Kekua despite never having met her in person (though Sports Illustrated reported in the fall that the pair had first met after a game at Stanford a few years prior). He said he learned the truth in early December, just days before the Heisman Trophy ceremony, where he would be faced with intense media attention and more questions about her death. There was too much scrutiny and pressure then to come clean, he claimed.

You can watch more clips from the ABC News interview here.

Do you believe Te'o? If you had been in his situation, what would you have done? Give us your take in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
McDonald's is launching a new global packaging design that uses QR codes to give consumers nutritional information about their food. It is the latest brand to promote informed decisions about health, as Coca-Cola made headlines last week for an ad that aims to tackle obesity.

The designs will be featured on all carry-out bags and fountain beverage cups, communicating "brand stories" and delivering facts with a mix of text and illustrations. If the QR codes are anything like the Trackmymacca app in Australia, they could also include information about where the food comes from.

"Our new packaging is designed to engage with customers in relevant ways and celebrate our brand, " said Kevin Newell, McDonald's chief brand officer. "Customers tell us they want to know more about the food they are eating and we want to make that as easy as possible by putting this information right at their fingertips."

McDonald's gathered consumer input on these new designs and consulted its Global Advisory Council, who emphasized the importance of providing access to nutrition information and support using the packaging to connect customers to facts about menu items.

The new packaging designs launched last week in the U.S. and will roll out worldwide throughout the year. The text is offered in 18 different languages.

This article originally published at PSFK here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Children of the '90s, take out your pogs, slap bracelets and Tamagotchis, and get ready to have your heartstrings pulled.

Microsoft has posted a video on YouTube promoting "the new Internet Explorer" that takes a delightful trip down memory lane and trust us, you'll be glad you sat through all 1:41 minutes of it.

The clip has all the makings of a viral success, thanks to so many visual throwbacks tied to modern-day advancements.

It takes you through a journey of what was popular 20 years ago and shows how the times have evolved. Example: Remember when trolls were in doll form with hot pink hair, instead of a nickname for someone who stirs the pot on the Internet?

"You might not remember us, but we met in the '90s," the ad says. "We are members of Generation Y. As in Ying Yang, yo-yo ... life moved a little slower. Disks were square, desktop folders had personality and extra storage space was just a zipper away. There was only one social network, but most of your friends died of dysentery."

The ad comes beautifully full circle: "The future was bright," it continues. "You grew up ... so did we. Reconnect with the new Internet Explorer."

SEE ALSO: 50 Things Replaced by Modern Technology

Check out the video and let us know what you think in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Scientists with NASA's planet-hunting Kepler spacecraft have revamped the mission's online archive of alien worlds, opening up the database for the entire world to see.

Researchers are now posting all exoplanet sightings by the Kepler observatory into a single, comprehensive website called the NASA Exoplanet Archive. Instead of going through the long planet confirmation process before making data publicly available, since December of last year, scientists have started shoveling out all the data Kepler collects into a comprehensive list.

"When we make that list, right away it goes to the archive," Kepler mission team member Steve Howell told SPACE.com during the 221st American Astronomical Society meeting in Long Beach, Calif., this month. "So the day we know about the list, the archive knows about the list. And then everybody, including us, can work on that list. But that list is dynamic so if we, or a community person, makes an observation and says, 'Hey, I looked at this planet candidate but it's really an eclipsing binary,' then that entry in the archive will be changed."

The archive has information about the size, orbital period and other metrics of any possible planet discovered and investigated by Kepler.

SEE ALSO: Gallery: A World of Kepler Planets

"It's all in real time," Howell said. "The sausage-making process is exposed."

Before the new archive was debuted, astronomers were already doing creative work with the data. One created a visually stunning video of every known Kepler planet candidate  2,299 unconfirmed exoplanets at the time  orbiting one central point.

The Kepler teams new "open" attitude toward data release is giving everybody, not just members of the scientific community, a chance to do some hands-on scientific research by building their own experiments, Howell said.

A group of high school students has already taken data from groups of planets observed by Kepler and mapped them against a map of known stars looking for a pattern. Howell doesnt think they'll see much, but he's glad that they have the opportunity to get creative.

"The entire world can help us with this Kepler data," Howell said. "I don't see any downside."

Planet Hunters, a collective of amateur astronomers, recently found 42 new alien planets using Kepler data that was publicly available prior to the launch of the new archive system.

It would be difficult for Kepler scientists to get their jobs done without the help of amateur astronomers around the globe, mission researchers said. By making the exoplanet archive more accessible, it could mean that more planets are found and confirmed in shorter amounts of time than ever before.

More people sifting through the wealth of data collected by Kepler means that scientists have a better chance of finding even more planets circling distant stars, Howell added.

Since its launch in 2009, NASA's Kepler spacecraft has flagged more than 2,300 objects as possible alien worlds. Although only about 100 have been confirmed, scientists expect that at least 80% could be certifiable exoplanets.

Currently, Kepler has entered a "safe mode" after researchers spotted an issue with one of the spacecraft's three reaction wheels that are responsible for orienting the telescope. The malfunction has stalled science observations, but researchers hope that the issue will be resolved by Jan. 27.

This article originally published at Space.com here
--------------------------------------------------------------
NASA is unveiling a new documentary film about the history of Mars exploration today to an audience in the Los Angeles area, and there's a chance the movie could eventually get distributed nationally.

"The Changing Face of Mars" premieres tonight at 8 p.m. PST at the California Institute of Technology's Beckman Auditorium in Pasadena. Admission is free, with seating on a first-come, first-served basis.

The 90-minute documentary, which was produced by NASA's Jet Propulsion Laboratory (JPL), chronicles humanity's efforts to explore the Red Planet, from the first flyby in 1965 by NASA's Mariner 4 probe to the current work being done on the Martian surface by the agency's car-size Curiosity rover.

Reminders of those two bookend missions will be on display at the premiere, which will feature a full-scale Curiosity replica and the historic "first image" of Mars  a hand-drawn color portrait put together in 1965 using data beamed home by Mariner 4.

One aim of "The Changing Face of Mars" is to highlight and preserve the contributions of the 1960s-era pioneers, who blazed a trail to the Red Planet that engineers at NASA and other space agencies are still following today.

"They didn't know how to build a spacecraft; it had never been done before. There was no one they could turn to to ask how to build a spacecraft," said writer/director/producer Blaine Baggett, who heads JPL's office of communication and education.

"So I just have a tremendous respect and appreciation for those who came before, and I'm bound and determined to capture their memories and experiences so we have them, before they're lost for good," Baggett told SPACE.com.

"The Changing Face of Mars" is the fourth installment in Baggett's ongoing series "Beginnings of the Space Age." None of the titles are available nationally at the moment, though Baggett said discussions about a possible deal to distribute all four are underway.

Baggett hopes the series includes eight or nine films eventually.

"There are four or five more films, if I can last out and they keep me here that long," he said.

This article originally published at Space.com here
--------------------------------------------------------------
A small NASA space telescope has revealed surprising magnetic braids of super-hot matter in the sun's outer atmosphere, a find that may explain the star's mysteriously hot corona, researchers say.

The discovery, made by NASA's High-Resolution Coronal Imager, or Hi-C, also may lead to better space weather forecasts, the scientists added.

"With potential annual economic impacts of tens to hundreds of billions of dollars domestically during periods of high solar activity, accurate forecasts of the local space weather environment can possibly save billions for power systems, commercial aircraft and a number of other economic sectors," said study author Jonathan Cirtain, who led the Hi-C sun corona mission.

Cirtain, a solar astrophysicist at NASA's Marshall Space Flight Center, Huntsville, Ala., and his team launched the 9.5-inch (24 centimeters) telescope last July on a 10-minute flight just beyond Earth's atmosphere to study the corona, the sun's million-degree outer atmosphere. The telescope snapped 165 photos in stunning detail before parachuting back to Earth.

SEE ALSO: NASA's Hi-C Photos: Best View Ever of Sun's Corona

The surface of the sun is unsurprisingly hot, up to 11,000 degrees Fahrenheit (6,125 degrees Celsius). Bizarrely, however, the corona  the outer atmosphere far above the sun's surface  is hotter by a thousandfold, even in the absence of solar flares.

Scientists recently found that powerful magnetic waves rippling from below the sun's surface may heat the corona by 2.7 million degrees F (1.5 million degrees C). However, that alone would not account for the corona's ultra-hot temperatures.

Now high-resolution images of the sun's corona support the idea of magnetic braids generating tremendous amounts of heat, possibly enough to explain the readings of up to 10.8 million degrees F (6 million degrees C).

To picture these magnetic structures on the sun, "imagine a French braid in someone's hair," Cirtain told SPACE.com. "Bundles of individual hairs are wrapped about other bundles and together form a braided ensemble of hair.

"What we have observed is a bundle of magnetic fields, wrapped about several other bundles to form a magnetic bundle ensemble. The magnetic fields in this ensemble have varying lengths, and the rate of curvature along individual field lines may also vary such that some fields are very highly curved while others are less so."

SEE ALSO: Sun Quiz: How Well Do You Know Our Star?

These magnetic fields are physically manifested within the super-hot plasma making up the sun. For instance, very highly curved magnetic fields can take the form of coronal loops, giant arches rising from the sun.

"When a magnetic field becomes highly curved, it eventually becomes unstable," Cirtain said. Eventually these magnetic braids can grow unstable enough for individual magnetic field lines of force to interact within them. This phenomenon, known as reconnection, decreases the curvature of the magnetic field, releasing potentially vast amounts of energy that can heat plasma or accelerate solar flares and other massive outbursts.

While astronomers have seen magnetic braids on the surface of the sun, until now they had little way to see how common the braids were in the corona. To glimpse the magnetic braids, the NASA team launched the Hi-C telescope on a sounding rocket in July. It captured images of the corona with a resolution about five times higher than previously achieved.

The low-budget mission was filled with uncertainties. For instance, the mirror used in the telescope is so smooth that, across its 9.5-inch width, it deviates from perfect smoothness by only a few widths of an atom. There was every chance that mechanical stresses, temperatures changes and other factors before and during the mission could warp its surface, reducing its quality.

"We would only know if it worked once we had flown and taken the images of the sun," Cirtain said. "This lack of control of the situation kept me up many nights."

The telescope captured only five minutes of video data before re-entering Earth's atmosphere. Still, that was enough to discover magnetic braids in the corona, and the amount of activity seen suggested vast amounts of energy can be released there.

The researchers, who detail their findings in the Jan. 24 issue of the journal Nature, conceded it is possible the braids they saw were not bundles of magnetic fields but sets of many nested magnetic loops overlying and underlying each other. If so, they would store less energy than estimated. Even so, however, the corona would still hold 100 times the energy needed to be super-heated.

"My life for the better part of a decade went into this instrument, and seeing it work was exciting not only for me but for my family and for my close colleagues," Cirtain said.

The researchers hope to launch their telescope in an orbital satellite to observe the corona longer.

This article originally published at Space.com here
--------------------------------------------------------------
When's the last time you wrote someone a letter? Not typed, not dictated, wrote  with a pen or pencil. Yeah, we thought so. So in honor of Wednesday, National Handwriting Day, we thought we'd provide some inspiration.

First of all, why is it National Handwriting Day? It's the birthday of John Hancock, the first to sign the Declaration of Independence. His signature became so famous, as you probably have heard, that his name is now shorthand for any old person's signature.

Think about how much you use the written word in your daily life. Chances are, much of your day is spent typing on a keyboard or tapping letters on a virtual keyboard while texting. Not much time to show off your lovely handwriting. In fact many of us complain our handwriting has gotten worse, due to lack of practice.

To celebrate the handwritten word, Moleskine, the classic notebook brand, is inviting fans to write their Facebook and Twitter status updates instead of typing them on a keyboard. 

 

 



After you uncramp your hand from writing, upload the image of your handwritten status to Instagram with the hashtag #mHDay (for Moleskine Handwriting Day). It will then get added to a gallery on the Moleskine Facebook page.

 

Take a look at these images from the gallery. If you get really inspired, why not write someone a letter or a love note? Whatever it is, make sure it's written, not typed  just for today.

What will you be writing today?
--------------------------------------------------------------
Netflix's stock rose 25% in after-hours trading after the company beat revenue estimates for its fiscal fourth quarter and announced it added 2 million domestic streaming subscribers in the quarter.

The company posted revenues of $1 billion for the quarter and earnings per share of $0.13, compared to the street's average estimate of $935 million and $0.13, respectively. The company now claims 27 million domestic streaming subscribers. The quarter also saw an additional 1.8 million international streaming customers for a total of 10 million, though the international operation is not yet profitable.

In contrast, domestic streaming turned a profit of $109 million for the quarter. DVD subscriptions continued to lose ground. About 380,000 DVD subscribers left in the quarter, bringing the total to 8.2 million. That's a far cry from the 11 million DVD subscriptions Netflix claimed in the fourth quarter.

The company claimed it got a boost towards the end of the year. "Our holiday season was particularly strong, driven by consumers buying new electronic devices, including tablets and smart TVs," CEO Reed Hastings and CFO David Wells wrote in a letter to shareholders.

Making a case for Netflix's viability in the face of competition from Amazon, Hulu and Redbox, they noted that of Netflix's top 100 TV shows and top 100 movies, Amazon had just 73. Hulu, meanwhile, had 27. Redbox had 12. The two were also optimistic about the current quarter, which will see the debut of House of Cards, an original series. Financially, the company predicts a "relatively flat" increase in its operating profit in the fiscal first quarter.
--------------------------------------------------------------
From Instagram star Snoopy to Facebook personality Colonel Meow, the Interwebz loves its felines.

One man in New Zealand clearly doesn't share the sentiment, since he's putting out a nationwide call to eradicate cats. Maybe he's just never had his heart melt at the sight of Maru in a box.

Why would anyone wish such a horrible thing? According to Gareth Morgan, a New Zealand businessman, a cat-free country would bring bird songs back to cities and improve native bird life. Check out his infographic below explaining why they're so awful (complete with a cartoon cat that says, "I Love to Kill!").

SEE ALSO: 5 Kids Who Will Never Like Cats

On Twitter, Morgan created #catstogo to spread the campaign, but parody account @NotGarethMorgan provides hilarious insight into what might really be going on in Morgan's head.

New Zealand has the most cat owners in the world with 1.419 million Kiwi kitties, says a study by the country's Companion Animal Council. As a result of the large numbers, the cats pose a threat to native birds and have already contributed to the extinction of nine species on the island.

Aside from getting a bell for your pet, neutering it and keeping it inside, Morgan encourages people to "make this cat your last."

What would Grumpy Cat say?





Learn more about the damage cats do to our wildlife in New Zealand

BONUS: Awww, 6 Kids Who Will Grow Up to Be Cat Lovers
--------------------------------------------------------------
It's a good thing the NHL is finally back in action, because otherwise we never would have been presented with this mystery of the universe. As the video above shows, a hockey puck apparently escaped the rink to somehow land in a fan's beer during a recent game between the Boston Bruins and Winnipeg Jets.

How? We're not at all sure. But according to the announcers in this clip, the young sports fan received a well-earned standing ovation for his, um, efforts.
--------------------------------------------------------------
When news broke this week that one of the original developers of video games was filing for bankruptcy, it left many asking the same question: "Atari still exists?"

Founded in 1972 by Nolan Bushnell and Ted Dabney, Atari was responsible for creating a number of legendary video game franchises, including "Pong" and "Asteroids." In 1976, the company was sold to Warner Communications for a reported $28 million. Under Warner Communications, Atari expanded its offerings to include personal computers.

But by 1983, Atari began to suffer as a rash of video game competitors began to flood the market. Over the next 25 years, the company would be sold another three times, the final time being in 2008 to Infogrames, Inc.

Today, Atari specializes in online gaming through a multitude of platforms including browsers, Facebook and digital downloads. In addition, the company now develops and distributes interactive entertainment for video game consoles from Microsoft, Nintendo and Sony. The bankruptcy filing is an effort by Atari to break away from its parent company Atari S.A., formerly known as Infogrames, Inc.

Like Atari, there are a number of other businesses that the masses have long left for dead, but actually still exist.

In the 1970s and 1980s, it was hard to drive anywhere in the northeastern United States without passing a Roy Rogers restaurant. Named for the popular cowboy actor, Roy Rogers opened its first location in 1968. The chain, launched by the Marriott Corporation, quickly gained a following for its roast beef sandwiches, fried chicken and hamburgers.

By 1990, the chain had grown to nearly 900 locations, most of which were in the northeast and mid-Atlantic regions. That same year, Marriott sold the restaurant chain to competitor Hardee's, hich attempted to convert nearly a quarter of the Roy Rogers locations to the Hardee's restaurant chain. A customer outcry, however, forced Hardee's to change the restaurants back to the Roy Rogers brand. Over the next several years, Hardees would sell all the Roy Rogers restaurants to a variety of chains, including McDonald's and Wendy's.

By 1996, the chain had dwindled to fewer than 150 locations, all of which were being run by franchisees. In 1998, the Roy Rogers chain was sold to the Plamondon Companies, which remains its owner today. While only about 50 Roy Rogers restaurants remain today  all of them located in Massachusetts, Maryland, New Jersey, New York, Pennsylvania, Virginia and West Virginia  the company is starting to grow again. Within the last three months, the company has opened two new restaurants and announced plans for another.

Few companies rose to prominence as quickly as computer manufacturer Compaq did in the 1980s and 1990s. Founded in 1982, Compaq quickly became the largest seller of both personal and laptop computers. The company sold its first desktop computer, the Compaq Deskpro, in 1984, and 10 years later overtook IBM as the largest PC maker in the world.

As a way to diversify, Compaq began acquiring other computer companies, including Tandem Computer Incorporated and Digital Corporation. That proved to be the computer giant's downfall. The acquisitions began bringing down the value of the company, and by 2001, Compaq had been replaced by Dell as the world's largest PC maker. As the company's outlook worsened, it eventually agreed to a $21 billion merger with competitor Hewlett-Packard Corporation in 2002.

While HP has continued to use the Compaq brand name over the past decade, it announced late last year that it plans to change how it uses it. Beginning later this year, the Compaq brand will be used solely for basic computing products at entry-level pricing.

Before Diet Coke and Pepsi ruled the diet soda landscape, TaB was the drink of choice for weight-conscious consumers. The drink, first introduced in 1963 by Coca-Cola, was the first sugar-free offering for the soda pop giant, and was wildly popular until the early 1980s. Over the years,TaB has been reformulated several times  most notably in 1969, when it stopped using the artificial sweetener cyclamate.

The drink spawned several other versions of the diet soft drink, such as TaB Lemon Lime, TaB Orange and TaB Clear. The drink's downfall began in 1982 after Diet Coke was unveiled. While the diet soda may be difficult to find now, it has not vanished altogether. A dedicated group of TaB drinkers around the country is keeping the brand alive. In 2008, Coca-Cola sold more than 3 million cases of TaB, according to Beverage Digest.

Made famous by its orange roofs, Howard Johnson's restaurants used to be a staple across the country. Founded in 1925 by Howard Dearing Johnson, the restaurant chain started out as a drugstore/ice cream parlor. Four years later, the first Howard Johnson's restaurant was opened, specializing in fried clams and broiled catfish.

By 1935, the chain had expanded to more than 40 franchise locations. Just 10 years after the first locations opened, HoJo's  as it was affectionately known  expanded to more than 100 restaurants up and down the eastern seaboard, and by the 1960s, the chain was taking in more money than competitors like McDonald's and Burger King and had expanded to include hotels.

After Johnson died in 1972, the restaurant chain was bought and sold a handful of times. In 1985, it was purchased by the Marriott Corporation, which immediately sold the franchise-owned restaurants and hotels. Over the next several years, Marriott would convert many of the Howard Johnson's restaurants to other brands, until the chain became virtually nonexistent.

While still operating today, the chain appears to be on its last leg. Just two Howard Johnson's  one in Lake Placid, N.Y. and the other in Bangor, Maine  are still open today.

This article originally published at BusinessNewsDaily here
--------------------------------------------------------------
As promised at CES 2013, the Pebble smart watch starts shipping Wednesday.

Pebble is the most successful Kickstarter project of all time, raising more than $10 million from nearly 70,000 backers. The watch works in conjunction with your smartphone, making it easy to see who is calling, control your music and receive notifications. Even better, app developers can build Pebble support into their apps, extending the watch's capabilities even more.

On its Kickstarter blog, the Pebble team shared the latest status on shipping and mass production.

Pebble says that while it is working on adding shipment tracking to its account fulfillment page, it isn't there yet. Therefore, the company implores users not to start emailing about shipment tracking.

Today, less than 500 units will be shipped out from the factory, with more units to follow soon. Pebble has created a humorous IsPebbleShipping.com website to keep users connected.

On the app front, the Pebble Android app will be live in Google Play on Jan. 24. The iOS app is still in review. If users get Pebble before the app hits the App Store, they'll still be able to receive notifications and music, but they won't be able to upgrade the PebbleOS or install watch faces.

As one of the backers, I can't wait to get my hands on Pebble (no pun intended). Are you excited about the Pebble? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It always seems like a good idea until someone gets hurt, or nearly hit by a plane speeding toward them on the tarmac.

These guys, also known as "Those Crazy Texans," seem to think hanging out on an active runway is no biggie. Cue screams of adrenaline and most likely terror, as a low-flying biplane comes barreling down within two feet of them.

Just an inch more and it could've been an entirely different scene.

Staged or not, the Texans definitely live up to their name.
--------------------------------------------------------------
"Screwdriver," a new song from singer-songwriter Prince, has surfaced online along with a lyric video. The video appeared on 20pr1nc3.com, a never-before-seen website showcasing empty "STAY TUNED" boxes that presumably will be filled with videos.

A mysterious and fairly new Twitter account, 3rdEyeGirl, shared a link to 20pr1nc3.com late Tuesday. A YouTube account with the same "3rdEyeGirl" name also uploaded the video.

Rumor has it that 3rdEyeGirl is Prince's newly hired backing band, consisting of three female musicians, according to The Guardian.

The song comes on the heels of Billboard announcing Prince will receive the Billboard Icon Award at the Billboard Music Awards on May 19. Prince also graces the cover of the latest issue of Billboard magazine.

SEE ALSO: David Bowie's Album Tops iTunes Charts in 17 Countries Before Release

Prince's last album  his 34th studio album  came out in 2010 and was titled 20Ten.
--------------------------------------------------------------
We've all dreamed about having a robot friend, right? At least, that's the case here at Mashable. But there are other people out there who share our dream and are actually working to make it reality. Take Gael Langevin, a French sculptor and model marker who has been 3D-printing his own mechanic companion since early 2012.

Langevin started his project, called InMoov, by designing and printing the robot's arm and hand, but he has since built another arm and is on his way of completing the torso and the head, too. The robot can also understand voice commands and respond to them.

Judging from the pictures and videos available on his website, the robot looks impressive.

SEE ALSO: Turn Your Facebook Profile Into a 3D-Printed Sculpture

The good news is that you can reproduce it yourself if you have a 3D printer. Langevin is uploading the designs and specifications of his robot to the open-source 3D-printing repository Thingiverse. If you feel up to the challenge, you can already download some parts of InMoov through Langevin's website.

Langevin is also providing instructions on how to assemble the printed parts on InMoov's website.

To find out more about InMoov, check out the video above. Would you like to have a 3D-printed robot? Tell us your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
"Hiding behind your glasses" just took on a whole new meaning.

At Tokyo's National Institute of Informatics, Isao Echizen, an associate professor in the Digital Content and Media Sciences Research Division, unveiled a privacy visor  a set of glasses that prevents cameras with face-recognition software from recognizing you.

Echizen designed the glasses with near-infrared LEDs placed around the eyes and the bridge of the nose, two areas that computers use to pick out faces. Near-infrared is invisible to people, but many cameras can pick it up. The lights add digital "noise" to the image and when the computer tries to match the image with ones in a database, it gets confused and is unable to complete a match.

Echizen told BBC News that the purpose is to protect people from being tagged and identified in photographs without their knowledge. The EyeSee mannequins, for example, use face recognition software to log when shoppers come in and build a database of peoples age, gender or race.

At the same time, he didnt want to run into the problem of wearing a mask, which protects privacy but outside of 18th century Venetian masquerade balls, is considered a bit unusual.

Makeup could also fool face recognition software, as demonstrated with the CV Dazzle project, but that too could be problematic, since the designs are a bit outr.

Along with artist Adam Harveys stealth hoodie, these glasses are yet another indication that people are thinking more carefully about privacy  or the lack thereof  in a connected world.

Image courtesy of National Institute of Informatics; Photo via iStockphoto, brasil2

This article originally published at Discovery News here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Welcome to the rest of your life, Sloane Stephens.

The precocious 19-year-old American just became a household name after upsetting her childhood idol Serena Williams at the Australian Open on Wednesday. Now it looks like young sports fans will have an athletic idol of their own to look up to  and one who's a true dyed-in-the-wool member of the social media generation.

Besides worldwide fame, a $500,000 bonus and a benchmark win in her young career, what did Stephens hope to get out of the stunning victory?

"I hope to have a lot more Twitter followers," she said in a televised interview after the match.

Wish granted  and then some. Stephens had about 17,000 followers going into the match. Shortly after, she had 35,000. At time of this writing, she was up to 46,000.

Among her thousands of supportive mentions were messages from Shaquille O'Neal, Dirk Nowitzki and John Legend. Stephens retweeted all of them, and also spoke about how thrilled the messages made her  proving that for folks of a certain age in 2013, there's no props like Twitter props.

John Legend tweeted me, Dirk [Nowitzki] tweeted me. I mean, Im just excited," she told reporters after the match. "I want John Legend to sing at my wedding."

Stephens has the big game. She has the fresh-faced looks. She has the ebullient personality. And she has not just a trite "social presence," but  with more than 3,000 tweets to her name  a true understanding and comfort with digital communication.

The Twitter generation may have just found its next big thing.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Soccer player Eden Hazard, a Belgian national recently signed to top London club Chelsea, was thrown out of a match for kicking a ballboy in the stomach during a match against Swansea on Wednesday.

The moment quickly went viral online, as both #hazard and #ballboy became worldwide Twitter trends.

Ironically, Hazard's Wikipedia page claims his "calm and cool demeanor on the field has been cited as one of his best attributes."

Check out the video above to see the astonishing act of aggression for yourself.

UPDATE: News reports have named the kicked ballboy as Charlie Morgan. Coincidentally, a Twitter account called @CHARLIEM0RGAN from Swansea tweeted this earlier Wednesday:

That would seem to indicate that Morgan had a close-match stall tactic planned all along, which would explain Hazard's frustration  if not the kick to the boy's midrif. So was Morgan going rogue in his #timewasting plot? Or was the #timewasting deemed "#needed" by some higher Swansea authority? How deep does this #timewasting go??

At time of this writing, Morgan's post had been retweeted 19,000 times and he had 39,000 followers  both numbers growing by the moment, as his full name became a worldwide trend.

For its part, the official Chelsea Twitter account came out against Hazard's red card in a pretty controversial post of its own:

While this is a classic, hilarious, only-on-Twitter story in many respects, it does come with a twist of ugliness. As Morgan's identity spread, many fans tweeted threats and death wishes to him. English sports trolls on Twitter have been prosecuted for death threats in the past, so it will be interesting to see how this plays out.
--------------------------------------------------------------
American Idol returned for its 12th season premiere last week and proved it's a social superstar.

Though this was the lowest rated and least watched season premiere in Idol history, Fox's singing competition nonetheless scored highly in the social sphere. The debut of new judges Nikki Minaj, Mariah Carey and Keith Urban saw a 110% increase over last season's premiere in terms of social network activity.

This was a newsmaking week in the sports world as well, and it showed on the social charts. Disgraced cyclist Lance Armstrong's doping revelations drove heated discussions and put Oprah's Next Chapter high in the cable rankings. MTV's Catfish also placed well in a week when the Manti Te'o catfish tale came to light.

The data is courtesy of Trendrr, which measures social media activity related to specific television shows (e.g. mentions, likes, check-ins) across Twitter, Facebook, GetGlue and Viggle. To see daily rankings, check out Trendrr.TV.
--------------------------------------------------------------
We've all heard plenty about how your social-media footprint could cost you that dream job or become a massive distraction at work  but did you know social media also might just be the key to getting hired?

More and more, job hirers and recruiters scour social sites such as LinkedIn and Twitter to find new talent and learn about prospective employees. Here's the great thing about that: By and large, you control what your online presence looks like and includes.

But that doesn't only mean thinking twice about photos you post and links you share. The term "social resume" is beginning to gain traction, and refers to digital enhancements to the traditional paper or PDF curriculum vitae.

LinkedIn is likely the first social-resume tool that comes to mind, but other sites such as Twitter, Facebook and Tumblr can be just as helpful. There are also services such as ResumeSocial, VisualCV and Razume that offer more options for job seekers.

What can a social resume offer that the old variety can't? Links to past work, enhanced networking opportunities and instant feedback from recruiters and other job seekers, for starters.

The following infographic from OnlineColleges.com takes a deeper dive into the many benefits of properly leveraging social media in your job search. Check it out below; then offer your own tips in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
George Lucas got engaged to his girlfriend of seven years, Mellody Hobson, earlier this month  but that was hardly the only Star Wars-related engagement of 2013.

Indeed, if these rings are anything to go by, we're seeing a miniature boom in intergalactic proposals.

The rings above are part of a set available on Etsy. Most are versions of the Rebel Alliance and Imperial logos. And then there's the set above, which celebrates the most romantic moment from Empire Strikes Back.

The custom-made rings are available from $400 and up, depending on the materials used.

And speaking of custom-made Star Wars rings, check out this R2-D2 bling:

Commissioned via the online marketplace Custom Made and designed by Paul Michael Bieker, the R2 ring was used in the proposal you can see below, from last Halloween (hence the costumes):
--------------------------------------------------------------
Nerds. You can't live with them, can't talk to them about Star Wars plot holes.

Bad Bad Leeroy Brown's hilarious tweet is illustrated by Twaggies. Be sure to check out more great Twaggies comics on Mashable, and let us know if you've spied a funny tweet that's just begging for a visual.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Secretary of State Hillary Clinton said Wednesday the U.S. State Department is actively countering online propaganda posted by terrorists groups such as al-Qaeda by posting videos and other content of its own. Clinton's comments about the digital propaganda duel came during her testimony to the House of Representatives regarding the September 2012 attack on an American consolate in Benghazi, Libya.

Clinton's full comments (which you can also view in the video above):

"Social media is a great tool. We've begun trying to use it much more in the State Department  and not to communicate with just leaders and officials but really to get down ... into the grassroots. I started two organizations to deal with countering violent extremism. One a new operation inside the State Department that is stafffed with inter-agency experts. I'm not saying anything that's classified, but it's beginning to try to respond to al-Qaeda and other jihadist propaganda. So if they put up a video which talks about how terrible Americans are, we put up a video which talks about how terrible they are. We're trying to meet them in the media channels that they are communicating with people."

It was initially thought that an anti-Islam YouTube video sparked the deadly attack last year which claimed four American lives, including that of Ambassador J. Christopher Stevens. However, it later became clear the attack was an organized operation conducted by terrorists.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Steve Jobs once threatened its then-competitor Palm with a patent lawsuit if the company's CEO didn't stop poaching Apple employees, according to a newly surfaced court filing.

The filing, which was made public on Tuesday, detailed how Jobs once proposed an agreement for Apple and Palm to not hire away each other's employees, and if terms weren't met, he would file a patent lawsuit.

The filing was brought on by five workers against Apple, Google, Intel and others for an alleged conspiracy to remove the competition's employees, according to a Reuters report.

"In 2007, I received a call from Steve Jobs, the Chief Executive Officer of Apple," former Palm CEO Edward Colligan said in a sworn statement. "In the months before the call, several employees had moved between the two companies. On the call, Mr. Jobs expressed concern about employees being hired away from Apple by Palm."

SEE ALSO: Rumor: Apple to Launch an iPhone With a 4.8-Inch Screen in 2013

"As a solution, Mr. Jobs proposed an arrangement between Palm and Apple by which neither company would hire the other's employees, including high tech employees," he continued. "Mr. Jobs also suggested that if Palm did not agree to such an arrangement, Palm could face lawsuits alleging infringements of Apple's many patents."

Colligan said he "did not agree to Mr. Jobs's proposal" and instead, responded with an email, calling it "wrong" and "illegal."

"Your proposal that we agree that neither company will hire the other's employees, regardless of the individual's desires, is not only wrong, it is likely illegal," wrote Colligan, as shown in the filing. "I know it's difficult when a respected employee decides to leave the company for a new challenge, but, as you said in our call, 'This is America.' We can't dictate where someone will work, nor should we try."

He also said Palm could also respond with a patent legal action if Jobs were to proceed.

But Jobs' response, also revealed in the filing, showed he wasn't worried about the counter-threat: "We are not concerned about them at all. My advice to you is to take a look at our patent portfolio before you make a decision."

He also responded to other points: "It is not just a matter of our employees deciding they want to join Palm," Jobs wrote. "They are being actively recruited using knowledge supplied by [employees], with [one] personally participating in the recruiting process. We must do whatever we can to stop this. I'm sure you realize the asymmetry in the financial resources of our respective companies when you say: 'We will both just end up paying a lot of lawyers a lot of money.'"

Although the documents were previously kept private, California U.S. District Judge Lucy Koh rejected parts of the continued request from the tech companies during an ongoing civil case, which is why these details have now surfaced.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Sundance Film Festival, which kicked off last week in Park City, Utah, has long been one of the go-to events for filmmakers hoping to get their projects noticed by some of the industry's top players.

This year, the institute announced its partnership with an online video platform called Reelhouse, which filmmakers from the event can use to self-distribute their work online.

Reelhouse CEO Will Mainguy said the partnership is a natural fit for emerging artists and audiences alike.

"We're looking forward to this [partnership] being the spearhead of changing the industry's awareness of successful ways to distribute and collect film," he told Mashable. "If you look at the open marketplaces for apps, games, books and funding, they've all done extremely well  what's been missing all along is that same idea for quality video."

Reelhouse is similar to other open platforms such as Brightcove and Kaltura. Their selling point is "stories only"  so any type of creative storytelling, either as a full-length feature or 10-minute documentary, is fair game.

The partnership will pair Reelhouse with Sundances Artist Services, a branch of the Institute that helps provide resources to artists through the entire independent filmmaking process, from funding to distribution to advertising. The platform also offers a Kickstarter-like storefront for artists to sell physical or digital products to keep raising funds from fans.

SEE ALSO: 6 Ways to Enjoy the Sundance Film Festival From Afar

Mainguy was hesitant to give out too many details about which artists they'll be working with. Last year, however, a documentary about Porsche customizer Magnus Walker  called Urban Outlaw  accumulated more than 400,000 views using Reelhouse's platform.

The self-distribution model has been used before in the entertainment field. In the past year, comedians Louis C.K., Aziz Ansari and Jim Gaffigan sold tickets for their respective stand-up tours directly through their personal sites.

"Filmmakers can be so creative when they have close contact with their fan base. Really, that's their best resource," Mainguy said. "The benefits of self-distributing, and having an open community in general, help move the process along so much faster."

The Sundance Film Festival will wrap up on Jan. 27 with the premiere of jOBS.

What do you think? Is digital distribution the way of the future for filmmakers?
--------------------------------------------------------------
What if you could see at a glance what the world thought about everything: from gun control to the newest latte at Starbucks? Thats the idea behind Swipp, a tool launching Wednesday that measures sentiment on a topic in real-time, reporting back not only how people feel about something, but specific details about those feelings as well.

The idea behind Swipp is fairly simple: when youre given a term, for instance Pumpkin Spice Latte, you give it a rating between -5 and +5. Your personal rating, along with any comments you want to add, goes into the terms overall score.

Each term has its own dashboard where you can see what its score is, what it's trending at, and take a look at the demographics of those who have rated it. You can see what percentage of swippers are male or female, as well as what country theyre in.

A graph plots the sentiment associated with the term over time, so you can see exactly when it took a turn for the worse, or when it started to get popular.

You can view results for the entire world, or filtered by your friends. You can also browse whats being swipped by trending topics, or by specific topics that interest you.

Anyone can create a Swipp based on a term of their choosing, and have their voice counted in a Swipp score. The only way to log into Swipp, however, is through Facebook Connect, so youll need a Facebook account to play.

With its launch Wednesday, the companys first goal is to get people using the tool, and building a repository of information that can be used to create a living picture of the planet and the people on it.

Swipps founder see the tool ultimately being used in things like an app for The Voice, where people can vote in real-time for their favorite singer, and everyone watching can see at a glance who the front-runner might be. Youll even be able to see details like at what note in a song viewers became a fan of a particular contestant.

The tool can also be used in shopping sites, working somewhat like a review option for different products. For instance, you might select a camera from Canon that has a +4 rating over a Nikon with a +1 rating.

As a first look at the ultimate power of Swipp, the company is launching an app for the Superbowl. Called Swipper Bowl, the app focuses on players and teams for the big game, and can be used as a second-screen while watching the action.

Users will be able to Swipp the teams, individual players, and even commercials during the game and see what the rest of the world thinks about the same topics in real time.

Would you use Swipp, and for what purpose? Share your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Some 25 tech investors and entrepreneurs strut their stuff in this rap video aimed at aiding victims of Hurricane Sandy.

The program, organized by Undrip, includes cameos from Brian Wong of Kiip, David Hornik of August Capital, Aston Motes of Dropbox and Alexis Ohanian of Reddit lip-synching "The Lucky Ones." (The full list is here.) If you enjoyed the video and even if you didn't, you may want to donate to the cause here.

Mick Hagen, the founder of Undrip, a content discovery app, is no stranger to using rap to solicit donations. The 2011 video below, "We need an angel," was a tuneful plea for investors for his startup.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Be careful what the advertisements (and coupons) tell you  not all retail chains are created equal. In fact, some of the most popular places to shop for your beloved tech may be sneakily marking up some of your most needed tech products, right under your nose.

The reason for the markups, undoubtedly, is demand. The biggest prices disparities in tech retail happen especially when consumers need a particular accessory or product to make their beloved gadgets work. People need HDMI cables, display adaptors and 3D glasses, therefore, they can be the most painful at checkout.

SEE ALSO: 13 Strategic Ways Businesses Can Use Coupon Codes

Still unconvinced? Check out these seven products that, at a regular retail store, would send you into sticker shock  until you discover how much cheaper you could get them wholesale.

What's the most shocking price rip-off you've seen in tech retail? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
As the Australian Open rages on Down Under this week, most fans won't realize just how much the game they love has evolved over the past several decades.

But tennis has, in fact, been dramatically altered by technology in ways that have changed how the biggest stars play the game and how fans consume it.

Rackets today are made from high-tech composite frames, which evolved from metal frames, which came from wood frames. In fact, players who played one of tennis' earliest predecessors are actually believed to have smacked the ball back and forth with their bare hands.

Playing surfaces are constructed from much more advanced materials now as well, and ball-tracking technology has grown by leaps and bounds. Medical technology has revolutionized how players stay safe and recover from injuries, while social media has completely transformed their relationship with the public.

For a more detailed look at how technology has changed tennis for the better, check out the infographic below, which comes by way of Australian accommodations site HotelClub.com. In the comments, below, let us know which innovations you think have been the most important.
--------------------------------------------------------------
We've seen all kinds of gaming genres make the move to mobile, first-person shooters chief among them. But anyone who has tried playing one on a tablet knows it can be frustrating to navigate with gestures in a game world created around a keyboard and a mouse.

Ben Cousins of Scattered Entertainment thinks he has a solution for tricky tablet controls. His upcoming mobile game The Drowning is a horror-shooter hybrid; the world is being infected by terrifying reanimated creatures that gain their power from oil spills. The game is set some time after the main events of this apocalypse, and so the only people who remain are scavengers able to survive off the scraps. The game's protagonist is one such person, who happens to have an affinity for building weapons out of nothing.

A former EA studio general manager, Cousins says first-person shooters are gaming's most lucrative genre; therefore, they definitely need a smooth transition to tablet.

"There's something about a shooter on tablet works really well," he says. "Having that high-resolution screen close to your face reminds me of playing DOOM in 1992. But this virtual joystick system really doesn't work. I think the mistake with the sticks is they are trying to ape other console controls."

Cousin's ideas for tablet games are simple: It should be easy to hold your tablet in one hand while playing with the other. With that in mind, he says the development team at Shattered Entertainment have come up with controls they predict will be easy for anyone to use.

Players can tap anywhere on the screen to move to that location, Cousins says, similar to the control structure in games like Diablo III. To fire their weapons, players tap with two fingers. The bullet targets to the middle of those two touchpoints. Navigate the world with simple swipe gestures.

"We showed it to Apple and they were pleased. They said it's how they would would design the shooter," Cousins says.

For a player to cozy up to new controls, the introductory game has to present the modifications in the best light. Cousins says having enemies who don't fire back is important, at least until players can get used to the accuracy of shooting with two fingers.

"Zombies enabled us to set the world in a much more realistic, modern setting. But we realized the George Romero formula had been done too much, and we didn't want to see a guy in a business suit as zombie another time," Cousins says.

He adds, the infected creatures in The Drowning act more like rabid dogs or crazed primates than traditional zombies. Their goals are to drag helpless victims into the infected oil, converting them to monsters.

The Drowning will be out for both iOS and Android some time in the first quarter of the year, according to Cousins.

UPDATE: Scattered Entertainment released a video of Cousins demonstrating the controls. Check it out below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
TPB AFK, the documentary about torrent-indexing service The Pirate Bay, will premiere Feb. 8 at the 63rd Berlin International Film Festival.

The film will also debut online that same day, for free, director Simon Klose announced Tuesday. It will be shared under a Creative Commons license, marking the first time a movie would screen online at the same time as its Berlinale premiere.

TPB AFK, which was partially funded through Kickstarter, tells the story of The Pirate Bay's founders, who were found guilty in 2009 of promoting piracy in Sweden. They were sentenced to serve one year in prison, and pay a fine of 30 million Swedish krona ($3.5 million).

I dont want to tell too much about it because people should see it and make up their own minds. After seeing the full movie for the first time, I was thinking about it for about two weeks without having an opinion or words to describe it, Peter Sunde, one of The Pirate Bay's co-founders, told TorrentFreak.

Check out the film's official trailer, above; then, tell us what you think in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
In recent weeks, there have been several reports that Apple had slashed orders for iPhone 5 parts in the coming quarter, suggesting to some that demand for the latest iPhone was lower than expected. However, during Apple's earnings call on Wednesday, CEO Tim Cook urged investors to "question the accuracy" of these reports.

"I know there have been lots of rumors about order cuts. I don't want to comment on any particular rumor because I would spend my life doing that," Cook said. "I would suggest that it's good to question the accuracy of any rumor of bill plans."

"Even if any particular data point were factual, it would be impossible to interpret what the data point meant for our overall business because the supply chain is very complex," Cook continued, noting that Apple has multiple supply sources and yields might vary for its products. "There's an indordinate long list of things that would make any single data point not a great proxy for whats going."

Apple's stock was down nearly 10% in after hours trading following the earnings report, as the company missed sales estimates for iPhone and iPad and revenue came in lower than expected.
--------------------------------------------------------------
There are two secrets to Tumblr's runaway success: design and community engagement.

In 2012, the microblogging network became one of the top 10 most visited sites in the world, with an audience of roughly 170 million people per montha dedicated userbase that includes everyone from President Obama and Beyonce to fandom communities and GIF artists. While Tumblr Storyboardthe companys in-house editorial operationhelps spotlight and foster users creative contributions, the sites simplistic interface drives the sharing of content, according to Lee Rubenstein, Tumblr's seventh user and cofounder of art forum EatSleepDraw.

"It is still very easy to use compared to Facebook," he said.

Yet, amid never-ending reports on potential buyers, long-term profitability, and advertising revenue, Tumblr's future appears to be planned out in dollars and cents instead of notesthe internal mechanism that tracks how many likes, reblogs and comments a post has received  a sentiment furthered by founder David Karp recent Forbes profile.

"There's more to do, there's always so much engineering to do to serve more and more traffic, particularly when we dont want to disturb the same traffic," the 26-year-old high school dropout told the publication that named him one of its 30 Under 30. "The biggest thing by far is the infrastructure. ... [I]t demands an extraordinary team of real focus to make sure that we are constantly engineering Tumblr for the future."

But what exactly does that future look like, and more importantly, what should it look like according to the sites most influential users?

At the center of concern is the Radar feature, a tool used to highlight and introduce original and interesting content to all users.

While originally a source of pride and credibility for Tumblr users eager to have their content shared, the feature became a potential revenue source in May, after Karp announced plans to sell Radar spots to advertisers for $25,000 a pop.

"On one hand you need the funds to keep a site operational, but on the other hand, the Radar used to be a badge of honor," noted Mr. GIF, a New York-based GIF duo. "Getting on that radar is a huge moral boost for any creator. Some people think its unfair that brands can buy their way onto your dashboard."

Based on sponsored Radar ads and its Spotlight feature, where people pay to have their accounts promoted across specific tags, Tumblr has set a $100 million revenue goal for 2013, a year Gawker founder Nick Denton predicted will be brutal for the company.

And with such a lofty goal, more interface changes are likely to comeand community outcry, as with every major social network, won't be far behind.

"The most vulnerable thing in the Tumblr experience is its Dashboardthe main point of consumption, and it's the thing I think many of us are worried about," said marketer and Tumblr watchdog Andrea Lopez, who goes by bluechoochoo on the site.

Whatever changes occurs, they will be incremental, stressed Tumblr designer Peter Vidani, who helped architect the Pinned Posts feature, among other notable features.

"The obvious reason this is good is so that you're not scaring everybody," Vidani said. "By doing this we can learn a lot from each change we make and that will inevitably affect the other changes we thought we wanted to make."

Even still, as profit increasingly factors into the decision-making process, Tumblr has a tightrope to walk with its userbasethe content creators and agenda drivers who helped establish the company and drive its success.

Some influential users, like Rubenstein and comedic powerhouse Benjamin Grelle, better known as the Frogman, believe a profit-sharing model akin to YouTube would be a more community-friendly way of doing business.

"I think it is crucial that Tumblr take care of their content creators," Grelle said. "They should work to make this the best possible place for people to post things they make. If Tumblr could shift the perception from a place where people mostly repost things, to a place where things originate, I think they would leave their competitors in the dust."

This article originally published at The Daily Dot here
--------------------------------------------------------------
"The Bird" was one of the ideas considered for Twitter's original logo. That is, the extended middle finger gesture known in North America by that name. Other ideas, however, hewed closer to traditional images of birds.

That, at least, is one of the takeaways from a trove of putative early sketches of what became the Twitter logo. The images, uncovered by Slate, appear to be scrawled on brown paper towels you'd find in a bathroom. Twitter's design team also appears to have posted the illustrations on Dribbble. Twitter reps could not be reached for comment.

Assuming the images are on the level, it's appears the team threw out all kinds of ideas for the logo no matter how whimsical. Among the sketches, for instances, is a smoking bird and one that looks like he's wearing a wig. However some of the designs look like the image Twitter ultimately settled on.

Fascination with Twitter's look increased this summer when the company unveiled an updated logo. Shortly afterwards, many fans noticed that, if you turn the new bird on its side, it resembles Batman.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Twitter users may soon have a new way to share videos in their tweets.

Dick Costolo, the CEO of Twitter, tweeted on Wednesday morning about making steak tartare, but unlike the more than 5,000 other tweets Costolo has posted to date, this one featured something different: a short embedded video that was made with Vine, a small video-sharing startup that Twitter acquired in October.

If Costolo's tweet is any indication, it appears Twitter is planning to integrate Vine to allow users to embed short clips in their tweets in the same way that Twitter now lets users create and share Instagram-style photos in tweets.

The Financial Review reports hearing from sources that Twitter will add Vine integration in Australia in the "coming weeks," which will allow users to share 6-second videos in tweets.

Twitter declined to comment for this story.

Would you use this video sharing option if it does come to Twitter? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The clock to unlock a new mobile phone is running out.

In October 2012, the Librarian of Congress, who determines exemptions to a strict anti-hacking law called the Digital Millennium Copyright Act (DMCA), decided that unlocking cellphones would no longer be allowed. But the librarian provided a 90-day window during which people could still buy a phone and unlock it. That window closes on Jan. 26.

Unlocking a phone frees it from restrictions that keep the device from working on more than one carrier's network, allowing it run on other networks that use the same wireless standard. This can be useful to international travelers who need their phones to work on different networks. Other people just like the freedom of being able to switch carriers as they please.

The new rule against unlocking cellphones won't be a problem for everybody, though. For example, Verizon's iPhone 5 comes out of the box already unlocked, and AT&T will unlock a phone once it is out of contract.

SEE ALSO: Can I Get a Smartphone Without a Contract?

You can also pay full price for a phone, not the discounted price that comes with a two-year service contract, to receive the device unlocked from the get-go. Apple sells an unlocked iPhone 5 starting at $649, and Google sells its Nexus 4 unlocked for $300.

Advocacy group the Electronic Frontier Foundation (EFF) questions whether the DMCA has the right to determine who can unlock a phone. In an email to TechNewsDaily, EFF attorney Mitch Stoltz said, "Arguably, locking phone users into one carrier is not at all what the DMCA was meant to do. It's up to the courts to decide."

If you do buy a new phone and want to unlock it before the deadline, you must first ask your carrier if the company will unlock your phone for you. The DMCA only permits you to unlock your phone yourself once you've asked your carrier first.

Christopher S. Reed from the U.S. Copyright Office noted in an email to TechNewsDaily that "only a consumer, who is also the owner of the copy of software on the handset under the law, may unlock the handset."

But come Saturday, you'll have to break the law to unlock your phone. If you want to get in under the gun, you can search the Internet for the code to enter to unlock the phone or find a tool that will help you accomplish the task.

The change could crimp the style of carriers like T-Mobile, which have pushed "bring your own device" as an incentive for switching service providers. Such carriers promise savings in exchange for using your existing phone on their network.

T-Mobile has promoted this notion for iPhones, in particular, since the company is the only one of the big four U.S. carriers that doesn't sell the iPhone. The carrier goes so far as to feature ads displaying an open padlock, with an iPhone replacing the body of the lock. T-Mobile declined to comment.

This article originally published at TechNewsDaily here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Victims of a so-called "revenge porn" website, which allows users to upload naked pictures of other people, identifying them by their name and hometown, have sued the site as well as its hosting company, GoDaddy.

Last week, a class-action lawsuit was brought against the hosting giant and the website Texxxan.com. The plaintiffs are arguing that that these kind of "involuntary" or "revenge" porn websites violate Texas State privacy laws and are a "blight upon society" that serve "no useful, social or economic purpose," the lawsuit states.

The suit was brought forth by 16 named plaintiffs who are also seeking class-action status for all the rest of women appearing on the website.

GoDaddy is named as a defendant in the lawsuit as the plaintiffs argue that it's profiting off the "offensive and tortious conduct" of Texxxan.com. John S. Morgan, the lawyer contacted by the first victim who wanted to sue the revenge porn site, called people behind these kind of sites "sickos who post private information of women without their knowledge."

The first website of this kind to make the news was IsAnybodyUp, a page run by 26-year-old entrepreneur and "most hated man on the Internet," Hunter Moore. He started the website in 2009 as a way to get back at his ex-girlfriend after a bad break-up. The site was eventually taken down months ago. But soon an even sleazier imitator came up: IsAnybodyDown. The website works just as Moore's did, with scorned exes submitting pictures of their former partners without their consent, providing names, and sometimes even a screenshot of their Facebook profile and phone numbers.

Ars Technica has compared IsAnybodyDown to extortion. The site provides a service called "Takedown Hammer" that allows anybody who's unwillingly featured on the site (i.e., practically everybody) to ask the site to remove his or her picture. The caveat? It can cost hundreds of dollars.

SEE ALSO: Here's How Your Smartphone Is Ruining Your Sex Life

It's unclear whether the victims can win the suit. Section 230 of the Communications Decency Act protects webpages, making them not liable for user-submitted content. However, what is protected under Section 230 is unclear, and there are no precedents of revenge porn websites being sued for privacy infringement. Morgan argues they aren't protected because they willingly publish pictures without the victim's consent.

GoDaddy, on the other hand, should be protected. "The legal question isn't close," Eric Goldman, a law professor at Santa Clara University told Ars Technica. "Section 230's immunity doesn't change even if GoDaddy knew it was hosting the site or could have easily disabled the website."

To learn more about this lawsuit, check out the video above.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Cruising along at on the open road in your sweet ride is the stuff of romance movies and car commercials. Until that squirrel runs in front of you, you slam on the brakes and the semi truck behind you kisses your bumper at 40 MPH. It's not a pretty picture. Volvo, the automaker best known for deliriously safe vehicles, says it has the answer and offers proof in the white-knuckle video above.

Created by Volvo's trucks division (and introduced last year), the collision warning and emergency brake system is actually a series of tech steps designed to prevent one of its giant trucks from rear-ending a slowed or stationary vehicle. According to the release, the system employs radar to detect vehicles ahead. First it shows the driver a blinking red light. If he fails to notice, it adds a beeping sound. If those alerts fail, Volvo Trucks' system takes action  first gently applying the brake and eventually using the emergency brakes to bring the truck to a full stop. It works in trucks moving at up to roughly 43 mph.

In the video, at least, the system appears to work and Volvo Trucks notes that the semi is fully loaded with 40 tons of ... well, no one but Volvo knows really. Since the company unveiled the technology last year, we suspect some of the specially-equipped trucks are already on the road. Have you seen any in action? Let us know in the comments below.

Also, if you want to see how the technology works, check out this video below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Robert Alexander is a data sonification specialist, which means that his job is, essentially, to convert data into sounds. Alexander takes collections of flat, static numbers  stock price variations, wind speeds, human pulse rates  and transforms them into music.

"I think of myself as an explorer," Alexander says in the video above. "I live in the space between art and science and technology." And in the space  vast and narrow at the same time  between data and beauty.

And you know something that offers a ton of both data and beauty? Our nearest star. Alexander has been putting his sonification skills to use to create, basically, a soundtrack for the sun.

To do that, he relied on data gathered by the Solar Heliospheric Observatory (SOHO), a joint NASA-ESA spacecraft that astronomers use to study the sun. The vehicle, among other things, helps to predict the solar flares  gaseous eruptions from the solar surface, otherwise known as "coronal mass ejections"  that can disrupt electrical grids and communications infrastructures here on Earth.

Alexander manipulated those data to create songs that are both transcendent and utterly rooted in the physical world. As Motherboard's Michael Byrne puts it, "He's rendered solar flares as a human choir, and turned the sun's rotation into a a tribal beat."

But solar sonification  "interacting with the sun," Alexander calls it  isn't just about making artistic things out of science-y things. It's also about taking that data-driven art and using its patterns and rhythms and nuances and flows to learn something new.

At one point, Alexander, a fellow at NASA, noticed a unique hum in the solar sonification he'd created. Which in turn made him realize that sound can help humans detect carbon levels, which are in turn useful for measuring the actual temperatures of solar flares.

That insight resulted in a paper that was published last year in the Astrophysical Journal. We've always known that music has something to teach us; that truism could be even more true, however, when your inspiration  and your instrument  is the sun.

This article originally published at The Atlantic here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Principal photography for The Fifth Estate  a film based on the WikiLeaks saga  kicked off Wednesday.

The film stars Benedict Cumberbatch as Julian Assange and Daniel Bruhl as Daniel Domscheit-Berg. Bill Condon, best known for Dreamgirls, Kinsey and The Twilight Saga: Breaking Dawn, is directing.

Two books are serving as the basis for the film: Inside WikiLeaks: My Time with Julian Assange at the World's Most Dangerous Website by Daniel Domscheit-Berg and WikiLeaks: Inside Julian Assange's War on Secrecy by David Leigh and Luke Harding.

According to DreamWorks, the studio spearheading the film, it will chronicle the early days of WikiLeaks leading up to the release of the Afghan War Diary in July 2010. Think The Social Network meets The Pentagon Papers.

DreamWorks and its co-financier Participant Media are targeting a Nov. 15, 2013 release date for The Fifth Estate. Here's what Condon had to say about the movie:

"It may be decades before we understand the full impact of WikiLeaks and how it's revolutionized the spread of information. So this film won't claim any long view authority on its subject, or attempt any final judgment. We want to explore the complexities and challenges of transparency in the information age and, we hope, enliven and enrich the conversations WikiLeaks has already provoked."

While critics might be quick to write the film off, remember this: we all laughed off the idea of a Facebook movie. The Social Network wound up winning two Oscars.

Do you have high hopes for a WikiLeaks movie? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Nintendo made several big announcements during its livestreamed presentation Wednesday morning, but the most exciting to fans were related to the Legend of Zelda franchise.

First, Nintendo President Satoru Iwata announced GameCube's Wind Waker would get an HD remake for the Wii U, out this fall.

Second, Iwata announced Nintendo was working on a new Legend of Zelda game for the Wii U. While he was coy on the details, he said this title would "break conventions" of the series, including traditional dungeon order and the single player experience. Could this be a cooperative or multiplayer Zelda?

The Wind Waker HD remake will include remastered visuals and have functionality with the Wii U GamePad.

"The Wind Waker's endearing cartoon style is the perfect game for introducing first time players into the Zelda universe," Iwata said.

Iwata also said a new Mario Kart for Wii U was coming, the first confirmation of an update to the popular racing franchise. He also said that a new 3D Mario adventure game was in development by the makers of Super Mario Galaxy and Super Mario 3D Land. A playable version of both will be available at E3, according to Nintendo.

Other new unnamed titles were teased for the first time, included a Wii U party game by the makers of Wii Party. Videos showed off a game board world, along with mini games only playable on the GamePad's screen. There was also a Yoshi game by the makers of Kirby's Epic Yarn that showed the green dinosaur made of yarn.

While there was plenty of discussion of games far off on the horizon, there weren't any games with hard release dates. The Wii U won't see any new games until March, for which Iwata apologized.

"Nintendo takes seriously its responsibility to offer a steady stream of new titles in the very early days of a new platform to establish a good lineup of new software. On the other hand, we also firmly believe we have to offer quality experiences when we release new titles. Based on our software development schedules at the end of last year, we concluded we should spend a little more time to satisfy our Nintendo standard of quality. I apologize to those supporting Wii U about the lack of new titles from Nintendo in January and February, but please understand we'll have a steady stream of new titles from March onward," Iwata said.

Iwata also announced that Wii U will be getting its own Virtual Console similar to the Wii's sometime in the spring. The Virtual Console will allow players to download classic Nintendo games and play them on their Wii U.

The Wii U's Virtual Console was delayed so that games could be played on just the GamePad controller and MiiVerse, the Wii U's social network. This does mean that Wii Virtual Console games won't work in the same way, and anyone who wants the updated Wii U version of an old game will have to redownload it. Nintendo did say players doing that would only have to play between $1 and $1.50.

Only NES and Super NES titles will be available first, and not all classic games will be available immediately. Iwata also announced some classic games would be released for just 30 cents to celebrate the 30th anniversary of the Famicom, the NES's Japanese cousin. Starting today, Wii U owners can download Balloon Drop from the Wii U shop at that price.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Yahoo confirmed Tuesday that it acquired Snip.it, a social tool that lets users collect and share web content.

"The Snip.it team created an innovative technology that lets people share content in a social and fun way. We're excited to welcome them to Yahoo!, where they will help us build experiences that bring people with shared interests together," Mike Kerns, Yahoo's vice-president of product, said in a statement.

"Reading and sharing content is a core daily habit for most of the world, and we can't wait to work with the Snip.it team to make that experience even more entertaining for our users."

Snip.it will join Yahoo's "media group," company spokesperson Sara Bettencourt Gorman said in an email. Gorman did not disclose purchase price or other details about the deal.

On its website, Snip.it announced that it would bring the company vision to "a larger scale" at Yahoo, but declined to share specifics on future plans. Snip.it also said it would no longer support "snipping" (or collecting from the web), and told users that they could download and export their "snips" until Feb. 21.

"Our vision has always been to make news more social. And we can't think of a better platform than Yahoo, with half a billion monthly users, to realize this vision," Snip.it CEO Ramy Adeeb told Mashable in an email.

Founded in 2011, Snip.it users clip content as they browse the Internet (similar to other bookmarklets), and add commentary before adding it to their personal collections. At the time, Adeeb said Snip.it was different from Pinterest and other web-curation tools because it emphasized content and opinions.

Do you think Yahoo's acquisition of Snip.it was a smart move? Discuss in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
In a move that may augur more Siri-like functionality for its tablets, Amazon on Thursday announced it is buying Ivona, a firm specializing in text-to-speech technology.

The Poland-based Ivona's technology verbalizes written text messages. Amazon has been using Ivona's technology for its Kindle e-readers since 2009. Ivona also supplies "Explore By Touch" and "Voice Guide" navigation for Kindle Fire models. Explore By Touch gives readers an auditory cue when they swipe their fingers across the Kindle Fire's menu (for instance, the title of a book would be read aloud if it was swiped.) In Voice Guide, any action the customer performs on the device is read aloud. In Amazon's example, when you open a new book, it would say "The Hunger Games. Book opened." Both features are aimed at vision-impaired customers.

While the technology appears to be the exact opposite of Apple's Siri, Amazon's purchase might signal increased hands-free features that could be employed on a rumored Amazon phone.

Terms of the deal were not disclosed.
--------------------------------------------------------------
We don't actually know if Philippe Dubost is any good at his job. But boy, can he throw together a resume.

Dubost, a web product manager currently based in Paris, is looking to travel for his next position. So he decided to make his CV stand out anywhere in the world  by mimicking an Amazon product page.

The result, "Philippe's Amaz'ing Resume," is a pitch-perfect pastiche. Suggesting that you add the applicant to your shopping cart to see his price is such a clever way of asking to be hired, we're amazed no one thought of it before. Especially when followed by the urgent reminder: "only 1 left in stock. Order soon!"

You can see the full resume here. But in case Dubost's site has been overwhelmed by traffic  he's already had to change his web hosting service once, according to his Twitter feed  here's another screenshot.

Dubost has taken pains to replicate every last aspect of an Amazon page  even inserting an ad. We've seen resumes that look like Facebook pages and Twitter feeds before, but none have this much attention to detail.

And given the fact that hiring is a transaction, making it look like the world's largest store makes a ton of sense.

Would you hire an applicant based on a resume like this? Let us know in the comments, and check out our galleries of other unusual CV designs below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Welcome to this morning's edition of "First To Know," a series in which we keep you in the know on what's happening in the digital world.

Today, we're looking at three particularly interesting stories. Despite posting record results for the final quarter of 2012, Apple's stock plummeted. Facebook was the most popular mobile app in that same period, surging past Google Maps; all in all, it accounted for 23% of time spent on apps. And, while we're on the subject of Facebook, a site called Actual Facebook Graph Searches took the Internet by storm, highlighting the compromising, contradictory, or plain old racist things people have on their public profiles.

Check out the video above for more on these stories.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A scene from jOBS, the upcoming independent film about tech icon Steve Jobs, has surfaced and it gives us the first video glimpse of Ashton Kutcher as the former Apple CEO.

In this video, Jobs tries to persuade Apple co-founder Steve Wozniak that his "operating system" can be sold to the masses. Book of Mormon actor Josh Gad plays Wozniak.

The film  not to be confused with the one Sony Pictures is creating based on Walter Isaacson's biography of the late tech luminary  will premiere this week at the Sundance Film Festival and arrive in theaters on April 19. Jobs died from pancreatic cancer in 2011.

SEE ALSO: 6 Ways to Enjoy the Sundance Film Festival From Afar

Distributors Open Road Films and Five Star Feature Films released this deeper synopsis of jOBS earlier this month:

Directed by Joshua Michael Stern, written by Matthew Whitely, shot by Oscar- winning cinematographer Russell Carpenter and produced by Mark Hulme, jOBS details the major moments and defining characters that influenced Steve Jobs on a daily basis from 1971 through 2000. jOBS plunges into the depths of his character, creating an intense dialogue-driven story that is as much a sweeping epic as it is an immensely personal portrait of Steve Jobs' life. The filmmakers were granted unprecedented access during shooting to the historic garage in Palo Alto, that served as the birthplace to Apple Inc.

Mark Hulme of Five Star has called Kutcher's acting "inspiring and unforgettable."

Kutcher, who stars in CBS's Two and a Half Men, previously played roles on Fox'sThat '70s Show and in films such as The Butterfly Effect, No Strings Attached, Valentine's Day and Dude, Where's My Car?

What do you think of Ashton Kutcher's performance in the above scene?

Video via ETonline; photo via the Sundance Institute
--------------------------------------------------------------
Belkin announced Thursday that it is acquiring Cisco's Home Networking Business Unit, including the Linksys brand, current products and employees.

The financial details of the deal  which officially take Cisco out of the consumer business  weren't disclosed. With Linksys and Belkin under the same roof, Belkin says it will account for 30% of the U.S. retail home and small business networking market.

We had a chance to speak with Belkin CEO Chet Pipkin about the acquisition and what it means for the Belkin and Linksys brands in the future.

If you're an existing Linksys customer, you don't need to worry. Belkin will maintain support for its products and all valid warranties will be honored for current and future Linksys products.

Moreover, the Linksys brand will continue to exist and Pipkin said that the company would be making continued investments in both the Linksys and Belkin brands. When I asked Pipkin about differentiation in markets where the two brands sell the same type of product  such as home networking  he explained the philosophy behind each name.

"We like to think about the Belkin brand as being a brand that makes user interfaces simple and easy to understand," Pipkin said. It's strong in areas like smartphones and tablets and is very consumer friendly.

"Linksys has a very impressive install base and a great reputation for reliability in the prosumer space," Pipkin said, adding, "We will continue to celebrate and further accelerate the unique brand process for both Belkin and Linksys."

Beyond that, Pipkin said that the company will look at how it can create complimentary product experiences. For example, an accessory for a smartphone or tablet could have the Belkin branding and be designed to work in tandem with a Linksys-branded router.

Cisco acquired Linksys back in 2003 as a way to get into the then-burgeoning home networking space. Last month, Cisco turned to Barclays to sell off the division. The sale is the culmination of a strategy Cisco started back in 2011  when it shut down its Flip camera business just two years after acquiring Flip's maker, PureDigital.

What do you think about Belkin's purchase of Linksys? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
After a high-school student from Shenzhen, China, died earlier this month, some netizens speculated that over-sharing online led to the young girl's death.

Lai Zengyutong frequently shared her locations to Sina Weibo, China's Twitter clone, which has few security settings. Police are now investigating whether the 16-year-old's online activity played a part in her disappearance.

SEE ALSO: Facebook After Death: What Should the Law Say?

The day after Lai went missing, her body was found in a junk shop. So far, police have arrested a 19-year-old man in connection with the case.

Do you think it's risky to share personal details on social media? Tell us in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Google famously started out as little more than a more efficient algorithm for ranking web pages. But the company also built its success on crawling the web  using software that visits every page in order to build up a vast index of online content.

A nonprofit called Common Crawl is now using its own web crawler and making a giant copy of the web that it makes accessible to anyone. The organization offers up more than 5 billion web pages, available for free so that researchers and entrepreneurs can try things otherwise possible only for those with access to resources on the scale of Googles.

"The web represents, as far as I know, the largest accumulation of knowledge, and theres so much you can build on top, says entrepreneur Gilad Elbaz, who founded Common Crawl. But simply doing the huge amount of work thats necessary to get at all that information is a large blocker; few organizations  have had the resources to do that."

New search engines are just one of the things that can be built using an index of the web, says Elbaz, who points out that Googles translation software was trained using online text available in multiple languages. The only way they could do that was by starting with a massive crawl. Thats put them on the way to build the Star Trek translator, he says. Having an open, shared, corpus of human knowledge is simply a way of democratizing access to information thats fundamental to innovation.

Elbaz says he noticed around five years ago that researchers with new ideas about how to use Web data felt compelled to take jobs at Google because it was the only place they could test those ideas. He says Common Crawls data will make it easier for novel ideas to gain traction, both in the world of startups and in academic research.

Elbaz is the founder and CEO of big data company Factual, and before that founded a company bought by Google to be the basis of its ad business for webpages. Common Crawl also has Googles director of research, Peter Norvig, and MIT Media Lab director Joi Ito on its advisory board.

Common Crawl has so far indexed more than 5 billion pages, adding up to 81 terabytes of data, made available through Amazons cloud computing service. For about $25 a programmer could set up an account with Amazon and get to work crunching Common Crawl data, says Lisa Green, Common Crawls director. The Internet Archive, another nonprofit, also compiles a copy of the web and offers a service called the Wayback Machine that can show old versions of a particular page. However, it doesnt allow anyone to analyze all its data at once in that way.

Common Crawl has already inspired or helped out some new web startups. TinEye, a reverse search engine that finds images similar to one provided by the user, made use of early Common Crawl data to get started. One programmers personal project using Common Crawl data to measure how many of the web's pages connect to Facebook  some 22%, he concluded  led to his securing funding for a startup, Lucky Oyster, based on helping people find useful information in their social data.

Other ideas enabled by the project emerged from a contest run last year that awarded prizes for the best use cases. One of the winners used Wikipedia links in crawl data to build a service capable of defining the meanings of words; another tried to determine public attitudes toward congressional legislation by analyzing the content of online discussions about new laws.

Rich Skrenta, cofounder and CEO of search engine startup Blekko, says Common Crawls data fulfills a definite need in the startup community. He says Blekko has been approached by startups with technology needing access to large collections of online data. That kind of data is now easily available from Common Crawl, says Skrenta, whose company contributed some of its own data to the project in December 2012. Blekko shared information from its system that categorizes Web pages by content, for example labeling whether they contain pornography or spam.

Ben Zhao, an assistant professor at the University of California, Santa Barbara, who uses large collections of web data for research into activity on social sites, says Common Crawls data is likely unique.

"Fresh, large-scale crawls are quite rare, and I am not personally aware of places to get large crawl data on the web," he says.

However, Zhao notes that some of the most interesting and valuable parts of the web wont be well represented in Common Crawls data: "Social sites are quite sensitive about their content these days, and many implement anti-crawling mechanisms to limit the speed anyone can access their content."

To access this data, researchers must strike up relationships with companies and rely on whatever they will release  a route less available to startups who may be seen as competition.

This article originally published at MIT Technology Review here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Jesse Draper is creator and host of The Valley Girl Show, through which she's become a spokesperson for startups and helped pioneer the way of new media content distribution. Formerly a Nickelodeon star, Draper is now CEO of Valley Girl, where she oversees the show and runs technology blog Lalawag.com.

Crane & Canopy is taking the home dcor industry online, and it is starting with bedding. Businesses no longer need the department stores and big brand names to begin selling their products. Chris Sun and Karin Shieh decided to take advantage of this fact. They are cutting out the middle man.

By using the same manufacturers as designers like Vera Wang, Shieh and Sun have sell their 300 thread count and 100% cotton duvets and shams direct to the consumer. The benefit of purchasing through their site? They are selling the same quality for a fraction of the price.

Their master plan is to soon branch out into other home dcor items. But for now, they are owning the bedding space.

More Video from the Valley Girl Show
--------------------------------------------------------------
Apparently, advertising professionals have longed for a safe space where they can anonymously air their grievances. And now there is one.

Browse through The Creative Confessional, and it will make sense why the average creative feels comfortable in this online confession booth, as it helps them blow off steam from the day-to-day struggles and common client gripes in the industry.

Some admissions are more frank and sordid than others, while some are filled with disdain for the ad world. Readers can vote on each confession as to whether to absolve or condemn the person who posted it, and the results are tallied below each post. In this way, the sites readers get to determine whether the complaints are valid or not.

Confessions run the gamut from annoyance with commonplace workplace habits ("I decline to respond to emails that contain the phrase 'please advise.'"), admitted drug use on the job, outright laziness and career disenchantment.

This article originally published at PSFK here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Twitter's new mobile video creation service, Vine, has everyone tweeting their best six-second clips.

Six seconds doesn't give novice filmmakers  err, vinemakers?  much time to work their cinematic magic, but Twitter users have still managed to create some pretty cool snippets.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It's a daily routine for many fathers: dragging the little ones out of bed, helping them get ready for school or packing their lunch.

Derek Benson takes it to a whole new level, combining his passion for art and all things nerdy with his kids' daily meals. Every day, the father of three decorates his children's lunch bags with a new illustration, taking inspiration from shows or books he shares with the family.

Since 2008, Benson has been spending his lunch breaks with Sharpies and oil pastels in hand. Each drawing takes no more than 30 minutes, with something different for each child. His eldest daughter Dana, now 12, isn't too keen on the idea of still taking Daddy's drawings to school, but Benson is illustrating her first novel. Sons Dylan and Liam on the other hand, still get the attention of teachers and classmates with their brown paper bags.

He started out by writing their names, then it got more elaborate, Benson tells Mashable.

"It's a conversation piece and something a little more fun for them to take to class," he says. "It's something to do to keep my skills up and it keeps the kids involved, making them feel like everybody's on the same team here."

 

The lunch bags feature characters ranging from Super Mario to My Neighbor Totoro. He started chronicling his illustrations on his Tumblr, and posts trivia lunch bags for followers to answer. Check out the gallery, above, for more of Benson's drawings.

Much of his inspiration comes from "a lot of nerd stuff" and literary characters. On top of being a painter, Benson is also a video game developer and says he enjoys bonding over illustrations of obscure characters with viewers that recognize them.

SEE ALSO: 10 Glorious Shake My Head Dad Moments

When he first started posting pictures of the bags, he received some criticism from other parents online, who thought a mother with help was behind the drawings.

"It was really strange at first. I didn't say anything about myself when posting so people assumed I was the mom and were saying things like, 'It must be nice to have a maid,'" Benson says. "Then they find out I'm the dad and  hold on  it's praise because I'm so involved. It's really not that big a deal."

Benson's wife, Heather, prepares the kids' lunches while he creates the drawings sometimes days in advance. He works on them in his spare time, sometimes while waiting at the doctor's office.

But what happens when lunch is over? Some bags get thrown away, others are given to classmates, hung up on classroom walls or reused as gift bags. His son even takes requests from girls which, we'd wager, probably doesn't hurt his popularity. 

 

Thumbnail photo courtesy of Photo courtesy of Tumblr, Lunch Bag Art
--------------------------------------------------------------
Some restaurants have started banning customers from taking photos of their food, the New York Times reports, quoting several chefs in New York City.

If other restaurants follow suit, it may signal the demise of "foodstagramming," a popular practice that involves restaurant-goers taking Instagram pictures of their meals, and sharing them online. While some find it silly and annoying, others just can't stop themselves from photographing that juicy steak in front of them.

Policies around food photography vary from restaurant to restaurant; they range from restrictions on using flash to outright bans.

Some people are arrogant about it. They dont understand why. But we explain that its one big table and we want the people around you to enjoy their meal. They pay a lot of money for this meal. It became even a distraction for the chef, said Moe Issa, owner of Chefs Table at Brooklyn Fare.

While not everyone who photographs their food uses Instagram, the photo-sharing service now has 90 million monthly active users, and foodstagramming has become quite the fad.

Are you also guilty of taking photos of your meals? Do you think restaurant owners should ban the practice? Share your thoughts in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Yes, I too am frustrated that Apple has spent more time in the last two years iterating than innovating. Weve come to rely on Apple for the new thing we never knew we needed and, instead, we get the somewhat better thing we probably want anyway. This, along with seismic changes at the top, the loss of Steve Jobs and growing dissatisfaction with CEO Tim Cooks leadership has led us here  to a moment where Apple could stop being the most valuable company in the world.

Apple is still successful. It reported record revenue, sold millions of devices and has a boatload of cash in the U.S. and offshore. It can still take something like the iPad mini, the most expensive of all around 7-inch tablets and sell it as if it were water in the desert.

I was kind of hard on Apple for its decision to ignore the market and vastly overprice the iPad mini, but I did say it was beautiful. In fact, its almost shamefully so. Put the mini next to any competing 7-inch tablet and there is no comparison. Apple built the mid-size tablet as it should be: exquisitely thin and light and highly usable. Other tablets have more power, but nothing feels like the mini. iPad mini owners have told me so. They also surprised me by using the smaller tablet for productivity. For them, this was not a tablet with deficits, it was the tablet they had been waiting for.

Apple sold 22.9 million iPads last quarter, but refuses to break down how many for each model. On the other hand, they sold 15.4 million a year ago, so it stands to reason that the iPad mini accounts for at least a portion of the additional 7 million. In fact, Id bet that the mini has dug into the traditional iPad share a bit. Thats probably OK with Apple. The whole idea of the mini was to offer variety and satisfy those who thought the full-size iPad was too big and heavy. I know that sounds crazy, but more than one Mini owner told me they chose it for just that reason: They wanted an iPad, but thought it was too big.

In short, I think the mini is a success.

Similarly, Apple sold 10 million more iPhones than it did the year prior. The iPhone 5 is clearly at the heart of that success story.

For any other company, this kind of success would be lauded. Unfortunately, Apple is not just any company. It led on the innovation front for far too long.

The question people are asking now is if Apple can ever introduce another iPhone, iPod, iTunes, iPad or MacBook Air again. Each of these products redefined an industry. The clear-headed among us understand that not a single one was an entirely new idea. They were all reinventions and refashionings of decent and even failed ideas.

Some insist Apple TV is the answer. Apple must finally launch its own TV set. Personally, I wish people would stop talking about an Apple TV. Its my least favorite idea for the tech marvel. When I mentioned it to tech execs at CES 2013, most agreed it was a terrible business to get into with absolutely horrific margins. Apple will not be able to control the entire experience because it has to share the interface with cable and satellite companies  a situation thats an anathema to everything Apple stands for.

This is not to say Apple wont do it. Tim Cook has offered every indication that they will, but I remain skeptical that they can do it successfully.

Ive long believed that theres a whiteboard somewhere in the back halls of 1 Infinite Loop, covered with all of the late Steve Jobs' craziest and most profound ideas. Apple TV is certainly on there, but I also think there are other wilder ideas. Apples always collecting new patents for strange new interfaces, power sources, connectors, small ideas that could lead to big, unusual new products.

Apples iterative strategy is, obviously, not a recipe for long-term success. You have to bring something new to the table, especially when a large chunk of your business is disappearing. Did anyone take a good look at the 16% and 15% drop off in revenue for, respectively, Macs and iPods? The rapid decline of the desktop PC business (and somewhat slower decline of laptops) will only accelerate over the next few years. Apple needs something new to fill that gap.

Yet, I have this gut feeling (based on 27 years of experience in the industry) that Apple and Tim Cook are going to surprise us in 2013. Sure, well see more iteration  thats a natural part of the tech business. However, I think Apple has something big up its sleeve. We may not see it in the spring, but by June or July, well be talking about Apples first major innovation in nearly three years.

I believe this to be true, not just because I like it when Apple delivers the goods, but because I think Steve Jobs set Apple up with a raft of big ideas, and Tim Cook is a better CEO than people think. And no, I do not believe Jonathan Ive is the right guy to run Apple.

When that happens - and it will - this stock dip and deep uncertainty about Apples future will be nothing but a blip, no more than a reflection on the surface of the next great gadget Apple delivers.
--------------------------------------------------------------
An Arizona energy provider is charging its customers an additional monthly rate to make up for a decline in sales, ABC 15 reports.

APS, the Phoenix metro area-based provider, informed its customers of the upcoming charges  which will officially begin in March  in their January bills. The reason for lower sales, according to the statement, is an increasing number of customers utilizing energy efficient appliances, such as solar powered systems and compact fluorescent light bulbs.

In other words: customers are saving a little too much energy.

A photo of the announcement, above, was posted on Reddit by user graykat777 on Wednesday night. Part of the statement says:

In May 2012, the Arizona Corporation Commission (ACC) approved new rates for APS. Because more customers are installing renewable energy systems such as solar and wind, and energy efficiency measures such as compact fluorescent light bulbs and refrigerator recycling, APS is selling less electricity, but fixed costs remain. APS is allowed to implement a new charge to recover a portion of the fixed costs

Greg Balas, a customer service representative for APS, said the charges are essential for meeting a goal established by the ACC.

"We have fixed costs for power poles, wires, infrastructure  things like that," he told Mashable. "Without the help of customers in meeting those goals, we can't provide the energy."

The fees are relatively small. Customers have two options: the Lost Fixed Cost Recovery (LFCR) or Flat Charge. The LFCR adds an extra 0.29% of a customer's total bill, before taxes, to their amount each month. The Flat Charge varies on a customer's total kilowatt usage. If a customer uses between 0 to 400 kilowatts each month, for example, they'll be charged an additional 60 cents; any usage over 200,000 kilowatts amounts to around $6 extra per month. (According to the U.S. Energy Information Administration, the average American customer used 958 kilowatts per month in 2010.)

At the time of writing, there wasn't a press release or official announcement posted on APS' website. Read the full announcement here.

SEE ALSO: 4 Smart Thermostats That Save Energy and Money

What do you think of the fee? Or, better yet, are you an APS customer who will soon be affected by the charges? Let us know below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The pilot behind the controls during a daring airborne stunt seen in a YouTube video gone viral is under investigation by the Federal Aviation Administration, according to local media reports.

Stunt pilot Jason Newburg is being probed for the high-speed low pass involving a land vehicle, which was captured by a person on the ground at Lancaster Regional Airport in Lancaster, Texas. It was soon after uploaded to YouTube, reports NBC 5.

Normal FAA rules forbid the low-altitude flying demonstrated in the video, especially when people are in harm's way. FAA regulations specifically state that "no person may operate an aircraft in a careless or reckless manner so as to endanger the life or property of another."

SEE ALSO: Watch This Near-Death Experience With a Biplane

The FAA does, however, grant waivers for stunt pilots. A Lancaster city manager told NBC 5 that Newburg has a valid waiver for practicing daring maneuvers, but the FAA told the station their copy of Newburg's waiver carries a November 2012 expiration date.

"Even with a waiver, there a requirement that people on the ground not be endangered," FAA spokesman Lynn Lunsford told NBC 5.

Newburg has defended the video, telling NBC 5 that "this was a structured shoot, and some people don't understand that."

"All of the people at the practice were briefed and were part of the crew," he continued.

Newburg, 43, is a veteran stunt pilot who often incorporates ground vehicles into his aerial acrobatics routine, as seen in videos of his past performances:

In the clip most recently gone viral, Newburg is flying a Pitts Special, a biplane specifically designed for aerobatic stunt flying. Does the video show reckless behavior by a stunt pilot, or is Newburg in the clear? Share your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Facebook has blocked Twitters new Vine app from being able to find your Facebook friends on the service.

The app launched this morning, and previously offered users a way to see which of their Twitter and Facebook friends were also using the service, in addition to contacts stored in their phone.

A request to search for Facebook friends on Vine now yields a pop-up message indicating that the app is not authorized to make the Facebook request. The dialog box was first spotted by a Verge reader.

A Twitter spokesperson told Mashable the company didnt have anything to share beyond that notification. We've reached out to Facebook for comment.

We're also currently unable to share videos from Vine on Facebook. While we did not receive an error message to this effect, videos shared from the app have still not appeared on our timeline.

Vine has been experiencing considerable delays posting to social networks  including Twitter  so its possible that videos are just severely delayed rather than disabled.

In July, Twitter did a similar thing to Facebook's Instagram, blocking the service from using its API to find friends on the service. In December, Instagram retaliated, removing support for Twitter cards.

Is this another sign of war between Twitter and Facebook? Give us your take in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A tortoise-shell cat similar to the one pictured above became separated from its family in Daytona Beach, Fla., and then managed to find its way to West Palm Beach after a two-month, nearly 200-mile journey.

The four-year-old indoor cat, named Holly, is owned by Jacob Richter, 70, and Bonnie Richter, 63, who began traveling around in an R.V. with Holly last year. During a vacation this past November to Daytona, the cat dashed out an opened door. The Richters called local animal agencies and posted fliers, but Holly never turned up. They returned home. Two weeks later, an animal rescue worker called the Richters to tell them that a cat resembling Holly had been sited in Daytona.

And then nearly two months later, on New Years Eve, a woman who lived about a mile away from the Richters found an underweight, dehydrated and weakened cat in her backyard who could barely meow. The woman, Barb Mazzola, and her children fed and cared for the cat for six days, finally coaxing it into the house. Mazzola took the cat to a vet, who scanned it for an implanted microchip. Indeed, there was a chip, which lead directly back to the Richters.

How an indoor cat made such a long journey across unfamiliar territory is a mystery.

I really believe these stories, but theyre just hard to explain, Marc Bekoff, a behavioral ecologist at the University of Colorado told the New York Times. Maybe being street-smart, maybe reading animal cues, maybe being able to read cars, maybe being a good hunter. I have no data for this.

Back in September, 2011, Willow the cat (pictured above) was found in New York City fives years after she went missing in Boulder, Co. How Williow got to the Big Apple remains a mystery, but she was also positively identified thanks to an implanted microchip.

SEE ALSO: Why Cats, Other Carnivores, Dont Taste Sweets

But how domestic cats find their way is not something researchers devote much time to studying. A handful of experiments, however, give clues. Back in 1954, British cat biologist, Roger Tabor placed cats in a covered circular maze that had exits every 15 degrees. Most of the cats used the exit that pointed in the direction of their homes. And more recently, researchers in the Kitty Cams Project attached video cameras to 55 pet cats and recorded their behavior. The study found that some cats visited other homes for food and affection, crossed roads and ate and drank things from the wild.

Hollys mother was feral and its possible that Holly has some wild cat instincts, but how she found her way home is still a mystery. Only Holly knows what happened those two months and shes not saying a word.

This article originally published at Discovery News here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Foursquare's site is down and has been since at least 07:07 a.m. ET, as officially acknowledged by Foursquare on its status blog.

An update posted at 8:35 a.m. ET (though the update says p.m., we believe it's an error) says Foursquare is "working to identify the cause of the outage" and promises another update "soon."

We'll keep you posted as soon as we find out more about this outage; in the meantime, it looks we'll all have to put our checkins on halt.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Google has revamped its image search for faster and better results, the company announced Wednesday.

In the next few days, images will be displayed in an inline panel so that users can quickly flip through a set of images using their keyboard, Google announced in a blog post.

"Based on feedback from users and webmasters, we redesigned Google Images to provide a better search experience," Hongyi Li, Google's associate product manager, wrote.

As a result, it will be "faster, more beautiful and more reliable," he added.

With Google's updated image search, users will see one main image framed by a display of smaller images above and below.

What's more, rather than getting sent to a separate landing page, users will see image metadata (or information) directly underneath the image. The title of the page hosting the image, the domain name it comes from and the image size will also be featured "much more prominently" next to the image, Li said.

SEE ALSO: Explicit Images on Google: Now Harder to Find

Google Images currently shows a grid of thumbnails. Users must hover their cursor over a photo to see metadata. They must click on the image to enlarge it, and then click again to visit the host site.

For more on the changes, read Google's entire blog post here.

What do you think of the redesigned image search? Tell us in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Google revealed Wednesday that it always requires a search warrant whenever authorities seek access to the content of a user's emails or documents stored in Google's cloud, Wired reported.

The company's insistence in asking for a warrant is seemingly against current law. Particularly, the Electronic Communications Privacy Act, which allows authorities to get access to information stored on a server for more than 180 days with a simple subpoena. The law states that if there are "reasonable grounds to believe" that the information could be useful as part of an investigation, there's no need for a judge's intervention.

The law was passed in 1986, when emails were deleted from servers every time a user downloaded them  and cloud storage wasn't even in the wildest dreams of a computer scientist. According to the law, emails left on a server for more than six months were considered abandoned, and thus freely accessible to authorities. Nowadays, critics say, with the advent of cloud based storage, the law is out of date. That seems to be Google's thinking as well.

"Google requires an ECPA search warrant for contents of Gmail and other services based on the Fourth Amendment to the Constitution, which prevents unreasonable search and seizure, Chris Gaither, a Google spokesman told Wired's blog Threat Level.

The search giant can afford to do that because there have been a series of conflicting court rulings that have interpreted the ECPA and the Fourth Amendment in different ways. In 2010, a federal appeals court weighed in on the matter. The 6th U.S. Circuit Court of Appeals ruled that the government must have a valid warrant to access email content stored on a provider's server. The judges wrote that email content shouldn't be treated differently than phone calls and letters  which can't be accessed without a warrant.

SEE ALSO: Google: Police Requests for User Data Up 70% Since 2009

"Given the fundamental similarities between email and traditional forms of communication, it would defy common sense to afford emails lesser Fourth Amendment protection," the ruling read. "First, the very fact that information is being passed through a communications network is a paramount Fourth Amendment consideration. [...] Second, the Fourth Amendment must keep pace with the inexorable march of technological progress, or its guarantees will wither and perish."

This decision was followed by two different court cases in 2012, one in Kansas and the other in Minnesota. None of the cases, however, set a national precedent, and the Supreme Court has not yet ruled on the matter.

These decisions give Google some leeway to protect its users' privacy. "Law enforcement agencies must be able to pursue illegal activity and keep the public safe. But its just as important that laws protect our users against overly broad requests for their personal information," Gaither wrote in an email statement to Mashable. "Respect for the privacy and security of data that users store with Google underpins our approach. Before complying with a government request, we make sure it follows the law and Google's policies."

Google does turn over some information to the authorities without requiring a warrant, the so-called email metadata. That is, things like the names users provide when creating accounts, IP addresses of the computer where the account was created, what time and where somebody signs in or out of a Google account, the non-content part of emails like the addressee and sender, its date, and the IP address used to send a particular email.

Repeated legislative efforts to review the ECPA have so far faltered. The most recent attempt, led by the Senate Judiciary Committee, added email protections to the so-called Netflix bill. The provisions, which would have required authorities to get a warrant whenever they wanted to access a suspect's email, were stripped out of the bill when it was approved at the end of 2012.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Twitter launched Vine on Thursday  an app that lets you share 6-second video clips.

Currently iOS-only, the stop-motion videos can include as many scenes as you can fit in. Video stops and starts when you press on your devices screen. Your finished product can then be shared just on Vine, or with friends on Twitter or  in theory  Facebook.

Still in its infancy, the service isnt without drawbacks. Sharing for instance can only be done when the video is initially uploaded. So if you forget to select that Twitter button when you upload your followers will be out of luck forever.

Thursday at least, uploading those videos to social networks also takes a bit of time. Some of our videos went up immediately, while others took close to an hour.

Sound is also recorded along with each video clip. While thats not a huge deal if youre recording in a quiet location, video recorded where theres a lot of noise can sound choppy and be jarring for viewers. (Videos play automatically in Twitter, but the default setting appears to be on mute.)

And then theres Twitter's relationship with Facebook. A few hours after the apps launch Thursday Facebook blocked the service from being able to access your friends lists.

Knowing which of your Facebook friends are using Vine isnt essential to the service, but it does tend to make finding those friends - who you might not be connected to on Twitter - that much harder.

Have you tried Vine out yet? Let us know what you think about the app in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Many Hollywood stars have attempted the crossover from actor to musician, but what's more surprising is how many, albeit not known for their singing ability, have recorded songs for film soundtracks.

Whether it's Colin Farrell belting out a country track or Sylvester Stallone crooning a smooth, jazzy number, you'll be amazed who has contributed to Hollywood soundtracks.

SEE ALSO: 10 Crazy Ways to Use a GoPro

Take a look through the clips in the gallery above. Let us know in the comments below about any other actors-come-soundtrack-singers you know about.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A hypersonic "SpaceLiner" would whisk up to 50 passengers from Europe to Australia in 90 minutes. The futuristic vehicle would do so by riding a rocket into Earth's upper atmosphere, reaching 24 times the speed of sound before gliding in for a landing.

Many challenges still remain, including finding the right shape for the vehicle, said Martin Sippel, project coordinator for SpaceLiner at the German Aerospace Center. But he suggested the project could make enough progress to begin attracting private funding in another 10 years and aim for full operations by 2050.

The current concept includes a rocket booster stage for launch and a separate orbiter stage to carry passengers halfway around the world without ever making it to space. Flight times between the U.S. and Europe could fall to just over an hour if the SpaceLiner takes off  that is, if passengers don't mind paying the equivalent of space tourism prices around several hundred thousand dollars.

"Maybe we can best characterize the SpaceLiner by saying it's a kind of second-generation space shuttle, but with a completely different task," Sippel said.

SpaceLiner passengers would have eight minutes to experience the rocket launch before they reached an altitude of about 47 to 50 miles (75 to 80 kilometers). That falls short of the 62-mile (100-km) boundary considered the edge of space, but even a suborbital flight would allow SpaceLiner to glide back to Earth at hypersonic speeds of more than 15,000 mph (25,200 kph).

The rocket-powered design stands out compared with other proposed hypersonic jets, which feature new air-breathing engine concepts. European aerospace giant EADS previously unveiled a hypersonic jet concept that would rely mainly upon air-breathing ramjets to reach cruising speeds of Mach 4  faster than the supersonic Concorde's Mach 2 performances but far slower than the SpaceLiner's Mach 24 goal.

SpaceLiner's European project planners say their reliance upon proven rocket technology could allow their vehicle to fly sooner rather than later. They plan to use liquid oxygen and hydrogen rocket propellants so that the rocket engines leave only water vapor and hydrogen in the atmosphere.

SEE ALSO: Video: How DARPA's HTV-2 Hypersonic Bomber Test Works

"We will not try to improve the performance of the engine but would like to have it more reusable," Sippel told TechNewsDaily.

The empty rocket stage from SpaceLiner would return to Earth immediately after launch in preparation for reuse. An aircraft could grab the rocket stage in midair, tow it toward an airfield and release it for an autonomous gliding landing.

But big challenges remain before SpaceLiner can take off. Researchers first must finalize a design shape capable of surviving the intense heat created by gliding at hypersonic speeds through the upper atmosphere. New cooling technologies and improved heat shielding for SpaceLiner's wing "leading edge" could help in that case.

Launching like a rocket rather than taking off like an aircraft means SpaceLiner would remain restricted to suitable launch sites with uninhabited areas down range. The SpaceLiner also would need a careful flight path during its final landing approach  the "sonic boom" shock that accompanies aircraft traveling faster than the speed of sound can damage buildings on the ground at low altitudes.

"The profile of the vehicle is very similar to a rocket-propelled vehicle," Sippel explained. "We only have a small corridor in which we can fly safely and economically."

SpaceLiner's design will make use of study results from a FAST20XX (Future High-Altitude High-Speed Transport 20XX) project funded by the European Union and backed by researchers from Germany, Austria, Spain, Switzerland, Italy, Belgium, the Netherlands, France and Sweden. It can also draw lessons from upcoming efforts such as Project ALPHA by Aerospace Innovation GmbH  a space plane that aims to launch in midair from an Airbus A330 aircraft.

But future success ultimately depends upon the success of space tourism efforts by companies such as Virgin Galactic. If enough people prove willing to pay top dollar for suborbital flights as part of their travels around the world, Sippel envisions a fleet of SpaceLiners eventually making 10 to 15 flights per day.

This article originally published at TechNewsDaily here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Biofilms  groups of microorganisms that adhere to a surface  can be a real problem. When bacteria form a biofilm, it's difficult to treat since the cells are so densely packed. But now IBM has created a new substance that can break through biofilms such as plaque and drug-resistant bacteria, killing them while not harming humans.

IBM Research and the Institute of Bioengineering and Nanotechnology created a antimicrobial hydrogel  a highly absorbent substance made from synthetic polymers  that annihilates bacterial biofilms on contact. IBM claims the hydrogel is 100% efficient in destroying biofilms. The gel forms spontaneously when heated to body temperature. It's also biodegradable and non-toxic.

The image below demonstrates the gel's effectiveness. According to IBM, on the left is a mature and healthy biofilm. The photo on the right shows the same biofilm after the hydrogel is applied. IBM says the small portion of cells that remain have drastically disrupted membrane, preventing resistance.

The hydrogel has clear applications in medicine, and IBM says it could be a tool hospital workers use to reduce health hazards. For example, biofilms build up on catheters quickly, so they need to be changed frequently. A catheter treated with the hydrogel, however, would prevent the biofilm from forming, reducing the risk of infection and letting the hospital change it less often.

Hospitals are notorious for being breeding grounds for infection, and biofilms are a contributing factor. The discovery could potentially put a dent in hospital-acquired infections, which the US Department of Health and Human Services says is one of the top five causes of death in the country.

SEE ALSO: IBM Unveils Groundbreaking Technology to Reduce Traffic Jams on the Road

IBM says the it helped create the hydrogel through processes that were originally used in semiconductor manufacturing. The company's "nanomedicine" program began four years ago and looks for ways to apply IBM's decades of research (and massive patent portfolio) to improve medicine.

Image courtesy of the Institute of Bioengineering and Nanotechnology
--------------------------------------------------------------
New York's Intrepid Sea, Air & Space Museum wants your pictures for a new exhibition on the Space Shuttle Enterprise. Yes, you heard that right. One of your photos or Instagrams of the famous shuttle has a chance to go on display at the new exhibit "Space Shuttle Enterprise: A Pioneer."

Elaine Charnov, the VP of exhibitions at the Intrepid Museum told Mashable that some of the crowdsourced pictures will be shown on a screen at the entrance of the Shuttle Pavilion, which was destroyed by Superstorm Sandy.

You can upload your pictures here or via Instagram or Twitter, using the hashtag #IntrepidShuttle.

Why crowdsourcing? "I thought that given how many people online had been uploading various images of Enterprise and were clearly so impassioned by the story of its arrival," Charnov said in a phone interview, "it seemed like a fabulous opportunity to harness all that enthusiasm and to have an element of the exhibition that was really kind of citizen-generated."

The museum is also asking people to add a description or a commentary to their pictures. Sometimes, explains Charnov, the caption can be more important than the picture itself. Referring to someone who wrote "geek heaven" along with their photograph, Charnov said that a quip like that "just captures the electricity and excitement of the public" for the Enterprise when it sailedand flew around New York (or when it rolled through the California desert in 1977).

The museum will choose the best pictures and the ones with the best captions, making sure they are relevant to the exhibit and free of inappropriate language.

If you want to participate in this crowdsourcing campaign, visit the site, where some of the pictures will be featured as well.

SEE ALSO: Space Shuttle Enterprise Arrives at the Intrepid
--------------------------------------------------------------
You may soon see Rosie the Robot strolling the halls of more hospitals now that iRobot's remote presence robot has been given official FDA clearance. The Remote Presence Virtual + Independent Telemedicine Assistant, or RP-VITA for short, is the first autonomous navigation remote presence robot to receive FDA clearance for use in hospitals.

The RP-VITA was made by iRobot, makers of the Roomba vacuum cleaner robot, in conjunction with InTouch Health, a provider of telemedicine solutions. We first told you about the medical robot this past summer when it started trial rounds in several hospitals.

The robot is designed to allow medical specialists to communicate remotely with patients. Using an iPad interface and sensors to navigate, the doctor can maneuver the hospital corridors virtually by tapping on locations he or she wants the robot to go to.

This is a step-up from InTouch's earlier medical robot, the RP-7, which is in use in over 600 hospitals across the country. That one requires the use of a joystick to operate. With RP-VITA, the doctor controls the robot's movements using an iPad. Yulun Wang, chairman and CEO of InTouch Health, tells Mashable the doctor on the other end can split the screen so the top half is a video image as seen through the robot, and the bottom half can be a map. Tap on a location on the map and the robot navigates there.

SEE ALSO: This App Turns Your Phone Into a Virtual Urgent Care Center

Wang tells us the robot has an "environmental awareness, so it can see what's going on around it and act accordingly."

"FDA clearance of a robot that can move safely and independently through a fast-paced, chaotic and demanding hospital environment is a significant technological milestone for the robotics and healthcare industries, said Colin Angle, chairman and CEO of iRobot.

As companies work to make health care more affordable and accessible, we can expect to see a push towards adoption of virtual health care and telepresence. We saw many instances of this at the recent International CES, where a virtual medical kiosk was among the telehealth items on display.

Wang agrees, saying, "as adoption grows, [telepresence] can become pervasive in health care delivery."

How would you feel about being treated by a virtual doctor? Would you like to see robots in hospitals? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
[UPDATE: The story is now official. Read about George Lucas' announcement here.]

It seems Star Wars Episode VII has found its director.

According to multiple Hollywood outlets, the job has been offered to J.J. Abrams  creator of Alias and Lost, and director of both the rebooted and the upcoming Star Trek movies.

That in itself may present a problem. Star Trek's rights are owned by Disney rival Paramount; that studio, along with many fans, will not want to see the two series united under a single director.

But the directorship of the next episode of Star Wars, due in 2015, is a "done deal" between Disney and Abrams, according to reports from Hollywood blogs Deadline, The Hollywood Reporter and The Wrap, which reported the story first. Variety also carried the report, but without offering sources. Lucasfilm and Disney spokespeople did not return calls for comment.

"Lucasfilm Chief Kathleen Kennedy has been courting Abrams," claims The Wrap. We imagine she'd be a hard person to turn down; Kennedy has been involved in producing mega-hits from E.T. and Jurassic Park to Lincoln. But color us a little skeptical; after all, Abrams has already said publicly that he isn't interested in the job  denying it to Empire magazine and Entertainment Weekly. "I have some original stuff I am working on next," he told EW.

There were the very early conversations and I quickly said that because of my loyalty to Star Trek, and also just being a fan, I wouldn't even want to be involved in the next version of those things. I declined any involvement very early on. I'd rather be in the audience not knowing what was coming, rather than being involved in the minutiae of making them.

Abrams may not have that luxury any longer. We'll update this story as we hear more. But would you want to see Star Wars and Star Trek directed by the same guy? Give us your take in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Ever since Volkswagen introduced "The Force," its 2011 Super Bowl spot, there has been intense fascination about how the brand can possibly top it.

Though the brand's "The Bark Side" Super Bowl teaser was one of the most-shared ads of the year, the company's actual Super Bowl ad didn't do as well.

Judging by this 2013 Super Bowl teaser, VW is going in a completely different direction. The ad features various people having emotional meltdowns on YouTube, including eHarmony's crazy cat lady, political candidate Phil Davidson and Sad Football Fan.

As reggae legend Jimmy Cliff puts his own spin on The Partridge Family's theme song, the formerly freaked out converge on a picturesque meadow a la Coke's "Mountaintop" ad.

Thematically, it's more in keeping with VW's recent emphasis on upbeat fans' stories than on the Force. In other words, it's probably not going to be the Star Wars fix you're looking for.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Justin Timberlake's "Suit & Tie" lyric video premiered Thursday morning, and it's filled with pop-up animations and rotating lyrics intertwined with footage of a dapper Timberlake.

Lyric videos, which are created to help fans memorize lyrics and to build suspense for artists' actual music videos, typically don't feature the songs' artists. Some include photos, but "Suit & Tie" strays from the norm, showcasing new clips of Timberlake throughout the video.

Timberlake released a teaser for this lyric video on Wednesday before unleashing the full version, which at the end touts his forthcoming "20/20 Experience" musical project.

The song featuring Jay-Z recently broke airplay records and globally charted atop iTunes top-selling singles rankings in its debut week.

SEE ALSO: Prince Returns With New Song 'Screwdriver' and Lyric Video

Timberlake had teased a musical comeback this month only several days before releasing the song on iTunes on the same night as the Golden Globes.

In conjunction with the release, he put this letter on Countdown.JustinTimberlake.com:

I hope this gets to you the right way. It's the only way I know to do it. Some people may criticize me for the last 3 days. But it was fun, right?? Right?!?! Besides, I'd rather speak directly to all of you. And, who can knock me for having a little bit of fun with it? Well... No more teasing. Although, it was A LOT of fun. (Did I mention that I'm having fun with this?? Ha!) This year is an exciting one for me. As you probably have heard through the "grapevine," I'm gearing up for a big 2013. Back in June of last year, I quietly started working on what is now, my next journey with that thing I love called MUSIC. The inspiration for this really came out of the blue and to be honest, I didn't expect anything out of it. I just went into the studio and started playing around with some sounds and songs. It was probably the best time I've had in my career... Just creating with no rules and/or end goal in mind and really enjoying the process. What I came up with is something I couldn't be more excited about! It is full of inspiration that I grew up listening to and some newfound muses that I've discovered along the way. I'm calling it "The 20/20 Experience," and it's coming out this year. I hope you enjoy listening to it as much as I enjoyed making it. That's all I'm giving you for now... I know, I know! Again, with the teasing!!! Get ready. This is going to be fun (well, at least it is for me).
--------------------------------------------------------------
The most successful athletes and coaches spend hours studying game film, both of themselves and of their opponents. All professional-level and most high-level college teams employ entire crews of specialists to film and break down footage of games.

For high schools and smaller college programs, however, video capabilities vary from team to team. A New York startup is trying to level the playing field.

Krossover offers its service for basketball, football and lacrosse teams of all levels. In essence, it is an outsourced video crew. Coaches can send game footage and roster information to Krossover.

"What they get back from us the next day is the equivalent of what a NBA or NFL team gets from their ocean of video coordinators," Krossover CEO Vasu Kulkarni tells Mashable.

Krossover's analysts break the game footage into individual plays, then catalogue each one by type. Coaches and players can sort through the plays, separating them by any number of categories.

Another feature allows a coach or player to build compilations of selected plays, making it easy for players to send highlight reels to colleges during the recruiting process, and for coaches to aggregate certain types of plays for teaching purposes.

"Now you've gone, as a coach or a kid, from having raw footage to having your own highlight reel in about 30 seconds," Kulkarni says.

The service also produces a statistics sheet that includes advanced metrics. For instance, a basketball team's Krossover stat sheet would show all the normal figures, such as points, rebounds and assists, in addition to advanced stats, such as charges and deflections.

SEE ALSO: Check Out the Sports Floor From the Future

Sean McInnis has been coaching high school basketball for more than 20 years. He became Krossover's first customer after meeting Kulkarni, who was promoting a demo version of the product at a Las Vegas coaching clinic in 2010. McInnis had recently taken over as the coach of the varsity boys basketball team at King Philip Regional High School in Massachusetts. The team had not won a game in more than three seasons, losing more than 60 consecutively.

"When I show it to other coaches, they can't believe what it does," McInnis tells Mashable. "We absolutely love it."

McInnis was so enthusiastic about Krossover that he paid for the service using his own money. King Philip improved its record to 14-8 during the 2010-11 season, and made it within one game of the state championship. As you might expect, McInnis has continued paying for the service, using his own money, each year since.

The University of Kentucky mens basketball team, last year's NCAA National Champion, also uses Krossover.

Most high-level programs like Kentucky employ video teams to analyze their own games and even most opponents' games. Kulkarni says teams like Kentucky may find Krossover to be a useful tool to scout lesser-known opponents.

"We can, overnight, have 10 games broken down," he says. "That's where we add a lot of value to larger programs."

As far as pro teams, it is unlikely any of them are going to trade in their video crews for Krossover's anytime soon. The company is currently pursuing other inroads into the professional market.

For instance, Krossover is working on apps that use the sports equivalent of big data to help players improve their "basketball IQ." It keeps a database of every single play from every game it has broken down. That database currently has more than 10 million clips.

"We can repurpose all of this content as a teaching and a training tool," Kulkarni says.

Though he cannot indicate which, Kulkarni says several NBA teams are currently testing beta versions of these training apps.

As for its film parsing services, Krossover has grown from just one client in the summer of 2010 to more than 1,000 today. About 75% of its business comes from high school basketball teams, and 20% comes from high school football teams and college basketball teams. The remaining 10% is comprised of lacrosse teams.

For more information on Krossover and to see a demonstration of the app, check out the video above.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Restaurant patrons often have picky requests for waiters, like moving tables because of a draft or ordering a rare  but not too rare  steak. But those fussy needs don't compare to those of a party of four at Laurenzo's steakhouse in Houston, Texas, who told a waiter, "Special needs kids should be kept in special places."

The Laurenzo's waiter, Michael Garcia, refused to serve the party, who complained that they'd been seated next to a family with a son who has Down syndrome. The customers were moved out of his section and subsequently left the restaurant. Garcia is now being showered with love on Facebook for standing up to the insensitive customers.

"Thank you, Mr. Garcia, for standing up for a kid with special needs," wrote Justine Witkowski on Laurenzo's Facebook page. "You didn't have to, but what a wonderful thing! I wish there were more people in this world like you!! Too bad I don't live in Houston. From an Illinois mom with a kid that has special needs!"

Garcia admitted to Houston publication Whine and Dine that he feared getting fired when he first refused to serve the family of four.

SEE ALSO: Death of Foodstagram? Restaurants Ban Taking Food Pics

"Did he just say that in front of his own children?" Garcia said, recalling the customer's comment. "I had considered whether or not I would lose my job, but I knew it wasn't right. I could find another job and my guests would follow me."

Kim Castillo, the mother of the boy with Down syndrom, Milo, also wrote about the experience to Whine and Dine:

"Tonight was a first. Dinner at Laurenzo's and a family of 4 asked to be moved from the booth next to us. I didn't think that much about it but shortly after they left the restaurant entirely, glancing at our table as they left (thought I was being paranoid). As it turns out they told the waiter, 'special needs kids should be kept in special places.' The waiter promptly told them he was offended by their comment and refused to serve them. Yay for people like Michael, Candace and Eric at Laurenzo's (also waiters who everyone should go tip heavily) who not only love (my son) Milo for who he is  a customer and little boy with Down syndrome, but stand up for him no matter what."
--------------------------------------------------------------
North America's first Lego-themed hotel is being built next to the Legoland amusement park in Carlsbad, Calif., giving brick-loving kids (and kids at heart) a place to doze after bulldozing.

The hotel will feature rooms and suites tailored for three different Lego themes: Adventure, Pirate and Kingdom. What's more, large sculptures built entirely out of Legos, as well as interactive Lego features and play areas will be scattered throughout the premises. Other amenities include themed elevators, a buffet restaurant and a themed swimming pool.

The Lego hotel is set to open this April. Check out the video tour, above; then, tell us what you think in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Got a question for Beck? Use the chat feature above to get it answered live.

Justin Beck is the co-founder and CEO of PerBlue, a mobile and social gaming company in Madison, Wis. The company is best known for its flagship product, Parallel Kingdom, the first location-based RPG. Beck is a passionate software developer and entrepreneur. As CEO, Beck has grown PerBlue from a group of five college friends to a team of 40 full-time employees.

Prior to starting PerBlue, Beck held software engineer and program manager positions at Microsoft and Google. He graduated from the University of Wisconsin with degrees in computer engineering and computer science.

#StartupLab is a free virtual mentorship program created by The Young Entrepreneur Council (YEC), an invite-only organization comprised of hundreds of Americas most successful young entrepreneurs. #StartupLab takes YEC's mission to help more people start successful businesses to the next level by offering millions of entrepreneurs direct access to YEC members through interactive video chats, email lessons and a library of how-to articles, videos and eBooks. Whether you're just starting up, a current business owner, or you run an organization that supports entrepreneurs, sign up for #StartupLab today for real-world advice from some of the coolest entrepreneurs on the planet.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Logitech announced disappointing earnings for its Q3 2013 fiscal period. Sales were down 14% year-over-year and the company reported a net loss of $195 million ($1.24) per share.

As a result, CEO Bracken Darrell is focused on making serious changes to Logitech's business. On the earnings call following the release, Darrell set out a bold set of plans for the business that include selling off the Harmony remote business and doubling down on mobile and tablets.

On the earnings call, Darrell noted that, "[Logitech's] Q3 results were unacceptable." He cited the weakness in the global market for new PCs and the "slow transition to Windows 8" as major factors in the results.

"The PC market," Darrell said, "has changed dramatically in the last two years and in my assessment we haven't evolved as quickly as we need to. With that in mind I am now focused on transitioning Logitech to become a faster and more profitable company."

That transition includes a hard look at all areas of Logitech's business. On the PC side, the company will look at performance over the next one to two quarters and if things don't improve, the company will "decisively scale back spending" in that area.

When it comes to remotes, Logitech Harmony sales were down 24% with units declining by 55%. Even more distressing, the high end of the market increased just 4%. This was in spite of the launch of the Harmony Touch, a high-end remote that I personally love, whose place in the current gadget landscape is no longer clear.

Darrell said that given these figures, the company "does not have the luxury of waiting a few more quarters to see its sales improve. We simply can no longer justify the ongoing investment in this category given the current state of our business and the dynamics of that niche market."

Logitech is already seeking active buyers in its remote and digital video security business. Moreover, its LifeSize division is also being evaluated to see where it fits within the current company structure.

The one bright spot in Logitech's lineup is with mobile products, specifically with tablet accessories. Logitech's bet-selling product across all product categories was its Ultrathin Keyboard Cover

Darrell acknowledges that the company has been "far too slow in bringing products to market and too slow within the space in general." As a result, the company now has an established tablet accessory team in China aimed with building relationships with suppliers in order to better anticipate market directions.

In addition to tablets, the company is also focusing on music, building on the success of its wireless speakers for smartphones and tablets.

Listening to Darrell clearly assess the problems within Logitech, I got the sense that he most certainly recognizes the challenges the company faces in the future.

The decision to get out of the remote and home security businesses isn't one Logitech is taking lightly. Answering a question from an analyst, Darrell acknowledged that the remote control business  for example  could be a very attractive business. Still, right now, Logitech has to focus on where it can have the strongest profitability and growth.

As an outsider to the business, I can say that the products I've seen from Logitech over the last quarter have been some of the best to come out of the company in years. The K760 Bluetooth solar keyboard is one of the best products I've purchased in the last year  and the fact that it can be paired with three different devices at once is genius.

Perhaps with a more concentrated focus on the essentials and faster time to market, Logitech can reverse its fortunes.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Ronaiah Tuiasosopo isn't just an alleged identity thief  he's also a talented singer.

The 22-year-old church vocalist stands at the center of an elaborate hoax which ensnared star Notre Dame linebacker Manti Te'o. Over the course of nine months, Te'o corresponded  and eventually fell in love  with a Twitter user named Lennay Kekua, whom he believed to be a young woman studying at Stanford University.

After months of online correspondence (and cell phone calls), Te'o was led to believe that his love had died from leukemia. As it turns out, Kekua was an invention of a sadistic prankster, and all signs point to Tuiasosopo as the likely culprit.

SEE ALSO: The Manti Te'o Lesson: We Are All Catfish

Tuiasosopo's possible motivations remain a mystery, and Te'o's involvement is still unknown (though he did admit to Katie Couric that he found out it was a prank in December.) But one thing is certain: The dude can sing. In a video posted to YouTube in 2011, Tuiasosopo belts out a Christian ballad.

We chopped up that ballad and filled it with photos of people Te'oing, just because.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The strange and twisted Manti Te'o saga took another series of WTF turns on Thursday, and we're back to bring you up to speed.

First up: Te'o apparently spent more than 500 hours on the phone with his fake, social media hoax of a girlfriend  who wasn't even being impersonated by a woman.

According to multiple reports, Ronaiah Tuiasosopo  the scam's alleged puppet master  played the part of Lennay Kekua during more than 1,000 intimate phone calls Te'o says he legitimately thought he was sharing with his girlfriend between from last May through September, when she fake died in a fake car crash.

Tuiasosopo's lawyer told the New York Daily News that his client had disguised his voice to dupe Te'o. ESPN reported Wednesday that it obtained documents showing the two had spent hundreds of hours conversing.

SEE ALSO: Funny or Die Takes on Te'o in eHarmony Ad Parody

Katie Couric  whose extended Thursday afternoon interview with Te'o contained the former Notre Dame football star's first extended comments on the shocking hoax  earlier in the day posted audio from three voicemails "Kekua" left for Te'o.

In the first, Kekua updates him on her fictional first day of chemotherapy treatment for leukemia. In the second, she expresses insecurity that Te'o might be seeing someone else behind her nonexistent back. In the third, she tells Te'o she loves him. Clips from all three voicemails are included in this compilation:

Unfortunately your browser does not support IFrames.

Te'o and Kekua's romance was the feel-good sports story of the fall, and covered by a wide range of major media outlets. They had allegedly, according to Te'o's dad, met in person after a game at Stanford then struck up a romance online. Kekua was said to have died in September after a horrible car accident and battle with leukemia, but Te'o nonetheless led Notre Dame within one win of a national title and finished second in voting for the Heisman Trophy.

Then a bombshell Deadspin report blew that narrative to smithereens last week. Te'o and Kekua had never met. She had never lived, or died, but was in fact part of an elaborate "catfishing" scam perpetrated by Tuiasosopo, an acquaintance of Te'o's. Photos associated with Kekua's fake social media accounts were allegedly stolen from another woman's social profiles without her knowledge.

SEE ALSO: Te'o Hoaxer Is a Pretty Good Singer

The main question then became what Te'o's role was in it all. Was he just incredibly naive? Was he part of the hoax all along, looking to boost his media profile and Heisman candidacy? Was he gay, and this a coverup? Was he initially fooled by the scam, then an accomplice?

On Friday, Couric shared an interview teaser clip in which Te'o admitted that he actually learned of the deception in December but was too embarrassed to come clean at the time.

The full interview that aired Thursday afternoon was supposed to lend some clarity to the entire story, but it was widely panned among the sports Twitterati and further extended the entire story's farcical nature. Te'o's apparent naivete was widely roasted and the most awkwardly viral moment came when Couric asked pointedly whether he is gay.

"No," Te'o answered. "Far from it. Faaaaar from it."

The New York Times had a good running commentary on its live blog of the interview. You can check that out here.

Do you still think it's possible Te'o was in on the hoax, or is he simply a naive victim? Give us your take in the comments.

UPDATE: Now a Tuiasosopo relative claims his lawyer was lying and the voice Te'o spent 500 hours on the phone with was actually that of a female accomplice, according to the New York Post. I don't even know any more. I don't even know.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Whether you're looking to make industry contacts or learn the latest trends in advertising, technology and media, Mashable's Events Board has something for you. We picked four of the latest events to be listed to give you an idea of the possibilities for networking, developing skills and moving your business forward. Check these out, or head over to the full listings to find relevant events in your area or preferred destination.

You can sort listings by when they were added, get discount codes for Mashable readers and maybe even see a YouTube video of a past event so you'll know what to expect. You can also follow our events account on Twitter so you'll catch the best events before they sell out.

This summit is a one-day immersion in the digital communications best practices that help drive organizations' reputations, media profiles and profitability

You'll get the how-to's, real-world examples and nuts-and-bolts practical advice in using social channels to connect with journalists and win positive coverage. Also, learn how to make Twitter the core of your digital communications efforts, and learn how to navigate Facebook's newest algorithms and more.

Social Fresh is a gathering of the best experts in the social media industry: over 400 attendees with 15 speakers including representatives from ESPN, JetBlue, Campbell's Soup, Chris Brogan, Ted Rubin, Tom Webster and more.

Social Fresh EAST will have multiple networking breaks, evening happy hours, an exhibitor lounge full of leading industry vendors, and a hands on social media strategy brainstorming competition between attendees.

At Structure: Data you'll learn how to channel the flood of data into actionable information and exploit it for competitive advantage. Hear first-hand accounts of machine learning and scaling from scientists who have done it, and how to recruit the next generation of data scientists.

Speakers at this event are industry experts like Denise Hatzidakis, the CTO of Premier Healthcare Alliance, Naveen Jain, the CEO of Inome, Douglas Merrill, the CEO of ZestFinance and more.

Use "MASHABLE" for $50 off

At the 5th Mobile Marketing Strategy Summit you will discover the growing mobile trends of 2013 and learn how to strategically further your brand's reach through mobile.

Past summits have included presentations and case studies of proven success by brands like ESPN, JetBlue Airways, Travelocity, PayPal, Nielsen, Cars.com, Tasti D-Lite and American Express.

New for 2013, MMSS will feature dedicated Strategy and Engagement tracks, cover topics such as mobile apps vs. the mobile web, location based marketing, SMS and push marketing and more.

Visit our full list of upcoming conferences and events here.

Want to promote your event on Mashable's Events Board? Submit it here.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Years of late-night feuding will finally come to an end Thursday night. After being the butt of Jimmy Kimmel's ongoing joke, Matt Damon has exacted his revenge by kidnapping the talk show host.

In his creepy teaser video, above, Damon laughs maniacally while acknowledging a duct tape-tied Kimmel in a room plastered with pictures of the comedian.

Kimmel has regularly apologized to Damon at the end of his show, joking that he's "run out of time" for the actor to make an appearance. Their on-screen rivalry was fueled by Damon in 2008, when he created a video called "I'm F Matt Damon" with Kimmel's then-girlfriend, Sarah Silverman.

We'll see how they duke it out tonight when Damon finally gets his time on the couch. Kimmel posted this picture on his Facebook page Tuesday, with the caption, "The late night meeting of the century."
--------------------------------------------------------------
If you're wondering what a Disney Star Wars universe looks like, look no further than The Empire Strikes Back, where everyone's favorite mouse makes an appearance in the background.

Mickey Mouse can be spotted a few times on a display panel during the epic lightsaber duel between Luke Skywalker and Darth Vader. Star Wars Blog writer Pablo Hidalgo writes, "Just pointing out something that youll now never be able to un-see."

Check out the images from Hidalgo's post here.

Was this a sneak peek at the Disney/Lucasfilm deal, light years ago? Do you think it was the will of the force or purely coincidence? Let us know what you think in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It looks like Microsoft had a decent end to 2012.

Microsoft reported earnings-per-share of $0.76 on revenue of $21.46 billion in the December quarter, beating EPS estimates by a penny but coming in just shy of Wall Street's consensus estimate for revenue of $21.6 billion. Nonetheless, Microsoft's revenue for the quarter set a new high.

The Windows division of the company had a particularly strong quarter, generating $5.88 billion in revenue, a 24% increase from the same period a year before. Even when you factor in deferred revenue from Windows upgrade offers, Windows revenue was still up 11% year-over-year.

"Our big, bold ambition to reimagine Windows as well as launch Surface and Windows Phone 8 has sparked growing enthusiasm with our customers and unprecedented opportunity and creativity with our partners and developers," Microsoft's CEO Steve Ballmer said in a statement. "With new Windows devices, including Surface Pro, and the new Office on the horizon, well continue to drive excitement for the Windows ecosystem and deliver our software through devices and services people love and businesses need."

Microsoft did not break out sales figures for its new Windows 8 products, other than to restate that it has sold more than 60 million Windows 8 licenses to date.

Microsoft's stock was up down by about 1% in after hours trading following the earnings report.
--------------------------------------------------------------
What would modern music sound like, were it not for the synthesizer? Electropop wouldn't exist, Ellie Goulding would be an acoustic act, and the Beatles' Abbey Road wouldn't have as much pizzazz. While modular synthesizers existed and were used in music studios, it's the Minimoog  the first portable analog synthesizer and the first-ever electronic analog instrument, pioneered by Robert Moog  that changed the sound of music. It graced the music scene in the 1970s, introducing electronic sound modulations to the music-making process and dramatically expanding the kinds of sounds that could be produced by an instrument.

Robert Moog's (rhymes with rogue) company was known for creating theremins  early electronic instruments  but he moved into new territory when he developed the analog, monophonic synthesizer in the 1960s. This synthesizer makes wave forms by electronic means, and it plays one note at a time. Moog developed standardized modules for the synthesizer sounds and proposed a standardized scale of voltages  the Moog oscillators and keyboard, for example, have a standard progression of one volt per octave. He debuted his prototype at the Audio Engineering Society conference in October 1964 and began taking orders.

The sound of the Moog Modular synthesizer became widely known in 1968, on Walter (now Wendy) Carlos' "Switched-On Bach," which was recorded entirely with the instrument.

The modular Moog was large (as were computers of the day), and it was initially developed for use in-studio. But just as room-sized computers were downsized into PCs, so too were synthesizers. Bill Hemsath, a Moog Music Inc. engineer, created the Minimoog Model A prototype out of spare parts during his lunch breaks. In the Moog junkyard, Hemsath found a five-octave keyboard that had been whittled down to three octaves, and then he bolted a synthesizer console on top of it. It was the first time these two parts has ever been combined, and it revolutionized music forever. This new device, the portable Minimoog, debuted in 1970, putting the power of the modular Moog in the hands of keyboard players all over the world.

It's this smaller invention, the Minimoog and not the original modular Moog, that quickly became a staple for progressive rock bands such as Rush and Yes, who produced the futuristic sounds that were so in vogue in the 1970s. But it was also an instrument of choice for jazz musicians, who could solo on the machine using the innovative "pitch wheel" next to the keyboard. And even Bob Marley "stirred it up" with Moog, using a Minimoog to produce his reggae sounds. Although it doesn't quite have all of the sonic capabilities of the original modular Moog, the Minimoog's portability and user-friendly interface enables musicians to produce lots of sounds on stage. A more modern version of this synthesizer, the Minimoog Voyager, debuted in 2002; that's the instrument you see at rock shows today. To this day, each Moog synthesizer is handmade at the Moog Factory in Asheville, N.C.

Of the Minimoog's place in music, Moog said:

Musicians always come up with stuff I couldnt imagine, using my instruments. I can get a sense of whether something would be a good musical resource, but I dont do music. Im a toolmaker. Its always amazing what someone like Herbie Hancock, Wendy Carlos, or Stevie Wonder can come up with. What theyll do is, when you put something in front of them thats new, theyll turn a couple knobs, and listen, and immediately get a sense of where to go. The muse talks to them.

We know the modular Moog and Minimoog are revolutionary, but how do they actually work to make that cool sound? The Minimoog makes noise electronically instead of acoustically, and the machine's knobs and can be manipulated to alter the sound the synthesizer emits. So it might sound like this:

or like this:

Before the Minimoog, electronic music studios typically had oscillators, filters and other tools to produce and manipulate electronic sounds; but these tools were limited in functionality and could be laborious and time-intensive. Moog consolidated these tools into one portable device, giving musicians more control in one instrument.

The Minimoog's most central component is its voltage-controlled oscillators (VCOs), which generates the primary sound signal by producing a waveform, be it sine, square or sawtooth waves. The output from the VCO could then be modified by manipulating other modules, such as voltage-controlled amplifiers, voltage-controlled filters, envelope generators and ring modulators. The circuit looks like this:

So hitting a key on the keyboard and turning the knobs to various settings can create myriad sounds, making the Minimoog one of music's most versatile and unique instruments.

On what would have been Robert Moog's 78th birthday, Google created an epic Google Doodle to honor the electronic music pioneer. The Google Moog has 19 full-functioning knobs, one wheel, a switch and four tracks that let you record up to 30 seconds of overlaid audio. Check it out above.

Have you played a Minimoog? What do you love about the sound?

Image courtesy of Buffalo Museum of Science, Bob Moog Foundation, Moog Music, Inc.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The web as you experience it  with pretty pictures, in a browser, with back and forward buttons  emerged 20 years ago.

On Jan. 23, 1993, programmer Marc Andreessen released Mosaic, the web browser credited with making the Internet accessible for the general public. While not the first graphical web browser, it was the most popular one of its time and still the model for today's browsers.

Before Mosaic, for example, images and text weren't able to display together. Each had its own window. There were no bookmarks; there wasn't even a back button.

Mosaic made all this possible  and for free. In fact, it's still available from Archive.org, or from the National Center for Supercomputing Applications (NCSA) at the University of Illinois Urbana-Champaign, where Andreessen, as a student, led the team that developed the software.

"NCSA Mosaic was available for free, and soon thousands of copies were being downloaded each month. It quickly moved beyond the research and education niche and became the first 'killer app,'" Danny Powell, NCSA's current executive director wrote to TechNewsDaily.

Ironically, to download the software from NCSA, you have to use a pre-web technology called FTP. The university doesn't have a web page where you can download the first web browser.

NCSA states that the software was downloaded more than 5,000 times a month the peak of its popularity. By comparison, Google said in June 2012 that its Chrome browser has 310 million active users (Chrome was first released in 2008). Of course, the web was far bigger by then.

"I don't think anyone foresaw the incredible impact Mosaic would have, but they knew it was something cool, something that would help people connect and explore and learn," Powell said.

Though Mosaic ushered in the modern web, much of the credit goes to the Netscape browser, which debuted in 1994. That didn't deprive Andreessen of fame, however, since he was also the founder of Netscape. Andreessen now serves as principal of Andreessen-Horowitz, a company that invests in today's tech startups.

This article originally published at TechNewsDaily here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Aerospace engineers have long known that ditching a conventional tubular fuselage in favor of a manta-ray-like hybrid wing shape could dramatically reduce fuel consumption. A team at NASA has now demonstrated a manufacturing method that promises to make the design practical.

Combined with an extremely efficient type of engine, called an ultra-high bypass ratio engine, the hybrid wing design could use half as much fuel as conventional aircraft. Although it may take 20 years for the technology to come to market, the manufacturing method developed at NASA could help improve conventional commercial aircraft within the next eight to 10 years, estimates Fay Collier, a NASA program manager.

The manufacturing technique lowers the weight of structural components of an aircraft by 25%, which could significantly reduce fuel consumption. The advances are the culmination of a three-year, $300 million effort by NASA and partners including Pratt & Whitney and Boeing.

There are two key challenges with the flying wing design. One is how to control such a plane at low speeds. NASA previously addressed this by building a six-meter-wide remote-controlled test aircraft (the X-48B) to demonstrate ways to control hybrid wings. Based on those tests and wind tunnel tests, NASA built a larger remote-controlled aircraft that started test flights last year.

The second challenge is building a full-scale version of the aircraft with pressurized cabins that is structurally sound. One reason tubular airplanes have persisted is that its relatively easy to build a tube that can withstand the forces acting on it from the outside during flight while maintaining cabin pressure. The hybrid wing design involves a flatter, box-like fuselage that blends with the wings. The flatter structure, which includes some near-right angles, is much more difficult to build in a way thats strong enough and light enough to be practical.

NASAs manufacturing process starts with preformed carbon composite rods. The rods are covered with carbon fiber fabric and stitched into place. Fabric is then stitched over foam strips to create cross members. The fabric is impregnated with an epoxy to create a rigid composite structure.

Sections of a fuselage built with the technique were tested and shown to withstand up to the forces that would be applied to a finished aircraft. Tests also showed that when enough pressure was applied to cause the parts to fail, the stitching used to make the structure stopped cracks from spreadinga key to avoiding catastrophic failure in flight.

The researchers are now building a 30-foot-wide, two-level pressurized structure that will be used in an attempt to validate the manufacturing approach. That structure is scheduled to be finished by 2015.

To achieve a 50% reduction in fuel consumption, the hybrid wing design will need to incorporate an advanced engine design. Collier says ultra-high bypass engines are a good match. In an ultra-high bypass design, the front fan on the engine is far larger than the core of the engine, where air is compressed and combustion takes place. Such large fans can be difficult to mount under the wing, as engines are mounted in most conventional airliners. The hybrid wing design involves mounting the engines on top of the plane, rather than under the wings (The top-mount design also cuts noise levels.)

NASA has helped Pratt & Whitney develop prototype ultra-high bypass engines, which are slated to go into commercial use for the first time next year, starting on Bombardiers C-Series aircraft. NASA is further optimizing the engines to take advantage of the top-mount design in the hybrid wing airplane.

This article originally published at MIT Technology Review here
--------------------------------------------------------------
The former whipping boy for the tech industry is on the comeback trail.

Netflix, whose stock has dropped as low as $52.81 over the past year after almost hitting $300 in mid-2011, rose more than 40% since Wednesday's market close. The impetus appears to be a better-than-expected fourth-quarter earnings report in which the company announced that it added 2 million domestic streaming subscribers  more than had previously been anticipated  and posted a surprise profit.

Many investors lost confidence in the company in 2011 when it uncoupled DVDs and streaming subscriptions and began charging $16 a month for streaming plus DVDs, nearly twice the original price. The company then frustrated and confused customers further with a plan to rename its DVD service Qwikster and have it run as a separate operation. Netflix abandoned the plan a month later and CEO Reed Hastings apologized.

Some 18 months later, in a letter to shareholders Hastings highlighted expanding international operations and more profits from streaming video. In fact, in the first quarter of 2013, Netflix expects to report for the first time that its streaming business is more profitable than its DVD business.
--------------------------------------------------------------
What you see above is not a piece of Martian footwear  rather, it's the Reebok ATV 19+, an "all-terrain vehicle for your feet" that goes on sale for $140 on Feb. 1.

The shoe became a minor viral sensation on the sports side of the web Thursday after photos began to circulate. A Reddit thread titled "Reebok has lost it" made the social network's front page, as many debated the shoe's rather oddly designed soles.

Admittedly, the ATV 19+ does have a weird space-nipple look. But read on to see why there may be more to that strange appearance than first meets the eye  and why its outer-space vibe is no coincidence.

Bill McInnis  Reebok's head of advanced innovation who helped design the ATV 19+  is a former NASA scientist. The 19 bumps on the bottom of the shoe are designed to grip as much terrain as possible each time you move. In other words, the shoe can mimic how a real-life ATV dominates anything under its wheels.

"This digs right through the top layer of a surface and gets traction on that layer underneath," McInnis says in the video below.

Check out the full clip below for more on the technology behind this funky-looking footwear. Then let us know in the comments  would you wear these shoes?
--------------------------------------------------------------
Nokia is reportedly working on a true PureView Windows Phone, which will include a sensor similar to the one found on the companys 41-megapixel 808 handset.

According to The Verge, the phone will be made out of aluminum rather than the polycarbonate typically found in Nokias Lumia line. Slated to launch on AT&T later this year, the handset - code-named EOS  will be one of several Lumias sporting a new design. Nokia is also reportedly working on its own Windows 8 tablet to debut later this year.

The Lumia 920 also bears the PureView name. Arguably one of the best smartphone cameras available on the market today, the 920 has a backside-illuminated sensor and fixed f/2.0 aperture, which makes for some astounding low-light photos.

Nokia also worked with Microsoft to create a new algorithm for the 920 camera that reduces visual noise, and further improves low-light performance while maintaining a natural look in photos.

2013s Lumia will likely continue that tradition, providing high-resolution, high-quality photos, especially in low-light situations.
--------------------------------------------------------------
North Korea announced Thursday it is planning separate tests of a nuclear device and long-range missile systems in defiance of American-backed United Nations sanctions that were approved following North Korea's recent satellite launch.

The country's military leaders said the nuclear and missile tests will help to serve an "upcoming all-out action" against the United States, reports CNN.

North Korea initially denied December's launch was part of an offensive military program. However, it reversed that attempted guise in a statement released Thursday.

"We are not disguising the fact that the various satellites and long-range rockets that we will fire and the high-level nuclear test we will carry out are targeted at the United States," said North Korea's National Defense Commission in a statement reported by ABC News.

SEE ALSO: Watch North Korea's First Successful Rocket Launch

North Korea successfully launched a satellite into orbit in December, ignoring United Nations prohibitions against such a launch. It's not clear whether the satellite, which did achieve orbit, is doing anything useful. Video of that launch is available on YouTube:

Some experts believe the satellite launch was a thinly veiled attempt by the North Koreans to test an Intercontinental Ballistic Missile, or ICBM, technology which could give the country the ability to strike Hawaii or, eventually, the United States' west coast.

Upon analyzing debris from North Korea's most recent rocket launch, South Korean authorities determined the rocket's components were mostly made within North Korea, suggesting that in terms of materiel, the country needs less outside help than previously thought.

Little else is known for certain about North Korea's closely guarded rocket technology, including a definite understanding of their range. However, it is believed the country still lacks nuclear warheads small enough to be fit atop a rocket.

North Korea's planned nuclear test will be the country's third, following tests in 2006 and 2009.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The NYPD has unveiled a new "weapon" in its arsenal to fight illegal guns: a radiation scanner that can spot concealed guns from a distance  no need for controversial stop-and-frisks.

NYPD commissioner Raymond Kelly announced Wednesday that the police will soon deploy and test the portable radiation scanner on the streets, as reported by the New York Daily News. The high-tech machine reads terahertz radiation, the energy naturally emitted by people and objects, from a distance, allowing police officers to see through people's clothes and potentially spot guns.

"If something is obstructing the flow of that radiation, for example a weapon, the device will highlight that object," Kelly said.

The idea is to put these scanners in police cars or at notoriously violent corners and monitor passersby to see if any of them has a suspicious object hidden under his or her clothes. The NYPD showed a video of how this works at a Police Foundation breakfast on Wednesday. In the video, a police officer is standing on the street, wearing a New York Jets jersey. A superimposed image taken from a scanner shows a black object, which appears to be a gun, on his belt.

SEE ALSO: Secret Service Mulls Bionic Ears to Detect Gunfire at Large Events

The scanner, which was developed by a contractor in conjunction with the London Metropolitan Police, is still in its trial phase. "We still have a number of trials to run before we can determine how best to deploy this technology. Were also talking to our legal staff about this. But were very pleased with the progress weve made over the past year," Kelly said.

At this point, it's hard to tell how effective these machines will be. And the ACLU raised privacy concerns over these "virtual pat downs" last year. Some questions, for now, remain unanswered. Is being scanned randomly on the street a search without a probable cause? If it is, that would go against the Fourth Amendment, which protects against unreasonable searches.

In a statement sent to Mashable, New York Civil Liberties Union Executive Director Donna Lieberman said that "any technology that allows police to peer into a person's body or possessions raises a lot of questions that have yet to be resolved. But to the extent that this technology reduces the abuse of stop and frisk that harms hundreds of thousands of New Yorkers every year, we're intrigued by the possibilities."
--------------------------------------------------------------
The older, smaller cousin of NASA's huge Mars rover Curiosity is quietly celebrating a big milestone today  nine years on the surface of the Red Planet.

NASA's Opportunity rover landed on Mars the night of Jan. 24, 2004 PST (just after midnight EST on Jan. 25), three weeks after its twin, Spirit, touched down. Spirit stopped operating in 2010, but Opportunity is still going strong, helping scientists better understand the Red Planet's wetter, warmer past.

"No one could've imagined how good the exploration and scientific discovery would be for this vehicle, looking from the perspective of nine years ago," said John Callas, Opportunity's project manager at NASA's Jet Propulsion Laboratory in Pasadena, Calif. "It's been a phenomenal accomplishment."

The headline-stealing Curiosity rover, for its part, touched down on Aug. 5, 2012, marking the next step in Mars exploration. The car-size Curiosity weighs about 1 ton  five times more than either Spirit or Opportunity.

Spirit and Opportunity were originally supposed to spend three months searching for evidence of past water activity on the Red Planet. The golf-cart-size robots found plenty of such signs at their separate landing sites, showing that Mars was not always the cold and arid planet we know today.

SEE ALSO: Most Amazing Discoveries by Spirit and Opportunity

For example, in 2007 Spirit uncovered an ancient hydrothermal system in Gusev Crater, suggesting that two key ingredients for life as we know it  liquid water and an energy source  were both present in some parts of Mars long ago.

And Opportunity is currently inspecting clay deposits along the rim of Mars' huge Endeavour Crater. Clays form in relatively neutral (as opposed to acidic or basic) water, so the area may once have been capable of supporting primitive microbial life, researchers say.

"This is our first glimpse ever at conditions on ancient Mars that clearly show us a chemistry that would've been suitable for life at the Opportunity site," Opportunity principal investigator Steve Squyres, of Cornell University, said of the discovery at a conference last month.

The rovers rolled far beyond their 90-day warranties. Spirit finally stopped communicating with Earth in March 2010, after getting mired in soft sand and failing to maneuver into a position that would allow it to slant its solar panels toward the sun over the 2009-2010 Martian winter. NASA declared the rover dead in 2011.

But Opportunity keeps chugging along. It has put 22.03 miles (35.46 kilometers) on its odometer since landing on Mars  just 1 mile (1.6 km) off the all-time record for most ground covered on the surface of another world. The Soviet Union's unmanned Lunokhod 2 rover holds that mark, traveling 23 miles (37 km) on the moon back in 1973.

The great engineering that allowed Spirit and Opportunity to keep roving for so long is a big part of the six-wheeled robots' legacy, mission team members say.

"These are magnificently designed machines," Callas told SPACE.com. "We really have greatly expanded the exploration envelope by having a vehicle that can not only last so long but stay in very good health over that time, such that we can continue exploring."

While Opportunity is showing signs of its advanced age, such as an arthritic robotic arm, the rover remains in good shape overall.

"Its health right now is miraculously good," Callas said.

Still, the rover team is treating every day as a gift at this point, knowing that Opportunity could conk out at pretty much any time. Indeed, the sun will rise one day without a message from Opportunity, and its handlers will have to face the rover's death and the end of an amazing mission.

"It's going to be hard; it'll be the end of a great era," Callas said. "But we'll have to remember that we've had such a good run."

This article originally published at Space.com here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Pakistan has banned both Call of Duty: Black Ops II and Medal of Honor: Warfighter for their reported portrayal of the south Asian country as a haven for terrorists.

Pakistani shop owners have complained that the games suggest the country's Inter-Services Intelligence agency supports Al Qaeda.

"The problem is that there are things that are against Pakistan and they have included criticism of our army," said Saleem Memon, president of All Pakistan CD, DVD, Audio Cassette Traders and Manufacturers Association. "They show the country in a very poor light."

SEE ALSO: Pakistan Closes Mobile Networks Amid Fears of Terror Attacks

Have you played either of these games? Do you think they portray Pakistan as a terrorist haven? Tell us in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Navigating the winter wonderland is best done with shoes made of ice picks, padded snow pants and a helmet. The unfortunate folks featured in The Poke's video compilation of people versus winter probably wish they would've yielded that friendly cold-weather fashion advice.

Wipeouts, pile-ups, snow face-plants  it's all crammed into three minutes of cringe-triggering YouTube goodness.

SEE ALSO: 10 Dogs That Are Better at Winter Than You
--------------------------------------------------------------
Samsung will announce a new Android tablet, the Galaxy Note 8, at a mobile trade show next month, a company executive revealed to reporters earlier this week. But the unveiling has come a little early, if these photos from an Italian technology site are to be believed.

Digital Day Revolution published these pics earlier today of what definitely looks like a mid-size Samsung tablet, smaller than the Galaxy Note 10.1 but slightly larger than the Galaxy Tab 2 7.0. As the name implies, the Galaxy Note 8 will be a tablet with an 8-inch screen, very close in size to the iPad mini.

From the photos (more are below), the overall design of the new tablet is very close to the Samsung Galaxy S III smartphone, with similar curved sides and a front-facing camera (with dual sensors) positioned on the bezel along one of the shorter sides (since users tend to hold smaller-screen tablets vertically). It also sports a physical home button, which is found on the GSIII but not on the Note 10.1.

The Note line's trademark stylus appears to be housed in the tablet's lower-right corner. There's a rear camera, too, but doesn't appear to have a flash.

SEE ALSO: Samsung Galaxy Note II: A Giant Phone That Grows on You [REVIEW]

The original article cites some specs for the tablet, although the sources are unknown. Take these, like any rumor, with a grain of salt:

Assuming this is the real deal, what do you think of the Galaxy Note 8? Would you buy one instead of an iPad mini if they had similar prices? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
One of the most difficult decisions in talking about the history of any aspect of computing, or even of technology as a whole, is to decide when it started. When, for instance, did social networking begin? With Facebook in 2004? MySpace in 2003? With CompuServe in 1969?

How about Pompeii, 79? (No, not 1979  just 79.)

I know. Hacky. But there is some truth to the notion that the walls of the houses and apartment insulae in the Italian city of Pompeii (and the other cities lying at the hinge between the Roman Republic and the Empire) created the original form of social networkingright down to the practice of bandwidth throttling.

Writing on walls with charcoal and inscribing with stones and knives was a common aspect of Roman life. A recent study, authored by researcher Eeva-Maria Viitanen, an archaeologist at the University of Helsinki, concentrated on political messages.

It was through political messaging that the revolutionary, information-wants-to-be-free promise of Roman disruptive technology (known as graffiti) hit the wall. Rimshot.

Much of the political advertisement of the time was commissioned by the candidates themselves and their supporters. They often hired professional painters to create the spots and competed against others for prime space. That space tended to be the sides of upper-income houses, not bars and shops.

"The current view is that any candidate could have chosen any location and have their ad painted on the wall. After looking at the contexts, this would not seem very likely," Viitanen told the publication LiveScience. "The facades of the private houses and even the streetwalks in front of them were controlled and maintained by the owner of the house, and in that respect, the idea that the wall space could be appropriated by anyone who wanted to do it seems unlikely."

So candidates, it is thought, had to bid against one another to secure the space. Candidates were a dime a dozen, while it turned out houses in the right places were not.

There were three times as many shops and taverns than wealthy houses. Most buildings in Roman cities had retail space on the first floor. In addition to being numerous, those retail spaces had high traffic. But the customers were unlikely to be literate, while those with an interest in the houses of the wealthyresidents, friends, peerswere likely to read and therefore be of higher status and greater influence in the community.

Therefore, where the messages were left was not a case of opportunism, but of audiencea peer to peer network of potential office holders speaking to their social peers, those with the most influence over voters of the lesser classes.

It is in this peer-to-peer communication where the social networking aspect of the communication lies, according to Viitanen. A case could be made, however, that the social networking aspect lay more strongly in the asynchronous messaging the wall network offered and the existence of a permalink for each conversation.

This article originally published at The Daily Dot here
--------------------------------------------------------------
If NFL football is too violent for your taste, the upcoming Puppy Bowl IX may be the perfect diversion while your more hardcore friends watch the Super Bowl. A piece of cuddly programing from Animal Planet, the Puppy Bowl takes place at the same time as its more famous counterpart  6 p.m. EST on Sunday, Feb. 3. The precise rules and regulations of the canine melee are a bit unclear, but there's more info here.

Meanwhile, we've got the impossibly adorable puppy cam embedded above to hold us over. It features the fuzzy football showdown's all-star roster of lovable pups. They're in the locker room hanging out, playing, sleeping, scurrying about, pooping and just being generally cute as all get-out while they wait for their big day.

It's a guaranteed good mood, in streaming video form. So check it out above and be sure to tell a friend who's having a bad day.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Before John, my husband-to-be, and I started our food truck in 2010, I cyber-stalked food trucks on the West Coast and in New York City to find out how they were using Twitter, Facebook and Foursquare.

For the most part, they posted their daily routes and specials of the day, and while that alone attracted them hundreds of customers, I knew that wouldnt fly for us.

Our town, Tallahassee, is mostly known for politics and football, and certainly doesnt have the population of cities like Los Angeles and NYC. We knew we were going to have to get creative.

Though we were early adopters of Twitter and used Facebook when it was just a site for college students (the wonder years), up until 2010 we were merely bystanders of the social media sphere. But the food truck forced us to not only become active participants, but content creators, too. Here are four of the most valuable lessons Lazarus, our food truck, taught us about social media.



SoLo (not to be confused with YOLO), a combination of social media and location-based technology, is the motto for food trucks. Most food trucks start with shoestring budgets, and SoLo comes at a low cost with high returnsbasically providing free advertising to let your potential customers know where you are.

So how does that look in practice? Our Foursquare account is linked to our Facebook and Twitter profile, so every time we check in somewhere, our friends and followers see it (and hopefully, are tempted to stop by). In addition, we encourage our customers to check in to our location for an incentive like a free drink or waffle  which promotes our truck to their friends and followers, too.

Location-aware technology also helped us forge partnerships with local businesses looking for shout-outs from our 7,000-plus social media base.

For example a local boutique owner, targeting college-aged women, invited us to her grand opening. Since most of our followers on Twitter are college-aged students, we thought this would be a great opportunity for her to tap into the market and for us to be on one of the busiest cross streets in the city.

We checked in on Foursquare and asked our customers to go inside to the boutique while they waited. She had a sale, adorable dresses and affordable jewelry; customers walked away with red velvet waffles and a cute dress for a night out on the town.

One of my favorite partnerships was with a wine bar and a local hip-hop group. The last Tuesday of each month was filled with moscato, freestyle battles, and fried chicken: Perfection.



Most brands recognize that a part of the whole social media strategy is to engage fans  and that often means getting their feedback or crowdsourcing. For example, Doritos is encouraging fans to vote on which fan-produced ad it should show during the Super Bowl.

For our brand, we created a "Waffle of the Week" poll on Facebook and asked our friends and fans to vote on whether they would like us to serve a banana pudding, sweet potato or cinnamon roll waffle for the week.

We integrated the poll on Twitter by using the hashtag #WOW or #WaffleOfTheWeek, and asking followers for their suggestions. Sometimes, wed even name the waffle after the Tweeter. Our customers (also known as Cravers) got a kick out of voting  and of course eating  their favorite waffles.



"The wait for @CravingsTruck is ridiculous!!!! Im never coming back here again." "@CravingsTruck gave me a chargrilled red velvet waffle." I remember seeing tweets like this and panicking. Should I respond? The wait cant be that bad, can it? How many followers does this person have anyway?

We quickly realized that social media couldnt just be about putting out our routes or talking about our 52 different waffles; we had to enhance the customer experience by creating a social customer service strategy.

According to Useful Social Media, "77% of customers expect to be served in the [social media] channel of their choice." So, like most companies today, Twitter became our virtual call center. When a problem occurred, customers tweeted about it and we tweeted back. We apologized for the inconvenience, and if there was a mishap with an order, we'd send a coupon for a free waffle in an effort to square things away.

We also created an internal infrastructure around the social customer experience by encouraging customers to tweet about a crew member who gave outstanding service. The tweets became weekly bonuses for our crew and affirmed our mission of great food served by great people.

Responding to customers is important because it shows that we're listening, not just riding around with a bullhorn shouting out our message. (We do have a bullhorn on the truck, though.)



I think everyone can relate to having an old, beat-up car that you love. For us, Lazarus (and the story behind the food trucks name) became a way to connect with people. Some could connect with breaking down on the interstate for hours, while others enjoyed the biblical story behind the name.

We tweeted or posted photos of the times the truck got a flat tire or the (many) times it had to be towed away because the battery blew up or some other expensive calamity happened, and customers loved it. But they also loved that Lazarus is a symbol of perseverance, the audacity of hope. To take a raggedy truck and make a dream out of it, despite the many obstacles, inspired many and is a constant teacher of having the patience of Job.

In addition, unlike other food trucks that we studied, we talked to our audience about more than just food. We tweeted with customers about current events like the football season and hip-hop artists coming into town and stayed away from politics (though we did hand out free red velvet waffles for those who showed their voting stickers on Election Day).

Social media is all about placing value in the content, but along with the content, we try to have an authentic voice. Whether we were counting down the days to my graduation or sharing our engagement (yes, as in, proposal) video with more than 7,000 people across our social media networks, we try to just be sincere, humans who happen to have a food truck. And weve found that it works.

 

With our social media powers combined, John and I have shown other small businesses what we've learned. Social media isn't just for live tweeting award shows and reality shows (though I am an active participant in both)  it's an influential and cost-efficient tool that entrepreneurs can use for growth, innovation and customer service. Take it from my food truck.

This article originally published at The Muse here
--------------------------------------------------------------
"A long time ago in a galaxy far, far away ... It is a period of civil war, rebel spaceships boldly go where no man has gone before."

The worlds of Star Wars and Star Trek collided Thursday when rumors beamed out that Trek director J.J. Abrams would direct the new Disney-back Star Wars Episode VII. The nerd world hadn't witnessed an explosion this big since Luke Skywalker destroyed the Death Star.

SEE ALSO: Obama's Death Star Response is Best Star Wars Tribute in History

The Internet rushed to share its vision of what an Abrams-helmed Star Wars might look like. Think William Shatner sweet talking Wookiees and new, more spandex-style uniforms for Stormtroopers.

BONUS: 10 Star Wars Technologies We Actually Want
--------------------------------------------------------------
Flips, flops, twists and turns are brazenly displayed in a new video that shows extreme stunts performed by people just like you and me (except they have a Chuck Norris-level of daring).

Called "People Are Awesome 2013," the four-and-a-half-minute video shows daredevils jumping over moving cars, parkouring across rooftops, cliff diving, as well as doing a myriad of tricks using skateboards, BMX bikes, surfboards, motorcycles, unicycles and their own bodies.

Since being uploaded to YouTube on Tuesday, it has attracted more than 800,000 views.

What's your favorite stunt in the video? Let us know in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Working in the technology sector is paying off more than ever, new research shows.

A study by the online career site Dice.com revealed that technology salaries in the U.S. saw their biggest jump in more than a decade. Specifically, tech professionals earned a greater than 5% increase in average annual wages to $85,619, up from $81,327 in 2011.

The salary increase comes at a time when more than 60% of the tech professionals surveyed are confident they could find a better job in 2013 and when the employers are increasing their efforts to retain and motivate staff with more interesting or challenging assignments, higher compensation and the ability to telecommute.

"Employers are recognizing and adjusting to the reality of a tight market," said Scot Melland, chairman, president and CEO of Dice Holdings, Inc. "The fact is you either pay to recruit or pay to retain and these days, at least for technology teams, companies are doing both."

The research found several reasons for the salary increases, including company actions, like merit or company-wide raises and internal promotions, as well as a number of professionals who found higher- paying jobs during the year.

Overall, average salaries for tech professionals with at least 15 years of experience topped six figures for the first time, growing 4% from a year ago to $103,012. Those with less than two years of experience also saw an increase from last year, up 8% to $46,315.

Tech professionals who specialize in big data are most in demand, the study found. Salaries reported by those who regularly use Hadoop, NoSQL and MongoDB are all above of $100,000, compared with the just under $90,000 that cloud specialists are earning and the $80,000 mobile experts are taking home each year.

Alice Hill, managing director of Dice.com, said despite many believing big data was just a fad, it's clear that data professionals are in demand and well-paid.

"Tech professionals who analyze large data streams and strategically impact the overall business goals of a firm have an opportunity to write their own ticket," Hill said. "If you have a talented data team, hold on tight or learn the consequences of a lift-out."

When examined by market, the research found that the Silicon Valley is the only area where tech professionals average six-figure salaries. Among the cities that had the highest salary increases from a year ago include Pittsburgh, which saw an 18% increase, and San Diego and St. Louis, each with salary increases of 13%. In addition, Phoenix, Cleveland, Orlando and Milwaukee all had double-digit increases.

"This recovery has been particularly hard for employers in non-traditional tech markets if they want to grow their staff," Melland said. "With mobility down, the pool of available talent isn't as deep, which pushes salaries up and makes companies scramble to come up with creative solutions."

The study was based on surveys of 15,049 employed technology professionals.

This article originally published at BusinessNewsDaily here
--------------------------------------------------------------
The app launched for iOS last week, and quickly rose to the top of the App Store charts, securing an astounding 20 million downloads in just four days. Within that time, fans played the game a mind-boggling 210 million times  that's 1,775 years of gameplay.

The response from fans has been overwhelming, Keith Shepherd, co-founder of Imangi (Temple Run's creators), said in response to the games popularity on iOS. We are thrilled players want more of the Temple Run universe, and we hope to grow and expand the game over the coming months.

Shepherd launched the app's Android version at 12 a.m. ET on Thursday.

The original Temple Run was a runaway success, and has been downloaded more than 170 million times on iOS and Android since its launch in 2011.

Temple Run 2 is available now as a free download from Google Play.

Are you excited about Temple Run 2 launching for Android? Let us know in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
"Like" it or not, Facebook has changed the way we live. The monolithic social site has consolidated numerous forms of communication under one big, blue roof, simultaneously rendering some traditional means of interaction obsolete. Even those that adapted have been irrevocably altered by Facebook's rise.

SEE ALSO: Facebook More Memorable Than Faces or Books

Are we forgetting a big medium that bit the dust because of Facebook? Anything in particular you miss? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Cable network TNT has dropped a sequel to the most-shared ad of all time, "A Dramatic Surprise on a Quiet Square."

Like the previous ad, the new one, "A Dramatic Surprise on an Ice-Cold Day," features a red button in the middle of a town square (this time in Holland, not Belgium) next to a sign that says "Push to add drama." Shortly after that, a man in a body suit is lowered on a rope and offers the button-pusher a telephone. A voice says, "Make a choice: Blue or yellow."

After choosing yellow, all hell breaks loose. A woman is shot, which causes her suitcase full of cash to open. Then the button-pusher is whisked away in a black van marked "Witness Protection Program." The person is then dropped in what looks like a parking garage, where there are explosions, a SWAT team and what looks like a prison break. The purpose: To underscore TNT's tagline, "We know drama."

If anything, the ad ups the ante on "Quiet Square," which has received more than 42 million YouTube views since last April and has been shared 4.5 million times, according to Unruly, making it the second most-shared ad ever next to Volkswagen's "The Force."

What do you think? Is this ad as good as the first one? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Twitter's popularity among lawmakers has been meteoric. Three years ago less than half of the Senate and House of Representatives were on the platform, now every senator and 90% of representatives are tweeting away.

Twitter use is particularly heavy among the freshman class  almost every freshman member of the recently begun 113th Congress has a public Twitter account.

Who are the top 7 freshman members of Congress on Twitter? Mashable asked Twitter analytics firm PeekAnalytics to find out. PeekAnalytics is able to determine not only a Twitter user network's audience size, but also its social influence and demographic data about audience members.

Democratic Senator from Massachusetts Elizabeth Warren tops our list with 74,000 followers. She has a "pull," PeekAnalytics' term for the influence of a Twitter user's audience, of 150x. And Warren's followers' average network size is 990, which PeekAnalytics offers as an indication of her followers' overall influence.

44% of Warren's Twitter followers are female. Most are over the age of 36 and make over $50,000 annually. Only 19% of her audience is from the state of Massachusetts, with 11% hailing from California and another 10% from New York.

Texas Republican Senator Ted Cruz has 41,000 Twitter followers, a pull of 369x and an average network size of 4,000. The vast majority of his followers  71%  are male, while 69% are over the age of 36. 77% of his followers earn more than $50,000 annually, and a higher than usual percentage of his followers are employed in the automotive industry. 33% of his followers are from Texas, while 7% are from California.

Alan Grayson, Democratic Representative from Florida, has 36,000 Twitter followers, a "pull" of 76x and an average network size of 1,000. Most of his followers are male and older than 36. Interestingly, most of his followers are from California  Floridians only make up 12% of his followers.

Joe Kennedy, Democratic Representative from Massachusetts and great-nephew of president John F. Kennedy, has 8,000 followers, a pull of 29x and an average network size of 1,700. 60% of his followers are male, while 67% are over the age of 36.

65% of his followers make more than $50,000 annually and 31% make more than $100,000 a year. His audience contains an unusually large number of people working in the logistics field. 40% of his audience is from Massachusetts, with 22% from the city of Boston.

Tim Kaine, Democratic Senator from Virginia, has 20,000 followers, a pull of 59x and an average network size of 1,500. Most of his followers are male and over 36. 75% of his followers earn more than $50,000 annually, with 32% earning more than $100,000 a year.

His audience contains 25 times as many people who work in the field of law than the average Twitter audience. 29% of his audience is from Virginia, while 14% hail from Washington, D.C.

Democratic Representative from Illinois and veteran of the war in Iraq Tammy Duckworth has 12,000 Twitter followers, a pull of 45x and an average network size of 1,600. Her followers are split male-to-female almost evenly, with 53% male. 67% are over the age of 36, 70% earn more than $50,000 annually and 29% earn more than $100,000 a year.

A full quarter of Duckworth's audience resides in Illinois, while 9% are from California and 8% are from New York. Chicago, as would be expected, is the top city of origin for her followers.

Tammy Baldwin, Democratic Senator from Wisconsin, has 22,000 Twitter followers, a pull of 63x and an average network size of 1,400. Like Duckworth, her following splits almost perfectly evenly between men and women. About 18% of her followers are between 18-25, while half are older than 36. Nearly 70% of her audience earns more than $50,000 annually, and more than a quarter earn more than $100,000 each year.

Her audience contains eight times as many people who work in music than does the average Twitter audience, and four times the number of people who work in software. 25% of Baldwin's audience identifies as hailing from Wisconsin, 8% from California, and 8% from New York. Madison is the top city of origin among her followers, but Milwaukee is tied for third place with New York at 5%.

Are you following any of these lawmakers? Which do you think is the best Twitter user and why? Share in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Tumblr users will start to notice a slightly new Dashboard beginning Thursday morning. The new features were created to make adding content easier, meaning users will never have to leave the Dashboard.

For users who have multiple blogs, you can manage all of the accounts from this new design. The top left where your user name is drops down to easily switch.

Next to the "Create post" button, a dropdown menu allows users to choose between publishing immediately, preview, adding to queue and saving as draft. It's also where users decide whether the post is public or private.

The small gear at the top right contains all of the former back-end features like custom URLs, scheduling and allowing users to post a reply. Tagging is directly under the content of the post.

Users uploading video will notice you can now see and play the clip in the Dashboard before hitting the "Preview" button. So you can edit the post and see how the video looks before previewing it in your blog.

Tumblr told Mashable this is "a step toward making the Dashboard a smaller and more streamlined experience."

The new design will begin rolling out to users on Thursday morning. Have you received it yet? What do you think of the new look? Tell us in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Sharing your health woes on social media can be beneficial for tracking disease outbreaks, a new study says.

Researchers at Brigham Young University found that Twitter's speed and volume can help health officials use the site as an early-warning system to monitor diseases.

Tweets with location information may allow officials to plot points on a map to detect a trend, then alert providers to gear up for a possible outbreak. Though accurate information is available for only about 15% of tweets containing GPS data, it's enough for a system to monitor key words like "fever" or "coughing" in a specific area. Check out the video, above, for more.

Twitter can also help health officials differentiate between actual diagnoses and self-reported symptoms like, "The doctor says I have the flu," explains Scott Burton, lead author of the study.

SEE ALSO: 250,000 Social Media Users in U.S. Said They Got the Flu

Burton and his team sampled 24 million tweets from 10 million unique users for the research.

It's not the first time the medical world has acknowledged the possibilities social media holds for the field. Researchers in Brazil also used Twitter to track dengue fever with real-time surveillance of data for individual cities, and systems like the Global Public Health Intelligence Network monitor websites and news wires to recognize the spread of disease.

BONUS: 8 Devices to Keep Flu Season Germs out of Your Life
--------------------------------------------------------------
Twitter announced on Thursday a new mobile service called Vine, which allows users to create and share looping videos.

"Like Tweets, the brevity of videos on Vine (6 seconds or less) inspires creativity," the company said in an official blog post. "Now that you can easily capture motion and sound, we look forward to seeing what you create."

Here's an example of how it works:

Vine is available as a separate app, free for download on iPhone and iPod touch devices via the Apple App Store. It's exclusively on mobile for now.

"Were working now to bring it to other platforms, so stay tuned for that," the company added.

To download the app, click here.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A bottlenose dolphin with a fish hook stuck in its pectoral fin found help from a kind and resourceful scuba diver.

Keller Laros was diving in Kailua-Kona, Hawaii when the injured dolphin swam by. Laros signaled the dolphin to approach and used his underwater MacGyver skills to remove the hook and fishing line.

SEE ALSO: Heartwarming Photo of a Man and His Dog Has Facebook Users Smiling

The video above shows the heartwarming moment of interspecies kindness.
--------------------------------------------------------------
What could you show the world in six seconds? Thats the idea behind Vine, a service introduced Thursday that allows you to create and share looping videos.

Currently only available for iOS, Vines are created by pressing and holding your finger down on the screen of your iPhone, iPod touch, or iPad. Youre given 6 seconds of tape for your video masterpieces, but you can start and stop recording as many times as youd like during that six seconds to include several different scenes.

For instance, I created this Vine showing off some of the toys I have on my desk, starting and stopping the recording to pick up a new toy. The service can also be used to create a stop-motion video, moving the subjects slightly between each clip. Important to note: Vine is also recording audio, so you'll want to record in quiet places or at the very least be conscious of what audio is going on around you.

Once youre done creating a video, youre given the option to share your finished masterpiece on Vine, Facebook and Twitter. You can also add a caption and location information to the video. Your finished Vine is also saved to the camera roll on your device. If you want to share a video from the app you have to do it right when you upload it, theres currently no option to go back and share later.

Check out a step-by-step guide to using Vine in the gallery above.

I gave the app a try this afternoon and, truth be told, it really is as simple as it looks.

One hiccup I ran into was a software glitch  or potentially a poor cell signal  in uploading a recently completed Vine. The Vine didnt upload, and prevented my next Vine from being uploaded until I deleted it from the queue.

Another apparent software bug also prevented me from adding a caption to one video, and another made it so a video I tried to share on Twitter never made it to the service. That wouldn't be a huge deal, except you can't go back and share videos, so that magical moment may never make its Twitter debut.

Vines also autoplay from your timeline (or while you're browsing) which can make things awkward if you're sitting in an office and suddenly start blasting sounds from a particularly lively Vine. Audio can be turned on and off, but that still doesn't stop a few slip-ups from happening.

Vine is certainly buggy, but its also new. Hopefully we'll see an update soon that works out the kinks and make the service really shine.

What sorts of things can you see Vine being used for? Let us know your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Owen Groesser won Twitter and SportsCenter at the same time as his improbable, inspiring sports story took the web by storm Wednesday night.

Who's that, you say?

Groesser isn't some NBA rookie or NHL hotshot. He's a middle schooler with Down Syndrome, from Rochester, Mich. He's a member of his school's basketball team, but reportedly had not played a minute all season.

SEE ALSO: How Facebook Inspired One Woman's Incredible 'Tough Mudder'

Coaches inserted him during the squad's final game of the season, and he made the most of his opportunity  to say the least. Owen promptly sank a pair of three-pointers to wild applause from the crowd and celebration from his teammates. One of the shots was caught on video, and that launched what would become a viral campaign to spread Owen's story far and wide.

The hashtag #GetOwenOnSportsCenter gained traction, eventually becoming a Twitter trend in the United States. Eventually an ESPN producer took notice of the tweets and was intrigued.

Soon enough, Owen was on SportsCenter.

His shot led off the show's nightly top 10 plays segment during the 11 p.m. broadcast Wednesday night. For the 1:30 a.m. broadcast Thursday morning, it was the top play overall, beating out NBA and college hoops stars. Fittingly enough, SportsCenter shared the play via its Twitter account as well:

"Sometimes Twitter is awesome, like tonight," SportsCenter anchor Scott Van Pelt says while introducing Owen's shot in the top plays countdown.

UPDATE: Owen and his father appeared on SportsCenter for an interview on Thursday morning:
--------------------------------------------------------------
Is actor Rob Corddry the Daniel Day-Lewis of zombie acting? That's what Corddry, who stars in the zombie romance flick Warm Bodies, thinks in this quirky digital short.

In the clip, Corddry dishes some tips on how to act like a zombie: "If you can fool a child into thinking you're dead and you hate her, then you're doing something right," he proclaims.

Corddry jokingly says he employed method acting to prepare for his role, just like Day-Lewis did before filming his role as Abraham Lincoln in the Oscar-nominated movie Lincoln.

SEE ALSO: 'Oscar Nominees Star in 'Les Zero Silver Djargo of Southern Pincoln'

Entertainment Summit studio describes Warm Bodies, which comes out Feb. 1, as such:

A funny new twist on a classic love story, Warm Bodies is a poignant tale about the power of human connection. After a zombie epidemic, R (a highly unusual zombie) encounters Julie (a human survivor), and rescues her from a zombie attack. Julie sees that R is different from the other zombies, and as the two form a special relationship in their struggle for survival, R becomes increasingly more human  setting off an exciting, romantic, and often comical chain of events that begins to transform the other zombies and maybe even the whole lifeless world.

Warm Bodies director Jonathan Levine wrote the digital short and filmed it with help from Break Media's Screen Junkies. It also features Warm Bodies actors Nicholas Hoult, Teresa Palmer, Dave Franco and Analeigh Tipto.

BONUS: Watch the First 4 Minutes of 'Warm Bodies'
--------------------------------------------------------------
Warner Music Nashville just unwrapped a new, social media-driven website that makes it easy for country fans to keep tabs on the online activity surrounding their favorite artists.

Propelled by a responsive web design and Arktan's social-data curation technology, WarnerMusicNashville.com aims to be a "one-stop destination" for musicians' buzz from fans across social networks as well as digital content from the musicians.

Blake Shelton's page, for example, aggregates all posts mentioning his name on Facebook, Instagram and Twitter. Users can filter to see content posted by just Shelton. Each artist page also provides links to his or her music on iTunes, Spotify and YouTube. Additionally, WMN displays such info as bio, news, hometown, current single and appearances.

"We're fostering conversation by pulling each of these channels together in a succinct, easy-to-digest package."

"Now, when fans visit the site, they can read breaking news about Blake Shelton, watch Charlie Worsham's live concert stream and discover their new favorite artist Jana Kramer, all on the same site and within a few minutes," said Jeremy Holley, WMN's VP of consumer and interactive marketing.

The redesign  which adjusts responsively across devices, platforms and browsers  and a partnership with StageIt will allow WMN artists to conduct live concerts that will stream on the website in a series called "Live from Music Square."

SEE ALSO: Interscope's New Website Relies on Artists' Social Media Activity

A "buzz meter" on the overhauled site's homepage tracks mentions, news posts and streams on the web to determine each WMN artist's real-time reach and relevance.

The interactive concert series launches on Feb. 12 at 7 p.m. CST with singer-songwriter Brett Eldredge and Charlie Worsham. 

 

"'Live from Music Square gives me a chance to perform and socialize with fans around the world," Eldredge said in a statement. "They can sit in the comfort of their own home, eating Fruit Loops and drinking a cold one and watch me jam like I'm right there with them."
--------------------------------------------------------------
The event, dubbed a "Fireside Hangout" in reference to President Franklin D. Roosevelt's Fireside Chats, brought Biden together with Guy Kawasaki, one of the original Apple employees, video blogger Phil DeFranco, several other Americans and moderator Hari Sreenivasan of PBS NewsHour. Participants asked Biden questions on a range of gun-related topics from his personal views on the Second Amendment to the administration's push for a renewed ban on assault weapons.

Biden has been leading a gun control task force since the December shooting at Sandy Hook Elementary School in Newtown, Conn., that claimed 27 lives including that of the shooter.

During the hangout, Biden took several jabs at the pro-gun National Rifle Association, which has proposed placing armed guards in schools among other measures in the wake of the Newtown shooting. Biden singled out that proposal as a "terrible mistake."

"The Center for Disease Control can't even keep statistics on gun violence," Biden later told Hangout participant Kawasaki, taking a dig at the NRA's stance against gun-related investigations.

"They can't even do research," added Biden, who compared the gun safety debate to that over automotive safety, which was a hot topic during his early years in the Senate.

"Once the research that was done, we built much safer automobiles," said Biden.

A recent meeting between Biden and the NRA was reportedly unproductive.

Did you watch the Biden Google Hangout? What did you think? Share in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Spotify users have an endless library of tunes and sounds to listen to, but that doesn't make all of it things you actually want to hear.

Deep in the heart of the music streaming service, past the Justin Bieber albums and Rihanna singles, lurks the tracks you might have not known existed. The ones that make you scratch your head and say "WTF?"

SEE ALSO: The 100 Most Beautiful Songs in the World, According to Reddit

If you want the whole playlist, we've collected all of the strangest finds here.

All of the indie hits with pan pipes on vocals.

Arnold is going to "PUMP YOU UP!" to the tune of "It's Raining Men," among other classic songs.

Not sure how you actually use these as real ringtones, unless you just record it from your phone. Bonus points if you use this one and your name isn't even Carl.

Anderson was a talented famous opera singer and civil rights activist. She also really liked her cat, Snoopy.

Sure, it sounds like a rainy day in the forest, but when you "unlock the floodgates of your subconscious mind," you might find yourself speaking Japanese.

The former U.S. president won a Grammy, but not for his saxophone playing. It was for speaking in this musical fairy tale.

Have you ever wondered what a Coolio rap would sound like when it's performed by the German version of Kidz Bop? If that piqued your interest, there's also a pretty swell cover of "Cotton Eye Joe."

Not really what you'd expect from Rudolph.

One thing I can definitely say about this is that it is a cover of a Beatles song.

I'd prefer you did neither.

You probably never realized you wanted to hear a marching band perform a Jimmy Buffet song. That's ok, because there are multiple songs to choose from.

It's as strange as you think it is.

This group provides all of the zen versions of alternative and rock songs that you were never looking for.

This one goes out to all of my Internet friends.

When Ali wasn't knocking competitors out in the ring or inspiring crowds with his words, he was singing about how awesome he was.

I know, I know  you've been wondering what that sounded like. Us too. (FYI, that's just one of millions of random sound effects.)

Don't worry, fellas, there's one for you too.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Apple reported record revenues on Wednesday of $54.5 billion in the December quarter. So naturally Wall Street responded by calling Apple a "broken company" and sending the stock's price down by about 11% in pre-market trading, effectively shaving off more than $50 billion from the company's market cap.

If that sounds a little counter-intuitive, don't worry: you're probably not alone. In a nutshell, the disconnect boils down to a difference between what Wall Street focuses on and what Main Street focuses on.

For the average consumer, what might stick out in the report are numbers like 47.8 million iPhones sold (a new record), 22.9 million iPads sold (a new record), $54.5 billion in quarterly revenue (a new record) and the fact that Apple's cash pile has now grown to $137.1 billion (it's highest ever.) Throw in some fun stats like Apple revealing that it has now sold more than 500 million iOS devices to date and one could justifiably walk away with the impression that Apple is stronger than it's ever been.

As impressive as these numbers are, they still came in slightly below Wall Street's expectations for the quarter at a time when investors wanted to see Apple beat estimates by a convincing margin in order to set aside lingering concerns about the stock. In recent months, Apple's stock has been plagued by rumors of supply and demand issues for the latest iPhone, an executive shakeup at the top of the company and increasing competition in the tablet and smartphone space from Samsung and other companies.

Perhaps more importantly though, investors had their eye on a different number: $13.1 billion. That's the profit Apple for the quarter. Again, one's first impression might be that this is a huge number  in fact, it's the fourth-largest quarterly profit for a company ever. Yet, that profit was essentially flat compared to the December quarter a year ago  the first time there has been no year-over-year growth in a decade. Why is that a bad thing? Because more than anything else, Apple investors are laser focused on the company's cash flow and this quarter their worst fears were confirmed: the days of rapid growth in that cash flow appear to be over.

To make matter's worse, Apple's revised the way it offers guidance to be a more accurate predictor and that guidance just happened to suggest that cash flow for the coming quarter will be just $9.23-$10.23 on an earnings-per-share basis, according to numbers crunched by BTIG analyst Walter Piecyk which would be at least a 17% decline year-over-year.

Part of the problem, as analysts have long speculated, is that Apple's profit margin is going down as the costs associated with building newer products increases and more of its products like older iPhone models and the iPad Mini have lower price tags. As a result, many on Wall Street are waiting to see what new products Apple will introduce this year in the hopes that these might revitalize the stock.

As of publication, Apple's stock was trading at about $460 a share, down more than 10% for the day.
--------------------------------------------------------------
What percentage of your Facebook friends are married? Who lives closest to the North Pole? And who is that person who connects you to more people than anyone else on the social network?

You may think you know what's going on with all of your Facebook friends, but a new app from computerized engine Wolfram Alpha proves you only know the start of it.

The company rolled out on Wednesday night an updated version of its analytics tool, which combines its own data with your Facebook profile to interesting things you might not otherwise know. By giving the app access to your profile, it provides a completely visual report based on your activity and who you know.

First, it highlights some basics, including the people with whom I have the most mutual friends, how many I know in various countries and my most common friend names (apparently I know 13 Jessicas, 12 Matts and 12 Mikes). The report also noted how many pictures and status updates I've posted in the past year, and which have gotten the most Likes and comments. Not to mention, I found out I was born on a Thursday.

SEE ALSO: Microsoft Ad Is Nostalgic Trip Down '90s Memory Lane

But data visualization is the star here. Friends are placed on a color-coded map based on how you know them, such as from high school, college and work. The report takes a much deeper dive from there though by grouping peers into five categories: social insiders, social outsiders, social connectors, social neighbors and social gateways.

Wolfram Alpha describes social insiders as people you have a lot of friends in common with, such as a best friend since elementary school. Social outsiders, however, are those with whom you have no or few mutual friends, like that person you met at a bus stop once while traveling overseas.

Meanwhile, social gateway friends know a lot of people outside of your network  such as the editor of your college newspaper  and a social neighbor has few friends outside your network, such as a sibling. Finally, a social connector is someone that connects a cluster of friends. It's fascinating to see where friends are placed based on your history and relationship with them.

The company also improved some of its existing features, such as the "word cloud," which reveals the most common words you use in wall posts. Here's mine:

Although Wolfram Alpha was experiencing some issues with users downloading the app, it said it's working to correct the problem. After giving it a few tries, I was able to access the platform and retrieve my personalized report.

For a full report on your Facebook profile, friends and network, click here or type "Facebook Report" into the search form.
--------------------------------------------------------------
During a time when computing power was so scarce that it required a government-defense budget to finance it, a young man used a $238 million military computer, the largest such machine ever built, to render an image of a curvy woman on a glowing cathode ray tube screen.

The year was 1956, and the creation was a landmark moment in computer graphics and cultural history that has gone unnoticed until now.

Using equipment designed to guard against the apocalypse, a pin-up girl had been drawn. She was quite probably the first human likeness to ever appear on a computer screen.

In the early years of the Cold War, the United States invested billions of dollars into a state-of-the-art computerized air defense system unlike any the world had ever seen. At the time, the threat of nuclear strike came primarily from Soviet bombers penetrating American airspace, so the Air Force, in conjunction with MIT and IBM, created SAGE: Semi-Automatic Ground Environment.

It was a project so ambitious that it ranks among the massive scientific programs like the Manhattan Project and Apollo in scope and budget, yet surprisingly few people know about it today.

The SAGE system defended against Soviet attack by combining live radar input with pre-programmed commercial airline flight information to paint a live picture of what should or shouldn't be flying in American airspace. If something looked out of place, SAGE commanders could scramble jets to intercept the unknown object.

Starting in 1958, the Air Force built 21 SAGE centers around the continental U.S. At the heart of each center lay an enormous, four-story windowless blockhouse that contained two massive AN/FSQ-7 computers. Each computer cost the equivalent of $1.89 billion in today's dollars and occupied half an acre of floor space.

The AN/FSQ-7 was an achievement unto itself, for it was the second real-time computer with an electronic graphical display in history. The first was the Whirlwind I, the 1950 precursor to the AN/FSQ-7 that began as an MIT project commissioned by the Navy for flight-simulation purposes.

At any given time of the day, technicians at each SAGE center kept one of the dual AN/FSQ-7 computers live while the other underwent maintenance. That way, even in an era of unreliable vacuum tubes (of which each computer contained 50,000), SAGE could maintain near 100% uptime.

At the top story of every blockhouse lay dozens of OA-1008/FSQ situation display consoles (91 in a typical installation), each hooked to the active AN/FSQ-7 computer, upon which personnel would monitor different segments of airspace in a given defense sector. For example, the SAGE center at Ft. Lee Air Force Station in Virginia was responsible for monitoring a sector which included the Washington, D.C. area.

Each situation display console in the blockhouse contained a specially crafted 19-inch cathode ray tube (CRT) display that could draw vector-based lines or alphanumeric characters on any portion of the screen. One may be familiar with CRTs from their use in television sets, but unlike a television set, the CRT in a situation display console did not paint a top-to-bottom raster-based image on the screen. Instead, it drew lines from any point to any other point arbitrarily, sort of like an electronic Etch-a-Sketch.

Typically, the SAGE computer drew a line-based image of coastline or map on each SD console then overlaid flight vector information and live radar blips. When the operators wanted to identify a certain flight on the screen, console operators had a unique input device at their disposal: the light gun. They simply pointed the light gun at the spot and pulled the trigger. Alphanumeric information that identified the flight would then appear next to it on the screen.

Among this very serious business of detecting incoming nuclear threats, someone decided to commandeer the AN/FSQ-7's computing power and graphical display for something a little more fun. Using a console and one of the two SAGE computers, an enterprising programmer created a graphical interpretation of a pin-up style woman that rendered as line segments on the SD's 19-inch screen.

In doing so, the pin-up's programmer created the world's earliest known figurative computer art, and quite possibly the first image of a human being on a computer screen.

In early 1959, 21-year-old Airman First Class Lawrence A. Tipton snapped the only known photo of this pin-up program in action at Ft. Lee. The photo shows the tube of an SD console displaying the outline of woman with her arms held high, cradling her head while emphasizing her bosom. She reclines awkwardly, her legs splayed apart in an uncomfortable but provocative pose that smacks of mid-century pin-up art.

"One day I decided to take pictures for posterity's sake," recalls Tipton, "And those two Polaroids are the only ones that made it out of the building." The other Polaroid is a self-portrait of Tipton himself sitting in front of the AN/FSQ-7's Duplex Maintenance Console. "We used the Polaroid cameras to take pictures of anomaly conditions. When the computers would malfunction, you'd take pictures of those main consoles to diagnose the conditions."



 Lawrence Tipton in front of the Duplex Maintenance Console (Lawrence Tipton)

The pin-up image itself was programmed as a series of short lines, or vectors, encoded on a stack of about 97 Hollerith type punched cards, Tipton recalls. Hollerith punched cards were 7.375 x 3.25 inch paper cards that stored binary data via holes cut through a matrix printed on its surface. Like other 1950s computers, the AN/FSQ-7 used the cards extensively for program input.

According to Tipton, the program that displayed the pin-up image was a diagnostic that tested data flow between the two SAGE computers on site (referred to as the A and B computers). At the end of every shift, as one computer was about to go offline and switch over to the other, the active machine would begin transferring flight and intercept data to the standby machine so there could be a seamless switch over.

Two switching consoles on site were used to handle this process. After running the diagnostic, Tipton describes, if the pin-up displayed correctly on the screen, then data was being transferred between the A and B computers correctly. If the image displayed improperly, then the technicians immediately knew there was a problem.

When loaded, the pin-up image would be visible in flashing pulses that synchronized system-wide with the incoming flow of real-time radar data. A long exposure on Tipton's Polaroid camera would have assured the steady image of the pin-up you see here. (The pin-up lady has a spot on her thigh because that is the center of the circular display, which is where the electron gun in the CRT naturally aims when it is idle.)

When contacted, dozens of SAGE veterans who worked in the program between 1958 and 1983 (the approximate lifetime of SAGE) recalled witnessing this pin-up program firsthand. Not surprisingly, the pin-up's role changed over the decades as the technological culture shifted around it.

While Tipton insists the pin-up had a diagnostic purpose, SAGE operators in later decades remember it as a lighthearted way to pass the dull hours of the late shift when traffic was slow or the standby machine was not in service ("At no time was the primary mission of air defense compromised to my knowledge," wrote one veteran in an email to the author.)

Viewing this ancient digital artwork today, one naturally wonders who created it. "I remember at the time that everybody knew it was done by an IBM programmer," recalls Tipton. Robert Martina, a veteran of early SAGE installations in the 1950s, agrees with Tipton. "IBM guys were supposed to be so straight. They weren't," he adds with a laugh. But no one seems to recall who exactly at IBM created it.

Going by accounts from Tipton and others, the pin-up program likely dates from 1956 to 1958. The upper end of the year range, 1958, can easily be established because multiple eyewitnesses claim that the diagnostic was present when the first non-test SAGE site went live in New Jersey in early 1958. The lower end of the range, 1956, comes from a compelling piece of cultural evidence.

In 1955, famed pin-up artist George Petty resumed a relationship with Esquire magazine just before his retirement. He illustrated two calendars for the publication, one for 1955 and one for 1956. Each month's page came accompanied by a lushly illustrated and extremely scantily clad Petty pin-up.

Petty had a way of painting a woman by which she almost appeared nude if not for a sheer, skin-hugging fabric that obscured almost nothing. Such is the case in the December 1956 calendar pin-up, which leaves little besides the woman's mysteriously absent nipples to the imagination.

As it turns out, this illustration matches the SAGE pin-up almost exactly (as you can see in the comparison below), as if someone directly traced her outline and translated it into vector coordinates. It's likely that whoever created the pin-up image used a technique similar to those used to encode maps and coastlines into vector segments for display on the system.

Since the Esquire 1956 Girl Calendar was likely printed in mid-late 1955 to prepare for the coming year, and that painting was created specifically for the calendar, the pin-up could not have originated from before that time. It may have even been created when the December 1956 image was hanging on the wall nearby.

As it happens, in 1955, IBM began educating specially selected Air Force personnel as part of the first SAGE training program at its facilities in Kingston, N.Y. It's possible that IBM instructors at Kingston devised the pin-up diagnostic an amusing way to immediately engage a group of all-male, usually 18-24 year old computer novices. But until more information surfaces  or someone comes forward to claim credit  the author shall remain unknown.

While no SAGE veterans contacted by the author remember seeing the pin-up girl at Kingston, they do remember seeing another risqu diagnostic program in use by IBM instructors around 1960. It featured the rough outline of topless hula dancer with a grass skirt. And it was interactive. (No photos of the hula girl are known to exist.)

According to one account, upon proper manipulation of switches on the console, the hula girl's hips would sway back and forth in an arc, synchronized to music playing on the console's buzzer. If the operator pointed his light gun at her navel and pulled the trigger, her skirt would fall off and the screen would go blank.

"That probably was the first pornographic show," jokes Robert Martina, a SAGE veteran who witnessed the hula girl in action. "As close as it gets. It was so innocent."

As with the pin-up program, early SAGE vets recalled the hula girl as a diagnostic, and later ones remembered it as a form of lighthearted amusement. Its program seemed to vary from site to site: some vets say the girl danced on her own without the use of switches, and others say she wasn't topless. It's likely that the program was modified many times over the years.

How the diagnostics were viewed also changed from site to site, era to era.

While Tipton and Martina recall viewing the diagnostics during the early setup of various SAGE centers, John R. Stephens, Jr., who worked in the SAGE program from 1962 to '64, recalls times when unofficial word would circulate among the operators that one of the two girl-based programs would be displayed on one of the consoles. As in: "They're going to run girley2 on console 4-1 around 0300 local."

While formal tests and drills were regularly announced over the PA system, news of the risqu diagnostics only spread by word-of-mouth. "The girley programs were never announced over the PA, which led me to the conclusion they were beyond normal procedures," says Stephens.

But even if the images weren't totally above board, they encountered little to no resistance among the ranks. "It was an all male enterprise at that time," recalls Tipton, speaking of the late 1950s. "There were a few women in the Air Force upstairs in the control center, but at that time of life, you know, there wasn't as much controversy."

This article originally published at The Atlantic here
--------------------------------------------------------------
As Facebook is expanding its footprint in Washington, D.C., Facebook CEO Mark Zuckerberg has picked a seemingly unlikely beneficiary of his good graces: Republican New Jersey Governor Chris Christie.

Zuckerberg, along with his wife Priscilla Chan, will host a fundraiser for Christie at Zuckerberg's Palo Alto, Calif. home on Feb. 13. Attendees will be a mixture of Zuckerberg and Chan's social and business circles, and donations will be capped at $3,800, New Jersey's limit.

Why has Zuckerberg picked Christie as the beneficiary of what will be the Facebook chief's coming-out party in politics? The two met after Zuckerberg made a $100 million contribution to Newark public schools and have kept up ever since, reports the Wall Street Journal.

Zuckerberg recently approached Christie's team to find a way he could help the governor reach a third term, reports BuzzFeed.

SEE ALSO: Governor Chris Christie Makes Fun of Himself on 'SNL'

Does this mean Zuckerberg is a card-carrying member of the Republican Party now? Not really: Zuckerberg hasn't been public about his political preferences, though he has attended events with President Barack Obama and Facebook hosted a presidential town hall with Obama in April of 2011.

Christie also has bipartisan support, particularly after his leadership efforts in the wake of superstorm Sandy. His job approval rating is 74 percent among all New Jersey residents, and 56 percent among Democrats, recent data from the Quinnipiac University Polling Institute.

Facebook spent a record $4 million in Washington, D.C. lobbying efforts last year, focusing on privacy issues, immigration reform, security and a United Nations telecommunications treaty which the United States did not sign.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It's been colder than usual this week in most of the U.S. If you've been watching weather reports and the maps that go with them, you've seen snapshots depicting that cold air blanketing the nation.

To get a more comprehensive view of what's been happening all week, take a look at this fascinating animation from the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA), commonly known as the National Weather Service. Those trusty weather watchers say a drop in the jet stream caused a week-long cold snap across the country.

This animated graphic shows how temperatures changed across the U.S. between last Saturday and today. To create the animation, the NOAA used a series of data from its Real-Time Mesoscale Analysis Areas, consisting of graphics it uses to visualize weather conditions over widespread areas.

In this map, notice how the blue area (depicting temperatures below 32F) slides across the country from the north, slightly receding as each day breaks when the temperature rises.

Looking for relief from the cold? Some of you are in luck: The National Weather Service says in the next three months, temperatures will be warmer than average in the Southwest and Northeast, but cooler than average in the Northwest.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Apple lost its title as the most valuable company in the world on Friday.

Apple's market cap plummeted below $420 billion on Friday after a disappointing earnings report earlier in the week, allowing Exxon Mobil to regain its title as the most valuable company by market cap. Apple ended the day with a market cap of $413 billion, about $5 billion less than Exxon's market cap.

The Cupertino company first overtook Exxon in August, 2011, just a few weeks before Steve Jobs resigned as CEO and has held onto it firmly starting in January. Under the leadership of his successor Tim Cook, Apple's market cap continued to grow on the strength of the company's product lineup. At its peak after the iPhone 5 was released in September, Apple's market cap was $656 billion  about $240 billion more than Exxon at the time.

Since then, however, Apple's stock has been plagued by iPhone 5 sales concerns, a shakeup in the company's executive leadership and increasing competition in the smartphone and tablet markets, most notably from Samsung. On Wednesday, Apple reported generating record revenue in the December quarter, but it fell short of analysts' sales estimates for iPhone and iPad. Perhaps more importantly, the company's profits were effectively unchanged from the same quarter a year ago, adding to investors' concerns that the days of Apple's incredible profit growth are coming to an end.

Part of the reason Apple's stock and market cap soared as much as it did was the expectation that the company had more innovative products in the pipeline that would help it break into new markets. Now, according to Forrester analyst Charles Golvin, Wall Street appears to be settling into lower expectations for the company, with the stock's price dropping accordingly.

"It's a reality check on inflated expectations," Golvin says, referring to the significance of Apple losing its top spot for market value. "I don't think it's a portent or a harbinger of diminished impact of Apple on the market." Beyond that, Golvin says that the milestone may be indicative that Apple is no longer miles ahead of its competition. "While they are still an 800 pound gorilla and bringing tremendous innovation and new experiences to consumers, others are starting to catch up to them a little bit and having some influence where they didn't before."

Apple may be fighting for its position as the most valuable company in the world, but it is still far and away the most valuable tech company. Google and Microsoft, the second and third most valuable tech companies, each have market values around $250 billion.

Even so, it's a sharp reversal for a company that some thought was on pace to become the world's first trillion-dollar business.
--------------------------------------------------------------
If you can't beat 'em, buy their airwaves.

AT&T announced Friday that it has agreed to buy spectrum from rival carrier Verizon Wireless for $1.9 billion in cash and Advanced Wireless Services spectrum licenses in several markets. The deal is part of AT&T's ongoing effort to bolster its 4G LTE network.

AT&T will acquire licenses for 700-megahertz spectrum in 18 states, including California, New York, Ohio and Texas, which will help the company broaden access to its 4G network to 42 million more people in the U.S.

In a statement, the company said that the acquisition "will allow AT&T to continue to quickly deploy 4G LTE services to meet demand for mobile Internet services on a wide array of smartphones, tablets and other devices" and help it meet its goal of making its 4G LTE network available to 300 million people in the U.S.

AT&T has been actively buying up spectrum from other companies in recent months to compete with Verizon's vast coverage. The carrier acquired NextWave Wireless in August of last year for its spectrum licenses and just this week, it announced plans to acquire Atlantic Tele-Network for the same reason.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Audi is building a plant that will use solar and wind power to make methane from water and carbon dioxide. The plant, which will use technology developed by Stuttgart, Germany-based SolarFuel, is scheduled to start operation later this year. It will produce enough methane to power 1,500 of Audis new natural-gas vehicles, which also go on sale this year.

SolarFuels process uses excess renewable energy generated as a result of Germanys push to reduce greenhouse-gas emissions. Theres now so much renewable energy in Germany that supply sometimes exceeds demandsuch as when the wind is blowing late at night. That power could be cheap enough to make methane from water and carbon dioxide, even though the process for doing so is inefficient.

SolarFuel says its approach may be a solution to one of the biggest challenges with renewable energyits variability. Methane, which can be stored in existing natural-gas storage facilities, provides a convenient, long-term option for storing the energy.

To make the methane, SolarFuel combines two existing technologies. One is electrolysis, which splits water to produce hydrogen and oxygen. The other is methanation, which combines hydrogen with carbon from carbon dioxide to make methane. The company says its innovation lies in the way its combined the two processes.

SolarFuels chief customer officer, Stephan Rieke, says that the amount of excess renewable energy in Germany grew, in two years, from 150 gigawatt-hours per year to 1,000 gigawatt-hours per year. Thats electricity that we could use for nothing, he says. The amount is expected to continue to grow as Germany pursues ambitious goals to cut greenhouse-gas emissions 80% by 2050 using largely renewable energy.

SolarFuel cant compete directly with the wholesale price of natural gas. But it hopes to compete with biogasmethane produced from organic sourcesa relatively large industry in Germany. It may also compete with retail natural-gas prices by building its plants close to consumers.

The uses of the technology outside of Germanywith its excess supply of cheap renewable energywill be limited. The company is in talks with mining companies in Chile that currently get power from expensive diesel generationits system could help such operations cut costs. The technology might also be attractive for rural communities without grid power.

One major drawback of the process is its inefficiency. Its small-scale demonstration systems are only 40% efficient at converting electricity to methane. It hopes to improve that to 60% efficient in its commercial plants.

Even then, when factoring in the losses from burning methane to generate electricity again, the overall process is at best 30% efficient. SolarFuel hopes to recoup much of that lost energy by using it for steam, but doing that is limited by the demand for steam and the infrastructure for distributing it.

This article originally published at MIT Technology Review here
--------------------------------------------------------------
What if you could have an iPad case that gives you better control over your games? That's the promise of Audojo, the case with joysticks and buttons that its makers say can turn your iPad into the ultimate gaming machine.

The cool thing about this iPad case is that it makes up for the weaknesses of the iPad when it comes to gaming. Attach an iPad 2, 3 or 4 to this case, and you'll have precise control using a couple of actual analog joysticks. In addition, you'll have two physical trigger buttons that are sorely missed when gaming on an iPad, especially with first-person shooter games.

Just above the joysticks are a couple of stereo speakers that but are designed to sound better than that single tinny speaker on all the iPads. The company says there will be two headphone jacks in the final version as well.

Audojo not only enhances gameplay with a tablet in your hands, but it also supports AirPlay. That will let you send your iPad's video to a larger screen that supports such things.

Considering that according to Flurry Analytics, 67% of all activity on iPads has to do with gaming, an iPad case that doubles as a precision controller is long overdue.

Audojo's creators are working with gaming manufacturers to make it easier to integrate support for this new controller/case, and they plan to provide a package that supports the Unity engine, used by 50% of mobile developers. In addition, they plan to make the case integrate with other game engines, and plan to offer a native software developers kit (SDK) for those who would like to create games and features for this hardware.

Currently, this Kickstarter project still has about $200,000 to go until it meets its goal of $240,747 when its deadline hits 26 days from now. So we'll see if the gaming community rallies around this innovative device.

Gamers, has your iPad controller arrived? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Research in Motion will run its first Super Bowl ad, which will spotlight its new BlackBerry 10 smartphone and platform.

The company did not disclose any details about the ad. London's AMV BBDO is creating the ad.

"A Super Bowl commercial is a great opportunity to show the redesigned, reengineered and reinvented BlackBerry to tens of millions of consumers on the largest advertising stage of the year," said Frank Boulben, Chief Marketing Officer, Research In Motion, in a statement. "BlackBerry has 30 million social media fans, and were looking forward to continuing to encourage them and all NFL football fans to see the power of BlackBerry 10 for themselves."

In addition to the 30-second commercial during the game, BlackBerry "will be integrated into a number of pre- and post-game on-site, digital and social activities, including real time engagement with BlackBerry social fans on Facebook and Twitter, as well as extending and amplifying exposure and fan engagement through Promoted Posts and Sponsored Story ads," according to the company.

Such 30-second spots are estimated to cost between $3.7 million and $3.8 million.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Nellie Akalp is a passionate entrepreneur, small business advocate and mother of four. As CEO of CorpNet.com, a legal document filing service, Nellie helps entrepreneurs start a business, incorporate, form an LLC or set up sole proprietorships (DBAs) for a new or existing business.

These days it seems like every business  from dentistry to software  has a blog. However, just because everyone has a blog doesnt mean everyone is doing it right. Whether youre just launching a blog for your business, or youve been blogging for awhile, its easy to fall into some blogging bad habits.

As a small business owner, I try to truly embrace the unique opportunity that social media offers. Ive been experimenting with our company blog for years; here are some lessons I've learned along the way, including the mistakes.

Many small business owners rush to blogging, and to social media in general  they see it as free advertising. However, when your blog posts focus too much on your company, products and services, your blog is no longer useful or credible. Few readers will return to read about why youre so awesome week after week.

If the bulk of your posts are company or product-centric, youll need to change the way you think about your blog. Focus your content so it offers information thats useful and relevant to whatever your particular community cares about. For example, my company helps small businesses incorporate, file for trademarks and launch their business from a legal perspective. Therefore, we try to cater our topics toward whatever would help small business owners run their companies, from leadership and employee management tips to small business marketing and taxes.

Some experts advise on keeping a 90:10 or 75:25 ratio when it comes to educational vs. promotional content. You dont necessarily have to stick to some magic equation, as long as you keep your audiences needs and interests at the forefront of your blog strategy.

Its easy to start a blog, but not so easy to keep it going. A small business blog usually fails due to lack of commitment or resources. A HubSpot report found that companies who blog frequently and consistently benefit the most from their blogging efforts.

Before launching your blog, determine the ideal posting frequency to keep your blog fresh, for example, once or twice per week. If you need to, scout out your competitors blogs to gauge the average number of posts per week. In an ideal world, you should create a quarterly editorial plan for your upcoming post topics. And during downtimes, create a handful of general (non time-sensitive) topics that can be fed into the blog whenever the schedule gets tight.

A blog isnt a press release or static web page where information simply flows from you to the reader. Social media uniquely provides a direct link to interact with your customers and community; it would be shame not to take advantage of the opportunity. If youre fortunate enough to have engaged readers who comment on your blog posts, be sure to acknowledge them  whether by thanking them for some kind words, answering a question, providing further details, or inserting yourself in a conversation.

While everyone will differ on the level of community moderation and control, the following is true: If you want to encourage engagement, you need to make it easy for your readers to leave comments. Log-in systems and captcha forms help limit spam or trolls, but they also make it difficult for the casual reader to leave a comment.

Blogging can have an amazing impact on your keyword rankings and organic search traffic. I encourage businesses to develop an SEO strategy for their blogs. Identify the top keywords for your business and optimize your posts with those keywords. Tools like Scribe or Yoast can help you with search engine optimization.

However, the most successful business blogs write for humans, not machines. Dont hire a poor quality SEO company that churns out posts filled with specific keywords and phrases, without even thinking whether the content is useful or easy to read. That strategy might drive visitors to your blog, but those visitors will never stay, read, engage with or share your content if it's poor. Keywords dont create credibility. Write posts that are interesting, sprinkle in keywords now and then, and your efforts will be rewarded.

While many new bloggers focus on the words, images are the best way to grab peoples attention quickly. In addition, breaking up longer posts with images that illustrate what youre talking about will help keep readers interested and combat our limited attention spans.

For many small business blogs, the problem with images boils down to resource allocation. You may expect it to take you one hour to write a post, but only a few minutes to find an image. However, finding the right image is rarely that easy.

Before you begin searching, take a few minutes to think about the main concept, feeling or idea your post is trying to convey. You should always use images that are visually engaging, aesthetically pleasing and relevant to your post. Your image needs to express a concept and not just look like you picked the first stock image that came your way.

In addition, many small businesses run afoul of copyright law and fair use practices by thinking they have the right to use any photo found on the Internet. The best way to steer clear of trouble when selecting images for your blog is to use ones with Creative Commons licensing. You can search for Creative Commons-licensed images on Flickr, on the Creative Commons website or via CC search engines like Compfight or Photo Pin.

Not sure what kind of content appeals to your audience the most? Its not a mystery: Your blog analytics can provide valuable insight into what types of posts are resonating with readers.

By failing to pay attention to analytics, youre ignoring valuable information that can take your blog to the next level. Continually track the responses to each blog post. Tinker with different topics, titles and types of posts. Which posts generate the most activity (comments, shares, likes)? Increase the frequency of the most popular.

What are some of the top lessons you have learned with your business blog?
--------------------------------------------------------------
Museums are places we often go to connect with our pasts. The Cleveland Museum of Art , however, is also giving us a glimpse of the future.

The museum recently installed what it claims is the nation's largest multi-touch screen, where as many as 16 visitors at a time can explore the 3,500 works in the permanent collection on display. Pieces are presented as thumbnails on a 40-foot-wide moving grid. Visitors can click on individual images to pull up more information, and to discover similar items by category (such as African art), artist, medium or period.

The wall, housed in a space called Gallery One, is designed to foster stronger engagement between visitors and individual items in the collection, says Caroline Goeser, director of education and interpretation at the museum. It may introduce a visitor to a work of art for the first time, perhaps in a wing of the museum she had never thought to visit before, or bring about a "deeper encounter" with a work she already knows well.

The wall is designed not just for discovery, but for acting on that discovery. Using the museum's ArtLens iPad app, visitors can link to the wall to add works to their own custom museum tours. They can also opt into pre-designed, narrated tours developed by the museum's curators. Additionally, the app's image-recognition tool allows visitors to scan artworks to pull up more information, save them to their favorites and share their interpretations with friends via social media. Ultimately, it allows for a less linear, more layered and personalized tour through the museum than an audio guide.

Visitors can download the ArtLens app onto their iPads, or borrow one from the museum. Volunteer hosts have been installed in Gallery One to introduce visitors to the space and to the app.

I asked Goesser if the museum's technology initiatives sprung out of a desire to integrate technology into the museum experience, or if they proved to be the best solutions to an original set of goals. Goesser says it's the latter. The museum's primary goals were to respond to what visitors wanted, and to encourage new people to enter the museum, particularly those who don't frequently go to any museums.

"Our visitors typically wanted two things," she said. "The first segment wanted a structured gallery experience, a way for them to figure out the best thing to do in the 30 minutes they had for a visit. The second group wanted to take on the galleries as they own projects, to browse and learn more about the works they like. We built technology specifically to respond to those visitor behaviors."

Although it's unlikely that most or even many other museums will replicate Gallery One in their own spaces, it shows an openness and willingness, on museum administrators' parts, to rethink traditional visiting experiences to achieve their chief goals: In this case, to foster interest and better educate visitors about works of art. Other museums, from the Smithsonian in Washington, D.C., to the Powerhouse Museum in Sydney, Australia, are making similar efforts, hosting hack days and launching apps to induce innovation.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The year 2013 may someday be known as "the year of the comets." If all goes well we may see two of the brightest comets in many years, and possibly one of the brightest in history.

However, astronomers are being very cautious in their predictions because of past disappointments. As comet specialist David Levy says, "Comets are like cats; they have tails, and they do precisely what they want."

Once thought of as harbingers of doom, comets are now known to be normal members of our solar system. They are small bodies similar to asteroids. The majority spend most of their lives in the Oort Cloud, a mysterious region on the outer edge of the solar system. Now and then they venture close to the sun, and undergo a strange transformation.

The heat of the sun causes the comets' ice, which is their main component, to vaporize. The solar wind streaming off the sun forces this vapor into a huge tail, which flows away from the sun. No matter what direction they are actually traveling, comets' tails always point away from the sun.

There are always comets in the sky, but most are too far from the sun to develop large tails, and too far from Earth to be seen with the naked eye.

SEE ALSO: Photos of Comet ISON: A Potentially Great Comet

Bright comets appear only every few years, so it is very rare for two comets to appear in a single year. 2013 looks to be one of those special years.

Traditionally, comets have been named for their discoverer or discoverers. In recent years, astronomers have adopted a system of naming comets that includes the year of their discovery, in this case "2011," followed by a letter and number indicating the point in the year in which they were discovered, in this case "L4."

Many comets today are discovered by teams of observers, which has started a trend to name these discoveries for the project rather than the individual. This has two unfortunate results. It de-personalizes the discovery, and leads to a lot of comets sharing the same name. Peter Jedicke, past president of the Royal Astronomical Society of Canada, is urging astronomers to return to naming comets after people rather than acronyms.

Comet C/2011 L4 is a case in point. It was discovered by the Panoramic Survey Telescope and Rapid Response System, known by the acronym Pan-STARRS, and is one of three comets already discovered by this program. Jedicke would prefer that we call this Comet Wainscoat, after Richard Wainscoat, the member of the Pan-STARRS team who confirmed its existence.

This comet will become visible to the naked eye for observers in the Southern Hemisphere in early February in the morning sky. It will be at its brightest on March 10, when it will pass close to the sun and move into the evening sky, becoming visible to observers in the Northern Hemisphere. Look for it just above and to the left of the setting sun.

"Comet Wainscoat" will continue to be a bright object in the evening sky for the rest of March and the first two weeks in April.

This comet was discovered on Sept. 21, 2012, through a telescope in Russia that is part of the International Scientific Optical Network, known as ISON. Its actual discoverers were two amateur astronomers, Vitali Nevski of Belarus and Artyom Novichonok of Russia. So Jedicke would prefer we call this Comet Nevski-Novichonok, because there are at least two comets named "ISON."

This comet will make its first appearance to the naked eye of early risers in both hemispheres in the first week of November. It is what is known as a "sun grazer," a comet that passes very close to the sun. Its appointment with the sun will be on Nov. 28, when it will pass within 680,000 miles (1.1 million kilometers) of the surface of the sun, much closer than Mercury.

If it survives this encounter, Comet C/2012 S1 should put on a spectacular show in the days immediately before and after that date. It is predicted to become brighter than the full moon, and to be visible in the daytime sky.

The comet should continue to be a bright object for all of December and into early January 2014.

But here we come back to David Levy's comparison of comets and cats. No one knows for sure exactly what will happen in late November, but all the world's astronomers will be watching the show, and hoping to see the brightest comet in decades.

This article originally published at Space.com here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Cory Booker, the mayor of Newark, N.J., who's become an Internet legend for his Twitter antics and real-world heroics, added another act of valor to his resume Thursday: He saved a freezing dog left in the cold during a below-zero night.

The dog was brought to Booker's attention by local WABC reporter Toni Yates, who tweeted a plea for help to the mayor. Yates was using Twitter to help residents without heat, while Booker had been tweeting to advise people about staying warm.

Booker saw the message and decided to help in person:

Before long, Booker was on the scene, ready to rescue the endangered pet:

"This is brutal weather," Booker told WABC. "This dog is shaking really bad and you just can't leave your dogs out here on a day like this and go away and expect them to be OK. Hypothermia on any animal including a human animal will set in pretty quickly. So this is very sad. You can just feel the dog shaking pretty badly."

Booker put the dog in a heated police car, called its owners and scolded them for leaving the dog outside. The owners said they were away from home and didn't know how the dog, named Cha Cha, got out of the house. They apologized to Booker.

Booker's list of previous thrilling heroics include saving a woman from a burning building and shoveling snow for Newark residents.
--------------------------------------------------------------
If you look at it the right way, the universe can astound you with its scale. Astrophysicist Carl Sagan once said we live on an "insignificant planet of a hum-drum star lost in a galaxy tucked away in some forgotten corner of a universe." The scope of the space around us and within us is practically inconceivable.

Similarly, we are beginning to harness the power of technology to create, send, store and receive more data than at any time in history. This digital world is just as striking in its seemingly infinite depth  the Internet routinely processes more data than humans have exchanged in 5,000 years of civilization. This is the decade of the digital universe, after all.

So which world is more astounding, then? The cosmos that birthed us, or the digital realm we have created? It's a grudge match for the ages. Check out the infographic below and let us know what blew your mind the most.

Thumbnail image courtesy of Flickr, Bulldog Pottery; Infographic researched and created by Bob Al-Greene
--------------------------------------------------------------
Vine, Twitter's new video sharing platform, is the social "It Girl" of the moment. Everyone from average users to businesses is using it to illustrate odd 6-second moments. However, the oddest and maybe most important by far may be what NBC's New York City news affiliate just caught: A 6-second Vine clip of a dolphin stuck in the waters near one of New York City's harbors.

Clearly taken from one of the station's news helicopters, the quick clip shows the gray fins, body and emerging bottle-nosed head of the stranded beast. At the time of the clip, the dolphin was stuck inside the Gowanus Canal in Brooklyn.

SEE ALSO: Vine Mania! 10 Creative Vines on Twitter

As of this writing, no one knows how the dolphin got there or the fate of the still-stranded animal, but capturing the mammal's plight on the nascent social media platform could be a watershed moment for Vine. It's for animation, fun, quick thoughts and, now, news.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Grab your 16-bit D-pad controller and affect your best British accent  it's time to play Downton Abbey for the Super Nintendo Entertainment System!

Actually, it's just a pastiche of what such a game would look like, courtesy of Bill Kiley at Santa Cruz production company Left Coast Digital. But we have to admit, if Downton had hit our screens in the early 1990s, this is exactly the cartridge-based spin-off we'd expect to see.

No complex role-playing exploring the upstairs-downstairs class system of a fading British stately home here  just classically inane quests, such as finding Lord Grantham's lost cigars on the 2-D estate, or pressing the L and R keys as fast as possible in order to fluff the family pillows.

Downton Abbey returned this month for a third series on PBS. Nearly 8 million people watched the premiere, making it the public channel's greatest hit since Ken Burns' The Civil War (which, by the way, would also make an awesome SNES game.)

The 16-bit SNES went on sale in the U.S. in 1991 and became the hit console of its day, selling 23 million units in the U.S. alone.

You want more classic game parodies like this? We'll see what the kitchen can rustle up, m'lord. In the meantime, perhaps you'll find these Downton Abbey Tumblrs to your taste.
--------------------------------------------------------------
We've all been there. Your grandmother just joined Facebook, your boss sent you a friend request or you're applying for that dream job. Suddenly, you're scrambling to purge your profile of last night's pictures plus everything else you wouldn't want Grams to see.

Painstakingly filtering through your Timeline isn't going to cut it, but FaceWash makes it easier. Three Kent State University undergrads created a web app that cleans your profile of incriminating content to give you a "fresh face."

The app allows users to search the profile with a "dirty word" list, a precompiled set of offensive or distasteful terms. You can also input your own words, and the returned results are displayed in categories such as "links that you have liked" or comments.

When taken to the questionable content, users have the option to either delete or change privacy settings. Check out the video, above, for more.

SEE ALSO: This App Turns Your Facebook Activity Into Beautiful Data

Like most Facebook-compatible web apps, FaceWash asks for access to your basic information, email address, profile info and photos. The free app is ideal for professionals in the making, creators Camden Fullmer, Daniel Gur and David Steinberg say on their page.

"You spent the last four years being a college kid. And that's wonderful. But a lot can happen in four years, and Facebook never forgets," the site describes.

The students hope to add more features, reports the Los Angeles Times, giving the app the ability to search in other languages.

Would you use FaceWash to clean up your online identity? Let us know what you think in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Welcome to this morning's edition of "First To Know," a series in which we keep you in the know on what's happening in the digital world.

Today, we're looking at three particularly interesting stories. Facebook seems to have "defriended" Twitter's vine, though we're not sure whether Facebook is trying to keep its knowledge of all our real-friends to yourself, or it's a retaliation for Twitters lockdown of Facebook's own API last year. Microsoft reported $21.46 billion in revenue for the last quarter of 2012  a whopping $1.6 billion a week. Finally, J.J. Abrams might direct Star Wars VII, which didn't sit well with some fans of the franchise.

Check out the video above for more on these stories.
--------------------------------------------------------------
In 2004, a site called Thefacebook appeared on what we used to call the World Wide Web. Initially it resembled an interactive, year-round yearbook for kids at elite universities. But then came new features. Long before users were angered by privacy breaches, they were delighted and sometimes confused by the variety of additions aimed at making the social network "better."

Come walk with us down memory lane as we reminisce about Facebook features ultimately left to fade or die due to unpopularity.

If you're an early Facebook user (I joined in mid-2005), let us know which ones you wish the company would bring back, or any other long-lost Facebook features we might have missed.

Before the 2007 redesign, a man's face obscured with binary code appeared at the top-left of Facebook's header. It turns out the image was manipulated from a 1987 photo of Peter Wolf, lead vocalist for the J. Geils Band.

2. Virtual Gifts



Did your friends ever give you a picture of a beer for your birthday? An orange soda? In this early Facebook phenomenon, one could buy virtual gifts to post on a friend's Wall via Facebook Credits. Originally launched in 2007, it was the first time you could spend actual money on Facebook.

Despite generating cash, Facebook shut down the service on Aug. 1, 2010  in favor of a gift program that allows users to send real, tangible gifts, instead.

3. The Facebook Wall



Before Timeline, your Facebook profile featured a Wall. Your status update logged in a different part of your profile; therefore, the Wall was a space where friends could write notes specially for you. In fact, last year Facebook faced a related user outcry  many people assumed Facebook had made old private messages public  before the News Feed, a user's Wall was only accessible by going to a person's profile, making it feel like a safe place for more intimate posts.

Interestingly, the Wall was originally intended as a sort of white board. Friends could change or delete what was already there, but users generally favored posting new content at the top, so Facebook tweaked the system to display individual comments in reverse chronological order.

At one point, it was cool to "de-virgin" someone's Wall, i.e., be the first to post.

A user's activity, displayed on the "Mini-Feed," was added to the Wall in 2006, and ultimately it was replaced by Timeline in 2011.

4. Facebook Groups



The original Facebook Groups were more or less lost once Facebook expanded outside of schools. In the beginning, groups were network-only, so if students at Harvard and UC Berkeley wanted to be in the same group, they essentially had to create different chapters.

One such group that spread school-to-school was called "I went to public school ... bitch." In my SoCal college, I was proudly a member of "I wear my Rainbow sandals every day."

The point in joining groups, really, was to have the group names displayed in a section on your profile  much like your Books, Movies or Quotes sections, the Groups served to define your identity (plus, the type of people you associated with).

Before Facebook, we used AIM and the away message. When Facebook first introduced the status update, it was reminiscent, with one notable exception: The field to input your status was preceded by "[Your Name] is ...", inducing grammatical gymnastics for many people.

Facebook hasn't entirely strayed from prompts, though  in the status field, it currently asks, "What's Happening, Danielle?" and also, "What's on your mind?"

Could Facebook be a blogging platform? History tells us, no. The Notes feature, while still live, is hidden in navigation. You can view your notes by adding "/notes" after your profile URL, or by clicking the down arrow to expand the tiles on your profile page.

If you were on Facebook in 2009, you might have logged a Note entitled "25 Things," a style of chain letter widespread enough to warrant New York Times coverage. The prompt, included in each person's note, went like this:

The demise of Notes can also be attributed to today's Facebook statuses, which can log up to 63,206 characters.

6. Wall-to-Wall



Before threaded comments, where Facebook conversations take place today, you could elect to "See Friendship." Before that, "See Wall-to-Wall." Remember back even further: You actually had to click back and forth between two profiles to see what two other people were talking about. Some even used the phrase as a verb (e.g. "Did you wall-to-wall Michelle and Becky? Looks like they're fighting.").

Yes, this sounds like stalking. That's what Facebook was for in those days.

Like many other updates, introducing a way to see two people's Wall posts in order of timestamp was creepy, precisely because it brought to light that people were using the service to "stalk." Apparently, the ability to see the friendship between two people  literally, every interaction between them on Facebook  was initially despised, as well.

Want to really know what you're friends think of you? The Honesty Box allowed you to ask questions that your friends could answer anonymously, or send anonymous messages to those you hated, or had a crush on (it would only show whether you were male or female). It was one of the early apps on Facebook, launched in 2007. It has since been shut down.

Before Facebook launched an app called Poke to compete with Snapchat, the Poke was an arbitrary action on the nascent social network. The site's FAQ did little to clear up what a Poke was, but perhaps users knew exactly what it meant, or just used it to mean a variety of things.

While no longer going strong, the ability to Poke other Facebook users still exists. Just visit a friend's profile and click the down arrow on Settings, just below the right side of the cover photo.

Facebook discontinued another early Facebook app called SuperPoke, which most memorably allowed you to throw a sheep at a friend. The app was acquired by Slide, which was later acquired by Google, which shut SuperPoke down for good.

Before your friends posted about farm animals, they threw virtual food and perhaps snowballs.

10. "Too close for missiles, I'm switching to guns"

In the early days, you might have seen phrases in the footers of certain pages, which on closer look, contained movie quotes. "Too close for missiles, I'm switching to guns" is from Top Gun, as is Thats a negative, Ghostrider. The pattern is full." Another: I dont even know what a quail looks like, from Wedding Crashers.

Talk Like a Pirate Day is Sept. 19, and in 2008, Facebook debuted "English (Pirate)" as one of its languages. Once activated, your entire profile is translated to pirate langage. Examples include "1 sorry lout thinks they're yer mate!" instead of "1 person added you as friend," and "What be troublin' ye" instead of "What's on your mind?"

Pirate is still offered as a language, along with English (Upside Down)  yes, what you think  and Leet.

Sometimes, it's difficult to remember a Facebook before the "Like." But it existed, and it was glorious. Your profile picture sat nearby 10 additional fields, including contact information, Looking For (Friendship, Dating, Networking, Random Play, Whatever I Can Get), Relationship Status, Interests, Favorite Music, Favorite TV Shows, Favorite Movies, Favorite Books, Quotes and, finally, About Me. Your Groups were also listed, as well as other schools you had friends at, with the number of your friends in parentheses next to the school name.

Click on something hyperlinked, which was nearly everything, and you could see a list of everyone in your network who had that interest or connection listed on his or her profile. If I wanted to find a guy who liked the Red Hot Chili Peppers, I could just add it to my own profile, click on it, and voila.

Most people would edit and update the content in their favorite lists ruthlessly. After all, there was no News Feed to announce changes, if you decided Christian Aguilera wasn't really representative of you, after all. This epoch of Facebook history is probably the time when user data most closely matched a person's true interests.

The text profiles were killed in 2010 when Facebook began prompting users to turn their interests and favorites into Community Pages. The problem with this was, as much as I liked running and felt that interest was profile-worthy, I didn't want to follow a Page generically geared toward "Running." Thus began the devaluation of the "Like," something the network is still trying to reclaim via Graph Search.

These Community Pages and later Brand Pages were built on trusted friend referrals, rather than supplying Facebook's interest graph with data. But it seems replacing one with the other reduced the ability of users to provide Facebook's ad algorithm monster with accurate personal data.

When Facebook profiles were organized by network  the network being the school you were at  you could select which classes you planned to take each semester, based on your school's course listings. It was a great way to stalk potential classmates before the first day, or even choose courses by classmates and buy and sell text books for a better deal than the campus bookstore.

Courses didn't make it through 2007, when Facebook (you'll recognize the author of the blog post, Dave Morin, now founder of Path) suggested third-party apps could fill the gap. It's most likely that non-students infiltrating the network made this school-only feature less relevant.

14. Bumper Stickers



Bumper Stickers is a third-party application that was simultaneously despised and loved, it seems. The images, which could be found in the app or uploaded, seemed to clutter an otherwise clean Wall with colorful and often cheesy pictures. I'm gonna go out on a limb and say those old Bumper Sticker fanatics have now infiltrated Pinterest. Take a look at the video below for examples.

If you get a hankering to send a bumper sticker to a friend (or post to your own profile, as I did), the app is still live.

Up Up Down Down Left Right Left Right B A. If you did these actions on your keyboard on a Facebook page, it would activate what was called a lens flare.

A cheat code in video games, the Konami Easter Egg was really popular at the time. Similar tricks were hidden on other sites, including Digg and Google Reader.

Unfortunately, the code no longer works on Facebook.

The News Feed still lives on today, but deserves a mention here; it is largely responsible for morphing the way people used Facebook.

In a headline so overplayed it would be regarded as a joke now, MSNBC announced (via an AP story), "Facebook Feature Draws Privacy Concerns," on Sept. 8, 2006. The addition of the News Feed led to Mark Zuckerberg's first major apology to users.

The News Feed marks the end of people obsessively editing their favorite movies and books. Since then, Facebook has become less of a rabbit hole, in which one click leads to another in an endless journey through people's lives  now, the Facebook experience is often like opening your refrigerator door, staring in, not sure what you're looking for.

On November 7, 2007, Facebook announced Fan Pages (along with Beacon and social ads) to replace "sponsored groups," which at the time, were the only acceptable way for a brand or business to represent itself on Facebook. The goal, as told to MarketingWeek, was that the feature "enables businesses to create their own pages, which users can then recommend to friends, and uses behavioural targeting techniques to serve ads."

Pages initially had "Fans," so in order to follow the Page, you would merely click "Become a Fan."

In April 2010, Facebook introduced the Like in order to spread its grip across the web. (It didn't make sense to put "Share" on lots of sites, but "Like" could really port anywhere.) In June of the same year, the Like button replaced "Become a Fan" as a way to ease the perceived commitment.

In my own personal use, I found that I was indeed too click-happy with the Like button, and the relevance of my News Feed continues to suffer.

Facebook Beacon was a partnership between Facebook and certain sites, including Blockbuster, eBay, The Knot and others. Actions on those sites would be broadcast to News Feeds in the form of a user's Facebook activity. The first problem was that users couldn't opt out of the whole thing; they had to opt out case-by-case. Soon, surprise Christmas presents and engagement ring purchases spilled over the social network.

Facebook was sued over privacy concerns for its data collection practices on sites other than its own. In 2009, Beacon was shut down.

When smaller upstarts offer something cool, Facebook sometimes adds the feature to its own platform, as if growing a new tentacle. See: Foursquare and Facebook Places, Snapchat and Facebook Poke, Instagram and Facebook Camera (purchasing the competitor just happened this one time) and finally, Quora and Facebook Questions.

SEE ALSO: 15 of the Funniest Facebook Questions

Sure enough, Quora launched in January 2010, and Facebook Questions followed in July (although you never know for sure how long these things were in production or on the drawing table).

As it failed to gain traction, Facebook Questions was slowly removed from the site, and fully pulled in late 2012.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Guys, please. I know you've got serious differences, but you still love us users, right? Right?

A Cold War has been brewing between the two major social media services for the better part of a year  and it heated up Friday. That's when Facebook effectively sent Twitter a little passive-agressive note about why it was blocking access to the Facebook Friends list on Twitter's Vine app.

The blog post in question never mentioned Twitter or Vine by name. But Facebook did respond to Mashable's request for a comment on the Vine blockage by simply forwarding the post to us.

There's no doubt who it refers to when it calls out "apps that are using Facebook to either replicate our functionality or bootstrap their growth in a way that creates little value for people on Facebook."

Seriously, Facebook? That's like leaving a Post-it on the fridge talking about "whoever keeps drinking the last of the milk" when there's only one other person in the house. Then putting the milk in a locked cabinet. Then photocopying the note and sending it to all your roommate's friends.

Twitter is hardly blameless, of course. Indeed, there's a case to be made that, yes, "they started it"  by disallowing Instagram's access to the list of folks you're following on Twitter last July, shortly after Facebook's purchase of Instagram was finalized.

Boy, I bet Twitter wishes they could take that back now. They've gotten as good as they gave, first when Instagram stopped supporting Twitter cards  so you couldn't see Instagram pics within your Twitter feed any more  and now again with the whole Vine blockage. This is a textbook definition of conflict escalation.

Most of us, even those who are paid to cover this stuff, don't care who started it. We don't care about your competing business models. We simply want any app we use that is owned by either of you to interact seamlessly, the way they used to. We'd just really like to see our Vine videos on Facebook and our Instagram snaps on Twitter. You're linking to them anyway; why not go that one extra step, delight your users, and raise the tenor of the whole social media experience?

Yeah, I know, you're kind of competitors now on the photo-sharing front. But is that really worth throwing out the baby with the bathwater here? You have a long history of cooperation and interactivity, allowing Facebook posts to appear on Twitter and vice versa.

You have hundreds of employees who could be sitting down every day to resolve your differences. You have hundreds of millions of users who know how great social media can be when everything just works. There are expectations of a golden age. The whole planet is watching. Let's get to it.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Facebook has clarified its platform policies in response to the news that it has shut off friend-finding access to Twitter's new video sharing app, Vine.

Within hours of Vine's launch, the ability for users to find Facebook friends also using Vine disappeared. The move was not unlike a decision Twitter made in July to prevent Instagram users from continuing to find contacts using Twitter.

In a post on its Developer Blog, Facebook clarifies some of its platform policies. While not mentioning Vine by name, it's clear this is the app the company is referring to when it writes:

For a much smaller number of apps that are using Facebook to either replicate our functionality or bootstrap their growth in a way that creates little value for people on Facebook, such as not providing users an easy way to share back to Facebook, we've had policies against this that we are further clarifying today (see I.10).

This is the text from section I.10 (emphasis ours):

Reciprocity and Replicating core functionality: (a) Reciprocity: Facebook Platform enables developers to build personalized, social experiences via the Graph API and related APIs. If you use any Facebook APIs to build personalized or social experiences, you must also enable people to easily share their experiences back with people on Facebook. (b) Replicating core functionality: You may not use Facebook Platform to promote, or to export user data to, a product or service that replicates a core Facebook product or service without our permission.

In other words, if developers want to access data from the Graph API to build a personalized Facebook experience within the app, those developers must make it easy for users to share information within the app back to Facebook.

Moreover, developers will need Facebook's permission to promote or export user data to a service that "replicates a core Facebook product or service."

In the case of Vine, while the service allows sharing back to Facebook or Twitter, the sharing functionality or secondary social network appears to meet Facebook's definition of "replicating a core Facebook product or service."

While it's possible Vine could ask permission from Facebook to have access to the Graph API, given the ongoing social war between Facebook and Twitter, that solution seems unlikely.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The recent unprecedented video footage of a giant squid filmed in its deep ocean habitat has renewed interest in the enormous  and yet still mysterious  species.

It's believed that giant squid (genus Architeuthis) can grow up to 55 feet long. The individual captured on video via a small submarine located in the North Pacific Ocean was about 30 feet long and silver and gold in color, marine biologist Edie Widder, who helped to shoot the footage, said. Her colleague Tsunemi Kubodera added that the squid was missing its two longest tentacles.

Cephalopod experts are intrigued by the world record footage.

SEE ALSO: Photos of Sea Monsters Real and Imagined

"It was really thrilling to see the press releases concerning the filming of a living giant squid with a manned submersible," William Gilly, a professor of biology at Stanford University and the Hopkins Marine Station, told Discovery News.

Gilly previously examined a 7-foot-long giant squid that weighed 300 pounds. It was found floating dead in Monterey Bay, Calif.

"It was missing the tentacles and its stomach had been removed through a hole in its body," he said. "Something strange must like to eat those parts, I guess!"

He also noted that the color-changing system, which functions using organelles called chromatophores that contain pigment and reflect light, was present very deep inside the giant squid's body cavity. In smaller species, this system is arranged only on the bodys outer surface.

In recent months, researchers have also learned more about giant squid eyes. The diameter of these eyes measures two to three times that of any other animal.

Dan-Eric Nilsson of Lund University determined that giant squid eyes measure 10 inches, making them about the same size as a large dinner plate. Big is optimal for sight in deep-water environments.

"For seeing in dim light, a large eye is better than a small eye, simply because it picks up more light," Nilsson said, explaining that the light isnt from the sun, but rather from bioluminescence emitted by other deep sea species, such as huge and hungry sperm whales.

This bioluminescence, he explained, is light produced by small gelatinous animals when they are disturbed by the whale moving through the water. It is well known that bioluminescence can reveal submarines at night, and diving sperm whales will become visible for the same reason."

Bioluminescence even played a key role during the recent filming in about 3,000 feet of water near Japan. Widder, Kubodera and their crew used a lure that mimicked the bioluminescent display of jellyfish in order to attract the giant squids attention.

SEE ALSO: Giant Squid Filmed in Pacific Depths

Despite the footage and other recent research, there are still more questions than answers about giant squid.

Gilly, for example, mentioned that the following questions remain: What are their daily behavior patterns? Do they rise toward the surface at night like many other large oceanic squid, or do they remain deep all the time? How can they tolerate the very low oxygen levels at great depths? How rapidly can they swim? What do they eat, and how do they catch prey with their very long tentacles? How many of them are there in any one place? Do they travel in groups like other squid? If so, do they show group behaviors associated with hunting, mating or defense? How big and old can they get?

"These questions can, at least in theory, be answered by existing technologies, including manned and remotely-operated submersibles for filming," he said.

He added that another important tool could be video and archival electronic tags for filming interactions with other animals, monitoring swimming activity, recording migration patterns, and documenting environmental parameters  such as temperature, depth, light and oxygen  as the squid moves up and down in the water column.

Such tags are programmed to release at a certain time, permitting researchers to non-invasively study the collected data. Gilly and his colleagues are using these techniques to monitor large Humboldt squid in the Gulf of California and off the Pacific coast from Baja California to Canada. No one, though, has yet been able to successfully capture and tag a giant squid for release back into its habitat.

Gilly said Kubodera might be the one, in the future, to solve this problem. In the meantime, Gilly plans "to wait until Jan. 27 like everyone else" to see the rare giant squid footage.

Discovery Channel's Monster Squid: The Giant Is Real, premieres on Jan. 27 at 10 p.m. EST as the season finale of Curiosity.

This article originally published at Discovery News here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Fox's musical teen drama Glee aired its version of hip-hop classic "Baby Got Back" on Thursday  despite objections that the cover's composition was copied from Internet singer-songwriter Jonathan Coulton.

Last week on Twitter, Coulton said Glee "ripped off" his arrangement of the song, which he released in 2005. Coulton noted he had purchased rights to use the lyrics of "Baby Got Back" legally and was upset that his arrangement was allegedly lifted by Glee's songwriters. Here's Coulton's version for comparison:

While Coulton could not be reached for comment at the time of publication, he told The Escapist that Glee's creators said he should be happy for the exposure.

"They do not credit me, and have not even publicly acknowledged that it's my version  so you know, it's kind of SECRET exposure," he told them by email.

An intellectual property attorney previously told Mashable the rights to the arrangement may belong to Coulton depending on which type of contract he obtained the cover rights under.

Do you think Glee's creator's owe Coulton an apology, or do they have rights to the song and its arrangement? Let us know your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Google Flu Trends is a useful tool in tracking the severity of a given flu season. But take some caution in making conclusions from it. Exhibit A: Look at the discrepancy between the following two charts.

The first is Google Flu Trends plot of national flu activity, compared with the last 6 years of flu activity. Google complies this chart by sifting through the search terms that someone might type if they had the flu. In the aggregate, this information is used to create a chart of flu outbreaks that often matches the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention's data on outbreaks.

The bright blue line is the current year  and it looks pretty bad.

Now, look at the CDCs Outpatient Illness surveillance. This data is compiled from 3,000 clinics across the country that report to the CDC when they see patients with flu-like symptoms.This is one of several graphs included in the CDC's weekly flu reports. They also track mortality rates, have a network of labs analyzing viral specimens, survey hospitals for confirmed flu patients, and track the geographic spread of viral strains, among others.

The red line is the current year.

If you have a keen eye, you can see the difference. The first chart implies this is the worst flu season in recent years, the second shows a severe season, but still below the H1N1 (swine flu) pandemic year of 2009. Granted, the CDC's data runs about a week behind Google's, but even data points from a few weeks back show this discrepancy.

In a world where Target knows a woman is pregnant before she or her family does, the power of enormous digital data sets should not be ignored. We all leave huge tracks of data wherever we go  shopping in stores, but especially on the Internet. And these swathes of data create a shadow of our real world that can be analyzed. But its still just a shadow. While Googles Flu trends have passed the acceptance of academic research, the search giant admits that the project needs constant tweaking.

We intend to update our model each year with the latest sentinel provider ILI data, obtaining a better fit and adjusting as online health-seeking behavior evolves over time, Matt Mohebbi, a Google software engineer wrote on Forbes recently. With respect to the current flu season, its still too early to tell how the model is performing.

Recently, I spoke with Lynnette Brammer, an Epidemiologist in the Flu department of the CDC about the role of technology in disease tracking, and about how we can explain the discrepancy in the charts above. Below is an edited version of the interview.

Is it fair to compare the CDC's flu tracking with Google's Flu Trends?



Theres pros and cons to both systems. Because [Googles} system is real time that gives us a peak of what might be coming a week early. The downside is you cant track down those signals. If you see an increase in flu, you cant find out what it really is, at least not directly. Whereas in our ILI system, if we see an increase in people going to the doctors for flu-like illness and we look at our laboratory data and we dont see any increase in flu, well check with our colleagues who look at other respiratory viruses. And we dont see anything there, we can always call the state, and the state calls the physician, and say the next few people who come in, that look like they have flu, can you take some samples and send them to our lab? We can directly follow up on those and investigate things that we think are unusual.

 

There can be things in Google flu trends that cause signals that maybe arent flu. They try very hard to filter out signals that could be caused purely by increased media interest. At the beginning of the pandemic in 2009, they probably had done too good of a job of that. They didnt pick up the signal in the beginning. They modified and they had said all along, were going to do this and if we learn more were going to modify our algorithms. And they did, and it seems to be working, but they seem to be a little high. Changes in peoples [search] behaviors can change that.

 

Its really hard, certainly for us at CDC, to understand whats causing that change. Theyre seeing much pretty much record levels of influenza like illness. And while ours are high, theyre not at historical limits by any means. We just have a lot more flexibility and ability to track down and ask additional questions and find the answers to those questions.



So if what were seeing out of Google is skewing high, how would you describe this seasons outbreak?

This season is within the range of what we see when this Influenza A H3N2 virus, which is predominant right now. When that virus circulates, we tend to have more severe seasons. Not all H3N2 seasons are severe, but the severe seasons tends to be H3N2 seasons. H3N2 virus tend to effect the elderly, so its not a huge surprise to us that we are seeing more illness, more hospitalizations, and more deaths in the elderly this year.

 

Its similar to what we saw in 2007, 2008, a little bit less probably than what we saw in 2003 and 2004 season. Its certainly in the range of normal for this type of virus.



Five years from now, what do you predict will change in the way the CDC tracks the flu? Or what do you hope for?



In five years from now, I would like to get an even larger proportion of my laboratory data electronically, using standard messaging. We have been working to get more and more of that doctor office data electronically. And as more and more of them get those systems, we want to be able to collect the data in a way that doesnt take up a physician or somebody in his office staff, it doesnt take up so much of their time. We want to make reporting easier and, we want to get more data, but we dont want to put an additional burden on people.

 

Im hoping that our mortality data is based more and more on electronic death certificates. A fair number of [our reporting sites] sit there and count how big of a stack, how many death certificates came into their office that week. And theyll sit there and actually read those death certificates and look and see how many had pneumonia, or if there is influenza listed on here. And if death certificates become electronic, and they can get those transferred in electronically, those can get automatically coded and this data can be extracted without having someone sit there and read all these death certificates. Hopefully soon it will all be seamless.



So it sounds like the optimal flu tracking system is a combination of Google Flu trends and the CDCs tracking. Instant data, but also very specific data.



We want the data transmission to be as easy for the people providing it to us as possible. But the thing we dont want is to lose the connection we have with those people. Even if you have really good data coming in, youre always going to have questions about what it means. And nothing replaces being able to call up a doctors office, when you are seeing something unusual, and just being able to say what do you think is going on? And these guys in addition, when they see something thats unusual or something they dont understand, they have the phone number of somebody at the health department, so I think they are more likely to call. We dont want to lose that.



Im imagining that there are Purell dispensers everywhere at the CDC. Is that a fair guess?





When did you realize this winter was going to be a severe flu season?

Its not one of those things when you have an "a-ha" moment and say, O my gosh this is going to be bad. It sort of builds gradually. The fact that we never got down to less than one percent [of our samples] testing positive for flu during the summer sort of gave me a not-so-good feeling. It usually gets down below 1 percent and I think the lowest we got was maybe 3% over the whole summer. And we were starting to see these H3N2 viruses and we were starting to hear from our colleagues in Australia and New Zealand that they had a fairly severe flu season, and those viruses are what circulated there.



What do you make of companies like Target who mine sales records for hints of peoples health states  like if they are pregnant or not. Are there any of these big data implications for national public health? For flu tracking?



This article originally published at National Journal here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Excited to hear about what will happen at next week's first official developer conference for Google Glass? Good luck. Google is requiring attendees to sign a restrictive NDA that bars them from revealing anything about it.

Google's non-disclosure agreement (NDA) for the Google Glass Foundry, a two-day developer event taking place in San Francisco and New York City next week, explicitly forbids developers from talking to the media or posting publicly about anything they do there. ReadWrite got a look at the event's NDA and posted the details.

While that's par for the course for most developer early access, Google also won't allow developers to use their own Google+ accounts to test Glass; the company will instead distribute special developer accounts that Google can revoke at any time.

SEE ALSO: Google Glass (And Sergey Brin) Ride the NYC Subway

The secrecy doesn't end there. Google claims ownership of any photos or videos attendees capture of Google Glass or while using the device. The agreement says developers "waive any moral rights you have and agree not to exercise them," essentially meaning Google will have ownership of the copyrights over any Glass-related intellectual property attendees create at the event. Software, however, is covered by a separate developer's agreement.

While most developers would probably not risk being cut off from Project Glass by revealing anything about the conference, there's still hope. Check out this clause:

Google warns participants not to use Glass while driving, biking, using sharp objects, or playing sports, and to use caution while walking and crossing streets. If they have any concern about the safety of using Glass, Google asks participants to stop using them and return them immediately.

That strongly implies attendees will be able to use their headsets "in the wild" and may even be able to keep them after the conference is over. You may see photos of various developers playing with Project Glass headsets around Google's offices in NYC and SF appearing on Twitter and Facebook next week.

How interested are you in Google Glass, and what do you hope developers do with it? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Last winter, a Stanford researcher discovered Google was bypassing iPhone users privacy settings in the mobile Safari browser in order to serve them ads tailored to their browsing history. Even though Google apologized, paid $22.5 million in fines and chalked the whole thing up to a technical error, several people sued Google over the affair, which was consolidated into a class-action lawsuit.

Now Google is asking the court to tell those people to get lost. The search giant filed an official motion to dismiss the lawsuit this week, stating the plaintiffs claims lack standing, mainly because they suffered no demonstrable injury over the ads, and that Google never obtained anyones personal information via the tracking.

The case all comes down to cookies. Cookies, of course, are the snippets of code your browser uses to remember whether or not youve been to a site (or set of sites) before, helping to exchange things like login information. Cookies inform the site youre browsing that youre a returning visitor, and if it serves ads they can be tailored to your browsing history.

The thing is, ads often serve your browser their own cookies, separate from the site youre on, in order to track you on their network. Those are whats called third-party cookies, and since lots of people are creeped out by them (just search for Do Not Track), many browsers offer a way to opt out of receiving those cookies. Apples mobile Safari is one such browser.

SEE ALSO: Google Caught Tracking Safari Users: What You Need to Know

What happened, according to Google, is that it used a common developer technique that lets it bypass those user preferences to serve cookies  even when the user has opted out  to ensure things like the Google+ +1 buttons that appear on third-party sites still work. Now, because of the way this exception works, once any cookie from a specific domain is allowed, theyre all let in. But thats OK since Google and its ad network use different domains.

Heres where the problem began, as Google explains it: When it introduced Google+ in 2011, it also created a way for users to highlight specific ads on Google they liked. To let users do this while still remaining anonymous, Google had to create a new kind of intermediary cookie, which also bypassed user preferences.

However, not all of Googles developers were up to speed on Safaris let em all in policy on cookies, and these new cookies use the ad-network domain. Because of that oversight, Googles ad network suddenly had backdoor approval to put tailored ads in front of a whole slew of Google+ users who never gave that permission in the first place.

Of course the problem was spotted, Google apologized (and supposedly fixed it) and was fined a record $22.5 million by the FTC, and the lawsuits began. Users cried shenanigans, not buying that the worlds largest ad network somehow served them ads by mistake. In the lawsuit, they claim damages related to their personal information being used to add value to the ads served by Google.

Google says thats bunk. In its motion, it (correctly) points out cookies by their nature dont carry personal information, and that when they do things such as help a browser automatically log into a site, thats only possible because the user had at some point in the past deliberately provided that site with the information.

The plaintiffs also claim Google benefited from serving them ads, and they should be compensated as such. Google is persuasive in its filing when it says any affected users suffered no harm, but the act of serving tailored ads certainly has some value, otherwise the technology wouldn't exist at all.

Is that value enough to justify real damages in a lawsuit? Thats up to the judge, and if Google fails at getting the case tossed, the world may see the first serious trial over Do Not Track. No word on when the judge will rule, but were staying tuned.

In the meantime, let us know what you think of the case in the comments. Googles filing is below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Just as expected  when a lion walks toward you, it's equally menacing and adorable.

But this GoPro Camera had to learn that the hard way. When the camera's owner spotted this lion in Kenya, he strapped his GoPro 2 onto a $60 toy car and drove it slowly toward the adolescent male.

At first, the lion only pawed at it, but after a few moments it decided that this futuristic E.T. thing was clearly the enemy and lunged appropriately. It's ok Simba, at times we all feel equally terrified by the power of technology.

Luckily, the lion slobber didn't harm the footage and we still got to see life as the prey of a lion. Lesson learned: Don't mess with the (lion) king.
--------------------------------------------------------------
In November 2011, Tony Loftis's 13-year-old daughter ran away from their suburban hometown of Wayland, Mass. She was last seen boarding a Peter Pan bus to New York from downtown Boston, and Loftis assumed she'd headed to Brooklyn where his daughter had frequently visited family.

Not a stranger to social media, Loftis took it upon himself to spread word that he was looking for his daughter on email, Facebook, Twitter and LinkedIn.

"We tweeted the heck out of it," Loftis told Mashable.

After a few days, Loftis' story was picked up by The Huffington Post, the New York Daily News, the Boston Herald and four TV stations. On day 12, following a live TV appearance, Loftis received word his daughter had been found living with a sexual predator in Jersey City.

"Once we found my daughter, got her situated and started her in the recovery process, we wanted to organize a way to help parents of missing children use social media," Loftis said. "There certainly was a gap in missing persons organizations' knowledge. They weren't skilled in how to use social media, so we started writing the document."

Loftis, with the help of others, completed a 24-page guide to using social media to find missing children in September 2012. Later, he launched the organization Find Your Missing Child, which he now works on full time.

"Not enough parents are employing social media," Loftis says. "One reason is because we're just starting to get a generation of parents that have used social media as part of their lives. The organizations that the parents of the 1.6 million kids who go missing each year deal with don't know how to use social media themselves."

SEE ALSO: Sisters Reunite After 72 Years With the Help of Facebook

Find Your Missing Child includes a blog and resources for families, police units and other organizations.

Lutfis advises parents to create separate email, Facebook and Twitter accounts for their search. For parents, he says, email's the best way to reach the largest number of people.

"Parents find it unbelievably calming to be involved in a way that doesn't disturb the police's campaign, because you can do something every single second you're awake that actively leads to bringing your child home," he says. "Other people will notice your effort and when the police realize that other people care it gets them more motivated."

However, Loftis warns that there won't be a shortage of criticism toward your child and your parenting.

"You need people to know that you are a good parent and that your kid is a good kid," he says. "The anonymity that social media gives to people to make comments is absolutely scary."

Once children go missing, Loftis tells parents to start writing everything down, from who they speak with to what they last remember their child wearing. The whole ordeal, he says, quickly becomes overwhelming.

Loftis also reminds parents of more a comforting fact: He says about 97% of children who go missing do return home.

"You're your child's best advocate. You can unleash people in your network to find your missing child."
--------------------------------------------------------------
HTC has launched a new low-end, budget-friendly smartphone in China and Taiwan: the HTC Desire U.

The device has a 4-inch, 800x480 pixel screen, a single-core 1GHz CPU, 512MB of RAM, 4GB of memory storage (further expandable via microSD memory cards) and a 5-megapixel camera. It also comes with Beats Audio.

It supports Wi-Fi, 3G and Bluetooth 4.0, and is powered by Android 4.0. It's currently scheduled to arrive only in China and Taiwan, but the exact date of availability hasn't yet been revealed. We don't know if an international version is in the works, but we might get a glimpse of the device (hopefully along with some other new models) at the upcoming Mobile World Congress, held 25-28 February in Barcelona.
--------------------------------------------------------------
China's Huawei more than doubled its market share over the last year to become the world's third largest smartphone maker by units, according to a new report by IDC. Huawei joins familiar names like Samsung (#1), Apple (#2) and Sony (#4), but holding the fifth position is another upstart from China: ZTE.

Overall, the worldwide mobile phone market grew 1.9% year-over-year in the fourth quarter of 2012 as vendors shipped 482.5 million of the devices, IDC reports. Of course, a huge area of growth was smartphones, though the increase of 36.4% came in slightly below IDC's previous forecast of 39.5% for the quarter. For the full year, vendors shipped 545.2 million smartphones, a 10.1% increase over 2011. As expected, Samsung continued to outpace Apple in shipments.

While the overall numbers don't appear that surprising, Huawei's appearance so high on the list was unexpected. Huawei had been a top 10 vendor, but as IDC reports, "Huawei has courted both the mass market with its simple and inexpensive smartphones and the high-end of the market with its Ascend-branded product line." The company also released the world's thinnest smartphone last year (6.68mm), the Ascend P1 and is planning to release the Ascend Mate, which has a 6.1-inch display.

ZTE, meanwhile, held its top five ranking despite transitioning to lineup last quarter to now include more smartphones than display phones. ZTE has benefited from offering a low-cost smartphone, which has appeal in markets like China.

Displaying the volatility of the market, there are three vendors who made IDC's top five last year who are absent from this year's ranking  RIM, Nokia and HTC.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Darcy the Flying Hedgehog hams it up for the camera and her thousands of Instagram fans. And, as if that didn't convince you to send a few orange hearts Darcy's way, the adorably filtered spine-puff also hobnobs with Gizmo the Gremlin and E.T.

SEE ALSO: Waldo Who? Instagram Dog Makes it All About Finding Momo

Tokyo-based "hedgehographer" Shota Tsukamoto captures Darcy's cutest quill-ball moments. See Darcy snooze, lounge with M&Ms or hide from little green army behind a miniature chair at darcytheflyinghedgehog on Instagram.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Chip maker Intel and mobile operator Safaricom have announced the Yolo, the first smartphone for the African market with an Intel processor.

Intel claims the Android device is aimed for "cost-conscious and first-time buyers in Kenya," but its specifications aren't as shabby as that characterization might imply. It's powered by the Intel Atom Z2420 processor which can reach speeds of up to 1.2GHz. It also comes with a 3.5-inch touch screen, a 5-megapixel camera with full HD video capture support, FM radio and HSPA+ support.

"We are delighted to partner with Safaricom in bringing the first smartphone with Intel Inside to Kenyan consumers. The new handset extends the benefits of Intel technology to more smartphone users around the world and we believe that Kenyan consumers will welcome the increased functionality and overall value of the device. We look forward to our continued cooperation with Safaricom," said Aysegul Ildeniz, Intel's Regional Director for the Middle East, Turkey and Africa Region.

The choice of name for the device is somewhat peculiar, given that Canadian rapper Drake, who used the "YOLO  You Only Live Once" acronym in his 2011 song, "The Motto," wasn't too happy about Macy's and Walgreen's use of the acronym.

The Yolo will be sold in Safaricom shops in Kenya for the price of 10,999 Kenyan shillings ($126), and will come bundled with 500MB of data.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The mobile wars can get pretty hostile. It seems as though iPhone users and Android fans are always at odds over battery life, customization, integration and other gripes.

We pit the two platforms against each other in a cruel texting challenge, set in the bitter 16-degree cold that's gripped New York City and much of the northeastern U.S. this week. Which phone can compute text faster when our interns really, really need it? Check out the video above to see who wins.

Got any tricks for texting in bad weather? Tell us in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Two major soap operas will return this spring  but not the way you might expect.

All My Children and One Life to Live will reach viewers via Hulu, Hulu Plus and iTunes, The Online Network announced on Friday.

New half-hour episodes of each show will air every weekday. Exact premiere dates will be announced later. Fans using the Hulu Plus subscription service or free Hulu.com will be able to watch via tablets, PCs or connected TVs. iTunes users can watch via iPhone, iPad, iPod Touch or Apple TV.

Jeff Kwatinetz, CEO of Prospect Park, the production company that owns The Online Network, released a statement framing the move as a key way for the network to stay relevant in a changing entertainment landscape.

"I believe that both Hulu and iTunes have the vision, the reach and the technology to help us launch TOLN in a significant way," Kwatinetz said. "We think these platforms are part of history, helping us to transform distribution. Hulu's reach, platform and advertising prowess are best in class, and iTunes provides an incredible way to buy TV shows that is second to none. Through both of these partners, we hope daytime drama fans are absolutely delighted to be able to watch their favorite programs in a broadcast-quality HD format wherever and whenever they want."

Both All My Children and One Life to Live are long-running soaps that built up loyal followings with decades-long programming runs. All My Children aired from 1970 to 2011, while One Life to Live aired from 1968 to 2012.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Imagine our delight last Wednesday when media mogul/New Age music megastar/omnipresent radio voice guy John Tesh was pulled into a Twitter "slap fight" with comedian Patton Oswalt. It was all about Tesh's quest for a new hashtag to accompany his signature pearls of 140-character wisdom.

It was in good fun, of course. Witty repartee was slung, and Tesh even got some of his followers in on the action (see the full conversation below).

More than that, it was a light bulb moment for Tesh, who's been tweeting since 2008, but typically sees light engagement (he's only amassed 21,000 followers to date, despite his celebrity). Suddenly, his feed was alive with conversations and suggestions around #IStillNeedANewHashtag. And he wants to thank the 500+ fans and followers who offered up some assistance.

Tesh tells Mashable that he will be sending a $5 gift code to every single person who suggested a tag to him since the Twitter chatter began last week. What's more, the user who suggested the winning hashtag will receive a $500 gift code, and Tesh will start using the tag in future tweets. Gift codes to what you may ask? Some strange legal devices prevented Tesh from telling us. We can say it's for "the world's largest e-tailer," so we'll let you do the math on that.

"We saw the immediate response to John's first post about needing a new hashtag and thought doing something nice for his fans [would] surprise them," says Mark Edwards, digital community manager for The Tesh Media Group. "We didn't start out making this a contest, and people didn't know they would all get something just for suggesting a new hashtag."

So, why is Tesh so sweet on Twitter?

"I have vivid memories of what it was like to be reporting for WCBS [in New York City in 1976] from the epicenter of major news events," Tesh tells Mashable of his early career in journalism. "We were all so excited that we could do live microwave broadcasts and be first on the scene. Now, I find myself (like millions of others) going first to Twitter to get breaking news. Twitter reporting on US Airways flight 1549's crash landing in the Hudson was my first big wake-up call."

Regarding his own social media presence, Tesh says, "At first I treated Twitter like Facebook (it's all social media right?). But I soon realized that Facebook is Seinfeld and Twitter is Lenny Bruce. They are much different shows."

The contest is, of course, officially closed now, as of 12 PT/3 ET. You had to be in it to win it. If you follow Tesh, and played along last week, keep an eye on your inbox for a DM.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Texas A&M quarterback Johnny Manziel isn't just a historic Heisman Winner. He's also a master of the novelty trick throw, as this video shows. The 6-minute clip pairs Manziel with the masterful YouTube trick-shot series Dude Perfect, as Manziel and a Dude Perfect counterpart go toe-to-toe in trick throws.

The video has become a massive hit on YouTube, where it's been viewed more than 170,000 times since going up on Thursday. There's football skeet shooting, long-distance balloon popping and more  so check out the video above and let us know what you think in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Here's an exciting innovation in the name of something we can all agree upon: behold the PancakeBot, an awesome breakfast-making machine made largely of LEGO bricks.

The video above gets into the nitty-gritty of how this nifty robot works. The genius behind it is Miguel Valenzuela, an American living in Hokksund, Norway. Valenzuela says his two young daughters inspired the device, which took about nine months to perfect. He recently launched an Indiegogo campaign to bring the invention to the 2013 Maker Faire in the Bay Area this May.

Will you help fund the trip? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The CFO of Chinas Lenovo, the second-biggest personal computer manufacturer in the world, said yesterday that the company was thinking about a possible deal with Canadas Research in Motion. RIM-bulls rejoiced: The companys shares rose around 3%, closing at C$17.80, marking a 52-week high.

The logic is not dissimilar from Lenovos purchase of IBMs ThinkPad laptop business from IBM in 2005. Though the tech titan already dominates Chinas overall mobile phone market, its not particularly renowned for its quality, even in China. Given that Lenovo already has a range of smartphone offerings, the idea, one has to guess, is to upgrade Lenovos smartphone brand and buy a massive sales channel in new markets.

RIM, on the other hand, has been struggling to defend the market share for its BlackBerry smartphones as the likes of Apple and Samsung continue to trounce it. The Financial Times reports (paywall) that RIM is entertaining the idea of new opportunities, though its currently focused on next weeks launch of its new BlackBerry 10 operating system and devices to work with it.

There are legitimate questions about the logic of a linkup, as Tech in Asia notes:

The lack of obvious synergies is probably less of worry than another aspect of a rumored deal. As Bloomberg explains, the Canadian government reviews any foreign bids for domestic companies that exceed C$344 million to assess whether the deal would generate a net benefit to the country. And thats not an empty threat: In 2010, it quashed BHPs proposed takeover of Potash Corp. Plus, the Canadian Industry Minister has already signalled his preference for RIM to grow organically.

So theres that. But south of the border might be even worse. A US Congressional committee recently recommended against government or private purchases from Chinese telecom companies Huawei and ZTE, seeing them as potential Trojan horses for the Chinese state. That suggests that any Chinese bid for all of RIM, which runs software and services for government networks, could run up against the prospect of quickly losing much of its US business.

That leaves the possibility that Lenovo could try to acquire RIMs hardware business alone, and leave RIM with the arguably more-sensitive software and communications services that handle BlackBerry messages for users. The fate of any linkup very well may come down to BlackBerry 10s success. Would Lenovo be interested though? Its recent acquisition kickit just bought a Brazilian tech company, after snapping up five companies alone in 2011suggests it might take what it can get.

This article originally published at Quartz here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Londons so-called "Silicon Roundabout" east of downtown can appear underwhelming. The attached Tube station is decrepit, the shops below ground are tatty, and at night its psychogeography seems deliberately designed to attract muggers and thieves.

It doesnt get much better above the surface. Traffic swirls around the unwieldy Old Street roundabout , which is dominated by a huge billboard. Nearby City Road stretches north for a mile from the Thames and the City of London, home to Londons banks and finance.

The cityscape is depressing. Nothing seems to have been built since the areas halcyon days of printing in the 1970s and 1980s, when it served the newspaper industry on nearby Fleet Street. Here, it feels as if it rains every day.

SEE ALSO: Documentary Details How Silicon Valley Got Its Start

But just because it's ugly doesnt mean it's unimportant. The Silicon Roundabout is the center of Londons emerging tech cluster; behind the disappointing facade, interesting things are brewing.

Last December UK Prime Minister David Cameron announced that the government would invest 50 ($77) million to regenerate the roundabout itself. The new "civic" space will house startups and shared work spaces where students will learn to code; and an advertising screen will replace the aged billboard.

But it is the roundabout's surrounding streets where the real story begins. Restaurants and pubs are up-market, chic and cool, and the Hoxton Hotel serves as a focal point for the hundreds of entrepreneurs at startups flourishing in the area.

Some planning officials hope to link Silicon Roundabout five miles east, to the Olympic Park that hosted last years Olympics. While those intentions are fanciful (some jokers have even called the idea "Silicon Ditch"), there is no doubt that something is at work here.

The Olympics were obviously a boost to the area. Irish playwright George Bernard Shaw once said that every new yard of West End created a new acre of East End, and this is particularly true for London. The money previously invested in the traditional film, TV and advertising industries in Soho to the West was never replicated in this neglected part of the city.

This is changing. The Tech City Investment Organisation (TCIO) is funded by the UK Trade & Investment, which supports companies exporting from or investing in the UK. Its aim is to support the growth of the tech cluster in East London and to champion a 50% tax relief for angel investors, on investments of up to 100,000.

Moreover, tax breaks of 78% are available until 2014, meaning that with other benefits (such as loss relief), investors can write off 100% of those startups that fail.

TCIO recently brought in Facebooks ex-European Head Joanna Shields as CEO. She will soon join the enthusiastic Benjamin Southworth, TCIOs deputy CEO and passionate evangelist of Londons startup scene.

We're seeing a new generation of businesses emerge in London's tech and creative industries," he says. "A number of factors are contributing to this: One is the collision of ideas that happens in a cluster, from being surrounded by other entrepreneurs and innovators. This is hugely exciting.

This collaboration and creativity is translating into jobs and economic growth. We're doing everything we can to foster this growth and act as world-class mentors for the next stage of entrepreneurs.

Ivan Mazour is the CEO and founder of Ometria, an ecommerce analytics software startup. He is also an angel investor, one who is particularly impressed by the training available at Silicon Roundabout.

After immersing myself in the many events that take place, it immediately becomes clear that the startup scene in London is really impressive in the way that the ecosystem has developed methods for inciting people to join, and training them so that they can participate," he says.

"Having experienced things both as an investor and the founder of a startup, the technology and entrepreneurship courses in London have proven to be considerably more useful than a mathematics degree from Cambridge," he adds.

In the heart of the community, theres Google Campus, seven floors of mentoring programs, flexible work spaces, high-speed Internet and a host of events "powered' by the startup community.

PageHub has set up there. One of the few companies to be awarded Facebook's Preferred Marketing Developer status, PageHubs online software helps brands to manage and monitor their activities on Facebook. Its CEO is James Devonport Wood, a young man who epitomizes the energy of Tech City.

The explosive growth of the tech scene in London in recent years has been phenomenal," says Devonport. "Where only five years ago there were only a handful of meet-ups and hack events every month, there are now several every day.

The next true test for Silicon Roundabout is whether it can produce a true global tech giant, avoiding the temptation of an early exit that are so common among European startups.

Silicon Roundabout is not only booming; it is also spreading. Across the river in Greenwich, the focus is on incubation and investment.

Backed by the Royal Borough of Greenwich and Digital Enterprise Greenwich, the area's Digital Peninsula is emerging as a major destination for creative London startups attracted by the promise of business support, high-tech infrastructure and a highly skilled talent pool.

Ravensbournes digital incubator venture, DMIC, has already attracted more than 120 creative businesses to Greenwich, and works closely with global giants such as Cisco and Ogilvy Labs. Its London Transmedia Fest, the largest festival of its kind in the world, has fixed the area on the global map.

Business incubators abound in London, and while we see ourselves very much as part of a wider London ecosystem, we are about creating new innovative collaborations, new jobs and bringing new products and services to market," says Carrie Wootten, head of commercial development at Ravensbourne.

Back over at Silicon Roundabout, companies like the hugely successful Mind Candy, the owner of the Moshi Monsters game, are acting as beachheads for other startups on the rise. Companies (in no particular order) such as Songkick, Moo.com, Decoded, Huddle, Pusher, Halio, PeerIndex, Conversocial, OpenSignalMaps and many others are accomplishing amazing things in their particular sectors. Their success is vital in ensuring that Silicon Roundabout continues trending upwards.

Now we just have to hope that the government spends its 50 million wisely  that visitors don't immediately focus on that ugly roundabout, but rather, become overwhelmed by the beauty of innovation. And maybe a decent coffee shop or two.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Looking for a good deal on a MacBook Air? Head to Best Buy over the next two days to save a whopping $200.

Best Buy is running a Winter Doorbuster Days sale Jan. 25 to 26 in stores and online. While there are a lot of good deals, the one one that stuck out to us is $200 off assorted MacBook Air models.

Both the 11-inch and 13-inch variants are available for $200 off the list price. That means that an 11-inch base model MacBook Air with 64GB SSD and 4GB of RAM is just $799.99. The base model 13-inch MacbBook Air  with 4GB of RAM and a 128GB SSD is just $999.99. Best Buy also has MacBook Air configurations with more drive space. A 256GB SSD 13-inch MacBook Air is $1299.99 and a 128GB 11-inch model is $899.99.

It looks like the $799 model is already sold out online  thought it may still be available in some stores  but the other three models are all available.

The current-generation MacBook Air computer has the latest Intel Core i5 processor using Ivy Bridge. It has two USB 3.0 ports and a Thunderbolt port.

This is a great price for the MacBook Air  and one of the best we've seen at a major retailer. Apple usually prevents retailers from offering these kinds of deep discounts, but perhaps the company has allowed Best Buy to hold this sort of sale  similar to the sale it offered Walmart on iPhone 5 and iPad devices right before Christmas.

I'm typing this post on a 2012 13-inch base model MacBook Air and I can say that it is my favorite laptop of all time. There are only a handful of things I find myself using my 27" Core i7 iMac for these days; the MacBook Air is that good.

If you've been waiting to take the plunge on a MacBook Air, now's the time to act.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Hip-hop duo Macklemore & Ryan Lewis's "Thrift Shop"  about the pursuit of buying inexpensive clothing  moved to the top of Billboard's Hot 100 this week. The singles chart tracks digital downloads and streaming stats along with radio airplays and sales.

"Thrift Shop," which Mashable premiered in August and has accumulated 65 million page views on YouTube, earned Billboard's best "Digital Gainer" recognition and ranked number one on the Digital Songs chart with 341,000 downloads. The recently launched Streaming Songs chart places "Thrift Shop" at the top spot with 1.68 million streams.

"Thrift Shop" beat out "Locked Out of Heaven" by Bruno Mars, "Ho Hey" by The Lumineers, "Suit & Tie" by Justin Timberlake and "I Knew You Were Trouble" by Taylor Swift.

The duo from Seattle consists of rapper Macklemore and producer Ryan Lewis. "Thrift Shop" is from their 2012 independently released album The Heist.

SEE ALSO: Billboard Alters Music Charts to Add Digital Sales and Streaming Data

"Thrift Shop" isn't the first independent single to top the Hot 100. Most recently, charity single "We Are the World 25 for Haiti" snatched top billing in early 2010.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Online book reviews on sites like Amazon and Goodreads have an immense power over the sales of newly published work, but how trustworthy are reviews?

A new book about Michael Jackson shows the strength of fan groups and how online reviews can be "gamed" to read a certain way. Michael Jacksons Rapid Response Team to Media Attacks is a Facebook and Twitter group that leveraged social networks to ask other fans to write negative reviews of the new book, Untouchable: The Strange Life and Tragic Death of Michael Jackson by Randall Sullivan. Fans were infuriated by the way he discussed what plastic surgery did to MJs nose and the authors assertion that he died a virgin.

In a larger scope, the situation calls to attention to two problems that help us better understand web culture (or at least the Amazon ecosystem). The first is a question regarding online anonymity. This removes the accountability associated with the reviewer by, for example, putting someone that hasnt read the book alonside someone that actually did.

The second problem is that reviewers own opinions might conform to whats already posted, particularly if theyre being directed from a forum or social media dialogue. The issue is a common problem in other parts of the web like SoundCloud, where a visitor might think a track is good based on the fact that it appears to have received many plays or likes.

Many recognize online reviews as the closest thing we have online to "word of mouth" marketing, but to what extent can such reviews be trusted? Particularly when youre dealing with mobs of fans?

Amazon has not taken any definitive steps to curb mobs of fans, but it has cracked down on writers' reviews of other writers and reviews submitted by family members, according to the New York Times. The article frames this issue succinctly in posing the question: Is a review merely a gesture of enthusiasm or should it be held to a higher standard?

This article originally published at PSFK here
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Massachusetts Institute of Technology has ranked the most buzzed-about university on the Internet for the second time in a row, ahead of Harvard, Columbia and Stanford.

The Global Language Monitor's TrendTopper MediaBuzz survey measures the schools with the most Internet clout. One major trend this year is the rise of public universities on the list, as 13 of the top 25 schools ranked are now state institutions. Two public universities, the University of California, Berkeley, and the University of Texas, Austin, placed in the top 10.

"The higher education world is in the midst of a major upheaval that has only begun to sort itself out," said Paul JJ Payack, president of the Global Language Monitor. "You can't have an institution of MIT's stature give away its product for free, or millions of students opting for online schools or educations provided by for-profit organizations, and of course the globalization of higher ed, and not record significant change."

This is the fifth year and eighth edition of the Global Language Monitor's list, which is published every nine months.

SEE ALSO: 25 Most-Buzzed Universities on the Internet

Payack also observes that Pennsylvania State University, which had previously ranked in the top 20, has been severely bruised following the scandal surrounding its football program. This year it placed 39 and last year, immediately following its scandal, it placed 51.

Similarly, Emory University fell from 59 in the rankings to 71, following its SAT score inflation scandal.

Take a look at the list of the top 25 below. The numbers in parenthesis indicate 2012's rankings.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Launchpad is a series that introduces Mashable readers to compelling startups. If you would like to have your startup considered for inclusion, please see the details here.



One-Liner Pitch: NewlyWish is a free online wedding gift registry service that offers couples options beyond the usual big department stores.

Why It's Taking Off: Couples can create a single wedding gift registry from a network of more than 50 independent shops, brands and artisans.

A few years ago, Amada Allen and Robard Williams were planning their wedding and trying to find time to look for the perfect venue and bridal dress. But when it came to figuring out their registry, they found that their options were limited.

The local shops that we like didnt have online registries and when we went to the big department stores, we just had a mediocre experience, Allen told Mashable in an interview.

So in May 2010, Amanda and her husband partnered with web design company Intersect and created NewlyWish, a wedding gift registry service that lets couples create a single gift list from more than 50 handpicked independent shops, brands and artisans across the United States.

The online platform provides a seamless registry creation process by curating items from each shop and offering couples choices that they wouldnt normally get from large department stores. Couples can choose to add more traditional gifts like kitchen and bath items to their registry, or leisurely gifts that suit their styles like spas, cooking classes or even tickets to a baseball game.

Couples are making so many decisions when theyre engaged, and their registry is just one decision, Allen told Mashable. NewlyWish provides couples with a personalized shopping experience and options beyond the large big-box retailers.

Each registry has a unique URL that couples can share with friends and family. If guests decide not to purchase an item on the registry, they can choose to buy gift certificates that couples can use on the site.

Apart from being a registry service platform, NewlyWish also offers other items that couples may need for their wedding plans, such as bridal accessories, wedding party gifts, stationary and items for bachelor and bachelorette parties. The company earns a net margin of between 15%50% on all products sold on the site.

In November 2012, NewlyWish was selected as the winner of the Women 2.0 PITCH NYC competition out of more than 260 submissions in 24 countries. Now with approximately 1,500 registry profiles, the majority of users are engaged, tech savvy and educated women between the ages of 27 and 35. Most of the women are from major cities in the U.S., including New York, Los Angeles, San Francisco and Chicago.

NewlyWish is bootstrapped with $70,000 raised through two Business Plan competition wins, sponsored by Merrill Lynch and Pace University.
--------------------------------------------------------------
How well did you really listen to President Barack Obama's Inauguration?

Did you hear the part about Elvis and the part where he admits how much he loves makeup? No?

It's ok, neither did we. But according to BadLipReading, it's not about what you say, but what it looks like your lips are saying.

SEE ALSO: "So Help Me Internet": Funniest Inauguration GIFs and Pics

And apparently Obama's lips weren't aware of what his speechwriting team worked on all week. His lips were happy to sing a song about hungry grandmas instead.

If you ask us, this speech is just as inspiring as the real one.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A petition submitted to the White House demands the Librarian of Congress to rescind his recent decision which removed the unlocking of cellphones from the exceptions to the Digital Millenium Copyright Act (DMCA).

Due to the Librarian's decision, the unlocking of cellphones effectively becomes illegal in the U.S. on Jan. 26.

"As of January 26, consumers will no longer be able unlock their phones for use on a different network without carrier permission, even after their contract has expired," reads the petition. "Consumers will be forced to pay exorbitant roaming fees to make calls while traveling abroad. It reduces consumer choice, and decreases the resale value of devices that consumers have paid for in full."

Created by "S. K." from San Francisco, CA, the petition needs to reach 100,000 signatures before February 23 in order to get a response from the White House  the White House recently raised the threshold from 25,000 signatures. At the time of this writing, 3,121 people have signed the petition.

"We ask that the White House ask the Librarian of Congress to rescind this decision, and failing that, champion a bill that makes unlocking permanently legal," the petition text concludes.

Should unlocking of cell phones be legal or illegal? Share your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Scotland is revered for its scenic country side, historic castles and  of course  being the birthplace of Mashable.

It's tough to imagine better incentives to visit, right?

VisitScotland, in an attempt to promote tourism to the isle, released a series of pictures on its website of some of its most adorable residents: a pair of Shetland ponies dressed in sweaters with classic, breath-taking Scottish landscape in the background.

One more time: That's Shetland ponies, hand-knitted sweaters and Scottish scenery. The only thing missing here is a set of kilts.

The ponies, Fivla (red sweater) and Cinnamon (brown sweater), were photographed as part of VistScotland's "Year of Natural Scotland" campaign, which aims to celebrate the country's natural beauty through landscape, art and wildlife.

SEE ALSO: How Google Glass Could Change Advertising

You can see the rest of the d'aww-worthy photos here.

Do you think this an effective campaign? What other creative ways have you seen countries promote tourism? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
On Feb. 3, 2013, the Baltimore Ravens and The San Francisco 49ers will redefine sibling rivalry.

Yeah, yeah, there's that whole Super Bowl thing that night, but we're more interested in how the head coaches  and brothers  of the rival teams deal with the family affair.

It appears that Ravens coach John Harbaugh is dealing with the whole thing smoother than a pigskin: He's just taking this as an opportunity to prank his parents.

SEE ALSO: Super Bowl Coach Jim Harbaugh Was Once on 'Saved By The Bell'

And considering the Harbaugh parents have a no-win situation on their hands (but, seriously, whoever wins is clearly going to be their favorite), they could use the laughs.

Our friends at NowThisNews captured the hilarious, near-successful prank. Watch above.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Samsung's revenue and profits are growing at a nearly Apple-level pace, at least for now.

The company announced Friday that it generated revenues of $52.4 billion in the December quarter, an increase of about 18.5% from the fourth quarter in 2011 and just shy of the record $54.5 billion in revenues that Apple reported for the same quarter.

Even more impressive, Samsung posted a net profit of $6.6 billion for the quarter, an increase of more than 75% from the same period a year ago and a new record for the company. Much of this was driven by its success with smartphones and tablets: the operating profit for Samsung's mobile division more than doubled to about $5 billion for the quarter.

While it was a strong earnings report for the company, Samsung noted during the earnings call that demand for smartphones will likely "decelerate" in developed countries in the coming quarter, though demand for cheaper smartphones will likely stay strong in emerging markets.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Does Skype let police and authorities spy on users' conversations? That's the question a wide group of advocacy organizations including the Electronic Frontier Foundation as well as Reporters Without Borders, and many activists and journalists, are asking in an open letter published online.

The signatories note that Skype, with more than 600 million users, has become "one of the worlds largest telecommunications companies." And many of those users rely on it for sensitive conversations, be it activists living under authoritarian regimes, or journalists talking to sources. In other words, users rely on Skype "for the privacy of their communications and, in some cases, their lives," the letter reads.

In light of that, "it is unfortunate that these users, and those who advise them on best security practices, work in the face of persistently unclear and confusing statements about the confidentiality of Skype conversations, and in particular the access that governments and other third parties have to Skype user data and communications."

That's why the group wants Skype and its parent company Microsoft to publicly release a regularly updated transparency report, a la Google, detailing its privacy policies as well as what data Skype releases to third parties, what data the company itself collects, how many times it responds to government requests to release that data, and what criteria it uses when making that call.

What's more, the signatories want to know what responsibilities Skype thinks it has regarding laws like the Communications Assistance for Law Enforcement Act (CALEA), how they respond to subpoenas, and to National Security Letters. These are special subpoenas used by authorities in national security cases that can even be accompanied by a gag order that prevents the recipient from disclosing the existence of the request.

Basically, the signatories want to know whether Skype's stance on privacy and eavesdropping has change over the years, particularly after it was acquired by Microsoft.

Microsoft refused to grant Mashable an interview with its Chief Privacy Officer, Brendon Lynch. The company answered our requests for comment with an email stating it is reviewing the letter and that "Microsoft has an ongoing commitment to collaborate with advocates, industry partners and governments worldwide to develop solutions and promote effective public policies that help protect peoples online safety and privacy."

In the past, as Slate reported, Skype has always been widely trusted thanks to its encryption and peer-to-peer based architecture that made snooping on calls virtually impossible. In 2007, Skype itself publicly stated that its practices made it impossible for them to wiretap conversations. And the German police even complained about it.

But in recent years, things might have changed. Hackers pointed to a recent redesign of Skype's architecture, a change that might have made it easier for the company and interested authorities to spy on users' calls.

"Microsoft made this change to Skype's architecture to make it more centralized," explains Eva Galperin, an activist at the EFF. "But by making it more centralized, suddenly they were capable exactly of the sort of surveillance that Skype had earlier denied that it's capable of."

At the time of the change, security and privacy expert Chris Soghoian wrote that "until it is more transparent, Skype should be assumed to be insecure, and not safe for those whose physical safety depends upon confidentiality of their calls."

Skype denied that the change had anything to do with enhancing eavesdropping capabilities, but it refused to clarify whether it allows wiretapping requests, when questioned by Slate in the summer of 2012.

The fact that, in June 2011, Microsoft entered an application for a patent for "legal intercept" that seems tailor-made for chat services like Skype didn't help putting rumors to rest.

Also, in early 2012, after the arrest of Megaupload's Kim Dotcom and his associates, the FBI said they used emails and Skype chat logs dating back to 2007 to nab the file-sharing guru. This seemingly contradicts Skype's policy of retaining chat logs for only 30 days.

Skype's strong stance on its users' privacy is no longer clear, and experts are wary.

Advocacy group Electronic Privacy Information Center (EPIC) wrote in a statement to Mashable that even though they haven't decided whether to sign the letter, they "do think that companies should be transparent with users about their privacy practices" and that "Skype should incorporate transparency into its business practices."

The EFF publishes a report titled "Who has your back?" detailing which companies are transparent about government data requests or whether they fight for users' privacy in courts or in Congress.

For Galperin, being transparent is the least a tech company can do nowadays. "If you are hanging on to users' private data and users are concerned of government requests of their data, or government takedowns, or surveillance, then one of the best of ways to alleviate that sort of concern is to be transparent.
--------------------------------------------------------------
On Jan. 27, 1967, the crew of Apollo 1 was killed when a fire broke out in their pure oxygen-soaked capsule during a routine pre-launch test. The dangers of an oxygen fire should have been obvious to NASA. It was obvious to the Apollo spacecrafts builder, North American Aviation, who recommended the space agency not run tests with a highly pressurized spacecraft.

It was also a danger the Soviet space agency knew well. In the early days of training, cosmonaut hopeful Valentin Bondarenko was killed in an eerily similar accident to the Apollo 1 crew.

Cosmonaut training in the 1960s wasnt all that different from the astronauts training at NASA. Neither nations space program was sure how men would react to orbital flight and each went to great lengths to prepare its men, both mentally and physically, for the anticipated stresses. For the cosmonauts, the mental training included time spent in an isolation chamber the cosmonaut trainees called the Chamber of Silence.

The Chamber was a spartan room with minimal furnishings: a steel bed, a wooden table, a seat identical to the Vostok capsules, toilet facilities, an open-coil hot plate and a limited amount of water for both washing and cooking.

Cosmonauts also had leisure materials. Mind games were posted on the walls, and some men were given books or drawing materials. That was it. As the "Chamber of Silence" moniker suggests, sensory deprivation was part of the test. The room was mounted on rubber shock absorbers that muffled any vibrations from movement outside, and the 16-inch thick walls absorbed all outside sounds.

During the test, cosmonauts had no voice communications with the test administrators outside the Chamber. They communicated with doctors by lights. A light would turn on, signaling the cosmonaut to apply medical sensors to his body; turning on an outside light from inside the Chamber cosmonauts could tell doctors when they were ready to start a test. A different light would signal the end of the isolation test.

The only sound came from frequent, random interruptions. A sudden blast of classical music was designed to see how the cosmonauts would react to a pleasurable shock.

SEE ALSO: Deaths of Phantom Cosmonauts

The test was meant to challenge the cosmonauts mental stability and ability to adapt to strange situations. The hardest part for the test subjects was waiting  cosmonauts werent told beforehand how long a test would last. It could run anywhere from a few hours to weeks. Completing the simulated spaceflight atmosphere, the Chamber was pressurized to mimic a Vostok in flight with 68% oxygen.

Valentin Bondarenko, known to his friends as a kind man of great athletic abilities who fought to prove he was worthy of the honor of flying in space, was the 17th cosmonaut to go into the Chamber of Silence. On March 23, 1961, his ten day stay in the Chamber ended; a light from technicians outside told him they had started depressurizing the cabin.



 Detail of cosmonaut Alexei Leonovs spacesuit during his historic EVA in 1965, four years after Valentin Bondarenko died in an oxygen fire during training. (Public domain)

Bondarenko spent his last few minutes in the Chamber removing his biomedical sensors, wiping the adhesive off his skin with a rubbing alcohol soaked cotton pad. But his mind was elsewhere, likely outside the Chamber after ten days of mentally strenuous testing. He threw the alcohol soaked cotton pad towards the garbage but missed. It landed on the hot plates uncovered coil. It wasnt uncommon for cosmonauts to leave the hotplate turned on all the time; many described the small test space as chilly.

The room and everything in it had been soaking in a high oxygen concentration for ten days. A fire sparked and engulfed the room in an instant. Technicians managed to open the door quickly, and exposed to air the fire died down almost immediately but the damage was done. A severely burnt Bondarenko was huddled on the floor. Miraculously, he was still alive.

The doctors that reached the cosmonaut trainee immediately saw the severity of the situation. Bondarenkos wool clothes had melted onto his body, his skin had burned away, his hair had caught fire, and his swollen eyes were melted shut. "Its my fault," he whispered, "Im so sorry no one else is to blame."

SEE ALSO: True Horror Stories from Space

Bondarenko, wrapped in a blanket, was immediately transferred by a small army of men in uniforms to a hospital in Moscow. The cosmonaut asked for a pain killer. Doctors obliged with a shot of morphine in the soles of his feet, the only unharmed part of his body thanks to his heavy boots. But there was nothing anyone could do to save him.

Just 24 years old, Valentin Bondarenko died the next morning. The official cause was shock and severe burns.

In keeping with the Soviets traditional secrecy, Bondarenkos identity and the nature of the accident wasnt publicized in the West. Theres been some speculation that had Soviet space officials shared Bondarenkos story with their American counterparts, the Apollo 1 astronauts could have been spared. But its unlikely. By the mid-1960s, there was enough American-based research about the hazards of oxygen fires that a warning from the Soviets wouldnt have changed NASAs approach to the "plugs-out" test.

This article originally published at Discovery News here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Square announced late Thursday that COO Keith Rabois was leaving the company to pursue other opportunities. Now, the Wall Street Journal is reporting that his resignation came after a sexual harassment claim from an unnamed employee at Square.

The Journal reports hearing from Square that a lawyer representing the employee in question accused Rabois of sexual harassment and said that the company had failed to take necessary action. Rabois denied the charges to the Journal: "I'm completely confident that all the facts will come out and I will be vindicated."

In a lengthy post on his Tumblr, Rabois explained that he had a physical relationship with a man who he then recommended to interview for a job at Square. Rabois says he did not work directly with the employee, but that he did continue to have a physical relationship with him after he was hired at Square.

I realize that continuing any physical relationship after he began working at Square was poor judgment on my part. But let me be unequivocal with the facts: (1) The relationship was welcome. (2) Square did not know of the relationship before a lawsuit was threatened; it came as a complete surprise to the company. (3) He never received nor was denied any reward or benefits based on our relationship. And (4), I did not do the horrendous things I am told I may be accused of. While I have certainly made mistakes, this threat feels like a shakedown, and I will defend myself to the full extent of the law.

Ultimately, Rabois says he decided to resign from the company to avoid serving as a distraction for his coworkers. "I decided to resign from Square so my colleagues could continue to do great work without the distraction that a lawsuit would most certainly bring," he said.

Rabois served as the second-in-command at Square, helping to steer the startup's business development and ramping up the staff. Before joining the company in 2010, Rabois held executive positions at big-name tech companies, including LinkedIn and PayPal and, according to his LinkedIn profile, he currently serves on the board of directors at Yelp.

Square has been riding high in recent months, closing a $200 million round of funding in September that valued the company at $3.25 billion, and partnering with Starbucks to make Square available in some 7,000 stores across the U.S. It remains to be seen how much of a shadow this casts over the startup in the coming days.
--------------------------------------------------------------
So J.J. Abrams, director of the rebooted Star Trek series, has officially been tapped by Disney to direct the next movie in the ever-expanding Star Wars saga. And by the tone of the tweets floating around the ether Thursday night, you'd be forgiven for thinking a Protestant had just been elected Pope.

Star Trek and Star Wars have some major built-in sectarian differences, which aren't immediately apparent to outsiders. One is science fiction, the other science fantasy. One is resolutely humanist, the other revolves around a mystical religion. One is set centuries into Earth's future, the other who-know-how-long ago in the past of a whole other galaxy. One began on TV and got canceled after 3 seasons, forcing its creator to beg for financing; the other hit the big screen like an atom bomb, and when its creator attempted to abandon it after 3 movies, the fans wouldn't hear of it.

So it's not surprising that Trekkers (as they prefer to be known) tend to nurse a little resentment towards their more popular Jedi counterparts. (After all, nobody is describing themselves as "Federation" on census forms.) Abrams' defection could only exacerbate that sense of ill-deserved inferiority. This reaction from a movie critic and StarTrek.com columnist says it all:

Behind the scenes, however, the two franchises have been inspiring each other, and sharing personnel, for years. Abrams will hardly be the first player to switch sides.

Alan Dean Foster, who wrote the first two Star Wars novels, also did the script treatment for the first Trek movie. George Lucas' special effects giant, Industrial Light and Magic, was a major player in bringing Star Trek: The Next Generation to TV screens in 1987. Visual Effects Supervisor John Knoll was the guy who figured out how to make the Starship Enterprise do that famous "stretch and snap" in the opening credits:

Knoll (who is also the co-developer of Photoshop) stuck with the Star Trek series until 1995  whereupon he promptly turned around to help Lucas with the Star Wars Special Edition, and then on to the prequels. Lucas himself appeared in a documentary called Trek Nation, praising Star Trek creator Gene Roddenberry for his "moral lessons."

And then there's George Takei, hero of the Internet and the first major actor to crop up in both franchises (he voiced a character in the Clone Wars series). When Carrie Fisher (Leia) and William Shatner (Kirk) got into a supposed feud over the franchises  and really, given the obvious affection they have for one another, it was the fakest thing since pro wrestling  Takei stepped in to broker "Star Peace" between the fans and direct them both against a greater foe.

Here's how it all played out:

Note the part where Fisher claims that Shatner once wore her infamous metal bikini from Return of the Jedi? I'll leave you with that mental image, which explains better than most how close the franchises have been all along behind the scenes.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The first released scene from jOBS, the upcoming independent film about tech icon Steve Jobs, emerged online Thursday. Soon after, Apple co-founder Steve Wozniak expressed dismay over Ashton Kutcher's portrayal of Jobs and Josh Gad's portrayal of him.

"We never had such interaction and roles," Wozniak told Gizmodo. "I'm not even sure what it's getting at ... personalities are very wrong although mine is closer."

The scene shows Jobs telling Wozniak his "operating system" can be sold to the masses.

The film  not to be confused with the one Sony Pictures is creating based on Walter Isaacson's biography of the late tech luminary  will premiere this week at the Sundance Film Festival and arrive in theaters on April 19. Jobs died from pancreatic cancer in 2011.

SEE ALSO: 6 Ways to Enjoy the Sundance Film Festival From Afar

Distributors Open Road Films and Five Star Feature Films released this deeper synopsis of jOBS earlier this month:

Directed by Joshua Michael Stern, written by Matthew Whitely, shot by Oscar-winning cinematographer Russell Carpenter and produced by Mark Hulme, jOBS details the major moments and defining characters that influenced Steve Jobs on a daily basis from 1971 through 2000. jOBS plunges into the depths of his character, creating an intense, dialogue-driven story that is as much a sweeping epic as it is an immensely personal portrait of Steve Jobs' life. The filmmakers were granted unprecedented access during shooting to the historic garage in Palo Alto that served as the birthplace to Apple Inc.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Strokes are back. Almost two years after the release of their last album, Angles, the band returned Friday with audio for "One Way Trigger" on their website.

The track will be featured on their fifth album, Comedown Machine, which Pitchfork reports will be released on March 26.

Give it a listen yourself through this Soundcloud embed.

SEE ALSO: Watch Justin TImberlake's Spiffy Video for 'Suit and Tie'

The band announced the news on Twitter this afternoon with this cryptic tweet:

Reaction across Twitter has been positive so far, with many fans commenting on singer Julian Casablancas' uncharacteristically high vocals:

Originally, it was announced the band would be releasing a single called "All The Time."

What do you think of the song? Are you excited for the new album? Tell us below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Attention hopeless lovers: Jimmy Kimmel has created an easy to follow instructional video to help you figure out if your gal-pal is flesh and blood or just a figment of your lonely imagination.

And while the steps are fairly easy, it might be jarring to realize that your Friday nights will no longer include snuggling with "Rebecca" but watching Late Night With Jimmy Kimmel.

SEE ALSO: Create a Fake Girlfriend on Facebook for Just $39.99

It'll be okay buddy, we hear Manti Te'o has a pretty free schedule these days. Maybe you can invite him over for your next movie night.
--------------------------------------------------------------
On average, you come across a 3M product 40 times a day  from reflective street signs to cellphone screens to Scotch tape to Post-it notes. That's right, 3M goes well beyond office supplies  the company has 65,000 products spanning every market imaginable  and it's quite the innovator.

Among its most popular products is Thinsulate, the thin insulation material used in myriad gloves, jackets and boots. There's a good chance it's keeping you warm in these chilly winter temperatures. If you're wondering how your lightweight jacket manages to keep you so warm, we have some answers. Mashable spoke with Jeff Gunia, Thinsulate's global business manager, about how Thinsulate was developed, how it keeps you warm and where else this innovative material is used.

Who said warm needs to be bulky? Certainly not the team at 3M that developed Thinsulate in 1978 under the pretense of "warmth without bulk." The material is a matted piece of insulation that allows you to remove the bulk out of jackets.

"There's no need to have that 'Michelin Man' look  we could give you the same type of thermal efficiency for much less cost, weight and thickness," says Gunia. Over the years, the Thinsulate portfolio has developed to be a warm and thin alternative to down.

The microfibers in Thinsulate trap air molecules between you and the outside world  the more air it traps, the warmer you stay. This science explains why winter coats are typically bulky. But Thinsulate fibers are finer than those used in other synthetic and natural insulation materials so they trap more air in less space, making it a more efficient insulator.

One important Thinsulate implementation is in footwear, since there's not a lot of room to insulate your feet in a snow or rain boot. "You want things that are compression resistant, thin and lightweight with high thermal efficiency, and thats the way the shoe is made, so ounce for ounce, gram for gram, we are arguably the most thermally efficient footwear," says Gunia. "Most of the tech footwear or high quality footwear is going to have a Thinsulate footwear product in it. Its our bread and butter, and its the tech that has really changed the way you can insulate footwear."

Over its 30-year history, the Thinsulate portfolio has grown so that it can fit just about any product. The Thinsulate team works with clients  consumer brands such as Spyder, Harley Davidson and Burton  to bring concepts to life with a focus on style and design.

The team works with designers to decide which type of insulation technology would work the way the designers want it to. For instance, ski pants need "flexible insulation" that will allow the material to stretch in the butt and knees to accommodate squatting on the slopes, but then recover to fit normally. Thinsulate items are always warm, but they also can incorporate other features, such as the aforementioned stretch recovery, anti-odor (X-static silver fibers are used for odor control), and flame-resistant (FR) insulations for oil, gas, military and occupational applications. There's even a recycled version of Thinsulate, in which 50% of the fibers are recycled from post-consumer waste.

Thinsulate applications go well beyond apparel. Eight years ago, the team at 3M discovered that Thinsulate has very good acoustic properties, so the auto division created 3M Thinsulate Acoustical Insulation, which has been used in Honda vehicles, in addition to motorcycles, trains, RVs, yachts, houseboats, trucks and buses. It enables a quieter ride without adding a ton of weight.

But the material goes beyond transport  because of its acoustic properties, thinness and the ability to conform to just about any shape, you'll also encounter Thinsulate behind the scenes in your office. It's probably muffling the sound of your desktop computer, printer, scanner and copier. And if you're a laptop user whose thighs burn from an overheating computer, you could use a Lapinator, a Thinsulate heat protection sleeve for your legs.

With its thermal properties, it's no surprise that Thinsulate has also been recognized for energy efficiency  if it keeps humans warm and doesn't let the exterior climate affect the interior, then it can also be a great material for home construction. While houses primarily utilize fiberglass insulation, Thinsulate has been used in bedding and in drapes. You lose about 25% of heat in winter and cool air in the summer through your windows, so if you can improve the insulation, you can conserve energy and save money on utility bills.

The Thinsulate design lab runs hundreds of tests and works closely with other 3M lab teams to make sure the products are efficient and functional  for instance, there's collaboration with the auto lab to develop Thinsulate products for vehicles. And, of course, there's close communication with the client's designers to make sure the proper aesthetic is being achieved. "Were the function side, theyre the fashion side," says Gunia of the 3M client relationships. "Burton can tell their story better than we can tell their story, so we give them the nuggets of science that help them create the performance they're looking for on the jacket."

Depending on the application  New England slopes, Antarctica, etc.  the Thinsulate team can design the garment and test its thermal capabilities in labs to make sure it will do the job. There's an array of testing, including thermographic imaging, to make sure the Thinsulate product is maintaining the proper amount of warmth. "If the Burton team says they need an oversized snowboard jacket for the California market, they'll send in what they're using, well test it and suggest other products that will decrease the weight," Gunia says.

3M is a global innovation company always looking to create new and inspiring products. Customer panels and feedback help to drive innovation, as each client presents a new challenge for the Thinsulate team. "A lot of tech development and ongoing tech production comes from customers  well sit down with them and they'll need, say, an insulation that is temperature-regulating," and the lab teams will collaborate to produce the proper Thinsulate material, says Gunia. Just like the old adage, necessity is the mother of invention, or in this case, innovation.

With constant product expansion of the Thinsulate brand and a passionate push for innovation, we can anticipate Thinsulate being more a part of our daily lives, perhaps even in the digital and electronic tools we use every day.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Should Twitter be forced to reveal anti-Semitic and racist users? That's exactly what a court in France is asking the company to do.

Several French groups demanded in a recent lawsuit that Twitter identify anonymous users posting anti-Jewish messages they argued broke French law, which prohibits Holocaust denial and hate speech. A French judge agreed and ordered the company to reveal the users, but Twitter is hesitant to comply, reports The New York Times.

Twitter is currently reviewing the judge's decision, a Twitter spokesperson told Mashable.

The company's official policy is not to reveal anonymous users unless there's a court order from an American court, as all Twitter user data is stored in the United States.

Twitter has a mixed record of complicance with European hate speech and anti-racism laws: In October of last year, it blocked neo-Nazi accounts on a request from Germany, where local law bans neo-Nazi content. However, Twitter received one content removal request from a French government agency or law enforcement organization between January and July of last year, with which it did not comply, according to Twitter's first transparency report.

SEE ALSO: Twitter: We Comply with 63% of Government Requests

If Twitter decides against cooperating in this particular case, French authorities will be given two options: Give up or try to open the case in an American court through an international legal process which the British government used in 2011 to unveil an anonymous user charged with defamation. In that case, Twitter complied with Britain's demands once a Californian court order was issued.

While the French case may seem like an isolated incident, it speaks to a much larger issue in international technology law: When a platform such as Twitter is based in one country but users break a law in another, which country gets jurisdiction over the case? Watching this particular case closely may help at least partially answer that vexing question.

Should Twitter unveil users accused of breaking French hate speech laws or let them remain persons unknown? Share in the comments.

Photo via JACK GUEZ/AFP/Getty Images; photo shows approximately 20 Israeli demonstrators protesting outside the Swedish embassy in Tel Aviv on August 24, 2009.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Vine  Twitter's GIF-like looping video platform  has been out for less than 24 hours, but some brands are already experimenting with it.

Perhaps the most enthusiastic early adopter is Urban Outfitters, which has created two Vines so far:

Lucky magazine is also kicking the tires on Vine:

Other brands that were said to have tried out Vine include the New York Jets and Warby Parker, though neither of those brands currently has a Vine on their Twitter feed.

In its official post introducing Vine, Twitter did not mention any ad possibilities. However, it's easy to see how a brand could use a Vine in a Promoted Tweet.

What do you think? Will the :06 become the new :30 in the ad world? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Vine, the new iOS app that lets you shoot six-second, multi-scene video, has the potential to be the next mobile phenomenon. But its earliest public iteration has four flaws holding it back from greatness.

In order to test Vine, I attempted twice to Vine my commute between Mashable headquarters in Manhattan and my apartment in Queens. I had the storyboard drawn in my head  for the morning commute, it would start with a shot of me pouring coffee, cut to the subway arriving at my station in Astoria, then you'd see some shaky-cam of my walk past Madison Square Park and the Empire State Building before I finally arrived at my desk.

Neat, right? Right  theoretically. It did not go as planned.

What happened? I also like to listen to podcasts on the subway, which required shooting some Vine footage, switching apps, then coming back to Vine to shoot more footage about 20 minutes later. Vine hated that, and my finished product only had the coffee-pouring footage. Boo.

Vine doesn't yet take advantage of all the iPhone's hardware  namely, the front-facing camera and the flash. The front-facing camera would of course allow for plenty of Vine selfies, but also more cinematically interesting work. The flash might let users get creative with the use of light, though admittedly most mobile photos and videos that use a flash are badly washed-out.

It seems you can only share a Vine to Twitter or Facebook at the moment of its completion, and then it's forever locked inside the Vine app. That's silly  Instagram and all the other photo and video apps that I use let you create some media then share it later, which is helpful if you don't have an Internet connection or you're pressed for time.

Tumblr is the land of the GIF, and what is a Vine if not an enhanced GIF? They would do phenomenally well there. I personally use a Tumblr as my primary personal website, and would love to easily show off my Vine creativity there.

We most recently saw evidence of the rivalry between social media platforms when Facebook-owned Instagram disabled support for Twitter cards  but Twitter doesn't have a problem with Tumblr, as pointed out to me by Circa's Daniel Bentley.

I have a feeling Tumblr support will be coming sometime in the future, but I would love for it to be on the list of Vine users' demands.

SEE ALSO: Hands On With Twitter's Social Video App, Vine

Vine has amazing potential, but users ought to be calling for these and other improvements. Have you been using Vine? What other features would you like to see added to the app? Share your ideas in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
When Twitter launched Vine Thursday it omitted one important social network from its sharing options: Tumblr. Looped GIF images are extremely popular on Tumblr, so the audience there for Vine videos is potentially huge.

Just because theres no native way to share Vines on Tumblr, doesnt mean you cant share your creations on the site. Here are few different ways you can include Vine videos in your Tumblr posts:

If you want to share your Vine on Tumblr, one of the easiest ways is to just upload it directly to your Tumblr from your iOS device using Tumblr's app.

Every Vine you create is automatically saved to the camera roll on your device. To upload to Tumblr:

Vine videos shared this way will just play through once rather than loop. To get that looped effect, you can import the video clip into your favorite mobile video editor (Splice is a good example, but there are many others) and copy it several times, laying the copies down on the timeline, one after another. Once youve reached your desired length, export the video and upload it just as you would a traditional video through Tumblr.

If you dont have a video editor on your phone, you can email the clip to yourself from your phones Photo Library and edit it on your computer instead.

Embedding a tweet on Tumblr is the easiest way to share the looped version of your Vine. To embed a tweet:

If you dont want to share all your Vines through your own Twitter stream but want the ability to embed them, consider creating a Twitter account just for your Vines. Once you tweet them, youll be able to copy/paste tweets or links to your Vine from your special account to your main account fairly easily, and you won't pollute your traditional Twitter stream.

iOS devices offer the ability to upload video clips directly from your Photo Library to YouTube.

Vine video files are saved as MOVs so you can upload the file to almost any video service and then embed that player into your Tumblr blog.

The file can also be downloaded onto your computer and uploaded to Tumblr (or other sites) any way youd like.

Have you tried sharing Vine videos on Tumblr, or another site? Let us know your own tips and tricks for sharing the video clips in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Dan Tynan has been writing about technology since Steve Ballmer had hair. He is a contributing editor for Family Circle, where he writes about the intersection of parenting and technology. Follow him on Twitter @tynanwrites or at his blog Hopeless Dork.

To say that I am not a gamer is putting it mildly. My video gaming skills maxed out with Ms. Pacman in 1986, and even then I never got past level 3.

My son Cole, however, is a different story. He is a member of Generation Xbox. Now 16, he has mad skillz when it comes to navigating virtual spaces and making life-or-death decisions with his thumbs.

It all started when he was 10. We'd sent him away for a week that summer to IDTech Camp to whet his interest in computer programming. He returned home with a new favorite hobby: Runescape, a multi-player fantasy game set in medieval times. Every evening he'd log on at a specified time to meet up with friends he'd made at camp and go on adventures.

SEE ALSO: Why I'm Cyberstalking My Son

When his friends weren't around, he'd rope me into playing. "I suck at games," I'd say. He'd respond, "Just follow me, I'll show you what to do." So I'd meander behind him through this Arthurian village where other players were building fires, killing chickens and drinking mead from tankards. Invariably, though, he'd lead me out of the village and into the woods, where I'd be set upon by goblins and killed.

The next day he'd ask me to play again. The same scenario would play out. After a few days of this I grew wary.

You're just going to lead me into the woods again and have me killed."

No, I'm not, he'd swear. And then, of course, he would.

So I stayed away from Runescape and its Oedipal implications. It was soon replaced by a Nintendo GameCube, and then an Xbox 360. A couple years later  my son is 12 and wants me to play an Xbox game with him called Halo. It's very slick and sci-fi, with impressively detailed graphics, but it's still basically Gunfight at the OK Corral. Space-suited soldiers from the Red and Blue teams take turns running around an alien landscape firing high-caliber weapons at each other. (Yes, I know, the story line was a bit more complex than that, but this is as far as I got with it.)

Against my better judgment, I picked up the controller and pondered the ABXY buttons, the dual thumbsticks, the rocker triggers. It was putting a Stradivarius into the hands of the village idiot.

I didn't stand a chance. The next thing I knew the screen had gone red and my life points were at zero. I couldn't even see his avatar, but he'd already dispatched me with a sniper rifle. Sometimes just for fun he'd disappear, then sneak up behind me to break my neck. On extremely rare occasions, and almost always by accident, I'd manage to kill him first. This really ticked him off.

I persevered with the game for a while, but without much improvement. Eventually I decided it was better to sit and watch him play. It wasn't all murder and mayhem. I was quickly impressed by his dexterity and in awe of his ability to navigate a three- dimensional space and make split-second decisions. I could see his problem-solving skills evolve as he worked his way through role-playing games like Oblivion and Skyrim.

There were unexpected cultural benefits as well. After spending hours roaming the gorgeous western landscapes of Red Dead Redemption, Cole immediately dove into the Sergio Leone movies that inspired them. After listening to the 30s-era radio soundtrack of Fallout, he spun up a Pandora station devoted to the Ink Spots.

Do you know many 16 year olds who listen to the Ink Spots?

Not that the Xbox has been an unmitigated good. It is so addictive we have had to remove it a half dozen times when his grades went south. But that too has been a kind of lesson, an effort to teach him the need to balance work and play.

SEE ALSO: 77% of Parents Blame Video Games For Exposing Kids to Violence

Of course there is the whole violence thing. It's different when it's your teenage son pulling the trigger instead of Charles Bronson or Clint Eastwood. I asked Cole recently whether he thought these first-person shooters made young people more violent. He scoffed. Every one of his friends liked these games, he said, and none of them was ever likely to shoot anybody in real life.

He also pointed out that society has always enjoyed violent entertainment, going back to the ancient Greeks. Like that story about the kid who slept with his mother, murdered his father, and then gouged out his own eyes.

If Sophocles were alive today, he'd be working on Grand Theft Auto.

This post is part of a series on the dilemmas of raising digital kids. We'd like to hear some of the parenting issues technology has raised for you. Please let us know in the comments, or on our Mashable Lifestyle Facebook page. You can also follow and tweet us @mashlifestyle.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The burgeoning online education scene is a practical option to a traditional college education for a number of reasons  cost, convenience and efficiency. And for professors it offers a consistent classroom format.

A number of online education sites say the goal is not to be a substitute for the classroom experience, but to offer an even more collaborative learning environment, while also making education convenient and accessible for everyone  whether you're taking a couple college courses or learning for the fun of it. In light of recent news about a partnership between a California state school and an online education site, it's possible that because of the high cost of education, online learning could become the norm for college students.

But can an online classroom teach you the social and collaborative skills that real-life, in-class experiences impart?

Mashable recently covered the big news that San Jose State University in California was implementing three new online courses for freshmen. Granted, it is a limited trial in partnership with online education platform Udacity, but it's the state's first partnership that could lead to an official online program in all California state schools. In a school system where four courses is a full course load (12 credits), freshmen could take three of their four (or more) courses online and, perhaps, lose out on the typical college experience.

Dr. Katherine Cohen, CEO and founder of IvyWise, spoke to Mashable for the article about SJSU's online classes and said MOOC (massive open online courses) give students who may never have been able to consider college access to university classes. But, she allowed, "there's certainly something to be said for the college experience. College is where students build their social and professional networks, ones they will rely upon throughout the rest of their lives. Students living on campus also tend to mature much more quickly, as they take on new responsibilities and maintain a new level of independence."

On the other hand, students without the budget for a typical college education, or students who don't want to go into copious amounts of debt, working students or students with children might benefit from taking college courses online.

Alison Johnston, CEO of InstaEDU, an online tutoring platform, tells Mashable the industry-wide dilemma for those in online education is getting people to complete the course.

She said there have been numerous reports about people not completing MOOCs in particular. Johnson says to overcome this hurdle, companies in this space will have to offer an online experience to make web-based education have all the features of a real-life college education. On a side note: others have countered that MOOC dropout rates are high because the bar is low to enter the programs and many people sign-up, some without a strong intent to even take the course. Also, the college-level coursework weeds out a lot of people.

"In the real world, you have the teacher, the TA and fellow classmates," she says. "I think you're going to see companies come in and fill this space."

Sites like Coursera are the classroom and teacher; InstaEDU and other tutoring sites are the teacher's aide (TA); and sites like Piazza and OpenStudy act as virtual study groups, she explains.

Andrew Ng, the cofounder of Coursera, says they recognize that online education is not a replacement for the real classroom experience, "which is extremely valuable beyond knowledge sharing for reasons of social interaction, one-on-one learning and more."

He sees their service as an alternative to not having higher education at all, which is a reality for many people due to their location, budget or job. And also as an enhancement to on-campus learning that complements traditional classroom formats. Still, the site tries to offer as many personal interactions among its users as possible. Coursera has nearly 2,000 in-person meet-up groups; professors on the site are also known to host these groups from time to time.

"For the most part, online-based education is equivalent [to a traditional college education]. Students can learn in either setting," Cathy Sandeen, vice president for education attainment and innovation at the American Council on Education (ACE), tells Mashable.

Online courses are not going to be exactly like real-life courses, Sandeen says. But most college students are not, in reality, how we picture the typical college student. Only 25% of university students are in their late teens to early twenties and entered college right after high school. The remander participate at other times in their lives, making online courses convenient.

And the online class model mirrors today's work environment, she adds, with groups from around the country or world working together online.

MOOC classes can also provide an in-person experience. Sandeen said she recently took a MOOC course with 30,000 students from all over the world. There were enough students in the course that regional study groups were formed.

"It doesn't have to be an either/or," she adds. "What we're seeing is a lot of traditional institutions incorporating online classes."

It seems online classes, particularly MOOC classes, have a high drop-out rate, but for students who appreciate the convenience and cost, online courses could open doors to a college education.

How would you like to see online education woven into the traditional college education setting? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A Las Vegas woman is suing Match.com for $10 million after she was brutally attacked by a man she met on the dating website.

Mary Kay Beckman claims the site misled her and failed to alert her to the dangers of online matchmaking, leading to an ambush attack in her garage. The assault left her with 10 stab wounds and multiple surgeries, for which she's seeking compensation.

Beckman joined the online service in August 2010 and met her "match," Wade Ridley, a month later. After several online conversations and 10 days of dating, she decided to end the relationship. Beckman claims Ridley sent threatening texts to her days after the break-up and in January 2011, hid in her garage with a knife, then stabbed and kicked her "several times in the head until she 'stopped making the gurgling noise.'" The force he used was so strong that it caused the knife to break, Beckman said in court documents.

Ridley committed suicide in prison in 2012 after being charged with the murder of another woman, the Las Vegas Review-Journal reports.

In her official complaint, Beckman says that Match.com misrepresented the idea that the "site was safe, consistently lead[ing] to loving relationships, and was comprised of individuals seeking healthy relationships."

The website's terms of use explain that eligible members must warrant that he or she has never been convicted of a felony, and users aren't required to register as a sex offender with the government. It also highlights a section called "Your Interactions With Other Members," saying users are solely responsible for their interactions and Match.com does not currently conduct criminal background checks on its members.

It also provides safety tips to follow, including guidelines for meeting offline. In 2011, the website implemented a screening process for sexual offenders after a woman claimed she was raped by someone she met through the site.

Acknowledging Beckman's lawsuit, Match.com issued a statement to a Fox affiliate saying, "What happened to Mary Kay Beckman is horrible but this lawsuit is absurd. The many millions of people who have found love on Match.com and other online dating sites know how fulfilling it is. And while that doesn't make what happened in this case any less awful, this is about a sick, twisted individual with no prior criminal record, not an entire community of men and women looking to meet each other.

Do you think a criminal screening process on dating sites can prevent similar incidents? Should online dating sites do more to protect users? Let us know your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Marissa Mayer wants Yahoo to be a part of your everyday life, and she's pursuing a multi-pronged strategy to achieve it. In a half-hour interview with Bloomberg Television's Erik Schatzker in Davos, Mayer spoke about the need to work Yahoo into people's daily activities  checking the weather and the news, playing games  through mobile, personalization and partnerships.

When Mayer was developing a strategy for Yahoo, she said she created a list of what people do on their phones according to frequency. Beyond voice calls, texting and maps, people are most likely to read their email, pull up the weather, check the news, share photos, get financial quotes, check sports scores and play games  all services, notably, that Yahoo already provides.

"I think that there's a real opportunity to help guide people's daily habits in terms of what content they read," said Mayer. She added, "We have all of the content that people want on their phone, we have these daily habits. And I think that whenever you're dealing with a daily habit and providing a lot of value around it there is an opportunity not only to provide a lot of value to the end user but to also create a great business."

Making Yahoo's services a part of people's daily routines will require more than just getting them onto people's phones: Such services will also need to be personalized and contextualized, Mayer believes. "There's so much content and there's so much social context, and now with mobile, there's so much location context and activity context," she observed. Elsewhere, she added that Yahoo would take that information "to make sense of the content." She continued, "It takes Yahoo back to its roots... It took the Internet and ordered it up. Now it's so vast that you can't just categorize it anymore. But could we provide a feed information that is ordered, a web ordered for you and is also available on your mobile phone."

Because Yahoo doesn't have its own mobile OS or software, nor its own browser nor social network, it will have to continue to build strong partnerships to deploy its services. Yahoo has always been "a very friendly company," Mayer noted. "We work with Apple and Google in terms of the operating system. In terms of social network, we have a strong partnership with Facebook. We're able to work with some of these players that have a lot of strength in order to bolster our user experience that we offer on the Yahoo site," she said.

In addition to her plans, Mayer also took some time to reflect on her first six months on Yahoo, when her focus was primarily on people. "I believe technology companies live and die by talent," she said. "I got very focused on people, building the right team, particularly the executive portion, but all throughout the business, and also the overall environment. I wanted to make sure that Yahoo is the best place to work and that people really want to come and work there."

Yahoo's stock price has increased by approximately 30% since Mayer took the helm in mid-July.
--------------------------------------------------------------
While the nation is under a bracing cold snap, it's the perfect time to relax on your couch and game.

If you aren't sure what to pick up and play, we've got you covered. PlayStation 3 owners, it's a good week for you: there are some great console-exclusive titles and sales that will keep you busy for a while. We've also included some great mobile titles, too.

SEE ALSO: Finally, A First-Person Shooter You Can Play on a Tablet

What are you playing this weekend? Let us know in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The hacktivist group Anonymous hacked the U.S. federal sentencing website early Saturday, using the page to make a brazen and boisterous declaration of "war" on the U.S. government.

The group claims mysterious code-based "warheads," named for each of the Supreme Court Justices, are about to be deployed.

As of midnight Pacific time, the front page of Ussc.gov  the Federal agency that establishes sentencing policies and practices for the Federal courts  is filled with a long screed in green on black, together with this YouTube video:

All areas of ussc.gov other than the front page appear to be functioning normally. In other words, there's no denial of service attack or widespread vandalism. (Update, an hour later: it's getting a little slow and has all the hallmarks of a DDoS.)

At the bottom of the page is a series of nine files, mirrored three times. Each file is named for a current U.S. Supreme Court Justice.

The statement opens with a lament for Aaron Swartz, the Reddit programmer and Internet activist who committed suicide earlier this month. Promising revenge for his treatment at the hands of a federal prosecutor, the screed veers into some of the most inflammatory  dare we say hyperbolic  language we've seen on a simple front page hack.

The group talks of planting "multiple warheads" on "compromised systems" on various unnamed websites, and encourages members to download a given file from ussc.gov that is "primed, armed and quietly distributed to numerous mirrors." It has given the warhead "launch" the name of "Operation Last Resort," the text said:

There has been a lot of fuss recently in the technological media regarding such operations as Red October, the widespread use of vulnerable browsers and the availability of zero-day exploits for these browsers and their plugins. None of this comes of course as any surprise to us, but it is perhaps good that those within the information security industry are making the extent of these threats more widely understood. Still, there is nothing quite as educational as a well-conducted demonstration... Through this websites and various others that will remain unnamed, we have been conducting our own infiltration. We did not restrict ourselves like the FBI to one high-profile compromise. We are far more ambitious, and far more capable. Over the last two weeks we have wound down this operation, removed all traces of leakware from the compromised systems, and taken down the injection apparatus used to detect and exploit vulnerable machines. We have enough fissile material for multiple warheads. Today we are launching the first of these. Operation Last Resort has begun...

Here's the list of files the group is encouraging its followers to download:

What's in the files, and does it have anything to do with the recent "Red October" series of security breaches, thought to be prevalent in China and Russia? Anonymous plays coy:

The contents are various and we won't ruin the speculation by revealing them. Suffice it to say, everyone has secrets, and some things are not meant to be public. At a regular interval commencing today, we will choose one media outlet and supply them with heavily redacted partial contents of the file. Any media outlets wishing to be eligible for this program must include within their reporting a means of secure communications. We have not taken this action lightly, nor without consideration of the possible consequences. Should we be forced to reveal the trigger-key to this warhead, we understand that there will be collateral damage. We appreciate that many who work within the justice system believe in those principles that it has lost, corrupted, or abandoned, that they do not bear the full responsibility for the damages caused by their occupation. It is our hope that this warhead need never be detonated.

What "collateral damage" is the hacktivist group talking about  and is there anything to their threats? We're continuing to update this story, but give us your take in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It can be tough to keep up with all the new apps released every week. But you're in luck  we take care of that for you, creating a roundup each weekend of our favorite new and updated apps.

This week Twitter released a new application for sharing video content on the web, and another company released one for sharing your opinion on literally everything in the world.

A popular iOS game finally made its way to Android, and we saw a few new apps that make reading news on your mobile device a little more interesting.

Take a look at the gallery above for a look at this week's highlights.

Still looking for more? Check out last week's Apps You Don't Want To Miss for more great apps worth a look. Think we left a one off the list? Let us know about your own app highlights from this week in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
NASA's Curiosity Rover arrived on Mars last August to much fanfare, but its trails on the planet so far are pretty meager  not even a mile. Extra-planetary rovers travel slowly. In fact, all of the man-made rovers combined, both Lunar and Martian, have only explored a grand total of 113 miles  less than what you would cover in two hours on a highway without traffic.

A new chart from Space.com's Karl Tate gives the breakdown so far:

You've got to hand it to the Mars Rover Opportunity, which today celebrates its ninth anniversary of life on the Red Planet. If it can last just a little longer, it stands a chance of overtaking the Apollo 17 vehicle, and maybe even Lunokhod 2, which set the record for distance driven on a land other than Earth in 1973.

This article originally published at The Atlantic here
--------------------------------------------------------------
At the end of a bitter cold week, there's nothing better than kicking back at home with a warm blanket and the features you may have missed during the past few days. Read on for coverage of Obama's inauguration and some cool tips to help you land your next job.

We've got everything you need to know about Twitter's new Vine app, as well as highlights from all major tech and social-media news. There's no reason to go outside and brave that cold snap  sit back at home and get yourself caught up.

For more social media news and resources, you can follow Mashable's social media channel on Twitter and become a fan on Facebook.

For more business news and resources, you can follow Mashable's business channel on Twitter and become a fan on Facebook.

For more tech news and resources, you can follow Mashable's tech channel on Twitter and become a fan on Facebook.

Image courtesy of Thru Mikes Viewfinder via Compfight cc
--------------------------------------------------------------
Whether you're after sweet revenge, a fresh online battle or just a little harmless mischief, Facebook is a fertile ground for pranking.

We have gathered 10 devious tricks you can play on your Facebook friends, from freaking them out with photos to fooling them with alternate realities.

SEE ALSO: 10 Skype Chat Tricks for Power Users

Take a look through our suggestions in the gallery above. Please remember, only play such pranks on sturdy souls you're sure can take it  and never use your powers for evil.
--------------------------------------------------------------
"Hi, this is Dog. I'm not home right now, but go ahead and take a pee, and I'll call you back as soon as possible."

SEE ALSO: Watch These Dogs Have a Heated Skype Convo
--------------------------------------------------------------
Infographics break down data visually, helping viewers make sense of complex information. Their popularity has increased with the rise of social media, fuelling the need for instant results by providing content in bite-size, digestible chunks.

So, what's the science behind an infographic's success? Allow an infographic to explain.

Created by Nowsourcing, a social-media marketing company, it shows that infographic posts dwarf traditional posts when it comes to sharing on social networks. The most popular topics for infographics include: business, technology, social media, the economy and health.

For more on the most viewed, liked and commented-on infographics in recent history, among other trends, check out the entire post, below:
--------------------------------------------------------------
Over the last week, several Instagram users began reporting that the photo-sharing app was locking them out of their accounts, and asking them to confirm their identity by showing photo ID.

These incidents, which CNET first covered Tuesday, were reportedly a result of Instagram's new terms of service, which came into effect on Jan. 19.

At first, users were worried that their accounts were hacked. But Talking Points Memo confirmed Friday that the ID requests were actually legitimate, and came from Instagram and Facebook, which now owns the photo-sharing app.

"This is just a general practice for both Facebook and Instagram to request photo IDs for verification purposes depending on what type of violation may have occurred," a Facebook spokesperson told Talking Points Memo. "Unfortunately, I cant share more with you beyond that as we dont go into details beyond that."

SEE ALSO: Instagram Is About to Start Sharing Your Data With Facebook

Identification is requested in cases when the social networks suspect that their terms of services have been violated. It aims to confirm who's behind an account, and perhaps to determine whether a user is underage (the minimum age to use both services is 13).

As Instagram doesn't require users to provide their real names, it's unclear why the photo-sharing app would ask for official ID. Facebook, on the other hand, does ask for users' real names. The social-network giant declined to comment on the matter.

Instagram's terms of service give the company the right to "refuse access to the Service to anyone for any reason at any time."
--------------------------------------------------------------
You can put corrections in brackets and red italics, but they still won't stick in people's minds if they don't want to believe the truth. That's one of the conclusions of a new study about the effectiveness of corrections to information online.

Not everything you read on the Internet, as the saying goes, is true. Yet what kinds of corrections will work best to convince people of the facts? A new study of 574 people examined two different ways of presenting corrections, to see which would work better and with whom.

Reading a correction on a separate website, after a delay, works moderately well with most people, the study found. But there's a split when corrections appear right inside a story, in brackets with red italics. Those whose political beliefs line up with the corrections are more convinced the corrections are true, while those with opposing political beliefs act just like a control group that saw no correction at all.

"We see stronger bias in the response that people have to corrections when we do it in real time," said R. Kelly Garrett, a communications researcher at Ohio State University who led the study. That's too bad, he said, adding: "One might hope that approach would work well because it would allow you to correct information at the source, before it has the chance to spread."

There's one upshot to Garrett's findings. They show that separate fact-checking websites such as Snopes or Factcheck.org work pretty well for people with all kinds of political beliefs, he told TechNewsDaily. "It works for everyone. Everyone becomes a bit more accurate," he said.

Yet in the future, Garrett thinks people may see more real-time, embedded fact-checking. Companies are working now on browser add-ons that automatically find incorrect statements  things like "President Obama wasn't born in the United States" or "Vaccines cause autism"  and offer the expert consensus on the topic. "It's not a huge area, but there are certainly a number of projects focusing on this topic," Garrett said.

Many previous efforts to make such software, such as a 2009 project called Dispute Finder, failed because not enough people downloaded it, Garrett said. Nevertheless, he predicted the current generation of insta-fact-checking browsers will take on. "I still believe in the idea and I think in five year's time we will see something like this out there," he said.

He hopes his research will guide the design of insta-fact-checkers. Perhaps the browser add-ons could collect their findings in a report at the end of the day, instead of embedding comments. They might also tailor their tactics to users' personalities, Garrett said.

In an age of cable networks and endless blogs and social media posts, Garrett thought a browser that shows people what the expert consensus is could be a relief.

"People are having to rely on their own ability to sort through competing claims, more than ever," Garrett said. "One answer [to that problem] has to do with building tools that help us sift through this chaos."

Garrett and his doctoral student, Brian Weeks, will present their work in February, at a conference hosted by the Association for Computing Machinery.

This article originally published at TechNewsDaily here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Forget about Al Pacino in Any Given Sunday, this might very well be the best inspirational pep talk ever. And the one who gives this speech is none other than a young, very classy, kid.

SEE ALSO: Top 24 Most Inspiring Photos of 2012

We don't know his name  he goes by Kid President  and in this video he delivers a touching and inspirational speech that sometimes borders on the poetic.

The video is dedicated to Gabbi, a child who is fighting cancer "like a boss," Kid President says.

Watch the video above to see Kid President's uplifting speech.
--------------------------------------------------------------
If you ever wondered how Radiohead's "Creep" would sound if Lance Armstrong sang it, you're in luck.

After Armstrong's confession to Oprah that he did, indeed, use performance-enhancing drugs, videos making fun of the former cycling champion have begun surfacing on the Internet. In a parody made from snippets of the now-infamous Oprah interview, Armstrong "sings" Radiohead's classic song.

Watch the video, above; then, tell us what you think in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
One Miami Heat fan had two strokes of luck Friday, when he sank a half-court shot for $75,000. But Michael Drysch's good fortune, which took place during a timeout at a home game against the Detroit Pistons, didn't stop there.

After winning the prize with a one-handed hook shot, Heat forward and NBA champ LeBron James excitedly tackled Drysch to the ground. Watch the 50-year-old computer technician make the one-in-a-million shot (and then get a bear hug from a million-dollar player) in the video, above.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Billboard this week gave a facelift to its magazine, launched an iPad app and refreshed its business-focused Billboard.biz. What's more, the music brand unveiled a revamped Billboard.com.

The new Billboard.com, which displays rankings of music's most popular songs and albums, now offers playable music charts and more social-media functionalities.

Visitors can play entire charts via Spotify, Rdio and Myspace players, as well as share individual chart rankings. Billboard has also added a new "fan ratings" feature on the charts and artist pages, which lets people quickly voice their opinion.

SEE ALSO: Digital Sales Push Macklemore & Ryan Lewis to Top of Billboard Charts

A "Top 100 Artists" timeline enables users to pick a year as far back as 1958, and view popular artists from a chosen year. A click on 2003, for example, yields these results:

In terms of visuals, Billboard's new photo gallery now has sharing capabilities for each image, so visitors can push photos to Facebook, Google+, Pinterest and Twitter.

SEE ALSO: Alicia Keys Joins Pinterest With Boards for Individual Songs

The redesign also comes with new genre-specific columns for K-Pop, EDM and Latin.
--------------------------------------------------------------
After an agonizing wait of more than a day to confirm the widespread rumor, Disney and its newest subsidiary Lucasfilm have made it official: J.J. Abrams will direct the still-unnamed Star Wars Episode VII.

The news was announced late Friday night  at exactly midnight EST  on StarWars.com. None other than George Lucas was quoted, effectively handing the baton of directing Star Wars to Abrams personally. Here's how the Star Wars creator put it:

Kathleen Kennedy, the new head of Lucasfilm, offered her own praise for Abrams, the director of two Star Trek movies: "He has an intuitive understanding of this franchise. He understands the essence of the Star Wars experience, and will bring that talent to create an unforgettable motion picture."

"I may be even more grateful to George Lucas now than I was as a kid," Abrams gushed. He was little more than a decade old when Star Wars Episode IV was released in 1977.

To placate those nervous about this new direction, Lucasfilm assured us that Lawrence Kasdan  the heavyweight writer of fan favorite The Empire Strikes Back  would be consulting on the project. It also lined up a number of Star Wars veterans (such as Ben Burtt, the guy who made the lightsaber and Darth Vader sound the way they do) to vouch for Abrams at the end of the blog post.

In short, Kennedy couldn't have been more aggressive out of the gate in signaling that something great is in the works, and that some major talent is going to be giving it their best shot. The title of the post said it all: "Star Wars is Being Kickstarted With Dynamite."

Read the full release here. How are you feeling, Star Wars fans? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Alan Carniol is the founder of InterviewSuccessFormula.com, an online training program that helps job seekers deliver powerful answers that prove why they are the right person for the job. Follow Alan and Interview Success Formula on Facebook, Twitter, and LinkedIn.

This could happen to you: You dont hear back from an employer for weeks. Then, out of the blue, you get the call. Youve gotten the interview. Yet, its not exactly what you expected. You only have one day to prepare. As an added twist, your interview will be online.

If you thought online interviews were just for high-tech jobs, youre mistaken. Just five months ago, 63% of interviewed HR managers said their company conducted interviews using video on a regular basis. And with the job market still seeing 2.1 million turnovers in November, employers arent exactly bending over backwards to cater to the schedules of job seekers.

The question now becomes this: How do you prepare for a virtual job interview when you have limited time  say, only 24 hours? Check out this timetable as a guide.

9 - 11 a.m. Research: No matter what sort of interview you have, its important to research the organization. Check out their recent news, organizational practices and what other people are saying. In addition, do a little Googling of yourself to ensure theres nothing questionable about you online.

11 a.m - 12 p.m. Get your equipment ready: Online interviewing may require certain equipment. Make sure you have a working webcam, mic, or the latest software ready. If you aren't positive about your system requirements, check with the interviewer. Test your equipment with a friend or colleague to ensure everything is up to date and working correctly.

1 - 2 p.m. Dry run: In addition to equipment, its vital to do a virtual interview dry run. Practicing your interview story with the same friend or colleague can help you to be confident when the actual interview takes place. Your physical appearance is also important. For example, certain clothes, colors, or backdrops may translate differently in a virtual interview. Try using different lighting and attire to guarantee you not only sound professional, but also look the part as well.

3 - 4 p.m. Verify: Online interviews may not be as black-and-white as the in-person experience. Verify the date, time, whom youll be speaking with and what you may need to have on hand during the interview. For example, some virtual interviews may require multiple conversations with different interviewers. Some could just be a Skype call that requires no video. Others might make you take a proficiency test on the spot. Confirm all details so you arent surprised during the actual interview.

4 - 5 p.m. Name-check: Since the interview is virtual, chances are good your interviewer is proficient on social networking sites. Send them a tweet, Facebook message, or reach out on LinkedIn saying youre looking forward to speaking with them tomorrow. Keep it formal, but make sure your enthusiasm for the position is translated.

7 - 10 p.m. Last minute checks and balances: By now, you have verification on what equipment you need, whom youll be speaking with, and what youll need to have on hand. Use your last few hours of the day to do some checks and balances, such as testing your audio and camera one more time or recording a mock interview. These last-minute checks and balances may be a repetition of what you did earlier in the day, but double-checking your technology is better than facing a software disaster during the interview.

7 - 9 a.m. Get yourself in the zone: The hours before your virtual interview are not the time to go overboard, memorize your resume, or do another run-through. Its the time to get your mind in the zone. Interviewers can tell when youre overly nervous or trying too hard. Eat some breakfast, grab yourself a cup of coffee and relax. Up until this point, youve done all you can to prepare in the short time you were alloted. Anything else may be seen as overkill and can cloud the progress youve made. Instead, mentally focus on succeeding in the interview. Youll find this will help you to prepare instead of cramming.

Since online interviews are becoming more prevalent, understanding how to prepare for them in a short time period is vital. With these tips in mind, youll be able to to impress the interviewer and land the job.

What are some other ways to prepare for an online interview in 24 hours? Let us know in the comments

The Mashable Job Board connects job-seekers across the U.S. with unique career opportunities in the digital space. While we publish a wide range of job listings, we have selected a few job opportunities from the past two weeks to help get you started. Happy hunting!
--------------------------------------------------------------
In place of Pinterest's activity feed, the company has installed a new tool called "News." The feed displays boards where your recent pins have been repinned, creating a feed of potentially relevant content that users can peruse from their own profiles or those of others.

According to an entry in Pinterest's help center, News is meant to foster content discovery. "To make relevant and interesting content easier to find, we are introducing News," Pinterest writes. "We think this will help pinners like you find more relevant boards and pins more easily."

Pinterest began testing News among a gradual population of users on Jan. 16. It is unclear precisely when News will roll out to the entire network, although the company anticipates "over the next few weeks." Pinterest could not be reached for comment.

Users can access News from two places: See a preview of News in the left-hand column of the Pinterest homepage, or head to any user profile and click "News," an option next to follower count.

Although users can access a "News" tab on Pinterest's mobile app, the feed only displays repins (akin to the old activity feed) and does not steer users to related boards like its web counterpart. Nor does a user's mobile profile contain a News option.

Should a user still wish to track information found in the old activity feed (i.e. likes and new followers), he or she can configure notifications settings to receive the news via email.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It didn't take long for Twitter's new mobile service Vine to get its first collection of porn uploads.

The app  which launched on Thursday and allows users to create and share six-second GIF-like looping videos  already has not-safe-for-work videos of male and female genitalia creeping up on the platform.

We first noticed the occurrence while watching VinePeek, a new website which aggregates Vine videos in real time via a steady stream of user-generated clips. Cozied in between videos of snow, puppies and babies was a graphic clip uploaded just seconds before of a nude body.

Videos saved via the Vine app with hashtags such as #porn, #sex and #penis revealed even more graphic videos, many of which had a warning that the following content contained sensitive content. Twitter and Vine have not yet responded to a request for comment.

SEE ALSO: Vine Is Teaching Everyone This Terrible Habit

Do you think porn should be kept off Vine? Let us know your thoughts below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It's something straight out of an episode of CSI: An orange gun fires a green pellet that carries DNA traces, which, according to the manufacturer, lasts on a target for weeks, making it easier for authorities to identify him or her.

Called the SelectaDNA High Velocity System, the gun uses non-lethal bullets. It is useful in situations where police are having difficulty catching a particular target on the spot.

SEE ALSO: NYPD Radiation Scanners Identify Concealed Guns From Afar

"On contact with the target, the uniquely-coded SelectaDNA solution leaves a synthetic DNA trace mark that will enable the relevant authorities to confirm or eliminate that person from their involvement in a particular situation and could ultimately lead to arrest and prosecution," Andrew Knights, managing director of UK-based gun developer Selectamark, said in a release.

Selectamark offers the gun in both pistol and rifle models, and claims it has a range of 98 to 131 feet. Check out the video, above, for more.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The independent biopic about tech icon Steve Jobs premiered at the Sundance Film Festival this week, and the movie as well as Ashton Kutcher's portrayal of the former Apple CEO generated mixed feelings on Twitter and in online reviews from Sundance attendees.

Titled jOBS, the film debuted not long after Apple co-founder Steve Wozniak criticized a scene, going as far as to describe the personalities and moment as "totally wrong."

The Joshua Michael Stern-directed film  not to be confused with the one Sony Pictures is creating based on Walter Isaacson's biography of Jobs  will arrive in theaters on April 19.

SEE ALSO: See Ashton Kutcher as Steve Jobs in This Video

Here are the good, the bad and the funny reviews from Sundance viewers on Twitter:

Eric Kohn of Indiewire: "The movie is constantly at war with attempts to provide an honest portrayal, almost as if its subject were reaching beyond the grave to steer any negativity back in the direction of a hagiography."

Justin Lowe of The Hollywood Reporter: "While the films emphasis is on Jobs' career, it also touches on less savory aspects of his personal life, including his rejection of pregnant girlfriend Chrisann Brennan and repudiation of his daughter Lisa in his early 20s. And jOBS doesnt gloss over his reputation for unwavering perfection, direct speech and temperamentalism."

Main image courtesy of the Sundance Institute/ Thumbnail images courtesy of Eonline video
--------------------------------------------------------------
It was another exciting week in tech, with a wide range of exciting news. There was really something for all tastes: 3D printing, futuristic planes, medical breakthroughs and a new social video app.

The launch of Vine, a social video app developed by Twitter, took the social-media world by storm. Vine allows users to easily create six-seconds movie loops with a smartphone, and so far, it's been a hit. The other big tech announcement came last weekend, with the official launch of Kim Dotcom's new start-up Mega, the successor of the infamous Megaupload.

There were gadgets, too. First, the surprising debut of a new LG phone, the Optimus G Pro, which has even more impressive specs than the Optimus G. Then there was the somewhat wacky NEC Medias W, a phone with two different screens. Yes, you heard that right  the phone has two screens, one on the front, one on the back.

And in the futuristic news department, we had NASA demonstrating a manufacturing method that could eventually lead to the a manta-ray-shaped plane.  an aircraft that could potentially consume way less fuel than current airplanes.

Take a look at our Top 10 Tech This Week to see what else happened this week in the world of technology.
--------------------------------------------------------------
"No more vertical videos." - Joan Crawford's message for the digital generation.

Twitter's new snap-and-share video service, Vine, has forced users to break the first rule of iFilm making: never shoot vertical videos.

SEE ALSO: Vine Mania! 10 Creative Vines on Twitter

Of course, Vine's videos appear as a square, so you could argue it doesn't really matter. But after years of comment shaming and PSAs to break novice video shooters of this deplorable habit, will Vine reverse all the progress made?

BONUS: How to Use Vine
--------------------------------------------------------------
A newly launched website gives you a chance to glimpse into what's going in the world, six seconds at a time. Vinepeek aggregates Vine videos in real time, showcasing an endless stream of six-second snippets of everyday lives.

Vinepeek takes inspiration from This Is Now, a real-time aggregator of Instagram pictures, and does the same thing with videos created with Twitter's newly released social video app, Vine.

SEE ALSO: Vine Is Teaching Everyone This Terrible Habit

As of now, the website is stripped-down and very simple, with just a few introductory sentences explaining what the site is about and the Vine videos in the middle of the screen  but it's still compelling.

Check out Vinepeek for yourself here.

Graphic courtesy of Vine and Apple, composite by Mashable/Charlie White
--------------------------------------------------------------
We told you about the world's first driving dogs back in December when they were in training, and now a video of one of them driving around a track has reached viral status on YouTube.

Teaching dogs to drive is a project of the Auckland, New Zealand SPCA, where the organization teamed up with carmaker Mini Cooper in a social media awareness campaign.

What they're trying to prove in this publicity stunt is that many abandoned pets are whip-smart, trainable and can even do surprising things.

Heck, they can even be molded into good drivers if you so desire (all well and good, but not in my backyard  keep that part in New Zealand).

As you can see in the video, Porter, the world's first driving dog, is using a paw-activated accelerator and brake to pilot the vehicle. He's doing pretty well at the wheel, albeit at a snail's pace and requiring considerable micromanaging from his trainer. Don't try this at home, folks  it's a "professional driver" on a closed track. Never mind that the pro driver is being paid in dog biscuits.

It's not surprising that dogs can drive, given their enthusiasm for sticking their heads out the windows of moving cars. We're thinking Porter is a much better driver than many we've seen recently. Even so, were hoping these driving dogs don't add to the highway chaos anywhere near here.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A Cadillac is a huge, ostentatious land yacht, usually piloted by grandpas wearing Hawaiian shirts and lots of gold chains, right?

Not any more. It's time to change those stereotypes now that there's the 2013 Cadillac XTS, a performance sedan that's packed with the latest car tech. It's a car Gramps wouldn't even recognize as a Caddy.

Let's take a look at what it's like to drive the XTS. The centerpiece of the company's in-car tech is CUE (an acronym for Cadillac User Experience). It does away with knobs, dials and switches in favor of a tablet-like touchscreen interface, with a few dashboard buttons thrown in for good measure. And yes, it lets you pinch to zoom, just like you'd do with an iPad.

As I took a seat in the XTS, I found out these aren't the cushy luxo-seats of the old Elvis-era Cadillacs. These extensively adjustable thrones are firm and sporty. They can give you a high seating position if you so choose, making the XTS sedan feel almost like an SUV. Once you get them set to your preference, the seats are exquisitely comfortable.

On a cold winter's day, I quickly learned where to find the seat heating control, offering three levels of blessed warmth. Another favorite feature is a heated steering wheel that gets nice and toasty warm in a few seconds. These hot features are not new by any means, but they're so welcome  especially on those frigid days when the steering wheel feels like a frozen pump handle.

Cadillac lent us a Cadillac XTS Platinum Collection car (with a $61,305 sticker price) for a week. I was glad to see it was the all-wheel drive (AWD) version (also known as the XTS 4). That came in handy during this bitter winter, where I drove this sturdy steed through an icy Midwestern snowstorm.

Never have I felt so confident on an icy road  perhaps overconfident  as I did with this XTS 4. Its traction control and ABS performed admirably, keeping the car traveling in a straight line even when I slammed on the brakes or got a little too enthusiastic on the throttle.

My enthusiasm was egged on by the respectable horsepower under the XTS's hood, a 3.6-liter V6 engine that cranks out 304 hp without even breathing hard (for full specs, gearheads, please take a look here).

It's a six-speed automatic, but for extra thrills, I enjoyed placing the Cadillac into its manual mode and using the paddle shifters on the back of the steering wheel to change gears. Even though this is a large car, weighing just over 2 tons (4,215 lb), its handling was nimble and its acceleration was brisk.

But you'll pay in gas for all that oomph. With my spirited driving, on 151.3 miles of combined city and highway driving, I got an average of 17.2 mpg. Ouch.

My only complaint about its drivability is the poor visibility out the back window and sides of the car, due to the slim design of the vehicle's windows. My wife felt it was like driving a tank.

But why even look out the back window when you have a backup camera? The one included in the XTS is excellent, using clever graphics to show you exactly where your car will go, changing their trajectory as you steer. I went to an empty parking lot and tried driving backwards using just the backup camera, and after a little practice, it works beautifully. That doesn't make up for the poor visibility out the back window, but almost.

Along with that coolness, all the accoutrements you would expect from Cadillac are there. There are no keys involved  all you need to do is possess the Cadillac key fob, and you can press a button to start it either as you sit in the car or remotely. When you open the car door, the Cadillac CUE logo floats across both the 12.3-inch instrument cluster screen in front of the steering wheel, as well as the 8-inch screen on the center stack.

After that flashy animation is done, you're left with icons that help you control the audio, weather reports, OnStar, GPS navigation, phone and Pandora. As you touch any of those items on the screen, you feel a slight vibration, giving you haptic feedback about what you just touched. However, that doesn't help the fact that this screen is simply not responsive enough.

Perhaps I've been spoiled by touchscreens on iPhones and Android and Windows phones, but this screen did not react well. Sometimes I would need to touch an item twice or three times. This is not acceptable, particularly in an environment where distraction can mean death.

The system contains several redundant icons that I don't think are necessary. For instance, there's an OnStar icon on the touchscreen, and that capability is also present in a cluster of buttons above the windshield. In addition, there are two icons on the touchscreen for climate control of the left and right seat, which are also unnecessary because of the presence of physical climate controls right there on the center console.

You can move the icons around to your liking, but there will still be the need to swipe from one screen to the next  if there's a function you need on the next screen, it's awkward to swipe to it while driving.

An effort toward alleviating that awkwardness are Favorites, functions such as radio stations or even navigational destinations that you can program into the system. Favorites can be accessed by a cryptic icon of unlabeled chevrons on the bottom right of the interface. Why not just make it a heart, the icon that makes it little more obvious that you'll be presented with your favorites?

If you don't designate your favorite radio stations, you'll be in for a mystery tour. For instance, if you tap on the audio icon, and then tap Radio, it's hard to tell what to do next unless you're happy with the default AM radio station. It places you smack dab in the middle of the AM radio band, and the only way to get out of it is to push that radio button again to get to FM, HD radio or Sirius XM.

Once you learn it, it works, but for first-timers, it's not intuitive at all. I'd suggest creating Favorites for your stations as soon as possible.

The car's speech recognition is slightly better than I've seen in other models from GM and its competitors. Responding in a voice that sounds a bit like Apple's Siri, the system could recognize a lot of what I said to it, including unusual addresses.

Sometimes the voice is a bit slow to respond, making you wait until it's finished talking before it can take action on what you've said. Even so, it shows me that even though speech recognition in cars is not good enough to depend on 100% of the time, it's showing steady improvement. Perhaps the quiet interior environment of the Cadillac made it easier for the system to work, but it still has a way to go before it's accurate enough to use without frustration.

The car's GPS system is excellent, and can be controlled by voice, as can phone calling and radio station selection. I especially like the way GPS directions show up in the car's head-up display (HUD), graphically counting down the distance to the next turn. The display is brilliant, appearing to hover over the hood, and you can configure it to show your current speed along with GPS directions, compass direction, a tachometer or the music you're currently playing.

After a week of testing, I began to get used to the CUE system. But I'm a technology reviewer. It wasn't that hard for me. But I'm thinking about some of the people who might be sitting in front of CUE for the first time. I think they will be bewildered. And sometimes, the difficulty of using this system could be dangerous.

For example, like the Chevy Volt, the Cadillac GPS system hides "cancel route" at the bottom of an obscure menu. This means if you've changed your mind about where you're going, if you're not completely familiar with the system, you won't be able to cancel your route. Then you'll be required to listen to unnecessary GPS commands until the next road stop. It's either that or go fishing through menus (while you're driving ) to try to find out how to silence these unhelpful directions. Not good.

The most compelling technology in the XTS is its ability to interface with smartphones. The system is set up so that it uses the cellular data signal from your smartphone to access data from the Internet. So far, Pandora Radio is the only app included with the car, letting you use your Pandora account in your car just like you would with your smartphone. If you have an Android or BlackBerry phone, you're good to go.

Once I paired up my Droid 4 smartphone to CUE, I launched Pandora on the phone and it showed up on the car's screen. Suddenly, the XTS was rocking Pandora. It was letting me listen to my favorite Pandora stations, give a song a thumbs up or thumbs down, and change stations and get songs, right there in the CUE interface.

However, if you're using an iPhone, that linkup doesn't work quite as well. To get the full benefit of controlling Pandora using the CUE interface, I had to plug my iPhone into the vehicle via its USB port conveniently located in the center console. Once plugged in, I could see an abbreviated Pandora interface, with thumbs-up and thumbs-down icons and the album cover.

Even when it's plugged in, you can't skip to the next track in Pandora using an iPhone. The only way to do that is to tap the thumbs-down icon. It felt like a work in progress.

I talked with Cadillac technicians, and they showed me how to use Pandora wirelessly from an iPhone via Airplay. But that doesn't give you any control of Pandora from the CUE interface. And I was disappointed to see that on neither Android nor iPhone could you skip to the next track using the car's steering-wheel controls.

You can use those controls to change radio stations  why not to skip songs on Pandora? This would eliminate the need to use the CUE's touchscreen while driving, which, as I mentioned, is often a hit-or-miss affair.

At first I was wishing I didn't need to plug my iPhone into the car's USB port to use Pandora. But after using it for a while, I realized that plugging the phone into the car is important when using Pandora. As I've learned from using GPS on my iPhone as I drive in my current car, functions like that are battery hogs. If you go on a long trip, you don't want to run your smartphone battery down as it accesses 3G, 4G or LTE data to feed Pandora Radio.

So yes, you'll want to plug your phone into your car, even if it's just to top off the charge. And here is a delightful feature that makes using a smartphone easier: Cadillac created a perfect little bay tucked into the center console for your smartphone. While your phone is plugged into the well-placed USB port, it's a joy to use it while it's plugged in. Check it out:

You can close the console and there's room for the cable to come out, so you can easily see your phone's screen while it's plugged in. But when you're using your phone for such linkages to a car's audio system, keep in mind, this is going to be guzzling cellular data like this Caddy guzzles gasoline, so you might need to upgrade your plan accordingly.

Beyond the smartphone-friendly gadgetry, there are remarkable features that hint at a future of self-driving cars. The Driver Awareness Package includes Lane Departure Warning, sensing whether you're staying in your lane or not.

If you stray too far outside your lane to the left, you feel a little buzzing on the left side of the seat, or on the right cheek if you're drifting a bit to the right. It's startling the first time that tingle happens, and amusing every time after that.

The lane detection doesn't work as well when the pavement is wet  the XTS wasn't able to tell when I strayed from one lane to another when driving on rain-drenched streets. But on dry days, the system is smart enough to know if you've engaged your turn signal to change lanes, avoiding a false butt-nudge.

I love it when a car suggests to you ways to drive more safely. The XTS lets you know if there's another car lurking in your blind spot, or cross-traffic in the street into which you're about to back up. There are two even more-advanced features in the Driver Assist Package (a $2,395 option) that Cadillac rolled out but didn't include in this review car.

The Adaptive Cruise Control uses radar and cameras to help control acceleration or braking, keeping up with the vehicle in front of you. Also included in that package is Automatic Collision Preparation, which senses when an accident is about to happen, and slowly applies the brakes to lessen the impact.

Cadillacs have traditionally been a showcase for the latest car tech, and this XTS is no exception. There are some features in this car I think should be installed in every car on the road, because they can make driving safer and save lives. For instance, all cars should have that Lane Departure Warning that could wake up a driver who had fallen asleep at the wheel.

The heads-up display is eminently useful  it's a lot safer than lowering your eyes to look at a speedometer, navigation prompt or radio station.

Features that I found useful and wished I had in my car are keyless ignition, as well as the heated seat and steering wheel, favorites of those of us who live on the frozen tundra. And using iPhone apps is definitely welcome, especially if there were more from which to choose. But all of this gee-whiz tech is expensive, so it might be a few years before we see all these niceties as standard equipment in cars driven by the rest of us.

After testing the 2013 Cadillac XTS for a week, I can say that its brawny power, lovely and leathery interior and high-tech features have seduced me. Its sure grip with its all-wheel drive on icy roads, as well as its driver awareness technology certainly makes driving safer. Its awkward CUE interface could use some work, but the tech-minded can learn how to use it efficiently with a bit of study.

The best news is, the most advanced features in this Cadillac will be trickling down to ordinary cars soon. That will be good for everyone.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Apple has applied for a patent of "smart shoes" that would come with embedded sensors to track your activity and tell you when you need a new pair.

Instead of wearing an additional sensor, people would just have to wear the shoes, where the technology would be less visible and be a more seamless part of your lifestyle, rather than an external tracker.

The patent application notes the importance of a good pair of shoes:

Shoes (including sneakers or boots, for example) provide comfort and protection for feet. More importantly, shoes provide physical support for feet to reduce risk of foot injuries. A shoe is often necessary to provide support during intense physical activity, such as running, soccer and American football. As a shoe wears, physical support provided by the shoe decreases, thereby reducing associated protection from injury. When a critical wear level is reached, even if the shoe looks like it is not particularly worn, the shoe may not provide adequate support and may, in fact, cause damage to feet.

Apples shoe wear-out sensor would either be a thin built-in layer or be located in the heel. It would include a processor configured to measure the use of the shoes and determine whether they were worn out and an alarm that informed the wearer when they were no longer providing adequate protection for their feet.

Engadget reports that the sensor could also connect to an external display. This could be used for alerting you about worn out shoes via your iOS device.

This article originally published at PSFK here
--------------------------------------------------------------
What is Apple stock really worth? Our friends Nitrozac and Snaggy at The Joy of Tech consulted the pros, and discovered many of their best-kept secrets:

Comic illustration provided by The Joy of Tech. Published with permission; all rights reserved.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Now that the Internet's collective tears have dried following the Beyonce Lip-Syncing Debacle of 2013, let's make way for the parodies.

Watch Queen B soothe you with her dulcet tones, and inspire you with the lyrics, "My dog, you can't see him. Put your mouth next to me. All night, I scratched your pig."

SEE ALSO: 8 Lip-Syncing Moments Worse Than Beyonce's

Created by the folks at Bad Lip Reading, the YouTube video parodies Beyonce's lip-syncing of "The Star Spangled Banner" at U.S. President Barack Obama's inauguration last week.

Check it out, above; then, tell us in the comments: Do you prefer the original or the parody?
--------------------------------------------------------------
The San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge is gearing up to become the world's largest light sculpture when a new art exhibit comes to the landmark in the near future.

Designed by artist Leo Villareal, more than 25,000 white LED lights will be displayed across the bridge starting on March 5, and will be lit from dusk until midnight for two years. The individually programmed lights will create stunning designs and patterns across its 1.8 mile span as part of a massive light show. The move is in part to celebrate the bridge's 75th anniversary.

SEE ALSO: Viral Video Wrap Up: The Best of the Week

Installing the LED light system has been no easy task. Electricians started working in October to carefully attach strings of lights to the cables on the bridge. The energy-efficient lights will be inexpensive to power, according to TheBayLights.org  in fact, it will cost only about $30 a day to run them.

Although the installation will cost about $8 million, it's supposed to boost the local economy by about $97 million in those two years.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Anheuser-Busch seems as much a fixture to the Super Bowl as the pigskin itself, yet that generally positive association doesn't necessarily buy love on social media.

That's why A-B's Bud Light brand is starting the party early this year. As in 2012, the brand is hosting a Bud Light Hotel near the big game and hoping that recruiting some social media-friendly fans and hosting some high-profile concerts will prompt buzz well before kickoff.

Bud Light has transformed a 200-room hotel in New Orleans into Bud Light Hotel and will host EA Sports' Madden Bowl shortly after the hotel opens its doors on Jan. 31. In addition, the brand is running a contest on Facebook to find a Bud Light Hotel Facebook Correspondent. Finally, the brand will host concerts featuring Flo Rida, Pitbull and Stevie Wonder that will be broadcast on MySpace. Select performances from the shows will be broadcast on Bud Light's MySpace Page.

Except for the latter part, the brand is hewing closely to the game plan it used last year. That's because Bud Light was happy with the results it got in social media last year. Though he declined to delve into specifics, Lucas Herscovici, VP of Digital at Anheuser-Busch, says the results measured in earned media views, fans and the levels of engagement were sufficient.

So, expect more of what Bud Light did last year. That means there will be a Twitter hashtag (last year's was #makeitplatinum for Bud Light Platinum, a brand extension; this year it's #tasteis for another extension, Budweiser Black Crown) and the brand also dropped the following teaser video on Jan. 24, which sports the Bud Light hashtag #herewego:

However, there are some major differences from last year as well. The brand, for instance, will run two ads during the game, not one. (Last year's ad, you may recall, featured a dog named "Weego," who fetched Bud Lights when you said "Here Weego.") The brand can also run its official account on Twitter. Last year, Bud Light was barred from doing so because Twitter hadn't yet installed an age gate for fans under 21. Twitter introduced an age gate  something Facebook didn't need since members give their ages  later in 2012.

The MySpace relationship is also new. Herscovici stresses that this is the new Justin Timberlake MySpace. "MySpace is revamping," he says. "They have big plans for the future and we've been close to them. We feel they're a good partner for music."

The current estimate is that a 30-second ad in the 2013 Super Bowl costs $3.7 million to $3.8 million. That's not a lot of money for Bud Light, but these days you have to turn up the volume on social media just to avoid being overshadowed by all the other advertisers. For instance, Doritos has been making headlines since last September thanks to its crowdsourcing Crash the Super Bowl contest, which is now its its seventh year. Volkswagen is also a source of interest since its 2011 Super Bowl spot, "The Force," has become the most-shared ad of all time. Though VW's 2012 ad didn't do nearly as well, fans are still curious about what the brand is up to.

In addition to vying with other brands, though, Bud Light also has to compete with its history. Bud Light is still the biggest beer brand in the U.S. by far. According to Beer Marketer's Insights, the brand had 19% of the market in 2011, which was flat with the year before and down 0.2% from 2009. The next-closest rival, Coors Light, saw its market share rise from 8.3% to 8.7% over the same time period. Meanwhile, the beer business overall has been relatively stagnant over the past decade. The 2008 recession really hurt the industry as the prime customer  blue-collar men in their 20s  were hit disproportionately by the downturn. The industry began rebounding last year, but Bud Light still faces competition from trendy microbrews.

Meanwhile, there's a perception among ad critics at least that A-B's brands haven't yet matched the creative and popular apex of the '90s, when they routinely won the night with ads like "Lizards," and "Frogs." (Budweiser ended the decade by winning the Cannes Lions Grand Prix in 2000 for its "Wassup" campaign, which wasn't a Super Bowl ad, but instead premiered on Monday Night Football.)

"It seems like everything they initiated became part of the DNA of the event," says Barbara Lippert, a columnist for MediaPost. "All those same ads are being created by fans for Doritos." In Lippert's view, the endless stream of sassy animal ads from Doritos' long-running Crash the Super Bowl contest has stolen A-B's thunder. "All through the '90s they were a force," she says. "Now it seems like they're catching up."

Another obstacle is social media. Given the restrictions on marketing to people under 21, Bud Light has to careful not be seen courting youngsters. While age-gating is one solution, think of how a very successful viral video might prompt charges that Bud Light is trying to preach its message to underage consumers. Hence the more middle-of-the-road path that Bud Light has to follow in social media. Association with older acts like Stevie Wonder helps, and using a hotel as the centerpiece of a marketing plan also communicates that this is a product for adults. (After all, kids don't generally visit hotels by themselves.)

Lippert says that the hotel is a great solution for the brand that lets it get the message out via social media without raising any eyebrows. Says Lippert: "They're in a tight spot, but this seems to be really successful for them."
--------------------------------------------------------------
As more companies and more industries buy into the benefits of social media and community development, the number of job opportunities available for professionals with community-building skills also continue to grow.

Companies are looking for professionals who can blend their skills to effectively deliver updates to a community, but also have the ability to tap into that community to collect feedback for a company to use for improving its product or delivering its message.

While the job opportunities grow, so to do the number of professionals who include community skills on their resumes and profiles. On LinkedIn alone, the number of people who have added "Community Management" to their skills list is up 46% year-over-year.

But being a quality community manager goes beyond having the knowledge and background to use social media networks. Here are 10 qualities a community manager should possess to improve the chances of success in the position, according to professionals who work within social media and community today.

It's no surprise that the person who is acting as a representative of the brand should have strong people skills. Google DC Community Manager Corrie Davidson said that the community manager, in many ways, is the face of a brand, and this person must be able to effectively communicate the message to the audience. "Whether it be short form or long form, you have to be able to write," she noted. "Blog posts, guest articles, emails, proposals, social content  you have to be able to craft your ideas and messages to fit any medium."

But the community manager position goes beyond the online relationship, Davidson said. "They need to be outgoing, friendly and relatable. They should be comfortable interacting with people offline as well as online; a natural networker."

In many industries, one role of a community manager is of a curator. This person must be able to parse through all the content coming out of an organization and determine what to share, how to share and when to share.

For news organizations, deciding how to engage with an audience is especially important in times of difficult news, noted NBC News Senior Community Manager Anthony Quintano. "On days where we have really upsetting news to report on, we're very careful about the kind of stories we share, and what information we put out there."

Community managers must also determine the best ways to handle feedback from the audience, and decide how to respond in an appropriate fashion, said Dave Kerpen, chairman of Likeable Media, a social media agency that employs community managers. "When people ask questions, how do you answer? I believe not answering those questions is answering those questions."

To engage a community in a discussion about a brand, a community manager must know the type of people who make up the audience, said Tim McDonald, the community manager for HuffPost Live. "You're dealing with a bunch of different personalities. If you're not empathetic, you're never going to be able to to put yourself in those people's shoes, which means you won't be able to communicate a message to them."

Being able to demonstrate empathy is important, noted Kerpen, because a community manager must be able to effectively converse with the audience. This person should see the brand from the perspective of a fan or consumer, and use this point of view to guide his or her engagements with the community, he added.

Unlike with other positions, there is no end of the work day for community managers. When news breaks, whether the organization you represent is on the giving or receiving end, a community manager has to be available to the audience. "When you're a community manager, you're on 24/7," said Adobe Community Manager Rachael King. "Good or bad, something huge can happen at any time, and when it does, social is the first place it hits. You are technically the face of the brand, so you have to deal with it."

Community managers have to look at their positions as a lifestyle rather than a job, Google's Davidson added. "If you want to check in at 9 a.m. and out at 5 p.m., you're in the wrong field. When you've dealt with nothing but mean-spirited comments, hundreds of emails, demanding partners and a grueling schedule of tasks  all in a 14-hour work day  you need something other than a paycheck to keep you going."

For many community managers, the job consists of managing multiple platforms, tracking feedback and then sharing this information with their employers. This work can be overbearing, but remaining organized can help professionals stay on top of their responsibilities. "I believe that community managers have to be able to multitask, and that means staying organized," Likeable Media's Kerpen noted. "It's a very fast-paced job and there are a lot of things thrown at you at once  and you need to stay on top of it."

Davidson said that she uses multiple spreadsheets that she updates daily with data across a range of metrics for a variety of people and terms. "One wrong entry can throw off goals and spreadsheets across our whole team, affecting other teams and projects. Whether I am planning an event, managing vendors, reviewing a contract or creating content, success or failure is in the details."

Flexibility in the workplace is key for a successful community manager. The work this professional does will often extend beyond creating conversations with a brand's audience on social media networks. For many, this means carrying the responsibilities of multiple jobs.

"Adaptability is important because the community manager wears a lot of hats," Kerpen said. "On any given day, they have to be a marketer, a PR person and then a communications guy who has to react to a story."

It's the Internet. There are going to be situations, often on a daily basis, when a member of the community attacks the brand. As the community manager, it is vital that your response alleviates the situation; not intensifies it.

"The problem is you've got the keys to the brand's voice," Adobe's King said. " Anything you say on behalf of the brand can and will be held against you, and can be inferred as the brand's perspective. You have to have a cool head and remember that the audience is attacking the brand, usually, not you."



In each industry, the way a community manager handles social and site analytics may differ, but it's vital that this professional is educated about how communities are responding to engagement, and can determine what efforts are working and not working. "I hate when people say they can't measure the metrics of engagement," Google's Davidson said. "If you can't measure it, you aren't doing it right. Build tracking links, look at your website traffic, measure your reach and impressions. Have a goal and reach it."

HuffPost Live's McDonald said that he uses analytics to figure out what the community is not telling him anecdotally. "The community isn't always going to tell you what they want. They'll tell you one thing but then want another. You need to look at things to see if they're working because people aren't always going to tell you."

One of the most important responsibilities of a community manager's job is not to continue to push the brand's message, but to empower the audience and give it a voice, said NBC News' Quintano. "If we're just talking about ourselves, eventually people will turn away," he noted. "The only reason we are successful is because of our audience. We want to try to reward them as much as possible."

At HuffPost Live, McDonald said the organization realized that roughly 70% of all comments on site were in response to other comments. "We wanted to turn those comments into the conversation [on HuffPost Live]," McDonald added. "We wanted to give the audience a voice on equal footing with our on-air guests."

In many ways, the community manager is the eyes and ears of a business or organization. But this professional also is responsible for being the voice of the company, and the audience wants to interact with someone who loves the brand as much as they do. For a community manager who just goes through the motions, he or she is not going to be successful and the company will ultimately suffer, Kerpen noted.

"Passion is really important," he said. "At the end of the day, you are the representative of that brand. You have to eat, sleep and breathe the brand."

Did we miss any other important qualities? Share your thoughts in the comments below.

Images courtesy of flickr, Scott Monty, Get Satisfaction and flickr, bluefountainmedia.
--------------------------------------------------------------
We all know we should eat more fruit, but sometimes it can be a struggle to consume the recommended five servings of fruit (or vegetables) per day.

To try and encourage us all to get more fructose in our faces, we have taken a look at cool kitchen gadgetry that makes eating fruit easier, quicker and more fun.

SEE ALSO: 9 Cooking Gadgets for Your Geeky Kitchen

Take a look through our healthy options in the image gallery above. Share in the comments below any great gizmos you use to help you get your five-a-day.
--------------------------------------------------------------
We've all had work days in which we wished we'd be asked to leave and never come back. Then comes the hard-hitting reality that unemployment is about as bad as it gets in the professional world.

Phoenix resident Amy McClenathan, who is still heartbroken over the loss of her mother, learned this lesson after updating her Facebook status with the confession, "I wish I could get fired some days, it would be easier to be at home than to have to go through this."

Whether you're Facebook friends with anyone from work or not, a comment of this nature never brings anything good, and McClenathan wound up losing her job.

"It was a very small sentence, but it was one of the most powerful sentences I've ever typed in my life," she said. She added that she'd posted the remark around the one-year anniversary of her mom's passing. You'd think she'd get a pass, but the woman was asked to leave the day following her Facebook status update.

On top of it all, her firing may not have even been warranted. Phoenix attorney Dan Barr told AZ Family that the woman's post could very well be protected by the law:

"If the employer reprimands you for discussing your job on Facebook, that can run afoul of the National Labor Relations Act"If you were to post on Facebook, I work for a bunch of crooks or company X is the worst place in the world to work, that would not be protected. If you post on Facebook I was cheated out of a bonus or that I'm working too many hours and other employees respond and you get a conversation started about that, that counts."

Even so, McClenathan takes responsibility for what she wrote, and if you want to keep your job (as awful as it may seem some days), you should probably do the same.

This article originally published at The Jane Dough here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Yesterday a friend told me about the very convincing bit of spam he received from someone posing as Facebook's legal department telling him he is part of a class action lawsuit. Turns out, it's not spam.

Facebook just settled a class action lawsuit for $20 million and is looking to pay out. There won't be much left if the 150 million U.S. Facebook users claim their cut, but it's better than nothing. Although if too many people file claims, then nobody gets anything.

The suit was settled last month over Facebook using people's pictures in sponsored ads without their permission. To avoid having to take the case to court, Facebook offered $20 million and the court approved the settlement. Users have been getting an email from "legalnotice@facebookmail.com" informing them of the lawsuit, but many people could be dismissing it as spam like my friend did.

There's potential bad news for anyone looking to cash in on the suit, though. Part of the email says, "If the number of claims made renders it economically infeasible to pay money to persons who make a timely and valid claim, payment will be made to the not-for-profit organizations on the Settlement website at www.fraleyfacebooksettlement.com"

Basically, if too many people make claims then nobody gets paid, and the money goes to not-for-profit groups that the settlement site says are "involved in educational outreach that teaches adults and children how to use social media technologies safely, or are involved in research of social media, with a focus on critical thinking around advertising and commercialization, and particularly with protecting the interests of children."

If you'd like to file a claim, and don't think doing so will just bring things one step closer to ruining it for everybody, you can do on the official settlement site. This is like a weird social experiment. How many people will still file a claim knowing that by doing so, they're increasing the likelihood of negating payment for everyone, including themselves? Probably all of them.

It's likely going to be a good day for the not-for-profit groups.

This article originally published at Geekosystem here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Ahead of the 55th Grammy Awards, the Recording Academy is giving undiscovered musicians a way to potentially put their music in front of more people online.

Grammy Amplifier, part of the academy's #TheWorldIsListening social media blitz, lets artists upload songs via Soundcloud for the opportunity to have their music amplified by select celebrities on Twitter such as Kelly Clarkson, Linkin Park, RZA and Ozzy Osbourne.

SEE ALSO: Linkin Park Music Video Puts Your Facebook Photos in Emotional Tale

The website allows music lovers to listen to the music and share songs with their friends and followers on Facebook and Twitter. The more plays and shares a song gets, the better chance it has at having the celebrity artists see them.

The Grammys will air on Feb. 10 with LL Cool J as the host.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Erin Bazinet is a team manager at Seven Step.

Word-of-mouth. When it comes to recruiting, these three words say it all. There is simply no better source of talent than your own network. But imagine you could move beyond your closest friends and colleagues to harness your entire Facebook network for recommendations for whom to hire for an open position with your company. Well, you soon can.

Following on the heels of its much-anticipated job board, Facebooks Graph Search allows users to get recommendations from the people they trust on things like which restaurant to visit next, who to hire and where to find their next career opportunity. Consumers can use Graph Search to discover new people, places and products that align with their interests, while businesses can use it to connect with their likely potential customers.

So how, exactly, can recruiters and job seekers use Graph Search? Below are the top three ways we predict Facebooks newest tool will transform talent acquisition for the better  along with our recommendations for how companies and candidates can start preparing to take advantage of these changes while Graph Search is still in beta.

Facebooks Graph Search will allow users to search by people and by interest, meaning who you friend and what you like will ultimately define you  and your network. For companies, this means the like button will become a top tool for reaching talent. Ask everyone in your network to like your company page, beginning with your own employees, clients and industry partners for increased visibility. For candidates, this means youll need to connect with the people, companies and industry groups you aspire to work with  not just your college friends and long-lost relatives. Audit your network to make sure your industry colleagues and influencers are represented among your friends.

Another major asset of Graph Search for talent acquisition is its ability to find candidates and organizations whose personalities align. Rather than sort candidates by skills and connections alone  which LinkedIn does well  Facebooks Graph Search can comb users broader interests, photos, people and places to find a candidate or company that offers the right cultural fit.

The key to leveraging this asset, whether you are a company or a candidate, is to be authentic! If you are a company, build out your page to include as many indicators of your companys values as possible. Ask yourself what news you can share, what causes you support, and what content you can leverage to showcase your company culture and the types of people who succeed there.

If you are a candidate, fill out your profile as completely as possible, including career interests to supplement your personal interests. Is your favorite book a management classic? Are you part of an industry group with a presence on Facebook? Dont hold back! Also, be sure to check that your location is current. The more you have to search, the more likely you are to be found.

One of the greatest assets of Graph Search, in our opinion, is its ability to connect companies with hard-to-find candidates. Graph Search uses long-tail searches, which basically means that the more detail your search includes, the better your results will be. Searches can be tailored to include very narrow criteria  in countless combinations  meaning that hard-to-find candidates with highly specific skills, experiences and affiliations should be well-served by this platform.

Companies often tasked with finding needle in the haystack candidates for positions will be excited at the prospect of leveraging Facebooks extensive global network to source one-of-a-kind candidates. Those candidates should be excited, too. If Graph Search proves to be a magic bullet tool for sourcing, it could quickly become the go-to platform for finding candidates with highly specific skills and affiliations  once the domain of elite alumni networks.

So what should companies and candidates do now to take full advantage of Graph Searchs sourcing capabilities later? That remains to be seen, but one tactic that could help increase Facebook search-ability is strategic keyword tagging throughout your profile and photos.

In short, we expect Graph Search to benefit talent acquisition in several ways, but its success will ultimately hinge on whether it provides accurate and insightful recommendations that keep users coming back. If so, companies and candidates can expect shared success in the near term.

The Mashable Job Board connects job-seekers across the U.S. with unique career opportunities in the digital space. While we publish a wide range of job listings, we have selected a few job opportunities from the past two weeks to help get you started. Happy hunting!
--------------------------------------------------------------
Sometimes Internet security can be a difficult concept to grasp, but it's nothing some old-fashioned office supplies can't handle, right?

SEE ALSO: More Sunday comics

This hilarious (and, sadly, realistic) comic is brought to you by Drew at Toothpaste For Dinner. Come back each week for more Toothpaste For Dinner comics on Mashable, and be sure to check out our Sunday Comics section.

Comic illustration by Toothpaste For Dinner. Republished with permission; all rights reserved.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Learning a new language comes with its difficulties, but three designers are looking to put translations right at your fingertips.

The Ivy Guide, a device that fits over pens and pencils, scans words and projects its translation directly onto the document. Check out the video, above, for more.

The scanner tip adjusts to any writing tool with a flexible sponge, and while pressing the translating button, readers can underline text. The word is then projected in the chosen language, and cleared by pressing again. The scanner connects to a USB for easy charging.

SEE ALSO: 15 Mobile Translation Apps for the International Businessperson

Designers Shi Jian, Sun Jiahao and Li Ke say the Ivy Guide will keep users in the habit of making marks and also create a continuous reading experience.

Though the device is currently in its concept stage, its creators hope to do away with the experience of heavy dictionaries or bulkier electronics.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It seems like you can't be too rich, too thin, or have too much battery power. That's where AmpTec's JuiceCAN can help, bringing you enough power to charge an iPhone 5 three times over. One of these cans can even charge up a power-hungry iPad a couple of times.

It works with anything that gathers power via a USB port, and this colorful device is scalable. That means you can stack these JuiceCANs into what the company calls a JuiceCane, giving you additional power when you need it.

Its stackable nature lets you add utility caps, which have myriad uses including USB ports, an LED flashlight and even, ahem, a vibrator.

This Indiegogo project is currently seeking funding, and it will cost you $33 to pick up one of these JuiceCANs. So far, the company is slightly more than $6,000 on the way to its $25,000 goal, with 33 days left.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Chris Crowell is a veteran kindergarten teacher and contributing editor to Children's Technology Review, a web-based archive of articles and reviews on apps, technology toys and video games. Download a free issue of CTR here.

Is it too far out of season for a vampire-themed app? Let's hope not. Click through the gallery to see which apps  some spooky, some not  to download for your kids this week.

SEE ALSO: Xbox Marks the Spot, or 'Why Is My Son Always Trying to Kill Me?'

Children's Technology Review shared these 5 top apps with us from their comprehensive monthly database of kid-tested reviews. The site covers everything from math and counting to reading and phonics.

Check back next week for more Top Kids Apps from Children's Technology Review.
--------------------------------------------------------------
As technology progresses, sometimes science fiction becomes reality. Soon, lasers could leave the realm of imagination and a galaxy far, far away. Thanks to the Defense Advanced Research Projects Agency (DARPA), the futuristic arm of the U.S. military, this year liquid-cooled, solid-state laser weapons will be installed on fighter planes.

DARPA and General Atomics announced they finished working on the laser turrets in 2012, and will now start integrating them on bomber and combat planes, with a goal of starting to test the technology in 2014.

The program is called HELLADS (High Eenergy Liquid Laser Area Defense System) and DARPA has been working on it since 2008. The laser turrets will be light enough to be mounted on planes, and will be able to shoot down surface-to-air missiles or rockets with high-energy laser beams.

DARPA is involved in other laser projects, including one with defense giant Lockheed Martin. So someday soon we will probably see technology that resembles science fiction like Star Wars or Star Trek.

To learn more about this Star Wars-like program, check out the video above.
--------------------------------------------------------------
In an effort to better compete with Spotify and other music services, Nokia announced on Sunday it is expanding its free music streaming service with an enhanced paid version of its existing Nokia Music platform.

Nokia Music  the ad-free service launched in September, exclusively to Lumia smartphone users  will now offer a monthly subscription option called Nokia Music+ for about $3.99, depending on location. Spotify's subscriptions range from $4.99 to $9.99.

Although the service already allows you to download up to four one-hour mixes of music, which are playable offline, Nokia Music+ will remove the limit. It also allows you to access the service via a web app, so you can play it on your computer or smart TV, and features unlimited skips. The app is also available for download from the Windows Phone Marketplace.

SEE ALSO: 5 Fascinating Facts We Learned From Reddit This Week

"It's the only smartphone music service out there offering access to millions of songs out of the box without the need to sign up, sign in, or suffer adverts in between enjoying the music," said Jyrki Rosenberg, VP Entertainment at Nokia, in a statement on the company's blog. People love Nokia Mix Radio  in fact, many people are amazed that we can offer it for free. When you add in the ability to skip songs and save playlists for offline uses like the tube, you have something unique."

The company said Nokia Music+ will roll out in the next few weeks, but it's unknown at this point when it will come to the U.S.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A new survey by the Pew Research Centers Internet & American Life Project shows 69% of U.S. adults track some sort of health indicator for themselves or a loved one, such as exercise routine, weight, diet, blood pressure, blood sugar, headaches or sleep patterns.

With the proliferation of fitness tracking devices, you might be surprised to know that at least in this survey, only 21% of the respondents said they used a gadget, app or website to track this information. Nearly half of those surveyed (49%) said they keep this information in their heads. Thirty-four percent say they track the data on paper, like in a notebook or journal.

Respondents were allowed to submit multiple answers to that question, but overall, 50% of people who track their health keep notes in some organized way, either on paper or with a gadget.

Susannah Fox, associate director of digital strategy at Pew Research, tells Mashable this is the first national study measuring health tracking.

"We found good old pencil and paper was pretty dominant," she said, adding that "technology did not play a big role."

"That presents a challenge to tech developers who might want to convert these people who are not using technology," she says. The hurdle will be to create something as easy as keeping track of health and fitness in one's head, or on pen and paper, while making it irresistible, Fox says.

The Pew survey also shed light on how people with chronic conditions use trackers. It found that people living with one or more chronic conditions are significantly more likely to track health indicators. This likelihood increases among those living with more than one condition. This group is also more likely than others to monitor their health with pencil and paper. It's interesting to note that people in this group have chronic conditions like diabetes, that require tracking.

So what can developers take from this information?

"Let's really look at the people who are facing some serious chronic conditions," Fox says. "And (ask), what are the opportunities for bringing new technologies to market that specifically help that population?"

Ernesto Ramirez, community organizer for Quantified Self, a community of people using self tracking devices to better understand who they are, tells Mashable that 21% is still a good number of people possibly using a digital tracking tool, considering that digital fitness trackers are fairly new.

He also predicts a proliferation of devices to track wellness in the future.

Ramirez says what he found the most interesting about the Pew study is that tracking their habits actually made people take smarter steps toward better health. In fact, 46% of people who tracked their health say that this activity has changed their overall approach to maintaining their health or the health of someone for whom they provide care.

"These trackers make it easier to undertand ourselves, our world and the interaction between the two," Ramirez says. "Ten to 15 years ago, you were stuck with paper and pencil. Now, you can wear a device that syncs to (an) application."

He said he hopes this study sparks further research into how people are engaging with these devices and what they're actually doing with them.

How do you track your health  a device, pen and paper, or in your head? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Did you know that John Wilkes Booth attended Abe Lincoln's second inaugural address? Or that you can work out with Richard Simmons for the low, low price of $12? You do now, thanks to this week's edition of Reddit Facts.
--------------------------------------------------------------
This post originally appeared on the American Express OPEN Forum, where Mashable regularly contributes articles about leveraging social media and technology in small business.

Search advertising was based on the premise that if you put the right information in front of consumers while they're looking for a product or service, then they're likely to click on it.

However, mobile has ushered in another option. Now, instead of clicking you can call or click to call. The difference isn't that stark. As Jay Lefiger, owner of the Chelsea Pines Hotel in New York and a Google AdWords Express user notes, "a lot of people just go on our website and call us anyway." Providing a direct phone connection in a search ad saves a step for the customer, but also adds some complexity for the advertiser. After all, how are you supposed to keep track of how many of these incoming calls lead to sales?

Google has been providing the ability to click on an ad to call a merchant since early 2010. The company claims that having a clickable phone number in an ad leads to a 6% to 8% average increase in click-through rates. While traditional AdWords ads only charge you if someone clicks, Click-to-Call ads run up a bill only if someone actually calls. (A Google rep says the pricing for AdWords is the same regardless of whether it contains CTC. However, on desktop, there's a separate bidding system that starts at $1; a call has to be longer than 30 seconds to warrant payment.)

Thankfully for merchants, Google's not the only game in town for CTC. Skype, now a unit of Microsoft, began offering CTC ads in July 2010. Skype added the functionality to display ads in December 2011. "Our goal is to make it as ubiquitous and friction-free as possible," says Sandhya Venkatachalam, GM of Skype's advertising and monetization. While some big advertisers, including Intuit's TurboTax (see below) have signed on of Skype CTC, Venkatachalam acknowledges that "were early in this business. We're talking to a wide range of SMBs." (Yahoo, the other possible entrant in CTC, doesn't offer the feature at present.)

Comparatively, Google has the advantage of a pre-existing AdWords client base to leverage for CTC. One such client is Lefiger, who spends $300 a month on AdWords ads with CTC. Lefiger is happy with the results, though he hasn't yet closely parsed the data. "Every call that comes in, we always ask 'How did you hear about us?'" Lefiger says, explaining his preferred mode of ROI. "We don't do much in the way of print anymore because it just doesn't work."

Similarly, Google doesn't offer detailed stats about CTC's efficacy beyond its 6%-8% figure. But to address ROI concerns, the company introduced a product in November 2010 called Call Metrics. As the video below outlines, Call Metrics that assigns a new phone number to an ad and then tells you how many calls are coming to that number and how long they last. That way, if one ad appears to be more effective than another, you can put all your spending behind that more effective ad.

Richard Holden, director of product management for Google, says that businesses should experiment to see what works. Some businesses are a better fit for CTC than others, though. "Local practicioners, lawyers  a lot of them get their business through lead generation," he says.

Obviously, if you're a web-based business or you aren't interested in taking a lot of phone calls, though, CTC may not be for you. That said, most businesses don't disable the feature if they have the choice. Says Holden: "The opt-out rate is very low."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Saturday Night Live has put a hilarious hypochondriac spin on the popular catchphrase "YOLO" in its first digital short of the season, featuring guest host Adam Levine and comedy sketch troupe The Lonely Island.

The catchphrase  which stands for "you only live once," popularized in a song by rapper Drake  got a meaning makeover on Saturday night in the music video spoof, which would be more accurately characterized as "you better look out."

Musical guest Kendrick Lamar and former SNL cast member Andy Samberg, who is also in The Lonely Island, appear in the video. When Samberg left the show last year, the epic digital shorts from The Lonely Island went with him, until now.

"Don't go to loud clubs because it's bad for your ears," the lyrics say. "Your friends will all be sorry when they can't hear. Stay the hell away from drugs because they're not legal. Bury all your money in the backyard like a beagle."

The song gets even more ridiculous as it continues, cautioning people build bomb shelters, not trust the banks and stay away from kids because they have lice. Not to mention blankets can smuggle you in your sleep and furniture can be "killing machines."

"You know we are still young, so don't be dumb," sings Levine. "Don't trust anyone cause you only live once."
--------------------------------------------------------------
It was a big week for apps.

Twitter released Vine, a new way for creating and sharing video content, and Temple Run 2, the app that garnered an astounding 20 million downloads in its first 4 weeks in the iOS App Store finally made its way to Android.

We saw a few new apps for reading your news, and a new app for sharing your opinion about literally everything.

Curious what some of these new apps really look like? Check out the video above for a visual run-through of our top apps from the week.

Have you given any of this week's top apps a try? Tell us about your favorites in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
One of the biggest stories in social media this week was the report in The New York Times that restaurants in New York City have begun banning customers from taking photos of their food.

Usually our weekly top comments roundup features discussions pulled from various stories, but this week we were particularly impressed by the ideas and discussions you offered in reaction to this one.

The potential death of "foodstagram" brought on a much larger debate about the etiquette involved in being part of the connected generation. Is it rude to snap a picture of your food at a fancy restaurant? How can restaurants take advantage of these customer interactions? What does the future of food photography look like?

SEE ALSO: 5 Tips for Delicious Food Photos

Some of our readers pointed out that using the flash while taking food pictures could take away from fellow diners' experience. Others argued that once they had paid for the food, it was theirs to do with as they pleased. Someone even suggested that getting thrown out for taking a food pic before the bill had been paid was a great way to score a free meal.

We loved the conversation that ensued. What do you think about the idea of a "social table," (similar to smoking rooms at restaurants), or an Instagram menu that features pictures of food? Let us know in the comments below!
--------------------------------------------------------------
It's not exactly easy to tell if someone is who they say they are on Vine, Twitter's new video-sharing app. Case in point: There's an account with the username Vine. Who is it? Hard to tell  maybe it's run by the company; maybe it's an unknown, opportunistic individual.

Duplicate usernames and easily faked profiles mean it's difficult to ascertain the legitimacy of high-profile Viners (if that's what we're calling them). For now, our best way to tell who's who on Vine is if verified Twitter accounts plug their six-second videos, or if they pop up when you look for people to follow via connected Twitter accounts.

Now it appears that Vine is playing around with ways to verify accounts. Rus Yusupov, Vine's cofounder and creative director, has a Twitter-verified badge-style stamp that looks like this on his profile:

Here's how those badges look in the following/followed-by list:

And here's how they look in search:

Seems legit. We asked Vine and Twitter for comment. We'll update when they respond.

Adding verified badges would certainly help cut out the fakers and help Vine foster a greater sense of trust between its users and the app itself.

Elsewhere, while Vine has little in the way of privacy settings, you can create a video with the app and share it with others privately. As CNET notes, it's simply a case of not sharing the video through Vine itself (either by hitting the "X" and "Delete Post" prompts as soon as you've recorded your video, or unchecking the "Share on Vine" option on the Share screen).

You then have the option to send it to friends from your iPhone's or iPod touch's Camera Roll (those are the only devices on which Vine is available right now).

As we noted Friday, Vine has several issues which should be addressed to make the app really sing. It's the early days though, and Vine's already a captivating community.

Meanwhile, a neat site called Vinepeek lets you view a real-time stream of vines. Careful though: the site's unfiltered, so some of the porn on Vine already might unexpectedly make its way to your delicate corneas.

Graphics via Apple and Vine, composite by Charlie White

This article originally published at The Daily Dot here
--------------------------------------------------------------
It was quite the week for viral videos, so in case you missed any of the big ones, we've wrapped up the best in one nice little package for your viewing convenience. That's right, we're here to help.

From the epic sequel to the most-shared ad of all time to cable network TNT and Price Harry cutting off an interview in Afghanistan to Internet-famous cat Maru's encounter with snow, here's a look at what captivated the online world this week.

SEE ALSO: 'SNL' Gets YOLO Treatment With Hilarious Digital Short

What was your favorite clip of the week? Let us know in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Apple is getting ready to release a new iPad model, and it's likely to have 128GB of storage memory, 9to5Mac reports citing unnamed sources.

This iPad would not be an entirely new model, but an upgrade to the current fourth-generation iPad. According to 9to5Mac's sources, the device will come in both black and white, as well as Wi-Fi-only and Wi-Fi+cellular variants.

It is likely that the biggest upgrade, compared to the current iPad lineup, will be in the memory department, though it's not certain. Apple internally calls its 16GB, 32GB and 64GB iPads "GOOD," "BETTER" and "BEST," while this upcoming model is referred to as "ULTIMATE," which suggests it will come with 128GB of memory.

As far as iPad mini goes, 9to5Mac has no info about an imminent launch of a new model, though we've been hearing rumors about an upgrade to that iPad line for months.

How do you feel about a 128GB iPad? Would you buy one? Share your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Hoping to start a bidding war, a woman has launched a resume for herself on eBay that warns "Hurry, I will go fast."

The execution, on behalf of a laboratory technician named Sonya Williams, gives employers until Feb. 4 to make their decision. The offer also promises "no defects or wear and tear" and one-day shipping from Lansing, Mich.

It's not clear whether Williams' resume was inspired by that of Philippe Dubost, a web product manager whose Amazon-esque resume we dubbed the "best online resume ever." However, Williams' execution pales in comparison if only for the low-quality head shot (what's up with those red eyes?) and for merely posting her traditional resume (with her contact info blotted out) under the "description" field.

Still, you've got to give Williams points for trying, even if this isn't quite a five-star effort.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Hacktivist group Anonymous took over the U.S. Sentencing Commission website this weekend, turning ussc.gov into the classic arcade game "Asteroids," complete with Nyan Cat shooter.

The initial hack on Saturday embedded a video on the site issuing a statement in response to the death of Internet activist Aaron Swartz. The video details "Operation Last Resort," promising revenge and demanding reform in the U.S. justice system.

On Sunday, Twitter user @OpLastResort posted Konami code instructions for the site. The Konami cheat code was originally used in the 1980s for video games on the Nintendo Entertainment System.

Upon typing the code, site visitors could control a missile-enabled Nyan Cat and shoot chunks of text off the government page, reports Slate. The game opened with the alert message, "PEW PEW PEW PEW PEW! End Prosecutorial Overreach!"

The USSC site went offline, presumably due to high traffic, but Anonymous had a backup plan. It also took over the United States Probation Department for the Eastern District of Michigan page with the same game. At the time of writing, both sites were still down.

Anonymous also spread instructions on Twitter and Pastebin, telling supports how to join their "Twitterstorm."

What do you think of the hacktivist group's threats and takeover? Let us know your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Apple and Android are dominating the smartphone market in a big way, grabbing a record 92% of global shipments, according to new research.

Android took the top spot with 70%, or 152 million units, followed by Apple, which shipped 22% (48 million units), according to a report released by research firm Strategy Analytics. Other smartphone makers captured the remaining 8% (17 million units).

"Android's share of the global smartphone market has surged from 51% to 70% over the past year, crushing Symbian, Bada and other platforms in its wake," Neil Mawston, the firm's executive director, said in a statement. "Android is clearly the undisputed volume leader of the smartphone industry at the present time.

"Android's challenge for 2013 will be to defend its leadership, not only against Apple, but also against an emerging wave of hungry challengers that includes Microsoft, Blackberry, Firefox and Tizen."

Overall, worldwide smartphone shipments grew 38% annually from 157 million units in the fourth quarter of 2011 to 217 million in the fourth quarter of 2012. Shipments for the full year reached a record 700.1 million units in 2012, jumping up from 490.5 million in 2011. Check out the video, above, for more.

What do you think of the study's findings? Do you own an Android phone, an iPhone or something else? Tell us in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
More details about Apple's rumored cheaper iPhone have emerged online, providing a concrete idea of how the smartphone looks.

In a nutshell, it will be a cross between the iPhone 5, the latest iPod touch and the iPod classic, according to an unconfirmed report by iLounge.

The budget version will have a 4-inch screen like the iPhone 5, a bottom like the fifth-generation iPod touch and a shape similar to the iPod classic. (To be precise, its dimensions are slightly larger than the iPhone 5's, at a half-millimeter taller, half-millimeter wider and nearly a millimeter thicker.)

From the front, the device looks almost exactly like the iPhone 5, with the sensor, camera and button in the same place.

SEE ALSO: Cheaper iPhone Would Cost $99 to $149, Report Says

In terms of materials used, it will be made largely from plastic, confirming earlier reports that the phone could have a polycarbonate shell, rather than an aluminium one. Despite this move to plastic, however, Apple will use Gorilla Glass for its screen. For more details, check out iLounge's post.

This alleged move into lower-cost territory signals that Apple is looking to appeal to developing markets, such as China, and to cut into the market share of Android phones, which are available in a wide range of prices.

What do you think of the cheaper iPhone's reported specs? Would you buy it? Tell us in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Apple CEO Tim Cook has personally acknowledged the numerous problems with the Maps app, launched late last year. He's in the midst of devoting considerable resources to fixing it. He has deputized Apple's Mr. Fix-it, Eddy Cue, to sort out the problem.

So we feel a little bad pointing out yet another error in Apple Maps  but this is one we just couldn't resist.

In the middle of San Francisco's infamous Tenderloin District, near the corner of Eddy and Taylor, Apple Maps will direct you to a restaurant apparently called "My Butt."

The best part: users have noticed, and four of them have left Yelp reviews of My Butt.

"I hope I don't sound too cheeky," writes one Yelp reviewer, "but I am really going to be pushin' My Butt into your face, since it really is a clASSy place."

And yes, in case you're wondering, Google Maps lays bare the truth of My Butt: an empty parking lot next to the Pandora karaoke bar.

Given Apple's relationship with Yelp, it's entirely possible that Yelp reviewers came up with the fictional establishment first. But we doubt it  you can't actually find My Butt on Yelp's homepage.

So who first put My Butt on the map? We've reached out to both companies and will let you know what we hear back. Rest assured, dear readers, we will do what we can to get to the bottom of this.

Images from Apple Maps and Google Maps. Hat tip to Kavi Kapur
--------------------------------------------------------------
Ashton Kutcher spent time in the hospital just days before filming his movie role as former Apple CEO Steve Jobs, revealed the 34-year-old actor at the Sundance Film Festival.

Kutcher was imitating Jobs' fruit-only diet to prepare for the lead role in jOBS, the indie film about the tech luminary. The biopic premiered at Sundance, garnering mixed reviews.

"First of all, the fruitarian diet can lead to, like, some severe issues," he said. "I ended up in the hospital like two days before we started shooting the movie. I was, like, doubled over in pain.

"My pancreas levels were completely out of whack, which was really terrifying ... considering everything."

The movie  not to be confused with the one Sony Pictures is creating based on Walter Isaacson's biography of Jobs  opens in theaters April 19. In Isaacson's book, though, the author quoted Jobs recalling one of his "fruitarian diets." Jobs described how a trip to an apple farm inspired his company's name: "Apple took the edge off the word 'computer.'"

Actors who portray real people in films often mimic their behaviors to better fit the part on screen, or even go on extreme diets to transform their bodies to look like someone else's.

Tom Hanks lost 55 pounds to resemble a stranded plane crash survivor in Cast Away, for example, while Charlize Theron gained 30 pounds to play a prostitute in Monster.





 



Thumbnail image via Sundance Institute; video courtesy Chris Barrett's YouTube SEE ALSO: Steve Wozniak Says Scene From Steve Jobs Movie Is 'Totally Wrong' Thumbnail image via Sundance Institute; video courtesy Chris Barrett's YouTube channel
--------------------------------------------------------------
Freeze-dried Neapolitan ice cream often comes to mind when we think about what our astronauts are eating high above Earth in the International Space Station. But the extraterrestrial culinary world is a bit more refined these days.

Astronauts still rely heavily on prepackaged, nonperishable foods that are assembled on Earth. However, with longer missions to Mars in mind, NASA is rethinking the space diet, and coming up with ways for astronauts to grow, process and prepare food while they are actually in orbit.

SEE ALSO: Can Humans Live on Mars?

A recent study, for example, proposes three 10-day menu cycles that use a variety of food sources  from farmed or shipped salad crops to pre-packed dishes. African sweet potato soup, flourless peanut butter cookies and Spanish rice are just a few menu items from that list.

Space is a rough place for the human body, making adequate nutrition very important in an astronaut's overall success. In fact, it's so important that NASA has its own Space Food Systems Laboratory where it develops and tests the best meals for missions.

The agency recently released photos of how astronaut food has changed over the years. Going by looks alone, we're guessing the pineapple fruitcake from the 1960s probably wasn't a favorite.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Earnings from the video of a fake baby-snatching eagle will help real students pay for school.

Posted on YouTube last month, the minute-long video shows a golden eagle flying above a grassy park, then suddenly swooping down to grab a baby before letting it go moments later.

Montreal's Centre NAD, the animation and design school behind the hoax, said profits will go toward scholarships for its 3D-animation students. NAD spokesperson Claude Arsenault declined to comment on the amount raised, as the school is awaiting final numbers from YouTube.

"It will likely be divided into several scholarships aimed at recognizing excellence in our undergrad students," she told Mashable in an email.

The scholarship program will launch this spring, Arsenault added.

For its part, Google spokeperson Kate Mason said the company does not release the earnings of partner videos. The YouTube Partner Program gives videomakers "resources and opportunities" to earn money and build bigger audiences, according to its website.

Initially believed to be genuine, the footage went viral soon after going online; its current view-count stands at 41.7 million.

NAD later admitted that its students, Antoine Seigle, Normand Archambault, Loc Mireault and Flix Marquis-Poulin, created the video as part of their production-simulation workshop class. It aims to teach students how to "work in a realistic work environment, and under real work conditions," Arsenault said.

Do you think funding scholarships is a good way to spend the video's earnings? How would you use the money? Tell us in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It's going to get even harder to find a bookstore to shop at in the next few years.

Barnes & Noble, the world's largest bookstore, is planning to cut down the number of bricks-and-mortar locations it operates by as much as a third in the next 10 years. CEO Mitchell Klipper told the Wall Street Journal that the company will have between 450 and 500 stores in 10 years, down from the 689 retail stores it currently operates.

"You have to adjust your overhead, and get smart with smart systems," Klipper told the Journal. "Is it what it used to be when you were opening 80 stores a year and dropping stores everywhere? Probably not. It's different. But every business evolves."

Barnes & Noble, like other book store chains, has been squeezed in recent years by the rise of digital books and competition from e-commerce sites like Amazon. Borders, one of Barnes & Noble's longtime competitors, went out of business in 2011 in part because it took longer to get into the e-reading space and ultimately was less successful at it.

Barnes & Noble, for its part, has had success with its Nook tablets and e-readers, but the company appears to be struggling with the reality of running hundreds of retail stores at a time when more readers shop online. Last April, the company decided to spin off its Nook division as a separate venture backed partly by Microsoft. In the December quarter, Barnes & Noble, no longer bolstered by Nook sales, revealed that its revenues had dropped my more than 10% from the same period a year earlier, due in part to an 8.2% drop in store sales.

Even the 689 stores that Barnes & Noble has in operation now represents a significant decline from the 726 stores it had running at its peak in 2008.

Do you still shop at bookstores or do you prefer to do all your book shopping online? Share in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
One of the biggest brands in the world, Budweiser, has finally launched a Twitter account in its name.

The brand, which had a little more than 600 followers Monday morning, is using the account to promote its upcoming Super Bowl ad, which will feature a Clydesdale foal:

The foal was born on Jan. 16 and will be featured in the brewer's Super Bowl ad, which was filmed when just seven days after its birth. The brand is asking fans to use the hashtag #clydesdales and is also promoting the effort on Facebook, where it has 3.7 million fans.

Though this is the first Twitter handle using the Budweiser name, sister brand Bud Light launched an account last year, which currently has around 5,000 followers. Lucas Herscovici, VP of Digital at Anheuser-Busch told Mashable that the brand held off doing so until Twitter launched an age-gating mechanism. Like other marketers of alcoholic beverages, Budweiser is barred from marketing its products to consumers under the age of 21.
--------------------------------------------------------------
As a retired high school teacher, Daniel Watson now spends most of his time working in his garage fixing up classic cars. Daniel is now in his final year of graduate studies in journalism in Toronto.

In every country, in every generation, car enthusiasts count down the weeks and days until a new model comes along that blows every other car out of the water. They love nothing more than to drive a new model, put the pedal to the metal and impress their friends with a vast tome of car-related knowledge.

SEE ALSO: 5 Apps To Prevent Your Teen From Texting While Driving

Perhaps as an acknowledgement of this timeless enthusiasm, developers have created mobile apps designed specifically for car lovers.

From fuel economy apps to those that allow for the comparison and purchase of car insurance policies, these five apps are designed to make driving easier, more enjoyable and increasingly social.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Paul Marcinkowski, a design student at the Academy of Fine Arts in d, Poland, has taken the infographics craze to another level. Marcinkowski, who studies in the department of graphics and painting, has tattooed his entire body with an infographic about tattoos for his final project.

The tattoo includes stats such as the number of Americans who have tattoos (45 million), and the top three reasons for regretting a tattoo: the person's name in the tattoo, the way it looks and it was stupid.

SEE ALSO: Can't Decide on a Tattoo? Get a QR Code Inked on Your Chest

Take a look at more photos of Marcinkowski's fully-inked torso below. Do you think he should ace his course?
--------------------------------------------------------------
China may be considering lifting its ban on game consoles, according to recent reports. This move essentially stems from the Chinese government's recent award of quality certification to the Playstation 3.

Seven ministries of the Chinese government put the ban into place in 2000, and there seem to be conflicting reports from those ministries about the future of the ban. An unidentified source at the Ministry of Culture was quoted in the China Daily as saying,"We are reviewing the policy and have conducted some surveys and held discussions with other ministries on the possibility of opening up the game console market."

Meanwhile, a semi-identified source only calling himself "Bai" at the ministrys cultural market department said the "ministry is not considering lifting the ban."

Lenovo managed to sneak its Eedoo CT510 system into the Chinese market despite the ban last year. The Eedoo is similar to the Xbox Kinect as it senses a users motion to control the games. Lenovo billed it as an "exercise and entertainment machine." It stands to reason that other consoles could make the same argument for systems like Wii Fit and Playstation Move.

Whether or not the rumors are true, Nintendo has already seen a 3.5% increase in its share price, and Sony shares are selling up 8% at the moment.

This article originally published at Geekosystem here
--------------------------------------------------------------
New college graduates who have a background in engineering can expect to cash in when they hit the job market, a new study finds.

Research from the National Association of Colleges and Employers (NACE) found that six different engineering specialties are among the 10 highest-paid majors for recent college grads.

Specifically, computer engineering majors take home the highest staring salary of $70,400. Chemical engineering, aerospace/aeronautical/astronautical engineering, mechanical engineering, electrical/electronics and communications engineering and civil engineering were also among the 10 highest-paid starting salaries for recent grads.

"This is not surprising since the supply of these graduates is low, but the demand for them is so high,"said NACE executive director Marilyn Mackes.

Here are the average starting salaries for the other majors in the top 10:

Overall, the study found that the average starting salary of all new college grads is $44,455, up 3.4% from one year ago. Among the broad categories of majors, education, up 5.4%, business, up 4.2% and communications, up 4.1%, experienced the largest increases to their average starting salaries. The research was based on data from approximately 400,000 employers.

This article originally published at BusinessNewsDaily here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Community management has come a long way since the first Community Manager Appreciation Day in 2009. We're interacting with our audiences in new formats and on new platforms, such as Instagram and Pinterest. Our online conversations have become more sophisticated with tools that allow us to curate social updates and host live video chats. Success measurement is more streamlined, and we're shaping our strategies around both organic and paid growth.

But amidst the excitement of these advancements, it seems something has gotten lost. We've forgotten why we got into this business and what, at its core, it's really all about: people.

Before we move forward in 2013, let's get back to our roots. To do so, I'm penning a new mission statement for all community managers.

Much of community managers' day-to-day work involves motivating people to take action: liking, sharing, commenting, etc. The tactics we use to spark this motivation can dictate the type of community we build.

To effectively construct a community around people and user experience rather than numbers, let's look at the two different types of motivators: extrinsic and intrinsic.

With extrinsic motivators, you offer an incentive to get your community members to take action.

When it comes to community management, an extrinsic reward usually involves offering the audience a discount or chance to win a prize for liking the company's Facebook page or retweeting a tweet from a certain Twitter account. But there's a catch. In his TED Talk, Dan Pink, author and career analyst, warns:

"These contingent motivators  if you do this, then you get that  work in some circumstances, but for a lot of tasks, they actually either don't work or, often, they do harm."

If your goal is to quickly get more followers or drive traffic to your site, the promise of a one-off discount can accomplish that.

But community managers looking to build a long-term strategy should aim higher. We want vested users. We want the people who will not only like our Facebook post but also walk into the store every weekend and make a purchase. We want fans who "@ mention" us daily and tell all their friends how much they love our product. That's what makes our job worthwhile.

Are these people doing these things because they received a small perk through social media? No.

People want to do things that matter. They have a desire to be a part of something with a larger purpose. If our goal as community managers is to acquire not just users but vested users, we need to harness our audience's drive to do things for their own sake. We need to tap into their intrinsic motivators.

When I say people want to be a part of something that matters, I mean that in a proverbial way  but I also mean it in a practical way. People want to use products that provide utility. They want to get something out of their experience.

"People dont buy your product because they like the product; they buy your product because they like themselves," Kathy Sierra, a programming instructor and game developer, said in her presentation "Building the Minimum Badass User".

This is the brand-user disconnect, according to Sierra: Community managers want users to think the brand is awesome  but users want to be awesome.

What makes users more awesome? A truly great product that helps them better do whatever it is they want to do.

As community managers, we're probably not the ones creating the product that will help our audience members reach their goals. But there are a few things we can do.

Own the feedback loop: Community managers are great listeners, constantly in tune with what people are saying and where they're saying it online. But what good is that feedback if it's not being turned into action? Establish a system for informing those making your products, content or whatever you create. Google did a great job of this a little over a year ago when it asked users to provide suggestions for improving its Tasks feature. Users cast 185,000 votes on various new improvements they wanted to see. Not only did Google integrate the top five suggestions, the company took it a step further by communicating the changes to its users in blog posts and a video, emphasizing it was user feedback that made the updates possible. The key here is understanding how the teams in your organization communicate and how you can best weave the most useful feedback into their systems. Following up with users, so they know they were heard, will bring your feedback loop full circle. Foster a positive experience on all touch points: From social networks and on-site engagement platforms to in-person events and even phone conversations, community managers are in touch with their brand's audience members just about everywhere. While understanding your audience is the first rule of community management, understanding your medium is second. Know what communities exist on each platform and what type of communication works best for them. Track how people are responding to you in likes, retweets, sentiment analysis or whatever makes most sense for your business. Use this data to help make decisions about how you interact with your community. Share valuable content: The beauty of social networking is that it gives everyone a voice. This means your community members are constantly being bombarded with updates from not only brands but also friends, family, celebrities, schools, church groups  the list is endless. Cut through your community members' noisy feeds by offering valuable updates. GE's Facebook page is a great example. While its content is always branded with the GE logo, some of the company's best posts are unrelated to its products or initiatives. Rather, it focuses on what's useful for the audience, such as health tips, technology stats and news articles about innovation. More importantly, you can tell GE is paying attention. The company picks up on timely events and pop culture references, incorporating them in a way that makes sense for its audience.

Speaking the same language as your audience requires stepping outside the community manager bubble, where you're living and breathing social media.

SEE ALSO: 10 Qualities of an Effective Community Manager

Something that might pop up as a trend in your feed could be non-existent to others. Speak to your community as humans  but don't be condescending. Consider the way you feel about the brands you follow, and how they to speak to you.

Here are a few terms to avoid:

"Meme": The majority of your audience doesn't know what this means. Just because you hang out on the Internet all day doesn't mean that they do. To them, "Hey Girl" is just a funny "thing" about the ridiculously good looking Ryan Gosling that someone posted on Facebook. "Engagement": This word will never go away. It is ingrained in our day-to-day practices and overall measurement of success. Nevertheless, I encourage you to think about engagement in terms of its roots  connecting with individual people. Aim to benefit the user and the benefit to your brand will follow. "Brands as publishers": Many community managers talk about content as the next big industry trend. I disagree. Brands have always been publishers. They have been publishing ads, which are forms content too. The difference now is the types of ads brands traditionally created don't necessarily provide value to a social media user. Marketers designed traditional ads to make consumers want something they don't already have, whether it is a product, lifestyle or body image. This type of content is unnatural on social media because these platforms are the ultimate vehicles of self-expression. People don't need brands to tell them what they want. The power of a status update is at their fingertips. Overall, aim to be relatable by understanding the world your audience lives in. Figuring out what motivates users, being integrated into their online experience and knowing how to relate to them all ties into understanding user behavior. Most social networks, forums and commenting systems don't release user behavior data. This means you, as a community manager, are your company's insight into that invaluable information. By giving your organization a glimpse into how your audience will respond in an uncontrolled environment, you can help inform decisions about product launches, content strategy and any other customer-facing initiatives. It's also important to think about how you communicate your insights internally. Represent your community by not only being an enthusiastic advocate but also an exemplary professional. Explain yourself in a way that makes sense to stakeholders. If you hear yourself saying "they just don't get it," stop and think about how you're delivering your message  because it's your job to make them "get it." Your colleagues  particularly higher ups  will respect your community if they respect you, positioning you to help your organization make user-driven decisions. As a community manager, it's your responsibility to make your community a better part of the Internet than where they started. Don't let the siren song of clicks and likes cause you to forget that.
--------------------------------------------------------------
App crash-reporting service Crashlytics announced Monday that it will be joining the flock at Twitter.

Launched a little over a year ago, the company helps developers determine what specific line of code is causing their app to crash so that they can more quickly correct the problem.

Twitter is an existing customer of the service, as are a number of other high-profile apps including Waze, TaskRabbit, Yelp, and Kayak. Despite its acquisition by Twitter, the company says it will continue to support its existing customers, and add new ones.

Development of Crashlytics will continue unabated and we remain dedicated to working with all of our customers  current and new, big and small  to deliver the key app performance insights they need, co-founders Jeff Seibert and Wayne Chang said in a blog post announcing the merger.

Going forward, were thrilled to work with the incredible team at Twitter. We share a passion for innovating on mobile and building world-class applications. Joining forces will accelerate our build-out, allowing us to leverage Twitters infrastructure to deliver new features faster than ever.

Twitter announced that Crashlytics would be joining the flock in a tweet:

What do you think we'll see from Crashlytics and Twitter working together? Let us know your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Mashable's mission is to inform the connected generation; but we can help you put that knowledge to work, too.

Since 2005, Mashable has been committed to bringing the top digital, social and tech news and resources to our readers. Over time, we've built a readership of 20 million people who are well versed in digital trends, social media and all the hottest technologies. So when the world's best companies are looking to fill open positions, they post them on the Mashable Job Board. New jobs are added every day, and many positions are exclusive  employers know that if they're going to find the right person for the job, they're going to find them reading Mashable.

Below, we've rounded up five recently posted jobs; check the Mashable Job Board daily for more open positions, and be sure to read our Job Search Series for tips on how to land your dream job.

Position: Social Media Strategist

Company: We Are Social

Location: New York

"One of our biggest priorities as we continue to grow is maintaining a culture and environment where people love coming to work and love what they do. Do you get a rush by rising to the unique challenges of the industry and creating amazing experiences for your clients? So do we. We take pride in creating innovative, creative and remarkable work (proof here)."

"Sound like a place you'd like to be? We're looking to hire talent across all levels, from account executives to creative designers, but in particular, we are looking for curious, innovation-minded strategists with a breadth of brand experience."

"HBO is looking for a Social Marketing Manager to support the Director of Social Media and Performance Marketing. This position will manage HBO's initiatives in social media on behalf of the brand and key series. With the ability to balance day-to-day fan engagement, project management, marketing, and creative writing, the ideal candidate is passionate about HBO, enthusiastic about digital media, and possesses an exceptional command of all things social."

"Weber Shandwick is seeking to hire a Digital Analytics Associate for its Digital Practice in Chicago. Digital Analytics Associates are responsible for development and execution of social media and digital measurement programs across multiple account teams and industry categories. They need to operate efficiently within a group, as well as execute assigned tasks independently, acting as the primary contact on data gathering, content analysis and presentation development. They are also expected to work closely with practice leaders to deliver assignments within agreed upon time and cost parameters. Deep passion for and knowledge of social media is a must!"

"Perficient is a leading information technology consulting firm serving clients throughout North America. Our IT consultants deliver business-driven technology solutions that enable our clients to gain competitive advantage, make their businesses more responsive to market opportunities and threats, strengthen relationships with customers, suppliers and partners, improve productivity and reduce information technology costs."

"Since 1998, we have delivered successful business-driven technology solutions for hundreds of Global 2000 and other large enterprise customers. During that time, we have grown from a startup to a publicly-traded firm with approximately 1,400 full-time professionals serving clients from locations in 20 strategic markets across North America, global delivery centers in Europe and China, and a technology consulting recruiting office in India."

"This is a full time position with Perficient. At Perficient, we offer a full competitive base salary, a full benefits package including medical, dental and vision, a 401(k) with matching contributions, 3 weeks of PTO and 10 paid holidays per year."

"Spil Games Global Business Development team discovers and facilitates partnerships for game content, advertising, e-commerce, and global online distribution of casual and social games. The Director of Business Development " United States will have a pivotal role in maximizing on the considerable opportunity the US market presents and will work in close cooperation with the Spil Games executive team based in Europe.

This is a strategic role, and you will be our first feet on the ground in the United States. We are looking for a game-changing Director of Business Development who is persistent and shows entrepreneurial leadership."

Check out these and other jobs on Mashable's Job Board. New positions are added every day, ranging from entry-level to C-suite positions.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Walt Disney Studios announced Monday that its mystery film project, previously known only as 1952, will be titled Tomorrowland when it hits theaters Dec. 19, 2014.

Starring George Clooney and featuring a creative team that includes Brad Bird (The Incredibles, Mission: Impossible - Ghost Protocol) and Damon Lindelof (Lost, Star Trek), Tomorrowland is one of Disney's most high profile development projects. It's also one of the most mysterious.

All we really know about the film is the participation of Clooney, Bird and Lindelof. Bird is directing, based on a script he wrote alongside Lindelof.

Last week, Brad Bird tweeted an image with the caption, "The Box...opened."

Inside the box, which is labeled "1952," we see photographs of Walt Disney and a few books. Sleuths at Entertainment Weekly have deduced that the loot includes a 1928 issue of Amazing Stories magazine, which features the introduction of Buck Rogers.

/Film thinks the film takes place in the present day and is about making contact with Earth.

Perhaps that's it and the film  and it's title  are based loosely around the Disney theme park world of the same name (think Pirates of the Caribbean). Still, I can't help but hope for a slightly different film.

I'm a die-hard Disney fan and when I first saw that 1952 was now Tomorrowland  starring George Clooney no less  my first thought was, "it's going to be about Walt."

Walt Disney started work in earnest on his Imagineering division that would build the rides and attractions for Disneyland in 1952. With a mustache and the right kind of hair gel, Clooney could be a dead-ringer for Walt.

Regardless of the plot, this looks like the most ambitious viral marketing effort that Disney has undertaken since Tron: Legacy.

What do you think Tomorrowland is going to be about? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Gamers were agog this weekend when screenshots and videos of an enormous (and somewhat accidental) battle in EVE Online hit the web. All told, 3,161 players duked it out in the Asakai system; 222 ships were killed, resulting in a loss of 470 billion ISK (the in-game currency), according to EVE-Kill.net.

Reports from Reddit and EVE bloggers indicate the fray was sparked when the pilot of a titan ship (the most expensive class in the game) prematurely jumped into enemy space, rather than warp allies to his location (a technique known as "bridging"). A lone titan in "low security" space is like blood in the water, and players from multiple factions rushed in, with reinforcements piling on to attack and defend.

Essentially, one pilot's accidental click ignited one of the largest impromptu capital ship battles in EVE history.

Besides the far-reaching in-game political implications of this battle (which are a bit too "inside baseball" for this publication), the spat has intrigued the Internet for a few reasons. For one, capital and super capital ships like the titan class can take months for players to build. Amassing wealth in EVE's hyper-capitalist, living economy is a full-time job, and it can be traded (legitimately) for the game's real-life subscription fees. Thus, some players at the Asakai battle were risking and losing ships worth upwards of $1,000 (real dollars), and months of work.

Asakai was by no means the largest battle EVE has seen by player count, according to Ned Coker, who handles media relations for CCP, the company that runs the massive online universe.

"There was actually a battle happening at or around the same time in a completely different location organized by two alliances as a free-for-all that had over 19,000 ships killed," Coker tells Mashable. "But they were much smaller ships, and it was a pre-planned event instead of an organic battle."

That's the other reason EVE fans are so enthralled by Asakai  it was not planned the way many of the game's complex operations usually are.

"If the parties involved know there is going to be a fight happening in a specific system, usually because some physical asset there is going to become vulnerable at a certain time, they use the fleet fight notification form to contact us ahead of time and let us know, so we can put our super expensive, way-fast hardware on that system," says Coker. Because all players inhabit the same persistent universe, CCP will often divert server resources to hot spots where the action is.

In this case, the game kicked into "time dilation" mode.

"We actually 'slow down time' so that all server calls happen in the right order and the fight becomes fair. If we didn't do that, the massive amount of data traveling back and forth might mean one sides modules and commands wouldn't go through, and all of a sudden it's just a game of flip-the-coin," Coker explains. "We didn't have any technical server issues, although we do kinda wish the fight was more planned (although that would take away some of the fun), so we could have put it on a dedicated node without ruining the fight. Time dilation kicked in, lots of ships were killed, and it was awesome."

Online discussion around the battle has led to lengthy explanations of what EVE is, and how new players can get started. "Weve seen an uptick in signups and accounts," says Coker. "Some are new players and some are old players returning who just cant stay away once they hear about such things."

For a first-person view of the Asakai battle, check out this video.

CCP also provided Mashable with this chart, showing the loss of in-game revenue by ship class.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Facebook updated its iOS app Monday, adding the ability to record and share videos from the app as well as the ability to send voice messages.

Voice messaging was previously released as an update to the companys Messenger app. Often a place for the social network to try out features with power users before releasing them to the public, it looks like voice messaging was a hit, and is now being rolled out to the masses in Facebooks main app.

Monday's update also added access to your device's camera, so you can send along a photo or video clip to your recipient as well.

If you want to share a video clip with more than just one person, video clips can also now be recorded and shared from directly within the app.

The Nearby feature got a bit of an update Monday as well, with a new streamlined look and more information about whats located near you based on Facebooks Knowledge Graph.

Facebook's updated mobile app is available now for iPhone, iPad and iPod touch from Apple's App Store.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Sweaty, savage, steadfast and often sauced, NFL fans are an interesting bunch indeed.

Who are they? Where do they come from? And what, generally speaking, is their deal? These are mysteries to which we may never truly have answers, but a slew of data released by Facebook on Monday does yield some fascinating insight into NFL fans' online behavior.

For starters, more than one in 10 Americans on Facebook have made their fandom official with a digital like for at least one NFL team. This, Facebook claims in a blog post, represents "one of the most comprehensive samples of sports fanship ever collected."

This map shows how that allegiance breaks down by location, with which teams dominate particular states and counties:

As expected, the map largely corresponds to teams' geographic territories, but there are some interesting anomalies. The Pittsburgh Steelers, in particular, dominate a handful of counties in Nevada and Oregon, and pretty much own Hawaii (possibly because star player Troy Polamalu is of Pacific Islander descent?). The Dallas Cowboys, meanwhile, truly are America's team.

This version of the same map narrows the geographic competition to just the San Francisco 49ers and Baltimore Ravens, who meet Sunday in Super Bowl XLVII:

Now how can an NFL team attract more likes on Facebook? "Just win, baby," to quote the late, great Oakland Raiders owner Al Davis. The chart below shows how many new fans NFL teams pick up on average after different outcomes of games. As you can see, winning playoff games is by far the most lucrative thing to do from a like-gathering standpoint, while even playoff losses help, likely because of the increase in media attention. Even losing a regular season game, however, is preferable to not playing at all:

For more insight, check out this post from Facebook's data science team. Which stats jump out at you most? Let us know in the comments.

All maps and charts courtesy of Facebook; Photo credit Jim Rogash/Getty Images
--------------------------------------------------------------
If you're having problem logging into Facebook this evening, you're not alone. The site is experiencing outages in parts of the United States.

The outage seems to be sporadic. Some Mashable staffers in San Francisco have access while others do not. The same is true in New York City, where some users can login without issue and others are unable to connect.

According to DownRightNow.com, Facebook started experiencing issues about 8:00 p.m. EST. We've reached out to Facebook for comment and will update this post as more information become available.

Is Facebook down for you? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Once upon a time, Facebook users joined groups to self-identify; groups lived in your About section, next to your favorite books, movies and quotes. (Anyone remember "Grab Your Balls... We're Playin' Tennis?")

But no more. Now, Pages have replaced traditional groups. And today's groups revolve more around communication, sharing and interaction.

SEE ALSO: 18 Facebook Fossils We'll Remember Forever

Groups help gather with friends around common interests; within groups, you can share updates, photos, documents and more under specific settings of your choosing.

In light of Facebook Pages' popularity, some users may wonder if groups are obsolete. However, Pages are always public, meaning their information and posts are available to all Facebook users, and if they represent a brand or company, they can only be created by official representatives.

Today's groups also enjoy more intuitive privacy settings. There are cons, however  for instance, you can't avoid being added to groups against your will (though you have the option to leave, of course), and the "Seen by" feature adds another creepy consideration.

We walk you through the process of creating, joining and customizing groups in the gallery above. Tell us why you use Facebook groups in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Got a question about Facebook privacy? Erin Egan, Facebook's Chief Privacy Officer of Policy, wants to hear it.

Facebook on Monday announced a new feature, "Ask Our CPO," which invites Facebook users to submit questions or comments about Facebook's privacy policy. Egan will answer or otherwise comment upon several of those submissions in a regular feature on Facebook's Facebook and Privacy blog.

"Go to the Ask Our CPO application to send me questions for our next note," wrote Egan in a blog post announcing the new feature. "I'll answer some of the questions we receive in each note. For instance, we recently launched Graph Search. As you learn more about this feature, we hope you will use this forum as a place to ask us any questions you may have. In the meantime, I wanted to use this as an opportunity to respond to some privacy questions I get asked on a regular basis."

SEE ALSO: Facebook Changes Privacy Controls, Forces Users to be Searchable

Egan's first note also included a series of answers to general privacy questions, including details of her own privacy settings:

One of the great things about Facebook is the granular controls that we offer, like audience selectors, so that as you're posting something, you can make a decision about who should see that specific post. I use these controls regularly for things that I post on my timeline. 

 

For example, I sometimes use the "only me" privacy setting when I'm on the go to keep photos or remember things that my kids have said. I can go back and see the "only me" posts on my timeline later, and change the audience for them if I want to share something more broadly, but they're not shared with anyone else when I first post.

 

I also really like using Facebook lists, which let me split up my friends into groups and share certain information with specific lists. For example, sometimes when I'm posting about an event that we are holding at Facebook, Ill post that information to the list of my friends who work here.

Egan also noted that she will only answer general questions about Facebook privacy, not account-specific queries.

Have a question for her? You can submit your question at Facebook's Ask Our Chief Privacy Officer page. What would you ask her? Share in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Facebook has announced its partnership with suicide prevention group Save.org to monitor what they're calling "suicide warning signs" posted through social media.

Essentially, the site will research the online behaviors of suicide victims in the months leading up to their deaths. The initial goal, the company said, is to provide researchers at Save with patterns to help detect potential suicides as early as possible.

Renewed public interest in the issue was triggered after the apparent suicide of Internet activist Aaron Swartz on Jan. 11.

Dan Reidenberg, executive director at Save, said in an interview with Bloomberg that traditional suicide prevention organizations usually rely on the memories of the victims' families and friends to look back for warning signs  something that's often difficult to fully recall.

"Friends sometimes dont ask important questions for fear of being invasive ... If we can see whats happening, we can train people to look for it."

SEE ALSO: After Aaron Swartz: The Tech World Must Talk About Depression

Facebook's not the first social media site to take action steps toward preventing suicide. Google has designed its site to display the number for the National Suicide Prevention Hotline whenever "suicide" or related terms are searched.

Facebook and Save's current project will analyze the posts of about 20 people in Minnesota who recently committed suicide. It will take around 12 months to gather the needed data.

Watch the video above to learn more. What role, if any, should social media networks play in suicide prevention?
--------------------------------------------------------------
The White House has abbreviated citizen signatures on its We the People petition website. The signatures, which used to include a signers first name and last initial, now just include first and last initials.

The signature blocks also include the signers location and the date of the signature.

The change comes less than two weeks after the White House raised the bar for petitions to receive an official response to 100,000 signatures in one month. The 16-month-old website was flooded with hundreds of thousands of petitions related to the shooting of 26 people at an elementary school in Newtown, Conn., in December and from citizens seeking to secede from the union after President Obamas reelection in November.

The change affected both signatures on active petitions and on historic petitions that have already received a White House response.

There was no public announcement of the change and the White House declined to comment about it on the record.

The change will likely reduce the amount of monitoring and oversight White House staffers must perform on petitions. Theres no mechanism to ensure people who register with We the People are using their real names, so it would be possible for registrants, for instance, to enter profanity in the first name field.

The move will also inhibit some social science research using the site, such as a University of North Carolina study that divided signers of secession petitions by their presumed gender.

The White House has stated in the past that it retains all data it removes from the public We the People site in order to comply with the Federal Records Act. Previously, the White House has only removed petitions that failed to meet the threshold for an administration response and petitions that violated the sites terms of service.

This article originally published at Nextgov here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Google gets "dozens" of requests for users' information from governments, courts and police forces around the world every day, according to the company. These requests are up 70% over the last three years, but exactly how Google handles data demands from government agencies has been a mystery  until now.

Google released on Monday new details about how it handles officials' requests for user data, stressing that it does everything in its power to keep user data private when it's legally able to do so.

Police or courts might ask Google to turn over user data if it's considered relevant to an investigation. When Google receives such a request, it pours over the request to ensure it complies with the law and Google's own policies.

"For us to consider complying, it generally must be made in writing, signed by an authorized official of the requesting agency and issued under an appropriate law," reads a blog post from Google Senior Vice President and Chief Legal Officer David Drummond in a Monday blog post.

If a request passes this stage, Google then considers whether the request is overly broad in scope. If Google decides the request is indeed too broad, it either denies the request or looks to narrow it.

For example, a hypothetical request might demand Google hand over five months of a users' emails and his YouTube uploads. Google could take steps to narrow that down to, say, one month of emails and no YouTube content.

After a request passes these benchmarks, Google notifies targeted users that a request has been made for their information  if it's legally able. Warrants are occasionally sealed to protect an investigation. In this case, Google takes steps to make the warrant public so that it may notify the user. Notification of a request allows users to contact legal counsel.

Finally and most significantly, Google's standards for handing over user data are stronger than those required by American law  an important and controversial point.

The Electronic Communications Privacy Act (ECPA) requires police to obtain a warrant only for emails and other electronic communications less than six months old. Google, however, views the Fourth Amendment's protection against unreasonable searches and seizures to trump the ECPA, and thus it requires a warrant for emails. This legal conflict has yet to be tested at the Supreme Court.

"Were a law-abiding company, and we dont want our services to be used in harmful ways," wrote Drummond. "But its just as important that laws protect you against overly broad requests for your personal information."

Sen. Patrick Leahy (D-Vt.) is calling for a new law that would require police to get a warrant for all emails and other online communications.

SEE ALSO: Google: Police Requests for User Data Up 70%

More about Google's treatment of requests for user data can be found in Google's latest Transparency Report, issued Friday.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Grubwithus launched two years ago with the goal of helping users organize group dinners with people they've never met before who might just share some things in common. Now the startup is trying to bring a little more spontaneity to this social dining experience.

On Monday, Grubwithus released a new iPhone app called GrubTonight, which lets users find and join a group dinner taking place at a restaurant that same night. Each day, the app rings a "dinner bell" to notify users about meals with spots available. The user can then pay a flat fee to reserve a spot at the table, which covers the cost of a fixed-price meal, the first round of drinks and the tax and tip.

"We built GrubTonight for the spontaneous person who doesnt have time or the ability to make plans days in advance, but still likes to have fun at night," Eddy Lu, the CEO and co-founder of Grubwithus, told Mashable. This might include locals who find themselves without dinner plans on a particular night or those new to a city who may be looking for a place to eat and other people to dine with.

At launch, GrubTonight only works with restaurants in Los Angeles, but the startup plans to add other cities in the coming months, including San Francisco, New York and Chicago.

Grubwithus unveiled its website in early 2011 and has since raised more than $6 million in seed funding and signed up about 85,000 members. The startup released its flagship iPhone app about a year after launching the website. Rather than build GrubTonight's features into the existing app, Lu says the team decided it would be better to build out a separate "low-weight" app that let users make same-day reservations in fewer steps.

The hope, according to Lu, is that the new app lets Grubwithus capture a broader range of social diners. "We are delivering social dining experiences for everyone," he says, "from the spontaneous, last-minute types to the planners who keep their calendar updated down to the minute."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Intel came to rule the PC market by making the worlds most advanced chips, beating competitors down the curve of Moores Law and producing higher-performing processors at a lower unit cost.

But todays smartphones and tablets dont necessarily require cutting-edge computing performance, and investors are worried that Intels long-winning strategy wont translate to profits as these devices cut into PC sales. Indeed, in the mobile market, Intel remains far behind its competitors.

On an earnings call last week, CEO Paul Otellini found himself reassuring analysts that Intels leading-edge fabs are still its single greatest asset, enough to justify $13 billion in 2013 capital spending to maintain this edge.

A big test of that will occur over the next two years, as Intel intends to finally lay claim to the worlds most advanced mobile processors. These will be manufactured with transistor features as tiny as 22 nanometers, which Intel plans to introduce this year, before it pivots relatively quickly to selling mobile chips made with a 14-nanometer process in 2014.

Intel has sold mobile chips for some time, but the first Intel-powered smartphones and tablets only shipped in 2012. More power-efficient ARM-based designs sold by companies like Qualcomm and fabricated in foundries like TMSC and Samsung have comprised the smartphone chip market so far.

Otellini is right that Intel will pull ahead with its 22-, 14-, and, eventually, 10-nanometer technology, and that this edge may be its best hope for convincing device makers to buy its newest mobile processorsalong with new, more efficient chip designs.

The problem for Intel is that they dont get anywhere by being Intel. They are the new kid on the block now. Just being equal doesnt do much; they have to be better, says Linley Gwennap, principal analyst for the Linley Group.

Crucially, these chips will also be designed to help solve the biggest problem that delayed Intel from entering the mobile marketdesigned initially with plugged-in PCs in mind, its chips have sucked too much battery life from devices.

Intel has designed new chips that offer improvements. Today, Intels 32-nanometer Atom smartphone chip architecture, now found inside a total of seven devices sold in 20 countries, is already equal or better than the best ARM designs, Otellini claimed last week. Going forward, combined with a smaller architecture that packs more transistors onto a chip, Intel can make higher-performing chips that can also consume less power, Gwennap says.

Such advantages could appeal particularly to device makers looking to make smartphones that act more like tablets, or tablets that act more like powerful notebooks, says Len Jelinek, chief semiconductor manufacturing analyst at the firm IHS iSuppli. As Otellini noted last week, the lines between form factors are blurring.

Still, there will be large barriers that Intels advanced manufacturing technology cannot solve as it tries to sell to more device makers. It doesnt matter how good your transistors are, you still have to create products that are meeting market needs, Gwennap says.

It will be a challenge, for example, for Intel to design the right combinations of features and specifications on its chips, integrating everything from Wi-Fi and cellular capability to graphics and GPS features. In the last few years, Intel has acquired a number of companies to help with this effort, but has not proven it can incorporate them smoothly.

Intel must also combat the perception that ARM is the default mobile chip designer. Device makers, working on rapid product cycles, could view it as risky to switch to Intel until its mobile technology is more proven, says Jelinek.

And finally, Intel faces risks as it plans how much expensive manufacturing capacity to build. Mobile chips are smaller, so it will be harder to keep the fabs busy even with a lot of orders.

These questions are all crucial for Intels business, because PC sales are slumping. Intel gave a nod to these seismic shifts yesterday by announcing a slow ramp down of its desktop motherboard business so it can focus on lightweight ultrabooks, tablets and phones.

The company is making some progress. Today, for example, some of the seven smartphone designs that come with Intel inside include models from ZTE and Lenovo, two of Chinas top smartphone sellers. Its Clover Trail chips can now be found in 10 tablets, too.

Jelinek anticipates that Intel will be part of the wireless revolution moving forward. It is the next generation of technology that Intel is really good at providing. It has just taken them a long time to get there.

This article originally published at MIT Technology Review here
--------------------------------------------------------------
During the previous quarter, international iPhone sales grew at a rate of 35%, significantly lower year over year according to AllThingsD.

Raymond James analyst Tavis McCourt contends that the rise in international iPhone sales is likely to slip to 15% during the first three quarters of 2013. During the first quarter of 2012, sales were up 110.5%.

Says McCourt of the 35% rise during the previous quarter:

This would be a strong result except for the fact that the comp was easy internationally for Apple as the iPhone 5 launches occurred far earlier this year in most countries than last years 4S launch. March will be a tougher comp internationally.

AllThingsD suggests two ways in which Apple could improve international iPhone sales. These include releasing a handset earlier in the year, and signing up "a big new iPhone carrier abroad." That carrier could be China Mobile, which is reportedly in talks with Apple regarding a potential iPhone deal.

Another way that Apple could improve iPhone sales abroad, of course, could be to launch of a less expensive handset as has long been rumored.

Earlier this month, Apple reported record revenues during the holiday quarter. However, analysts have grown increasingly concerned about Apples long-term prospects.

This article originally published at AppAdvice here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Apple issued on Monday its first major update to iOS 6, boasting new bells and whistles as well as bug fixes.

iOS 6.1  which comes after five beta test updates following the September launch of iOS 6  includes 4G LTE support for 36 additional iPhone carriers and 23 more for the iPad.

On top of that, U.S. users can now purchase movie tickets through Fandango via Apple's voice-assistant Siri and iTunes Match subscribers can download individual songs to iOS devices from iCloud.

Apple has also added a way to reset your Advertising Identifier, which acts as a control room for informing advertisers about your web activity.

SEE ALSO: Microsoft Office 2013 Launches Tomorrow: What You Need to Know

iOS 6 is the worlds most advanced mobile operating system, and with nearly 300 million iPhone, iPad and iPod touch devices on iOS 6 in just five months, it may be the most popular new version of an OS in history, said Philip Schiller, Apples senior vice president of Worldwide Marketing, in a release. iOS 6.1 brings LTE support to more markets around the world, so even more users can enjoy ultrafast Safari browsing, FaceTime video calls, iCloud services, and iTunes and App Store downloads.

To download the app, visit Settings on your mobile device and then select General. The update will be available via the Software Update section within that screen. However, users should not at least 1GB of storage is needed to download iOS 6.1, so you may have to clean up some space on your device beforehand.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Iran is claiming to have successfully launched a monkey into space and brought it back alive, according to Iranian state television.

Iranian television says the craft carrying the monkey reached 72 miles above the Earth before safely returning, as reported by Time. Here's a picture of the monkey, via Mahir Zeynalov:

SEE ALSO: The Second Space Race: It's On

The American and Soviet space programs experimented in their infancy with sending animals to space to test if the venture would be safe for humans. Albert I, a Rhesus monkey launched by the United States in a V-2 rocket, became the first monkey in space in 1948, but he suffocated during flight. Albert II was launched in 1949. He survived his trip but later died in a parachute accident. Laika, a Soviet dog, became the first animal to orbit Earth in 1957.

The United States fears that Iran's space program may be a veiled method of experimenting with intercontinental ballistic missiles and other military technology.

North Korea recently launched a satellite into orbit, later saying missile and nuclear tests would continue despite U.S.-backed United Nations sanctions.
--------------------------------------------------------------
At least now we know  the best thing to come out of MTV's obnoxious, greed-advocating reality TV show "My Super Sweet Sixteen" is the birth of Jennifer Lawrence's acting career.

The two-time Oscar nominee and star of Silver Linings Playbook was once a promo gal for MTV. She starred in the commercial as a spoiled blonde teenager who gets enraged when a disco ball smashes her cake (who wouldn't?).

And while her humble roots barely resemble the butt-kicking archer Katniss Everdeen who we've all grown to love in The Hunger Games, J-Law hasn't forgotten where she got her a start.

SEE ALSO: Jennifer Lawrence GIF Reactions to Oscar Nominations

When she took home a Screen Actor's Guild award Sunday night, her first shout out was to MTV.

"I earned my SAG card when I was 14; I did an MTV promo for 'My Super Sweet 16,'" she said in her acceptance speech. "And I remember getting it in the mail and it being the best day in my entire life, because it officially made me a professional actor."

Looks like there's still hope for J-Woww's Oscar aspirations.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Twitter's video sharing service, Vine, has instantly become the go-to place for memes and quirky, fun videos. One way to quickly check what's up on Vine is Just Vined, a simple but useful web service that displays the last 20 videos on Vine.

All of the videos are muted by default, but you can choose to un-mute any of them if you like.

The service is lacking any other options  we, for instance, would like to see an option for more or less videos displayed on the page  but it's still quite fun, and each refresh is guaranteed to net you at least one or two interesting clips.

SEE ALSO: Vinepeek Opens a Window on the World, Six Seconds at a Time

Check it out over at justvined.com and tell us what you think in the comments!

BONUS: How to Use Vine
--------------------------------------------------------------
We know, we know: Weird and twisted as it is, you're sick of the Manti Te'o story by now. And, truth be told, we're suffering from plenty of Te'o overload ourselves.

But this! This autotune-enhanced remix of Te'o's strange interview with Katie Couric last week breathes new life into a tired storyline. A rapping cameo from Te'o's father puts things over the edge. All in all, the song could easily pass for a track on the next R. Kelly album.

The remix has become a hit with Internetters, picking up 100,000 YouTube views since Saturday. Check it out for yourself above and let us know what you think in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
NASA's Mars rover Curiosity has captured its first nighttime view of the Red Planet using a camera and ultraviolet light on its robotic arm.

Curiosity snapped the Mars night photos in visible and ultraviolet light on Jan. 22 to take an up-close look at a rock called "Sayunei," which the rover had scuffed with a wheel to scratch off surface dust, NASA announced Thursday. One goal was to seek out any fluorescent minerals, they added.

The rover took the photos with the help of small light-emitting diodes (LEDs) that serve as lights for the Mars Hand Lens Imager  or MAHLI  a microscope-like camera at the end of Curiosity's robot arm. The camera has an adjustable focus and several LED light sources for its Martian photography.

"The purpose of acquiring observations under ultraviolet illumination was to look for fluorescent minerals," MAHLI principal investigator Ken Edgett of Malin Space Science Systems in San Diego, Calif., said in a statement Thursday. "These data just arrived this morning. The science team is still assessing the observations. If something looked green, yellow, orange or red under the ultraviolet illumination, that'd be a more clear-cut indicator of fluorescence."

The MAHLI camera is one of10 science instruments on Curiosity, which is a car-size rover capable of examining the surface of Mars in unprecedented detail.

Curiosity is currently exploring a shallow depression on Mars that mission scientists have named Yellowknife Bay. The nighttime photo target Sayunei is near the site of where the rover is expected to use its drill for the first time on Mars.

The $2.5 billion Mars rover Curiosity landed inside the vast Gale Crater on Aug. 5 to begin a two-year primary mission aimed at determining if the region could have ever supported microbial life. After leaving Yellowknife Bay, the rover will continue on toward a destination called Glenelg, which is located near the base of a 3-mile (5 kilometers) mountain rising up from the center of Gale Crater.

This article originally published at Space.com here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Not one but two companies have now decided that theyre going to mine asteroids to collect gold and platinum.

The aptly named Deep Space Industries joins Planetary Resources in the competition for meteor material. But were a little concerned here; a NASA mission to an asteroid to bring back 2 kilograms of material in 2021 is expected to cost the space agency $1 billion.

Before we turn over billions of dollars as angel investors, wed like to run some math on this venture.

These mining ventures aim to bring back resources like platinum, water and gold. At market close Jan. 24, 50 troy ounces of platinum sold for $1681.30 (32.15 troy ounces equal 1 kilogram). Even if NASA could bring back 2 kilograms of pure platinum, it would only net $108,107.59.

Clearly thats not going to bring in the big bucks. But were going to consider that private companies might be able to mine galactic material more cheaply  U.S. government spending is hardly known for its efficiency  so bear with us.

Now, the risk of an asteroid being steered off course and crashing into the Earth, though unlikely, is not one wed really like to run. So we capitalists would rather not screw around with anything remotely close to the size of the Chicxulub meteor, which killed off the dinosaurs 65 million years ago and was probably about 15 kilometers wide.

For this reason, Deep Space Industries has said that it will initially target very small asteroids of 10 meters or less:

These sorts of asteroids hit the Earth every day, but disintegrate and burn up high in the atmosphere. The meteorites that do survive passage to the surface generally come from much larger objects, 30 or more meters, and even those are blasted into smaller pieces before they reach the ground. It takes a really large meteorite (50 or more meters in diameter, depending upon its composition and structure) to actually impact the Earth hard enough to make a crater.

So if a mining operation could mine a roughy spherical asteroid with a diameter of 10 meters, and if the entire asteroid were made out of material that can be mined (were going to say platinum), how much money would that company be able to bring back?

The density of platinum is 21.45 grams per cubic centimeter. (OK fine, science nerds  thats at room temperature, but in space were going to assume its still a solid and therefore reasonably similar.) If we assume that an entire spherical asteroid with a 10-meter diameter (about 523 cubic meters) is made of platinum, and that one of these asteroid miners could harvest the whole thing, theyd get about 11.2 million kilograms of platinum. At current market rates, that comes out to $12.1 billion.

Of course, this is wildly optimistic. Although asteroids of pure metal exist, theyre most likely to be mixes of roughly 90% iron and 10% nickel. A tenth of our asteroid (52.3 cubic meters, or 466,000 kilograms) made of nickel would be worth about $8.1 million at last months market rates. The iron  well, iron ore is so cheap that it hardly adds anything.

So its a little harder to make the commercial case. Its also likely that a massive influx of any of these materials would deflate its market price. Still, this is not the same order of crazy as building a Death Star (price tag: $850 trillion). Whats more, private companies are taking a bigger role in space exploration and galactic commercial ventures; SpaceX has already delivered commercial cargo to the International Space Station.

The plans proposed by Deep Space Industries and Planetary Resources may seem laughable. But hey, who knows? No wonder the latter counts Google Executive Chairman Eric Schmidt, Google CEO Larry Page and one-time U.S. third-party presidential candidate  and Texas billionaire  Ross Perot as its investors.

This article originally published at Quartz here
--------------------------------------------------------------
While most of us might blush if Mom showed up anywhere in matching attire, Carra Sykes doesn't mind at all. She actually thinks it's kind of cool, and she has even documented the twinsie outfits through a series of photographs.

The beautiful portraits showcase the similarities between mother and daughter. At times, it's almost like looking into Carra's future or her mother's past.

And props to Mama Sykes who could be dubbed hippest mom on the planet for convincing her daughter to actually share clothes.

SEE ALSO: Dad Draws Awesome Art on Kids' Lunch Bags

The idea for the project came from an uncle's jokes about Carra's mom often stealing the 25-year-old photographer's clothes. Then when Carra was having a hard time finding a job, she decided to spend her free time bonding with her mom.

"I have enjoyed her enthusiasm and energy in our adventure together," Carra told Mashable. "[My mom] has been so wonderful to work with! I hope this project encourages people to have fun and creatively express!"
--------------------------------------------------------------
Drones are routinely used to kill terrorists and conduct surveillance operations in the Middle East. But we've already seen that they have countless other applications, like protecting endangered species, transporting medical supplies and even delivering burritos. Soon enough, movie-making could be added to the list.

In fact, the Motion Picture Association of America is actively lobbying to get permission to use robot planes to shoot Hollywood flicks, as revealed in a lobbying disclosure report last week.

Howard Gantman, a spokesman for the MPAA told The Hill that having a drone film some scenes can be cheaper, safer and more useful than relying on traditional techniques such as a helicopter or crane.

SEE ALSO: Student Tweets Entire History of US Drone Strikes

Using unmanned aerial vehicles for commercial purposes is currently banned, but the FAA is working on integrating drones into the U.S. airspace. Some police departments and other law enforcement agencies like the U.S. Customs and Border Protection are already using flying bots for surveillance purposes. And the FAA, as well as the drone manufacturing industry, expects the trend to increase over the upcoming years.

To learn more about how drones could be used to shoot movies, watch the video above.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Conventional wisdom holds that photos snapped in the White House should be taken with a certain modicum of grace and sincerity.

Bosh and his Miami Heat teammates visited the White House on Monday as part of the hang-with-the-president session that's long been a tradition for championship-winning American sports teams. Heat owner Micky Arison posted the photo above to Instagram during the trip. Arison, LeBron James and Dwyane Wade all sport nice smiles  but then there's Bosh, lurking in the background and doing ... well, something.

If you're interested in more, below is a video the official White House account posted to YouTube from the visit. It's pretty cool to see LeBron James, someone as universally admired by kids around the world, visibly nervous and bashful in Obama's presence.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Chris Hughes, the 29-year-old co-founder of Facebook who acquired a majority stake in the small, storied arts and politics magazine The New Republic last March, naming himself editor-in-chief and publisher, unveiled the results of its 10-month redesign process Sunday.

The redesign spans print, web, tablet and mobile. The first element of the overhaul  a new logo, which introduced a bolder font and did away with the old ship seal  was introduced earlier this month. The rest of the redesign has been similarly modern, aesthetically at least, combining the bright splashiness of New York Magazine and Bloomberg Businessweek with the streamlined, tablet-optimized reading experience of The Atlantic's Quartz (on the web, at least).

What's perhaps most surprising about the makeover is how relatively traditional it is. One might expect an entire rethinking and repackaging of the very notion of a "magazine" from a co-founder of one of the most groundbreaking companies of the last decade, but it's clear that Hughes wants to stay true to TNR's 98-year-old foundations. The redesign, to carry the metaphor forward, is more like a fresh coat of paint. To point: Hughes brought Frank Foer, who served as editor from 2006 to 2010, back as editor. Hughes told the New York Times plans to stick to politics reporting and arts criticism, but with a broader range, covering not only museum openings but also the HBO series Girls.

The revenue strategy is similarly traditional, hinged on subscription and advertising revenue  though, to be fair, Hughes, who has made hundreds of millions of dollars on his Facebook shares, has said repeatedly that money was not a motivating factor in his decision to acquire TNR. "I bought it because I believe in the power of longform and substantial journalism," he said in a phone interview with Mashable Monday morning, adding that he expects the operation to be profitable "in a couple of years."

The first part of Hughes' revenue strategy is to make TNR, which costs $35 for 20 print issues per year, more worthy of its subscription price. In addition to glossy print deliveries, subscribers are also promised complimentary access to all of TNR's digital assets, including its website and tablet apps, which will sync across devices (a first for any magazine, so far as I'm aware). They'll also be privy to audio recordings of every story, via Spoken Layer, making it easier for subscribers to consume on their morning runs and daily commutes. In addition, there will be invitations to subscriber-only events.

At present, TNR has just over 44,000 subscribers, up about 10,000 since March, Hughes told the NYT. Newsstand sales are around the 1,700 mark.

There's still something for non-subscribers, too: TNR has adopted a metered paywall on its site, allowing visitors up to eight articles per device per month for free. Stories will be posted to the site daily, a mix of content from the magazine as well as "timely blog posts" written specifically for the website, says Hughes.

Visitors to TNR.com will notice that there are no display ads. Hughes says he plays to keep the homepage ad-free, though there's "some opportunity for display" on article pages. "From our perspective what advertisers want is a more immersive experience," he says. "It's more about customizing premium packages than a few display ads." What those packages will include is still a bit nebulous, though Hughes did mention opportunity to advertise in TNR's audio streams as well as event sponsorships.

I asked Hughes how his experience at Facebook has come to inform his approach to TNR. "Probably the most important approach I took from Facebook is [its] approach to iterative design," he said. "What you see now is about half of what we want to get out the door, and you'll see us constantly tinkering and revising it, but on a much smaller scale. It's a culture of constantly trying to improve things."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Reporting live from Nowheresland: This is a journalist who can't get rid of the giggles.

Live television is almost asking for some epic mishaps and bloopers  ask any on-air news anchor or reporter. Just because they call action, doesn't mean everyone is set to go. And the best occasions are when the journalists aren't aware the cameras are rolling and America gets to watch its local TV reporter embarrass themselves into television history.

But we appreciate their hard work and, even through the laughs, goat attacks, football tackles and occasional technological difficulty, they will still tell us what is happening in the world.

SEE ALSO: Somewhere Out There, Local News Is Embarrassing Itself

Or, if you happen to be Al Roker, you will get the vice president of the United States of America to shake your hand and then abruptly end the segment, because you know you can never beat that.

Back to you, somewhat incompetent and mildly confused on-air reporters.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Public figures looking to build some Internet credibility via an interview on Reddit may want to reconsider their strategy after reviewing the experience of NFL commissioner Roger Goodell.

Violent off-the-field incidents and increased awareness of the longterm damage caused by a game built on savage collisions has cast a pall over the NFL. An awkward labor dispute with its officials' union hurt the the league's credibility with many fans early this season. But football nevertheless remains an iconic American sport and its extreme popularity shows no true signs of waning anytime soon.

Amid this context and six days before Super Bowl XLVII, NFL commissioner Roger Goodell took to Reddit on Monday afternoon for an hour-long Ask Me Anything session with fans and users.

The free-for-all interview format is a hallmark of Reddit, and one that its users take very seriously. Redditors post questions, which are up-voted by others. The same policy applies to the interviewee's answers. The Reddit AMA is distinct from an "AMAA"  which stands for "Ask Me Almost Anything." AMAs by major public figures are still a relatively new phenomenon, made more popular by President Obama's AMA in August, which was considered a runaway success.

As was to be expected, Redditors hit the commish with a number of tough questions about player safety, the referee labor dispute, TV blackout rules and more. However, many of Goodell's answers came off as bland, PR-approved canned responses. That, predictably, garnered a fairly significant amount of comment backlash from Reddit users.

While it was cool to see the commissioner of a major sports league submit to such a crowd-sourced interview, it's worth considering whether the radical honesty implied by the format was really something Goodell could agree to. While public figures in particular are thoughtful about which questions they answer and how, Goodell's selectivity and evasiveness angered Redditors who seemed to feel that the ethos of "ask me anything" was being violated.

Below are some of Goodell's more notable answers. To see the entire AMA, click here.

Loate asked about "the role of traumatic injury in the NFL, and the dichotomy between making the game safer versus giving the fans the hard hits and satiated bloodlust they so clearly desire."

The game of football has always been tough and always will be. Even before the NFL was founded, President Teddy Roosevelt called the college presidents in to make sure that the safety issues of the game were addressed since there had been 17 deaths in 1905 alone. From there came the first and ten, forward pass and the inception of the NCAA. Since then, the game has flourished while sticking to the fundamentals of fair and competitive football. Our football coaches and executives wanted to bring the game back to the fundamentals of tackling and blocking. We have seen some of the best NFL football in our history during this season's playoffs. Hope we finish with another great one on Sunday.

It was recently reported that Goodell's approval rating among players is just 39%. mrbananagrabber1 asked, "Why do you believe your rating is so low, and are you planning on focusing more on issues important to the players given this news?"

ThaddeusJP asked about overseas expansion for the NFL and whether there's "a long term plan to bring new NFL teams to the rest of the world?"

chronolis asked about last fall's labor dispute with officials and whether the controversial ending to an important game in September was a tipping point for bring back the NFL's regular referees.

We never wanted to have a work stoppage with the officials, but faced with the circumstances of not playing or not being able to improve officiating for the long run, we needed to get an agreement. I regret that it took longer to get an agreement. Eventually, we reached an agreement that allowed us to add full-time officials and a developmental roster of officials that we hope will improve officiating for the long term, which we all want.

Siffilis asked, "Would you consider allowing more extensive touchdown celebrations again?"

Do you think this AMA included too much PR spin, or is it a cool use of social media you'd like to see become more common in the sports world? How honest should an audience expect a public figure to be in an interview like this? Give us your take in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Welcome to this morning's edition of "First To Know," a series in which we keep you in the know on what's happening in the digital world.

Today, we're looking at three particularly interesting stories. Nokia has announced it will be releasing a music streaming service called Nokia Music+ for a subscription price of $3.99. Rumors say Apples set to release a new iPad model  one that could have 128 gigabytes of storage, and Twitter's Vine has taken a not-so-safe-for-work turn after users began to post pornographic videos with the app.

Check out the video above for more on these stories.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Update 1/29: The new Office 2013 is here! Check out our full review.

Microsoft appears to be on the verge of launching the latest version of Office, according to a tweet the official Office Twitter account posted over the weekend. The tweet includes a picture of what Microsoft is setting up in New York City's Bryant Park for launch day, specifying Jan. 29 as the day of the event.

The new version of Office, Office 2013, represents a rethink of the productivity software. Microsoft re-designed Office for Windows 8, changing aspects of the design, features and back end to better suit a world of touchscreens, cloud connectivity and social networks.

Although the new Office is designed for Windows 8 machines, it's not actually a Windows 8 app. Office still runs in the traditional desktop environment, even on Windows RT devices.

Microsoft is also a changing the way it sells Office with the 2013 version. The software is now available via subscription, as opposed to the "pay once, for one machine" approach of the past. When a customer buys Office, they will be able to download it and install it on up to five machines (PCs, Macs or a mix). A subscription entitles multiple users to cloud content (such as continually updated templates), 20GB of SkyDrive storage, 60 minutes of Skype service and updates for new versions of the apps.

For businesses, things work a little differently. While a user can still install the software on up to five devices, the subscription is limited to one user. The business version also has built-in integration with Microsoft's SharePoint, Lync and Exchange services (presumably plans for Yammer are in the works as well).

SEE ALSO: How Microsoft Re-Invented Office for Touch, Social and the Cloud

Pricing for the two versions is as follows: $99.95 a year for consumer, and $149.99 a year for business. Office will still be available as a one-shot download for those who want it, $219.99 for the Home and Business edition and $399.99 for the Professional edition.

With Office 2013, Microsoft is revamping third-party add-ons, renaming them apps and creating an store where developers can share their apps to all Office users. Office apps can even incorporate real-time data, such as a medal tracker Microsoft created for last year's Olympic Games.

We reviewed at the consumer preview of Office 2013 and found it to be a true "21st Century" upgrade for the software. After working with it for a few days, switching back to old versions of Office "felt like I had pulled out a PC from a decade ago."

What about other platforms? While versions of Office for iOS and Android have been rumored for over a year, there's no new information on Office spreading beyond PCs and Macs.

Will you be buying the new Office? Let us know why or why not in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Tumblr's pin feature, which allowed users to literally pin content to the top of every followers dashboard for 24 hours, has been disabled.

The microblog rolled out the feature in late June as a way for users to give their content more emphasis. It cost only $5 a post, a manageable amount that made it attractive to bloggers and major brands alike. Tumblr's $2 highlight feature, which did not move a post to the top of the dashboard but rather let you choose attention-grabbing phrases as you scrolled by, has also disappeared from the Tumblr Dashboard.

The changes come after Tumblr tweaked its Dashboard design Thursday to allow users to post content within the same browser window instead of being directed to another page.

Over the past six months, response to the pin feature has been mostly negative, with people claiming to unfollow users who used the feature. Newsweek made light of the drama in a pinned post on Jan. 16, claiming "You pin, we unfollow." The post collected more than 900 notes and a handful of hilarious responses. Newsweek released the following statement following the troll-like post:

News of the missing pin and highlight feature has caught Tumblr users off guard.

"Tumblr I have credits left over from when I decided to tag that drawing of Erthilo for NO REASON," not-reality blogged. "Let me use them or give me back my measly $8 that I should have left over."

"Really puts a kink in for those of us who had a lot relying on dashboard visibility of pinned-posts," tweeted Ryan Wood.

Tumblr did not respond to a request for comment at press time.

This article originally published at The Daily Dot here
--------------------------------------------------------------
In what appears to be the sign of a coming cyberwar arms race, the Pentagon is reportedly going to shore up its cybersecurity forces to defend critical domestic networks. It also aims to carry out more offensive operations, as reported on Sunday by both the Washington Post and the New York Times.

According to anonymous U.S. officials, the Pentagon has approved a plan  yet to be made official  to expand its Cyber Command, hiring more than 4,000 troops and civilians, a significant increase from the current corps of 900 employees. The intention is to improve defenses over critical cyber-infrastructure at home while boosting the Pentagon's ability to strike abroad, perhaps with cyber attacks like Stuxnet or Flame, which rumors indicated were a joint operation by the U.S. and Israel.

The Cyber Command will reportedly be split in three different arms. "National mission forces" will protect critical infrastructure like the electrical grid and power plants; "combat mission forces" will carry out offensive operations; and "cyber protection forces" will focus on protecting the Pentagon's own computer systems.

The plan raises a series of concerns. For starters, is this a sign of a cyber arms race that's only going to intensify in the future?

"I am a little worried that we are rushing ahead with no clear view how these new weapons can and should be used," Adam Segal, a cybersecurity expert at the Council on Foreign Relations, told Mashable in an email. "Other countries are already developing these capabilities, so it is not as if the U.S. alone creates the situation, but these announcements certainly reinforce the sense that there is a developing arms race in cyberspace."

The decision comes as military officials, as well as members of the administration, continually tout the risk of a "cyber 9/11" or "cyber Pearl Harbor," underscoring the need for the Department of Defense to be prepared for this new aspect of warfare. "The threat is real and we need to react to it," said William J. Lynn III, a former deputy defense secretary who has worked on the Pentagons cybersecurity strategy. Security experts have expressed their doubts about these claims, however, saying the threat has been "exaggerated."

SEE ALSO: Mystery Online Theft Operation 'Red October' Is Winding Down

Another concern is how much the Pentagon should work in conjunction with the National Security Agency, the massive electronic-spying arm of the U.S. government. The NSA's mission, as established in Executive Order 12333 is to collect "foreign intelligence or counterintelligence" while not "acquiring information concerning the domestic activities of United States persons."

It's unclear how the NSA can keep following those guidelines while working more closely with the Pentagon in domestic cybersecurity operations. The NSA "as foreign intelligence gathering apparatus," explains Segal, "has a difficult time legally defending networks within U.S. territory because of privacy concerns." Of course, it wouldn't be the first time the NSA found itself in muddy waters, having to deflect accusations of spying on Americans. Furthermore, the head of the Cyber Command, Gen. Keith Alexander, is also the director of the NSA.

There are also concerns on how the Pentagon will be able to pull off such a large expansion when defense spending is being cut across the board. "Where are they going to get all the people from?" asks Segal. "U.S. Cyber Command already has problems with training and retention. That will be the other big arms race  for talent."

Sean Connelly, a U.S. government contractor who has been working on cybersecurity initiatives for the past eight years, agrees. "My long-term personal concern is to answer how the different government agencies will be able to retain quality cyber talent," he writes in an email to Mashable. "Cyber operations is an area where most every business and industry will require some level of cyber talent to protect themselves. This broad increase in demand of specialized cyber talent will only make it a seller's market for such talent. How will the U.S. government be able to compete with the industry as a whole to maintain a long-term corps of analysts?"
--------------------------------------------------------------
Pinterest announced it's testing a new look among a small group of users to make it easier to find what you're searching for on the site.

The company aims to improve a few key components, such as making navigation more intuitive and faster. Pins will also be bigger and include more image details. The new design also includes a related pins side bar, which may encourage users to stay on the site longer by clicking through to other boards.

Although the updates may be hard to spot for those who are not design enthusiasts, the aesthetic is easier on the eyes with a new gray gradient background behind all pins and the subtle changes will be an improvement for discovering new content on the site.

"Pins are bigger and weve added more information related to pins, so its easier to find things youre interested in," Vy Pham, software engineer at Pinterest, wrote in an official company blog post. "For example, on each pin, youll see pins from the same board, other boards this pin was pinned to, and a whole slew of related pins."

Pinterest says it will be testing the update with a small group of users in the upcoming weeks and will roll out the design once it's ready.

"Our goals with this new look are to make it easier to get around the site and help people get more information about pins they care about," a Pinterest spokesperson told Mashable. "We also made some changes behind the scenes that we hope will make things faster."

SEE ALSO: Pinterest Introduces 'News' Feature to Improve Content Discovery

What do you think of Pinterest's new look?
--------------------------------------------------------------
Pushing a mother's love (and patience) requires two things: a twisted sense of humor and a few Photoshop skills.

Reddit user gutterbaby used both to pull the ultimate prank on her mom.

My mom told me to "behave myself" before leaving for on a short trip out of state. So, I just wrote this fake article about myself and had our neighbor send it to her. I'm very good at testing the limits of her sense of humor.

What's the best prank you've played on your mom? Tell us in the comments.

BONUS: 10 Awesome Pranks to Play On Your Facebook Friends
--------------------------------------------------------------
NFL legend Ray Lewis plays his final game on Sunday, capping off a Hall of Fame career against the San Francisco 49ers in Super Bowl XLVII.

When Lewis announced his impending retirement earlier this month, fellow players, fans and media used Twitter to heap praise upon one of the greatest linebackers of all time and a renowned locker room leader.

But the digital chatter surrounding Lewis more recently hasn't been so rosy, according to data from the social media analysis company Fizziology.

According to Fizziology's findings, Lewis was mentioned more than 63,000 times on Twitter during the week of Jan. 21 through Jan. 27. Eighteen percent of those mentions were negative  and approximately half of those negative comments referenced Lewis' alleged role in a double murder following Super Bowl XXXIV in 2000.

SEE ALSO: NFL Star's Wife Blasts Ray Lewis on Facebook

Two men were stabbed to death during a fight involving Lewis' entourage following the game. Murder charges against Lewis were dropped after he agreed to testify against two friends. Both were later acquitted of murder. Lewis was sentenced to 12 months of probation and the NFL fined him $250,000. The white suit Lewis was wearing the night of the stabbings was never located, prompting conspiracy theories about his role in the killings and possible evidence connected to the outfit.

Interestingly, overall negative sentiment surrounding Lewis in the San Francisco area is slightly higher than the national average but contains fewer murder references, Fizziology says. Just 37% of negative comments there reference the incident, compared to 48% for the nation as a whole.

But in the Cleveland/Akron area  where the two murder victims were from, and home to the Ravens' divisional rival Cleveland Browns  a whopping 71% of negative comments about Lewis contain murder references. 



Thumbnail image courtesy Flickr, Keith Allison
--------------------------------------------------------------
In today's world, not having Facebook is akin to leprosy. Surely something must be wrong with you if you have no social account to show for your life. How will people follow your achievements, your relationships or your weight gain without a social presence to stalk?

The existential crisis of the 21st century has become: "If something happens and you don't put it on Facebook, did it ever happen?" Joking aside, it's true many of us feel that Facebook is the end-all and be-all of socializing; that having no social network is the same as having no friends.

But what our connected world has not taken into account are the several ways in which Facebook can harm our lives, instead of enhancing them. Sure, you can reconnect with lost friends and family, find job opportunities and keep a digital log of your life. But more commonly Facebook has become a dark hole  a place where jealousy and competition breed, where self-worth is defined by a catalogue of carefully tagged pictures and an overall productivity time-suck.

Ultimately, we risk comparing our everyday lives to our online personas, which are often overwhelmingly composed of curated success stories and positive experiences.

SEE ALSO: Facebook in 2013: More Growing Pains Ahead

So why not simply log off? (Even a few Mashable staffers have tried it.) Though it's much easier said than done, willpower comes in stages. Deactivating could be the cold turkey option, but simply reducing time spent on the site could greatly improve your quality of life. Check out the gallery above for some reasons you should consider it.

What do you think about deactivating your account? Have you ever tried it? Share your thoughts in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Its easy to get rattled by a high-stakes job interview  and so, its also not uncommon to experience a certain head-smacking moment right after you walk out the door.

So how can you recover when you think youve blown your chances of landing that new gig? Post-interview damage control is a tricky process  you dont want to destroy whatever polished, poised confidence you did manage to exude during the interview, or point out a flaw your interviewer just might have missed.

If you think some post-interview damage control is in order, its important to plan carefully and really think it through before you go contacting your interviewer in a frenzy. But if youre going to do it, follow these four steps to make sure youre approaching your blunder with grace.

Its perfectly normal to mentally rehash every detail of an interview immediately after that final handshake: Did you remember to smile? Ask questions at the end? Did you really convey that youve been working on your delegation skills, or did you come across as a total control freak?

As you think more and more about each question and answer, theres a good chance youll start dwelling on small mistakes you think you made  like how your voice slightly wavered when you talked about your weaknesses, or that you were too vague about your five-year goals.

In most cases, you can rest assured that these are slip-ups you dont need to address because theyre much more obvious to you than to anyone else, and probably didnt have a significant impact on your interviewer. Plus, theyre mistakes that will look much worse when highlighted to your interviewer the next day than if you just let them go.

Of course, if youre certain that you completely flubbed an answer, or left out some vital information about yourself, proceed to step two: Figure out if theres anything you can do.



Damage control can be risky. Some interviewers will appreciate the extra elaboration on a question you think you botched, but to others, it will simply draw more attention to your mistake. So, its important to pinpoint if the errors from your interview are important enough to bring up again  and if bringing them up is going to help you. To determine if its actually worth doing damage control, you should ask yourself a couple questions:



Was it a Make-or-Break Mistake? Will your mistake (or lack of information) make a significant impact on the interviewers perception of you? Maybe you had a great answer planned out about how your past experience would make you a perfect fit for a business analyst position, but you forgot to mention you also have an interest in social media and would love to help expand the companys online presence. Is this an essential piece of information that may affect the interviewers ultimate decision? Probably not. On the other hand, if youre interviewing for a position in another state and completely forgot to mention that youre OK with relocating, your interviewer was probably left questioning. The same would go for a situation where your level of experience is in question, and you failed to mention a relevant internship you completed. That could ultimately affect the interviewers decision, and damage control is probably worth the risk. Can You Recover By Sharing Additional (Concise) Info? One of the key elements of damage control is being able to recover in a concise manner. If you can convey additional information in a few sentences to clear things upperfect! Youre good to go. If your explanation would require pages of writing or a lengthy phone call, your chances of success fall dramatically. Also, if your recovery sounds mostly like an apology, rather than providing concrete new information ("I cant believe I messed up the multiplication on that problem!")just skip it. If you arent giving your interviewer new information about you as a candidate, addressing the mistake isnt likely to help you.

If, after considering these questions, you determine you have a shortbut absolutely essentialpiece of information to share, move on to your plan of action.



The smoothest way to approach an interview blunder is a short comment (not an apology) in your thank you note. Your follow-up email should only be a paragraph or two, so you dont have much room to explain yourself. Thats why, as we determined above, that you should bring up only the most influential and important mistakes and omissions.

After you thank your interviewer for her time, transition into your additional information: "Since we were talking about my social media experience, I should also mention that as part of my internship at Smith Media, I wrote weekly blog posts and initiated a campaign to boost the companys Facebook followers to over 3,000. This experience, along with the rest of my background, would really allow me to shine as your new Social Media Specialist."

This casual note explains further details that you forgot to mentionbut doesnt outwardly admit to a mistake, as it would if you started with, "Im so sorry, but I completely forgot to mention one of my internships!"

Another good option is to recruit your references to help you recover. As soon as you leave the interview, contact your references and give them an update. They should already be familiar with the position that youre applying for, so you can simply encourage them to mention specific information.

For example, if you think you didnt emphasize your customer service experience enough, ask your former boss to point out specific examples of when you went above and beyond to make a client happy.



The most valuable damage control you can perform is to learn from your blunder and prepare well for your next interview. What was the core cause of your mistake? Did you get nervous and fumble over your answers? Consider enlisting a friend or career counselor to conduct a few practice interviews with you. The more comfortable you become answering interview questions, the less nervous youll be when youre in the real thing.

Maybe you just forgot to mention relevant experience or bring up a certain point that you wanted to bring up. These signs point to a lack of preparation, so before you head into the interview, try writing out a few bullet points of accomplishments and other specific points you want to address. Keep these tucked in your notepad, so that before that final handshake, you can glance down and make sure you covered absolutely everything.

This article originally published at The Muse here
--------------------------------------------------------------
TV news can be an ugly game. The unpredictable element of it  that something bizarre, offensive or scary could happen at any minute  makes it all the more stressful for the reporter.

For the viewer, though, it makes for pretty good television.

Linda Carson of WWSB-TV was just trying to film a quick introduction to the Manatee County Fair in Palmetto, Florida last week. One of the goats next to her, however, wasn't quite in the "interview mood." Watch it for yourself.

SEE ALSO: Somewhere Out There, Local News is Embarrassing Itself

Thankfully, Carson's a great sport about it. The goat on the other hand? What a butt-head.

Tell us in the comments about some of the best news bloopers you've seen.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Online collaboration might be the Republicans' path to victory in 2016, a former member of Mitt Romney's digital staff believes.

Accordingly, he has organized a weekly Twitter chat to help Republican digital staffers foster an atmosphere of partnership following Romney's loss.

That defeat triggered accusations and finger-pointing among some of the right's digital director community, a tense environment which ex-Romney staffer Bill Murphy believes is hurting the party.

"I worked on the Romney campaign and I noticed afterwards there was a lot of  call it disagreement or criticisms  of what the right and Republicans were doing digitally," said Bill Murphy, who organizes the chat, in an interview with Mashable. "I thought it was time we all came together and collaborated and started this discussion of how we can do better and how we can all work together to do better in 2014 and 2016 and beyond."

#Polichat has become a hub for right-leaning digital and social directors to openly discuss and debate online politics.

Topics discussed so far range from messaging strategies to online advertising to the role of big data in modern campaigns. Participants often ask one another questions, helping to generate a cross-party collaboration and, perhaps, heal the post-Romney rift.

It's also used by employees of platforms such as Facebook and Google to pitch their products:

Murphy launched #polichat after he became convinced the right needs to work together to match the left's technological prowess and collaborative environment.

"I think the left has had success with  their culture is a little bit different than ours, we're more politically oriented and we have a campaign operative-type system, the left has a little bit more of a collaborative atmosphere, like an agency you'd see in New York City or out in San Francisco," Murphy said.

Among the most notable players in the chat are representatives from Facebook and Google, former Romney staffers, congressional staffers and other major figures in the Republican digital community.

Notably absent, however, has been former Romney digital director Zac Moffatt, who took a shellacking from some Republicans following Romney's loss. Moffatt has defended himself in a series of blog posts, in which he argues that digital is not a "zero-sum game," but rather his team made real accomplishments of which he's proud.

"There can be a tendency for people to determine that when you lose, there were no successes and that all the ideas were bad," wrote Moffatt. "It is imperative that we as a party understand that we have an opportunity to continue to grow if we fully capitalize on the achievements and time invested over the last two years."

Murphy said he agrees with what Moffatt wrote.

"What I wanted to focus on is our communication with each other," added Murphy. "I think there's a hole that needs to be filled for open discussion, and it doesn't have to be anything overly sensitive online, just to get that discussion started on how we can all work together and build a coordinated effort anywhere from a local county race to a presidential campaign in 2016, I think we all need to come together and work together."

Murphy also runs a website, Polichat.org, which curates the weekly discussion and publishes guest blog posts with deeper dives into the topics discussed in the chats.

What do you think Republicans need to do to be more successful online? Share in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A funny thing is happening on the way to Research In Motions imminent demise  the company is becoming relevant again. Sure, its largely on the strength of a still-non-existent product, but RIM is building Apple-level buzz for BlackBerry 10 and the handset we expect them to deliver on Wednesday.

Did RIM CEO Thorsten Heins know something I didnt when he spoke to me last summer? I remember how confident he sounded, even as he described how the company was restructuring and shedding hundreds of millions of dollars in costs. He spoke of the companys still massive user base (then 80 million service subscribers) and his desire to deliver BlackBerry 10 hardware they could all adopt.

I have to admit, I liked Heins. Hes smart (physics-level smart), affable, and calm. Our conversation, which covered everything from licensing BlackBerry 10 to other hardware manufacturers to selling the corporate jet, did not, however, convince me that RIM had a chance in hell of a comeback.

The market had moved on. All the best handsets were sexy or over-large slab screens, with so few buttons you could count them on one hand. BlackBerry has never delivered a successful, large-screen, keyboardless phone. The Storm, which first arrived almost five years ago, introduced the concept of screen-as-giant-button. It was horrible.

RIMs experience with tablets wasnt much better. The PlayBook was an adroit, mid-sized device with some very big flaws. Heins told me it helped RIM build BlackBerry 10 (which, like the PlayBook, is based on RIMs proprietary QNX operating system). Creating a consumer product that only ends up helping you figure out how to make your next set of offerings better is not a success in my book.

I walked away from the Heins interview with deep respect for the new CEO, but little hope for RIMs future. Heins' plans did not sound bad, but the hurdles appeared too great to surmount.

In the weeks after we spoke, RIMs stock and market value continued to slide, finally bottoming out in late September 2012.

Things started to change in October and November when RIM reportedly began seeding carriers with BlackBerry 10 devices. No consumers had seen the handsets, but the handful of reporters and RIM customers who had were apparently more than pleased.

Since last fall, the company has handed partners and developers over 5,000 BlackBerry 10 devices. Based on early images, the phone looks a bit like a black iPhone, but works nothing like it. The interface is somewhat reminiscent of the original Playbook OS, but appears well-suited to the much smaller screen.

Even though the full details on the device and BlackBerry 10 OS are still under wraps, RIM appears much more interested in getting information out there than all-out secrecy. And thats working to RIMs advantage.

RIMs stock started surging back up. Its still far from its 2008 heights, but its also definitely traveling up the hockey stick handle.

Now, just days away from the launch, the RIM BlackBerry 10 publicity juggernaut is in full swing. In the space of a few weeks, RIM renamed its App World to BlackBerry World, added thousands of apps and promised a Super Bowl ad.

The last item is a huge, likely $3 million-plus, gambit for RIM. Even in its heyday, RIM was never a big consumer brand. Its sweet spot was the enterprise and, as consumer-friendly touch-screen phones like the iPhone rose up, it became even more so. When President Barack Obama entered the White House in 2009, he was carrying a BlackBerry. Most of the people who voted for him likely had iPhones in their pockets while doing so.

Its not just what RIM is doing. Ive noticed the sentiment around the BlackBerry brand has changed, too. People have stopped joking about RIM. Theres an air of anticipation about this weeks unveiling. There are stories about RIMs chance to be the "number three" mobile OS.

Sure, it's RIM's CEO pushing the idea, but I think some people are taking to the idea that RIM and BlackBerry can glide right back into the mobile mix and push aside the finally-gaining-traction Microsoft Windows Phone 8 seriously.

I can only imagine how annoyed Microsoft CEO Steve Ballmer must be right now. Some argue that RIM is in a better position than Microsoft for the No. 3 spot because it already has so many customers. 80 million subscribers is nothing to sneeze at. On the other hand, many of them - in the U.S. at least  are on the BlackBerry Enterprise Service because their companies wont let them off. Another portion is RIMs strong developing nations business. None of this speaks strongly to success in, say, the U.S. consumer market.

Yet, there is that buzz. Its strong and persistent.

Its not the first time weve gotten excited about RIM only to be disappointed. The Storm and PlayBook are two perfect examples. Those were over-promising, under-delivering endeavors.

BlackBerry 10 and all its associated devices must break that mold. If the bits and pieces of information I can find online about it are to be believed, it does.

If thats true, then RIM has a huge opportunity.

Close your eyes with me for a second and image what could happen. RIM runs a thrilling and lauded product launch. Reviewers are ecstatic. Consumers are anxious for access, and Heins announces that BlackBerry 10 phones are already at all your favorite carriers.

That would really be something. It could be the start of one of the biggest comebacks in tech history, as stunning a turnaround as Steve Jobs engineered for Apple in the late 1990s. Admit it, it seems possible now, doesn't it?
--------------------------------------------------------------
People online are accusing Les Misrables actors Anne Hathaway and Hugh Jackman of using jokes from a meme as their own lines during Sunday night's SAG Awards.

"Wolverine is being chased by Gladiator," said the pair, trying to give viewers a modern-day synopsis of the 19th century tale's movie adaptation. "Catwoman gets knocked up and, for some ungodly reason, goes to see Bellatrix Lestrange from Harry Potter and Borat.

"Wolverine agrees to raise Catwoman's baby, and she grows up to star in Mamma Mia."

Oscars 2013  Here are the Nominatons SEE ALSO: And the SAG Awards Go To ...

The humorous description of Les Misrables has been compared to this viral movie review that was posted on Facebook and photo-sharing site imgur in December.

Some people on Twitter had their memories piqued, immediately noticing the similarities:

What do you think? Did the Les Misrables duo rip off the Internet? Or is this just a coincidence? Leave your thoughts below in the comments.

You can watch Hathaway and Jackman recite the Les Misrables synopsis here:

The Screen Actors Guild Awards honors movie and TV performances as voted on by peers.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Hugh Jackman and Anne Hathaway from Les Misrables used their airtime at the SAG Awards to give us a modern-day synopsis of the 19th century tale's movie adaptation.

"Wolverine is being chased by Gladiator; Catwoman gets knocked up and, for some ungodly reason, goes to see Bellatrix Lestrange from Harry Potter and Borat," they said. "And Wolverine agrees to raise Catwoman's baby. And she grows up to star in Mamma Mia."

If that sounds familiar, it's because it resembles a viral Facebook review of the flick.

The Les Misrables bit was among the highlights of Sunday's 19th Screen Actors Guild Awards, which honored motion picture and TV performances as voted on by peers.

Another standout moment was Tina Fey's acceptance speech  for Outstanding Performance by a Female Actor in a Comedy Series  in which she thanked Amy Poehler.

"I've known you since you were pregnant with Lena Dunham (of HBO's Girls)," Fey quipped.

Oscars 2013  Here are the Nominatons SEE ALSO: And the Golden Globes Go To ...

You can watch Fey's speech and other ones below, as well as see the full list of winners.

Outstanding Performance by a Male Actor in a Television Movie or Miniseries

Outstanding Performance by a Female Actor in a Television Movie or Miniseries

Outstanding Performance by an Ensemble in a Drama Series

Outstanding Performance by an Ensemble in a Comedy Series
--------------------------------------------------------------
Sure, we've all seen the likes of Tony Hawk and Dave Mirra do crazy things on skateboards and BMX bikes, but did you know you can do some incredible stunts on a scooter as well?

YouTube user Devin Super Tramp has recently posted a compilation of freestyle scooter stunts, both on the street and in a park, and they can hold their own against the best BMX videos we've seen.

Though scooters aren't an official part of the X Games yet, based on this (and similar) videos, we wouldn't be surprised if they become so in the near future.

How do you like the video? Share your thoughts in the comments!
--------------------------------------------------------------
Last weekend, EA let a large number of players into a closed beta for SimCity, the newest version of the classic city-building sim game loved by millions.

The SimCity beta functioned like an extended demo of the game. Players were first shown a guided tutorial, in which they solved the problems of an already created city, then were permitted an hour to start from scratch on their own creations. After the time was up, players' cities weren't saved, but they could restart again and again.

Although the demo was limited in scope  many of the options for city-building weren't available  players could interact enough to experience the flavor of the world. I can easily say that SimCity is going to be a smash when it comes out, because it makes city-building easy to navigate yet allows for deep dives into your "citizens" day-to-day.

The last iteration of SimCity was released a decade ago, and even before that the game was hardly considered a visual marvel. This SimCity is ready to run on modern PCs, and sets forth a sumptuous visual feast that you'll want to dive into.

Technology called GlassBox powers SimCity's simulations, allowing the game to iterate many small details at once. You can really follow kids as they go to school, criminals as they commit crime or commuters moving around the city. You can peer into homes and figure out what each Sim resident wants  most really seemed to want parks, in my game  and give it to them.

SEE ALSO: Every Sim Has a Life in the New 'SimCity'

The tiny details of the simulation respond to the economic status of your city. Because the beta only gave players the tools to create a blue-color, industrial city, you could see all the effects of that simulation. The houses were smaller, most of my commercial zoning popped up as fast food chains, and my industrial zone included a glue factory.

My biggest problem with the limited time I had in my city was the fact I couldn't spend time just watching life unfold, which you could easily do when you set time to "Turtle's Pace." It's something I very much look forward to exploring more later.

In SimCity's beta tutorial, you must fix the problems of existing city Summer Shoals, the mayor of which has up and skipped town. The protestors outside city hall have pretty reasonable demands: Turn their power back on, stop sewage from flooding their homes, build a new wing on the school so kids don't turn into violent criminals. You'll learn from this tutorial how to read your budget and judge how happy your citizens are, the most important aspects of the game.

But thankfully, the tutorial shows you enough without giving away all the strategy. Once you've been plopped down in your own city, Clearwater, you're given a blank slate and few nudges in the right direction. This couldn't be a better setup; while players do know how to operate the tools in front of them, SimCity avoids handholding by allowing players to revel in the sandboxes of their new city.

However, you'll have to learn from a few cues. Before I'd managed to build a hospital, a building alerted me that someone had gotten sick. The game doesn't require you to stop and build a hospital; it just gives you points of dialog to respond from. You could also ignore that cry for help and focus on other problems, or bulldoze the building with the sick occupant. Like the previous games, it's your city, so you can decide how to run it.

All the tools you'll access are delightfully intuitive. Once I started adding mass transit to my city, I could see the coverage area along all my roads as a green overlay. As soon as I started dropping bus stops around my roads, I could instantly recognize where that coverage increased. You'll also get instant feedback on your citizens' happiness. Once I put in a residential park, the Sims around it sent out a collective cheer by shooting green smiley faces into the air, giving you instant gratification for improving their lives.

While I breezed through the first hour, easily adding more amenities for my citizens, I could see the long-term challenge of balancing happiness with income. It's something I'm looking forward to digging into when the full version releases.

The SimCity beta was far too short, though a rep from EA said the weekend-long event was useful for collecting data and improving the game before its launch on March 5. On Saturday, many players experienced trouble accessing the beta, but the rep assured us those server stress tests would help improve what the players would experience in the live game.

SimCity has also been touted as having a great multiplayer experience, in which several players can cooperate in a region with multiple cities. While the tutorial explained this feature in some detail, it wasn't available to players this weekend.

Also, as mentioned above, the city building options were severely limited. I couldn't provide my town with anything past a grade-school education, which wasn't exactly going to help their job prospects. While this was clearly done in the best interest of helping players manage the time allotted, it would have been nice to attempt a different kind of city.

But my complaint of wanting more time to explore my city is a good sign for SimCity. I can see immense depth and fun potential in just the short amount I played. It will be a long month for those who sampled the beta, while we wait for the game to launch.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Improving your standing amongst gals and pals starts with knowing a few handy life hacks. No one can withstand the charm of someone who can take a beer from tepid to arctic in 10 minutes flat.

YouTube channel Household Hackers continues to enhance your irresistible cleverness with part seven of the "Quick and Simple Life Hacks" series. You'll learn life-improving tricks for toothpaste, broken glass and the aforementioned warm brewskie.

SEE ALSO: 5 YouTube Channels to Learn Amazing Video Effects

And, if you missed the first six installments of life hack wizardry, give them all a watch in the gallery below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Now you can ask Siri to handle picking up tickets to the latest blockbuster.

Apple rolled out iOS 6.1 Monday, adding Siri support for Fandango in the process. After the update iOS users can ask their favorite digital assistant to find movie times for them, ultimately launching the Fandango app on their iPhone, iPad, or iPod touch where they can complete a purchase for tickets.

Fandango tickets are also supported by Passbook, which means at some theaters your phone can also become your ticket inside the theater.

Siris Fandango support was one of several improvements to iOS 6 made Monday. Apple also added 4G LTE support for 36 additional iPhone carriers and 23 more iPad carriers, and the ability for iTunes Match subscribers to download individual songs from iCloud.

The company also added a way to reset your Advertising Identifier, which acts as a control room for informing advertisers about your web activity.

Have you tried out Siri's new Fandango support? Let us know what you think about iOS 6.1 in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
At 8 a.m. my smartphone alarm goes off, nearly jolting me out of bed. It displays a short message: Aim for 30 minutes of exercise today. Craving another hour of sleep, I duck under the covers, but immediately that thought is replaced by another: You know, this app actually has a point. Five minutes later, Im in my sneakers and out the door.

Juice is one of the apps I downloaded as part of my three-week long experiment to see if my smartphone could help me change my bad habits. I wanted to be fitter, more energetic and more social. I also wanted to eat better and stop spacing out on what I wanted to see at the movies.

There was no science to my selections, although they did have to meet some criteria. They had to be new-ish (i.e., launched in the past year), well-received and strike me as intuitive to use. They also had to be cheap because Im on a budget.

After much deliberation and searching around online, I settled on five iOS applications: Bloom, which plays short, inspirational videos; The Eatery, where users share and rate photos of meals; Recall ($2.99), a reminder app for cultural recommendations; Juice, an energy, sleep and nutrition tracker; and Lift, a running log of users daily habits and progress.

Registering for the apps took only a minute at most. Nearly each one, except for Recall, asked for my email, name and Facebook account, the latter of which I havent used for almost a year. (Clearly, these apps believed reaching your goals is a group effort.)

Both Juice and Bloom required setting reminders, which was easy for Juice (9 p.m.) but not so much for Bloom, where every single video required one. Scheduling what time I wanted to Be mindful this morning or Reflect on my achievements seemed counterintuitive, but I went along with it anyway, setting Random reminders for Monday through Thursday.

Next up was Lift, where I picked a few habits from menus grouped into categories like health, relationships and finances. I didnt vow to do anything crazy, just hit the gym and keep up with friends. If I made good on both of those habits, I figured Id check in and write notes like I'd seen other users doing. After setting some notifications for upcoming films I wanted to see in Recall, I got started.

That week I let the apps do their thing, reminding me when to use them and ignoring them when they didnt. But Juice wasnt going down without a fight. The app incessantly bugged me to check in, and by the third day, I was admitting to eating a bagel, feeling generally run down and getting lackluster sleep, due to a noisy radiator.

SEE ALSO: Why Being Young Doesn't Make You a Social Media Expert

Breakfast, meanwhile, became fraught with tension as I snapped one wheat bagel after another, subjecting myself to the instantand displeasedfeedback on The Eatery. According to my Instagram-style feed, 14 people rated my Zaros oat bagel with butter as a solid 52 on a scale of 1 out of 100. I could see my best and worst meals at a glance, including when they were eaten and if Id made progress. My weekly report showed I hadnt.

By now, I was relying on Recall when I visited bookstores and getting accustomed to using Juice nightly. Something else was happening, too. I was starting to regret all those bagels I was eating and dreaded sharing them on The Eatery, where every snapshot came with a side of public shaming. Worse still, Id received a weekly report from Juice that showed my eating, sleeping and energy had all taken a nosedive since last Friday.

Id checked in with Lift a few times, but reminding myself to use the app felt pointless although Ive learned to set reminders since thenand the plain white interface bored me. I also felt lazy when I ignored it, which happened a lot. I asked David Freedman, contributing editor for The Atlantic and author of The Perfected Self, a cover story for the magazine on B.F. Skinner-nodding apps, whether I was wrong to expect more pressure. Skinner, you may recall, was a famous psychologist who said people could "condition" or change their behavior in the right environment.

I think what you've experienced is something that is commonly experienced by anyone who adopts a vaguely Skinnerian program, he said. We've been sort of led to believe this is invasive and leads to unpleasant regimentation, that it's controlling, that it eats into our freedom and we become robots. But on the contrary, these apps are building on how the brain works and taking it on in a useful and advantageous way. When we're reinforced then we end up feeling pretty comfortable with it. But on the other hand, really, this does come down to the execution, and not every app will deliver.

Depending on your level of motivation and personality, some apps will just click better than others. And some are better at nudging, like Juice. Though Juice was annoying at first with all its reminders going day and night, I found myself checking in because I realized it wasnt intrusive at all; it only took a minute or so to use. By Week three, it was part of my daily routine, like taking those morning walks.

The app had other things going for it as well, like not relying on Facebook as The Eatery and Lift seemed to do, although the latter cared less about following friends than the former. Juice was also great at incentivizing hard work: Since I could track when I'd exercised and see how well I ate or slept on those days, I quickly realized the benefit of doing it. If I didn't walk that day, chances are I felt pretty lousy. If I did, I probably slept and ate well.

While Juice was the clear winner of the experiment, Id secretly hoped that Bloom would pan out. The truth was, it didnt alert often enough, and when it did, the videos popped on at inappropriate times, often during nights out. Not that the app knew my schedule, but Freedman noted it could have. Behavioral apps have gotten to the point where they can recognize patterns, such as what sends you on a cookie bender or when youre watching TV.

You can design an app so that most people, or at least many people, will really take advantage of [how we think and live] and benefit from it, and [the app] will prompt you for doing the right things and that's something you'll adapt to, he said.

If you've yet to have that experience, dont despair. Theres probably an app out there for you somewhere. All it takes is some trial and error, and not getting discouraged when it doesn't work out. It took me five apps, three weeks and a lot of groggy mornings to do it, but I found an app Ill keep for awhile.

Images courtesy of Juice, Bloom, The Eatery, Recall and Lift
--------------------------------------------------------------
Saturday Night Live's ode to the YOLO meme has taken iTunes by storm, catapulting the song to number one on the Top 10 Comedy Songs charts in the United States and Canada.

The Lonely Island tune  named "YOLO" in honor of the popular catchphrase that stands for "you only live once"  features recent SNL host Adam Levine and musical guest Kendrick Lamar. The song costs $1.29 on iTunes.

On YouTube, "YOLO" has racked up more than 3.6 million views. Give it a listen above.





 



Thumbnail image courtesy SEE ALSO: Justin Bieber Will Host and Perform on 'SNL' in February Thumbnail image courtesy The Lonely Island via YouTube
--------------------------------------------------------------
Social music service Soundrop launched its "listening room" app on Facebook on Monday, allowing fans and users to share the audio experience.

The Norway-based company lets users create and embed a Soundrop room on Facebook pages, where people can listen to tracks or watch videos while chatting with other fans. Listeners can vote on what song they want to hear next from a preset playlist streamed from YouTube or VEVO.

Soundrop rose in popularity when it first launched its app on music streaming service Spotify in 2011. Its founders believe "...music sounds better with friends" and look to help artists engage their fanbase while simultaneously accelerating video traffic.

Last year the service streamed more than 500 million tracks on Spotify, but adding video is a new feature unique to Facebook pages.

SEE ALSO: The 20 Weirdest Things on Spotify

"Were excited to make Soundrop available in the main place where artists connect with their fans," Soundrop CEO Inge Andre Sandvik said in a statement.

Playback and chatting occurs in real time and the rooms sync across all platforms, which means any conversations going on in a specific Spotify room are the exact same on its Facebook page.

Aside from bringing the typical music-sharing experience online, the app lets artists chat live in listening rooms. Musicians like Matisyahu and Owl City are set to answer questions on their Facebook pages in the coming weeks. Check out Matisyahu's page here to see Soundrop in action.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Nobody likes the spinning pinwheel, the rainbow wheel or the Beach Ball of Death. Whatever you call it, you know its not a good sign.

Luckily there are simple steps you can take to speed up old reliable, regardless of his age  and most are built right into your Mac.

Your device needs breathing room to function properly. Go to About this Mac > More Info > Storage to see how many GB are free and to access a color-coded picture of the files using the most space. (A free utility like Disk Inventory X is a second option.) Find out if photos, audio, movies or apps are your main culprit, then decide where to go from there.

SEE ALSO: 5 Easy Ways to Speed Up Your PC

If photos are a problem, consider transferring old images to a USB or external hard drive, or burning them to a disk. Another helpful tip? Visit your iPhotos trash. Just because you deleted a few pics from iPhoto doesnt mean theyre gone. The application has its own bin that needs to be emptied; you might find 500 pictures just waiting to be purged from your hard drive.

Finally, under About this Mac > Overview, youll find a Software Update button. It never hurts to double check that youre up to date.

Dont get frustrated the next time your fan powers up and that pesky beach ball starts spinning. Theres a quick way to diagnose the problem using Apples Activity Monitor. Find it under Applications > Utilities > Activity Monitor.

If youre unsure how to understand the Activity Monitor, read this walkthrough from Apple. In short, each application and background process needed to run your computer uses a percentage of your computers CPU (central processing unit). You can also see how much memory each application requires.

Click % CPU once or twice to organize the list in descending order. If something is running above 90%, its a recognizable program and it doesnt say root under the user column, close it down immediately by clicking Quit Process.

Consider adding the Activity Monitor icon to your dock. Click and hold, then select Show CPU Usage under Dock Icon. Now you can monitor your activity at all times.

One more check: Click the Disk Usage tab at the bottom of the Activity Monitor. If Space Free (the neon green color) is getting too narrow in the pie chart, you should probably clear even more photos and videos off your hard drive.

For a quicker power up, go to System Preferences > Users & Groups > Login Items. See which boxes are checked; these are the applications that boot up every time you start up. If you dont need them to do so, uncheck them.

Once youre booted up, take a look at your desktop. If its filled with hundreds of icons, youve got some explaining to do. Stop saving things to your desktop. At the very least, organize your files into folders. But for best results, clean it up completely.

For any new Mac users out there, be sure to properly close programs. Simply exiting an application or browser does not stop it from running in the background. It basically just minimizes the program. (You can tell if an application is still running by the glowing marker beneath it in your dock.) If its a complicated program like Photoshop, you can bet its slowing you down. Visit the item on your dock, click and hold, then select quit.

When it comes to language files, Apple is more than generous. Sure, its tempting to keep all those interesting files on your computer just in case, but Hrvatski, Svenska, Magyar and Suomi are taking up too much space. Chances are one is enough for you. Download the free app Monolingual to get rid of these unused files.

The genie effect is a signature Apple move that applies when you minimize windows, for example. But its an unnecessary one. Get rid of animations like these and your windows will open and minimize much faster. Go to System Preferences > Dock and change the Minimize windows using selection from Genie effect to Scale effect. Then uncheck the Animate opening applications box. This window is where you can turn the magnification of your dock on and off, as well.

Have you successfully sped up your Mac by eliminating waste and improving productivity? Share your advice and tips in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
So the two-minute teaser trailer heralding J.J. Abrams' second Star Trek movie, Into Darkness, wasn't enough for you? Is the wait for the movie (which comes out in May) driving you insane?

We feel you. And so does Star Trek fan Dustin McLean, who just released a stunning, no-budget, shot-for-shot remake of the trailer. It was shot entirely on an iPhone, in what appears to be McLean's apartment and a hair salon, without any of that pesky CGI getting in the way of its pure awesomeness. Check it out:

And here's a side-by-side comparison with the original. Note the precision timing:

This isn't the first time McLean, a Pasadena-based filmmaker, has entered the genre of shot-by-shot movie trailer remakes using his iPhone. Here's his shot-by-shot iPhone remake of the second Man of Steel trailer, which has racked up an impressive 100,000 YouTube views in a month.

Do charming iPhone remake videos like these have a future, or do you get the joke after one? Give us your take in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
If you're one of the lucky ones headed to Mercedes-Benz Superdome in New Orleans, La., for Super Bowl XLVII, we wish you a great trip.

For the rest of us who will be watching the big game at home, it turns out we're in good company. Century 21 Real Estate surveyed close to 3,000 people about the big game and found an overwhelming majority (88%) think home is the best place to be on game day along with, of course, good friends, good food and a big screen television.

Century 21, an advertiser in this year's Super Bowl, looked at the habits and likes of stay-at-home viewers and found men say they like "being able to control instant replay with the DVR" as a reason to watch the game at home. Men are 4% more likely than women to cite that as a reason to stay home.

SEE ALSO: Which Super Bowl Ads Get Shared the Most?

It's all about big screens too. 52% of U.S. adults said the TV (size and resolution) is key in throwing a successful Super Bowl watching party. So are awesome snack foods like chips and dip and hot dogs, with 72% of respondent saying food and drink are among the most important factors in a successful Big Game party.

The infographic below shows just how critical staying connected is on game day. Of those who plan to watch, 36% say they'll use a second screen to supplement the game-viewing experience. They'll be checking sports news apps on their phone or tablet for breaking, behind-the-scene commentary. And 52% say they'll use social media during the game. They'll be talking about the game and  what else  the commercials.

What do you think makes for a good Super Bowl party? Will you be using a second screen to follow along with the game? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Last week, the single "Thrift Shop" by Seattle rap duo Macklemore & Ryan Lewis climbed to the top of the Billboard Hot 100 chart. Dominating the U.S. music rankings is a hefty accomplishment on its own, but when you consider that Macklemore and Lewis are not yet signed to a label, their achievement takes on a whole new meaning.

This isn't the first time that an artist has topped the charts without the strength of a major label behind him. For this week's Music Monday, we decided to look back on the past few decades of top hits. Amidst the domination of the charts by the likes of Madonna, Mariah Carey and the Black Eyed Peas, we found a few underdogs who had major Billboard hits.

Remember when Lisa Loeb took over the airwaves in the early 90s? Or when Kate Bush and Sublime, artists with sizable but more cultish followings, finally found mainstream success? Our playlist also reflects how being featured in an Apple commercial helped "Jerk It Out" and "Feel Good Inc" get commercial play, and how an appearance on the soundtrack of television phenomenon The O.C. made Imogen Heap a household name.

After 2005, YouTube changed the music game forever. Artists like Soulja Boy and Gotye can thank the Internet for their fame. Our playlist also includes some songs that we're still surprised were huge hits (we're looking at you, Sir Mix-A-Lot).

What songs make your list of underdogs who broke onto the Billboard charts? Share them with us and we'll add a few to our playlist.

Here's how you can share your favorite unexpected hits with us:
--------------------------------------------------------------
Oxygen plans to air sneak peeks of The Face in a Google+ Hangout ahead of the modeling competition show's Feb. 12 premiere. Host Nigel Barker and supermodel coaches Naomi Campbell, Karolina Kurkova and Coco Rocha will participate in the Q&A hangout.

The hangout starts Feb. 6 at 8 p.m. ET, but people can RSVP now.

"Because our audience of diverse women is intensely social  we're actually the third most social network in the unscripted space  we generate tremendous return by engaging with our fans on these platforms," Harleen Kahlon, SVP of digital at Oxygen Media, told Mashable.

Hosted by DailyCandy's SuChinPak, the hangout will also feature bloggers from Hollywood Life, Entertainment Weekly, Bossip and Buzzfeed, who will help steer discussions.

SEE ALSO: FBI Teams Up With 'White Collar' to Get Viewers to Solve Real Crimes

The show's contestants are competing to become the face of a national brand.

Oxygen will use Facebook, Twitter, Tumblr, Google+ and Pinterest to engage with viewers, while Barker and the supermodel coaches will use Twitter to interact with fans.

"The Google+ Hangout is indicative of our increasing emphasis on interactivity," Kahlon said.

Campbell specifically joined Twitter in August 2012 in preparation for The Face. And among Oxygen's digital initiatives for the show was The Face Challenge, a video contest in which people can win a photo shoot with Barker.
--------------------------------------------------------------
While seat-kicking and talking in a theater will likely incite the ire of fellow seatmates, using your smartphone may soon lose its taboo status.

The Providence Performing Arts Center in Providence, R.I. has designated a section of its theater for "tweet seats" since last spring. Located in the back two rows to avoid distracting patrons, the seats are free for those who promise to live-tweet a performance, marketing-project coordinator Caitlyn DiPompo told Mashable.

"We do place participants under strict guidelines and ask them to remain discreet while they are tweeting," she said via email.

One theatergoer, Sarah Bertness, live-tweeted a Dec. 4 showing of Memphis. Tweeting with the hashtag #MemphisPPAC, Bertness commented on the set design, costumes and music, among other topics.

The center previously advertised for "avid tweeters" with a following to apply for its tweet seats.

SEE ALSO: Theater Enlists Ninjas to Shush Obnoxious Moviegoers [VIDEO]

"Tweet seats," which initially started as a Broadway League initiative, are a growing trend in the arts community, with Connecticut's Norma Terris Theater, Raleigh's Carolina Ballet, the Indianapolis Symphony, the Cincinnati Symphony Orchestra and the Dayton Opera setting aside seats for visitors who want to live-tweet performances.

For the Providence Performing Arts Center and many other theaters, the special seats aim to engage theatergoers on social media, and build extra excitement for shows, DiPompo said.

Still, this embrace of Twitter remains controversial, as some say it distracts from performances.

"We feel strongly that the experience that an audience member has in our theater should be limited to what they are seeing on the stage," Rebecca Curtiss, spokesperson for Boston's Huntington Theatre, told the AP. "When the lights go down and the show begins, we want the art on stage to speak for itself."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Slightly more than 80% of government and law enforcement agency requests for Twitter user data issued in the latter half of last year came without a warrant, the company said Monday.

During that period, search warrants comprised "19% of all requests received from U.S. law enforcement," according to Twitter's second Transparency Report. Warrants are required by Twitter for access to actual communications, such as tweets and Direct Messages. They need probable cause and a judge's signature to be issued.

The majority of data requests  60%  came to Twitter in the form of subpoenas, which typically don't require a warrant and request basic user information, such as IP and email addresses.

Eleven percent were court orders, which are signed by a judge but aren't as powerful as search warrants. The final 10% are requests that don't fall in the other categories, such as emergency requests issued when a person's life may be at stake.

SEE ALSO: Here's What Google Does When the Government Wants Your Emails

In total, Twitter received 815 requests for user data from U.S. government and law enforcement agencies during the second half of 2012, up from 679 in the first half of last year. The company handed over at least some user data 69% of the time, down from 75% in the first half of 2012.

Twitter received two U.S. government or law enforcement requests for the outright removal of content in the second half of 2012, up from zero in the first half of the year. It complied with neither request.

When Twitter receives a request for user data, company policy is to notify the targeted users when it's able, so they might contact legal help or take other steps. Twitter notified users targeted by a data request 24% of the time in the last half of 2012.

What's keeping that number from reaching 100%? Twenty percent of U.S. requests were issued "under seal," meaning they needed to be kept private to protect an ongoing investigation or for other reasons. In other cases, requests were withdrawn, they didn't meet legal or Twitter policy benchmarks or they were an emergency disclosure.

The Electronic Communications Privacy Act (ECPA) says that police only need a warrant for emails and other electronic communications, including tweets, for messages less than six months old. Twitter and other companies consider all messages protected by the Fourth Amendment, which bars unreasonable searches and seizures.

Senator Patrick Leahy (D-Vt.) has been working towards reforming the ECPA's rule to require a warrant for all electronic communications.

Globally, Twitter received 1,009 data requests targeting 1,433 accounts from government and law enforcement in the second half of 2012, up from 849 in the first half of the year. It complied at least partially with 57% of global requests in the latter half of the year, down from 63% in the first half of the year.

Twitter received 42 content removal requests from governments around the world in the second half of 2012, up from six in the first half of the year. The company at least partially complied with 5% of those requests, withholding one account and 44 tweets.

Twitter's second transparency report came packaged alongside a new portal for transparency data: transparency.twitter.com. Google released its latest transparency report last week.

Is it a good idea for Twitter to be open with user data and takedown requests? Share your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Presidential Inauguration Committee worked with Twitter monitoring firm Dataminr to detect potential security threats during President Barack Obama's inauguration ceremony last week, Mashable has learned.

Dataminr's team discovered one such potential problem  an entrance gate that was unexpectedly closed  and notified the Presidential Inauguration Committee ten minutes before it got word of the situation from more conventional means.

"They were able to use that warning to actually take action and preempt the situation before it escalated," said Dataminr CEO Ted Bailey in an interview with Mashable. "The situation was there was a sudden gate closure and there was the start of a Twitter reaction to it, and although I don't know the specific details of how they changed that situation, what they have confirmed to me is that they used this warning to actually effect change on the situation and mitigate risk."

Dataminr, which has access to Twitter's firehose, monitors Twitter activity in a pre-determined geographic area  in the case of the inauguration, that was the National Mall, the parade route and other parts of Washington, D.C.

Dataminr gets some location data from geotagged tweets, but it also looks for contextual clues such as keywords ("National Mall") or Foursquare check-ins. Location aside, Dataminr does not rely on pre-selected content parameters, instead adapting to situations as they develop.

"The key to our event detection technology, which is a very unique approach to looking at the [Twitter] firehose, is that one doesn't need to actually make a choice up front about the particular keywords or scenarios that may be of interest in a particular situation, like Washington on Inauguration Day," said Bailey. "What we do is look at a number of different factors across the firehose of tweets from that area and we factor in geo-proximity of tweets, propagation of patterns and a wide variety of other data."

Bailey was careful not to give away his company's "secret sauce." Dataminr also cannot reveal statistics on the percentage of people who geo-tag their tweets.

Since Dataminr's founding in 2009, the company's primary focus has been on the financial sector  major hedge funds and banks use its technology to detect market-moving information before it makes headlines. It has since expanded into the government and media arenas.

Dataminr was only recently allowed to discuss its involvement with the inauguration, which Bailey said is an unusual but welcome decision.

"It's a great example of Twitter data being used in a practical, real-world use case in a government context and the system obviously working at its best," Bailey said. "I think it's highly rare for government entities to allow things like this to be used as a case study, so we're really excited the Presidential Inauguration Committee green-lighted this and I think it's a very unusual and fascinating story."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Brands are going beyond just experimenting with Vines to using them as actual ads on Twitter.

Wheat Thins, GE and candy brand Red Vines have all run Promoted Tweets with Vine videos attached. In Wheat Thins' case, the brand spelled out the hashtag "musthavewheatthins" in Wheat Thins. The hashtag ties in with a pre-game Super Bowl spot the brand has purchased.

GE's is the creation of a pen rendering of its logo:

Red Vines, meanwhile, ran the Vine it created on Friday shortly after Twitter announced the platform:

Though it's early days for the ad, it's easy to see how the 6-second format could become a new standard for video ads, the way the 30-second ad has for TV.
--------------------------------------------------------------
We all know the business case for doing user experience (UX) work: Investing upfront in making products easy to use really pays off. It reduces project risk, cost, and time while improving, efficiency, effectiveness, and end user satisfaction.

(Dont know the business case? Read this or this. Or this.) But what if youre investing in UX and not getting results?

There can be many factors behind an under-performing user experience effort. First, rule out the obvious: Your UX folks are jerks, they dont communicate well, they dont understand business, they arent team players, they have such terrible body odor people stay 10 feet away 

Next, look at your organization. The following list is based on observations accumulated over my years as a UX professional. These are some common organizational behavior patterns that can make even the best UX efforts ineffective.

User experience design is getting a lot of attention lately, and UX is a buzzword many want to add to their resumes. But the field has been around for several years (although under different names) and is fairly mature. Until a person has done full-time UX worknot as an aspect of their job, but as their jobfor at least two or three years, they are generally not at a professional level.

He displays a high level of empathy, excellent communication skills and lots of curiosity. She doesnt design based on personal preference or opinion, and will try to make sure you dont either. She bases her design decisions on user research, heuristics, test data and UI design patterns. He is not attached to his designs. In fact, he starts with sketches and wireframes and happily crumples up multiple iterations before progressing to a detailed level of design. She starts with concept, structure, and information design before progressing to interaction and visual design. If the first thing she shows you looks like it could be the final product, shes probably not a UX pro. He is very interested in measurable success metrics and uses them to drive design direction and test protocol. If he speaks of making something easy, but cant say how hell measure how easy it is, hes not a UX pro.

Youve kicked off a solid UX pro or team and an exciting project  that's great! But sometimes the very organization that values UX and hires us to do UX work is also the biggest impediment to a UX teams success. Here are some rules of engagement that will enable UX teams to do their best work.

They really do need to talk with and observe end-users before the design is finished. This is the underpinning of what UX does. Give them reasonable and timely access to end-users. Dont provide subject-matter experts in place of users. Your team will tell you theyre not appropriate substitutes, and they will be right. Give designers the authority (within technical constraints) on design decisions and researchers authority on test protocol and data interpretation. Never design by committee. Its a quick way to degrade a design. Youve hired your team to make a successful product. Be ready to make design changessometimes big onesfollowing user research and usability testing. The more usability recommendations are declined, the poorer quality the products user experience will be. Dont nibble the design to death. Making a series of minor changes here and there, or picking and choosing which aspects of a design to keep or omit almost always creates new usability issues. Clearly define roles and responsibilities for all team members at the beginning of project work.

User experience work touches almost every aspect of an application or web project. Your UX resources will need regular check-ins with a multi-disciplinary team. At the very least, a development resource must be available to vet designs for technical feasibility and a business resource needs to make sure youre aligned with their goals.

The risk of not having a technical resource aware of the design direction from the beginning is that time gets wasted working on a design that the coders cant build. The risk of not having a business resource communicating with the UX team is that your design will not meet business needs, making it a waste of time and effort.

SEE ALSO: Breaking Down Silos

Even with a UX team ultimately responsible for designing your product, many other groups contribute to the final user experience. Establishing a shared vision across all the groups involved in a project encourages effective teamworka coordinated effort is far more likely to lead to a great design.

Tragically, many people view UX work as something that is done after coding to make it look good. They couldnt be more wrong. We not-so-secretly call this putting lipstick on a pig."

The best time to bring in your UX team is at the initiation phase of the project lifecycle. The role of UX at this stage is to help define requirements and structural design based on user needs. This is where we have the biggest impact.

Because user experience pros follow a methodology called user-centered design, they need to stay consistently ahead of the development team. For product design to be user-centered, the design should be iterated and validated before its coded.

Have you observed other reasons UX teams might fall short? Please share your own experiences and thoughts in the comments below.

This article originally published at UX Magazine here
--------------------------------------------------------------
It's not often you see a sports clip hovering near the top of Reddit's front page, but that's exactly what the hilarious video above did after hitting the web on Monday.

It reportedly comes from the Russian Basketball League and shows a coach who's tremendously adept at thinking on his feet. Check it out for yourself and let us know what you think in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Twitter-backed video serviceVinehas unleashed a new storytelling format, giving users an opportunity to create short clips of video art.Because of the way the app captures videos (tap to capture, release to end the take) it removes the need for editing and allows users to quickly create stop-motion and disjointed-reality videos.

SEE ALSO: Vine Mania! 10 Creative Vines on Twitter

Some of the best Vines we've seen have been true works of art. Now, we want you to go beyond capturing daily life, and challenge yourself to get creative! Create your best artistic Vine and tweet it with hashtag#VineArt.Show us a stunning moving image or gripping short visual story. Your Vine may be featured in a follow-up story on Mashable. Here are some examples to inspire you:

Image composite by Mashable; photos by Emily Price and iStockphoto ALEAIMAGE
--------------------------------------------------------------
Want to turn your Vine video clips into an animated GIF? A new Mac app makes it a snap.

Over the weekend, Twitter engineer Esten Hurtle created VineGifR, a simple Mac app that turns a Vine URL into an animated GIF file.

The app  which is still in its early stages  is incredibly easy to use. Just open it up, paste in a Vine URL and select the file name and where you want to save your GIF.

Once you do that, the finished product looks like this:

Right now, the output size for a 6-second video GIF is a bit large at about 2MB per file, but Hurtle says he'll look at ways to reduce the file size so this can be used on sites such as Imgur.

This is only Hurtle's second ever Mac app, which makes the fact that this works so much cooler.

You can download the pre-built binary from Hurtle's website or follow the progress on Github.

As we said, the app is still developing, but we're totally impressed with the results.

Graphic courtesy of Vine and Apple, composite by Mashable/Charlie White
--------------------------------------------------------------
Twitter has apologized for highlighting porn Monday morning in the "Editors' Picks" category of its video-sharing app Vine, citing a "human error."

The app  which launched last week and allows users to create and share six-second GIF-like looping videos  featured a not-safe-for-work video as an Editors' Pick before it was promptly removed. Editors' Picks are hand-selected by staff to display the most creative and interesting videos posted to the app.

"A human error resulted in a video with adult content becoming one of the videos in Editor's Picks, and upon realizing this mistake we removed the video immediately," a Twitter spokesperson told Mashable. "We apologize to our users for the error."

Many Vine users posted comments to the video, expressing disappointment and threatening to delete the app.

Over the weekend, users started to notice that videos saved via the Vine app with hashtags such as #porn and #sex revealed graphic videos, many of which had a warning that the following content contained sensitive content.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The premise of the spot is that a sunny non-Jamaican white guy is infused with the happy-go-lucky spirit of Jamaica. Despite skepticism from his colleagues ("You're from Minnesota, right?" one asks), he eventually wins some over, including the boss.

The ad follows 2011's hugely successful (56 million views and counting) Super Bowl spot "The Force," and 2012's moderately successful (16 million views) ad, "The Dog Strikes Back."

Though last year's ad continued the Star Wars theme of "The Force," VW has now abandoned it. The latest ad, which was teased with another video last week, is in keeping with a shift in marketing strategy last September that focused on emotion and fans' stories.

What do you think? Has VW done it again or are you disappointed with the new spot?

Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A lot of research and development goes into the clothing you throw on every morning before shuffling out into the cold. Imagine a constant, molecular battle fighting to keep the elements away from your body, whether you're scaling an icy cliff or departing for work at daybreak.

SEE ALSO: Would You Wear Internet-Connected Clothing?

Some technological advances in cold weather protection allow for maximum breathability across multiple layers, while other fabrics can literally harness your perspiration and generate heat. Or just take your bed with you everywhere in the form of a sleeping bag bodysuit.

Check out some example of cool wearable tech. Do you own any of these items? What's your most reliable wintertime gear? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Hungry? Try filling your belly with cat hair  tasty, yummy cat hair.

TLC's My Strange Addiction introduces Lisa, a 43-year-old woman from Detroit who eats cat hair and licks her feline like a fuzzy lollipop. Lisa is so hooked on the fuzz balls of deliciousness that she has to pop one in her mouth every two hours. She likened the taste to cotton balls and claims cat hair has a weaker taste than human hair (maybe the blonde roast of tresses?).

SEE ALSO: 5 Kids Who Will Never Like Cats

Lisa claims that grooming her cat with her tongue is a bonding experience and she points out that she doesn't lick the cat's paws or butt. See, it's not that weird, people.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Yahoo had a strong fourth quarter, but its display advertising business is heading in the wrong direction.

Yahoo reported earnings per share of $0.32 on revenue of $1.22 billion for the December quarter, beating Wall Street's estimates of an EPS of $0.28 on revenue of $1.21 billion. That beat was enough to send Yahoo's stock price up by as much as 5% in after-hours trading.

However, the earnings report showed some troubling signs for the company's advertising business. Yahoo's display ad revenue minus traffic acquisition costs was $520 million, a 5% decline from the same quarter in 2011. Likewise, the number of ads Yahoo sold declined by a whopping 10% year-over-year.

Some of this was offset by the strength of the company in search. In the fourth quarter, search revenue minus traffic acquisition costs shot up by 14% year-over-year to $376 million and the number of paid clicks increased by about 11%.

The earnings report comes at a time when analysts and investors are waiting for signs of whether the company's new CEO Marissa Mayer is succeeding at turning things around. Since taking over in July, Mayer has taken some small but significant steps to change the company's culture and strategy. She has signed distribution deals with NBC and CBS, acquired two mobile app developers and pushed for redesigns of Yahoo Mail and Flickr  not to mention giving employees free lunches and free iPhones.

Mayer's broad strategy for the company  as laid out in a recent interview with Bloomberg  is to make Yahoo more a part of peoples' daily mobile routines. Wall Street, for its part, has responded by sending Yahoo 's stock above $20 a share for the first time since 2009.

While Mayer and Yahoo deserve credit for boosting search revenue and increasing overall revenue year-over-year for the first time in four years, her challenge going forward will be to find a way to reverse the trend of declining display ads. Until that happens, it can't really be considered a turnaround.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Is putting your Super Bowl ad on YouTube before the big game a good idea? It is if you want to get more views for your video. According to YouTube's research, ads that ran online before the Super Bowl last year got 9 million views, in average. Those that waited? 1.3 million.

The six-fold difference explains why there has been an onrush of 2013 Super Bowl videos on YouTube already. On Monday alone, Volkswagen, Audi, Century 21 and Axe dropped their Super Bowl spots on YouTube. According to YouTube, 34 of last year's ads were online before last year's game and 20 were withheld until broadcast. In 2011, about a dozen brands put their complete ads online, including VW, whose "The Force" ad became the most-shared ad of all time.

Not everyone is taking part in the trend of dumping their ads online before the game, though. Holdouts include Best Buy, RIM, Chrysler and Procter & Gamble's Tide. Chris Lillich, associate marketing director for North America laundry at P&G, told the New York Times that running ads in advance is "certainly a valid strategy... [but] we think doing the big reveal in the game is going to do the best for us.

Nevertheless, Nielsen data from 2012 show that revealing ads beforehand did not hurt their impact. The best-remembered Super Bowl ad of 2012, for instance, was Doritos' "Sling Baby," which was available online well before the game. However, number two on the list, M&M's "Sexy and I Know It," was not shared before the game.

Another argument for putting ads out early is that YouTube is a bigger venue than the Super Bowl. While last year's game attracted 111 million viewers, the 2012 Super Bowl ads have been viewed online more than 300 million times.

"Thats data to back up online audience has really eclipsed the TV audience," says Suzie Reider, head of industry development at YouTube. Reider added that while holding back Chrysler's Clint Eastwood ad before the game may have resulted in a bigger wow factor during the game, other marketers may have benefited more from posting their ads early. "Yes, the Clint Eastwood spot made a big splash the day of," she said. "But if you're a marketer interested in impact of entire campaign... it's not just about the glory of the ad on that one day."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Remember when Teddy used to keep you safe from the monsters under your bed? That brown fluffy fellow was your best friend, your compadre, your confidant. Until one day, he got bit by a zombie and wanted to rip your guts out.

Nightmares to ensue, children and the faint of heart look away.

These undead bears from Etsy merchant UnDeadTeds have no promises of protecting you and may or may not ravage the rest of your toy box. So arm Barbie with wooden stakes (or toothpicks), and set up G.I. Joe on the front lines of the playroom.

SEE ALSO: 'Warm Bodies' Actor Teaches You How To Be a Zombie

And while these blood-soaked, stuffing-un-done bears may look gruesome, just remember that we all need some lovin', so look into getting a Chuckie doll as your zombie's newest pal.

If you were never the biggest fan of toys of the gruesome nature, you can send this UnDeadTeds to any of your childhood BFFs to infect them with the zombie virus.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Ben & Jerry's will introduce a new ice cream flavor concocted with NBC's 30 Rock in mind on Thursday during a finale party for the show in New York City and across social media.

The comedy series ends its seven-season run Jan 31, but it will apparently live on through Ben & Jerry's mystery flavor, which the company is teasing on Facebook and Twitter.

SEE ALSO: '30 Rock' Fans Mark Final Season With Celebrity High-Five Challenge

On Facebook, people are attempting to predict the name of the flavor with such guesses as 30 Rocky Road, Liz Lemon Meringue, Tracey Jordan Almond and even Liz Lemon and Jenna Maloney Boloney Do-negy Nut Cluster. What flavor would you like to see announced?

Ben & Jerry's NYC party will mark the first time the public gets to try the 30 Rock flavor.

"It's the last episode, and the first tasting  a poetic changing of the guards," Ben & Jerry's says in the invite. Guests are encouraged to dress as 30 Rock characters.

The company will also reveal the flavor on Facebook and Twitter during the finale.

NBC previously inspired a flavor with a Saturday Night Live skit. The name: Schweddy Balls.
--------------------------------------------------------------
What the what? 30 Rock is leaving our televisions  shut it down. Shut. It. Down. Blerg!

After seven years of laughs and Lizbianism, audiences will wave goodbye to the TGS crew like that one scene in the The Sound of Music  only with more night cheese.

SEE ALSO: '30 Rock' Inspires New Ben & Jerry's Ice Cream Flavor

A proper 30 Rock send-off requires GIFs, pics and more GIFs. So that's what we're giving you  50 of the most memorable 30 Rock GIFs and pics. And, just because we like you, there's also a bonus gallery of 30 clips from the show.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The official 500px iOS app is back in the App Store.

Apple kicked the app out of the App Store last week, citing concerns that it was too easy for end-users to find nudity within the app. The removal highlighted some of the review inequalities that still plague the App Store nearly five years into its run.

We spoke to Evgeny Tchebotarev, 500px co-founder and COO, about the removal process and the changes the 500px team needed to make to get the app back in Apple's good graces.

Originally, the app was pulled from the App Store was because Apple said it was too easy for regular users to browse for nude images. Like many other apps with photo communities, including Tumblr and Flickr, some of the photographers who use 500px take photographs that contain nudity  not pornographic images, but nudity nonetheless.

Tchebotarev made some changes to the app to make it harder to find nude images.

The company also had to change the rating on its app. The old rating was 4+, which indicated it was fit for all users. While the company initially asked for a 12+ content rating  the same rating Flickr has  Apple asked the company to make the rating 17 and up.

Tchebotarev wasn't happy about having to make that change, telling Mashable "it's not an accurate statement for our app and for new users, it could turn them off if they think the app has content it doesn't have," but the team went along with the change because it wanted to get the app back in the store as soon as possible.

On Friday, Apple reached out again, asking 500px to add a "report" feature to the app for offensive or pornographic content. The 500px website already has this feature and according to Tchebotarev, most offensive material is flagged by its community soon after upload.

Nevertheless, the company made the change to the app. Every image on 500px's iOS apps now have a "report" option. Tchebotarev said that adding the report feature to the app was already on the roadmap but was expedited to meet Apple's request.

Tchebotarev is relieved the app is back in the App Store. "We're really glad we can continue a good working relationship with Apple," he said. "They are such a big company, not having them as a partner can really make or break a startup and we saw that firsthand."

While Tchebotarev says that 500px itself didn't receive any sustained traffic or new user signups from the publicity related to this controversy, he did say that ISO500  an app that was threatened with removal but was allowed to stay in the App Store  had 1000x install growth. 500px acquired ISO500 and its team at the end of 2012.

The situation faced by Tchebotarev and the 500px team is not wholly unique. In the age of user-generated content in apps, explicit material can and will get uploaded.

Look at Vine  Twitter's new quick-video sharing service. It took only 48 hours for porn to invade the service, leaving the Vine team to scramble to block common hashtag searches and add in methods to report offensive content.

It doesn't help that the App Store's rating system is still seemingly arbitrarily applied (Vine has a 12+ rating). Perhaps Apple should consider adding a UGC rating type to the App Store. This way, users would be aware that because the app contains user-generated content, it might not always be suitable for all audiences. App developers would still need to take the effective precautions to delete illegal content and explicit pornography, but users would be aware of what they are getting.

For Tchebotarev, he's just happy 500px for iOS [iTunes link] is back in the App Store.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Younger generations have a lot to learn from their elders. Video games are not a part of that wealth of knowledge  not yet, anyway.

An 84-year-old man was invited to play video games with his grandkids. Though his skill is not quite up to par, he makes up for it in sound effects and good sportsmanship. Watch in the video above as this grandpa loses in gaming and still wins cool points.

BONUS: 10 Grandpas With Cooler Moves Than You
--------------------------------------------------------------
Several lawmakers are demanding the Department of Justice answer questions about its handling of the case against Aaron Swartz, the 26-year-old hacker and activist who committed suicide months before his trial over computer fraud was set to begin.

Reps. Darrell Issa (R-Calif.) and Elijah E. Cummings (D-Md.), the Chairman and a ranking member of the House Committee on Oversight and Government Reform, sent a letter to Attorney General Eric Holder requesting a briefing on the Justice Department's decision to bring charges against Swartz.

"Many questions have been raised about the appropriate level of punishment sought by prosecutors for Mr. Swartz's alleged offenses, and how the Computer Fraud and Abuse Act, cited in 11 of 13 counts against Mr. Swartz, should apply under similar circumstances," reads the letter.

Issa and Cummings want the briefing to take place no later than Monday, Feb. 4. Their specific questions for Holder are:

1. What factors influenced the decision to prosecute Mr. Swartz for the crimes alleged in the indictment, including the decisions regarding what crimes to charge and the filing of the superseding indictment? 2. Was Mr. Swartz' opposition to [the Stop Online Piracy Act] or his association with any advocacy groups among the factors considered? 3. What specific plea offers were made to Mr. Swartz, and what factors influenced the decisions by prosecutors regarding plea offers made to Mr. Swartz? 4. How did the criminal charges, penalties sought, and plea offers in this case compare to those of other cases that have been prosecuted or considered for prosecution under the Computer Fraud and Abuse Act? 5. Did the federal investigation of Mr. Swartz reveal evidence that he had committed other hacking violations? 6. What factors influence the Department's decisions regarding sentencing proposals? 7. Why was a superseding indictment necessary?

Swartz was facing a maximum sentence of more than 30 years in jail for computer fraud and other charges after he snuck into a Massachusetts Institute of Technology network closet and downloaded academic articles from JSTOR, using software he created to dramatically speed up the process.

A reported plea deal would have brought Swartz's jail time down to seven or eight months, while prosecutors reportedly told Mr. Swartz' lawyers they would seek seven to eight years if the case went to trial.

Swartz was active in the technology community's fight against SOPA and similar legislation. The prosecutor in his case, U.S. Attorney Carmen Ortiz, has been accused by some of committing prosecutorial overreach, which she has denied in a statement.

Other observers have argued that Swartz's case highlights a lack of crime-to-punishment proportionality in the Computer Fraud and Abuse Act. One lawmaker, Rep. Zoe Lofgren (D-Calif.), has proposed "Aaron's Law," which would demote violation of online terms from felony status to breaches of contract.

The House Committee on Oversight and Government Reform's letter to the Department of Justice can be read in full below:
--------------------------------------------------------------
Amazon missed analysts' expectations for revenue and guidance, but the stock still shot up by as much as 10% after hours.

Net sales totaled $21.3 billion for the December quarter, up 22% from the same quarter a year ago, but missing analysts' forecasts by $1 billion. Net income was down 45% to $97 million. The company's first quarter guidance was also lower than expected at $15.8 billion compared to Wall Street's estimates of $16.84 billion.

Those figures were offset, in investors' minds at least, by Amazon's gross margins for the quarter, which were 24.1%  2.2% higher than what Wall Street was expecting. Non-GAAP operating margin was also better than expected, at 3.2% vs. 2.2%.

Amazon reported an operating loss of $97 million, the second net loss Amazon has reported in the last four years. However, it was not as severe as the $274 million loss reported in the third quarter of 2012, when Amazon took a $169 million writedown for its investment in daily deals site LivingSocial.

Low operating income is often a sign that Amazon sold a healthy number of Kindles over the holiday season  about 5 million, per analysts' estimates. Indeed, CEO Jeff Bezos seemed to suggest that was the case, noting that sales of e-books were up 70% from the year, and that sales of physical books were increasing at a slower rate than they ever have before, up just five percent. Amazon, as usual, did not break out hardware sales, noting only that its Kindle Fire HD tablet was the best-selling product on Amazon's website for the year, followed by the Kindle Fire, Kindle Paperwhite and regular Kindle, following their respective launches this fall.
--------------------------------------------------------------
There is no shortage of career websites that highlight salary data industries and established companies, but it is much harder to find comparable data for early stage startups. Now, AngelList just made it significantly easier to do the latter

AngelList, an online community for startups and investors, launched a new feature this week that lets anyone search through salary and equity data for the startups in its database. The website has 100,000 startup profiles listed, nearly 3,000 of which are actively hiring. Any company that posts positions on AngelList is asked to provide salary and equity data.

With the new feature, you can sift through the number of jobs offered in different salary ranges and filter the results based on the type of job, where it's located and relevant skills and the category that the startup falls into.

So, for example, you can compare the average pay for startup jobs overall in Silicon Valley and New York  Silicon Valley wins out with an average salary of $101,000 compared to New York's $90,000  or figure out whether it's worth the time to learn Ruby on Rails or Django by filtering the results by this skill.

It's not just for those looking for jobs as developers either. The AngelList feature collects data for design, marketing and sales positions at startups as well. The chart below breaks down salaries for marketing positions at startups based in San Francisco:

This is potentially a powerful tool for job hunters weighing their options in the startup world, though it may end up being a headache for startup founders who will now have to work that much harder to compete in recruiting top talent.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A small Caribbean island nation of fewer than 90,000 people could become the first legal haven for pirated content on the Internet.

The World Trade Organization confirmed on Monday an earlier decision granting Antigua and Barbuda (which in English translates to "Antique and Bearded") the right to suspend U.S. copyrights, paving the way for a government-run pirate website full of U.S. copyrighted content like movies, TV shows, music and software.

The latest decision technically allows Antigua to launch an online website where it can sell access to U.S. copyrighted material without having to compensate whoever holds the legal rights to those materials. Think of a legally-approved Pirate Bay that requires a membership fee, for example.

This is just the latest chapter in a dispute that's been going on for more than a decade  and it all started because of online gambling.

Antigua once had a strong online betting industry, which at its height employed 4,000 people, or around 5% of the nation's total population and was worth over $3.4 billion, according to the Antiguan government. In 2003 Antigua began arguing that American laws that barred placing bets across state lines by electronic means were a violation of global trade rules.

To seek justice, the country's government appealed to the WTO in 2003 and in 2005, the international body ruled that the U.S. government's refusal to allow Antiguan gambling sites to compete with its domestic ones amounted to a violation of free-trade.

In cases like these, the WTO normally gives nations the right to raise tariffs to compensate for their losses, but in Antigua's case, the WTO considered the nation too small for this solution to be effective. So instead of that, and after the U.S. kept refusing to change its gambling regulations, in 2007 the WTO gave Antigua the right to suspend U.S. copyrights up to $21 million annually in order to make up for its economic losses. This decision was confirmed on Monday.

In the meantime, Antigua's gambling industry has collapsed. It now employs only 500 people.

"The economy of Antigua and Barbuda has been devastated," said Antiguas Finance Minister Harold Lovell in a statement. "These aggressive efforts to shut down the remote gaming industry in Antigua have resulted in the loss of thousands of good paying jobs and seizure by the Americans of billions of dollars belonging to gaming operators and their customers in financial institutions across the world."

SEE ALSO: The Pirate Bay Documentary Will Debut Online For Free

According to Torrent Freak, there is no launch date yet, but the government has been working on the site for months. This doesn't mean that such a site will ever see the light of day, though. With the WTO decision in its pocket, Antigua hopes to force the U.S. government to a negotiated solution that would solve this issue.

"We are definitely working on it and are hopeful that the US will choose to negotiate fairly and honestly in the very near future so that we do not ultimately have to implement the remedy," Antigua's legal representative Mark Mendel told Wired UK. "We are not expecting this remedy to be anything other than a means to an end."

The American response, so far, has been negative. "The United States has urged Antigua to consider solutions that would benefit its broader economy," Nkenge Harmon, a spokeswoman for the U.S. Trade Representative's office, told Reuters. According to her, such a plan by Antigua would "authorize the theft of intellectual property."

In other words, no deal for now.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Welcome to this morning's edition of "First To Know," a series in which we keep you in the know on what's happening in the digital world.

Today, we're looking at three particularly interesting stories. Apple has released iOS 6.1, bringing several important updates, including a smarter Siri and additional LTE support. Google has added a detailed map of North Korea to its Google Maps service, and Twitter has started combating the flood of pornographic content uploaded to its video-sharing service Vine.

Check out the video above for more on these stories.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Yesterday it was a rumor; today it's true: Apple is launching a 128GB iPad.

The new device is practically identical to the current, fourth-generation iPad, only with more storage memory. So far, iPad has been available with 16GB, 32GB or 64GB of memory.

With twice the storage capacity and an unparalleled selection of over 300,000 native iPad apps, enterprises, educators and artists have even more reasons to use iPad for all their business and personal needs, said Philip Schiller, Apples senior vice president of Worldwide Marketing.

The new iPad comes with a new price tag, and it's a hefty one. The Wi-Fi-only model will set you back $799, and the Wi-Fi + LTE model costs $929, making it one of the most expensive tablets around. It will become available starting Feb. 5.

How do you like the new iPad, considering the price? Would you buy one? Share your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Photographs of Ashton Kutcher portraying a young Steve Jobs have been online for months, but now we have our first look at the 34-year-old actor as a seemingly middle-aged clone of the former Apple CEO. Kutcher shared the side-by-side comparison on Twitter.

Kutcher plays the late tech luminary in jOBS, an indie film that premiered and garnered mixed reviews last week at the Sundance Film Festival. The biopic opens in theaters April 19.

At the premiere, Kutcher revealed he imitated Jobs' "fruitarian diet" to prepare his body for the role and subsequently found himself in the hospital as a result.

SEE ALSO: Steve Jobs' Diet Put Kutcher in Hospital Days Before Filming Biopic

"I was, like, doubled over in pain," he said onstage. "My pancreas levels were completely out of whack, which was really terrifying. . .considering everything."

Jobs died of pancreatic cancer in October 2011. Here's Kutcher as a younger Jobs:
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Bang With Friends sex app, which claims to anonymously hook users up with their Facebook friends, revealed plans to expand following its successful launch last week.

"Support for same-sex selections is already under development here at BWF along with an iPhone application for banging on the go," the app's creators told Mashable in an email. While the creators provided no specific launch date, they said these new features will launch "soon."

Bang With Friends' controversial debut attracted plenty of media attention, as well as user interest. The app's "mostly 20-something" user base has topped 30,000, according to the California-based creators  three men who keep their identities hidden. What's more, they claim the app is registering five new users, or "bangers," every minute.

Bang With Friends' goal is simple, and its approach has a decidedly frat-boy-esque quality that may appeal to a young user base (the creators' contact email is "pimpin@bangwithfriends.com," after all). To join, users sign in with Facebook, and are taken to a page that features names and photos of their friends. After settling on an object (or objects) of lust, users must click a "Down to Bang" button that then changes to "Awaiting Bang."

The app says it "will only show your friends that you're interested if they are too," and notifies both parties via email about their mutual interest.

Currently, Bang With Friends can only accommodate heterosexual users, as the list of potential lovers includes exclusively members of the opposite sex, as well as people of the same-sex who did not list their gender on Facebook, according to Buzzfeed.

What do you think of the app? Would you use it? Tell us in the comments, below.

Images courtesy of Bang With Friends; thumbnail image courtesy of Flickr, jafsegal
--------------------------------------------------------------
For most users, Facebook apps fall into one of three categories: entertainment, productivity or annoyance. While some enjoy using these apps, others would prefer not to see what their friends are doing within the news feed  not to mention field dozens of app invites.

Hidden within Facebook's App Center are a number of strange apps. And let's just say you might want to double check your privacy settings before using some of them. Some of the apps might be overly personal, like marijuana-related games, birth control alarm clocks and religious preferences. Others reveal less touchy information, but are nonetheless downright strange or unnecessary.

SEE ALSO: 10 of the Weirdest Pins on Pinterest

Are you or your Facebook friends using a bizarre app? Let us know which one in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
On Jan. 30, Research in Motion (RIM) is going to launch BlackBerry 10 to the world.

BlackBerry 10 represents a pivotal, make-or-break moment for RIM as a brand and a company. If BlackBerry 10 is a success, RIM could be poised for the second-greatest tech comeback in history. If it fails, even licensing its OS might not be enough to save the future of the company.

Mashable will be reporting live from the event in New York City. In the meantime, here's what you can expect from RIM and BlackBerry 10.

The first full-touch BlackBerry 10 smartphone is one of the worst-kept secrets in tech. Images of what is purportedly the final design of the device appeared online in December.

Last week, video of the phone  purportedly called the Z10  was uploaded, showing how the physical size and UI compare to an iPhone 5.

You can bet that RIM will be announcing the full specs for the Z10 as well as price and a release date.

RIM isn't selling many smartphones in the U.S. but the company still has great relationships with U.S. wireless carriers. Unlike Microsoft  who has spent years trying to court the likes of AT&T and Verizon, reports are already surfacing that all four major U.S. carriers are onboard for BlackBerry 10.

As far back as last summer, RIM's CEO Thorsten Heins was talking up the company's relationships with carriers overseas. In fact, Mashable Tech Editor Pete Pachal has argued that its the international market that may save the company.

RIM is holding the BlackBerry 10 launch event in five cities across the globe. Expect to see a parade of wireless carriers talking up the virtues of BlackBerry 10 and on their respective networks.

If there is any single factor that will determine whether BlackBerry 10 is a success or failure it is the state of the apps ecosystem. Apps are historically a major problem for BlackBerry. Even in the BB OS heyday of 2008 and 2009, BlackBerry apps couldn't keep up with other platforms.

RIM's first tablet initiative  the BlackBerry PlayBook  continues to be plagued by poor app support and a confusing app developer story.

For that reason, we expect to see as many app developers as RIM can cram on stage at the BlackBerry 10 launch event. Expect to see RIM tout the fact that 15,000 apps were just ported to BlackBerry 10 and the new BlackBerry World.

While we're not expecting to see the likes of Instagram on display, we do think we'll see at least one major AAA game or mobile development shop on hand.

While much of the focus and design around the BlackBerry 10 operating system is based on a touch screen, RIM still has a happy contingent of CrackBerry keyboard addicts.

The plan has always been for RIM to launch a touch screen BlackBerry 10 device, followed shortly by a physical keyboard model. We're not expecting to hear specific price or release details for the rumored BlackBerry X10, but we fully expect to see at least a brief glimpse of the device at the BlackBerry 10 launch event.

Moving away form the physical keyboard and into the world of the touch screen is something RIM first tried to do in 2008 with the BlackBerry Storm. We think the company is ready this time.

As Thorsten Heins has reiterated over the last year, BlackBerry 10 isn't just about phones. In fact, the BlackBerry PlayBook was the first RIM device to run QNX, the underpinnings of the BlackBerry 10 operating system.

While we expect most of the BlackBerry 10 launch to focus on phones, the PlayBook will likely get some sort of shout-out.

We don't see RIM announcing or previewing new tablet hardware. But it would make sense for the company to show off how BlackBerry 10 phones interact with BlackBerry PlayBook tablets. Who knows  maybe BBM will finally come to the BlackBerry PlayBook natively.

What do you want RIM to announce tomorrow? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
China has begun testing smart-grid technology that could eventually be deployed nationwide to make the delivery of electricity more reliable and efficient. It might also serve as a way to deliver high-speed Internet, TV, and telephony to the farthest reaches of the country.

The State Grid Corporation of China (SGCC) is running the smart-grid project using passive optical networking (PON) technologya high-bandwidth data wiring that can be run inside electric power cables without interference. Around 86,000 premises in China have so far been connected to the grid; if the project goes nationwide, it would cost around $2 billion to deploy.

Smart grids use computer networking to let utilities monitor everything from electricity use in customers homes to the performance of generators at power stations in real time. The concept has gained much attention in the United States but has been slow to catch on. This is partly because regional utilities have different ideas about how to best connect the last mile of the smart grid to users homes, says Rajit Gadh, a professor in UCLAs School of Engineering and Applied Sciences.

"We have about 3,000 utilities in the United States compared to two main utilities in China," Gadh says. "In our infrastructure, there is a mix of technologies that has been deployed for communications and that ranges from broadband to wireless."

Chinas nascent smart grid could help spur development of the underlying technology. This is the largest utility company in the world, covering most of China, so it could potentially have a huge influence on the opportunities for equipment and component vendors, says Julie Kunstler, author of a report, The Merger of Chinas Smart Grid and PONA Potential Perfect Storm, published recently by analyst firm Ovum.The SGCC has a lot of money."

The SGCC is certainly spending big on smart-grid technologies, announcing plans in 2011 to throw $100 billion at related projects. It has 286 million customers and plans to achieve 100% smart-meter penetration by the end of 2015, according to Ovum.

Aside from local players like Huawei, ZTE and FiberHome, U.S. companies like Broadcom, Qualcomm Atheros and Marvell that manufacture media access controller (MAC) chips for PON systems could benefit from the venture, according to Kunstler.

The question is whether the project will go nationwide. The SGCC has been looking at LTE and other communications alternatives that are cheaper than fiber for the data communications side of the effort. The use of fiber in smart grids requires networking technology to be redesigned to meet the SGCCs strict redundancy requirements, adapted to interface with other parts of the power grid, and modified for use outdoors.

Ovums Kunstler describes the use of fiber as unusual in smart-grid rollouts, which normally employ Power Line Communication (PLC) or some form of wireless communications, and notes that the larger bandwidth it offers is simply not necessary in most scenarios. This would seem to point to the possibility of SGCCs plan to deliver Internet using the same technology, she says. It could apply for a service provider license, or potentially lease to an incumbent like China Mobile, which currently lacks significant fixed line infrastructure, in a bid to share costs.

Figures published in July 2012 by the China Internet Network Information Centre put the total number of Internet users in the country at 538 million with more than half388 millionon mobile rather than fixed broadband. So there is a huge opportunity for SGCC to improve both Internet penetration (beyond the current 40%) and the quality of Internet services to citizens by offering fixed line fiber to its users.

The entire project could also serve as a test caseshowing utilities in the U.S. and elsewhere whether such a costly, large-scale project is achievable, and perhaps pointing to a novel solution to nationwide super-fast broadband coverage.

Utilities touch every home, so why not take it a step further and say, If I already have a customer service relationship with you, lets take it to the next level and become your communications service provider,  says Kunstler.

The main barriers in the U.S., however, are still cost-based rather than technological. Utility EPB is using fiber for its smart-grid network in Chattanooga, Tenn., but nothing on the scale of a potential nationwide SGCC rollout. And utilities already have fiber cabling running alongside electrical power cablesbut only in high- and medium-voltage areas, so there are major expenses associate with adding in fiber for residential and business subscribers, especially to underground power cabling, says Kunstler.

Some academics have also voiced skepticism that the approach could work in the United States. Michael Caramanis, a professor in Boston Universitys College of Engineering, says the synergy between fiber and smart grids is debatable. It is not clear that the PON communications tech is a direction that we should mandate and subsidize in the U.S., he says.

Clive Longbottom, founder of analyst firm Quocirca, goes further, arguing that Americas free market economy may not be the right climate to foster such a radical, large-scale plan. This is where [Chinas] pseudo-capitalist, centrally controlled system has its strengths, against the entrenched capitalist system we have here where the concerned parties tend to see ownership as being power, rather than capability, he argues.

UCLAs Gadh is more optimistic, however. Despite the different market conditions in the U.S., he believes utilities there may benefit from observing the SGCC pilotalthough it would be down to each individual company to decide whether to follow suit. I am sure there will be research and trial and error, and there will be lessons learned from the project in China, he says. Based on lessons learned, American utilities would be able to determine if the technology is suitable for them.

This article originally published at MIT Technology Review here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Chinese delivery nights are supposed to be stress-free nights off from the glamorous world of cutlery and dishes.

But it's like the entire Chinese food service industry has worked together to make it slightly more difficult to achieve our Lo Mein noodle high. Those pesky paper cartons  while ideal for travel  seem to make it impossible for us to grabbed our orange chicken at just the right angle.

SEE ALSO: 6 Easy Life Hacks to Make You More Awesome

That is until FoodBeast discovered that it was really us all these years who hadn't grasped the beauty of the take-out carton. They are mini Transformers waiting for their potential to be released.

Simply take apart the carton for a makeshift plate and bask in your fried rice glow. Then realize that you need Tupperware and/or duct tape to reassemble the carton to store the leftovers in the fridge.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Eight months ago, Jason Nicosia found himself at a charity event in New Orleans that was raising money for the Louisiana Technology Council by auctioning lunch meetings. At the time, Nicosia was working as a sales representative for a billing software company and recognized purchasing some facetime with high-power execs presented a great opportunity.

"These guys were my ideal clients and this was a lot easier than getting a meeting otherwise," Nicosia told Mashable. "So I took the company credit card and spent a couple thousand dollars."

Nicosia says his bidding paid off, and he was able to close several business deals through his meetings. He then thought about taking this very concept online, to raise money for charity by connecting people for business lunches. That's when he got to working on Connect for a Cause, the startup he launched Monday.

Connect for a Cause is a social giving platform that lets you bid on meetings with top executives, celebrities and CEOs.

"I think of it as an eBay meets LinkedIn for social good," Nicosia says.

In a test version open to some non-profits, organizations auctioned lunches with board members, supporters and contacts. The trial raised $27,000 for charity, and Nicosia realized he could open the platform up to anyone, anywhere, who wanted to support a charity. In its beta version, people offering lunch can choose from any of the 1.5 million non-profits registered in the U.S. to benefit from their auction.

SEE ALSO: Give To Charity This Holiday Season With These 5 Apps

"My vision is that Connect for a Cause changes the way people get the meetings that help them get ahead in life," Nicosia says. "Somebody helped me get where I had to go, but not everybody in the world has access to the same. Hopefully, connect for a cause will facilitate those same connections."

Moving forward, Nicosia hopes to launch video conferencing, so lunches don't have to be geographically limited.

Would you lunch for a cause? Let us know if you'll be trying this new platform.
--------------------------------------------------------------
"Take a data journalism class," advises Dan Oshinsky, newsletter editor at Buzzfeed, in a tweet addressed to students at the Missouri School of Journalism (and followers of his Twitter feed). "Data journalism people get hired. Period."

At present, courses that fall under the data journalism umbrella are relatively scant. A cursory glance at the course catalogs for Columbia's and Northwestern (Medill)'s graduate programs showcase a few classes and workshops on the subject, skewed heavily towards data visualization. (A course at Medill does promise to teach students how to mine and present public government data.) What you won't find are courses on core programming languages, or building responsively designed websites like those recently unveiled by USA Today and Quartz  skills one would need to fill the role of a "news application developer" or "interactive news editor" at a newspaper or other online media outfit.

Dave Stanton, a managing developer who has taught courses on technology and journalism at the University of Florida as well as the Poynter Institute, is seeking to increase the resources available to journalism students, as well as mid-career professionals, interested in acquiring practical news application skills. On Friday, Stanton launched a Kickstarter fundraising campaign that seeks to make eight university-level courses available online. He's already secured teachers for each of these courses, which run the gamut from data visualization ("Charting and Visualization" and "Mapping") to information management and programming. The course list, in full:

Course materials will include e-books, screencasts, code repositories and forums, and can be taken on students' own time. Stanton estimates he'll need about $32,000 to start the project, and had raised nearly 20% of his funding goal at the time of writing. Those who pledge $20 or more will be able to enroll in one course; $100 will gain admission to seven.

Stanton said the idea was born out of conversations about the lack of tech classes in journalism schools two years ago. He asked a number of news apps developers what courses would appear in the "ultimate hacker/journalist masters program," which he whittled down to the list above. The goal of each course  Stanton pointed to the one on Ruby on Rails as an example  is to teach students how to build something (such as ProPublica's interactive graphic on Congressional gun control policy) that gives students the knowledge they need to "start poking at others' people's stuff and see how it works." Collectively, he believes the eight courses could offer the equivalent of a master's degree in data journalism.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Way back in 1994, Diet Coke launched a hit ad that featured women ogling a handsome construction worker. The ad was notable at the time because it turned the tables on traditionally sexist depictions of behavior to make a comic point.

Nineteen years later, there's less novelty in women objectifying men, but it appears that the idea still has legs, so to speak. Hence the sudden viral popularity of this Diet Coke ad, which uses the same tune  Etta James "I Just Want to Make Love to You"  and features a very similar plotline. Here, the object of desire is Andrew Cooper, who is taking the role created by Lucky Vanous.

The idea seems to have been a good one: Released just two days ago, the ad is among the most-shared on the Mashable Global Ads Chart, powered by Unruly. The video has also received more than 70,000 views on YouTube.

What do you think? Does this ad and Cooper deserve all the attention? Let us know in the comments. For comparison's sake, here's the 1994 ad:
--------------------------------------------------------------
Many people pick their cats based on cuteness, but seldom does attractiveness equate with Eugene Levy eyebrows. That is, until Sam.

Sam is a cat. Sam has eyebrows. Sam looks very apprehensive.

Follow him on Instagram @samhaseyebrows. According to Gawker, Sam's eyebrows have managed to earn over 2,500 followers in the space of a month.

BONUS: Awww, 6 Kids Who Will Grow Up to Be Cat Lovers
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Internet can be a cruel and unforgiving place. Think about it, there are trolls, phishers and con artists lurking around almost ever corner. Scams and hoaxes everywhere.

On occasion, social media propels one of these scams to viral fame. Facebook, as the grandaddy of social media, is a particularly fertile breeding ground for misinformation. According to Facebook users, we're going to have to pay for Facebook; Facebook is shutting down; we need to post a ridiculous legalese privacy notice on our timelines to protect our data; and Morgan Freeman is dead.

Nobody likes playing the fool, and it's particularly embarrassing to be the victim of a social media hoax. In other words, the next time one of these scams pop up, you don't want to be duped into endorsing it.

While we realize Mashable readers are among the most savvy social media users on the web, consider sharing the following list of tips and reminders with your friends and family. If we all work together to identify and inhibit these fallacies, we can nurture a smarter and more useful Internet for ourselves and posterity.

Now that social media has turned most of us into citizen journalists of sorts, we must assume the responsibilities of the trade. That means everyone who enjoys the benefits of sharing must also actively attempt to make the Internet a space for truth and accuracy. Misinformation is insidious, and it can be very harmful.

As Winston Churchill said: "A lie gets halfway around the world before the truth has a chance to get its pants on."

In the early stages of the shooting at Sandy Hook, mistaken reports surfaced that the shooter was Ryan Lanza, the actual shooter's brother. Immediately journalists, both pro and amateur, began sharing Ryan Lanza's Facebook picture. Moments later, hate groups started springing up. Facebook is the new court of public opinion, and it had all but convicted an innocent man of a heinous crime.

This situation obviously wasn't a premeditated hoax, but it is the type of situation newly anointed citizen journalists need to handle responsibly. The first step is to take ownership of that substantial responsibility.

Unless you witnessed something firsthand, you can never be absolutely sure that it happened (and research shows even eyewitness testimony can be dodgy). From playing the game "Telephone" as children, we all know that information gets warped and loses accuracy each time a story is told and retold. For these reasons, it's always good to maintain a healthy sense of skepticism when considering stories you hear, from the remarkable to the banal.

That being said, we have been on Facebook long enough at this point to know how our friends act on social media. Everyone has a few friends who are social media rockstars. They share current and pertinent content on a daily basis. Everyone also has a few friends who are, to put it gently, more likely to share viral misinformation.

It's not enough to scrutinize who told you the information; try to trace it back to the original source. Who originally reported the information and how did that person arrive at his conclusion?

Above, my friend and colleague Alex Fitzpatrick shares an important bit of information. Being a pro journalist, he also provides the source of the information. If only it was always this easy.

Don't absentmindedly hit the re-share button. If you have any doubt that something might not be true, it's you're responsibility to get to the bottom of it.

Start with a Google search. Has the information been reported by a reputable media organization?

Odds are you're not getting paid for your work on social media. It's not your responsibility to get the story first; it's your responsibility to get it right.

SEE ALSO: Not a Hoax: Facebook Might Have to Give You Ten Bucks

Sometimes a bit of critical thinking is all it takes. When Facebook charlatan Nolan Daniels posted a fake picture of himself with the "winning" Powerball ticket, Gawker debunked him by pointing out that, if the ticket was real, the numbers would list from lowest to highest.

This instance brings up another tell-tale sign of spam  it tries to propagate itself. Usually there will be some trick, attempting to encourage people to share the content. In Daniels' scam, he offered $1 million to one lucky person who shared his photo. More than 500,000 Facebook users took the bait.

SEE ALSO: Viral 'Privacy Notice' on Facebook Is Fake

In another scam, many felt compelled to post a fake privacy notice on their timelines, hoping it would protect their Facebook data.

The hoax was successful for two reasons. First, it touched on something most people are particularly cognizant of and concerned with: privacy in the age of social media. Secondly, the spam spread because, well, we're not all expert lawyers.

To avoid falling for this type of hoax in the future, check one of the many news sites that covers social media. Those outlets will certainly have reporters assessing the veracity of any viral content.

Or you could have just asked Boromir.

Not only should you avoid sharing misinformation; you should actively try to debunk it. If you've done your homework and found that a rumor is false, share it with your friends.

But be polite and discreet when proving people wrong. We have all made mistakes before  there's really no need to be condescending or sanctimonious.

Discourage friends from sharing spam by posting a carefully worded status explaining how you know a piece of content isn't true. Don't single anyone out, and encourage others to pass along the message.

If you notice a specific friend endorsing a potentially embarrassing sham, don't correct the person via comment. Send a private message notifying him or her of the mistake.

Posting lies is not necessarily against Facebook's terms of service, which read: "You will not use Facebook to do anything unlawful, misleading, malicious or discriminatory."

True, it does say the word "misleading." But at the same time, Facebook has not removed the Morgan Freeman tribute page, which is certainly misleading.

In any event, if you see a hoax spreading, it can't hurt to report it. If enough people do so, Facebook may take action  particularly if the misinformation is potentially harmful.

To do so, click the downward arrow on the top-right corner of the Facebook post (the arrow is invisible until you roll over it) and select the appropriate action.

Social Media Journalism 101 is only a starting point from which we can begin to correct and prevent misinformation. For the benefit of all, share your own pro tips in the comment section below.

BONUS: 8 Social Media Hoaxes You Fell for This Year
--------------------------------------------------------------
By now, Gangnam Style fatigue has turned into complete exhaustion. With more than 1.2 billion views and dozens of parodies, the most-watched YouTube video of all time may now be considered the most annoying.

But a new version of Psy's electronic-dance hit has given the video a much-needed refresher: a flip-book of Gangnam Style in all its imaginary horse-dancing glory.

SEE ALSO: This 7-Month-Old Has Mastered 'Gangnam Style' Dance Moves

Originally created by YouTube user etoilec1, the impressive animation was uploaded to another YouTube account  but this time with music added. Take a gander above.

Does Gangnam Style in flip-book form relieve your Psy fatigue? Share in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Foursquare continued its efforts to monetize its service with Foursquare For Business, an app designed to let business owners manage specials and view analytics.

The app, introduced on Tuesday, promises to let businesses attract customers by posting "beautiful photo updates," view recent check-ins to their establishment, share Foursquare updates on Facebook and Twitter, drive traffic to their store and learn more about their customers.

Foursquare's new app  its second  comes as the company has been busily trying to wring some cash from its popular service. In July, Foursquare introduced Promoted Updates, its first ad product, which let business owners send local updates like their daily specials, to users. Even with that effort, Foursquare reportedly posted just $2 million in revenues last year.
--------------------------------------------------------------
French Twitter users are saying "au revoir" to the word "hashtag" in an effort to protect the French language from anglicisms.

Instead, hashtag will be replaced with "mot-dise," meaning "sharp word" in English. The change comes from the French government agency called the Commission Gnrale de Terminologie et de Nologie, which is responsible for promoting the French language. The group's main goal is to keep French relevant in the age of the Internet, where most widespread terms have their origins in English.

It's a legal requirement for all government correspondence and legislation to use "mot-dise," but French Twitter users won't be punished if they use "hashtag" in its place.

This isn't the first time France has changed up its vocabulary to avoid English words creeping into the language. In 2003, France replaced the word "email" with "courriel," and attempted to create new terms for Wi-Fi and blog.

The country's government is actively involved in Internet regulations: In 2011, France banned the words "Facebook" and "Twitter" from television and radio in adherence to a decree prohibiting the promotion of brands. More recently, a French court ordered Twitter to identify users who tweeted racist and Anti-Semitic posts, the New York Times reports.

Some Twitter users are upset over the use of "dise," saying it represents the slanted musical symbol for a sharp note rather than a hashtag.

What do you think of the French switch from hashtag to "mot-dise?" Let us know your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
With the help of its community of citizen cartographers, Google has launched a detailed map for North Korea in Google Maps.

To build a complete map from what Google calls "very limited map data," the company used the data from users who added it using the Google Map Maker over the past few years.

Though the new map offers a fascinating insight into the most isolated country in the world, Google readily admits it still needs work.

"We know this map is not perfect  one of the exciting things about maps is that the world is a constantly changing place. We encourage people from around the world to continue helping us improve the quality of these maps for everyone with Google Map Maker," Jayanth Mysore, Senior Product Manager at Google Map Maker wrote in a blog post.

The actual map won't be of much use to most citizens in North Korea, who don't have access to the Internet. During his recent trip to that country, Google's Eric Schmidt reportedly urged the regime officials to give North Korean citizens access to the internet as well as cell phones.
--------------------------------------------------------------
With the country's political attention affixed on a wide-ranging immigration debate, four senators Tuesday introduced legislation that would increase the number of science, technology, engineering and math (STEM) visas to high-skilled workers.

The bill, named the Immigration Innovation Act, would increase the maximum number of STEM visas available to foreign citizens to 115,000 from 65,000. The cap would be adjustable based on market demand.

Some critics of high-skilled immigration reform have argued the U.S. should be focused on creating home-grown talent rather than relying on foreign workers. Accordingly, the Immigration Innovation Act would use fees collected from issuing high-skilled visas and employment-based green cards to fund domestic STEM education and worker retraining programs, an arrangement that might be considered more palatable by would-be opponents.

The Immigration Innovation Act was introduced by a bipartisan group of four senators, including Orrin Hatch (R-Utah), Marco Rubio (R-Fla.), Amy Klobuchar (D-Minn.) and Chris Coons (D-Del.).

"Our immigration system needs to be modernized to be more welcoming of highly skilled immigrants and the enormous contributions they can make to our economy and society, said Rubio, who is also part of a separate bipartisan group of eight senators that introduced an immigration reform proposal Monday.

"This reform is as much about modernizing our immigration system as it is about creating jobs," he continued. "It'll help us attract more highly skilled workers in the fields of science, technology, engineering and math, which will help our unemployed, underemployed or underpaid American workers find better jobs."

President Barack Obama said in a Tuesday address on immigration reform that he wants Congress to pass changes to high-skilled immigration that are similar to these senators' proposals.

SEE ALSO: Obama: 'Instagram Was Started With the Help of an Immigrant'

The separate and wider-in-scope immigration reform plan which Rubio is sponsoring would grant undocumented immigrants a path to citizenship after the U.S. increases its border security and steps up visa-tracking measures.

A summary of the bill can be viewed below. Do you think the U.S. should welcome more high-skilled immigrants? Share in the comments.

Summary of the Immigration Innovation Act of 2013 by
--------------------------------------------------------------
HP reportedly leaked a PDF on its site detailing its first Chromebook, teasing specs including a larger-than-usual 14-inch display and nearly three hours less battery life than competitors.

First spotted by The Verge but later taken down, the PDF provided a closer look at HP's upcoming Pavilion Chromebook computer.

The specs showed the new device will feature a 1.1GHz Celeron processor, 2GB of RAM and a 16GB solid-state device. Its 14-inch (1366 x 768 display) is a bit bigger than others on the market which feature the same resolution in a 11.6-inch screen package.

SEE ALSO: Apple Officially Announces the 128GB iPad

The document also revealed the Chromebook's battery will run for about four hours and 15 minutes  about three hours less than competitors' models, such as Samsung's Chromebook.

Although a launch date wasn't mentioned, February 17 was cited as an embargo date for ads.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Hubble Space Telescope has been looking deep into the cosmos for more than two decades returning more than 1 million observations of planets, exoplanets, nebulae, galaxies and clusters of galaxies.

The mission has surpassed our wildest expectations, but some of the most intricately beautiful views of the Universe have been released only recently  sometimes in collaboration with other observatories.

Image courtesy of NASA, ESA and the Hubble Heritage Team (STScI/AURA)

This article originally published at Discovery News here
--------------------------------------------------------------
In a world where mannequins track your every move and the waiter at that restaurant is made of metal, robots are inevitably becoming more commonplace.

But how much do we really care about these cold, controlled helpers? Most robots we encounter are far from the emotionally-capable interpretations in Steven Spielberg's A.I. Artificial Intelligence. One robotics professor in New Zealand put it to the test, analyzing whether a robots intelligence and agreeableness influence human interaction.

In Christoph Bartneck's study (loosely based on the Milgram obedience experiment), he sought to determine how people would react if a robot begged for its "life." Bartneck found that participants hesitated three times longer to switch the robot off when it was intelligent and agreeable, compared to an unhelpful machine. The smarter the robot, the nicer the human.

The main issue, researchers say in their study, is that robots embody and exhibit lifelike behavior but are not alive. For these machines to be integrated into our society, it's necessary to understand what attitude humans have toward them.

Using the relationships humans have with one another as a model, Bartneck applied the theory with a cat-robot. If a stranger helps you out, you are more likely to reciprocate the favor. On the other hand, if questioned by said stranger without previous interaction, you'd be less likely to oblige.

SEE ALSO: Eerily Lifelike Kenshiro Robot Mimics Human 'Muscles and Bones'

The expressive iCat robot, which possesses the ability to talk like a human, was paired with a participant for the experiment. The human-robot duo was instructed to play a game together, matching colors on a screen. For half of the participants the robot was intelligent, for the other half, it wasn't.

Researchers also controlled the robot's level of social interaction, sometimes making it agreeable and other times, not. When experimenters prompted people to turn the robot off, the robot immediately started to plead, "It can't be true, switch me off? You are not going to switch me off are you?"

Though all 42 participants decided to end the robot's life, the machine's intelligence had a strong effect on the users hesitation to turn the dial. In some cases, the helpful robot was perceived to be somewhat alive, influencing the person's reaction.

Watch the video, below, to see a woman reason with the iCat while explaining her decision.

"You made a stupid choice," she says to the machine. "Yea. No. I will switch you off ... this will happen."

What does the future hold for human-robot relationships? Bartneck and his colleagues explain that as robots become more prevalent, they must be agreeable in order to be seen as alive.

Do you think you could ever feel bad for a robot? How do you think humans will interact with machines? Let us know your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It may be hard to explain the concept of an Internet meme to a perplexed parent or grandparent, but you definitely know one when when you see one.

From "Binders Full of Women" to "McKayla Is Not Impressed," Internet memes have taken over the web as it relates to pop culture. Even standalone pieces of media such as Kony 2012 and "Gangnam Style" have spawned legions of spinoff memes.

This infographic, which was put together by MDG Advertising, takes a deeper look at the Internet meme phenomenon. It focuses on Kony, Gangnam Style, Maroney and Mitt Romney's famous binders to see how each conversation grew, evolved and eventually faded away.

Check it out below, and let us know what you think in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
New images have surfaced of what may be our first look at the iPad 5.

Obtained by 9to5Mac from a accessories maker in China, the photos show the rear-panel of a 9.7-inch iPad, with a similar look and feel to Apples recently released iPad mini. The panel is all black, with an iridescent black apple in its center, and looks to be almost as thin as its pint-sized counterpart.

The images on 9to5Mac fall in line with an iLounge report from last week. In that report the writer claimed to have spent time with the iPad 5, and described the tablet as a stretched iPad mini. Smaller than the current iPad, the device he saw had relatively no left or right bezels, with the only area around the screen being that required for the camera and home button.

Originally rumored to be launching in March, current rumors point to the next-generation iPad launching in October. Apple is also rumored to be launching a 128GB version of the iPad 4 in the coming months.

Do you think this is the iPad 5? Let us know your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Online retailers like Etsy and Zazzle offer virtually any iPhone case you can imagine  until now.

Here, we share seven different examples of do-it-yourself iPhone covers, which we crafted right here at Mashable HQ. All you need is a clear iPhone case (we found one for $5 up the street), a pair of scissors, an X-Acto knife and a flat and fabulous decoration.

SEE ALSO: 10 Simple DIY Gift Ideas on Pinterest

You have the choice to follow suit or let your creativity soar. After all, the only thing standing in the way of your dreams is fear.*
--------------------------------------------------------------
By now, you're sensing that Twitter's new social video site Vine has true addictive potential. You can't remember the last time you took a Foodstagram, because you're too busy making time-lapse videos.

But there's a problem. You love all the Vine videos you're taking, but they aren't exactly professional-grade. They're wobbly and inconsistent. If only there was some kind of gadget to steady your hand.

SEE ALSO: Turn Vine Videos into GIFs With This Mac App

We're way ahead of you. Check out these sweet tripod stands designed specially for iPhones and available on Amazon, all for less than $20 apiece. Is it worth it to take your Vine game up a level? We think so.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Did you know the Internal Revenue Service, the federal agency responsible for collecting taxes, is on Tumblr? Neither did we, until a YouTube video about the IRS' social media presence surfaced Tuesday morning.

The IRS has actually been on Tumblr for at least six months, posting infographics about tax returns, tax extensions, tax fraud and other relevant subjects. It's received barely any reblogs, though at least one Tumblr user's only post is an IRS reblog.

The previously mentioned YouTube video advertising the IRS indeed has an active social media presence is by far its most successful Tumblr post to date, with 31 notes in about a day. Other posts have zero or close to zero interactions.

Will the IRS Tumblr offer any helpful tax advice as April 15 looms near? We'll see. For now, we'll enjoy this surprising social find of the day: internalrevenueservice.tumblr.com.
--------------------------------------------------------------
San Francisco 49ers head man Jim Harbaugh may coach in the tech capital of the world, but you'd better believe the guy isn't drinking any social media Kool-Aid.

During Tuesday's media day in New Orleans before Super Bowl XLVII between the 49ers and Baltimore Ravens  coached by Jim's older brother, John  Harbaugh was asked for his thoughts on social media. His answer? An instant classic for tech nerds.

"My personal opinion is it's a time drain," Harbaugh says at the 1:15 mark of the above video, which was captured and posted to YouTube by Jeff Elder. "A lot of time is used on the Facebooking and the Tweeter and things like that. It seems unnecessary, though. It just seems like a modern-day diary."

A modern-day diary? Who'd ever want one of those? As the preceding minute-plus of the video shows, plenty of Harbaugh's own players.

But Harbaugh isn't just talking the anti-Tweeter talk. He's also walking the anti-Tweeter walk. His own @JimHarbaugh account has 370,00 followers, although he hasn't posted since Nov. 22, 2010. There's more to this case, however  just last week Harbaugh's bio read, "Head football coach, Stanford University," but has since been updated to his current team.

The irony of Harbaugh's thumbs-down for social media? He was actually pretty good at Twitter back in his day, posting updates on Stanford's team and shout-outs to hardworking players. He also mixed in some more mundane day-in-the-life updates, so here are a few sample tweets from Harbaugh's own "modern-day diary."

There is one social network Harbaugh should be grateful for: YouTube, which recently unearthed his epic 1996 cameo on Saved by the Bell: The New Class.

What do you think of Harbaugh's comments on "the Facebooking and the Tweeter?" Is he right or wrong? Give us your take in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Web-renowned singer/songwriter Jonathan Coulton says he is considering legal action against FOX, after its teen drama Glee aired a song last week that bears similarities to his own.

Coulton first learned that a song similar to his cover of Sir Mix-A-Lot's "Baby Got Back" was being included in an upcoming episode of Glee a week before the show aired. Coulton had recorded his cover of the 1990s hip hop classic in 2005, turning it into an acoustic, melodic jam.

When Coulton first heard Glee's cover, he was upset and took to Twitter, igniting fans who were eager to help defend him against a perceived threat.

"When I first started talking about this, people became really angry on my behalf," Coulton tells Mashable. "Fans began retweeting those things and making a lot of noise. It's not even me making noise; it's other people coming to my defense."

Coulton says he shied away from commenting publicly until he was sure Glee was going to use the song. After all, it was only posted on YouTube and linked via a fan Tumblr; he wasn't able to judge the authenticity for himself. After it aired last Thursday, however, he began considering legal action.

The "Baby Got Back" cover resides in a tricky legal area. Coulton says when he purchased the rights from licensing company Harry Fox, it specifically stipulated that the work he created couldn't differ too much from the original "in a transformative nature," and that a new work like Coulton's isn't covered by copyright.

Mashable spoke to intellectual property lawyer David Ervin when this news broke. He says covers can sometimes be considered new pieces of music if the song is so different from the original that it presents new context and message to the lyrics.

While such a legal precedent exists, Coulton's license for "Baby Got Back" specifically accounts for this situation.

"Going up against FOX for something like this wouldn't be a legal slam dunk, which would be the ideal situation when you go up against a giant media company," Coulton says.

But Coulton says audio experts are examining the similarities between the two pieces of music. "We're looking into the real possibility that they used my audio to create the track, and that is against the law."

Because of Coulton's Internet reach, fans are eager to send him their own audio analyses of the two tracks. You can listen to the two tracks parsed beat-by-beat, or a left and right-channel comparison below.

Two hours before last week's Glee episode aired, Coulton's assistant received a call from someone at FOX, the first and only time he was contacted by the company.

"It was basically, 'We understand he's upset, but we're allowed to do this and we hope he see this as a positive thing, to be exposed to all the Glee fans,'" Coulton recalls. "His next question was if I would get credited, and was told, 'Well, that's not our policy.'

"They were right. I did get exposure, but it didn't come from anything they did. It was sympathetic outrage on Twitter, and bloggers and journalists talking about how crazy it was."

FOX did not respond to Mashable's request for comment.

Coulton says he's grateful to have such a responsive fan base, and is thrilled that social media could get the story out so quickly.

"Sometimes I forget that Twitter is something beyond just being snarky at the Oscars. All of a sudden something happens and you remember that this is an amazing, powerful tool." Coulton says. "My fans have a keen sense of justice, and this idea that we should be attributed for our work. People who are of the Internet realize that attribution is what we trade on."

Coulton was a long time proponent of responsible attribution practices, having released all his songs under a Creative Commons license. That way, fans could create their own remixes or YouTube videos. Of course, even that license requires that anyone who uses his songs gives him credit.

Maybe FOX could learn something from the web's philosophy, Coulton says. "Giving attribution is free. It costs nothing and gains you everything."

Even if a legal action isn't an immediate possibility, Coulton hasn't been sitting idly by. On Jan. 25, he released "Baby Got Back (In the Style of Glee)" across web music stores. It's the same song Coulton released in 2005, but the proceeds will be divided between VH1's Save the Music Foundation and The It Gets Better Foundation, two causes "directly related to the Glee brand."

The single is currently sitting at 95 on the iTunes charts, propelled on by fans upset over the controversy. It has also earned over 2,000 five-star reviews.

The Glee version is suffering from the same fan vengeance; it has more than a thousand one-star reviews on iTunes. Coulton hasn't endorsed any backlash, and says he doesn't feel any malice towards the actors on Glee, or the fans. (He's only heard from a few Glee fans on Twitter, who believe he shouldn't have made a stink at all.)

"I don't have anything against the show or the fans," he says. "If you are a Glee fan and if you listen to the track, then you'll agree that it's kind of lazy and kind of unkind. Mostly I just feel bad for the actual people doing the actual work."

How do you feel about the "Baby Got Back" cover controversy? Let us know your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Justin Bieber's much-anticipated Believe Acoustic album came out Tuesday, and listeners' reactions to the music quickly spawned two worldwide trending topics on Twitter.

Hashtag #ThankYouForBelieveAcoustic and the phrase "Believe Acoustic Deserves A Grammy" trended as user excitement swelled. The Grammy trending topic is in response to Bieber's non-acoustic version of Believe failing to earn any Grammy nominations.

SEE ALSO: Justin Bieber's Manager Goes on Twitter Rant About Grammy Snub

Believe hit stores in June and reached number one on the U.S. Billboard 200 albums chart, while the songs "Boyfriend" and "As Long As You Love Me" both peaked in the top 10 of the Billboard Hot 100 singles chart. Bieber previously earned Grammy nods in 2011.

Believe Acoustic (listen below) garnered such responses as these on Twitter:

Bieber, who surpassed Lady Gaga in January to become the most-followed Twitter user and will host and perform on Saturday Night Live in February, posted a tweet to respond to fans:

You can listen to Bieber's new acoustic releases via this Spotify player.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Friendships can form at unexpected times in unexpected places. People don't just put out a classified looking for a best buddy. Luckily, sometimes fate  or someone trying to make a cute YouTube video  intervenes.

Loki the kitten and Harley the hedgehog were brought together and seem destined for a lifetime of interspecies kinship.

SEE ALSO: Eyebrow Cat Looks Really Nervous
--------------------------------------------------------------
Ever since he entered the NBA in 2003, LeBron James has had basketball fans dreaming of the day he finally enters the dunk contest and blows their minds with a series of reality-suspending slams.

But James has steadfastly sat out the contest, which has in many fans' estimation devolved into a derivative, yawn-inducing shell of its former self.

Its just not me, Im not a dunk contest type of guy, James told reporters last year. Im an in-game dunker. I kind of improvise during the game. Im not for scoreboards and all that type of stuff.

But if the winner walked way with a check for a million dollars?

SEE ALSO: The Incredible Story of a 5-Foot-5 Dunking Sensation

How? A crowdfunding campaign to accumulate $1 million in pledges to the LeBron James Family Foundation, thereby enticing James to bless fans the world over with his prodigious dunking talent. If he enters, his foundation gets the cash. If not, the money will be dispersed back to the original donors and no one loses a dime.

Thomas tells Mashable the idea came  like most good ideas  while sipping beers at happy hour with a few friends and bemoaning the dunk contest's decline in quality over the past several years. They wondered how they could get LeBron interested, then Thomas thought back to his "reconsider" quote from last year.

"I started thinking about how to execute the idea," he says. "Prior to a few years ago, a mechanism to do something like this didn't even exist."

But crowdfunding services have become extremely popular in recent years, and Thomas decided to use the site GoFundMe. You can check out the campaign at gofundme.com/helplebrondunk.

Traction has been slow since launching the campaign two weeks ago, however, and Thomas says the site has so far sparked far more pageviews than donations, which currently total just under $2,500.

Thomas hopes one big donation can help generate some momentum, but says he'll approach the foundation with whatever the campaign totals in the next couple weeks.

"We'll raise as much as possible, whether that's $50,000, $500,000 or $5 million," he says. "Whatever aggregate amount is raised, I'll contact the foundation and anyone else associated with LeBron, say 'take or leave it' and see what happens."

Could the crazy plan work? It's doubtful, but James does take his foundation seriously. In a classic sports moment that went viral just last week, he joyously tackled a fan after the man hit a half-court hook shot to raise $75,000 for the foundation and the Boys & Girls Clubs of America.

Would you donate to this campaign? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Shine on you crazy iPhone! The new glow-in-the-dark M-Edge Alter Ego Skin is an affordable solution to providing your iPhone 5 attractive protection.

The M-Edge Alter Ego Skin for iPhone 5 is available in a number of colors, but most notably in glow-in-the-dark lime or glow-in-the-dark sherbet (orange). Never again do you have to fumble around your pocketbook or dark room looking for your phone. As you could expect, the glow-in-the-dark option is very light in color and it gets more vibrant and brighter as the environment gets darker. If it's exposed to a lot of light just prior, it can really glow.

The Alter Ego Skin is a simple silicon case that's rubbery and very flexible. It pops right over iPhone 5 and offers an extremely durable grip with a repeating imprinted hexagon pattern. Hexagons are the reoccurring theme for the Alter Ego case. It's built into all of the button overlays and case cutouts. The lock and volume button overlays work perfectly and are very easy to press. On the bottom of the case is three separated cutouts. We would have preferred one large cutout, but this is better for the Alter Ego's structural design.

The Alter Ego provides decent protection. The jellyness should make it impact resistant. The front portion of the case adds a small bezel around iPhone's screen, which is an essential feature for keeping iPhone's face free of scratches. Lastly, the superior grip keeps the Alter Ego and iPhone from easily slipping out of your hand.

If you don't opt-in for glow-in-the-dark lime or sherbet you can Alter Ego in pink, red, aqua, cobalt, slate or black. The glow-in-the-dark feature is fun; though it really needs a lot of light to get a great glow. The M-Edge Alter Ego Case for iPhone 5 costs $19.99 from MEdgeStore.com.

The Bad: Pulls from sides of iPhone and attracts lint.

This article originally published at Chip Chick here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Everyone has a story to tell.

That's the thought behind Smith Micro's Manga Studio 5. The latest iteration of the decade-old graphics software launches today. Named for the popular Japanese comics, Manga Studio has evolved from a simple application for black-and-white art into a robust comic-creation program. It allows for panel layout as well as full-color illustration comparable with graphics programs like Photoshop.

Mashable had a chance to sit down for a hands-on demo of Manga Studio 5 with Smith Micro's Senior Product Manager Fahim Niaz and Content Artist Teyon Alexander. Niaz and Alexander wanted to show off the application's new muscle, along with a few surprises.

Check out the product video for Manga Studio 5 below:

Most prominently, Manga Studio's graphics system got a significant overhaul, taking it beyond black-and-white roots into the realm of digital painting and illustration. A slick vector-based panel creation system, diverse new brushes and a customizable UI make it a cool-looking program.

Now that comics are becoming an increasingly digital medium and creating and sharing work is easier than ever, Manga Studio is a welcome all-in-one creation platform.

"It's all about making production of a comic faster," Alexander said. "Making sure that you can get your work done as quickly and efficiently as possible. You can do everything, start to finish."

Note that Tuesday only marks the release of the application's debut version. An upgraded version known as Manga Studios EX5  with more features and targeted at professionals  will launch this summer. So if you take your art seriously, you might want to save your money until June.

Beyond the standard art tools, Manga Studio 5 integrates social interaction and sharing on a fundamental level. Brushes, or "subtools," can be shared individually with friends and colleagues who also use the application. This is a big improvement over EX4, which allowed sharing only of entire brush libraries, though Niaz hinted at further integration in the form of a future social network for artistic collaboration.

What if you have a great story to tell, but you're not exactly Picasso? The program now makes it easier to create whole books, even if you're not the most artistically gifted comics fan in the world.

"One of the things we used to run into at conventions were parents and kids who would come through and be like, 'I want to draw comics, but I'm not a good drawer,'" Alexander said. "But now if you can't draw, that's OK."

The software's developers have merged a few tools from Manga Studio's sister program, Poser, so users can build with 3D character models and even pre-programmed characters.

"Anyone that's a newbie, that's trying to get into creating comic books, they have that issue with creating that perfect pose or that perfect character, so you help them pose it with these 3D options," Niaz said. "A new user can use it for instant gratification. Maybe a 10-minute strip they can put online. They don't have to wait and learn how to draw."

Niaz said he sees this as an anticipation of the future of comics. These tools will allow a new generation to start creating instantly.

"You're only limited by your imagination," he said.

Smith Micro has introduced another tool to further this goal, and it takes a surprising form: humanoid. Meet QUMA, the humanoid input device  a white, plastic mannequin who can lend his form to an onscreen 3D avatar via USB cable. Bend QUMA at the waist, and watch your character double over accordingly. Twist his wrist, bend his toes, and it's mirrored in the application, essentially creating the perfect adjustable life model. Draw details over the 3D form and insert him into your stories seamlessly.

See QUMA in action in this video:

Though Niaz said Manga Studio 5 includes 90% of EX4's features, the EX5 upgrade will be a significant step up, along with a bump in price from the debut's modest $79.99 to a more substantial $299.99. QUMA is now available in Japan and will soon come to the U.S. with a $500 price tag.

To coincide with the release of Manga Studio 5, Smith Micro will sponsor a contest running through February, with free posters going to 25 lucky fans and a shiny new Wacom Cintiq pen display for first place.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A risky flyby of the Mars moon Phobos, a dip into the atmosphere of Venus and the creation of a comprehensive water map of the Red Planet are three goals the European Space Agency has laid out for 2013, officials announced last week.

In June, ESA will publish a map of the entire surface of Mars detailing the location of water-containing hydrate compounds, based on observations by the agency's Mars Express spacecraft.

"We will be revealing a mineralogical map of Mars  the whole planet  based on Mars Express data," ESA director-general Jean-Jacques Dordain said in his annual breakfast briefing in Paris on Jan. 24. "What were most interested in is the hydrates, as that will give us valuable information about the history of water on the surface of Mars."

This year, Mars Express will also make an extremely close flyby of Phobos, one of the Red Planet's two tiny moons, Dordain added.

SEE ALSO: Europe's Mars Express Mission in Photos

"Well run that mission with Mars Express; there is a risk," he said. "It is not just a flyby; it is almost within touching distance."

The spacecraft's orbit around Mars will be altered so it flies past Phobos at a distance of just 36 miles (58 kilometers)  far closer than Mars Express' 2011 Phobos encounter, which brought it to within 62 miles (100 km) of the moon.

"This [36-mile flyby] will give us unique data on Phobos. As you probably know, it is an object that is attracting huge attention, particularly from Russia," Dordain said, referring to Russias Phobos-Grunt mission, which launched in November 2011 in an attempt to return a sample from the moon. Phobos-Grunt failed to leave Earth orbit and fell into the Pacific Ocean in January 2012.

Russian scientists interest in Phobos goes back to 1959, when the Ukrainian-born Soviet astrophysicist Iosif Samuilovich Shklovsky wrote a paper suggesting the orbit of the moon implies it is hollow and could therefore be an artificial spaceship.

ESA is interested in Phobos exploration to learn more about eventual sample-return missions, and the hydrates map should help pave the way for such an effort on Mars, Dordain said.

"This will mean we can start looking for landing sites for the Exomars mission," Dordain said of the Mar Express hydrates map. Exomars is not a sample-return mission, but it will look for evidence of Red Planet life.

An Exomars orbiter and lander will be launched in 2016, and in 2018 a rover will be sent to the Red Planet. While ExoMars was originally an ESA-only mission, NASA became a major partner but then reduced its role last year to just onboard electronics due to budget problems. Now Russias Federal Space Agency, known as Roscosmos, is ESA's major partner.

Dordain also revealed that ESA plans to learn more about a maneuver called aerobraking by sending its Venus Express orbiter into a lower orbit around Earth's hellishly hot "sister planet."

Aerobraking uses a planet's atmosphere, rather than rocket engines, to slow a probe down as it settles into orbit. The move can save fuel, potentially making spacecraft lighter and thus cheaper to launch.

In orbit since April 2006, Venus Express mission is to study the atmosphere and surface of the planet. Its observations have hinted that Venus may still have active volcanoes.

Dordains briefing follows the agencys November 2012 meeting of its member states space ministers. That meeting approved an increased budget for ESA, granting 4.2 billion euros ($5.7 billion at current exchange rates) for 2013.

That meeting also approved the provision of a service module for NASAs Orion spacecraft. Dordain revealed that the module that will fly in 2017 will cost 450 million euros ($606 million).

He has high hopes for the coming year. "We're expecting tremendous results in 2013," Dordain said.

This article originally published at Space.com here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Fashion meets four legs in Tumblr's greatest new single-serving destination: Menswear Dog.

The stylin' pup shows all men of the world how to wear their duds, rocking the most fashionable clothing in everything from office wear to spring resort.

Even Tyra Banks would approve of this canine's smize-filled swagger.

SEE ALSO: Eyebrow Cat Looks Really Nervous

According to the Tumblr, "Menswear Dog is a 3-year-old shiba inu living in NYC with a panache for all things style. His interests include never washing his selvage denim, lurking around Soho for someone to notice his steez, and sniffing fine a$$ bitches."

We're already dubbing it one of the most important Tumblrs of 2013 and expect to see this pup on Vogue's "Best Dressed" list.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It's always the ones you least expect.

The Wichita, Kan., police department is reporting that a mouse is responsible for stealing marijuana from a 2009 case evidence facility. According to a local news station, the department held a press conference about the red-handed rodent  and even crafted an official police sketch.

SEE ALSO: 11 Pets With Real-Life Careers

Police say the mouse ate through the baggies and most likely ingested a good portion of the cannabis. Let's just hope the little guy found himself a giant wheel of cheese and is taking it easy for the next few weeks.
--------------------------------------------------------------
One of the biggest challenges of space travel has very little to do with the traveling itself, and more to do with everything that happens afterward.

How will humans sustain themselves if we send them back to the moon (and, as planned, to Mars)? Food, even freeze-dried, is heavy. Water, too. Maintenance is expensive, in every sense of the word.

So, if manned space travel is to become a long-term reality, we'll need to find ways to cultivate the places and planets we visit: to mine their soil for nutrients, to find the water hidden in their depths, to generate the air that will make everything else possible.

NASA has an idea for doing all that, and it takes the form  as so many innovative ideas seem to these days  of a robot.

Meet the Regolith Advanced Surface Systems Operations Robot  RASSOR, for short. The robot (pronounced as "razor") is an excavator device, designed to extract (yes) water, (yes) ice, and (yes) fuel from the soil of the moon. And from the soil of similarly dusty bodies (like, say, Mars).

NASA is envisioning that RASSOR, currently in development in prototype form, will not only perform the Greek-fable-meets-rocket-science-reality task of getting water from rocks; it will also take the remaining dust and convert the chemicals it contains into two things crucial to astronauts: air for breathing, and fuel for moving. "The robot," NASA says, "would be the feeder for a lunar resource processing plant, a level of industry never before tried anywhere besides Earth."

How do you design a device that can do all that work? How do you create an automaton that is rover and water filtration center and power plant all rolled in one rolling vehicle? One obvious challenge is mass.

On the one hand, the robot in question has to be light enough to feasibly fly on a rocket. (It takes about $4,000, NASA says, to send a single pound of payload into space.) On the other hand, though, the machine has to be heavy enough to operate in less gravity than that offered by Earth. (In the moon's case: less than 20% of that gravity.) It also has to be generally substantial enough to dig into soil without tipping over, and to operate  like its fellow lunar and Martian rovers  as a kind of multi-purpose machine.

The current prototype has solved many of those problems by applying its multi-purpose intentions to multi-purpose design. The drums that the machine will use to gather soil double as legs  which can, in turn, help the robot to navigate dusty terrain. (They also allow the 100-pound, 2.5-foot-tall device to dig effectively, since one of those drums can act as a grip to balance the robot as it does its work.)

Though the current design has given the RASSOR a tank-like shape, with tracks to balance the robot as it roves other worlds, NASA is considering replacing that base with wheels  which would make the next RASSOR iteration a little more Martian-rover-like than the current one. But the modular capability, ostensibly, would be a constant.

A shape-shifting, water-mining spacebot! NASA expects that the RASSOR 2  the next generation of the spunky little power plant  will begin testing in early 2014.

This article originally published at The Atlantic here
--------------------------------------------------------------
NASA will launch a rocket tonight on a mission that promises to put on a spectacular, albeit brief, light show over the U.S. East Coast that may be visible to stargazers along the Atlantic Seaboard, weather permitting.

Unsuspecting observers of the artificial night sky display may be puzzled and amazed, so before you make that phone call to your local media outlet or police station, here is why this is happening and when you might see it.

The bright phenomenon will be caused by an experiment aboard a NASA sounding rocket. As part the mission, the rocket will release a chemical tracer that should create two bright, red-colored lithium vapor trails in space that may be seen by observers across the mid-Atlantic region, and possibly from even further away.

The rocket will be fired from NASA's Wallops Island Flight Facility on Virginia's Atlantic coast. Liftoff is slated to occur as early as 5:30 p.m. EST (2230 GMT). The suborbital rocket, which can launch high above Earth but not orbit the planet, will be launched tonight to test technology for gathering science data during future projects.

SEE ALSO: NASA Rocket Launches Light Up Night Sky (Photos)

You can watch the launch live on SPACE.com here via a webcast that will begin at 4:30 p.m. EST (2130 GMT).

The launch window for tonight's NASA night light show opens at 5:30 p.m. EST and extends to 6:50 p.m. EST (2350 GMT), but the optimum target time is 5:45 p.m. EST (2245 GMT). NASA intends to photograph the resulting red luminescent trails from Wallops Island and from an aircraft as well.

Should weather conditions be unfavorable, the firings will be deferred to another night. Alternate datesrun fromThursday through Friday (Jan. 30 to Feb. 1).

The sounding rocket that will be used to create the two NASA-made glowing cloud trails will be a Terrier-Improved Orion.In this technology test launch, two canisters in the rocket's payload section will contain solid metal lithium rods or chips embedded in a thermite cake. The thermite is ignited and produces heat to vaporize the lithium.

Once the vapor is released in space, it can be detected and tracked optically. The rocket will eject two streams of lithium which will be illuminated at high altitudes by the sun (which will be below the local horizon at ground level).

Libby West, mission project manager with the NASA Sounding Rocket Program at Wallops, said: "This launch is a technology test flight for two upcoming missions. We will be testing two different methods for creating the lithium vapor to determine which configuration is best for observing various science phenomena in space."

During the flight, one vapor trail will occur at an altitude of about 72 miles (116 kilometers) and the second will occur at about 78 miles (126 km) up. When heated, the lithium rods change to lithium vapor and small amounts of lithium oxide. The thermite reaction produces iron and aluminum oxide. The lithium combustion process poses no threat to the public during the release in space.

A NASA map for the mission shows the trajectory of the rocket launch, as well as expanding circles indicating the visibility of the lithium vapor streaks at different times.

In the map, the blue line extending out from the launch site toward the 4 o'clock position represents the trajectory of the rocket; at the end of the blue line is where the lithium clouds will be released. The outer yellow circle extends for a radius of approximately 400 miles (645 km), marking the boundary where the clouds will appear at a maximum altitude of 10 degrees above the horizon. This is roughly comparable to the width of your clenched fist held at arm's length.

The key to making a sighting is to have a clear, unobstructed view of the horizon in the direction of Wallops Island. For example, a viewer in Raleigh, N.C., should look toward the northeast; in New Haven, Conn., you should face southwest; in Philadelphia, Pa., it'll be toward the southeast.

SEE ALSO: Amazing Stargazer Photos for January 2013

In the table below, we have calculated the altitude and direction of where you should look for 15 selected cities.

If you live along the Atlantic Seaboard and live outside of the yellow circle, you should still make an attempt to try and see the lithium clouds. At an altitude of 78 miles, theoretically they might be seen as far as 850 miles (1,370 km) from the release point. Their altitude will be less than 10 degrees above the horizon, but assuming your sky is free of any cloud cover or haze and you have an unobstructed view in the direction of Wallops Island, you certainly will have a chance of getting a glimpse of this atmospheric experiment.

Viewers as far north as southern Quebec and Nova Scotia and as far south as northern Florida might be able to catch the clouds as low as five degrees above the horizon.

For places situated to the west, toward the Ohio and Tennessee River Valleys, there will be a caveat in that the sun will have only recently set and the twilight sky may still be too bright to see the artificial clouds.

Looking up along the trajectory from the ground, such chemical trails often appear distorted in complex ways. Among other things, their shape provides scientists with precise data on wind speeds and directions at various levels of the upper atmosphere.

The jet stream at nearly 80 miles (128 km) above the Earth's surface is much higher than the one commonly reported in weather forecasts. The winds found in this upper jet stream typically have speeds well over 300 mph (482 kph) and create rapid transport from the Earth's mid latitudes to the polar regions.

This jet stream is also located in the same region where strong electrical currents occur in the ionosphere. It is therefore a region with a lot of electrical turbulence, of the type that can adversely affect satellite and radio communications.

NASA plans to launch two more missions his year that will use the lithium trails to assist scientists in observing events in space. The first launch will blast off in April from Kwajalein Atoll in the Marshall Islands, located out in the central Pacific Ocean. The second flight will occur in June, again at the Wallops Flight Facility in Virginia.

Last year, NASA launched five sounding rockets in five minutes to create a spectacular light show that amazed stargazers all along the Eastern Seaboard.

NASA used to conduct chemical cloud experiments from Wallops Island much more frequently during the 1960s, '70s and '80s, usually in the predawn hours when most people were asleep. Chemicals such as tri-methyl aluminum, barium and tri-ethylborane were used, often creating rather exotic colors of red, green and purple.

When such launches took place during convenient evening hours they usually took people by surprise. In March 1967, when three clouds were released around 7 p.m. they were followed by countless numbers of people all along the East Coast calling newspapers and police stations, asking for explanations of the strange sightings. One man described the rocket residue as "red balls of fire."

In January 1975, a barium cloud was released at around 5:30 p.m. in the evening. As luck would have it, the town of Riverhead, N.Y., was hit by a power outage at the very same moment that the cloud appeared in the sky.

This resulted in a panic among the local residents who believed that the cloud had something to do with the loss of their power. One man called the local police station and shouted: "Were being invaded! I can see the spaceship in the sky right now  it's glowing with a greenish color and expanding as it's draining us of our electric power!"

This article originally published at Space.com here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Sometimes all we want in life is for someone to really get us, deepest darkest secrets and all. And that person usually is  no, not our significant other  our Netflix subscription.

You can't hide anything from Felix the Netflix Bot  he knows you spent your entire Saturday watching White Chicks and The Land Before Time VIII and he doesn't judge you for it.

SEE ALSO: Watch the Most Awkward Blind Dates Ever

But sometimes, Felix gets jealous when you parade your gal pals around him and he spills the beans about your movie fetish needs.

Takeaway lesson: Treat Felix well or he will retaliate all over date night. 

 

Video via YouTube, UCBComedy; Photo via iStockphoto, kzenon
--------------------------------------------------------------
Viral videos are famously impossible to predict. Who, for instance, could have foreseen the phenomenal success of Rebecca Black's "Friday" or Psy's "Gangnam Style"?

Yet Unruly, a UK firm that specializes in collecting data around viral videos, claims it has a tool that can help advertisers predict the amount of earned media their videos are likely to attract across social media and how much advertisers should spend promoting their videos. Dubbed Unruly Share Rank, the algorithmic tool will help advertisers "gain insight into the psychological, social and content triggers that affect the success of their video content," according to the company, which also promises "they'll know the word-of-mouth potential of their video before they spend anything on media."

The company didn't disclose exactly how Share Rank works, except that it's based on seven years' worth of data from the Unruly Viral Video Chart and the algorithm includes more than 10,000 data points. (Disclosure: Mashable is a partner for Unruly's Global Ads Chart.) Such data is combined with the emotional reactions of test subjects and on their stated willingness to share the video. Pricing for Share Rank was not disclosed.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The New York Times is inviting early-stage startups to come work in its 8th Avenue headquarters in an effort to foster relationships between entrepreneurs and the 161-year-old newspaper.

The Times is accepting applications for its TimeSpace program from now until Feb. 19. Between three and five companies will be invited to interface with Times staffers over the course of a four-month residence period, per the application website. The goal (again, via the website) is to seek out new ways of creating, collecting and distributing news and information. The Times says it's primarily seeking startups focused on mobile, social, video, ad technology, analytics or e-commerce who have raised "at least" seed-stage funding.

The initiative appears to compliment the aim of the Times' research and development lab, which has incubated a number of software and hardware projects, including mobile news application News.me and this incredible, Internet-connected mirror.

In previous years, a range of venture capital firms, established tech companies (including Google and Facebook) and universities have set up incubators and accelerators, offering office space, mentorship and other resources over a set period of time in exchange for insight and collaboration (and, oftentimes, acquisition) opportunities. Several media organizations, including the BBC and Turner Broadcasting, have emulated this model with their own, more modest incubators for media-focused tech startups.
--------------------------------------------------------------
President Obama highlighted the story of Brazil-born Instagram co-founder Mike Krieger during an address on comprehensive immigration reform Tuesday.

"Instagram was started with the help of an immigrant who studied here and that stayed here," said Obama, referencing Krieger while making the argument that many immigrants benefit the U.S. economy. "Right now in one of those classrooms there's a student wrestling with how to turn their big idea, their Intel or Instagram into a big business."

Krieger was born in Sao Paulo and moved to California in 2004 to pursue an education in computer science and cognitive science at Stanford University. After he graduated, he worked for a year on an F-1 student visa. He later applied for and received an H-1B high-skilled worker visa, according to his White House biography.

Krieger joined with fellow Instagram co-founder Kevin Systrom to launch the company in 2010. It was acquired by Facebook for $1 billion in cash and stock in April 2012.

Part of Obama's immigration plan includes giving green cards to foreign post-secondary graduates in science, technology, engineering and math (STEM) fields. Employers of such workers would have to pay a fee that would benefit STEM education and worker training programs in the U.S. Such a plan has already been proposed in the Senate.

Obama and Kreiger are no stranger to one another: He was invited along with other entrepreneurs to be a guest of First Lady Michelle Obama for her husband's 2012 State of the Union address.

In a blog post about the experience, he noted a "common thread" among himself and his fellow guests  "a desire to roll up our sleeves and get to work on tackling some of the toughest issues facing us today."

"Every year, thousands of startups are founded  not only in technology, but increasingly also in health care, education, and energy," Kreiger wrote. "Innovation happens best when people of different backgrounds come together to solve the world's toughest challenges, and in the process can create new jobs and opportunities. I'm hopeful that updated immigration policies will encourage entrepreneurs from around the world to help tackle these opportunities in the U.S."
--------------------------------------------------------------
It's been a long wait, but the first version of Microsoft Office designed for Windows 8 is here. Office 365 Home Premium (a.k.a. Office 2013)  the real thing, not the preview  is now available for download. And it brings the software suite into the world of touch, the cloud and collaboration via social networks. It's a needed upgrade, though it still isn't as convenient to use as simpler alternatives, such as Google Drive.

As of today, Microsoft Office 2013 for consumers is available in 162 markets in 21 languages for either a $99.95 yearly subscription. The subscription lets you install Office on up to five devices (PCs, Macs or a mix), comes with 60 Skype minutes per month and 20GB of SkyDrive storage, and entitles you to continual updates to the apps for as long as you subscribe.

You can still buy the new Office for the one-time cost of $219.99, but that only lets you install it on one machine, and you don't get the version updates. Office 365 University for college students and staff is also available for a $79.99 yearly subscription. The business version of Office, which is priced a bit higher and includes deeper integration with Microsoft's enterprise software, won't arrive until Feb. 27.

Today, only the Windows apps are getting a refresh. The Mac apps are still the 2011 versions, and don't have the new features in Office 2013  cloud collaboration for instance, can only be done via the Office web apps. The Mac version of a major Office update typically lags the Windows one by several months, but it often gets a few extras when it finally arrives.

The most powerful change to Office in the new edition is that it's made with connectivity in mind. It starts with how you get it: No longer do you need to go to a store and buy a package with a disc inside (though you still can)  a purchase gets you product code. Enter the code, and you're taken to an account screen where you can download the Office apps and manage your Skype minutes storage, and authorize (or de-authorize) your five devices running the software. It's all very logical.

Downloading the apps takes a little while (it took my Samsung Series 7 tablet about 15 minutes), but you can start using them sooner than that. I fired up Word and began typing my notes for this review just a couple of minutes into the download.

Connection to the cloud  mainly via Microsoft's SkyDrive cloud service  is a constant presence in the new Office. Once you've connected your account, the default save location is SkyDrive, which also enables sharing and collaborating with others.

Microsoft was already using the cloud with Office 365, of course, but now the integration goes deeper. You can work on a SkyDrive document within the native Word app, for instance (as opposed to the browser), and it will even indicate if anyone else is editing the document at the time. If you want to ask what they're doing, it's easy to initiate an IM, call or Skype them without leaving the app.

The way Office 2013 works with the cloud is excellent, though I had a couple of issues with it: Word still needs any edits to be manually saved before they show up for other collaborators. It's a stark change for anyone used to Google Drive's real-time edits that just magically appear.

Second  and this is a greater problem  I found editing in Word noticeably slows down when working on a SkyDrive-stored document, even when no one else was working on it. It's not a lot, but it's enough to just default to saving locally. Of course, that eliminates the possibility of collaboration and other advantages.

Generally, though, greater connectivity was a needed upgrade for Office, and I hope Microsoft continues to improve it. Now it's possible to, say, insert a YouTube video into a Word document. Excel tables can be populated with real-time data. PowerPoint has slide templates that are continually updated via the Internet.

The apps that constitute Office have evolved over the years, but the core is still Word, Excel and PowerPoint. All of them have a new Spartan look that eschews the old toolbars for a revamped navigation across the top. Things like File, Home, Insert and View are all there, and tapping (or clicking) on one calls up a ribbon of clearly labeled icons. It's all very neat.

If you've ever tried to insert something like a photo into a Word doc, you know why page-layout apps like Adobe InDesign exist. Word 2013 does inserts better than any previous version, though, adjusting text wraps in real time as you move your object (be it photo, clip art or video). Options for inserting online images and videos are right in the menus.

One of the best changes in Word 2013 is the rethink of Track Changes. Editors know this function well, and many secretly dread the way it turns documents into strikethrough-laden mush with comments pop-ups everywhere. The new Word gives you an easy way to remove the markings from view while simultaneously consolidating those pop-up conversations.

Even better, you can now protect documents with a password, ensuring users can't make changes outside of using Track Changes. If you're used to the old way the feature worked, it's a little panicky when you make your first change and don't see the familiar strikethrough, but the mess is now under control.

Finally, a lifesaver: Word can now also edit PDFs, just like you would any other document. When you're done, you have the option to save as a PDF or a Word doc.

Excel's new big "wow" feature is Flash Fill. In the "tour," the app takes a table full of email addresses, formatted "firstname.lastname@wherever.com," and invites you to create a new column with just the first names. Start typing the first one, nothing happens. Start typing the second, and Excel figures out what you're doing and automatically fills out the rest of the column. The first time this happens, you might actually cheer.

However, it's a situation that I had a hard time replicating, usefulness-wise. This could be just me, but most of my tables I have don't have similarly formatted data, ripe for extrapolated partitioning. Still, it could save loads of time if you're doing a data "cleanup"  say getting contact information out of an old address book.

Far more useful, I think, are Excel's Suggested Charts and Instant Analysis. Got data? Excel can suggest several different kinds of tables that will be appropriate for it. I found its choices, like the chart below, to be very good, generally, needing only style adjustments and proper titles to make them truly pretty. It's a bit humbling when an app has better instinct than you, but I've never claimed to be a chart guy.

Instant Analysis is a great tool: Highlight your table and it can tell you which data points are the top performers, which fall below a certain threshold or what the totals are when each column is summed. It can even create temporary mini charts on the fly.

PowerPoint's best new feature is Presenter View. This is a feature that already exists in other apps like Apple's Keynote, and Microsoft has done a good job building this for touch. When you connect your PC to an external monitor, Presenter View shows you a screen with the miniaturized slide along with your own notes and the time elapsed. You can use gestures to enlarge things or jump (just yourself) ahead in the presentation.

These are just a few of the highlights of Office 2013, but they give you a feel of the direction Microsoft is heading in. Office has been a the go-to suite for core productivity apps for going on two decades, but it's overall experience felt tired and inflexible in the world of real-time collaboration with services such as Google Apps, Dropbox and OpenOffice.

With Office 2013, Microsoft has caught up with its competitors, but it hasn't surpassed them. It still needs to polish its experience (improving performance while saving to the cloud would be a big help) and make the experience even more inviting. Office certainly still has its edge on features and formatting  and the new layout is pretty  but it still has an intimidation factor.

The reason you should upgrade and get the new version, however, isn't the cloud integration or the cool new features. It's the subscription model. Spending $99.95 a year on a suite of world-class productivity apps that you can install on five machines  complete with cloud integration and continual updates  is simply a good deal.

Yes, you can arguably have Google Apps on an unlimited number of machines for free, but if you're like me, you'll at one point or another long for a Word formatting option or Excel pivot table. Although Microsoft's cloud integration isn't as good as Google's, you'll also never have the frustration of not being able to work because the connection to the server was "too busy." If you've ever felt adrift in the cloud, at the mercy of the changing winds of the Internet, Office 2013 will keep you safely tethered to the ground.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Microsoft launched the latest version of Office today (read our review), and the new apps are made for Windows 8. Strange, then, that the apps themselves  Word, Excel, PowerPoint and Outlook  aren't actually Windows 8 apps. The core of the new suite runs in a PC's desktop environment.

The new Office was supposedly tailored for touch, the cloud and social networks  the very same things behind the philosophy of Windows 8. Many features of the apps, such as PowerPoint's new Presenter View, are clearly made with touch in mind, so why didn't Microsoft go all the way and build Office 2013 as a Windows 8 app?

"Let's just say our apps were not naturally touch applications," P.J. Hough, Microsoft's vice president of Office program management, told Mashable. "I think if you look at what the Windows team did when they designed the interface, they obviously designed for touch first. In fact we did a lot of work in [the Office apps] to touch-enable them, but the contract Windows has for these particular apps is different than the internal capabilities of Office."

What Hough is referring to is the new way apps in Windows 8 talk to each other, which involve apps establishing a "contract" with each other to share data. In order to provide the safest experience for the user, Windows 8 apps are essentially sandboxed. For apps to interact, they typically must use the operating system's Share charm.

SEE ALSO: How Microsoft Re-Invented Office for Touch, Social and the Cloud

However, Office  as it was designed to work in previous versions  has built-in sharing capabilities ("Share to OneNote," for example). Those features would have to be rebuilt to work with the new user interface.

While the Office team could have done that, Hough says Microsoft didn't want to rush out a Windows 8 version of Office and risk serving up a poor user experience.

"It's a significant opportunity," he says. "I think the mistake would be to take what we have today on the desktop and somehow make it work in the Windows 8 environment. Over time, we will have to re-engineer the Office products  re-imagine them in new ways."

Hough points out that both OneNote and Lync run in the Windows 8 environment. Eventually the Office team will take what it's learning from those apps and apply it to a new Office suite that's designed from the start for Windows 8  which he says Microsoft will definitely ship someday.

"We're committed to delivering a full set of Office experiences on Windows 8," says Hough. "We've gotten a lot of experience from OneNote and Lync, and we're going to continue down that path.

"How do you integrate with the new features of the operating system  the charms, for example? How do you take advantage of the new navigation? what do you do differently if you presume cloud-backed storage first? We've added a lot of those capabilities to Office, but we decided not to rush and just jam something in."

Also likely a factor: hardware. Windows 8 PCs with touchscreens have only been available since the fall, and many users are upgrading to Windows 8 but using it on non-touch machines. Creating a version of Office that presumes touch would be premature for many Windows 8 users.

How would you build Office as a pure Windows 8 app? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Retailers can now add a surcharge of up to 4% on credit card transactions, but that doesn't necessarily mean your next Amazon purchase will include the fee.

Though Amazon hasn't stated whether it will levy the charge, David Robertson, publisher of The Nilson Report, a credit card industry newsletter, says that retailers in highly competitive industries are unlikely to include the fee. "What inhibits surcharging is when you have two or more competitors," he says. "You have to face the market reality of 'Can I get away with it?'"

Amazon reps could not be reached for comment. However, the retailer vies with various online competitors, including Walmart.com and Google Shopping.

The so-called "checkout fees," which went into effect on Jan. 27, came after the biggest antitrust settlement in U.S. history. The suit, on behalf of a group of merchants, claimed that Visa, MasterCard and nine other financial services firms colluded to fix fees that stores pay to process credit card transactions. Retailers who opt to add the checkout fee have to disclose it with their customers.

However 10 states  California, New York, Colorado, Connecticut, Florida, Kansas, Maine, Massachusetts, Oklahoma and Texas  have laws prohibiting the surcharges. If you're buying from an online retailer and they're based in one of those states, then you don't have to worry about the charge. Those states also contain about 45% of the U.S. population.

Robertson says that the only retailers likely to include the fee are those that offer one-of-a-kind or must-have items that can be found nowhere else. "These are merchants that know they'll have your business come hell or highwater," says Robertson.
--------------------------------------------------------------
OpenTable, the popular online restaurant reservation service, announced Tuesday that it has agreed to acquire food discovery app Foodspotting for $10 million in cash.

Foodspotting launched in early 2010 and its app has been downloaded more than 3 million times. The product, which lets users find and share pictures of dishes, will continue to exist as a standalone product. However, OpenTable is planning to incorporate the app's meal recommendations and sharing features to make the OpenTable experience more visual and social.

"The primary areas of focus for us are mobile, providing really rich content and social," OpenTable's CEO Matthew Roberts told Mashable. "Foodspotting is a really fantastic fit for each of these things."

OpenTable was one of several restaurant-focused websites to partner with Foodspotting last year, adding photos from the Foodspotting community onto restaurant reservation pages. Roberts says the two companies realized there was an opportunity to work more closely together and started talking about a potential acquisition late last year.

Going forward, OpenTable hopes to go a step further and use the Foodspotting functionality to help restaurant-goers discover and write about the best dishes to order before, during and after making their reservation through OpenTable.

"We think there is a big opportunity for you to look at a restaurant and look at the dishes that were loved at that restaurant by your friends as a way to inform the dining decision," Roberts says.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Ever wonder if the always-busy Oprah makes the time to check her Twitter mentions? She seemed to do so on Monday night, firing back at a tweeter who said she looked "old as hell" during an interview with the mother of the late Whitney Houston:

The response must have come as quite a surprise to @kp1lady, and many of Oprah's 16 million followers were quick to jump to her defense. "You look like a beacon of white light illuminating the universe. Making TV brighter with your #WISDOM," wrote @CaseysCreations. Another user had a slightly more vulgar response.

Oh, Twitter, where there's never a boring day.

Do you think it's cool that Oprah fired back, or should she have kept quiet? Give us your take in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
After the Internal Revenue Service (IRS) revealed its social media presence on Tuesday, we began to think about how other government agencies could utilize the platform.

The Tumblr audience is mostly comprised of younger, visual-starved Millennials who use GIFs to make a point and cat photos as a punchline. The IRS Tumblr site is filled with infographics and lengthy, text-heavy posts  which explains the lack of engagement from the community.

So how could other government agencies adapt to the Dashboard? Though created in good fun, these mocked up posts might point them in the right direction.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Have you ever wished you could sit atop of the Burj Khalifa, the tallest building in the world, and take a look around like Tom Cruise in Mission Impossible 4? It's your lucky day, at least if you are content with a virtual experience substitute.

SEE ALSO: San Francisco Bridge to Become Stunning Light Show

You can now immerse yourself in a stunning 360 degree panorama view from the top of the Burj Khalifa, a building that reaches 2,722 feet or 830 meters. The panorama  which is so gargantuan it takes 2.5 GB of hard disk space  has been released in celebration of the second Hamdan Bin Mohammed Bin Rashid Al Maktoum Photography Award (HIPA) and was first reported on by Gizmodo.

Dubai-based photographer Gerald Donovan made the image using 48 different panorama pictures shot at a resolution of 80 megapixels and then stitched together.

To access the interactive panorama, click here.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Pose, an online and mobile community where users go to swap photos and videos of their outfits, makeup and shopping finds, is perhaps most accurately described as "Instagram for fashion."

But Instagram is already highly treasured by the fashion community. At first blush, the social savvy fashion model Coco Rocha said she couldn't imagine the world needed such a thing. "Well it turns out, we do," she proclaimed. A year after signing up for the app, Rocha found she had developed two times the following on Pose (around 450,000 followers) compared to Instagram (approximately 250,000). "There's a huge audience of people interested in what others are wearing," she observed.

For fashion lovers, Pose has a few advantages over Instagram. It's easy to find fashion content, because that's all users are sharing. Many clothing items are also tagged so that users can track down, and in some cases directly purchase, individual goods. They can also save their favorite looks by dragging them and dropping them onto Pinterest-like "Collections" boards, say for "Eveningwear" or "Nail art." Additionally, Pose is available on a wider variety of platforms  it has apps for iPhone, iPad and Android devices, and works on both the web and Facebook.

Rocha is also a fan of the L.A.-based startup's business model. Since the beginning, the app has encouraged users to tag their outfits with brand names and prices. As of September, they have been able to link those items directly to retail websites where they can be purchased. If a follower makes a purchase through the app, the uploader will receive a small affiliate fee for that sale; Pose, too, will take a (smaller) fraction.

"The idea is a good business model for young fashionistas, and a new, legitimate way to monetize on social media," Rocha contends.

In an interview with Mashable last week, Pose founder and CEO Dustin Rosen declined to share sales figures to date, but said that bringing shopping to the forefront has changed the way people interact with the app and how much they engage with it. Users, who are now viewing 120 million images per month collectively, open the app to browse, save and shop looks. "We're letting [users] know where they can buy looks, where and at what prices, which has led to cross-the-board [engagement] increases," says Rosen. "We're like a fashion magazine but on a phone, a great way for women to spend five minutes on their commutes."

Pose is still exploring other monetization possibilities, namely advertising. "We are actively seeking opportunities for brands to reach our audience," says Rosen. "But we don't want to be in the business of selling tiny banners at the bottom of the apps. We want to be integrated in more innovative ways."

Rosen said he was "open" to opportunities to raise more funding this year  the company has raised more than $4.5 million in venture capital to date  as the company builds out more revenue products. Celebrity stylist Rachel Zoe and her husband, Rodger Berman, are the company's two highest profile investors.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Even back then, cats were funny without trying too hard. Though this saber tooth dude might be trying a bit too much.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Streaming music service Rdio has started offering up to six months of free music streaming in 14 new countries.

The list of countries where the service is available (besides the U.S., where free music streaming was available before) is as follows: UK, Australia, Belgium, Canada, Denmark, Estonia, Finland, France, Netherlands, New Zealand, Norway, Portugal, Spain, and Sweden.

Boasting a library of 18 million songs, Rdio offers free streaming, either through the web or Rdio's desktop apps for Mac and Windows. Perks include free listening for up to 6 months (depending on how many songs you stream), creation and collaboration on playlists, a music discovery engine and the ability to share your music-listening habits in real time on Facebook and Twitter.

If you like the service, you can upgrade to one of Rdio's subscription plans: $4,99 per month for unlimited web streaming or $9.99 for unlimited web and mobile streaming plus offline listening.

Sign up on Rdio's website and tell us how you like the service in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Extra! Extra! Watch all about it.

An look inside the day-to-day lives of a newspaper staff may soon be coming to NBC's weekly TV lineup. Last week, the media network issued a casting call for small-town newspapers to partake in a new reality show. Already, they've received more than 150 entries from publications across the country.

The focus of the show is still up for debate. The New York Times reported that NBC executives have received a variety of pitches, ranging from editors talking about the decline of the print media industry to showcasing their quirky talents.

SEE ALSO: Twitter May Launch Reality TV Shows

Ben Ringe, senior vice president for development for NBC News Peacock Productions, told the Times that he expects the show to work two ways: first, as a hit for NBC's viewers, and second as a boost in ratings and advertising for the chosen paper.

The network's producers are currently reading through the applications and deciding which publications will make the final cut.

Does this sound like something you'd watch?
--------------------------------------------------------------
How can we make young people care about the so-called "fiscal cliff," a critical matter to America's future, but one that seems to barely register among many of the citizens who will have to live with its potential consequences?

SEE ALSO: President Obama 'Slow Jams the News' With Jimmy Fallon [VIDEO]

One strategy might be to have Jimmy Fallon, NBC Nightly News anchor Brian Williams and The Roots slow jam the fiscal cliff. That's just what happened Monday night, and the results are pretty spectacular as you'll learn for yourself in the video above.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Are you getting the most out of your phone?

The smartphone in your pocket puts gadgets from Star Trek to shame. So why are you only using it to play Temple Run 2 nine hours a day? You can unlock potential you didn't know your phone had. In the video above, the kind geniuses at Hack College tell you how.

Hint: You can use the camera for things other than making NSFW Vine clips.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It was fitting that the 19th Screen Actors Guild Awards ceremony boosted its social media profile this year. One of the night's most popular bits basically rehashed a viral Facebook review of Les Misrables. This year's show experienced a nearly tenfold increase in social participation since 2012, garnering more than half a million mentions online.

Daniel Day-Lewis, Jennifer Lawrence, Tommy Lee Jones and Anne Hathaway were among the night's big winners. The SAG broadcast only placed eighth on the cable rankings for the week, however. Professional wrestling, hockey, basketball and MTV's reality show Catfish came in ahead.

SEE ALSO: SAG Awards Recap: Best Moments and Acceptance Speeches

Meanwhile, on the list of top broadcast programs, The Vampire Diaries snuck into the top spot as the most social non-sports program. Last week's big entry, American Idol, was in fifth place, just ahead of mainstays like The Simpsons and Family Guy.

The data is courtesy of Trendrr, which measures social media activity related to specific television shows (e.g. mentions, likes, check-ins) across Twitter, Facebook, GetGlue and Viggle. To see daily rankings, check out Trendrr.TV.
--------------------------------------------------------------
J.J. Abrams will pack up a suitcase filled with lens flares and travel to a galaxy far, far away to direct Disney's first crack at Star Wars. How will the Alias creator and Star Trek reboot director tackle the legendary film series?

SEE ALSO: Internet Boldly Uses the Force on Star Wars, Star Trek Memes

YouTube channel AVbyte imagines one option  a Star Wars musical. Imagine dancing droids mingling with daddy issues-prone princesses and Yoda jazz hands.

BONUS: 10 Star Wars Technologies We Actually Want
--------------------------------------------------------------
Scott Gerber is the founder of Young Entrepreneur Council, a non-profit organization that promotes youth entrepreneurship. The YEC recenty launched #StartupLab, a free virtual mentorship program that helps millions of entrepreneurs grow businesses.

The tech startups gearing up to make waves in 2013 (and beyond) are far more than just predictable apps  they're solving real problems and changing the way we interact with our daily technology, from hardware that authenticates smartphone transactions to digital billboards to Near Field Communication (NFC) technology.

To find out more, I asked a panel of successful young entrepreneurs to share which startups they're keeping an eye on in the new year. Here's what they had to say.





 SnowShoe is a startup located here in Madison, Wis. They recently developed the SnowShoe Stamp  a piece of hardware used to authenticate smartphone transactions. The applications of this technology are just about limitless and span across many industries. Their development team won this year's TechCrunch Hackathon!



 Clarity.fm is a platform that allows entrepreneurs to connect with experts for advice. I was super skeptical when I first heard about it, as I am with any sort of new way to find mentorship and/or advice. I believe that true mentorship grows organically. But then I logged in and saw how easy it was to connect with people who could offer me valuable business advice at a fair price (or free). I was super impressed and can see how it would have been exceptionally valuable especially in the early stages of my business.



 

BetterCloud is the tech startup to watch in 2013. Most of us have been using Google for our personal email, chat, calendar, docs, voice and much more. But now, Google's business suite, Google Apps, is becoming the leader for company messaging (read: email) and collaboration (read: chat and sharing docs), and as companies adopt the suite and leave Microsoft behind, they need tools to manage, secure and train their users. That is where the tools that BetterCloud has to offer will come in. It's like what Norton Utilities did for Windows, BetterCloud will do for Google Apps. They've been flying under the radar, but according to their site (FlashPanel.com), their tools serve over 3.5 million users today.



 

Customer.io has completely changed the game for us regarding customer retention. Customer.io effectively automates the process of making sure your customers don't "go cold" and forget about you. In two quarters, our repeat business jumped from 35% of all customers to 52%  no single company has had more of an impact on our numbers than these guys.



Found enables you to instantly find your files, images, etc. across your Mac and personal cloud services within one fully integrated search experience. As online collaboration improves, the onus to organize files becomes overwhelming. We all have files in Gmail, Box, Dropbox, our desktop and more. Found, which was the No. 1 downloaded free app for awhile in the App Store, allows you to seamlessly find your stuff no matter where it is.



 

How would you like to be able to use gestures to control your computer, the way you do on video game systems like Xbox Kinect? Flutter is making that possible, by enabling regular web cams to act as motion sensors. Considering that the company estimates that there are over 5 billion camera-enabled devices, this could be a huge technology very soon.



 

The average consumer hasn't been exposed to the powers of NFC technology. Flojack is a leader in the space, and will be introducing the concept to the world in 2013. With NFC, the world becomes accessible and interactive through the use of your mobile device. The more items that are tagged around you, the more you will be able to control your surroundings.



 

Unlike a lot of other "me-too" or "nice-to-do-but-not-critical" startups, this startup is focused on solving a huge problem: how is my website or app running? If it's slow, what's causing the problem? Developers are the target market, so many entrepreneurs might not know about it for that reason. However, using this tool helps your business as it grows online. I highly recommend it for any business looking to grow with a web presence. It provides you a ton of useful statistical feedback in the form of charts and graphs that you can't get anywhere else. This company is a little more than a year old, but they're already killin' it with 30,000+ customers. Keep an eye on them; they're going to continue to grow quickly in 2013.



RemarkableHire uses social evidence to help recruiters and hiring managers find and evaluate talent through the "collective voice of the crowd," providing a proof point behind candidates knowledge and expertise. Instead of a candidate claiming to be proficient in Ruby, RemarkableHire shows candidates that have actual evidence of Ruby experience by crawling sites like GitHub and Quora.



 Jonathan Abrams, who previously founded or co-founded Friendster, HotLinks, Socializr and the Founders Den, is taking a new approach at social news with startup Nuzzel. He built the prototype himself, and it's one of the few beta services I use daily. Nuzzel sends you a daily digest of the most popular news from your friends or the people you follow. With so much news in our social channels, Nuzzel helps prioritize. And Abrams has a nose for social.

Thumbnail image courtesy of Flickr, Official U.S. Navy Imagery
--------------------------------------------------------------
Some people prefer to work in a traditional office setting, others like Richard Branson prefer to do most of their work on a private beach.

LinkedIn published a collection of pictures on Tuesday from more than 50 prominent people showing where they work from day to day. The photo series, called View From My Desk, features pictures and brief write-ups from big names like Virgin CEO Branson, Arianna Huffington and T. Boone Pickens.

The people included in the photo collection are part of LinkedIn's Influencers Network, a group of more than 200 thought leaders who share original posts with their followers on LinkedIn. Since it launched in October, the influencers have shared 2,300 posts.

We went through the photo collection and picked out a few of the workstations from notable figures in tech and media.

Which of the workspaces is your favorite? Share in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Being a new parent is such an exciting time, but also an extremely busy one. If you need advice or organizational tools, smartphone apps can save you time, provide solutions and let you focus on what's really important  your baby.

"Having information literally in the palm of your hand can help a new mom feel connected and, for those middle of the night feedings, can even serve as a flashlight so you don't have to turn on lights and risk waking the baby," said Rebecca Levey, mommy blogger and cofounder, KidzVuz.com.

Of course you don't want to spend all your time on your phone while you have a baby to take care of, but these apps aren't time wasters. A number of baby apps let you enter feeding times, diaper changes and then share that information with others. This helps keep both parents and caregivers on top of what the baby needs, and can also help new parents to establish a schedule for their infant.

Take a look through the gallery and see which of these apps can help bring order to your upside down days.

Are you a new parent who has a favorite baby-related app? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Getting a professional to come and set up your home theater equipment can be expensive, which means many of us end up trying to take on the task ourselves. Tuesday THX launched its first mobile app, THX tune-up, designed to make that process much simpler.

Even if you know your audio and video equipment, tweaking your own personal setup can be a daunting task. What audio do you use to test the speakers? How do you know youve really got the colors on your TV set up correctly?

THXs app turns your iPhone into the Geek Squad, providing step-by-step instructions through audio narration and text on how to set up your television and audio equipment.

Its an app that allows the average consumer  not the calibrator or the home theater installer  but the average Joe or Jane to have some resources and guidance from THX, Sandra Benedetto, director of product management at THX told Mashable.

The interactive app offers detailed instructions and help to set up your televisions aspect ratio, brightness, contrast, color, and tint appropriately as well as test your speakers to ensure theyre connected to the correct audio video receiver (AVR) output, that all of your speakers wires are connected correctly and that all of your speakers are in phase.

Designed to be used as a two-screen experience, to start the process users will need to connect their iOS device to their television using a digital audio/video adapter or via Airplay. Once connected, you can use your iDevice to control whats on your television.

Audio scripts walk you though each step of the set-up process, which often involves a picture or graphic on the screen. Narration can also be turned off, and you can instead read the directions.

The brightness setting, for instance, is set using a pattern with the THX logo. The logo has a drop shadow. To set the brightness on your TV, you are asked to turn the brightness all the way down, and then turn it up until you are able to see the drop shadow.

Color settings are done by pointing your device at your television and adjusting the colors on your television based on what you are able to see on your iPhone or iPads screen.

THX has also added a number of its cinema features to the app including THX Trailers  the same that can be seen in THX Certified Cinemas  for showing off your perfectly-tuned setup, and Ask Tex a feature that helps customers get answers to any questions they might have about their home theater equipment or the setup process.

This is a way we can give them [users] the tools and understanding to get the best out of their system regardless of what they paid for it, says Benedetto.

THX is available now for iOS, and will be free through February 4th. The company plans on releasing an Android version of the app in the Spring.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Take a look at the image below. Looks like a typical Google Maps search result, right? It is. Only the flags don't indicate generic locations, like a Starbucks or Trader Joe's  they represent insecure, completely hackable security cameras across the United States.

TRENDnet Cam, a protest-like website, recently launched an interactive map to raise awareness of the flawed camera systems  designed by security company TRENDnet  that are set up in homes across the world.

News of the flawed system went viral early last year, exploding across Reddit and 4chan, and TRENDnet quickly issued a firmware upgrade. The only problem, according to TRENDnet Cam, is that the upgrade was neither automatic nor mandatory  so a handful of its customers remained unprotected.

TRENDnet Cam's purpose, then, is to demonstrate the number of the remaining cameras still vulnerable to hackers.

SEE ALSO: 7 Apps for Creepers

As of this writing, the interactive map had been shut down, with the following message on the site's homepage: "Thank you for your interest, the live site is now down and we don't plan to bring it up again."

It's unclear what caused the map to be discontinued. The site still includes a link to TRENDnet's homepage, which it urges customers to visit to manually install the upgrade.

Have you, or anyone you know, ever had a web or security camera hacked?

 


--------------------------------------------------------------
Twitter is now the fastest-growing social platform on the planet, beating Facebook and Google+ for the top spot, new research suggests.

The number of active users on the microblogging service grew 40% from the second quarter to the fourth quarter of 2012  equal to 288 million monthly active users, according to Global Web Index, a syndicated market-research service on web behavior and social media. (The index assessed 31 markets, and defines "active" as those who claim to "have used or contributed to Twitter in the past month.")

In July 2009, it estimated that Twitter only had 35.47 million monthly active users. Since then, the social network has seen an impressive growth rate of 714%.

Users are also more engaged, with 59% of account holders now active on a monthly basis.

Overall, 21% of the worldwide Internet population now actively uses Twitter on a monthly basis. For a more detailed look at the study, watch the video, above.

Which social network do you use the most? Tell us in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Twitter has addressed the topic of six-second porn videos on its service Vine for a second time, admitting that it is "changing how users find and view sensitive content."

On Monday, the company apologized for a "human error" that led to a pornographic video making its Editors' Picks list. The account responsible for that video, NSFWVine, now appears to be blocked on the service.

Also Monday, users began to notice that certain hashtags  such as #porn, #vineporn and #nsfw  were no longer searchable on the service. In our tests, the hashtags did not show up in searches roughly three quarters of the time.

When asked about Vine hashtag removal, a Twitter spokesperson gave Mashable this statement: "We're in the process of changing how users find and view sensitive content. We're experimenting with a number of approaches and will continue to iterate."

In other words, the site is testing ways of censoring the most common hashtags used to find porn on Vine. That doesn't block the offending videos from the service altogether, but it does make the genre harder for users to find.

According to the Guardian, the owners of the NSFWVine account denied it had been blocked. The owners also stated the purpose of the account was to gather Vine videos for a website where they could make money on advertising.

Why anyone would go to a website with six-second clips when pornography is abundant on the rest of the Internet wasn't immediately clear. Still, Twitter evidently feels obliged to make some effort to strike back against such accounts, lest Vine be saddled with a reputation. One possible solution in the long-term: a "safe search" option like the one you'll find on Google Images.

Complicating all of these matters: a service-wide outage that hit Vine midday Tuesday.

Should Twitter actively remove porn hashtags on the service? Give us your take in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Self-destructing tapes from the "Mission Impossible" TV series and films served fictional spies well during the Cold War. Today, the U.S. military wants a modern version of vanishing electronics that are able to disappear upon command in the environment or a human body.

The U.S. Defense Advanced Research Projects Agency (DARPA) is looking for such spy craft technology at a time when swarms of electronic sensors and communication devices already help U.S. troops hunt enemies, keep track of friendly forces and monitor threats from nuclear, biological or chemical weapons. Futuristic electronics able to self-destruct upon command would help prevent devices from falling into enemy hands and littering the environment.

"The [Vanishing, Programmable Resources] program seeks to address this pervasive challenge by developing electronic systems capable of physically disappearing in a controlled, triggerable manner," DARPA said in a special notice on Jan. 25.

Disposable electronics could either degrade into environmentally harmless substances or get absorbed into the human body if they act as biomedical implants, DARPA said. The idea could fit with another DARPA project aimed at making "nanosensors" capable of monitoring or even fixing the human body like a swarm of tiny doctors.

Lab versions of vanishing electronics already include microchip components, biomedical implants and even a 64-pixel digital camera. But DARPA points out that degradable electronics based on polymeric or biologically derived materials often perform worse than traditional electronics or prove less durable  a problem for U.S. military standards.

Researchers must also tackle the challenge of making a new generation of vanishing electronics that can self-destruct upon command, rather than simply building varieties that slowly disappear over time.

The "Vanishing, Programmable Resources" program has planned a Proposer's Day on Feb. 14 at the Capital Conference Center in Arlington, Va.  a day for researchers and companies to find out more about DARPA's vision of the future.

This article originally published at TechNewsDaily here
--------------------------------------------------------------
If you were planning on using Vine to create a GIF of todays lunch you may need to make other plans.

The app is currently experiencing a service interruption that prevents the creation of new Vines as well as browsing Vines already created.

The service interruption has been acknowledged on Vines Twitter account, where it is said to be temporary.

UPDATE: As of 11:15 PT/ 2:15 ET Vine service has been restored.

Composite by Jeremy Cabalona, from photo by Emily Price and iStock Photo AleaImage
--------------------------------------------------------------
It's the kind of moment that comes rarely, but tech journalists live for it: a service is launched with little fanfare and receives a sudden, energetic burst of genuine buzz. Developers start remixing it in all kinds of fascinating ways. It's supremely easy to use, and mobile, so we get hooked.

The technology itself is not new, but it is presented in a new and interesting form. It fosters creative competition. It starts to get traction in our lives.

The last time the tech world could agree this was happening was the launch of Instagram in 2010. We'd seen plenty of photo services before; Flickr had been around for the better part of a decade.

But here was one that was kind of a throwback to instant cameras, kind of something new, supremely social and creative in a quick and easy way.

It also resolutely refused to exist as anything other than an iPhone app. If you wanted to use it, you pulled your phone out of your pocket, took some snapshots and filtered them, or browsed the work of others. The fast-loading stream of Polaroid-like shots was a perfect match for a smartphone screen.

You hoped your gauzy efforts would rack up Likes from friends, of course. Who doesn't crave that recognition? But you also felt like you were participating in an historic, global effort to document human life, one snap at a time.

In short, Instagram perfectly captured the ineffable shared something that 21st century Internet users have taken to calling "the now."

Now here comes 2013's hot contender, another iPhone app: Vine. It's too early to tell if the service is going to blossom like Instagram did (the service has 90 million active users and counting, two and a half years after launch).

Vine is currently #4 in the App Store, beating out Google Maps and YouTube. It's the top social networking app by far.

One advantage Vine does have in its search for staying power is the enormous benefit of starting out with a major social service, Twitter, as a parent. (Instagram had to prove itself in the wild before it was snapped up by Facebook in a deal originally valued at $1 billion.)

And if anything, Vine is even better at capturing "the now" than Instagram.

Like Twitter, Vine benefits from an inherent limit. The parent company won't let you transmit more than 140 characters of your brilliance at a time; Vine makes you shoot your video in six seconds or less. Those six seconds don't have to be consecutive  you just start and stop recording by tapping on the screen  which can lead to all manner of interesting stop-motion animations, such as this heroic example from Mashable's own Jeremy Cabalona.

That means Vine is easily understandable, even mockable  as in this animation from the blog Willa's World:

That's fine. Instagram was consistently mocked as a purveyor of food photos. Twitter was consistently mocked as a stream of short "what I had for breakfast" updates. Neither stereotype stopped tremendous growth. Indeed, they may well have aided it.

What mattered in each case was that the service was easily summarized and differentiated. You could grok it instantly. You had a reason to try it. And here's a good rule of thumb: if you can describe what makes a service different in three easy words  "filtered square photos," perhaps, or "140 character updates," or "six-second videos"  it has a good shot at taking off.

To put it another way, here's how top Valley VC Marc Andreessen has described his process for deciding which companies to invest in: "I look for the thing people are laughing at, but is growing like a weed."

Some argue that Cinemagram, or GIF creation tools like it, are better apps than Vine. Cinemagram has more functionality  you can, for example, create a GIF that loops back and forth in time, rather than repeating the way Vine does.

But that doesn't really matter. Cinemagram and apps like it are riding a wider wave of animated GIFs. They've sacrificed differentiation to be part of a web trend. Can you honestly tell whether a GIF was created on Cinemagram? Do you care? Can you make the service sound unique in three words?

Vine videos are short, but they're noticeably longer than most GIFs. There's less of that jarring ADD sensation. You can pack a surprising amount of visual information into six seconds. And because it's in a stream, you're encouraged to move on to the next one rather than stare at the same video over and over.

GIFs are timeless; part of their appeal is they can be reused in online conversation over and over. Favorite GIFs become memes, and favorite memes become GIFs. But Vine's appeal is almost the opposite. It's raw footage, cinema verite. It's not surprising that the first news Vine, a dolphin trapped in New York harbor, arrived almost immediately.

You can see that most clearly on a service like Vinepeek, which aggregates Vine videos in real time. The results are quotidian, but endlessly fascinating. A guy jumps for joy in a parking lot. A horse grazes in a field. Someone opens a Pop Tart. Someone bowls a strike.

All human (and non-human) life is here. It's the now, in its purest distilled form.

Is Vine going to keep growing, or will it wilt? Share your predictions in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Washington Post is making it easier for the American public to hold politicians accountable by launching a prototype for a fact-checking tool that determines if their statements in public addresses are true or false.

During the last presidential campaign, many pundits took to live blogs and Twitter to fact-check the debates live. WaPo's tool, called "Truth Teller," aims to automate that process.

A software program recognizes and transcribes speech into text, which appears to the right of the video. As statements are transcribed, they are run against WaPo's database of facts, matching keywords to determine if an assertion is accurate. If it is, a "true" label will flash above the statement. Misleading statements will likewise be identified.

Beneath the video, viewers can check the full transcript as well as statements that have been tested by the Truth Teller.

If you head over to truthteller.washingtonpost.com, you'll find six video debates on tax reform that have already been fact checked (and again verified by a human researcher). That library will grow over time. WaPo's ultimate goal is to turn Truth Teller into a live fact-checking machine, something it will test internally during the President's State of the Union address on Feb. 12, Cory Haik, executive producer of digital news at WaPo, tells Mashable.

In a press statement, Haik said Truth Teller was inspired by politics editor Steven Ginsberg, who wanted a way to instantly verify politicians' public statements. Its development has been financed thus far by the Knight Foundation's Prototype Fund, which offers up to $50,000 to support the development of innovative projects in news and information.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Vine's meteoric rise to the number five free app in the App Store (and the top free social networking app) probably has a lot to do with hype from its new parent company, Twitter. It may have also gotten a bump, as it were, from the proliferation of porn videos app users shot over the weekend.

But Vine is not the first app to provide a quick way to make entertaining video clips. Nor, based on our tests, is it the best. That honor goes to Cinemagram.

Both services offer simple ways to turn videos into entertaining looping clips, but Cinemagram, which launched about a year ago, offers more features and has successfully solved its inappropriate content problem.

Shortly after its February 2012 launch, the developers manually flagged inappropriate content, added a reporting feature and warned users, "You will be banned for submitting inappropriate content. Please don't." Today, about the worst video you'll see is an oozing wound and a guy taking off his T-shirt.

But Cinemagram's features trump Vine in ways beyond its policies.

1. Keep your videos private: Unlike other social photo and video apps, you can keep your cines (pronounced cin-ees) private, meaning you don't have to share with the service itself and can save your video to your phone. This feature is also helpful if you want to save a video for later editing. With Vine, it's shoot-and-share or delete.

2. Use any video: With Cinemagram, you can shoot a video with the app or import a video from your camera roll. With Vine, you can use only videos you've just shot with the Vine app.

3. Find your friends: Find friends on Facebook who are using Cinemagram and follow them. (Facebook has blocked Vine's integration with its service, so you can't connect with Facebook friends or post Vines to Facebook.)

4. Share to more places: If you want to share a cine, you can share directly to Tumblr , send as an email, as well as share to Facebook and Twitter by turning sharing on for each service once you've finished your video.

5. Apply filters: Cinemagram offers 15 filters to add a variety of colors and effects, a feature similar to Instagram's filters for photos. Read more: Twitter Photo Filters No Match for Instagram

6. Message users: You can direct message any Cinemagram user by clicking the envelope icon next to users' names on their profile pages.

7. Add professional video clips: Cinemagram provides stock video clips from its partners such as Paramount Pictures, Red Bull and One Direction that you may use in your own cines, either on their own or by using along with video you shoot.

8. Go backwards: You have the option of looping your video in reverse instead of forward. With Cinemagram, you can also adjust the speed of your video.

9. Use a mask: Perhaps the most intriguing use of Cinemagram: You can designate an area of your video to move while the rest appears still.

10. Search by location: Find videos in a region based on geotags. (Just tap the location to see a stream of videos shot in a particular city or area. With Vines, you can search only by hashtags and user names.)

This article originally published at TechNewsDaily here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Drones are already widely-used tools for surveillance. They're routinely sent to spy in Afghanistan, Pakistan, and even on the U.S.-Mexico border. Soon enough, their civilian counterparts could fly over your city too. But drone cameras are still somewhat limited. Not the ARGUS-IS, the highest resolution camera ever made, however. With its 1.8 gigapixels mounted on a drone, its spying power it's equal to 100 Predator drones flying over a mid-sized city.

The ARGUS, which was developed by the Defense Advanced Research Agency (DARPA), has an impressive range. It can cover up to 15 square miles with extreme accuracy. Its resolution allows it to spot objects as small as six inches from 17,500 feet of altitude.

SEE ALSO: MPAA Wants to Use Drones to Shoot Movies

With such a high resolution, the ARGUS also requires a lot of storage capacity. In fact, it can stash away 1 million terabytes every day. And it also live streams footage to the ground, allowing an operator to monitor a large area with just one camera.

In case you're wondering if the ARGUS camera is currently used either abroad or in the U.S., we're not allowed to know the answer; that information is classified.

The ARGUS was featured on the recent PBS Nova special Rise of the Drones. Watch the video above to learn more about this amazing camera.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It looks like YouTube is about to take a big step towards monetizing its videos.

YouTube is planning to launch paid subscriptions for a couple dozen channels as soon as April, according to a new report in AdAge citing "multiple people familiar with the plans."

The online video site has reportedly reached out to a "small group" of channels asking them to apply to be among the first paid channels. There is also talk that YouTube might charge for live events like concerts and libraries of older episodes.

AdAge reports that the initial subscription costs would be between $1 and $5 per month. These channels would also have the option to show ads.

Right now, this effort is being billed as an "experiment," but it's one that YouTube reps have been suggesting for a long time. YouTube's CEO Salar Kamangar teased the idea multiple times last year and noted during the Reuters Media and Technology Summit in June that it had "seen demand from from the kind of networks that have smaller audiences on cable."

By effectively launching a-la-cart and pay-per-view options for consuming video content, YouTube would likely bring in more money from ad dollars and a cut of the subscription revenue.

"We have long maintained that different content requires different types of payment models," a YouTube rep told Mashable in a statement. "The important thing is that, regardless of the model, our creators succeed on the platform. There are a lot of our content creators that think they would benefit from subscriptions, so were looking at that."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Welcome to this morning's edition of "First To Know," a series in which we keep you in the know on what's happening in the digital world.

Today, we're looking at three particularly interesting stories. Amazon reported mixed quarterly earnings on Thursday  $21.27 billion in revenue was a little short of Wall Streets expectations, but the sting was lessened somewhat by $405 million in operating income. YouTube could be launching a paid video subscription model as soon as April. Finally, Twitter's video sharing service Vine is really picking up speed, with new tools to make sharing easier showing up each day. The latest on this list is Vineit, a browser extension that lets you share Vine videos to Tumblr with one click.

Check out the video above for more on these stories.
--------------------------------------------------------------
One does not simply walk away with an Oscar.

Much like politics, it takes campaigning to win over the treasured Academy. Yes, there is all that acting and looking beautiful to achieve, but Oscar winners go above and beyond  they rally.

Anne Hathaway is no stranger to the inner workings of the Academy and she isn't letting all the hard work (and lost weight) of playing Fantine in Les Miserables go to waste. She's begging for that Best Supporting Actress win like she begged Disney to stop making Princess Diaries movies (we suspect).

SEE ALSO: Did 'Les Miserables' Actors Steal Jokes From a Meme?

Ok fine, so it really isn't Anne in this video but this singer makes quite the argument for her case. This rendition of "I Dreamed A Dream" reminds us of the pain it has taken Anne to get to that Oscar stage, including losing her luscious locks.

Do you think Hathaway deserves the Oscar this year? Share in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Although Apple remains the leader in app revenue, earning over three-and-a-half times that of Google Play in December, it is seeing a rising challenge from Android's app market, which is growing at a faster rate.

Monthly revenue for the App Store grew by a record one-third from November to December of 2012, surpassing the impressive revenue increase during those months in 2011, according to a report by app-store analytics firm, App Annie. Its revenue from the third quarter to the fourth quarter of 2012 grew by one-fifth.

"As highly-desired holiday gifts in many countries, new iPhones and iPads (including the recently launched iPad mini) typically lead to a jump in app downloads, and consequently, app revenue," the firm, which did not provide exact figures, wrote.

Apple's growth rate, however, paled in comparison to its rival, which saw its revenue double from the third quarter to the fourth quarter of 2012.

Google Play owed this boost to Japan, the U.S. and South Korea, which respectively led the growth, and contributed nearly half of the store's app revenue in the fourth quarter of last year. A majority of app revenue from these countries came from games.

In terms of the top countries based on revenue, the App Store saw China rise in the ranks, demonstrating that Asia is an increasingly vital mobile-app market. Currently in sixth place, the country moved up from the eighth to the seventh spot last October.

"Given its recent growth rates and its population size, China's eventual revenue potential for the iOS App Store cannot be ignored," App Annie wrote.

Last month, Apple CEO Tim Cook called China "a very important market" for the Cupertino, Calif. company. For this reason, we will likely see further growth in China for the App Store, as well as for Apple overall, App Annie said.

What do you think of these findings? Tell us in the comments, below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
After the wildly successful launch of Bang With Friends, a new sex app has debuted online  Bang With Professionals. Its goal: to help hook users up over LinkedIn.

The site is likely a parody of Bang With Friends  a controversial app that anonymously connects Facebook friends who express mutual sexual interest  which launched to much fanfare last week. Bang With Friends said Tuesday that it has over 30,000 users, with five new users every minute.

At the top of its website, Bang With Professionals says its services are "coming soon." The layout mirrors that of Bang With Friends, and also references it with the tagline, "Because people you want to bang aren't always Facebook friends."

The two sites also share similar descriptions:

BangWithProfessionals.com is the easiest way to find co-workers in your LinkedIn connections that would secretly want to get more intimate. Our services are completely secure and anonymous. Your co-workers will only know you're interested for more if they are interested too.

Bang With Professionals tells visitors to "request an invite" by entering their email address. Users are led to a page that encourage them to tell co-workers by sharing a link.

Of course, the whole service could well be an elaborate parody. The notion of using an app to get intimate with co-workers does seem faintly ridiculous. Bang With Professionals did not immediately respond to a request for comment.

Do you think the site is for real? Tell us in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Bill Gates' 2013 Annual Letter highlighted the power of data and measurement to help lift the world's most needy up from poverty.

This year's letter was presented through an interactive experience fit with shareable quotations, embedded films and infographics. You can also view photos of Gates and his wife Melinda's work around the world, from meeting with high school students in Denver to visiting agricultural facilities in Ethiopia.

"In previous annual letters, I've focused a lot on the power of innovation to reduce hunger, poverty, and disease," Gates writes, explaining this year's focus. "But any innovation  whether it's a new vaccine or an improved seed  can't have an impact unless it reaches the people who will benefit from it. That's why in this year's letter I discuss how innovations in measurement are critical to finding new, effective ways to deliver these tools and services to the clinics, family farms, and classrooms that need them."

The Microsoft founder still considers technology to be at the core of improving measurement systems.

"Thanks to cell phones, satellites, and cheap sensors, we can gather and organize data with increasing speed and accuracy," he wrote.

1. Pick the Right Measures: "I think a lot of efforts fail because they don't focus on the right measure or they don't invest enough in doing it accurately." 2. Establish Clear and Concrete Goals: "Many people assumed the [Millenium Development Goals] pact would be filed away and forgotten like so many U.N. and government pronouncements. However, since the goals were clear and concrete, they brought focus to the highest priorities." 3. Learn From Success Cases: "Ethiopia found a successful model for achieving this goal in the Indian state of Kerala, which had lowered its child mortality rate and improved a host of other health indicators, in part through a vast network of community health care posts. This is one of the benefits of measurement  the ability it gives government leaders to make comparisons across countries, find who's doing well, and then learn from the best." 4. Maternal Health Has Improved: "According to a long-held Ethiopian custom, parents wait to name their children because disease is rampant, health care is sparse, and children often die in the first weeks of life ... But a lot has changed in Ethiopia since the birth of Sebsebila's first child. This time, with more confidence in her new baby's chances of survival, Sebsebila didn't hesitate to name her." 5. Accurate Measurements Are Crucial: "Setting targets for immunization and other interventions can motivate government health workers, but it can also encourage over-reporting to avoid problems with supervisors." 6. Every Case Counts: "The number of global polio cases has been under 1,000 cases for the last two years, but getting rid of the very last few cases is the hardest part." 7. Technology Brings Accountability: "Tracks are downloaded from the phone to a laptop at the end of the day so managers can see the route the vaccinators followed and compare it to the route they were assigned." 8. Feedback Breeds Success: "The Eagle County system is impressive because it focuses on helping each teacher grow. The evaluations are used to give a teacher not only a score but also specific feedback on areas to improve and ways to build on their strengths." 9. We Can Only Move Forward: "Once these tools are invented, they are never un-invented  they just improve." 10. Challenges Are Still Ahead: "Two that worry me the most are the possibility that we won't be able to raise the funds needed to pay for health and development projects, and that we won't align around clear goals to help the poorest."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Call of Duty: Black Ops II, 2012's biggest selling game, joins forces with Twitch, the biggest video game streaming network, to bring one-click streaming to all its players.

Players will now be able to stream their public matches of Call of Duty: Black Ops II to Twitch from their Xbox 360, PlayStation 3 or PC without purchasing any additional hardware.

"Twitch is extremely excited to announce our integration with Call of Duty: Black Ops II. It's going to blow the doors wide open for a new generation of console gamers to share their video game experiences," said Emmett Shear, CEO of Twitch. "There's no bigger gaming franchise on the console than Call of Duty, and we can't wait to see what the community can create with this new tool. In-game streaming is entering a whole new world."

Black Ops II has a huge multiplayer community, and that will definitely help swell Twitch's already fast growth. The platform already boasts the largest audience for gaming livestreams, with 23 million unique viewers.

"Making Call of Duty: Black Ops II not only fun to play, but also fun to watch was a key goal from the beginning of development, said Mark Lamia, studio head of Treyarch. We pushed ourselves to build these features right into the game in order to make live streaming as accessible and as social as possible for everyone."

Treyarch had already included features in the game that allowed for streaming to YouTube when it launched, but the web video service lacks the cohesive gaming community that could foster higher levels of livestream adoption, according to Twitch Vice President of Marketing Matt DiPietro. He says YouTube lacks certain important features, including the fact that videos must receive a certain number of viewers before they will be livestreamed. Twitch also has a chat feature, allowing players to more easily communicate with their audiences.

"Twitch is a dedicated video platform for gamers, whereas YouTube is broad and undifferentiated without a cohesive gaming community to rally around content," DiPietro said.

Players will also be able to use camera peripherals on their console to add their face to their Twitch livestream. Black Ops II is also integrated with social media, so players can notify their Twitter and Facebook friends that they're streaming right then.

Twitch says the streaming will roll out players as early as Wednesday at noon.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Shortly after BlackBerry CEO Thorsten Heins unveiled the first BlackBerry 10 smartphones  the full-screen Z10 and QWERTY-keyboard Q10  AT&T issued a press release saying it would be supporting both devices on its network. Verizon, Sprint and T-Mobile also made statements saying they will support BlackBerry's new phones.

With the exception of Verizon, no other carrier specified pricing. Verizon confirmed that it would sell the BlackBerry Z10 for $199.99 with a two-year contract. AT&T said only it would carry both phones, with no word on pricing. T-Mobile said it would carry the Z10, but didn't mention the Q10. Sprint did the opposite, only saying it would offer the Q10 "later this year."

No carrier specified availability, but Heins said today the Z10 would be available on U.S. carriers in March. In a Q&A with reporters after today's event, Heins said he expected the Q10 to be available in April, although he couldn't guarantee it since the carriers' testing program is "lengthy."

SEE ALSO: The First BlackBerry 10 Phone Is Exceptional, But Perplexing

Worldwide, Canadians will get the first taste of BlackBerry 10. The Z10 will be go on sale Feb. 5 in Wayne Gretzky's homeland for a slightly cheaper price: $149.95. However, that price requires a three-year contract (standard in Canada).

Unlocked, the BlackBerry Z10 costs $599. No pricing has been specified for the Q10.

All four U.S. carriers had previously announced they would support BlackBerry 10, but now they have gotten specific about which hardware would be available.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The BlackBerry Z10 is a powerful smartphone. It consolidates all messaging into a single, united interface called the Hub, it can run up to eight apps in the background, and it has an extremely high-res screen at 356 pixels per inch. But it also works in some starkly different ways than other smartphones.

For starters, there's no home button, so unlocking the phone works differently than on the iPhone and most Android phones. The BlackBerry 10 interface is gesture-based, meaning you navigate and control key functions by swiping the screen in specific ways. Minimized apps (called Active Frames) appear on their own home screen as widgets.

SEE ALSO: The First BlackBerry 10 Phone Is Exceptional, But Perplexing

So what happens when a room full of Android and iPhone users pick up a BlackBerry 10 phone for the first time? We were wondering that ourselves, so we tried it with some of Mashable's interns and editors. Sitting them down one by one, we asked them to do things such as unlock the phone, find email and get back to the home screen ... with no instruction.

The results are in the video above. Some fared better than others, but BB10 threw a curve at most of our otherwise tech-savvy staff.

Are you excited to try BlackBerry 10? Tell us why (or why not) in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Research In Motion is about to take the wraps of its next-generation smartphones  the first handsets built to run BlackBerry 10. They should be something special  RIM has been developing BB10 for three years, ever since it acquired QNX in the spring of 2010.

Today's event is being held simultaneously in eight cities worldwide: Toronto, New York City, London, Paris, Dubai, Johannesburg, Jakarta and Delhi. Mashable is live on the scene on the West Side of Manhattan, where RIM is sure to put on quite a show. The event is scheduled to get underway at 10 a.m. Eastern Time.

SEE ALSO: The First BlackBerry 10 Phone Is Exceptional, but Perplexing [REVIEW]

While the first BB10 touchscreen phone has already been leaked like crazy, RIM still has yet to fill in the details on its exact features as well as pricing. We expect those details to be forthcoming as well as a first look at the promised BlackBerry 10 phone with a QWERTY keyboard, and possibly a few surprises.

Will the first BlackBerry 10 phones thrill or disappoint? Will they have game-changing features? And even if they do, will the platform really be able to compete with the mature OSes of iOS and Android?

Follow along with us and join in the conversation via our liveblog:
--------------------------------------------------------------
During its BlackBerry 10 launch event, CEO Thorsten Heins announced a new Global Creative Director for the company: Alicia Keys.

Im fascinated by technology. I've always wanted to work directly with a technology company, said Keys. I wanted to do something where I could grow professionally and personally.

Keys says she is going to be working directly with developers and carriers on the platform, as well as with other artists. Previously a BlackBerry user, she spoke on stage about experimenting with other smartphone platforms over the past few years  she talked about being an 'iPhone Junkie' on Google+ just over a year ago  but now that BlackBerry has been "working out" she's excited to get back together.

Now we're exclusively dating again, and Im very happy, she said.

Keys took to Twitter  somewhere it appears she had been posting via iPhone just a few days ago  to express her excitement over the position:

She will be performing the national anthem at Super Bowl XLVII this Sunday, where she says she plans to bring her brand new BlackBerry 10 device.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The gym inside Royal Condominium, an upscale apartment and leisure complex in Medan, a fast-growing city on the island of Sumatra, has a safety problem. People are reluctant to let go of their BlackBerrys while they exercise. At the start of spinning classes, instructors say, "Remember to drink water, and no BBM!"

That Indonesians try to use the free BlackBerry Messenger service while stationary-cycling is testament to how much many of them love their BlackBerry smartphones, however much maligned the device now is in the developed world. Minimum-wage workers like BlackBerrys as much as Royal Condominiums upper-class spinners. In Medans biggest mall, the Sun Plaza, staff in the numerous mobile phone shops proudly fiddle with their own phones while they work.

But the BlackBerrys dominance in Indonesia could be slipping. Android phones, particularly ones made by Samsung, have jumped in popularity.

Indonesias response to the launch of the new BlackBerry 10 devices could well be the acid test for whether the companys fortunes, so weak in rich countries, can recover in emerging ones. BlackBerry has chosen Jakarta as one of several launch cities, alongside New York, London, Paris, Dubai, Johannesburg and New Delhi.

Last September, consultants IDC said the BlackBerry was Indonesias most popular smartphone. But in terms of operating systems, Googles Android has already shunted BlackBerry into second place. And Samsung claims to have won 80% of the Android smartphone market.

BlackBerry has done well in Indonesia by co-ordinating with local carriers to offer cheap messaging and social media packages. These have proven popular in a country where decent home broadband can cost $100 monthly but the minimum wage is $220 or less. Indonesias largest mobile phone company, Telekomsel, sells a BlackBerry deal (link in Indonesian) offering free messaging, Facebook and Twitter access and limited internet browsing for approximately $7 a month.

But local carriers now offer cheap Samsung deals, too. Telekomsel sells an Internet plan for the Samsung Galaxy for 49,000 rupiah a month, or around $5.

And Samsung has really cheap smartphones. The Galaxy Y sells for a little more than 1 million rupiah ($100). That could well be cheaper than the new BlackBerry Z10 phone, which is rumored to be priced at $149.

Revealingly, Samsung Indonesias mobile division vice president, Andre Rompis, told reporters earlier this month that sales of the Korean firms cheapest smartphones were growing the fastest. People are commonly upgrading their feature phones (more basic gadgets) to entry-level smartphones in Samsungs range, Rompis added. The BlackBerry will have to both remain cool and get cheaper to beat that.

This article originally published at Quartz here
--------------------------------------------------------------
BlackBerry Messenger (BBM) has long been a key feature on BlackBerry mobile devices, but it's getting a significant new perk with the ability to chat with video.

BlackBerry  the company formerly known as Research In Motion (RIM)  announced on Wednesday video chat is coming to its messaging service. The functionality will be available on the new BlackBerry Z10 smartphone and limited to users running the BlackBerry 10 mobile operating system.

To use video chat, BlackBerry Messenger users will be able to tap an icon when video chat is available. A user will also be able to share what they're viewing onscreen with the person they're chatting with.

BlackBerry Z10 will also include BBM Voice, which allows users to make free voice calls over Wi-Fi. First launched in beta version in November, the feature lets customers switch between texting and talking or doing both at the same time via a split screen.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The BlackBerry Z10 wasnt the only smartphone announced running BlackBerry 10 Wednesday.

Along with the all-touch Z10, RIM (BlackBerry now) announced the Q10, a smartphone with a built-in keyboard much like BlackBerry devices of yore.

The handset has a 3.1-inch 720x720 AMOLED display and a three-dimensional glass-weave structure on the rear of the device that CEO Thorsten Heins describes as thinner and lighter as well as stronger than plastic.

Check out the video below for a bit of an introduction to the handset.

What do you think of the Q10 and BlackBerry 10? Let us know your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
As promised, RIM has added music, TV shows and movies to its freshly renamed online store, the BlackBerry World.

The prices for albums range from $8 to $12, while movies are mostly in the $10 to $20 price range. TV shows  which, unlike movies and music, don't have a preview  cost $1.99 per episode.

All this new content is available only to people in the supported regions, which are currently the U.S., UK and Canada.

We'll likely hear about RIM's plans for BlackBerry world at the BlackBerry 10 launch event, which starts at 10AM ET today, Jan. 30.
--------------------------------------------------------------
BlackBerry  the company formerly known as Research in Motion  announced on Wednesday the arrival of its new BlackBerry Z10 smartphone, which has the potential to brighten the future of the struggling company.

The sleek device is a lightweight beauty and packs a whole slew of bells and whistles. But could the BlackBerry Z10 truly compete against the big hitters in mobile tech once again?

SEE ALSO: Could RIM Become the Biggest Comeback Story in Tech History?

Like many of its competitors, it touts a dual-core 1.5GHz Snapdragon S4 processor. It is 0.8 ounces heavier than the iPhone 5, but features a greater screen resolution (1,280 x 768 pixels)  the same as the Lumia 920, but Nokia's device is almost a whole two ounces heavier.

To give a better look at how the BlackBerry Z10 stacks up against other key products on the market, check out the chart below.

Do you think the smartphone can compete against the Apple iPhone 5, Samsung Galaxy S III and the Nokia Lumia 920?
--------------------------------------------------------------
BlackBerry, or the company formerly known as RIM, did all it could today in its bid for relevance. It delivered a cutting-edge smartphone, the Z10, a solid, old-school QWERTY Q10, and an intriguing and in some ways innovative mobile platform.

I just wish I could tell you if it's enough.

RIM ... er ... BlackBerry's CEO Thorsten Heins deftly played the role of affable showman. Standing in the middle of a perhaps over-large and too-empty stage (Apples stage is always more intimate, and I think with good reason), Heins honored those who came before him (former co-CEOs Mike Lazardis and Jim Balsillie), while clearly pushing the once-dominant mobile brand into an invigorating, though uncertain, future.

As our review points out, the Blackberry Z10 offers pretty much everything a smartphone-loving consumer could ask for: excellent, comfortable-to-hold design, powerful hardware (1.5 GHz, dual core CPU), full-featured HD camera (8 MP, 1080P), super high-resolutions screen, (more dots per inch than the iPhone 5s retina display) and tens of thousands of apps, including ones you actually want (Hello Foursquare and Angry Birds! The former's CEO, Dennis Crowley, was on hand to show his support for BlackBerry 10  see above).

BlackBerry did go further, of course. The company, which essentially built its brand (and now its name) on business, worked hard with Blackberry 10 to let consumers have their cake and laptop, too. In other words, this is the rare smartphone that starts out with the ability to contain two separate existences (business and pleasure) in one device. All it takes to switch totally sandboxed modes is a gesture - I saw this up-close and it is impressive.

This is smart and could be a critical component of BlackBerrys success. I could imagine consumers adopting the Z10 (well, thats obviously a big assumption, but for the sake of argument, lets say they do) and bringing it into the office where an IT pro will, at first, blanch because the chickens are ruling the hen house. But that tech pro may change his tune when Jill Employee adds, I use this, but you can set up the Work profile as you like. My stuff on the fun side will never touch your stuff on the work side.

Alternatively, theres a small chance that businesses that still use BlackBerry and BlackBerrys Enterprise services, may see a solution in the Z10. Finally, a device that their gadget-obsessed employees wont be embarrassed to carry, but that still satisfies all their business priorities.

Still, based on the Blackberry launch event, the company is clearly hoping to excite consumers first and get the world and business to fall into lockstep behind them. Exhibit A was the appearance of singer/songwriter Alicia Keys who Heins appeared to on-the-spot name as the companys new Global Creative Director. Think of her role as brand ambassador for BlackBerry. Keys had been a longtime BlackBerry user (hey, just like me!), but saw sexier options at the gym and finally walked away.

SEE ALSO: The First BlackBerry 10 Phone Is Exceptional, But Perplexing

Now Keys has re-embraced BlackBerry and will run around the globe touting its virtues. While Keys' role was obviously the product of long negotiation, her appearance at the event was a closely guarded secret that may have come together at the last minute. Still, it had the desired effect. Her star power sent a ripple of electric excitement through the cavernous NYC event space and, for some reason, made people wake up to the fact that BlackBerry is serious here, or, well, serious about winning over consumers.

I dont know. As Pete Pachal points out in his review of the Z10, there is a learning curve involved with the BlackBerry 10 OS. Not because its hard, but because it is different.

After the launch, I spent some time playing with the interface. First I watched someone demonstrate how to use it and then I gave it a spin. Within a minute or so, I had figured out the combinations of gestures to access the Hub (a super-smart central location for all your social and communication needs), apps, settings and more. I test drove the keyboard  using only my thumb  and found it surprisingly responsive and smart. I do wish, though, that the word suggestions were a bit more obvious. They appear sort of all over the keyboard and you flick them up to use them. Its smart but also so subtle that you might, as I initially did, miss it.

It was not all smooth sailing at the event. When it was time to reveal the most important parts  carriers, pricing, availability  Heins appeared overwhelmed by the need to make the information universal for the live, World-wide audience. In the process, he delivered a muddle of information of ship dates, carriers and price.

That was unfortunately because I think theres good news there. The subsidized Z10 (16 GBs, you can add storage via the micro SD slot), for example, is $199. Thats on par with the most affordable iPhone 5. Nokias Lumia 920, on the other hand is available for just $99. If you live in Canada, you'll save $50 on the Z10.

Also, the Z10 is shipping on AT&T, Verizon and T-Mobile (Sprint apparently got the Q10, but not the Z10), and it could arrive in the U.S. by March.

None of this was clear from what Heins said on stage. I suggest that next time he take firm control of all the deliverable information, then state it and post it clearly behind him on screen.

Yes, I believe Blackberry now has good enough technology to succeed, but there are so many other factors at play. Good, even great, hardware and software is not the only ingredient in a success souffl. Windows 8 and the Nokias Lumia line have taught Microsoft this. There are the intangibles, chief among them: How desperately consumers want your gadget.

In the mobile space, there is exactly one company capable of producing instant gadget lust - at least at the scale you need for success. Im not saying people dont lust after Android devices. They do, but not with the same passion that people exhibit for every single smartphone Apple delivers.

Blackberry Z10 is not generating that level of interest. At least not yet. Instead the Z10 ascent and Blackberrys rise from the ashes will be slower. The only problem is, does Blackberry have the patience, and time, to wait?
--------------------------------------------------------------
The BlackBerry Z10, the first smartphone to run the brand-spanking-new BlackBerry 10 operating system, finally gives us the first full look at what Research In Motion (now BlackBerry) has bet its future on. And judging by the product itself, it's a smart bet. BlackBerry 10 is a truly cutting-edge platform, capable of mobile-computing feats that Android and iOS can only dream of. 

 

However, BB10 is also coming way late to the smartphone game, and it's unclear whether it will ever get the support it needs  from consumers, businesses and developers  to really succeed. After using the Z10 for the past week, I think it would be a real shame if it didn't, because this phone can, in some surprising ways, be a real joy to use. 

 

The BlackBerry Z10 starts winning you over in the very first second with its novel way of coming out of sleep mode. Instead of pressing one of the (very few) physical buttons, you simply slide your finger up from the bottom of the screen. The phone's lock screen then lights up, but it doesn't stop there: The phone will show you the unlocked screen, too, but only up to the point where your finger is, rather like a curtain rising. Finish sliding up and the phone comes alive in whatever state you left it in; slide back down and it shuts off again. It's useful, clever and addictive  and about as cool as "slide to unlock" could ever get.

 

The trick also highlights one of the biggest problems the Z10 is going to have in winning over customers: It's unfamiliar. The Z10 has no home button. It consolidates email, messaging and notification into a Hub that demands users think about those functions differently. It has an odd way of switching between apps. 

 

While some of these departures make a lot of sense, they amount to learning curve that anyone picking up the Z10 for the first time may not have the patience for. In a world where most smartphone sales happen in a store, RIM's going to need some serious on-the-ground support for this phone for customers to really see the potential. I can see a lot of people throwing it down in frustration after the first 30 seconds.



At least RIM has designed a phone that people will want to pick up. The Z10 is a good-looking piece of hardware, and I don't think that it's any coincidence that it looks like the iPhone 5 from a distance. It's a little bit larger  0.35 of an inch thick to the iPhone's 0.30  but the overall proportions and design are virtually identical, right down to the rounded corners. 

 

This is a completely different phone, of course, and it shows. The Z10 has a rubberized back that feels good in the hand and ensures it doesn't slip, even on a sloped tabletop. The back is removable, letting you swap in a spare battery very quickly and gives quick access to things like the SIM card and microSD memory (none is included, but it accommodates up to 64GB). 

 

There are some nice touches that show off RIM's skill in designing mobile handsets. The top and the bottom of the phone are sloped slightly down toward the edges to make it more comfortable to hold in landscape mode.

The edges themselves have just the right amount of crispness, slightly duller than the iPhone's, and the volume buttons on the side have indented shapes so you can easily identify them by touch. And yes, the traditional BlackBerry blinking red LED is there. Overall, the Z10 a joy to hold.

The screen is an extremely sharp 4.2-inch LCD with a resolution of 1,280 x 768. That takes it well beyond "retina" resolution at 356 pixels per inch, and the result is ultra-crisp text and excellent color on things like photos and games. Of course, beautiful visual experiences are table stakes these days in high-end smartphones, but it's good to see RIM did its homework here.



 

Those pixels need an engine to drive them, and the Z10's is a 1.5GHz dual-core Qualcomm Snapdragon processor with 2GB of RAM. By my reckoning, the chip did a great job powering the phone, keeping up with my finger movements to make the overall experience feel fluid. App crashes were very rare, occurring far less often than they do on iOS or Android (probably about 90% less), but keep in mind BlackBerry 10 has far fewer apps and just one device that developers need to take into account. 

 

Besides being the first BB10, the Z10 is notable for being the first BlackBerry phone to have 4G LTE connectivity. Previously, the PlayBook tablet (which runs software that's similar, but not identical to BB10) was the only RIM device with LTE. Of course, LTE isn't available on every major carrier, but the Z10 will be.





It's nice that the Z10 is a great piece of hardware, but the BlackBerry 10 experience is where the phone  and RIM's chance for redemption  lives and dies. BlackBerry 10 is a powerful multitasker and organizer, but it takes some getting used to, and it's not for everyone. 

 

The big focus in BlackBerry 10 is the Hub. The Hub represents a rethinking of how mobile phones handle messaging. Instead of switching between different apps to deal with email, text messages and notifications, the Hub puts them all in one place  basically a giant Inbox with all of your messages in a single stream. Even Facebook and Twitter can be mixed in, integrated as system-wide accounts. 

 

It's less chaotic than it sounds. You can choose to display any single account at one time (say, just Gmail or Facebook notifications), and even in the main stream every message has clear icons so you can tell at a glance what it is. Don't want your Twitter @replies mixed in, but still want Hub access to them? You can turn off what appears in the stream while keeping it in the Hub.

 



The Hub is seemingly ever-present, always running in the background. Calling it up is a simple matter, but it's not immediately obvious. Whatever app you're running, whatever screen you're on, you can navigate back to the Hub with two simple gestures: swipe up from the bottom, then swipe rightward from the left edge. It's not hard  unless no one has shown you how to do it.

 

Swiping up is actually the gesture for minimizing your app, putting it on a page with all other apps the phone is running at any given time  what RIM calls Active Frames. When minimized, an app remains running, and you can resume exactly as you left it. This kind of multitasking, without taxing battery life, is one of BlackBerry 10's strengths  something iOS struggles with. Although the number of active apps appears to be limited to eight, I was able to call up a game of Angry Birds Star Wars hours after I began it, picking it up at the exact level I was playing.

How the phone responds to gestures is what RIM refers to as the "flow" of BlackBerry 10. Part of the flow is Peek, which is what RIM calls the gesture of sliding your thumb to "peek" behind your app at other content, typically the Hub.

To get a quick look at the Hub, you slide your finger up, then to the right from any screen. The movement tracks your finger precisely, snapping the "peeked" content back when you, well, snap back. It's extremely handy  once you get the hang of it, that is.

 

Back to the Hub. I found it to be an elegant solution to the issue of "message creep," with having several different apps for email, texting and all the rest. However, like most messaging aggregators, it has its weaknesses. Searching my Gmail account, for example, doesn't work anywhere near as well as on the native iOS app. And I'd appreciate something along the lines of the iPhone's VIP list of top-priority senders. 

 

The Hub provides a quick look at your calendar, visible when I pulled down from the top of my stream. There were my appointments for the next day, but I really started to taste the power of BlackBerry 10 when I launched the Calendar app. Calling up a Mashable staff meeting, the phone showed me the Facebook profiles and contact information of everyone invited. This wasn't in the Gmail invite  the phone was actively going out to my contact lists and accounts to and get any possible info that might be relevant to what I was looking at. Much appreciated. 

 

As much as I appreciated that, the Calendar is hampered by the classic problem of not being able to sync multiple Google calendars. This really has more to do with Google's support than BlackBerry's, but such distinctions are lost on users. Google calendars can be accessed via the web, of course, but then you lose the BB10 magic. 





One of the biggest things touted in BlackBerry 10 is the touchscreen keyboard, which predicts text in a different way than iOS or Android do. As you type, the OS tries to guess the word you're spelling out, displaying the complete word above the key for the next letter. If it's right, you just flick upward, and the word appears. The feature supposedly gets better the more you use it, and even works in up to three languages at once. 

 

Sound groundbreaking? To me, not really, and it isn't. Perhaps the predictor just takes some practice, but I found that trying to read words above my keys as I typed actually slowed me down rather than making me a more efficient typist. Maybe a legion of BlackBerry 10 texters will emerge in the coming months, but I doubt it. BB10's text predictor is no Swype, where the benefits are much clearer.



 

BlackBerry 10 does, however, bring with it an updated version of RIM's extremely popular BlackBerry Messenger app. BBM has now been upgraded to include video chat, bringing it up to speed alongside Apple's FaceTime/iMessage experience (voice chats were already in previous versions of BBM). Call quality is decent  better than Skype, but not quite as good as FaceTime. It's horrid when you're on 3G. 

 

BBM video chats have an extra bonus: screen sharing. With just a tap, you can show the person at the other end of the line your phone's screen, letting you quickly share photos, videos, apps  whatever you're looking at really. The imagery is a little jagged, improving slightly if you stay on one screen for a couple of seconds, but it's never as sharp as your native screen. 

 

Huge limitation, though: Video chats are only possible between BB10 devices, limiting them to owners of the Z10 and the coming Q10 QWERTY phone. Most video chatting services are incompatible in this way (although progress is being made), but it still sucks.

I also encountered some weirdness in the with email contacts. Trying to email some photos to myself, the phone for some reason associated one of my Facebook contacts  someone I barely ever interact with  with my primary email address. It's the same email I use for Facebook, but putting this guy's name in the recipient field made no sense. At least the email got to me. And if you got it, too, Mike  sorry.

 

BlackBerry 10 handles copying and pasting similar to Android, just in a slightly more showy way, with similar highlighting and a large "lens" that supposedly helps you zero in on where you want to paste. It's functional, but not nearly as elegant as iOS's roving menus and useful zoom. 

 

One way BlackBerry 10 is not similar to Android is there's no system-wide back button, a decision I applaud. The back button on Android is one of that OS's biggest weaknesses, mainly because it's unclear what it's going to do any given time you tap it. In BB10, apps will display a back button  which typically appears in the same lower-left location  when it's needed, tucking it away when it's not. 



Just like most phones today, the Z10 has a pair of cameras: an 8-megapixel model in back and a 2MP one in front, the latter of which is pretty good by today's standards  handy for selfies. The rear camera has an LED flash and does 1080p video recording. The front camera can record in 720p.

Feature-wise, the cameras are relatively bare-bones compared to those found on the iPhone and top Android devices. There's no panorama mode, for instance, and you're also not overloaded with the chinese-menu of shooting modes that are common on Samsung phones. Yes, there are some exposure presets (e.g. "Action" and "Night") and you can toggle the flash and image stabilization, but that's about it.

That's it, until of course you engage the camera's Time Shift mode. Time Shift is one of BlackBerry 10's "wow" features, using the camera with some clever on-the-fly photo editing to fix annoying "Joe blinked, let's do it again" moments in group pictures.

Here's how it works. First, engage Time Shift mode. Then get your group together, and snap your pic. Joe blink again? Just tap on his face and you can go forward or backward in time on just that face, the phone expertly photoshopping Joe's alert expression on the moment where everybody else looks great. Greta blinked too? You can do the same for her.

Time Shift works well on the BlackBerry Z10, but we've seen similar functionality in the camera of the Samsung Galaxy Note II. RIM's implementation is superior, however, zooming in on the person and calling up a rotating slider to select the exact moment of the person's "best face." It's a little addicting, and everyone I showed the feature loved it.

Less well executed is Storymaker, a BB10 app that can assemble videos and photos from your phone to create a "story"  sort of a video/slideshow hybrid  of any particular experience. It's a bit like a mobile version of iLife, although it's very compromised. It's not tweakable enough to be a serious editor, and it's not focused enough to encourage the creative engagment of, say, Vine. I'm calling it now: Storymaker will be a flop.





Yes, the Z10 is a fine piece of mobile hardware, and BlackBerry 10 does some impressive and useful things, despite its steep learning curve. However, no discussion of the platform is complete without talking about apps. And apps are BB10's fatal weakness. 

 

Here in 2013, where Android and iOS are fully mature platforms, with hundreds of thousands of apps, RIM's 80,000 or so are simply insufficient to offer a viable alternative. But it's really not about the raw numbers; it's about getting support for key developers, and offering customers a variety of useful and entertaining experiences. 

 

When I was setting up my Z10, I scoured BlackBerry World (formerly App World) for the apps I use the most often on my iPhone. eBay? Nope. CNN? Forget it. Pocket? Uh-uh. Netflix? Notoriously, no. What about stuff that ties into my gadgets, such as Eye-Fi, Nike+ or Jawbone's UP app? Nada, zip, zilch. Okay, how about productivity-related apps I use for work, including Trello, Campfire and Expensify? Not a one. Even Pulse, a news reader I use religiously and has a simple HTML5 base, isn't there. 

 

Certainly, BlackBerry 10 has some apps. Facebook, Twitter and Foursquare are there, though some of those were created by RIM itself, not the networks. Lastpass  a password manager that's essential to my workflow  is there. You can also get Angry Birds and many news apps, such as the CBC. 

 

All that's well and good, but it's not enough. For most people here in 2013, their smartphones have slowly become intertwined with their digital lives, and RIM is pretty much starting from scratch here. It's created a large canvas in BlackBerry 10, but it's largely blank, and that's a tough sell for anyone in the market for a phone today. Do you want a powerful mutitasker, or a phone that can actually run Instagram and Flipboard? 





The Z10 has an ace in the hole, though, and that's BlackBerry Balance. It used to be that you needed two phones  one for your job and one for personal use. That's evolved into using the same phone for both sides of your life, but the consequence has been an intermixing of email, calls and other content (photos, etc.) from both worlds on the same device. 

 

BlackBerry Balance restores the wall between work and play, but on the same phone. If you end up using a BlackBerry Z10 for work, your company can create a work profile on the phone via BlackBerry Enterprise Service, one that's completely separate from the personal side. Your company has total management of the work profile, but the personal one is out of bounds. RIM has engineered this at the chip level, and it says it's physically impossible to transfer data between the two profiles. 

 

Nonetheless, a Balance-enabled Z10 has just one phone number, and you'll never miss a single notification from either profile. All your email, texts and notifications still get through. You can see the number of calendar events and contacts on the other side, but you can't view them until you unlock it. 

 

With Balance, I can see BlackBerry 10 winning over company CIOs all over again. Finally they'll be able to issue their staff a single phone that they can use for both work and play. There may be a lot of interest in BB10 from business for this reason, which may be the platform's best hope, because I can't see consumers getting interested until the app gap starts to close, and that's not going to happen until RIM can show developers they can make real money creating BB10 apps. 





I like a lot of what RIM's done here. The Hub, while not perfect, is a well-thought-out solution to "message creep" on smartphones today. The multitasking is excellent, on par with Palm/HP's dearly departed webOS platform. And that slide-to-unlock trick is hot. 

 

When RIM debuted its PlayBook tablet, it adopted the slogan "amateur hour is over," a clear dig at the iPad and its consumption-based use case. Today, that tagline is better directed at RIM itself. With BlackBerry 10, the company finally casts aside its withered operating system  an amateur mobile experience among the platforms of today  for something that's a leap ahead. RIM's finally gone pro. 

 

However, BlackBerry 10 stumbles, first right out of the gate with its steep learning curve, and second with its anemic app selection that doesn't provide apps (like Vine) that deliver the full mobile experience that today's digital consumers want. Like Windows Phone, BlackBerry 10 now faces the chicken-and-egg problem between developers and consumers: There aren't enough apps to interest consumers, and developers won't create them until there are enough consumers to make money. 

 

For iOS and Android owners, BlackBerry 10 is a tough sell. That's why RIM's battle to reclaim relevance will likely be fought overseas, where smartphone penetration is low. For customers who just want a great email manager and a few powerful organizing tools, the Z10 will provide a great experience. And it can only get better: The potential of BB10 is large enough for some truly excellent apps to grow into. 

 

Will it get the chance? Once you figure out how to use it (which really doesn't take long), the Z10 is a worthy mobile flagship, and it certainly "feels" much better than any BlackBerry device that came before it. That good feeling isn't just superficial, either. It's based on real power, and the ability to do things other mobile OSes can't. But anyone buying RIM first BlackBerry 10 phone must realize: Most of that power has yet to be unlocked.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The company formerly known as Research In Motion unveiled its newest handset today, the BlackBerry Z10, which runs on the brand new BlackBerry 10 platform.

Attendees at the launch event were given Z10 devices to take home to review, which means we had to spend some time unboxing the device for the camera. The phone itself is quite beautiful. It's sleek, understated and modern.

Inside the box we found the Z10 along with the basic accessories and packaging you expect in a smartphone. It also included an accessory we didn't expect to see: a holster case for the Z10. Yes, that's right, a holster. BlackBerry might have a new phone, a new OS and a new company name but some old habits die hard.

We're not sure if the Z10 and BlackBerry 10 are enough to reverse BlackBerry's fortunes but we're excited to see how this develops.
--------------------------------------------------------------
This post originally appeared on the American Express OPEN Forum, where Mashable regularly contributes articles about leveraging social media and technology in small business.

Burberry's Art of the Trench campaign redefined UGC in the digital era. It's simple, really  the best way to show how great your product is is to show real, fashionable people wearing your product ... and looking damn good doing so. Since the Trench site launched in 2009 (it's still a living project today), several other brands have sought to integrate UGC into their marketing tactics and business model.

Last summer, apparel company Free People began integrating consumer Instagram photos onto product pages for its denim jeans. Doritos put its Super Bowl commercials in the hands of chip eaters  and it worked. Ray-Ban worked with Breakfast to create "mosaic" billboards in real time by pulling in Instagrams from a three-day music festival (see below).

UGC campaigns are an excellent way to collect creative material for marketing purposes, to get photos of your products on the social web and to drive sales and brand engagement. And images can be especially useful in driving apparel sales  Free People and Rent the Runway include UGC on their site to show products on real people. Luis Sanz, co-founder of photo aggregator Olapic, says customers engage more with photos than with text reviews, which could lead to to a 5x increase in interactions. Conversion rates on product pages that include customer photos can increase up to 30%.

"Lots of ecommerce customers end up not buying a product because theyre not sure how the product is going to fit after they make the purchase," says Jose de Cabo of Olapic, which Free People used to pull photos for the site. "It also shows they have a super hip, engaged customer base," he added.

Marketing with UGC will vary based on the type of business and also the laws surrounding content rights in various states. Below, we've rounded up four brands who've used UGC in interesting ways, and we've offered lessons that you can apply to your marketing efforts.

Yogawear company lululemon is all about living well. The brand's Instagram stream captures yogis in impressive poses and preaches inspirational wisdom (see also: the lululemon manifesto), driving home the point that you can do anything when you put your mind to it. To many consumers, wearing Lululemon is akin to a badge of honor, practically saying, "my body is a temple, and it can do amazing things."

So a couple months ago, the brand partnered with Olapic to collect images from consumers that represent #TheSweatLife  users were asked to tweet or Instagram photos of them getting their sweat on, and these images are displayed on a subsection of the brand website. These crowdsourced pictures show people pushing the limits, contorting their bodies and exploring the world in lululemon gear; like the brand itself, these images are simultaneously inspirational and aspirational.

"We created the program as a way to connect with our guests and showcase how they are authentically sweating in our product offline," says Lesia Dallimore, brand manager at lululemon. "We see it as a unique way to bring their offline experiences into our online community."

In addition to #TheSweatLife, there are also hashtags for specific products, like #wunderunder or #groovepant. When you click on a picture tagged with one of these hashtags, the site directs you to product pages, where customers can easily purchase items shown in the photos.

To date, the brand has received more than 7,000 photos via Instagram and Twitter, and the main #sweatlife gallery has had more than 40,000 unique visitors since launch.

Lesson: A loyal community is a powerful thing  highlighting customers who live your brand makes others want to live your brand, too. Encourage customers to snap photos that capture your brand values, and synthesize them into a Facebook cover photo, a T-shirt design or art to decorate your store. When choosing a hashtag, include a key brand value with broad, organic applications (see also: Tiffany & Co.'s #TrueLovePictures and Nike's #MakeItCount).

Rent the Runway lets you rent haute couture for weddings, birthday parties, prom and other highly photographed occasions. These also tend to be high-risk occasions, so women might be deterred from renting  what if a dress doesn't fit?

Rent the Runway found that many of its customers who did rent dresses had positive experience and uploaded photos to Facebook and Instagram to show off their stunning Cinderella moments  12,000 of them, to be exact. The burgeoning startup decided to turn this organic crowdsourcing of photos into Our Runway, a campaign to celebrate real beauty and help each renter find a dress that works for her body (while also offering social proof of the renting concept).

Those who have rented are encouraged to upload an image and indicate their measurements and what size dress they wore, along with comments and feedback about the outfit. With this massive archive of images, prospective renters can use the "Find Women Like Me" tool to select their own measurements and see what dresses look like on people with their body type, as opposed to stick-thin models. It's a marketing move that works  members who have viewed these UGC photos are 200% more likely to rent than those who have viewed a product shot on a model.

"With Our Runway, we are creating a platform for the everyday woman to discover amazing styles that work best for her body, and forming a community that celebrates every woman's special moments," says RTR CEO and co-founder Jennifer Hyman. "It's empowering to see thousands of photos of diverse women of all ages, sizes and ethnicities feeling self-confident."

Lesson: Online shopping is far less daunting when buyers know what they're getting, and photos are more useful than text reviews when it comes to pre-purchase research. Showing "real people" wearing your product proves the popularity of your brand and makes the purchase less intimidating.

Jeff Gordon has some serious fans on social media, and to engage this crowd, Pepsi MAX  for whom Gordon is spokesperson  sought to find the ultimate superfan. The beverage brand replicated the format of NASCAR's Sprint Cup with a series of 24 social media challenges that asked fans to do things like tweet why they prefer Pepsi MAX to Coke Zero in 24 words and Instagram themselves with a MAX and #24 gear. Users earned points for how quickly they completed each task, and they won prizes (including TVs, gift cards, a year's supply of Pepsi MAX and die-cast cars), based on the quality of their posts.

SEE ALSO: 7 Tips for Designing a Successful Photo Contest

After 24 challenges, the 10 most engaged users (based on point totals) went through four more challenges to vie for the grand prize, a trip to the Chase Race at Martinsville Speedway as a VIP Pepsi MAX correspondent to manage the brand's social channels and interview Jeff Gordon. Stephen Radford won the competition and blogged about his experiences on NASCAR.com (see his challenge entries here).

For Pepsi MAX, it was a win-win. The brand had more than 7,300 entrants and more than 700 images of Pepsi MAX cans posted to social sites. Meanwhile, the microsite had more than 52,000 visits, with a time-on-site average exceeding six minutes. And a Pepsi MAX rep says that, for a fairly reasonable price (compared to traditional sweepstakes), the brand was able to award prizes to "true fans," offer a fun month-long experience and inspire them to share Pepsi MAX and Jeff Gordon content with friends and followers. "Whereas traditional sweepstakes are a bit of a mystery and no one expects to win, with MAX It Now, we were able to be transparent about who was receiving prizes and why and gamified the whole experience," says the rep.

Lesson: Huge fans will go to great lengths to demonstrate their love for a brand. Don't be afraid to ask them to go out on a limb; you won't get a ton of responses, but finding your hardcore brand evangelists is more important than finding mediocre fans who are in it for the prize.

If two heads are better than one, then it probably makes sense to tap the collective creativity of a large community, right? That's exactly what the T-shirt company Threadless does. The Chicago-based printing company has a received 257,921 designs; since its founding in 2000, it's paid out $7,120,000 to $1,374 artists, who make money each time someone buys their design.

Artists and designers are encouraged to submit their files for scoring. For seven days, the Threadless community scores the design 1 to 5, leaving comments; that feedback helps the Threadless team decide what to print. When a design is selected, the artist gets cash upfront and then royalties based on the number of products sold with the design.

Threadless founder Jake Nickell's goal wasn't to build a multimillion dollar business, but to "give the creative minds of the world more opportunities to make and sell great art," he said in an interview.

Lesson: Good design is worth paying for, and crowdsourcing yields some incredible creativity. Consider a design contest for your new order of merch.

Before you jump in to a UGC campaign, make sure you're aware of the legal ramifications of using UGC. Joshua Sessler, a digital media and entertainment lawyer at Cowan DeBaets Abrahams & Sheppard LLP in New York, says that if you're going to have some sort of contest, the first thing you need to do is be extremely clear about whether it's a sweepstakes (random drawing) or a contest (some criteria involved).

Then, you ought to have very clear official rules  say where and how the winning material will be used, for example  and then you should be safe as long as you're in compliance with the rules you posted. In the submission widget, include some verbiage such as, "By submitting to this contest, I agree to these rules." (Since states and countries have different laws regarding contests, speak with a lawyer to ensure that you're in compliance.)

If you're going to solicit content on Facebook, that's a whole other beast  Facebook has its own strict rules. It's important to note that any promotion on Facebook needs to be administered within a Facebook app, so it may be easiest to use a third-party platform, like Offerpop or Strutta.

In addition to the initial rules, you should have winner(s) sign an affidavit, which authorizes your brand to use the winning materials post-contest. "If I'm a contestant, and I submit a piece of video, I want to know upfront what you're going to do with it [the rules]," says Sessler. "If I win, there's going to be a broad range of rights that I'm giving you  I'm giving up the right to exploit my content and control it past a certain point."

User-generated content can be a great tool in your marketing arsenal, but it can also be a legal mess if you're not thorough from the get-go. Do your legal research and be clear about how the UGC will be used, and respect the rights of the creators you're working with. After all, their material will likely help your brand make money!

Has your company used UGC? Tell us about your experiences in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Iowa Senator Chuck Grassley and Twitter aficionado is known for his oft-mispelled tweets and ability to cram as many thoughts as possible into 140 characters  or none at all.

Grassley left Twitter users with unanswered questions on Wednesday after tweeting what appears to be a typo. It was just the letter "U."

Twitter users took it upon themselves to solve the riddle with song lyrics, puns and other responses you'd expect from trolling.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Copious is an online hub where you can buy and sell the things you personally love. In essence, it's your own personalized store.

Co-founder Jonathan Ehrlich is the former head of marketing at Facebook, but prior to that, he started a company called Mobshop. On this episode of the Valley Girl Show, Ehrlich discusses how much harder fundraising was this time around versus getting money for Mobshop during the the dotcom era, when his team raised $150 million, no sweat.

Today Ehrlich draws on his social experiences at Facebook and lessons learned from Mobshop in order to create something where social capital speaks, and, in this case, money can be made from it.

"The cause of death for companies is to run out of capital," Ehrlich says. If starting your own company, he suggests you "make sure you're really thoughtful about your capital."

Jesse Draper is creator and host of The Valley Girl Show, through which she's become a spokesperson for startups and helped pioneer the way of new media content distribution. Formerly a Nickelodeon star, Draper is now CEO of Valley Girl, where she oversees the show and runs technology blog Lalawag.com.

More Video from the Valley Girl Show
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Launchpad is a series that introduces Mashable readers to compelling startups. If you would like to have your startup considered for inclusion, please see the details here.



One-Liner Pitch: An app that helps you pretend to have a more active social life online than you do in real life.

Why It's Taking Off: CouchCachet makes your social life seem more interesting by automatically checking you into hip spots on Foursquare and posting pics of cool people hanging out to Instagram.

There was a time when you could spend a perfectly nice weekend eating leftover Chinese food and watching Seinfeld reruns without feeling too bad about it. But now we're bombarded with exciting life updates from friends, family and all the random people we follow on social networks, which make us feel more self-conscious about spending a weekend this way. At least that's the premise of CouchCachet.

CouchCachet, an application that launched earlier this month, wants to help you enjoy a lazy night in without feeling too envious or embarrassed. To that end, the app works to make your social life seem more interesting online by automatically checking you into hot venues Foursquare, tweeting lyrics from hip bands and posting pictures of 20-somethings hanging out to your Instagram  regardless of whether you actually do any of these things or not.

The goal of the app is to help users deal with FOMO  or Fear of Missing Out  a psychological condition that the creators believe is running rampant thanks to the increasing popularity of social media.

"'FOMO' is the label we've given to describe that weird feeling you have about whether you should be out having a good time. Seeing all the things that you're friends are doing in your news feed just aggravates that condition," Brian Fountain, one of the app's creators, told Mashable. "And yet we all have times where we want to be boring and lame and catch up on our DVR."

Fountain built the app with two other friends at a Foursquare hackathon in early January and have since had "thousands" of people visit the website to check it out.

All you have to do is go through CouchCachet's website to connect it to Foursquare. Then, whenever you check into your home on Foursquare, CouchCachet offers up choices for several different itineraries of events  organized by categories like "Artsy Fartsy," "Feeling Outdoorsy" and "Hang with the cool kids." Once you select an itinerary, CouchCachet will start sharing activity from your "night out" on your behalf.

The application is still in its early stages and clearly intended to be a bit of a joke. Indeed, Fountain says the team's current funding strategy is to try and get FOMO classified as a treatable disease in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders so that doctors can start prescribing the app as treatment.

"That's a long road map though," Fountain says with a laugh, "so we might need some investors."

As silly as the app may sound, Fountain says it masks a more serious use case. CouchCachet uses two APIs to find a variety of sources for interesting events to create fun and unique itineraries for users. In the long-term, he says this is something the team could expand on to build a real business.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Security experts urged businesses and government officials to prepare for the worst as looming cyber warfare concerns continue to bubble up and could even result in the loss of human lives in the future.

People gathered on Wednesday at the 2013 Kaspersky Cyber-Security Summit in New York City to discuss the future of cyber warfare and how preventative measures must be taken to cut down on impact.

"It's not the question of if a major cyber warfare attack will happen  it's an issue of when and how bad it will be," Eugene Kaspersky, founder and CEO of Kaspersky Lab, told attendees. "Some enterprises are facing thousands of attacks a day, while others wonder if they are going to be hacked or not. This will occur across all industries and infrastructures, and we have to think and accept that as a reality. We live in a dangerous world."

SEE ALSO: Is Your Mobile Device Safe From Hackers?

According to the company's research, one of the main reasons for the growing interest in cyberattacks among criminals and terrorists is that cyber weapons are much cheaper than traditional weapons. (Nuclear weapons can cost several hundred billion dollars to build). In addition, cyberattacks have the potential to take down systems and impact a huge amount of people, from electricity in homes during the winter to derailing trains.

"Every industry can be a victim of an attack, from power companies and telecommunications to banks, transportation and the military," Kaspersky said.

The Internet is also an easy platform to break: "Cyber weapons can easily be used against innocent victims, especially because our infrastructures have been developed over 30 years ago and they haven't been updated," said Costin Raiu, director of global research and analysis at Kaspersky Labs. "When something catastrophic happens  and it hasn't yet  it's possible no one will take responsibility because cyber weapons can be pretty much anonymous."

Even small hacks can have a big impact on society. For example, panelist Howard Schmidt, former cyber-security coordinator of the Obama Administration noted how a non-functioning ticketing system at an airport can have a domino effect on thousands of people.

"People don't think about our tremendous dependencies on technology," Schmidt said. "If a ticketing system is down at an airport, you can't check in through mobile or go to a ticketing kiosk. This means passengers can't board a plane and it never pulls away from the gate. Incoming planes don't have a place to park, so flights in the sky have to be diverted to another airport. Situations like this can cause major disruption and could be a huge problem."

Schmidt emphasized the need for basic education and training to diffuse and prevent dire situations from occurring.

"Business schools today need to be teaching this to the future CEOs," he said. "We need to be prepared  and create a safe Internet for everyone. You also have to teach what is right and wrong in the virtual world. There are hackers who love to take things apart and discover new things who aren't criminals. This is also an issue about morality."

Although Kaspersky Labs has been following this uptick closely for years, it's still learning more about what they have already seen.

"Cyber warfare and attacks aren't rare  there are a lot of them  they are just hard to discover," he said. "In 2012, we found Flame, one of the most sophisticated attacks in history. We spent a few months trying to understand the whole program, but it could take up to 10 years to fully understand what it does and what it was created to do."
--------------------------------------------------------------
"War dogs" have been used for hundreds of years in combat to aid armies in scouting, tracking and standing guard. And while they've varied in sizes and breeds, one trait has remained consistent: intelligence.

The Defense Advanced Research Projects Agency (DARPA), in an attempt to find the brightest and best-fit dogs for warfare, announced it will fund a research project to scan potential war puppies' brains with MRI machines.

The project, called "Functional Imaging to Develop Outstanding Service-Dogs" (FIDOS for short), is proposing that whichever dogs show the most brain activity in their MRI scans will be the smartest and, in turn, easiest to train.

SEE ALSO: MRI Scanners: Now Used to Look Inside Batteries

The idea for the project was influenced in part from a 2012 Emory University study that examined dogs' brain activity in relation to food (unsurprisingly, the dogs showed more activity when they were offered treats.)

DARPA said that the project, in addition to uncovering the brightest pups, could also identify which dogs are the most social  an ideal companion trait to help soldiers dealing with PTSD.

Read the full announcement from DARPA here.

Do you think this will be an effective procedure?
--------------------------------------------------------------
What do 2,500 of the world's most influential leaders do at an annual soiree? Play with their smartphones, of course.

At the World Economic Forum (WEF) in Davos, Switzerland, last week, about one-third of the forum's delegates used social media to carry on the conversation. Social media activity peaked during UK Prime Minister David Cameron's speech about G8 priorities.

SEE ALSO: You Can Tweet at 75% of the World's Leaders

World-renowned writer Paolo Coelho, author of The Alchemist, continued to build his "Personal Legend" with a few golden tweets. He had the most retweeted post of the conference  which was written in Portuguese  in addition to the most retweeted English-language post.

Check out the following infographic, created by Accenture, for more information about the WEF's digital footprint.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Now there's an improved Dish Hopper satellite video DVR on the market, adding attractive new features that might make it worth a second look. The big news is the Hopper's built-in Slingbox that lets you watch anything on your DVR wherever you have an Internet connection. We tested the new Dish Hopper with Sling, viewing video at home and on the go. How much of an improvement is it?

When I first fired up the Dish Hopper with Sling, I immediately noticed snappier performance when scrolling its program guide and viewing its menus. That's because Dish has upgraded the Hopper's processor to a 1.3 GHz chip. It's faster than the company's original Dish Hopper's processor, which ran at a much slower 750 MHz.

But that was just the beginning of the new coolness.

The marquee feature of this update is its built-in Slingbox. Sure, you could use an external Slingbox with the Hopper before, but now it's even easier and much more deeply integrated.

The Slingbox capability built into the Hopper lets you watch anything that DVR can output, anywhere. As long as you can log onto the Internet on a browser  or if you have an Android or iOS device with the Dish Anywhere app  you can access your Hopper, change the programs you'd like to record, rent a pay-per-view movie, watch an on-demand video or check and see if there are any recording conflicts. Here's the Dish Anywhere app's guide, on iPad and iPhone:

You can transfer video directly to an iPad for viewing at a time when you might not have an Internet connection. This works in one of two ways. When you program a show for a recording, the Hopper gives you an option to prepare the video for a mobile device. That takes care of the video transcoding on the fly.

If you'd like to transfer video that you've already recorded, Hopper can let you do that too, but it takes about an hour for each hour's worth of programming to prepare the video for mobile devices. A slight downside is the amount of space these files take up, ending up being about a gigabyte per recorded hour. The transferred video looked excellent on our iPad with Retina display. This is all done with a separate app called Hopper Transfers:

Transferring video has a few caveats. Transferring only works on iPad so far, and Dish officials told me, "It will be expanded to Android devices in a future update." If you transfer a show from a premium network such as HBO, no one can view that show any more on the Hopper. And, while you can have multiple iPads paired with the Hopper, recordings can only be transferred once, according to Dish. For instance, if you've transferred Saturday Night Live to your iPad, your daughter won't be able to transfer it to hers.

The transferring feature will be handy, for example, on flights without Wi-Fi. But if you have a fast-enough Internet connection, you can also watch live TV or recordings directly from the Hopper using its new Slingbox capability. We tested it on iPads and iPhones (and it works on Android, too), both in-house via Wi-Fi and out in the field via an LTE connection. As long as the connection was fast enough, the video quality was superb.

Not only can you watch your satellite TV with mobile devices, but you can watch it from any browser, using Dish's updated website, dishanywhere.com. This means now you'll be able to watch live TV shows or any of your recordings (as well as tweak your program recordings and manage your Hopper) from any network-connected computer in your house or elsewhere:

A Slingbox user from way back, I welcomed this capability of watching live TV on a computer. With a fast Wi-Fi or LTE connection, I could control the Hopper from afar  albeit rather sluggishly  and the video looked sharp and played back smoothly. Overall, it was delightful to use.

Add this integrated Slingbox capability to the Dish Hopper, and you have a winner of a DVR. It's not perfect, though. For instance, its remote control feels like an artifact from 15 years ago, with inexplicable placement of buttons:



 Couldn't that big button have been Play/Pause?

There's not even backlighting on this clunky remote, which Dish should seriously consider replacing with something designed in the current century.

Even with this sprightly new processor on board, it takes a relatively long time to change from one channel to the other. Sure, the Hopper feels faster than its predecessor, popping up channel names within a second of pushing the channel-change button. However, it still takes at least three seconds for the satellite channel to be tuned in, a lag which is probably inherent in the platform. At this glacial speed, channel surfing is no fun. The pokey channel-changing performance made me (momentarily) long for the days 30 years ago when cable TV providers would give you a primitive box with physical sliders that instantly changed the channels.

The quality of Dish video is simply not that great. I noticed that more popular channels  such as the major networks, ESPN and a few others  look almost as good as the signal we get from Time Warner Cable (which itself is not as sharp nor noise-free as an over-the-air HD signal via antenna). However, other channels are obviously more compressed, resulting in cloudy-looking video that's supposed to be high definition but hardly looks it, especially on a big-screen TV.

The user interface of the Hopper leaves a lot to be desired as well. There's a steep learning curve, especially for someone who's used to a user-friendly DVR such as a TiVo. It took me the better part of a week to become fully comfortable with Dish's convoluted way of recording and viewing programs.

Those issues aside, you'd be hard-pressed to find a more powerful DVR than the Dish Hopper. Its strengths include letting you record six programs at the same time, connecting smaller units called Joeys that give you DVR capability all over the house, and its Prime Time Anytime feature. That unique capability records all three hours of prime time, seven days per week on the four major networks (ABC, NBC, CBS and FOX). This feature alone is worth the price of admission.

And then there's AutoHop, the controversial feature that lets you automatically skip commercials on those Prime Time Anytime recordings. The only catch: To watch a program with AutoHop skipping its commercials, you must wait until 1 a.m. after that show was recorded.

I also noticed that the AutoHop feature is slightly different from nine months ago. Now, you end up watching about five seconds of the first commercial and the last five seconds of the last one in a break. Before, you would only see a few frames of a commercial. Could Dish be bending to the will of those TV networks suing it for this radical new feature? AutoHop might not withstand legal challenges  but while it's here, it's a unique and useful feature, unless you're an advertiser.

The best part of this deal is this more-capable Dish Hopper with a Slingbox inside is offered at the same price as the first Hopper  the company's $10/month "DVR fee," and $7 per month for each Joey unit you connect.

Summing up, this is a worthwhile upgrade to the Dish Hopper; if you're already a customer, I'd recommend going for the update. Its quicker response, Slingbox place-shifting and AutoHop commercial skipping sets it apart from any other DVR on the market.

Pics and screenshots via Dish Network and by Mashable/Charlie White
--------------------------------------------------------------
Year after year when viewers are polled about their favorite Super Bowl ad, one brand rises to the top: Doritos.

Since 2007, a Doritos ad has landed in the top five favorite ads in USA Today's AdMeter. In 2009, 2011 and 2012, Doritos took the top spot. (Though 2011 was the first three-way tie in the AdMeter's now 25-year history.)

What's amazing about these placements is that for the past six years, Doritos' ads haven't been made by professionals at one of the top ad agencies, but by fans and people who want to make a name for themselves in advertising. Dubbed the "Crash the Super Bowl" contest, the event has not only been wildly successful in fielding ads, but in creating a social media buzz before the game. For instance, just a few days before the big game in 2011, Doritos had racked up 4,161 social media mentions, far and ahead of sister brand Pepsi's 2,589, according to Alterian.



 One of the five Crash the Super Bowl finalists

Part of the buzz can be explained by the fact that Crash the Super Bowl actually starts in September, when Frito-Lay sends out a press release announcing the return of the contest (now in its seventh year.) Then, from Oct. 8 through Nov. 16, there's a period in which participants can submit their videos. On Jan. 2, five finalists are chosen. Finally, viewers have to tune in to the game to see which two ads made the cut. (One ad is chosen by fans, the other by Frito-Lay execs.)

The narrative prompts lots of chatter in social media. According to Frito-Lay, site visits this year were up 73% to 3.4 million and uniques were up 100% to 2.6 million. Votes were also up 100%, according to the company. And Frito-Lay is even able to get press after the games as the winners (who receive payment of $25,000 unless their ad makes the No. 1 spot on AdMeter, in which case they get another $1 million; No. 2 is worth $600,000) are trotted out to the news media. In the past two years Frito-Lay has offered a bonus for the creator of the ad that comes in highest on AdMeter. Last year, the winner got a chance to work with Saturday Night Live's Andy Samberg; this year, the winner gets a chance to work on the next Transformers movie with director Michael Bay.



 Another one of the five Crash the Super Bowl finalists

All of this begs the question: Why aren't more brands crowdsourcing their Super Bowl ads? "It's not for every brand," says Ann Mukherjee, Frito-Lay's chief marketing officer. "You also have to trust your consumers."

Scott Lucas, executive director of Interbrand's Cincinnati office, says that crowdsourcing makes sense for Frito-Lay. "What they're doing is giving some control back to the audience," he says. "Create your own ad is allowing the consumer to deliver the relevancy of the moment."

Not everyone agrees. Critics have noted that the crowdsourced ads are often formulaic, relying on slapstick and cute animals. Cracked recently posted 5:1 odds that Doritos' Super Bowl ad would "feature a child or a pet critically injuring a grown man." Indeed, three of Doritos' five finalist ads feature animals and in two of the ads, a grown man is about to be injured. "To think of crowdsourcing creative [work] on the world's showcase for creative, feels either like a gimmick or a copout," says Chuck McBride, founder and chief creative officer for Cutwater.

But Mukherjee is unapologetic. "Look, we as Americans love it when animals are in spots," she says. "At the end of the day, all we're trying to do is sell chips." Mukherjee says the campaign does indeed appear to move bags of Doritos. According to researcher SymphonyIRI, Doritos sales rose 5.8% in units in 2012.

Nevertheless, she's coy about whether there will be an eighth year for Crash the Super Bowl, noting that she'll have to see how the data was this time around. Odds are, however, that there will be more crowdsourced ads and hence more grown men being abused by animals, in the 2014 Super Bowl.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Dropbox wants to stop thinking of content stored on the service as files, and instead think of it as types of content. In that spirit the company announced two new features for its website Wednesday: a new document preview for files, and a new look for albums of photos you have shared.

A new photo view will let you view all of the photos store on your Dropbox, organized chronologically by when they were taken. Timeline view is already available on Android.

Photos can be selected from that view, and shared as a virtual collection with a friend on Facebook, Twitter or email. On Facebook photos can be shared in a personal message or on a wall, and on Twitter photos will show up as a Twitter card. Pictures will always stay in the collection, regardless of whether you move them around within Dropbox  a move that currently would break links.

Document previews will let Dropbox customers click on any file within Dropbox and get a quick, fast preview without having to download the file. So you can know quickly you're sending the right file to a coworker without having to download it first. The feature currently supports most common Office file types, with Excel support coming soon.

Both features will be rolling out to all Dropbox users over the coming months.
--------------------------------------------------------------
On the season four premier episode of Revolution, we sit down with San Francisco Mayor Ed Lee to discuss how governments can adapt and improve services by embracing the startup culture.

One of Mayor Lee's first orders of business was to form a tech chamber of commerce called SF CITI (Citizens Initiative for Technology and Innovation) to leverage the collective power of San Francisco's tech sector. Companies include AT&T, Salesforce.com, Jawbone, Twitter and Zynga. Additionally, San Francisco partnered with Code for America to reexamine the way the city delivers services to impoverished people.

While Mayor Lee keeps today in mind, his work also focuses on the city 10 to 15 years down the road. His team's partnerships with entrepreneurs, non-profits, local businesses and investors is already expanding possibilities for how San Francisco will look over the years. His hope is that businesses will thrive through technology and the new perspective and capabilities that come along with it.

As the Mayor puts it, everything comes down to improving and leveraging civic engagement.
--------------------------------------------------------------
GIFs are more than just entertaining animated loops; they can actually teach us tons of quick and interesting facts.

Think about the old textbooks most of us grew up with in the classroom. Each chapter's stock photos helped a little, but visual learners would benefit even more from quick animations. In other words, GIFs could be especially useful in scientific and medical fields.

SEE ALSO: School Yourself With These 10 Fake Science Facts

Instead of exclusively bookmarking amusing GIFs, take a look at these loops and learn something new. Or if you're a know-it-all, brush up on your knowledge.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Blackberry 10 was officially launched at an event in New York City on Wednesday. Along with the official debut of the mobile operating system, the company behind it also made some huge announcements about its future.

Curious what all the hype is about? Here's a quick look back at the event, what the company announced, and what we can expect in the future.

RIM officially changed its name on Wednesday to BlackBerry. To go along with the new name the company will update its ticker symbol from RIMM to BBRY, and it introduced a new tagline: One brand, one promise. The company will be showcasing the new name in its first Super Bowl ad ever this coming weekend.

BlackBerry 10 represents a complete overhaul of the BlackBerry operating system. The operating system focuses around the BlackBerry Hub, a universal inbox of sorts that includes your email, text messages, and notifications. Calendar information is also available within the Hub. A smart calendar of sorts, BlackBerry 10 pulls contact information for guests in meetings into calendar entries. You can access the Hub from any screen youre on using a simple gesture.

The camera app is one place where BB10 is going to stand out against the competition. A Time Shift feature allows you to scroll back in time on a particular part of a photo, adjusting it slightly. For instance, if a friend is blinking in a group shot, you can scroll back in time on just that friends face in the shot and change their expression to the moment before their eyes closed. A new feature called Story Maker lets you stitch together photos, videos and tunes together into a "story" you can share with friends.

The virtual keyboard in BlackBerry 10 is also something that saw a significant upgrade. The keyboard has a predictive test mechanism built into it that attempts to anticipate what youre trying to type. Words appear above the keys on the keyboard, and swiping a key will input the word above it.

A feature called BlackBerry Balance allows you to use the same device for personal and work functions, giving your employer control over the work side of things.

BlackBerry Messenger, the company's private messaging service, also added video chatting functionality on Wednesday.

There are currently two smartphones running BlackBerry 10: The Z10 and Q10. The Z10 is an all-touch handset with a similar look to the iPhone 5, while the Q10 has a traditional BlackBerry look with a physical keyboard.

All four major carriers in the United States have committed to carrying one or both of the handsets, however, no carrier has specified when. At the BlackBerry 10 launch event, Heins said he expected the Z10 to be available in March of this year in the U.S. and the Q10 to be available in April, as long as carrier testing goes according to plan.

Verizon announced pricing for the Z10 on its network: $199 with a new two-year contract. No other carrier announced pricing of any kind.

During its press conference, the company announced that it has over 70,000 apps already available for BlackBerry 10. Applications available today include big names such as Facebook, Foursquare, Twitter and LinkedIn.

In addition to the apps available in the store today, BlackBerry also announced that Skype has committed to creating an application for the platform.

At the end of the press conference, CEO Thorsten Heins announced that the company has appointed singer/songwriter Alicia Keys as its new Global Creative Director. Keys, who has previously spoken the praises of the iPhone, said she was happy to be back in an exclusive relationship with BlackBerry.

Keys says she is going to be working directly with developers and carriers on the platform, as well as with other artists.
--------------------------------------------------------------
You may want to think twice before taking the elevator to your office or ordering in for lunch. New research has found that small periods of activity which add up to 30 minutes a day worth of exercise can be just as beneficial as longer bouts of physical activity.

That research found that small increments of exercise, even as short as one or two minutes at a time, can help to prevent metabolic syndrome, high blood pressure and high cholesterol as long as the exercise adds up to a half hour a day.

"Our results suggest that engaging in an active lifestyle approach, compared to a structured exercise approach, may be just as beneficial in improving various health outcomes," said Paul Loprinzi, assistant professor at Bellarmine University and lead author of the study. "We encourage people to seek out opportunities to be active when the choice is available. For example, rather than sitting while talking on the phone, use this opportunity to get in some activity by pacing around while talking."

Additionally, researchers found that 43% of people who participated in short activity bursts met a 30-minute-a-day threshold for exercise. On the other hand, just 10% of those who exercised for longer periods met that threshold.

"This is a more natural way to exercise, just to walk more and move around a bit more," said Brad Cardinal, study co-author and an professor of social psychology of physical activity and co-director of the sport and exercise psychology program. "We are designed by nature as beings who are supposed to move. People get it in their minds, if I don't get that 30 minutes, I might as well not exercise at all. Our results really challenge that perception and give people meaningful, realistic options for meeting the physical activity guidelines."

The researchers say that the short bursts of activity are more conducive to fit the schedules of busy workers who may not otherwise have the time to do so. Those short bursts of energy can be as simple as walking around the office or doing push-ups and sit ups during a commercial break when watching TV. However, the researchers caution that short periods of activity do not help very much in weight loss.

"In our society, you will always be presented with things that entice you to sit or be less active because of technology, like using a leaf blower instead of a rake," Cardinal said. "Making physical activity a way of life is more cost-effective than an expensive gym membership. You may be more likely to stick with it, and over the long term, you'll be healthier, more mobile and just feel better all around."

The research was based on the responses of 6,000 adults and was published in the current issue of the American Journal of Health Promotion.

This article originally published at BusinessNewsDaily here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Few people would argue with the need for air bags on the inside of a car. But how about on the outside?

The idea comes from TNO, a car company in the Netherlands, where there are now 1.3 bicycles for every resident. Amsterdam alone is home to a half a million riders daily.

In tests, TNO researchers found that when a car hits a bicycle, the rider usually ends up landing on the windshield, with the head and shoulder leading. So they developed an air bag that inflates on the outside of the car, between the bottom edge of the front windshield and the hood.

SEE ALSO: Work It! Human-Powered Machines

The car has a forward facing camera under the rear view mirror. Software picks out objects and decides whether it is a pedestrian or cyclist. When either one enters a "time critical" zone  meaning one that they might not have time to get out of the way or the car to brake, the system switches to "alert" mode. Sensors in the car bumper detect the collision. Then the air bag deploys, covering the lower half of the windshield.

Safety for cyclists is a particularly salient issue in the Netherlands, where the number of bicycles in the country has grown to more than 18 million. And even though cycling in the Netherlands is relatively safe, there are still some 600 traffic deaths per year involving cyclists and pedestrians, and that number has remained relatively constant.

External air bags of a have even made an appearance in some Volvo models.

This article originally published at Discovery News here
--------------------------------------------------------------
"Facebook" is no longer such a bad word on Wall Street  or at least not as much as it was a few months ago.

The company's stock plummeted to less than half its IPO price of $38 a share in early September, but the share price has since increased by nearly 75% due in large part to the strength of Facebook's previous earnings report. Now, with the stock back above $30 and the IPO price closer in sight, Facebook is set to release its third earnings report as a public company.

The December quarter earnings report, which is set to be released after the market closes at 4pm ET Wednesday, will determine whether Facebook continues ticking up towards its IPO price or dives back into the 20s. Here are the two big things that investors will be looking for in the report and earnings call that follow:

If there was one stat in the previous earnings report that renewed investor confidence in Facebook it was this: 14%.

Facebook revealed that mobile ad revenues accounted for 14% of total ad revenues in the third quarter, a remarkable feat considering that the company had only introduced its first mobile ad product a few months earlier. After months of worrying about whether Facebook "got" mobile, the stat seemed to confirm that it did.

"I want to dispel this myth that Facebook can't make money on mobile," CEO Mark Zuckerberg said during the earnings call in October. "This might have seemed true earlier this year because we hadn't started trying yet."

Now, three months later, analysts want to see that number continue to grow. Raymond James analyst Aaron Kessler expects mobile ads to account for 25% of total ad revenue and JP Morgan Chase analysts project it will be 27% of ad revenue.

Mobile ad revenue growth is expected to provide a nice boost to Facebook's overall revenue, but it's not the only area investors and analyst will be paying attention.

In recent months, Facebook has rolled out several new revenue-generation options  including app install ads, Sponsored Results and Gifts  and continued to build up others like the Facebook ad exchange. It's unlikely the company will break down the numbers for all or any of these products in the initial report, but analysts and investors will be looking for clues in the overall results and the comments that follow in the call to determine whether these options have taken off yet.

Facebook is expected to report revenue of $1.53 billion for the fourth quarter, up from $1.26 billion in the previous quarter, according to analysts surveyed by Thomson Reuters. If the company can meet or pass that, 2012 will go down as Facebook's first $5 billion year.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Facebook's fourth quarter earnings results beat estimates, but Wall Street initially responded by sending the stock down by as much as 9% in after hours trading.

Facebook reported revenues of $1.59 billion in the December quarter, an increase of 40% from the same quarter in 2011 and beating Wall Street's estimates for revenue of $1.53 billion. Taken all together, Facebook generated just more than $5 billion in revenue in 2012, its first time passing that milestone.

The vast majority of this revenue growth came from advertising, which generated $1.33 billion in the fourth quarter, a 41% increase from the same quarter a year ago. Mobile ads, in particular, accounted for 23% of total ad revenue, up from 14% in the previous quarter.

CEO Mark Zuckerberg touted the earnings as proof that Facebook has indeed become a mobile company. "In 2012, we connected over a billion people and became a mobile company," Zuckerberg said in a statement. "We enter 2013 with good momentum and will continue to invest to achieve our mission and become a stronger, more valuable company."

Further supporting this point, Facebook noted that the number of daily active users on mobile surpassed the number on desktop for the first time in the company's history.

Facebook's stock has climbed back from a low of $17.55 a share in early September to close at $31.24 on Wednesday, a gain of about 75% in less than five months. Much of that growth was based on the strength of Facebook's previous earnings report, which showed that Facebook was making headway in monetizing on mobile.

Even with the progress Facebook has made in mobile, Wall Street appeared mixed on the earnings announcement. Expectations have been running high for Facebook in recent weeks and some analysts had projected mobile ads would account for 25% or more of the company's total ad revenue.

Perhaps more importantly to investors, Facebook's profit margin was just $64 million in the quarter compared to more than $300 million during the same quarter a year ago. Some analysts pinned this decline to greater costs associated with ramping up mobile advertising compared to desktop advertising. "It appears that rising mobile sales have contributed to significantly higher costs and expenses," Brian Wieser, senior research analyst with Pivotal Research Group, wrote in a research note.

As of publication, the stock had recovered somewhat, but was still down by about a percent in after hours trading.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Shown off during one of the companys BlackBerry Jam sessions late last year, the Facebook app offers much of the same features you find in its iOS and Android applications and looks exceptionally similar to the current iOS version of the app.

Drop-down menus from the top of the screen offer access to your notifications, friend requests and messages. The app takes advantage of BB10s Peek feature, so you can view a photo full screen, and then slide the image to the right to take a peek at your timeline before returning to the photo.

One distinct difference with Facebook for Blackberry 10: it was developed by RIM not Facebook. What that means is out of the box the app is going to integrate exceptionally well with BlackBerry 10; long term that means Blackberry 10 users may potentially not get new features in the app as quickly as their iOS and Android counterparts.

Foursquare has its own unique BlackBerry 10 feature as well: check-ins on the service can be broadcast to your friends on BlackBerry Messenger.

Rounding out the social connectivity of BlackBerry 10, Twitter and LinkedIn are also available on the platform at launch. The mobile operating system offers built-in support for all four in BlackBerry Hub.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Facebook's fourth-quarter earnings was a bonanza for anyone looking for updated stats on the company. The one that caught a lot of analysts' attention was 23%  the proportion of ad revenues that the company derives from mobile. Facebook's perceived lack of progress in mobile was a major reason the company's stock slid precipitously after its May 2012 IPO.

But, as usual, the company used its call with analysts after to show off its brisk growth and huge scale. Among the highlights:

On New Year's Day, users uploaded 600 million photos to Instagram, a new record. Between Facebook's eponymous app and Instagram, the company now accounts for 25% of overall time spent on mobile, as measured by comScore. 42 million users have claimed an offer through Facebook Offers so far. Walmart ran a holiday campaign on Facebook that reached 50 million mobile users. A Michael Kors campaign on Facebook advertising a new line of sneakers reached 36 million users. FBX, the company's ad exchange service, served 1 billion impressions daily and is used by 1,300 advertisers per day.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Youd be hard-pressed to find a celebrity gossip magazine these days that doesnt include at least one article about body image or an actress learning to accept her curves. But while theres evidently a huge audience for these types of storiesand the weight-loss interview that inevitably appears six months laterboth mainstream and high-end fashion retailers are yet to catch up.

A particularly telling statistic is the difference in monetary success between Jessica Simpsons clothing brand and Victoria Beckhams. Beckhams super-skinny designs have received accolades from critics and earned her a place at New York Fashion Week, netting her company $95 million last year. Jessica Simpsons plus-size-friendly designs, by contrast, made a cool $750 million over the same period of time.

Tired of waiting for Vogue and Elle to meet the demand for plus-size fashion, many women have taken to the Internet to find their wardrobe inspiration. Ranging from blogs purely dedicated to pictures of clothes to feminist diatribes in favor of fat-acceptance and body positivity, the plus-size fashion movement (coined fatshion) is a blossoming subculture in the truest sense of the word.

Although my blog appears to focus on clothes, there's something radical in my approach to dressing which I guess springs out of a political impulse to question the image of what it means to be fat, offered Bethany Rutter (pictured below), creator of self-proclaimed fatshion blog Archedeyebrow. Uncompromising self-love is a radical statement for anyone, let alone fat girls.

The radical undertones of Rutters blog ripples throughout much of plus-size fashion community. Their content is often satirical and irreverent, but presented from a strong feminist perspective. Perhaps the most well-known example would be Nancy Upton's controversy-baiting submissions to a modeling competition run by American Apparel, which brilliantly challenged the fashion companys target demographic with hilarious and hugely popular self-portraits. She won the competition and forced the issue on a national level.

A similar aesthetic can be found on Tumblr, where people use hashtags like #fatshion and #fatspo to mock the trend of thinspo, or thinspirationthe widespread practice of sharing photos and videos of ridiculously slim celebrities and other women to encourage weight loss.

Deathfatties, a popular Tumblr blog, is dedicated to showcasing the vitality and visibility of those who self-identify as "deathfat, a term coined by the fatshionista LiveJournal community that refers to the BMI charts categorization of the morbidly obese. The entries are typically user-generated, comprised of a photo and description of the subjects' clothing, right down to their sizes.

Its a matter of pride, according to Frances, a public servant in Australia who runs the fat-acceptance blog Corpulent.

I was sick of never seeing bodies like mine celebrated or even presented as normal in the mainstream media, so I set up my Tumblr to fill the gap, she said.

In sourcing photos, videos, and quotes of and about fat women, I found fat acceptance and blogs," she said. "Reading them and the blogs they linked to made me realize that there was a social and cultural framework for how I related to my own body and how society relates to bodies like mine. I finally saw it was political.

Girl With Curves, by contrast, seems to be aiming directly at the glass ceiling between plus-size and mainstream fashion. The site was originally dedicated to photos of creator Tanesha Awasthi modeling her own outfits, but its evolved into something resembling a glossy magazine in its own right, with style tips and a lifestyle section along with the regular photo shoots.

Girl With Curves boasts 80,000 Tumblr followers and has been featured in Grazia, Glamour and the New York Times. And rightfully so. The site understands the market, mindset and needs of the community, offering inspiration, how-to tutorials and easy social sharing on Pinterest and Instagram.

Slowly but surely, the plus-size fashion community online is making a difference in the real world, changing public perception through repeat exposure, light-hearted humor, and relentless positivity.

If you look back at some of my earlier posts and videos, you'll find they're laced with self-hate and pressure to lose weight, recalled Amanda Valdez of personal style blog Fashion, Love and Martinis. The more I blogged, formed friendships with fellow bloggers, and saw other girls in posts who looked just like me, I began to love and accept myself. My posts and videos grew from self-hate to more about my personal style and life experiences. It's funny how the world works because now my posts are having the same affect on others struggling with self acceptance.

Theres still a long way to go, but Frances stressed the importance of social networking on the road toward acceptance.

Fat is still seen as unhealthy, fat discrimination still exists, and plus size fashion is generally still frumpy, of poorer quality, and more expensive, she said. However, we are getting there.  With the Internet, fat acceptance activists have a community that we can draw on for support, for numbers, and for friendship.

That's an encouraging sign and a lasting reminder that fashion and beauty comes in all shapes and sizes.

Photos courtesy of Girls With Curves/Tumblr; Amanda Valdez via Fashion, Love and Martinis

This article originally published at The Daily Dot here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Bike helmets are hardly anyone's favorite, albeit necessary, accessory. Though it's a safety essential, some cyclists prefer to ride sans headgear to avoid the bulk.

One French designer and engineer duo want to bring safety back to the streets with the Overade, a foldable bicycle helmet that protects just as well as it saves space.

When not in use, the helmet can be folded into to a small enough size to fit into a purse or backpack. It shrinks down to a third of its original size by way of latches and sliders. Check out the video, above, for more.

Philippe Arrouar and design partner Clment Cailleau created the Overade to address the aesthetic expectations of urban cyclists. Arrouar first noticed the problem in 2007 when the Paris public bike rental service started. Very few riders wore a helmet and, when asked, explained the inconvenience of lugging around a helmet after use as well as its unattractive appearance.

SEE ALSO: Invisible Bike Helmet Keeps Riders Safe, Looking Cool [VIDEO]

The Overade is available for pre-sale on crowdfunding site Ulule, with prices starting at $97. Based on the results of the impending safety certification process, the designers anticipate distribution in the spring.

Arrouar and Cailleau are also in the process of developing accessories like a removable visor and protective cover for rain and snow. The helmet will be sold in black or white and, like most helmets, is constructed from ABS plastic.

Would you use a foldable helmet? Let us know your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A picture of shooting victim and former congresswoman Gabby Giffords' "handwritten testimony" on gun control which was posted to Facebook by Giffords' Political Action Committee following her Wednesday testimony to Congress on gun reform was written by Giffords' therapist and not Giffords herself.

Several media outlets, including The Atlantic and The Washington Post, ran the photo with captions suggesting Giffords herself wrote the notes. The photo soon went viral on social media as people shared it as a celebration of Giffords' recovery following a January 2011 shooting near Tucson, Arizona.

However, it was later revealed in corrections made by those outlets that the notes were written by Giffords' therapist. Giffords' PAC, Americans for Responsible Solutions, has not yet altered the original post or added a new post addressing the issue.

Giffords has limited use of the right side of her body as a result of her injuries. She has been learning to write with her left hand.

Giffords during her testimony urged Congress to take "bold" action on gun reform.

We must do something," she said. "It will be hard but the time is now. You must act. Be bold. Be courageous. Americans are counting on you."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Parental success requires more than love, patience and understanding. Sometimes you need to break out your bag of tricks.

If your little angels refuse to brush their teeth for the recommended two minutes  or to brush at all  we have a few tools to help.

SEE ALSO: App Game for Kids Encourages Healthy Eating

Take a look through the gallery above for our stealth solutions to get your kids to get excited about dental hygiene. Share any of your tricks in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It's not too early to get a jump on Valentine's Day, especially if you're looking for the perfect card. Here at Mashable we're all about geekery, so we've found 10 cards we'd be delighted to give and receive.

SEE ALSO: 8 Adorable Pixel Heart Gifts for Valentine's Day

If your sweetie is also of the nerd persuasion, why not thrill him or her on Feb. 14 with one of these picks? Take a look through our selection in the gallery above and let us know in the comments below which design stole your heart.
--------------------------------------------------------------
When Google unveiled a detailed map of secretive North Korea, online pranksters and trolls began "reviewing" hotels, stadiums and even gulags.

Most of the Google Map "reviews" won't prove too useful for the few outsiders who get to visit North Korea as tourists. Instead, many people indulged in tongue-in-cheek commentary or dark humor about North Korea's cult-of-personality dictatorship, its Orwellian-style surveillance, and the general lack of both food and material wealth for many North Koreans.

"The finest health care clinic in all of Asia doubles as a fast food restaurant that makes starvation in the Glorious People's Democratic Republic a figment of Imperialist imagination!" wrote Ken R, a Google Plus user, in his review of the Ponghwa Clinic in North Korea's capital of Pyongyang.

Similarly fictitious reviews discussed the culinary merits of "dog-butt sandwiches" at Pyongyang's Yanggakdo Stadium, joked about invisible golf courses, and made mock complaints about movie theaters that showed nothing but films made by Kim Jong-il (the Hollywood-obsessed father of North Korea's current leader Kim Jong-un).

Google Maps previously showed few details in North Korea aside from the bare outlines of Pyongyang. That has changed since citizen cartographers  volunteer netizens working with Google Map Maker from outside North Korea  helped Google fill in the map and identify the locations of places ranging from Pyongyang's golf courses for the elite to labor camps housing political prisoners.

SEE ALSO: Video: North Korean Prison Camps Revealed by Google Maps

The Google Map changes debuted just weeks after Eric Schmidt, executive chairman of Google, visited North Korea as part of a private delegation in early January. But Google may not have anticipated exactly how many Google Plus users would use the online reviews to mainly "troll" North Korea.

Such commentary took on an even darker tone in the "reviews" of the North Korean gulags that reportedly house thousands of political prisoners in miserable conditions. Brian Ashcraft, an editor for the gaming website Kotaku, highlighted the more choice remarks about camps in places such as Chongjin, North Korea's third largest city.

"Spent 9 years before escaping," said Tore Sinding Bekkedel, Google Plus user. "What a tourist trap. Unfriendly natives. Only recommended as weight loss program."

This article originally published at TechNewsDaily here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Award-winning tears must be fueling Claire Danes' cry face meme, as people continue to infuse their Homeland humor with her character's emotional acting technique.

CollegeHumor is the latest culprit, featuring the cry face in "Homeland RPG." The parody of the Showtime drama transforms the show into a video game adventure.

Danes plays Carrie Mathison, a CIA intelligence officer who suffers from bipolar disorder. In the fictitious game, players can undermine Carrie by tapping A if they don't trust her or B if they think she's crazy. Either way, cue the waterworks.

A funny fight, awkward sex scene and a lithium-infused Tetris bit add drama to the clip.

SEE ALSO: FBI Teams Up With 'White Collar' to Get Viewers to Solve Real Crimes

Despite the mocking, Danes has won Best Actress honors for Homeland at the Emmys, Golden Globes (twice) and SAG Awards. Homeland returns in the fall for season three.
--------------------------------------------------------------
GIF creation app Cinemagram has seen a significant uptick in interest  but is losing the battle of the buzz to its upstart rival, Twitter's six-second video app Vine.

That's according to London-based startup PeerIndex, a Klout-like service that assigns social media scores to companies and individuals. A day after the Vine launch, Cinemagram had a PeerIndex of 70, with Vine just edging it out at 71.

SEE ALSO: Why is Vine So Hot?

Ironically, Cinemagram had been having one of its best months ever. The Montreal-based app saw a 116% increase in tweets featuring links to its short animations, called Cines, on Jan. 18. That came courtesy of the hit USA Network show Suits, which rolled out a contest asking viewers to submit their best Cines.

You couldn't fault Cinemagram for being a little annoyed, however, when Vine was launched last Friday. According to PeerIndex, Vine-based tweets matched Cinemagram's tweets-per-week score in a single weekend:

There's also a telling inequality in Twitter follower numbers. Cinemagram has roughly 2,500 followers; Vine is at 13,000 and rising fast.

Of course, it helps that Vine is owned by Twitter. But the parent company has done surprisingly little to promote the service. There was no splashy launch event, and no media tie-ins on the scale of the Suits deal.

Which app will win in the long run? Can they both succeed? Share your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
In the wake of a brutal string of gang-rapes of female bus passengers  one in New Delhi and one in Gurdaspur  Indian officials have unveiled a new weapon theyre hoping can help combat violence against women.

Kapil Sibal, minister of information technology, announced last week that the Center for Development of Advanced Computing, a unit within the Indian governments Department of Electronics and Information Technology, plans to make a watch that can alert authorities and family members if danger is at hand.

The watch would be equipped with a button that sends a text message to the nearest police station and chosen relatives. A GPS system within the device will help pinpoint the wearers location. The watch will also feature a built-in video camera that will be activated and record for 30 minutes once the button is pushed.

SEE ALSO: 10 Trickiest Spy Gadgets Ever

According the Wall Street Journals India Real Time, Sibal said he expects the government to develop a prototype by mid-year and eventually allocate companies to produce the device. A government press release stated that initial talks had taken place between the government and India Telephone Industries (ITI), a state-run telecommunications equipment manufacturer. ITIs chairman, K.L. Dhingra later confirmed those talks to India Real Time.

Sibal said the watch is proposed to be sold in two versions  one for $20 and another for about $50. Though when it comes a rape prevention tool, is there really any room for a discount option? And can the watch really help close the gap between a threat and the law enforcements response?

While the watch is certainly better than nothing, some womens rights activists are skeptical and rightly so. A 2011 study by Trust Law, an organization which calls itself a global hub of news and information on good governance and womens rights, ranked India as the fourth most-dangerous country for women. And if youre unfamiliar with dowry-related violence in India, heres a refresher, compliments of the UN.

I dont think this will make any difference in controlling rape cases, Sehba Farooqui, a womans rights activist in Delhi, told India Real Time.

Still, this is a step in the right direction. Lets just hope those steps turn into strides.

This article originally published at Discovery News here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Julian Assange is running for a seat in the Australian Senate, Wikileaks confirmed via Twitter early Wednesday. He will run as a member of the Australian Wikileaks Party.

Assange's mother, Christine Assange, confirmed her son's senatorial ambitions to The Age.

"He will be awesome," she said.

Assange, who previously announced he would run for the senate in March of last year, reaffirmed his commitment to do so after an announcement that Australia will hold elections on Sept. 14.

Assange has been taking refuge in Ecuador's embassy in London since June to avoid extradition to Sweden, where prosecutors want to question him on accusations of sexual misconduct. British officials have said that Assange will be arrested if he leaves the embassy.

Assange's status has caused many to question the viability of a Senate bid. However, Wikileaks claims that if Assange wins a seat, he would have a two-month window to actually set foot inside the building before the rest of the Senate could call a vote to replace him with another member of the Wikileaks Party.

SEE ALSO: Can Assange Really Become an Australian Senator?

Assange, founder of Wikileaks, fears that if he leaves the UK, he will eventually be sent to the United States. He claims the U.S. is seeking to prosecute him for his organization's involvement in the release of classified American military and diplomatic messages. The U.S. has not publicly confirmed any such charges.

Should Assange run for the Australian Senate? Share your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
When a Mercedes ad featuring the bodacious model Kate Upton hit YouTube last week, sports fans and advertising geeks alike were sent into a minor tizzy. Was it a leak of Mercedes' Super Bowl spot, as some speculated? A preview of the actual ad?

SEE ALSO: YouTube: Super Bowl Ads Shown Before the Game Get 600% More Views

As we suspected, that was just a preview, but Mercedes released its actual Super Bowl spot online on Wednesday. There's a lot less Upton  she makes just one brief appearance  but the ad features a star-studded cast nonetheless: Usher's there busting Usher moves; Willem Dafoe is a Lucifer-like character offering a tempting deal on the new CLA-Class; and the Rolling Stones' classic "Sympathy for the Devil" plays a starring role.

Check out the ad for yourself above, then let us know in the comments: Cool commercial, or does it fall flat?
--------------------------------------------------------------
Oh, Luke, for years you've strutted around as pack leader. All that Force gave you a hefty ego boost, but this cat could be in the running for lead Jedi.

Although, we seriously doubt this lightsaber-wielding cat will have its sights set on Star Wars' Rebel Alliance ranks.

SEE ALSO: If J.J. Abrams Turns 'Star Wars' Into a Musical...

It seems more likely that, in a few years, Jedi Kitten will be No. 2 to Darth, and not long after will dominate over all fish in the Empire.

And remember, Luke, Jedi cats have, like, 15 lives.

BONUS: May the Crafts Be With You: 15 Star Wars Etsy Items
--------------------------------------------------------------
Lady Gaga has joined the list of musicians to lose millions of video views on YouTube. Her official account lost some 156 million views, NME reports.

According to a YouTube spokesperson, VEVO reduced the play counts on many major artist's videos by up to 2 million views in December 2012 due to artificially inflation of view counts. Gaga's account survived that initial sweep.

SEE ALSO: Justin Bieber Passes Lady Gaga as Most-Followed on Twitter

Though many millions of views were removed last month, Gaga's videos have been found to be artificially boosted by hackers as well.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Streaming live on Mashable, Totsy founder Guillaume Gauthereau will answer questions from readers at 3 p.m. EST (12 p.m. PST) Thursday, Jan. 31. As part of the Young Entrepreneur Councils #StartupLab initiative, a virtual mentorship program, Gauthereau will appear live via video chat broadcast on this site.

Guillaume Gauthereau is a serial entrepreneur, business leader and socially conscious, green activist. He is currently the co-founder and CEO of TOTSY, where he raised $35 million for the companys first and second rounds of financing, leading it to become the second largest U.S. private sale site dedicated to moms and kids. It attracted over 5 million members and earned a ranking in Forbes as one of Americas Most Promising Companies.

His passion for social responsibility and sustainability is reflected in the TOTSY brand, with its unique position as the only U.S. carbon neutral and socially responsible flash sale company, and his other venture, Sequoia Lab. As founder and chairman at Sequoia Lab, Gauthereau implemented growth and brand strategies for companies that have sustainable and socially responsible interests.

Prior to TOTSY and Sequoia Lab, he worked at Lalique North America and UK, where he was the youngest CEO for the international luxury retail company.

Bloomberg named him an NYC Venture Fellow in 2011, an honor given to exceptional entrepreneurs who create jobs. He is also a member of the World Entrepreneurship Forum, the Clinton Global Initiative and e2.org/NRDC.org.

#StartupLab is a free virtual mentorship program created by The Young Entrepreneur Council (YEC), an invite-only organization comprised of hundreds of Americas most successful young entrepreneurs. #StartupLab takes YEC's mission to help more people start successful businesses to the next level by offering millions of entrepreneurs direct access to YEC members through interactive video chats, email lessons and a library of how-to articles, videos and eBooks. Whether you're just starting up, a current business owner, or you run an organization that supports entrepreneurs, sign up for #StartupLab today for real-world advice from some of the coolest entrepreneurs on the planet.

Check Mashable tomorrow afternoon at 3 p.m. EST (12 p.m. PST), when Guillaume will answer questions from the audience live via video chat.

You can also sign up for an email reminder of the chat by visiting this registration page.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LivingSocial's business went deeper into the red in 2012.

The daily deals service reported a net loss of $650 million in 2012, up from $499 million the year before, according to a new SEC filing from Amazon, which is a backer of LivingSocial.

LivingSocial's net loss widened even as its revenue more than doubled year-over-year. The company posted sales of $536 million in 2012, up from $250 million in 2011. Unfortunately, these gains were offset by the company's growing operating expenses and an impairment charge of $579 million stemming from acquisitions.

Amazon invested in LivingSocial in late 2010 and currently has a 29% interest in LivingSocial worth about $52 million. During Amazon's earnings call on Tuesday, the company refused to go into specifics about the strategy for LivingSocial and daily deals in general, but CFO Tom Szkutak did note that he considered local offerings to be an "interesting... long-term opportunity."

LivingSocial, for its part, tried to cut costs this year by laying off 400 employees  or just under 10% of its total workforce  late last year.

Even with the bad LivingSocial news and the fact that it missed on revenue and guidance estimates in its earnings report yesterday, Amazon's stock is still up about 2% on the day. Groupon, on the other hand, is down by about 1% as the LivingSocial news once again casts doubts on the viability of the daily deal industry overall.
--------------------------------------------------------------
With Macklemore & Ryan Lewis's "Thrift Shop" sitting atop Billboard's Hot 100 singles chart, it must be time for the indie hip-hop duo to sign a major record deal. Right?

Funny or Die explores the somewhat unlikely scenario of the guys tossing away their independent status in this "Macklemore and Ryan Lewis Get A Record Deal" clip.

SEE ALSO: Digital Sales Push Macklemore & Ryan Lewis to Top of Music Charts

"Thrift Shop," which Mashable premiered in 2012, isn't the first independent single to top the Hot 100. Most recently, "We Are the World 25 for Haiti" snatched top billing in 2010.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Rodrigo Diaz, a 22-year-old Georgia man, was shot and killed after his GPS device directed him to the wrong house, his friends who were with him at the time of the shooting claim.

Diaz and the others in his car were trying to pick up a friend to go ice skating Saturday night. However, Diaz's friends say his GPS device mistakenly led him to the home of 69-year-old Phillip Sailors.

Sailors, mistaking the situation for a home invasion, appeared outside of his home with a .22-caliber handgun. He fired one round in the air then another at the car while Diaz was attempting to speed away. The second shot hit Diaz in the head and he later died as a result, according to WSBTV.

"The guy came out," 15-year-old passenger Yeson Jimenez told WSBTV. "He went in again and he came out with a gun in his hand and he shot into the air."

Diaz had recently arrived in the United States from Colombia.

Sailors, a Vietnam War veteran, was arrested Sunday on a charge of malice murder, or murder committed with the specific intent to kill. He has no previous criminal history. His lawyers told WSBTV that Sailors is innocent and was merely trying to defend his home and his family.

"We maintain Mr. Sailors' innocence. I can tell you Mr. Sailors most certainly thought he was defending his life, his wife's and protecting his home," attorney Mike Puglise said.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Mars One says it has secured "a few million" in funding for a future human settlement on the Red Planet. The private Netherlands-based venture aims to send at least six groups of four people on a one-way mission to Mars in 2023.

This initial round of funding will partly finance Mars One's Astronaut Selection program, a process that calls on any applicant that's over the age of 18 and willing to spend eight to 10 years in training before living out the rest of his or her life on Mars. This entire process will be televised, and the audience will select the astronauts that will become part of the first Red Planet colony.

SEE ALSO: Are We Meant to Live on Mars?

While the Mars One plan sounds lofty, its Medical Director Norbert Kraft told Mashable this month that this mission is technically possible, and its final execution will come down to securing enough money.

"For us, committed funds in this phase of development are an important indicator we are moving in the right direction," says Kai Staats, director of business development.

Mars One did not disclose the exact amount of this investment, nor did it reveal the source. However, the organization still has a long way to go before raising the estimated $6 billion it says will be necessary to launch the first wave of settlers. Financing aside, there are still several risks regarding this type of mission. Astronauts' physical and mental health is a major concern, and it's something that Mars One doesn't talk about at length.

Even with these risks, there won't be a shortage of applicants. Kraft says Mars One has already received more than 1,000 emails from people interested in this mission, and the application process hasn't even started yet. After securing this week's investment, Mars One anticipates "hundreds of thousands, perhaps more than 1 million applicants."

Mars One isn't the only private venture that wants to send humans on a one-way mission to colonize the Red Planet. The "Mars to Stay" concept was first introduced in the early 1990s as a way of getting a man on Mars without worrying about the enormous technological and financial hurdles associated with a return flight. Mars Society and 4Frontiers are two other organizations vying for colonies on the Red Planet.

The space community remains divided on the idea of a one-way mission to Mars. NASA is currently working on ways to get a human to Mars and return shortly after. The agency currently has its $2.5 billion Curiosity rover on Mars in order to determine if the planet was ever capable of supporting life. NASA is not in favor of the Mars to Stay concept.
--------------------------------------------------------------
When you think of things you regularly pay a yearly subscription for, office software probably isn't high on that list. Microsoft wants to change that.

With the launch of Office 2013, Microsoft is introducing a new way for you to buy its software. No need to go to the store for a shrink-wrapped boxed version, it's moved to a subscription-based model. For $99 you get what's called Microsoft Office 365 Home Premium. You can install the software on up to five devices in your household. This is nice since many families today have a main computer and then kids tend to have laptops of their own for schoolwork. The software can also be used on Mac computers, though Microsoft is still using Office 2011 for Macs.

For your yearly subscription fee, you get pretty much everything in the Office suite and then some. In addition to Word, Excel, PowerPoint and the oft-overlooked OneNote, among others, you get what is called Office on Demand. This means you can access these programs on any Windows 7- or Windows 8-connected PC. You also get an extra 20GB of SkyDrive space over and above the 7GB Microsoft already offers for free, to save all your documents in the cloud.

SEE ALSO: 15 Monthly Subscription Boxes Shipping Essentials to Your Door

The subscription fee includes 60 minutes of Skype calls each month. You might think that's nothing since PC to PC calls are free, but remember, Skype calls can also be made to a landline phone, say, to a relative who isn't very computer savvy. So that means an hour per month of free calls to Aunt Gertrude.

At the Microsoft launch event in New York City this week, Rachel Bondi, general manager for office product marketing, told Mashable "people want more regular updates on their terms, allowing them to be able to get more frequent features that make their lives a little easier."

That's exactly what Microsoft is trying to do with the subscription model. While it's been three years since the last version of Office was released, Microsoft plans on pushing out updates to programs as soon as they're ready. If PowerPoint or Word has an update, a user can download it  there's no need to wait for a whole new version of the suite to come out. Bondi says some service packs will be automatically streamed to your computer when they're ready so you're always up to date.

SEE ALSO: Why the New Microsoft Office Isn't a Windows 8 App

Customers are getting used to the idea of paying a yearly fee for online services. Xbox Live users pay a yearly fee for their gaming and entertainment. We pay monthly or yearly for services such as Netflix and Spotify. It makes sense that Microsoft is looking to capitalize off this paid model.

You may think $99 a year is a lot to pay for software, and you might be right, depending on your circumstances. If you have just one computer, perhaps two, and use it for mainly word processing and a spreadsheet, you'd be better off buying a boxed copy of Office Home and Student.

However, for families with two or three laptops in the house and perhaps a kid off at school with another one, a $99 yearly fee makes good sense. Especially with the SkyDrive storage and cloud-based access to all your email, calendars and documents.

What do you think, is a yearly subscription fee right for you? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
In our Mobile App Trends Series, Mashable offers tips for utilizing the current mobile app trends to maximize your business' potential.

We know that in the rapidly growing app market it is difficult to keep track of all the changing technology, so we've compiled some resources to help you get the most out of mobile analytics, understand the pros and cons of cross-platform development and learn how to build a cost-effective app.

From leveraging specific features like GPS all the way down to the mere fact that people are walking around with Internet-connected computers in their pockets, smartphones open a whole new world of opportunities for marketers at businesses from large and small. We found some key ways businesses are getting an extra boost via mobile apps.

One of the biggest technologies to sweep the mobile industry looks more like magic  and it has a lot of big names chasing its imagination capturing abilities. You probably remember the first time you saw Near Field Communication, or NFC, in action: A swift tap against a sensor yields an instantaneous result, faster than a barcode scan.

It sure seems like the technology for the future, and it's undeniable that major companies such as Google are placing big bets for NFC to become the next global standard for everything from payment transactions to easy data transfer between devices. But, not all is set in stone, and NFC's still-nascent presence in tech means that it's a big gamble.

So, is it worth it? Mashable spoke with experts from a variety of industries to get a better handle on when you should develop an NFC app  and when to leave the technology on the shelf.

When building a mobile app, a well-thought-out strategy is critical, great design is paramount, and solid development is fundamental. But analytics is key to measuring the execution and value of all the hard work you put into the app. As smartphones continue to infiltrate every aspect of our lives, its understandable why marketers and developers alike are making a sustained effort to measure user behavior through app analytics. While the mobile application industry is relatively young, there is a variety of platforms and services vying for the privilege of providing you with good app data.

These tips will help you to get the most of of mobile app analytics, and hopefully help you to avoid some costly mistakes.

Sure, apps make our life easier, streamlining our calendars and grocery lists, offering entertainment while we're stuck in line, making it easy to collaborate with your co-workers.

But while apps may be efficient and convenient, a user is not afraid to vocalize (or tweet) complaints about an app's shortcomings  even minor ones. Here at Mashable (and in the Twittersphere), we crowdsourced our most common app glitch pet peeves.

For us, it felt good to vent our frustrations and get these burdens off our chests. We hope app developers out there will heed our advice and work around these flaws, avoiding the wrath of petulant smartphone owners.

Over six years ago (on January 9th, 2007, for those of us who are counting), Steve Jobs released the original iPhone. At the time, the only apps on the iPhone were the ones that came pre-installed (think stocks, calculator and YouTube). There were so few apps, they didnt even fill up the home screen! Apple didnt provide the ability to create or install any add-on apps. Instead, developers were urged to create web apps that users would access through the built-in Safari web browser.

Facing backlash from developers, particularly in light of a community of hackers that figured out how to crack the iPhones code and build their own apps, Apple came around and embraced native apps.

When it comes to mobile app design and development, the best way to learn is often by observing what works in successful apps.

This doesn't mean copying every interface or design element from a popular app  on the contrary  it means looking at what features in a successful app make it both beautiful and functional and applying those lessons to your own projects.

Perusing through our favorite apps for iOS and Android  and a few excellent mobile UI pattern blogs  we've come up with some lessons that developers and designers can learn from some of the best mobile apps.

Mobile developers across the globe have developed and released more than 650,000 iPhone apps, 400,000 iPad apps, and 600,000 apps for Android. Are you thinking about building an app? A key step in the process is choosing the right programming language, which depends on how scrappy you're willing to be.

Make sure you've researched cross-platform app design and reviewed the common pitfalls of developing your app. Decide on your audience and what platform you'll use, and then weigh your options to select a language.

While the phones of yesteryear were dull and basic, it was possible to go through a day or even two without the need to recharge. With an Android or iOS device? Not so much.

Until recently, it was often assumed by the general public that surface operations were to blame. Our games, cameras, maps and streaming videos are welcome and celebrated additions to our daily routines, but the sacrifice required by their bright animation is well known  use them for a few hours, and youll inevitably be on the search for a charger.

Last year, a team of researchers from Purdue University and Microsoft found that Android app ad-serving  the process that connecting apps to digital ad networks  was responsible for up to 75% of app-related battery drain. More often than not, these processes were taking place within the free version of apps, from Angry Birds to the New York Times, as the ad-serving provides advertisers with valuable data from a swath of users seeking free entertainment. In short, advertisers cover the cost normally gathered from the apps purchase.

The massive growth of the app market has coincided with the creation of a parallel niche industry  the proliferation of accessible, low-cost development alternatives to traditional shops and agencies.

But not all brands  or industries altogether  require diverse, expansive functionality in their apps. In the same regard, a lean approach to launch can move a unique product to market in a mere matter of minutes. For these brands, the process going forward is much as the same is it is for high profile, heavily touted launches: engage with customers, build off their response and expand and iterate in due time.

As the mobile applications market moves toward $25 billion per year, according to a MarketsandMarkets report, non-traditional development opportunities are emerging in a number of forms. Programs now allow everyday consumers to build apps through HTML, drag-and-drop platforms, customize templates and simply drop an SDK. These services are on the rise, and they're worthy tools to keep in your arsenal.

So you've already learned how to navigate the tricky world of cross-platform app design and worked through all of the common pitfalls of developing your app. You have a vision, some inspiration and maybe even a name that you know will be perfect. So ... now what?

It's time to get down to the nitty-gritty and begin designing the structure, flow and features that will combine to form your finished mobile app. But actually performing these tasks isn't easy  there are tons of moving parts and project management aspects to keep in mind during development. Developing a functioning and enjoyable mobile app requires discipline and practicality. If you don't tend to the nuts and bolts of production, you're putting yourself at risk for disaster.

These mobile design donts will help any mobile designer avoid some messy obstacles, so make sure to keep them in mind. Your app  and your sanity  will thank you for it.

Mobile development has come a long way in the past few years. But as technology continues to introduce new and more innovating products at a rapid pace, there's room for many developers to make huge mistakes along the way  ones that could jeopardize their product or even their entire business.

"I think that you can screw up five times before you get up in the morning, in ways that you never even thought of," says Josh Koppel, CCO and co-founder of ScrollMotion. "It's a dicey business sometimes to try something new, but the truth is, it's the mistakes that help you actually learn stuff. "

We spoke with four leaders in mobile app development about the common issues developers often face when create a new product.

Sure, some companies can focus on just one operating system and exclude all others, but most businesses and brands need to target myriad device types. It's no longer enough to just have an iPhone app  even small and medium sized businesses need to have a plan to support iPad, Android phones, the Amazon Kindle, larger Android tablets, Windows Phone and BlackBerry.

Developing for all of these platforms is a challenge, especially for the developer or business with limited resources. Fortunately, an entire sub-industry of development tools and languages exist to help solve this problem. Enter the cross-platform mobile framework.

Cross-platform frameworks  which include Appcelerator's Titanium, Rhodes and PhoneGap  are designed to limit the work that a developer or development team has to put in to creating apps for iOS, Android, BlackBerry, Windows Phone and beyond.
--------------------------------------------------------------
MTV's college station, mtvU, launched a digital experience Wednesday, created to teach students about the harsh realities of human trafficking.

"The Backstory," the video experience, is the latest component of mtvU's Against Our Will campaign, which unites students in the growing movement to end modern-day slavery. The interactive site was inspired by four James Madison University students who won mtvU's Against Our Will Challenge, which calls for students to innovate with digital tools to spread awareness for modern slavery. The Backstory puts you in the position of a victim of sex trafficking or labor trafficking victim. After completing the experience, you'll learn ways to get involved with the ongoing fight to end human trafficking.

The experience (which doesn't work in all browsers) begins with a list of ads that resemble Craigslist posts. If you select one such ad, titled "No Questions No Papers Just EZ Money," you'll see the following post:

SEE ALSO: Why Tech and New Media Can Help End Modern Slavery

One can understand why a college student struggling to finance their education would respond to the ad to learn more. You can then click to learn the Backstory, and see what happened to the young man who replied to this ad. If you connect with your Facebook account, the experience integrates your photos into the experience.

 

The narrative includes videos of dancers from Ailey II, music from Kenna, and text read by Talib Kweli, all of which were inspired by the stories of modern day slavery in the U.S. Below is the first segment of the labor trafficking sequence:

Human trafficking is prevalent in all 50 U.S. states, according to the National Human Trafficking Resource Center. The International Labor Organization says there are an estimated 20.9 million victims around the world and hundreds of thousands of victims in the U.S. The criminals behind the trade make billions of dollars each year.

Check out The Backstory and let us know if you think the digital experience is a good way to learn about the illegal trade.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Choosing a baby name is one of the most important decisions a parent makes for a child. After all, who really wants their bundle of joy to be called Hashtag for the rest of their life?

The Nametrix app takes the decision-making process one step further, giving parents-to-be some insight into their child's future profession and personality. Nametrix: Doctor or Dancer? lets users search a name, then lists likely professions, political parties and popularity associated with it.

Cathys tend to be homemakers, costume designers and nurses, while the top profession for a Riley is "XXX performer."

The idea for Nametrix was born when developer Mark Edmond and his wife were choosing names for their daughter with the help of baby books and websites.

"I realized that there's so much more to a name than the basic popularity info and 'name meanings' text that all the baby name apps and websites I found centered around," Edmond says on his blog. "Nothing out there provided much in the way of real data."

The app's data comes from the census, Wikipedia and a U.S. campaign contribution database, and also allows users to see the peak year and location for a name's popularity. Another feature lets you search by occupation (Fredric is the number one name for lawyers, followed by Cecily), and allows you to share name description and data via email.

BONUS: The Best Apps for New Parents

Do you have any favorite baby-naming apps? Let us know your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Nest Labs, the thermostat company founded by the man who is credited with helping to create Apple's iPod, has raised $80 million from investors and is shipping 40,000 to 50,000 units a month, according to a report.

GigaOM reports that Google Ventures led the latest round of financing, which gives Nest an estimated $800 million valuation. The investment comes as sources tell the publication that shipments could reach the 1 million per year level by summer. Meanwhile, the company is planning to branch out into other areas which could include home lighting and/or alarm systems.

Reps from Nest could not be reached for comment on the report.

Founded in 2010, Nest Labs sought to update the home thermostat, which Matt Rogers, Nest Labs co-founder and VP of engineering, called "an eyesore on the wall." Like Apple, the company bet on innovative design and marketed the product at a relatively high price point ($249), but promised savings of up to 20% to 30% on heating and cooling bills. In October, the company introduced a second-generation version of the product at the same price. The product is currently sold at Best Buy, Amazon and at Apple Stores.
--------------------------------------------------------------
While the countdown to Super Bowl XLVII marches on, something else is competing with the Big Game for attention and press time: the long-term impact of concussions and whether or not tackle football is actually a safe game to play.

A series of violent off the field incidents and increased awareness about the devastating toll repeated blows to the head can take have cast doubt upon the future of the NFL in some people's minds. President Obama himself chimed in on the debate during an interview with The New Republic that was published this weekend.

Im a big football fan, but I have to tell you if I had a son, Id have to think long and hard before I let him play football, Obama said. And I think that those of us who love the sport are going to have to wrestle with the fact that it will probably change gradually to try to reduce some of the violence.

Carolina Panthers tight end Greg Olsen, apparently, doesn't see things the same way. In a tweet addressed to Obama on Tuesday evening, he wrote:

The statement immediately provoked a slew of responses from followers, including a number who took his post rather seriously:

That also led to Olsen expanding on his position on the hottest topic in American sports:

For more, you can check out Olsen's timeline. It's not exactly ground-breaking stuff, but was nonetheless very interesting to see a high-profile NFL player use Twitter to debate with fans (and Obama) about a controversial, hot button issue. But what do you think  does football deserve the bad rap it's getting, and would you let your kid play? Give us your take in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Super Bowl Sunday, the biggest day of the year in sports, is just around the corner. The high-stakes matchup between the San Francisco 49ers and the Baltimore Ravens will be played this Sunday in New Orleans.

There's no better time than now to get ready to support your team with some techy tailgating gear. Whether you're a Niners or a Ravens fan, you've got to show your true colors on the big day. And if you're a fan of one of the other 30 teams, well, there's stuff for you too. Remember, there's always next year!

SEE ALSO: Volkswagen's Super Bowl Ad Has a Jamaican Accent

Check out our gallery above to see the best NFL-related gadgets.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Meet Oscar, the most cultured dog ever to have lived.

This Alsatian, Corgi, Cocker Spaniel, and Basset Hound mix was the first pup to ever have trasversed the entire planet, putting his paws on foreign territory from China to Peru.

Oscar was rescued in 2009 by Joanne Lefson from Cape Town, South Africa. This globetrotting canine helped bring awareness to more than 475 million homeless dogs worldwide. During his trips, he set aside some quality sight-seeing time to sniff around the many wonders of the world.

SEE ALSO: Happy Puppy Day! Top 10 Dogs to Follow on Social Media

Unfortunately, Oscar died in a car accident on January 11, 2013, but we're sure he's enjoying first class flights with caviar and champagne somewhere up in doggy heaven. The photos in the gallery above are in memory of Oscar and his finest travels.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Need a quick hit of romance and Mad Men-style glamor to get you through the rest of your work day? Take six minutes and watch this Oscar-nominated short from Disney: Paperman.

SEE ALSO: No, This Film Didn't Inspire Disney's Oscar-Nominated Paperman'

A blend of hand-drawn animation and computer graphics, Paperman is set in a stylized mid-century Manhattan. It deals with the star-crossed love of two office workers, and how a pile of papers brings them together. Disney released the video on YouTube late Tuesday.

The short is drenched in nostalgia  not least because of our increasingly paperless offices. (Throwing your laptop out of the window doesn't quite have the same airborne effect.) But the seamless hand-drawn and computer combo  created by a group of just 12 artists and first-time director John Kahrs  is something new in the world.

And if you feel like rushing out of the office and kissing a stranger on the street after watching it, we wouldn't blame you.
--------------------------------------------------------------
For our first Pinterest contest, we asked you to pin your connected living room to win a high tech prize from LG. We received more than 475 entries, and you pinned nearly 3,700 contest pins! While the minimum number of pins to enter the contest was five, most people pinned many more than that  one board even had 62 pins!

The winners of the contest were chosen at random. However, in addition to highlighting the winners' boards, we wanted to showcase other fantastic boards that you created. The idea of the contest was to design a dream living room for your home. Some of these rooms were comfortable with massive sofas and fluffy pillows, while others were cutting edge and filled with futuristic home gadgets.

Congrats to our winners and thank you to everyone who entered! We hope you enjoyed creating your dream living room on Pinterest. Keep an eye out for future Pinterest contests from us.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Prenatal testing could become safer and more informative in the coming years thanks to technologies developed to survey a baby's genome from the mom's blood.

Illumina, the world's leading manufacturer of DNA sequencing machines, is now moving aggressively into the field of prenatal sequencing. Earlier this month, the company announced that it would purchase startup Verinata, which launched its prenatal chromosome counting system last spring. The acquisition follows a string of moves by Illumina to increase its presence in prenatal medical diagnostics.

Conventional methods for checking a fetuss genome for abnormalities require invasive procedures, such as using a needle to withdraw some amniotic fluid surrounding the fetus or some cells from the placenta, methods that can sometimes cause a miscarriage.

These tests mainly focus on abnormal numbers of certain chromosomes (such as the condition that causes Down syndrome) and are offered only to women with high-risk pregnancies. But much more could be gleaned from the fetal DNA floating in moms blood, and some believe that such tests will soon be available to many women.

The first company to offer prenatal screening from a mothers blood was Sequenom, which made its MaterniT21 test available in October 2011. Last year, doctors used Sequenoms test to screen more than 60,000 pregnancies for abnormal numbers of chromosomes.

To search for these chromosome disorders starting from 10 weeks of gestation on, the companies sequence the bits of DNA floating in a sample of the mothers blood.

Around 12% of the DNA in her blood belongs to her fetus. The tests do not distinguish which sequences belong to mom or the unborn baby. Instead, counting algorithms are used to search for small but significant changes in the amount of one chromosome to another. DNA sequencing machines read out strings of DNA letters a few dozen base pairs long, and the mix of moms and babys sequences are then sorted by chromosome. If there are more sequences than expected belonging to a particular chromosome, then the fetus probably carries an extra copy.

In a normal blood sample, around 1.36% of the cell-free DNA should belong to chromosome 21, says Alan Bombard, chief medical officer of Sequenom. When a fetus has Down syndrome, the test usually finds 1.4%. Thats not much difference, but you are counting it 10 million times, says Bombard.

Medical experts are also taking note of the burgeoning field. In November, two medical societies released a joint opinion that the noninvasive DNA tests could be used to screen high-risk pregnancies, which include cases where the mother is over 35 or has had previous pregnancies with chromosome abnormalities.

The technology stands to change the whole of prenatal medicine, says Nancy Rose, a clinical geneticist who chaired the joint-opinion committee. This is a very early use of the technology and it will only get better, says Rose. Still, the committee recommends the tests be offered only to women with high-risk pregnancies, not to those with average or low-risk situations: There just isnt any data on low-risk patients, says Rose. We dont have good information to give these women without having large prospective trials. Its a reasonable stance to be cautious.

Another reason for caution for using the tests for pregnancies of low or average risk is that any indication of a chromosome disorder would need to be confirmed with an invasive procedure such as an amniocentesis, which can cause a miscarriage. Many folks biggest concern is a false positive, says Bombard.

Still, Illumina sees a much bigger market in the future. With these noninvasive approaches, eventually we will be able to test everyone, says Greg Heath, who manages Illuminas diagnostics division. And one day, the tests could screen for a much greater number of disorders.

While the noninvasive prenatal testing companies are currently offering tests for whole chromosome errors, they are looking to a future where they can get a much more detailed view of the fetal genome and perhaps even tell parents about whether their unborn baby carries particular gene mutations.

We are just getting started with [abnormal numbers of five specific chromosomes], but we will be expanding this to single gene disorders, says Bombard. This is just the first step in what we hope to be a long road to help patients, he says.

Illumina and Verinata say they will also pursue more refined fetal genetic analysis. The limit is the cost of sequencing, not something fundamental about the approach, says Rich Rava, chief scientific officer of Verinata. Weve always looked at it as whole-genome technology, he says.

As sequencing gets cheaper and cheaper, if you wanted to look at a particular mutation, say, in the cystic fibrosis gene, you may be able to do that in the future, says Heath.

As the technical advances come, the ethical issues remain to be addressed. Tackling just that single gene gets into different issues, says Heath. With a whole-genome sequence from a fetus, how do families handle knowing that their unborn child carries a genetic risk that may cause problems only late in life compared to mutations that will likely cause an early death?

If there is the probability that a baby is going to die within the first six months of a short and painful life, you might make a different decision, says Heath. We think any choices should be informed choices.

This article originally published at MIT Technology Review here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Research In Motion  now just "BlackBerry"  finally took the wraps of its much-leaked BlackBerry Z10 smartphone, the first phone to run the BlackBerry 10 mobile OS.

The Z10 will be the first in a new class of products for RIM, created to go toe-to-toe with the likes of Apple's iPhone and flagship Android superphones such as the Samsung Galaxy S III.

The company also revealed the Q10. It has the trademark BlackBerry keyboard.

CEO Thorstein Heins said, "BlackBerry 10 devices are absolutely the best typing experience in the industry. Period."

It even boasts features those phones don't have, such as being able to sense finger swipes in sleep mode.

SEE ALSO: The First BlackBerry 10 Phone Is Exceptional, but Perplexing [REVIEW]

RIM expects the BlackBerry Z10 to be available from all four major carriers in the U.S. for $199 with contract (the carriers themselves set the specific pricing and availability). Customers will be able to buy it unlocked for $599.

In Canada, where RIM is based, the Z10 will cost about CDN $149.99 on a three-year contract.

The BlackBerry Z10 has a 4.2-inch screen with a resolution of 1,280 x 768, or 356 pixels per inch (ppi). That makes it technically sharper than the iPhone 5, whose "retina" display is 326 ppi.

The phone is 0.35 inch thin, and it weighs 4.78 ounces. It's powered by a 1.5GHz dual-core Qualcomm Snapdragon processor with 2GB of RAM. Built-in memory is 16GB, but users can install a microSD card to expand storage by up to 64GB.

Wireless connectivity includes dual-band Wi-Fi, Bluetooth 4.0 and near-field communication for instant pairing with NFC accessories and mobile payments. It supports both 4G LTE and HSPA+ networks as well as global roaming.

SEE ALSO: Here's How the BlackBerry Z10 Stacks Up With Competitors

There's an 8-megapixel rear camera and a 2MP front-facing model. The cameras are equipped with a feature called Time Shift, which allows the user to "go back in time" on a specific person's face in any given shot, finding the moment where, say, they didn't blink.

Battery life is rated as 10 hours of talk time (on 3G) and up to 305 hours on standby (again on 3G). Video playback is up to 11 hours.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Research in Motion didn't just introduce a new OS on Wednesday, it also ushered in a new brand identity

Speaking in New York during the BlackBerry 10 launch event, CEO Thorsten Heins announced that RIM will now be known as BlackBerry. The company has also changed its ticker symbol from RIMM to BBRY and introduced a new tagline, "One brand, one promise."

The company will showcase the new name in an upcoming Super Bowl ad, its first.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Research In Motion renamed itself 'BlackBerry' and unveiled its long-awaited BlackBerry 10 lineup, but it looks like investors were not impressed.

The stock had been up as much as 5% on Wednesday to $16.62 a share leading up to the launch event. After Thorsten Heins unveiled the new BlackBerry 10 phones, however, the stock did an about-face and plummeted by 11% from the day's high, falling to as low as $14.41 a share  a loss of 6% for the day.

RIM's stock has enjoyed a resurgence in recent months on investor optimism for the BlackBerry 10 launch, surging from below $7 a share in October to nearly $18 a share earlier this month.

As of publication, the stock had recovered somewhat, but was still trading right around the $15 mark, a drop of about 5% on the day.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Judd Apatow regulars Seth Rogen and Paul Rudd will appear in a 2-minute Samsung ad slated for the fourth quarter of the Super Bowl.

However, instead of Apatow, the spot is directed by Jon Favreau of Iron Man fame. The brand has not released the ad or a teaser, but a rep said the ad is called "The Big Pitch" and "shows Rogen and Rudd on a quest to become the Next Big Thing."

Thirty-second Super Bowl ads this year are going for $3.7 million to $3.8 million, which means Samsung's spot could have cost as much as $15.2 million. In the 2012 Super Bowl, the company ran a 90-second ad called "A Thing Called Love" that promoted its Galaxy Note that poked fun at Apple fanboys and fangirls.
--------------------------------------------------------------
In the latest installment of the Apple-Samsung patent battle, judge Lucy Koh has decided that Samsung did not infringe Apple's patents willfully, therefore overturning one element of the jury's ruling from August 2012.

Originally, the jury had determined Samsung's infringement of Apple's patents was willful in several instances, which could possibly triple the $1.05 billion damages granted to Apple. Both Apple and Samsung were unhappy with the verdict: Apple asked for increased damages, while Samsung wanted an entirely new trial.

"To establish objective willfulness, Apple must prove by clear and convincing evidence that there was an 'objectively high likelihood that its actions constituted infringement of a valid patent'," writes Koh in the new ruling. However, since Samsung managed to prove it believed the infringed patents were invalid, it could not have infringed them willfully.

On the other hand, the original $1 billion ruling has been upheld and Samsung has been denied motion for a new trial.

Both companies can still appeal certain elements of the ruling, so we probably didn't hear the last of this seemingly never-ending case.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Sesame Street tweeted its way to a monstrous Internet win Wednesday afternoon.

Grover took over Twitter duties to put a social media spin on the classic 1971 children's book, The Monster at the End of This Book: Starring Lovable, Furry Old Grover. The Twitter version played out in 29 tweets that you  and your kiddos  can read below.

Sesame Street also has an interactive version available on iTunes.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Director Dan Cohen is a six-time Emmy Award winning veteran journalist and documentary filmmaker. Space Shuttle Columbia: Mission of Hope premieres Jan. 31 at 9 p.m. EST on PBS.

As a child, there was a big, blue chair in my living room that served as my "Mercury space capsule." I orbited the Earth hundreds of times in that chair. Though my imaginary missions into space eventually came to an end, my fascination with space exploration remained.

On Feb. 1, 2003, the Space Shuttle Columbia disintegrated during re-entry, claiming the lives of all seven people on board. In the days that followed, I found myself glued to what was going on as the story continued to unfold. A couple weeks after the accident, I read an article about a miniature Torah scroll from the Holocaust that Columbia astronaut Ilan Ramon carried into space. I was struck by the incredible power and symbolism of Ramons profound gesture.

Not only did I see Ramons story as a heros story, but I also recognized it as a universal story of survival, triumph, faith and hope. As I thought about the Torah in the context of the greater tragedy, it occurred to me that it might serve as a means to share a Holocaust story with a new generation through my passion for space exploration. That was the start of my nearly 10-year journey to create a documentary about the space shuttle disaster.

I contacted a friend at NASA to see if he knew anything about the owner of the scroll, Dr. Joachim "Yoya" Joseph, the Israeli scientist who had worked with Ramon on the Columbia mission. I explained my interest in developing a film around the story of the scroll, and just three minutes later a voice came on the other end of the line from Tel Aviv.

"What can I do to help you tell this story?" Yoya asked without hesitation. This would become a question I would hear again and again from everyone involved with the project.

In the days and conversations that followed, Yoya explained how his family had been ripped apart by the Holocaust. He also revealed how he had come to possess the tiny scroll after his secret bar mitzvah ceremony held at Bergen-Belsen, a Nazi concentration camp in northwestern Germany. In an amazing twist of fate, the little boy from the concentration camp had gone on to become the Israeli scientist working on a space mission with the nations first astronaut, Ilan Ramon.

In order to portray Yoyas bar mitzvah, we commissioned an artist to create similar sketches so we could continue the technique throughout the scene. Allowing the story to come to life through the sketches created a far more dramatic moment in the film than had we used World War II stock footage. The end result is intimate and powerful.

The documentary's scenes of Bergen-Belsen also features drawings by Louis Asscher, a diamond cutter and amateur artist from Amsterdam. When he and his family were deported to the camp, he managed to smuggle paper and pencil with him. Asscher became very ill, and the Nazis frequently left him behind.

In those moments, he sketched the horrors of Bergen-Belsen. For me, its not whats in the drawings  its whats missing. You find yourself drawn deeper into the story as you begin to mentally fill in the gaps and wrap your mind around what life in Bergen-Belsen was really like.

Fast forward years later to footage of the Columbia crew in the mountains toward the time of the shuttle launch. These videos were captured by one of the crew members, astronaut Dave Brown. A few months after I started production, I reached out to Doug Brown, Daves brother, to see what he thought about the idea of the film.

Doug shared that his brother had been an aspiring filmmaker in the process of capturing footage for a documentary, but was unable to see it to completion. When Doug extended an invitation to come over and watch the tapes, I didnt hesitate to take him up on the offer.

When I walked into Dougs house, he had Daves editing equipment set up in the living room, alongside a box of 95 tapes. Just a few months after the Columbia accident claimed his brothers life on film, I found myself sitting in the living room beside Doug as we watched the final days, weeks and months of Daves life through his own eyes. It was quite a surreal experience.

The crew of the shuttle was one of the most diverse to fly together into space. They represented a shining example of what can be done when people work together on a shared mission. When we came across the scene Dave had shot of the Columbia crew in the mountains I thought, "Wow. What an intimate way to tell the story of how close these people had become to each other, and how important they had become to each other."

During production, many critics have questioned whether it would be possible to create something uplifting from the ashes of such tragedy.

Astronaut Steve MacLean solved the dilemma for me when he carried a sister Torah scroll into space with him on a later mission as a tribute to his friend Ilan Ramon. The scroll rises again, hope springs eternal.

As Colonel Ramon once said himself, this is the story of "what can happen when they go from the depths of hell to the heights of space."

But even more than that, it crosses boundaries to show what's possible when we work together for the greater good. For me, that is what space exploration is ultimately all aboutthe incredible journey of the human spirit.
--------------------------------------------------------------
South Korea launched its first homegrown rocket into space Wednesday after a series of delays and two earlier failures, marking a spaceflight leap for the country's space program, according to press reports.

The Korean Space Launch Vehicle-1, also known as the Naro booster, soared into space from South Korea's Naro Space Center 300 miles (482 kilometers) south of Seoul. The rocket launch was aimed at sending the small Science and Technology Satellite 2C (STSAT-2C) into orbit, Yonhap News reported today.

"At 4 p.m. today, the Naro was successfully launched. The satellite was deployed 540 seconds after the launch and an analysis of related data shows the satellite has successfully entered its target orbit," Lee Ju-ho, minister of education, science and technology told Yonhap News Agency.

Today's successful liftoff marks South Korea's third launch attempt to send a satellite into orbit, and the country's first attempt since 2010. South Korea's attempts to launch the Naro rocket in 2010 and 2009 met with failure, with this latest mission experience weeks of delay due to technical issues.

Today's launch carried the 220-pound (100 kilograms) STSAT-2C satellite into orbit atop the 108-foot-tall (33 meters) KSLV-1 rocket. The rocket consists of a Russian-built first stage and a South Korean upper stage.

Officials won't be sure the satellite made it into orbit unscathed until Jan. 31 when the spacecraft can make contact with ground stations in South Korea the news agency goes on to report. A ground station in Norway did pick up beacon signals from the satellite, suggesting that it is performing as expected, mission officials said.

The STSAT-2C satellite was expected to reach a final orbit that circles the Earth once every 103 minutes, with a high point about 932 miles (1,500 km) above the planet and a low point of about 186 miles (300 kilometers), according to previous mission descriptions.

South Korea's successful rocket launch comes just over a month after its nearest neighbor, North Korea, successfully launched its own Unha-3 rocket and a satellite into orbit in December. U.S. and other observer nations, however, suspect the North Korean rocket launch was a veils missile test to support that country's ballistic missile program.

This article originally published at Space.com here
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Super Bowl is a momentous occasion for players, coaches and fans alike  that, we all know.

But it's also a bigger boon to its host cities than many probably realize. Get this, for example: Super Bowl XLVII in New Orleans takes place this Sunday and is expected to generate, by some estimates, upward of $430 million for the Crescent City's economy.

The Big Game is expected to create more than 6,000 full-time and part-time jobs for the New Orleans area, and visitors and businesses are projected to generate more than $26 million in revenue for state and local governments in Louisiana.

SEE ALSO: Jim Harbaugh: 'Facebooking and the Tweeter' a Waste of Time

Last year's numbers for Super Bowl XLVI in Indianpolis are downright staggering. Visitors spent an average of $571 per person per day during the 10-day period surrounding the game, according to a Rockport Analytics report. More than $50 million was spent on food and drinks, more than $63 million on lodging and more than $43 million on ground transportation. Those numbers are all likely to grow this year for New Orleans.

The software service TurboTax compiled all this data and more to create the infographic below, which sheds some fascinating light on just how much the Super Bowl can juice up an economy. Check it out for yourself, then let us know what you think in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Super Bowl XLVII between the San Francisco 49ers and Baltimore Ravens is just days away, but there's plenty left to do in order be ready for Sunday's epic showdown between coaches Jim and John Harbaugh.

Namely, it's time to get your social media house in order  even if 49ers coach Jim says the "Facebooking and the Tweeter" are a waste of time.

Which players and reporters should you follow on Twitter? How can you find the teams themselves online? What are the hashtags that're bound to take off on Super Bowl Sunday?

Luckily, social media monitoring company Sysomos has put together an infographic that should help you get started. It's got you covered on all of the above, and even includes a rundown on fan sentiment and which fans tweet about their teams the most.

Check it out below, then add your own Super Bowl social media suggestions in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
If you need some inspiration but have only 10 minutes to spare, these TED talks are worth your time.

Nonprofit TED puts "ideas worth spreading" on center stage in the form of conferences and independently organized lectures worldwide.

These four videos offer a snapshot of journalism today, covering topics that include citizen reporting, verification of social media content, data journalism and investigating government corruption.

Simon Rogers, Datablog editor at the Guardian, puts forward the idea that anyone can be a data journalist, just as anyone could be a punk rocker in the 1970s.

"All you needed was a guitar and a friend, and you had a band," Rogers says. "Were in a situation now where we tell stories with numbers and its a new way of journalism that literallylike punk  anybody can do."

Rogers says anyone can be a data journalist because data is everywhere, and free tools to manipulate that data are at our fingertips. Rogers mentions a few noteworthy tools and explains how data helped the Guardian uncover the economic causes for the London riots in 2011.

One of the first journalists to file a request under Britains Freedom of Information Act, Heather Brooke talks about her trials and triumphs in exposing government corruption in the British Parliament. The methods she used to uncover fraudulent spending show that the investigative stories leading to great impact often start with a simple question.

She includes a few resources any investigative journalist can use, like the Investigative Dashboard, a website featuring a collection of all the databases you need to find any document. Another tool is Alaveteli, a platform that makes Freedom of Information (FOI) requests a cinch and can be used in any country with a FOI law.

Markham Nolan, the managing editor at social media curator Storyful, outlines the painstaking task of verifying content found on social media. Journalists use Twitter as a de facto real-time newswire to get instant access to breaking news, so finding the source is becoming more vital than ever, Nolan says.

Sometimes you come across a piece of content thats so compelling, youre dying to use it, but youre not 100% sure because you dont know the source is credible. he says. You have to do that investigative work.

He shares simple investigative techniques journalists can use to verify legitimate content, like using a phone book, Google Maps, and other free web tools such as Spokeo and Wolfram Alpha. If youre in a rush, at least check out the brilliant visualization of Twitter activity during the Egypt revolution.

Director of Small World News, Brian Conley talks about the importance of tapping into local stories and training unheard voices to speak for themselves.

"The future of media is local," Conley says, with journalists telling the stories of their fellow citizens in their native countries. "Everybody has a story and somebody wants to listen to it."

For a goosebump-inducing moment, fast-forward to Conleys anecdote about the potential for training citizen journalists.

This article originally published at International Journalists' Network here
--------------------------------------------------------------
In a clip that made a stir on the sports web Wednesday, the New Orleans TV reporter above has her live shot interrupted by a drunken Super Bowl reveler. Obviously nonplussed, the reporter deals with the inebriated 49ers fan in a pretty unique way  by asking, out of left field, "How long have you had an STD?"

"I don't have an STD," the interloper responds.

"Ohhh, then why did you want to talk?" the reporter says with mock surprise, despite initiating the non-sequitur.

"I don't have an STD; that is so disrespectful," the woman answers, before (kind of) drifting away.

I, for one, have never seen a reporter pull anything like this and can't decide if it's a hilarious way to deal with annoying bystanders or just plain mean. What do you think? Give us your take in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Twitter rolled out an update today that makes it easier to view photos and videos on the site, specifically photos and videos in profiles or search results.

Now when someone tweets a photo, you can click on it directly from search results or that persons profile page and view a larger version of the picture without being taken to another page.

Media galleries on Twitter now include video from partners who are already supported in Expanded Tweets. That means you see videos from Vine, YouTube, and Vimeo show up in the Media Gallery.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Vineit is a new tool that lets you share videos from Twitter's video sharing service Vine on Tumblr.

Vineit is very simple to use: open the project's homepage, and drag the "Vineit" button to your bookmarks toolbar. Then, when you see a vine video, simply click on that link, and you'll share it on Tumblr.

If there are no Vine videos on the page, the tool will return an error.

Marrying Tumblr and Vine is a logical step, since Tumblr has become the go-to service for images and animated gifs (usually surrounding a certain topic), and we don't doubt many users will find it helpful.

Vineit joins the fast-growing army of Vine-related tools. For example, VineGifR is a Mac app that turns a Vine URL into an animated GIF file, and Just Vined is a page that lets you see the last 20 videos posted on Vine.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Walker Lukens comes to life in his new music video, "Dear Someone," as a man trapped in a photo. The catch? The picture can move, and it leaves home to wander New York City.

The video weaves a stop-motion tale using hundreds of Polaroid pictures, whose once-blank canvases were provided by ex-Polaroid employees now leading The Impossible Project.

"Dear Someone" is from Lukens's forthcoming album, Devoted. It comes out April 2.

SEE ALSO: 'Look at This Instagram' Puts Modern Twist on Nickelback Song

"These songs are about not having the things that you want yet," he said in a statement. "It's not necessarily bad, you know. It makes you work harder."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Working out is stupid. Sure, you can improve your heart health and get abs like Justin Bieber, but is any of that really worth it when you tumble off a treadmill?

SEE ALSO: A Giant Supercut of People Being Nailed by Dodgeballs

If you still need convincing on the appeal of a couch-potato lifestyle, these three minutes of exercise fails should keep your butt in the La-Z-Boy. The Poke gathered YouTube's most squirm-triggering workout moments for a compilation to watch every time you need the demotivation for a gym trip.
--------------------------------------------------------------
World of Warcraft players have raised more than $2.3 million for Hurricane Sandy victims, after embarking on a real-life quest to help with relief efforts last month.

Blizzard, the company behind WoW, announced that the funds will go toward supporting the American Red Cross' Sandy relief initiative.

Throughout December, players contributed by virtually adopting the "Cinder Kitten," available in Blizzard's pet store, for $10. For more on WoW's charitable efforts, watch the video, above.

WoW players, did you purchase the Cinder Kitten? Tell us in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
While most advertisers rise to the occasion and produce at least serviceable ads that are designed to run before 100 million or so people, a surprising number of them belly flop.

That's not such a bad thing. Too much caution with your Super Bowl ad and you have nothing but boring, formulaic pap. Try too hard to copy the winning ads of last year and you wind up looking too derivative.

SEE ALL SUPER BOWL COVERAGE HERE

However, there are cases where you'd think somewhere down the line someone in the room might have said, "No, seriously you want to run this?" but no one did. That's the head-scratching conclusion behind this list of some of the worst Super Bowl ads of all time. Note we say "some of" because there ought to be an asterisk next to the headline saying "that are still available on YouTube." Lost to the ages are most crappy ads from the late '60s, the '70s, the '80s and much of the '90s. Even many of the last decade's ads seem to have been purged. That's a shame, because at least one ad should be on this list and isn't. That would be possibly the worst Super Bowl ad of all time, Just for Feet's breathtakingly stupid "Kenya Mission" ad, which can be found here.
--------------------------------------------------------------
"It's not you it's me. I just need some space to work on myself. It's really just the timing. You deserve someone better."

Puh-lease. Those breakup lines aren't foolin' anyone. We've all heard 'em, we've all used 'em. It's time the dating world was injected with some creativity, some wit and, for goodness sakes, some honesty.

Enter an 8th grader mature beyond his years. He knows when a gal this needy is barking up his tree, he's got to tell her to love it or leave it. Because he's got his priorities straight  fried chicken over girls any day.

SEE ALSO: Upbeat Heartbreak as Couple Announces Breakup With Song

The note was found on the floor of an eighth grade classroom and posted by the teacher's friend on Reddit (lisabethlynn). So if you need a quick way to drop that stage-5-clinger before Valentine's Day, just take a page from this kid's book.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Amazon is paving the way for more original content, announcing Thursday that five pilots for original children's shows have been greenlit for production. After they're complete, viewers will be invited to vote to determine which pilot is made into a full-length series to run on Amazon's online video streaming services in the U.S., UK and Germany.

The pilots will showcase concepts for a preschool-age children's series, coming from professionals who have already worked on shows for that age group, including Blue's Clues and Rugrats.

Descriptions of the pilots, per Amazon:

Creative Galaxy is an animated interactive art adventure series, designed to inspire kids creative thinking through crafts, story, music and dance. The series was created by Angela Santomero, creator of Super Why!, the Emmy-nominated literacy series, Blues Clues and Daniel Tigers Neighborhood.

In this innovative problem solving series, Dot, Dorothys daughter, goes off to Oz everyday with the children of the beloved characters from L. Frank Baums classic book, The Wizard of Oz. In each episode, the yellow brick road leads Dot to a new magical location where she solves problems alongside her Oz friends.

Produced by The Jim Henson Company (Sid the Science Kid, Dinosaur Train) and created by Howard Baker (Rugrats), Teeny Tiny Dogs follows Butch, Butterfly, Dinky and Polly as they help one another navigate the big world despite their teeny, tiny, small size. This series promotes happiness through friendship, learning, growing and developing a strong sense of self as seen through the eyes of canine friends.

Tumbleaf was created by Drew Hodges and Bix Pix Studios, an award-winning stop motion studio. The series, aimed at preschoolers, is set in a whimsical land where a small blue fox named Fig plays each day and discovers adventure, friendship and love around every bend in the path. Children will be enriched by narratives that promote play through exploration and cognitive reasoning.

The Untitled J.J. Johnson Project revolves around Anne, a young scientist, who creates three robot helpers to assist her scientific experiments in the back of her dads junkyard. This science-based series from creator J.J. Johnson (Dino Dan, This is Emily Yeung) aims to introduce kids to science and technology in a fun, new way.

It's no coincidence that Amazon is prioritizing children's content now. In December, Netflix nabbed exclusive rights to stream new video releases from Disney, and opened Disney's catalog of cartoon classics, including Dumbo and Pocahontas, to Netflix subscribers. Netflix also rolled out a "Just for Kids" portal in August 2011, making it available on Playstation 3 consoles in March 2012.

In addition to the children's pilots, Amazon is also developing pilots for an original comedy series, the company announced in December. Amazon has not said when it plans to make the pilots available for voting.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Amazon's homepage, amazon.com, was unreachable for around an hour. During the outage, a user trying to reach the online store's main page would only see a white page with the message: "Http/1.1 Service Unavailable."

On the other hand, navigating directly to other pages on the website, like Amazon Books, worked perfectly. It's not clear what was causing the outage, and Amazon hasn't responded to requests for comment yet. We'll update this story as soon as we have more information.

One of many Twitter accounts linked to Anonymous has claimed responsibility, although there is no way of confirming if this is indeed a hacktivist DDoS attack.

UPDATE 5:25 PM 01/31/2013: Amazon sent the following statement: "The gateway page of Amazon.com was offline to some customers for approximately 49 minutes. Other pages of the site were accessible and Amazon Web Services was not impacted."

Additionally, someone with knowledge of the situation told Mashable that the outage was not related to any "outside group."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Google has a new Android statue on its campus, and it's quite different from its predecessor.

The new statue, Google's Paul Wilcox notes, is mounted on Building 45  one of the buildings near the center of Google's campus in Mountain View, Calif.

Unlike the "standard," green Android statue on campus, the new one is metallic  or chrome plated. This lead some of the commenters on Wilcox's Google+ profile to question whether the new statue is a hint for a new version of Android, or perhaps some sort of Chrome-Android integration, but Wilcox himself dispelled that rumor in a comment.

"I'm not a coder, I'm a user-facing person who talks to people about Android stuff and shares their feedback with the product team. To be clear, this post is a little tongue-in-cheek and is not meant to be a sneaky announcement of a new version of Android. It is, however, an announcement of a new statue," he wrote.

Google is known for setting up Android-related statues with each new version of the Android OS. Besides the green Android robot statue, the company has a statue of a gingerbread man, a piece of honeycomb an ice cream sandwich and some jelly beans.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Haven't you heard? It's not just a phone, it's a war.

So pick a side and choose wisely. You're making a lifetime commitment; is it Apple or Android? And there's no going back for fear of being called a traitor, a war criminal even a flip-flopper.

SEE ALSO: How to End the iPhone vs. Android Debate

And if you're spending any time liaising with the other side, prepare to sever ties. There's no sleeping with the enemy when it comes to this conflict.

This song is your official war cry, begin preparing for battle.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Apple loves to patent and protect its products. Now, according to a trademark application, the company aims to keep others from copying the design and layout of its retail stores.

Nearly three years after Apple filed for a trademark to protect its store design, the request has been approved this week by the US Patent & Trademark Office.

Among the trademarked features is the "clear glass storefront surrounded by a paneled facade consisting of large, rectangular horizontal panels over the top of the glass front." This is in line with other Apple Store patents granted in the past for features such as its floating glass staircase.

The trademark also protects the area where stores hold instructional classes.

"There is multi-tiered shelving along the side walls, and a oblong table with stools located at the back of the store, set below video screens flush mounted on the back wall," the application reads. "The walls, floors, lighting, and other fixtures appear in dotted lines and are not claimed as individual features of the mark; however, the placement of the various items are considered to be part of the overall mark."

SEE ALSO: Judge Koh: Samsung Did Not Willfully Infringe Apple's Patents

Apple says the store provides various computers, software, mobile phones, consumer electronics and accessories, but because the application was filed in May 2010  just one month after the launch of the iPad  it doesn't list tablets as its own category.

Color is not claimed as a feature of the store. For a full look at the application, click here.

This isn't the first time a big tech company sought a trademark for its retail store designs  Microsoft was granted one in 2011.

Store image via iStockphoto, EdStock; diagram courtesy of US Patent & Trademark Office
--------------------------------------------------------------
Beyonce's camp is giving the world a sneak peek at her upcoming Super Bowl halftime show performance. In a new video, Beyonce sits on steps with an Apple computer before rehearsal clips pop up, revealing dance moves that hint at the songs Beyonce might perform.

One observant YouTube commenter says the flashes of choreography point to Beyonce possibly performing "Single Ladies (Put a Ring On It)," "End of Time" and "Run the World (Girls)." The music in the teaser clip is "Countdown" from her last studio album, 4.

 

At a halftime show press conference Thursday, Beyonce addressed recent controversy about her national anthem performance at U.S. President Barack Obama's inauguration.

SEE ALSO: Watch Beyonce Stunningly Address Her Lip-Syncing Controversy

Update: Beyonce's people posted another rehearsal video after the press conference:



People are also wondering which artists, if any, Beyonce will bring on stage with her.

Will her fellow Destiny's Child members Kelly Rowland and Michelle Williams reunite and perform their new song "Nuclear"? Will her husband, Jay-Z, make a cameo?

Answers are unlikely to surface until the actual halftime show on Feb. 3. But until then, Beyonce's team will likely continue to tease the shindig with videos and photos like this:
--------------------------------------------------------------
Beyonce opened Thursday's press conference about the Super Bowl halftime show with a performance of the national anthem and finished by asking, "Any questions?"

Her rhetorical question was in response to her lip-syncing controversy that surfaced after she performed "The Star-Spangled Banner" at Barack Obama's presidential inauguration.

Despite the a cappella opening, media prodded Beyonce to answer whether any sound came out of her vocal cords during her inauguration performance earlier this month.

SEE ALSO: Beyonce Teases Super Bowl Halftime Show in Rehearsal Video 

"Typically, they have you sing a pre-recorded track, so I did sing along with the pre-recorded track," she said, noting that she didn't have time to practice with the U.S. Marine Band.

The Presidential Inaugural Committee (PIC) requested that the Marine Band accompany Beyonce Knowles-Carter in the performance of the Star-Spangled Banner at the 2013 Inaugural Ceremony. However, there was no opportunity for Ms. Knowles-Carter to rehearse with the Marine Band before the Inauguration so it was determined that a live performance by the band was ill-advised for such a high-profile event. Each piece of music scheduled for performance in the Inauguration is pre-recorded for use in case of freezing temperatures, equipment failure, or extenuating circumstances. Regarding Ms. Knowles-Carter's vocal performance, no one in the Marine Band is in a position to assess whether it was live or pre-recorded.

When asked whether she'll lip sync during the Feb. 3 Super Bowl halftime show, Beyonce quipped, "I will absolutely be singing live ... I'm ready."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Finding actors to star in your six-seconds of Vine movie magic can be challenging. Crafting brilliance in a few quick moments requires an enchanting star. Unfortunately, you're probably just Vining from your futon without access to a Hollywood Rolodex.

SEE ALSO: Vine Mania! 10 Creative Vines on Twitter

While it might be tempting to let your cat play the leading lady, don't bother because she's not interested. She has a full schedule packed with sleeping, coughing up hairballs and ignoring you. Well, wait  maybe cats are more like starlets than we thought.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Consumer Electronics Association (CEA) has dropped CNET as a partner for its "Best of Show" Awards at the annual Consumer Electronics Show (CES). It also reinstated the Dish Hopper with Sling as the winner of the 2013 show.

The editorial team at CNET originally named the new Dish DVR as its top pick during CES 2013, but was forced to remove the gadget from consideration at the behest of its corporate parent, CBS. CBS is in litigation with Dish over the Hopper and as a result, the conglomerate has decided that its subsidiaries  including CNET  cannot review the Hopper or any other product that is subject of current litigation with regards to its legality.

The Hopper will share the top honor with the previously announced winner, Razer Edge. The CEA is also searching for a new partner to replace CNET in running the Best of CES awards program. CNET has produced the Best of CES awards for the CEA since 2006.

CBS' new policy led to the resignation of senior CNET writer Greg Sandoval because of his lack of "confidence that CBS is committed to editorial independence."

In a statement, CEA president and CEO Gary Shapiro said, "We are shocked that the 'Tiffany' network which is known for its high journalistic standards would bar all its reporters from favorably describing classes of technology the network does not like." Shapiro expounded on the controversy and his perspective of the experience in a column for USA Today.

Karen Chupka, senior vice president for events and conferences at the CEA, said the organization is "concerned [that CNET's] new review policy will have a negative impact on our brand should we continue the awards relationship as currently constructed." She added, "we look forward to receiving new ideas to recognize the 'best of the best' products introduced at the International CES."

CNET posted a story about the CEA's decision, which quoted a CBS spokesperson explaining CNET's new policy of not reviewing any device from a company that CBS is in active litigation with:

"CNET is not going to give an award or any other validation to a product which CBS is challenging as illegal, other networks believe to be illegal and one court has already found to violate the copyright act in its application," the rep said. "Beyond that, CNET will cover every other product and service on the planet," a CBS spokesperson said.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Chinese hackers continuously attacked The New York Times over the past four months, the paper revealed Thursday. The infiltrators grabbed reporters' passwords and accessed private emails before the Times expelled them.

The attacks began Oct. 25, the same day the paper published a story revealing Chinese prime minister Wen Jiabao had garnered a multi-billion dollar profit through business deals.

The paper worked with AT&T and security firm Mandiant to track the hackers' activity. Security experts learned the hackers' patterns and identified backdoors they opened to allow themselves access to the Times' network. When enough intelligence about the hackers had been gathered, the Times closed off the hackers' access and revealed the attacks publicly.

The hackers accessed the Times by first infiltrating computers at American universities then directing their attacks through those computers to protect their identities. They installed 45 pieces of malware on the Times' network, which gave them access to all computers on that network.

The malware, according to the Times, eventually pointed to China as the source of the attack.

"The malware was identified by computer security experts as a specific strain associated with computer attacks originating in China," reported the Times. "More evidence of the source, experts said, is that the attacks started from the same university computers used by the Chinese military to attack United States military contractors in the past."

SEE ALSO: Here's What Happens When Chinese Hackers Hit Your Blog

The hackers stole the corporate passwords of every Times employee and were able to access the personal computers of 53 Times employees, though most of them were not newsroom workers. They were not able to access any delicate information regarding the Jiabao investigation, according to the Times' Executive Editor Jill Abramson.

Computer security experts found no evidence that sensitive e-mails or files from the reporting of our articles about the Wen family were accessed, downloaded or copied," Abramson told the Times' reporter who wrote of the attacks.

The Times uses Symantec anti-virus software, which detected only one piece of malware  a success rate of approximately 2% in this instance. Symantec said in a comment that "advanced attacks like the ones the New York Times described in the [ ] article underscore how important it is for companies, countries and consumers to make sure they are using the full capability of security solutions."



Cyberattacks between governments and non-state actors including media outlets have become commonplace in recent years. China, the United States, Israel, Russia and other governments have all been accused of launching attacks via computer worms or viruses. 



China has been a particular hotbed of hacking activity, having been blamed for attacks against a wide range of targets including Google, the United Nations, Lockheed Martin, NASA, the U.S. Department of Defense and Bloomberg News. China's military, however, flatly denied any involvement in the attacks against the Times.



Chinese laws prohibit any action including hacking that damages Internet security," Chinas Ministry of National Defense told the Times. "To accuse the Chinese military of launching cyberattacks without solid proof is unprofessional and baseless."



Mashable composite. Photos courtesy of Flickr, niallkennedy
--------------------------------------------------------------
Finding the right gift during the holiday season requires some challenging decisions, but connected consumers are taking advantage of their devices to help them shop. Nearly six in ten cell owners used their phone in a physical store to make purchasing decisions, a new study says.

The study, conducted by the Pew Internet & American Life Project found that more than half of adults used their mobile phones to call someone for advice, look up reviews or compare prices. According to Pew, more cell owners (46%) called a friend or family member compared to 27% of those who used their phone to compare costs.

Young adults ages 18-29 are much more likely to online price match and seek product reviews, with 56% checking reviews during the 2012 holiday season. Women are more likely than men to make calls for recommendations, and smartphone owners beat out regular cell users for price matching.

SEE ALSO: In-Store Shopping Will Only Get Better With Apps

Consumers in suburban areas would rather engage in a phone call than research the product, while urban shoppers tend to look online before deciding.

The rise of online shopping, with its convenience and offers, posed little allure to the surveyed shoppers. Majority of the mobile interactions (particularly cost comparisons), resulted in the consumer either buying the item in the store or not purchasing it at all.

Do you use your cellphone to make in-store shopping decisions? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Someone get the students at Conifer High School a Nobel Peace Prize  They are saving the world one kitty at a time.

Thanks to these kids, Flipper, a cat with a twisted spine, has a chance at leading a normal life of mouse-chasing and bedpost-scratching.

Flipper was born with a condition that doesn't allow her back end to walk on the same plane as her front. And while veterinarians at Aspen Park Vet Hospital in Conifer, Co., were ready to put her down, the Blitz Robotic Club stepped in with some true ingenuity.

SEE ALSO: Inspiring Blind Kitty Wins Best Cat Video of 2012

The students created a harness that allowed Flipper's hind legs to stay erect, giving the cat a chance to strut around the clinic as she pleases. The device will (hopefully) strengthen Flipper's legs enough that she can walk around on her own.

So, thanks, Conifer High School, you did the rest of us cat lovers (that means the entire Internet) proud.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Want to treat your Facebook friends to some unlimited breadsticks at the Olive Garden or a shopping spree at Target? The social network announced Thursday the arrival of the Facebook Card  a tangible, reusable gift card that allows you to keep monetary balances from different retailers on the same card.

"After you've received a card, the next time you get a Facebook Card gift, it will instantly be added to your existing card," the company said in an official blog post. "Your card can hold multiple gift balances, and each balance is dedicated to the retailer associated with the gift."

This means you could have $100 at Sephora and $8.25 at Jamba Juice on the same card's balance.

Here's how it works: After selecting a gift for a friend from the Gift Cards & Digital category on the site, select a value and make a purchase.

"Your friend will be notified instantly about your gift, and will receive a Facebook Card in the mail a few days later," the company said. "As soon as it arrives, your friend can use the card at the retailer you've chosen for the amount youve gifted."

Gift balances can be viewed on via your Facebook account settings on both mobile and desktop versions. It also lets you know when the balances change with real-time notifications sent to your phone.

SEE ALSO: Here's What a Facebook Gift Looks Like

The ability to purchase a Facebook Card will roll out gradually to members in the U.S.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Welcome to this morning's edition of "First To Know," a series in which we keep you in the know on what's happening in the digital world.

Today, we're looking at three particularly interesting stories. Facebook beat earnings expectations for the quarter, clearing $1.58 billion in revenue. Twitter has enhanced its multimedia experience with a pop-up gallery for large photos. Furthermore, its media galleries now include videos from all of Twitters partners  notably Vine, Youtube and Vimeo. And while we're on the subject of Twitter, a statement on gun violence from Arizona representative Gabrielle Giffords sparked both positive and negative reactions on the social network.

Check out the video above for more on these stories.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It's always nice to be included. That is, unless it's a Facebook Event for a 20-piece recorder recital playing Nickleback's greatest hits.

Since Facebook added the ability to plan events and invite your friends a few years ago, it's become one of the post popular online ways to organize get-togethers. It's also a feature that pisses people off.

SEE ALSO: 20 Things Your Most Annoying Friends Do on Facebook

Are you part of the problem? Look at our tips above to learn how to be a more conscientious Facebook host.

What are your Facebook Event pet peeves? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Facebook ain't afraid of no ghost. Hundreds of thousands of users scrambled to participate in the social network's latest hoax.

The image, posted Monday by a page called See more, invited users to interface with the supernatural. According to the instructions, a user needed to "like" the post, whereupon the photo would reveal one ghost. Then after commenting with the number "1," the rest of the ghosts would magically appear in the haunted house.

SEE ALSO: How to Halt a Facebook Hoax

(Not) surprisingly, over 239,000 people had "liked" the post, and 122,000 had commented by the time of publication. An overwhelming number of the comments were, in fact, the number one.

However, others chimed in with advice, such as "another sucker pic" or "Nope i pressed 1 and nothing appeared!??!"

Seems to us someone just wanted to rattle your chains.

BONUS: 8 Social Media Hoaxes You Fell for This Year
--------------------------------------------------------------
E-readers started surging in popularity during the late 2000s, but the first such device may have debuted over 60 years ago.

A Spanish teacher named ngela Ruiz Robles invented the "Mechanical Encyclopedia" in 1949  way before Nooks and Kindles hit store shelves  and historians claim it's the first of its kind, according to the New York Daily News.

In Robles' patent application, the then 54-year-old described her device as follows:

"It has some coils where you place the books that you want to learn in whatever language. By a movement of the same [COILS] it passes over all the topics, making it stop where you would like it to."

Alas, Robles' project never hit market because she didn't receive enough funding. Her prototype is now displayed in the National Museum of Science and Technology in La Corua, Spain. To see the early e-reader, check out the video, above.

Would you consider Robles' device a precursor to the e-reader? Discuss in the comments, below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Failed autocorrects can be a source of frustration to many smartphone users. Though the misspellings can oftentimes be hilarious, they usually makes texting a pain.

Fleksy, an alternative keyboard, promises accuracy so precise even those who are blind can use it. The autocorrect system works so users can type without looking at the phone and even takes it a step further: you can type without the touchscreen keyboard.

Using the QWERTY layout, users tap on the screen and the text prediction software detects the word you meant to enter, even if you missed every key. Swiping gestures replace function keys such as delete or the spacebar, since the keyboard consists only of letters.

Syntellia, a recently-launched startup that developed the keyboard, debuted a new version of the patent-pending technology at CES 2013. Within hours of its beta version announcement, more than 5,000 people registered to receive the app. Fleksy was also named a finalist in SxSW's Interactive Accelerator competition.

SEE ALSO: For Texting Without Looking, Researchers Adapt Braille

Ioannis Verdelis, Syntellia's founder, explains the keyboard was born out of company members' own frustrations with autocorrect. The technology started out as an application for the visually impaired, and has a feature that speaks words back to you. Watch the video, below, to see how it works.

Other apps like Android's SwiftKey and iPhone's VoiceOver mode speed up touchscreen typing, but Verdelis says Fleksy's users can type as quickly as they do on a laptop. Instead of asking users to learn something new, the "flexible system" adjusts to familiar habits.

"Rather than looking specially at what buttons the users press, the way other systems do, we designed technology from the ground up specifically for touchscreens," Verdelis tells Mashable. "It analyzes patterns, the context of what you're writing, and looks at the structure of the English language to make predictions."

Currently its creators are working on additions to the keyboard application, including integration with other apps. It's available as a stand-alone app on iOS and in beta version for Android as a system-wide keyboard.

Would you use Fleksy? Let us know your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
With BlackBerry 10, BlackBerry now has a smartphone platform that can compete with Android and the iPhone, and the Z10 and Q10 phones will roll out globally over the next few months. For tablets, however, BlackBerry only has its nearly two-year-old PlayBook, and it looks like it won't get any siblings anytime soon.

In a Q&A with reporters following the the BB10 launch keynote, BlackBerry CEO Thorsten Heins said the company would "continue" in the tablet space, but that it was still looking for a way to differentiate and position any new tablet. Heins noted that the cost-to-profits ratio of tablets was a challenge  alluding to the rise of smaller, cheaper tablets such as the Amazon Kindle Fire  which are sold at or near cost and make money through services.

"We want to provide a value proposition that is not just hardware, but software, too," Heins said. "What well be doing in the tablet space is looking for specific services on top of the tablet  financial, healthcare verticals. We are still exploring various use cases for it."

Heins did, however, reiterate the promise that all existing BlackBerry PlayBooks will get upgraded to BlackBerry 10, though he wasn't specific on timing. The current PlayBook software is based on the same software code as BlackBerry 10, so it's the only current BlackBerry device that's compatible with the new operating system. BlackBerry has essentially used the PlayBook as a real-world testing ground for many of the experiences in BB10.

SEE ALSO: Will Lytro Ever Go Mainstream?

However, the PlayBook had a tough time in the market. Unveiled in fall 2010, the PlayBook didn't debut until spring 2011, and it launched in a semi-incomplete state, without a native email app. It could only access email when it was bridged with a compatible BlackBerry phone, and the software was notoriously buggy at the start.

The PlayBook software has since been updated and polished, and BlackBerry says sales have picked up, mainly because its price was slashed considerably.

It may have a checkered history, but the PlayBook is BlackBerry's first and only tablet, and it looks like it will be for a long time to come.

Would you like to see a new BlackBerry tablet? Who should be its target audience, and what features should it have?
--------------------------------------------------------------
Major League Baseball's first African American player, Jackie Robinson, would have celebrated his 94th birthday Thursday. To honor the ground-breaking civil rights and sports pioneer, Google devoted Wednesday's search homepage Doodle to the baseball legend.

The doodle features "Google" redone in the style of the Brooklyn Dodgers logo, with an illustration of Robinson, wearing his No. 42 jersey and swinging a baseball bat. Robinson, who died in 1972, signed with the then Brooklyn-based Dodgers in 1947, thereby breaking Major league baseball's "color barrier." African Americans had been playing the game with distinction for years in the so-called "Negro leagues." That tale, how Branch Rickey defied baseball convention and signed Robinson, is soon going to be a movie starring Harrison Ford as Rickey and Chadwick Boseman as Robinson.

Robinson's signing opened the door for other African American players, transformed America's favorite past time and had a significant impact on the then embryonic Civil Rights Movement. Robinson was inducted into Baseball's Hall of Fame in 1962.

Clicking on the Doodle will take you to a wealth of information about the career and life of Jackie Robinson. The Doodle, by the way, comes one day before the U.S.'s Black History Month, which kicks off on Feb. 1.

You can learn more about Jackie Robinson at his non-profit foundation site.

Thumbnail image courtesy of The Library of Congress
--------------------------------------------------------------
Details and diagrams for Google Glass just hit the FCC.

The filing  originally discovered by the eagle eyes at Engadget  arrives just days after the first Google Glass Foundry developer event in San Francisco.

Developers at the event were forbidden from talking to the media and had to sign an NDA to participate, so the FCC filing is our best look yet at the technical details behind the project.

The filing is for the Explorer Edition hardware  which is what Google will provide to developers who pre-ordered devices at Google I/O last summer. Certification details for the Bluetooth module included this diagram:

Unfortunately, that's the only image of the actual device in these filings. Google filed a request with the FCC asking for short-term confidential treatment of a number of items, including external photos, test setup photos, internal photos and the user manual. Google's request means that we won't see that information for at least 180 days.

With FCC certification, Google Glass is ever closer to becoming a reality. Let us know your take on the filings in the comments.

Photo courtesy of Mashable, Pete Pachal; Diagram courtesy of the FCC
--------------------------------------------------------------
Rockstar Games has announced that the upcoming entry to the Grand Theft Auto series will be released on Sept. 17. The game is being moved from its original spring estimated release date to allow for more development time, Rockstar said.

Grand Theft Auto V is promised to be the largest game world Rockstar has ever created. The game takes place in the beautiful and violent city of Los Santos, where players will take hold of three protagonists. Players will be able to hop at will between Michael, an elder statesman of crime bosses not ready to retire; Franklin, a former street gangster and gifted driver; and Trevor, an extremely violent psychopath.

"Grand Theft Auto V continues to push the series forward in new ways; Rockstar North are creating our deepest, most beautiful and most immersive world yet, said Sam Houser, Founder of Rockstar Games. We are very excited for people to learn more about the game in the coming months.

Grand Theft Auto V will be available for both Xbox 360 and PlayStation 3.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Swedish academic and Gapminder Foundation co-founder Hans Rosling says data doesn't always back up our conceptions about the world. In the video above, Rosling explains that our ideas about developed and developing countries largely reflect the reality of fifty years ago, rather than today.

The video, The River of Myth, was released to coincide with Bill Gates' annual letter, and shares its emphasis on the power of measuring to achieve progress.

Rosling begins by examining the huge gap between child mortality rates in developed and developing countries fifty years ago, in 1963. By 1990, many countries had made progress, while others, such as Ethiopia, had hardly moved. In the last decade, however, Ethiopia caught up significantly. Rosling says that the East African nation's rapid progress can be an example for the countries where child mortality rates are still crippling.

SEE ALSO: 10 Key Takeaways From Bill Gates' Annual Letter

"To ensure that happens, we must measure the progress of countries. It's only by measuring that we can cross the river of myth," he says.

If others follow Ethiopia's lead, Rosling says, preventable child mortality can be history by 2030. 

 

Thumbnail image courtesy of The Gates Notes
--------------------------------------------------------------
As Secretary of State Hillary Clinton heads to retirement, news outlets are sure to write deep reflections on her legacy. But let's not forget something many will not include on a list of her achievements: The outgoing secretary is a Grammy Award winning artist.

Yup, she won one back in 1997 for the audio version of her book It Takes a Village: And Other Lessons Children Teach Us. The award was for best spoken word album. "I didn't even know people who couldn't sing a note and who were tone deaf were eligible for any Grammys," she told reporters after the win.

Listen to her talk about it to the press in the video above.

This article originally published at National Journal here
--------------------------------------------------------------
It's a tough day to be a music fan and also a member of the House of Representatives: House officials have blocked music-streaming service Spotify from working on their chamber's computer network.

The blockade was triggered by longstanding House rules against peer-to-peer networking, even though Spotify is not peer-to-peer. Those rules were designed to stop House staff from sharing files illegally or downloading malware-ridden content.

"To help protect House data, our IT policy generally prohibits the use of peer-to-peer (P2P) technologies while operating within the secure network," a spokesman for the Office of the Chief Administrative Officer told Politico. "While Spotify is currently not authorized, the CAO has and will continue to work with outside vendors to enable the popular services that improve member communication capabilities."

SEE ALSO: Obama Campaign Releases Official Spotify Playlist

Spotify's not happy about the philharmonic filibuster, using lofty language about democracy and free speech in a statement to Politico:

"It is a sad day when a few bureaucrats can block our nation's leadership from enjoying free, secure access to over 20 million songs. Music is a common language that all political parties speak and should be used to bring the legislators of this great country together so they can solve the serious issues facing our nation."

Spotify users in the Senate can still jam away to their heart's content, according to Politico. Thankfully for members of the House, Rep. Paul Ryan's iPod has everything from AC/DC to Led Zeppelin  so maybe they can just take turns sharing.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Talks of cyberwar and a cyber Pearl Harbor seem to be a regular fixture of news reports in the last few months, with prominent U.S. administration officials like Janet Napolitano or Leon Panetta regularly touting the threat of a cyber attack on the United States. But not everybody is buying it. For one, Howard Schmidt, the former chief cybersecurity advisor to President Barack Obama, is skeptical.

"I don't share the viewpoint that we're on the brink of disaster every time a new worm comes out or a new DDoS (distributed denial of service) comes out," he told Mashable. In fact, he even disagrees with the terminology that's being used. "I don't like using the word cyberwar, and I don't like using the word cyber 9/11, cyber Pearl Harbor and all these other things," he said.

Schmidt sat down to talk with Mashable after the 2013 Kaspersky Cyber-Security Summit in New York City on Wednesday, where he discussed cybersecurity with Eugene Kaspersky, the head of the eponymous online security giant.

Schmidt said he's not discounting the threat, in fact, he is well aware of the potential disruption that cyber attacks could cause. For him, the worst case scenario is an attack that takes out power, something that could have cascading and potentially very damaging effects. It's exactly for this reason that he also warns that using cyberweapons or malware against another nations should be a measure of last resort.

"You can use fire in a conflict if you're not going to burn. If you're going to burn, you better not care about what's going to burn," he said. "And in cyberspace you think about how vulnerable we are in the United States and generally in the developed countries, that could have a worse effect than what we're trying to solve to begin with."

Malware, as opposed to actual bombs, isn't destroyed once it's used, and targets can take a look at the code and re-use it. Schmidt mentioned the example of a piece of malware that could be used to stop a country from launching a nuclear weapon, a last-resort scenario in which most countries would agree a cyber attack is warranted. But you sill need to think about it twice. "If that can be turned around, reverse-engineered and modified, and keeps you from having your airplanes take off or your trains from working, that's bad," he said. "If it ever needs to be done, it's got to be given a tremendous amount of thought.

SEE ALSO: Experts Say Looming Cyber Warfare Attacks Could Be 'Catastrophic'

So far, there is no official proof that any country has ever engaged in a cyber attack, although certain malware attacks have been linked to different nations. The Stuxnet worm, which disrupted Iran's nuclear facilities, has been attributed to the United States and Israel and the recently uncovered cyber espionage operation Red October is rumored to be either a Russian or a Chinese operation.

To avoid a cyber arms-race and an escalation in cyber attacks, Kaspersky has openly advocated for more online regulation, including international treaties limiting the use of malware  just like there are treaties against biological and nuclear weapons.

For Schmidt, that's not a viable solution because it would be hard to enforce such a treaty. "At some point in the future maybe that will work but right now, number one, we have enough difficulty enforcing treaties of physical things that you can actually count, whether it's weapon systems or whether it's export import of these things, it's extremely difficult," he said.

Instead of a treaty that will take decades to become reality, Schmidt thinks countries should just respect the rules of engagement that already apply in real warfare. In war "we don't just arbitrarily start shooting at people, we don't send planes, we have respect for airspace, we have respect for a lot of the international laws," he said. "Cyberspace should not be any different."

Another aspect of cybersecurity that Schmidt has worked on is the protection of personal data online. While at the White House, Schmidt devised the National Strategy for Trusted Identities in Cyberspace, an Internet identity system that had the goal of improving both security and privacy online. Schmidt's idea was to entrust the private sector with delivering such a system. Government regulation in these cases, he argues, is rarely a good idea. "I've never found that government regulation, particularly when it comes to technology, does not have at some point unintended consequences," he said.

That's why he opposes the idea of creating a national electronic passport or ID, another solution that Kaspersky has endorsed in the past. While Schmidt admits that that could work in certain countries and cultures, it would never work in the United States. And it might be a bad idea in many cases anyway. "If we have everybody have a Internet identity that governments can have access to, think would would've happened during the Arab Spring. People would have been killed."
--------------------------------------------------------------
For Ashton Kutcher, playing the role of Steve Jobs in the upcoming film jOBS was a life-changing experience.

Speaking at Macworld Thursday, Kutcher said,  Playing this character has changed my life, and changed me as a person.

An Apple fan, Kutcher said he spent three months immersing himself in everything Steve.

Steve is fresh in our minds, hes a person who we have a daily reminder of in our hands, said Kutcher. Its not like playing Lincoln. We dont have a whole lot of video footage of Lincoln.

Kutcher said its even more important for the movie to be as accurate as possible. To prepare for the film, Kutcher created a Soundcloud file of every audio file he could find of Jobs, and listened to them whenever he could, repeating what he heard.

All you have to do is start repeating Steve and you sound really smart, he said.

Through playing Jobs in the movie, Kutcher learned about several of the Apple co-founders personality traits; traits that he hopes to incorporate into his own life.

Specifically, Kutcher talked about Jobs focus, compassion for the consumer, and his belief that it was possible to do the impossible.

He had an unparalleled desire to make something that benefitted other people, said Kutcher. He said that Steves passion, and his dream to not settle with what life gives you, instead making it better, played a role in his desire to be part of the film.

Kutcher recently made headlines for adopting one of Jobs' habits in particular: a fruitarian diet. The diet of just fruits and carrot juice put Kutcher in the hospital - with pancreatitis, oddly - right before the movie was filmed.

When asked if he would have invested in Apple if Jobs had come to him looking for money, Kutcher said that he hopes that he would.

Josh Gad, who plays co-founder Steve Wozniak in the film, said that before he started working on the film his knowledge of Wozniak was limited to his appearance on Dancing With The Stars.

He too learned a great deal about Wozniak before filming and specifically mentioned that he read iWoz several times.

Wozniak recently criticized a clip of the movie for being inaccurate. To that, Gad said that he hopes his thoughts will change after he sees the film in its entirety:

I greatly appreciate that man, and I hope when he sees the movie in its entirety hell see we went to great lengths to capture the essence of the journey. It was an intensive journey for me  there will always be debate on what we got right and what we got wrong  it was done with the utmost love, admiration and respect  and I hope when he sees it in his entirety hell appreciate that

Gad added that, though they tried to be as accurate as possible when shooting the film, It's not a documentary, it's an interpretation of events."

The movie opens in theaters April 19. The biopic recently premiered at Sundance, receiving mixed reviews.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Leave it to LEGOs to make telling time cool.

The guy who created this LEGO brick contraption is no short of a civic engineer who is probably our best bet at one day creating a time machine (which would also probably be made from LEGOs).

SEE ALSO: LEGO PancakeBot Is Deliciously Nerdy Innovation

The device uses a system of balls, levers and pulleys to tick away the minutes. And while it takes somewhat of a genius to actually figure out the time it is displaying, it manages to simultaneously look like something from both our past and future.

Clearly there is some type of magic involved. Or maybe that's just the magic of LEGOs. Watch the video above to learn how it was built.

What's the most amazing thing you've ever built from LEGOs?
--------------------------------------------------------------
How old do you think this little girl is? Ten? Eight? Seven? It doesn't really matter  she could probably whoop your butt bad, judging by this training video. Her quick jabs and elusive feints are something to behold.

The clip has been online for a couple weeks now, but is picking up viral steam this week and currently has more than 500,000 YouTube views.

Check her out in the video above and let us know what you think in the comments.

BONUS: The 14 Most Inspirational Kids of 2012
--------------------------------------------------------------
Got a question for Guillaume Gauthereau? Use the chat feature above to get it answered live.

Guillaume Gauthereau is a serial entrepreneur, business leader and socially conscious, green activist. He is currently the co-founder and CEO of TOTSY, where he raised $35 million for the companys first and second rounds of financing, leading it to become the second largest U.S. private sale site dedicated to moms and kids. It attracted over 5 million members and earned a ranking in Forbes as one of Americas Most Promising Companies.

His passion for social responsibility and sustainability is reflected in the TOTSY brand, with its unique position as the only U.S. carbon neutral and socially responsible flash sale company, and his other venture, Sequoia Lab. As founder and chairman at Sequoia Lab, Gauthereau implemented growth and brand strategies for companies that have sustainable and socially responsible interests.

Prior to TOTSY and Sequoia Lab, he worked at Lalique North America and UK, where he was the youngest CEO for the international luxury retail company.

Bloomberg named him an NYC Venture Fellow in 2011, an honor given to exceptional entrepreneurs who create jobs. He is also a member of the World Entrepreneurship Forum, the Clinton Global Initiative and e2.org/NRDC.org.

#StartupLab is a free virtual mentorship program created by The Young Entrepreneur Council (YEC), an invite-only organization comprised of hundreds of Americas most successful young entrepreneurs. #StartupLab takes YEC's mission to help more people start successful businesses to the next level by offering millions of entrepreneurs direct access to YEC members through interactive video chats, email lessons and a library of how-to articles, videos and eBooks. Whether you're just starting up, a current business owner, or you run an organization that supports entrepreneurs, sign up for #StartupLab today for real-world advice from some of the coolest entrepreneurs on the planet.
--------------------------------------------------------------
NBC's 30 Rock airs its final episode Thursday night. If you've tried dealing with your sadness by wrapping yourself in a Slanket and indulging in night cheese, consider stepping back from the dairy aisle and finding a new coping method.

Why not instead map out a life plan inspired by the all  er, somewhat  knowing Liz Lemon? A life of Lizbeanism.

SEE ALSO: 50 of the Greatest Things That Ever Happened on '30 Rock'

To shove you along the journey, we've collected 10 Liz Lemon life lessons full of wisdom and sandwiches. High-five a million angels on your path towards greatness, Lemonheads.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The man who entangled Notre Dame linebacker Manti Te'o in an elaborate hoax after creating a fake online girlfriend admitted he was in love with the football player.

In an interview on the Dr. Phil show, Ronaiah Tuiasosopo told host Phil McGraw that he fell in love with Te'o over their two-year correspondence during which Tuiasosopo posed as Lennay Kekua, the imaginary identity of a woman who supposedly died of leukemia in September. Their relationship, made public through the loving tweets sent from Te'o to Kekua, made national headlines.

"Here, we have a young man who fell deeply, romantically in love," McGraw said on NBC's Today show Wednesday. "I asked him straight up: 'Was this a romantic relationship with you?' And he says yes. I said, 'Are you then therefore gay?' And he said, 'When you put it that way, yes.' And then he caught himself and said, 'I am confused.'"

McGraw also said Te'o, 22, who was suspected of helping mastermind the ploy to improve his chances of winning the coveted Heisman Trophy, was "absolute, unequivocally" innocent.

After the hoax unraveled earlier this month, Te'o admitted that he continued to perpetuate the myth for weeks after he learned Kekua didn't exist in early December, by referencing her in interviews.

In addition to exchanging tweets with the football player, Tuiasosopo, 22, talked with him over the phone, telling McGraw that he imitated a woman's voice.

At one point during the two-part interview, which will air on Thursday and Friday, he claimed he wanted to end the relationship.

"I wanted to end it because after everything I had gone through, I finally realized that I just had to move on with my life, and had to get me," Tuiasosopo said. "I had to start just living and let this go. There were many times where Manti and Lennay had broken up, but something would bring them back together, whether it was something going on in his life or in Lennay's life, or in this case, my life."

Mcgraw said on Wednesday that Tuiasosopo "had a number of life experiences that damaged this young man in some very serious ways."

What do you think of the latest details in the Manti Te'o hoax? Tell us in the comments, below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Whether you're looking to make industry contacts or learn the latest trends in advertising, technology and media, Mashable's Events Board has something for you. We picked four of the latest events to be listed to give you an idea of the possibilities for networking, developing skills and moving your business forward. Check these out, or head over to the full listings to find relevant events in your area or preferred destination.

You can sort listings by when they were added, get discount codes for Mashable readers and maybe even see a YouTube video of a past event so you'll know what to expect. You can also follow our events account on Twitter so you'll catch the best events before they sell out.

Online Marketing Summit spans three days with 40+ conference sessions and workshops where you can discover the latest insights on analytics and big data, content marketing, demand generation, email, mobile, search, social and strategy.

OMS' hands-on learning approach is integrated with the larger perspective of how digital marketing is influencing and impacting the customer engagement model, enabling OMS attendees to immediately create greater impact within their organization and with their audiences.

Use code WEMASHABLE for 25% off All Access or Conference Passes.

Social Media Strategies Summit gathers the brightest minds in the social media marketing to present emerging strategies, tactics and case studies in the successful use of social media. This summit will consist of one full day of hands-on workshops and two Summit days with three tracks each day: Business to Consumer, Business to Business and Small to Medium Business.

The Seventh Annual Southeast Venture Conference (SEVC) will feature market relevant investor and executive panels, exclusive networking opportunities, featured speakers and dozens of the region's top private technology firms presenting to a national audience of venture capitalists, investment bankers and private equity investors.

SEVC highlights both early and later stage investment opportunities from: Alabama, Florida, Georgia, Kentucky, Maryland, Mississippi, North Carolina, South Carolina, Tennessee, Virginia, West Virginia and Washington DC.

The paidContent conference will explore the rise of digital media, new content-creation and distribution platforms and new media players.

Some confirmed speakers include Lewis D'Vorkin, CPO of Forbes Media, Raju Narisetti, managing editor of The Wall Street Journal Digital Network, Alan Rusbridger, the editor-in-chief of Guardian News & Media and more.

Visit our full list of upcoming conferences and events here.

Want to promote your event on Mashable's Events Board? Submit it here.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The key to improving today's workforce could lie in the elementary school math class, new research shows.

A study by University of Missouri researchers identified how a lack of a specific math skill in first grade correlated to lower scores on a seventh-grade math test used to determine employability and wages in adults.

David Geary, a Missouri professor and the study's lead author, said the research made a connection between child psychology and labor economics in order to examine the roots of America's shortage of mathematically proficient workers. Data from the United States Center for Educational Statistics revealed that one in five adults lacks the math competency expected of an eighth-grader.

"We isolated a specific skill that has real-world importance in employability and observed how that skill related to grade-school mathematical performance," Geary said. "By identifying a specific numerical skill as a target, we can focus education efforts on helping deficient students as early as kindergarten and thereby give them a better chance at career success in adulthood."

The math skill researchers identified was "number system knowledge," which is the ability to conceptualize a numeral as a symbol for a quantity and understand systematic relationships between numbers. The study found that having this knowledge at the beginning of first grade predicted better functional mathematical ability in adolescence.

Geary said an early deficit in number system knowledge creates a weak foundation for later learning, which can lead to a lifetime of problems, not limited to reduced employment opportunities.

"Poor understanding of mathematical concepts can make a person easy prey for predatory lenders," he said. "Numerical literacy, or numeracy, also helps with saving for big purchases and managing mortgages and credit-card debt."

The researchers believe intervention programs designed to overcome this early math deficiency could prepare students for later employment, help them make wiser economic choices and improve the future U.S. workforce.

The study, which was co-authored by Missouri senior researchers Mary Hoard and Lara Nugent and Missouri doctoral graduate Drew Bailey, involved 180 13-year-olds who had been assessed every year since kindergarten for intelligence, memory, mathematical cognition, attention span and achievement. The research was recently published in the journal PLOS ONE.

This article originally published at BusinessNewsDaily here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Kim Dotcom's new sharing website Mega got a little closer to resembling its old, closed-down version, Megaupload on Wednesday. Anonymous users launched a search engine that indexes files uploaded on the new sharing service, potentially making it easier to find copyright-protected material.

On Thursday, less than 24 hours after the first news reports of the existence of the third-party engine surfaced, Dotcom blocked it. The engine, called Mega-Search.me, is not available anymore. A message in French on its home page reads (according to a Google Translate translation): "Due to a script developed by Mega to delete all files indexed in Mega-search, the engine is temporarily unavailable. A solution to overcome this problem will be made shortly."

The files on Mega are encrypted so the engine relied on a very simple technique to index files: crowdsourcing. Users were encouraged to submit links and names of the files they had on their Mega clouds. Once you found what you were looking for, you could transfer the file to your own account or download it directly.

It's unclear who made the site, although all signs point to French-speaking people. According to WHOIS, the Internet equivalent of White Pages, the site was registered on Jan. 20, the same day of Mega's launch. Reports of its existence first surfaced on Wednesday and Mega's response came roughly less than a day after the news came out.

SEE ALSO: Everything You Need to Know About Kim Dotcom's Mega

Ira Rothken, Dotcom's lawyer, told Wired that Mega has no involvment with the website.

According to The Next Web, most of the files available on Mega-search.me were pirated movies, music, games or software.

Mega's quick response might be a sign that Dotcom's new company is really serious about copyright, and wants to avoid being shut down like Megaupload.
--------------------------------------------------------------
For iPhone users who are particularly rough-and-tumble with their phones, one case made of foam claims to provide protection in extreme conditions.

Developers of mentalKase say the covering, which accommodates the iPhone 5, 4S and 4, is not only durable, but also lightweight and anti-microbial.

"Nothing protects sensitive electronics from shock and impact like micro-cell rubberized foam," according to mentalKase's Kickstarter page. Check out the video above for more details.

While we don't picture the bulky case as an everyday holder for your iPhone, it could come in handy during outdoor activities.

Would you use the mentalKase? Tell us in the comments, below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Microsoft has announced the details of a new special offer for students, which will be able to purchase the Windows 8 Pro upgrade edition online for $69.99.

The offer starts Feb. 1 in the U.S., and will also become available in 49 additional countries by March 19.

On Feb 21, the offer will become available in 22 new countries, including Canada, the UK, France, Germany and Spain. Eleven more countries will follow on March 7, and 16 more on March 19. See the full list of countries where this offer will be available over at Microsoft's official blog.

Microsoft will also start its Windows Campus Tour on Feb 18, visiting over 150 university campuses across the U.S. A team of experts will be showing students the advantages of Windows 8, as well as the latest Windows-touting tablets and PCs.
--------------------------------------------------------------
In November, Nars took on a unique challenge: to promote a new cosmetics collection using social media without giving away free product or paying for advertising.

The company decided to develop a Facebook app for the Andy Warhol-inspired collection that would allow Facebook users to make over their profile photos and cover photos in the style of Warhol, with prominent Nars branding throughout. (To see it the app in action, check out the video from Nars below.)

Speaking at a WWD conference Wednesday, Heather Park, director of digital media at Nars, said her team wanted to target the cover photo section of users' profiles after discovering that every time a user changes her cover photo, it appears in friends' newsfeeds as a unique rather than a group update (i.e. not as, "13 friends of your friends updated their profiles photos"). Park said they decided to forgo paid advertising "to see how far we could take it purely on earned [media]."

The app attracted a relatively small number of users  3,143  but an impressive amount of engagement: Together, those users made more than 5,300 images and spent an average of seven minutes and nine seconds using the app, generating an estimated 823,000 impressions on Facebook. A little more than half of those users are based in the U.S., but a surprisingly high number (23%) are from Brazil.

Like many creative social media campaigns from established brands, Nars' app enjoyed greater traction off Facebook than on. Earned media impressions totaled 151 million, driven largely by press coverage from tech and beauty blogs, Park said. (Nars calculated that figure by adding up the monthly unique readers of each site that covered the campaign and, in the case of Twitter, but multiplying each tweet about the campaign by the number of followers that particular Twitter user had  in other words, the figure is rather inflated.) It would have cost Nars somewhere between $35,000 to $45,000 to generate the same number of impressions using Facebook ads, according to one ad buying firm's estimate.

Arguably, the app could have enjoyed far greater pickup if the company had made a modest investment in paid advertising on Facebook  something Maureen Mullen, director of research at luxury/digital research firm L2, has repeatedly advised brands do to increase the reach of their Facebook and multi-channel campaigns. But Nars should be at least be commended for generating that kind of reach without leaning on a giveaway or sweepstakes.
--------------------------------------------------------------
When NASA's newest satellite soared into space late Wednesday, a team of photographers captured dazzling views of the rocket streaking into orbit.

A series of long-exposure rocket launch photos released overnight by NASA show the unmanned Atlas 5 booster carrying the agency's new Tracking and Data Relay Satellite K (TDRS-K) as a bright arc of light climbing spaceward from a pad at Florida's Cape Canaveral Air Force Station. The rocket lifted off at 8:48 p.m. EST, rising like an artificial sun as it flew into space.

One image, by launch photographer Tony Gray, shows the Atlas 5 rocket just seconds after liftoff as it appeared from NASA's Kennedy Space Center, which is near the Air Force Station launch site. NASA's cavernous Vehicle Assembly Building stands stoically in the foreground as the rocket hovers in mid-flight on the photo's right side.

Another view, captured by photographer Rick Wetherington, shows the Atlas 5 rocket as a blazing arc of light as it passes behind a lighthouse at the Cape Canaveral Air Force Station.

A final image by photographer Glenn Benson shows the rocket streaking up into the night sky, its blindingly bright engine plume reflecting off the waters around the seaside launch pad.

The TDRS-K satellite is the first of three next-generation communications satellites to be launched in order to upgrade NASA's aging TDRS satellite constellation. The satellites serve as relays between NASA ground stations and the agency's Earth-observing satellites and other spacecraft currently orbiting the planet. TDRS-K is expected to spend at least 15 years in service once it begins operations, according to a NASA mission profile.

The first TDRS satellite was launched into space in 1983, with TDRS-K marking the 11th satellite to join the fleet. The launch provider United Launch Alliance oversaw Wednesday's Atlas 5 mission for NASA.

This article originally published at Space.com here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Nate Silver is a nerd demigod and basically a wizard. That's long since been established, and was cemented for eternity with his flawless 2012 election night prediction performance back in November.

Now Silver has released his Super Bowl XLVII prediction this week on NYTimes.com, choosing the San Francisco 49ers to emerge victorious over the Baltimore Ravens on Sunday. But 49ers fans shouldn't get too cocky  the NFL playoffs just may have killed Silver's omniscient mojo.

On Jan. 10, Silver appeared on ESPN after the playoffs' initial wild-card rounds had been settled and delivered a Super Bowl matchup projection. The New England Patriots would take on the Seattle Seahawks, he said. He also deemed the Patriots and Denver Broncos as likely the NFL's two top teams (But since they're both in the AFC, that Super Bowl matchup wouldn't be possible.)

Two days later, the Ravens beat the Broncos, and a day after that Seattle was knocked out by the Atlanta Falcons. The Ravens, powered by a viral "Call Me Maybe" parody, then went on to beat the Patriots for their Super Bowl berth. If you're scoring at home, that basically means Silver couldn't have done any worse.

And all this from a guy who first entered the public eye providing advanced sports analysis for baseball teams in the early 2000s.

SEE ALSO: NFL Commissioner Hit With Tough Questions in Reddit Q&A

Boiling it down, here's what Silver has to say about Super Bowl XLVII: Looking at statistics and history, a strong defense correlates with Super Bowl success much more than a strong offense does. The 49ers defense has performed better than the Ravens D this year, plus the 49ers have a stronger offense, statistically speaking, according to the website Pro Football Reference. Baltimore did have the best special teams unit in the league this year  but still, Silver writes, "there isnt much to recommend the Ravens."

So judging by that analysis, 49ers fans should prep the champagne and Mission District police officers should dust off their riot gear. But judging by Silver's lackluster results so far this postseason, Ravens fans should perhaps take pleasure in the stat savant's gloomy outlook for their team.

But here's the catch and why neither fan base should get too comfortable: Silver's formula relies heavily on educated analysis of probability, and his picks aren't by any means iron-clad peeks into the future.

This is what confused many conservatives who blasted Silver for bias during election season; while his predictions favored President Obama, they still gave Mitt Romney a varying change of winning and never said he wouldn't be elected. There's just a much higher margin for error, even for someone like Silver, in predicting NFL football than predicting presidential elections.

And that, as we say, is why they play the games.
--------------------------------------------------------------
J. J. Watt, above, is 23 years old, 6-foot-5, 295 pounds and a superstar defensive linemen for the NFL's Houston Texans.

The little girl below is a 6-year-old named Breanna and was recently very, very sad because she "isn't 25 yet but wants to marry J.J. Watt." This short video, uploaded to YouTube earlier this month, details her anguish:

But J. J. Watt, it turns out, is a mensch if ever there was one. With an assist from his Twitter followers, he said in a tweet on Wednesday afternoon, he found Breanna and made her day in a major way:

There is still hope in this world after all. Thank you for reminding us, J. J. Watt.
--------------------------------------------------------------
If Facebook Likes were touchdowns, both Super Bowl teams would be losers. In fact, both teams combined can't compare to the champion of Likes: the Dallas Cowboys.

With more than 5 million Likes, the Cowboys far outpace the San Francisco 49ers and the Baltimore Ravens, whose Like counts stand at about 1.7 million and 1.4 million, respectively. Maybe that's why they call the Cowboys "America's Team."

SEE ALSO: Super Bowl XLVII: The Social Media Guidebook

On the other hand, the Pittsburgh Steelers have the most active fans on Facebook. The Steelers contingent posted more than 350,000 comments throughout the season.

Check out Social Fresh's infographic below for more information about which gridiron teams rule the social web.
--------------------------------------------------------------
At first, the Nike+ FuelBand seems not so different from other gadgets on the market that track a persons movement  including the Fitbit and Jawbone UP. The features are comparable, although the FuelBand doesn't give you an optimized alarm based on sleep patterns, like the others. In fact, the key differentiator of the FuelBand is not hardware or a feature; its the point system created in conjunction with the gadget. Its called NikeFuel, and at first glance it seems totally arbitrary.

So, why invent a measurement that doesnt correspond directly to distance traveled, calories burned or another physical metric? Nikes goal, actually, is not to be a measure of hardcore fitness, but to provide a sense of accomplishment for regular people doing everyday activities. To create this type of motivation, Nike needed to provide users with a metric that would enable comparisons  no matter what height, weight, gender or activity  to past performance, another person (read: competition), or a daily average, which happens to be 2,000 Fuel points.

Because NikeFuel is a proprietary measure, Nike has some secret sauce involved in calculating it. Mashable took a deeper look at the tech Nike is using to identify activities and the process of turning that into NikeFuel.

The band itself is made of a thermoplastic rubber called TPE and polypropelene, a plastic often used in dishwasher-safe food containers. There are 20 LED lights which turn from red to yellow and then green throughout the day  assuming you reach the NikeFuel goal set on your profile. (Nike has software for smartphones and desktop that the FuelBand can be registered with). In addition, another 100 white LED lights reveal time, Fuel points, calories and steps taken  you can cycle through each of these via the FuelBands single button.

Inside the band is a triaxial accelerometer. If this sounds foreign, dont worry  your iPhone has one, too. Basically, it can sense the movement of a device and the tilt at which it is held  this component is also what makes the Wii intuitive and the display on your smartphone or tablet screen react to whether youre holding it portrait or landscape.

Two lithium-polymer batteries keep the Fuelband going for four days (some have reported longer), and it is charged through the built-in USB, which also happens to be the clasp to close the bracelet around your wrist. Lastly, a bluetooth chip syncs your Fuel information with your profile on the web and the smartphone app.

Although Fuel is a seemingly arbitrary number, Nike did spend some time developing a way to calculate a metric that could compare users' achievements and offer a fair judgement to the "fitness worth" of specific activities (although some claim its not totally dependable).

A study at Arizona State University monitored participants oxygen consumption on several sporting activities in order to correlate certain motions with oxygen demand  this is why NikeFuel is sometimes denoted as oxygen kinetics."

"The partnerships with Arizona State and other partners were critical in developing the foundation for NikeFuel. Oxygen kinetics is the most universal way to understand the level of exertion to perform a core movement," says Ricky Engelberg, Experience Director of Digital Sport at Nike.

The limitation of NikeFuel quite frankly comes back to the product itself and the fact that its worn on a wrist  it easily measures walking or climbing stairs, since your arms tend to swing somewhat methodically, but it cannot measure cycling. However, it seems that by simply releasing a second complementary product that attached to ones leg, eventually Nike could measure this  make it waterproof, and perhaps you can begin to measure swimming, as well. As NikeFuel is integrated into additional products and refined, it could become the most useful metric for motivation in exercise.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Nvidia surprised the world at CES 2013 when it unveiled Project Shield, a portable Android gaming device that also works with PC games. Everyone expected the Tegra 4 mobile processor, but no one saw Project Shield coming. In this age of a hyperscrutiny of tech companies, how did Nvidia keep it a secret?

Three ways: simple security precautions, very little outside involvement and an incredibly tight development schedule. Nvidia describes the inception and subsequent creation of Project Shield in a blog post, revealing the product went from barely functioning prototypes to the working models we saw at CES in just 19 days.

Nvidia's decision to use in-house talent to create Project Shield was a big factor in keeping it under wraps. After the first prototype  which was essentially a game controller fastened to a smartphone with a piece of wood  was assembled in early 2012, Nvidia looked to its own designers to build the device. The company, which has more than 6,000 employees, had plenty of people with experience designing products.

SEE ALSO: Hands On With Project Shield, Nvidia's Powerhouse Game Controller

It also took the simple precaution of forbidding cellphones in the workspace  a "scruffy light-industrial neighborhood" somewhere in Silicon Valley. Without cellphones, there was no way workers could take casual pictures of the device even if they wanted to. It also probably had the secondary effect of keeping the team of engineers focused during their 14-hour days huddled over workbenches eating fried chicken.

Nvidia flew in engineers from Texas and China to help finish of the first two real prototypes, which reached CEO Jen-Hsun Huang's desk on Dec. 18. Despite serious problems, they worked, but Nvidia now had just 19 days to assemble the final units that would be revealed at CES.

Working out of that Silicon Valley space, the team worked "non-stop" to build the controllers to be ready for the Jan. 6 unveiling, and they clearly pulled it off. I got a little hands-on time with one of the units at CES, and it worked extremely well, with very few bugs.

Nvidia said it expects to start selling Project Shield in the spring or early summer. The device, powered by a Tegra 4 processor, is designed to run Android games as well as stream PC games. It can also wirelessly relay anything running on the device to a big-screen TV, and it even supports 4K resolution.

Ironically, during the unveiling of the ultra-secret Project Shield, Huang appeared to let slip the name of another hush-hush undertaking when he accidentally called the device "Project Thor." He didn't elaborate on details, but all but confirmed it was another secret project when he admonished himself a few seconds later for revealing the name in a public forum.

Are you looking forward to Project Shield? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Text messaging is giving Africans the opportunity to make their voices heard by world leaders in a new campaign that kicked off Wednesday.

Poverty fighting organization One launched its "You Choose" pilot program in South Africa, Malawi and Zambia, hoping to give Africans from those countries a voice at the U.N. when post-2015 development goals are considered in March.

The Millenium Development Goals, created to help lift the world's poorest from extreme poverty, were established in 2000 and are set to expire in 2015. As U.N. leaders gather to create a new set of goals, One hopes it can bring the priorities of the world's poorest to the negotiation tables.

"In 2000, the Millennium Development Goals were set out, which have been an incredibly powerful force for good in the world," One's chief marketing officer, Jeff Davidoff, told Mashable. "There was one flaw, though: They didn't include the voice of the people they intended to help. If you really want to know what to do for the poorest people on the planet, there's a technology that unites all of the people in the world. That happens to be 2G technology."

SEE ALSO: 5 Reasons Mobile Is the Future of Sustainable Development

Unlike when the Millenium Development Goals were crafted, mobile phones now provide rapid mass communication for many living in Africa. There were just 16 million mobile phones on the continent in 2000, and now there are more than 650 million.

"In mobile phones you have a pretty efficient way to create a two-way dialogue and give these people a voice for the future," Davidoff says. "You've got to use the right technology. If we stuck to just email or Facebook we'd be skipping over millions of people who need to be part of this."

To initially reach citizens, One is running radio ads featuring prominent musicians including Hugh Masekela, Lira, Jabulani Tsambo (aka HHP) and Dbanj, and football stars Benni McCarthy, Chris Katongo. The ads ask, "What's the one thing the government can do to make the most difference for your family and friends?" It's free to send and receive the texts to One as part of the campaign.

The online survey version of the campaign suggests affordable food, better job opportunities, education, gender equality, access to clean water and better health, among other improvements governments can undertake.

The You Choose campaign is part of the My World coalition, a U.N. effort to understand what citizens are most hoping to improve about their lives. One's findings will be presented in March to the U.N.'s High Level Panel in Bali, Indonesia.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Could Sony finally be unveiling the PlayStation 4?

The company is holding an event Feb. 20 to talk about the future of PlayStation. Announced via its Twitter account, a page for the event simply shows the date and time of the event (6 p.m. EST) along with the short teaser version shown above, with no other information about what it has in store.

Earlier this month, Sony announced that it will stop selling the PlayStation 2. The PlayStation 3 has been on the market since 2006, which makes the company due for a next-generation console. The PlayStation 4 has been heavily rumored to be launching in 2013.

Do you think Sony's February event is for the PlayStation 4? Let us know your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Traveling is tough, especially when you can't find enough outlets to charge your MacBook and iPad at the same time. PlugBug World comes to the rescue, incorporating itself into the top of the MacBook Pro charger, and letting you plug into up to five different types of electrical outlets around the world.

The $44.99 PlugBug World from Twelve South can handle any device that charges using a USB port, not just those from Apple. You can configure the PlugBug as a stand-alone USB charger with enough power to charge up your iPad.

Or you can connect it to your MacBook charger and use one outlet to charge both MacBook and any other device that uses USB to charge. This is especially important for those who have older MacBooks, which can't pump out enough power from its USB ports to charge an iPad very quickly, or at all.

Besides giving you one less thing to lug around on your globetrotting adventures, it frees up one of those scarce ports on your MacBook Pro, MacBook or MacBook Air. It even fits on other Apple devices, replacing that "duck head" on Apple's iPad charger, AirPort Express, the Apple Battery Charger and older Apple USB chargers.

The build quality of the PlugBug World is excellent. It does take a bit of effort to separate its various pieces, but the tight fit and perfect sizing of these various adapters matches up with Apple equipment quite well. The only difference is that bright red color, which the company says can help you differentiate your charger from others if you find yourself in one of those crowded airport-outlet situations. Its bright color might also remind you not to leave it in the hotel room as you pack up for home, too.

When I plugged PlugBug into various wall outlets and then connected my MacBook Pro and a USB cable to my iPad, some outlets I tried made for a slightly loose fit, allowing the PlugBug to fall out of the outlet. Other outlets allowed it to stay secure. Either way, I could get it to stay put with an additional firm push into the outlet.

Even if you're not a world traveler, it's great to have that extra USB port when plugging in a MacBook Pro. Its 10 watts of power is a gracious plenty for any iPad, iPod or iPhone  twice as much power as the 5-Watt charger for the iPad mini, for example. This extra power results in a faster charge.

If you're not planning to span the globe anytime soon, I'd recommend saving yourself 10 bucks and going with the original PlugBug for $34.99. That gives you the same ability to charge two devices at the same time, but doesn't include the five interchangeable international plugs  the standard North America/Japan plug is permanently fixed.

I'm always looking for a way to lighten my burden on long trips, and this handy accessory would be a welcome sight in my overstuffed carry-on. What do you think? Is this a useful accessory for world travelers? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
If you're betting on the outcome of this year's Super Bowl, we think we've found a way to zone in on the winning choice.

Puppy predicting  a long practiced and perfected art  uses a streamlined mathematical formula which promises 100 percent guaranteed results. It has absolutely nothing to with the dogs just trotting over to the closet bowl filled with Kibbles 'n Bits.

SEE ALSO: Super Bowl Puppy Cam Is Here  and It's Too Cute for Words

Accurate or not, Jimmy Fallon recruited an elite group of puppy psychic types to sniff out the result of Sunday's Super Bowl.

See who the puppies pick, and tell us if you agree in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It is so difficult to get in a workout these days. You try and make time but there's always someone hogging the treadmill at the gym.

If all your fitness efforts fail, do like this puppy, and hop alongside your workout buddy. And while paws offer the best traction for dealing with incline and speed, there is an important lesson to learn from this agressive and persistant puppy  if at first your exercise efforts flop, try and try again.

SEE ALSO: Puppy Tackles the Stairs in Cutest Video You'll See Today

Now get to sweating  this pitbull is about to lap you.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Ladies and gentlemen, presenting the winner of Star Wars item of the week: R2-D2 shoes for ladies.

These beauties, featuring R2s clinging to their heels and a blinking R2-like front panel up on the foot, showed up Wednesday on Instructables  a site that documents its users' creations, so you can make your own. (And yes, that light on the front does blink like R2.)

R2-D2 heels are the proud creation of Mike Warren, aka Michaelsauras, the veteran West Coast-based "Play Editor" at Instructables. Warren's previous creations have graced the New York Times and Wired.

So make them yourself, you shall? Well, if you're proficient with a MIG welder, handy with a soldering iron, comfortable around propane torches, and wild about electric drills, the instructions are a snap.

The rest of us may have to wait  unless Warren saw fit for them to be made commercially. (Warren's Creative Commons license prohibits commercial use; he does commission work, apparently.) And to download the plans in the first place, you need to be paying for Instructables Pro.

Would you want to Do These Yourself? What would you pay someone else to Do Them For You? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Seth Rogen and Paul Rudd pitch ideas for a Samsung Super Bowl ad in this 60-second teaser for Samsung's upcoming 120-second Super Bowl ad.

In a very meta concept, the two stars pitch Mr. Show's Bob Odenkirk on an idea for "The Next Big Thing." Odenkirk, however, is hypersensitive about getting sued for using the term "Super Bowl" or naming either team playing in the game (though the "50 minus 1ers" and the "Baltimore Blackbirds" is fine.) Finally, he suggests using the term "el plato supremo" instead of Super Bowl.

The full 2-minute ad, and an extended cut version with never-been-seen footage will be released later this week, according to Samsung. The brand is encouraging consumers to weigh in on the ad win prizes by using the hashtag #TheNextBigThing.

 

"The anticipation of Super Bowl ads creates a unique consumer experience," said Todd Pendleton, CMO of Samsung Mobile, in a statement. "The Next Big Thing campaign has allowed us the flexibility to tap into significant cultural moments and relevant conversations while showcasing our innovation."

 

The ad will feature the Galaxy family of products including the Galaxy Note II, Galaxy SIII and Galaxy Note 10.1.

What do you think of the teaser? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Some web searches are easy to think of and describe, but complicated to conduct.

If, for instance, you want to find a nonstop flight from Las Vegas to San Diego next week on JetBlue, you have to fill out a bevy of fields on a travel site.

SkyPhrase, a startup created by Nick Cassimatis, an associate professor at Rensselaer Polytechnic Institute, will soon offer software that lets companies turn natural language questions like the one above into a format that their databases can handle.

Facebooks new search tool, Graph Search, highlights both the progress thats being made in natural language processing and the difficulties that remain. Unlike the old search bar, Graph Search lets users enter queries as they might speak them. And yet, this is still limited to a fairly small range of query types.

While natural language processing typically involves teaching software vocabulary and grammatical rules or using statistical analysis, SkyPhrases technology uses a combination of algorithms and data structures.

The company plans to release a website in February, as well as an extension for the Chrome web browser, that would allow users of Google Analytics to filter information using natural language queries.

Cassimatis says this could make it easier to find patterns or data points that are otherwise time-consuming for even a seasoned user to unearth. Eventually, the company hopes to offer SkyPhrase as a programming interface for other websites.

Natural language search could make it easier for people with little or no training to ask complicated questions that typically require searching through large stores of data. Besides Facebooks efforts, Wolfram Alpha can answer natural language queries, and Apples virtual assistant Siri also encourages users to speak questions aloud in complete sentences (some of its answers come from Wolfram Alpha).

Percy Liang, an assistant professor in Stanfords computer science department who studies natural language processing and machine learning, thinks SkyPhrases idea is a good one, but cautions that there is a lot of work to be done to make natural language processing work. He says challenges include determining what a word or phrase means based on its contextsuch as knowing that Obama is not just the U.S. presidents name, but also a city in Japanand the ability to pick up on sentimentsuch as a Yelp restaurant review that says, sarcastically, I had to wait an hour for this!

Users also need to know what they can do with the system. If theres a big gap between a users expectations and the systems abilities, the user will get disappointed, Liang says. Facebooks Graph Search, for example, tries to solve this problem by auto-completing queries so users know what kinds of things it can search for. Likewise, Siri tries to answer only a limited range of queries.

SkyPhrase is still clearly in its infancy. I tried a version that can conduct complex natural language searches of Twitter, Gmail, Orbitz and Amazons MP3 store. It couldnt understand a number of my queriesnot infrequently because I was trying to get it to do things it hasnt yet been trained to dobut it did a decent job of searching through Gmail, and understanding some complex queries about e-mails I needed to find as I organized an upcoming trip.

SkyPhrase understands only searches for complete words (a search for simply banana wont bring up an email mentioning the game Bananagrams) and doesnt infer meaning from words (it wont pull up messages or tweets with words related to the words youre searching for). But it can understand conjunctionsI could search for, say, emails from Bob Loblaw in December and January about recipes with a PDF, or emails from Bob Loblaw or Tobias Funke about cookies in December.

The company is also building a programming interface that Cassimatis says will make it easy for third parties to offer natural language search capabilities to their own serviceswhich could allow people without an artificial intelligence or linguistics background to quickly perform complex analyses of data that typically take a trained employee a lot of time.

Cassimatis envisions this API being used to squeeze insights from everything from financial information to sports scores. Eventually, it could also serve as a revenue source if the company charges developers to license it.

This article originally published at MIT Technology Review here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Toyota's "Wish Granted" ad featuring Big Bang Theory's Kaley Cuoco is so far leading the pack for views on YouTube with more than 6 million views, unless you count the trailer for Star Trek Into Darkness, which has twice as much.

The Star Trek teaser had a nice head start on the competition, though, as it hit YouTube on Dec. 5. Toyota's ad didn't appear on YouTube until Jan. 27. However, that ad, which runs 60 seconds, is not the 30-second version that will run during the Super Bowl. So the question of which Super Bowl ad has gotten the most views is a little bit ambiguous.

Coming in third on YouTube's list is the how-could-it-fail "Kate Upton Washes the All-New Mercedes-Benz CLA in Slow Motion," which got 5.6 million views since Jan. 21. The rest of the list includes Audi's "Prom" ad and Volkswagen's "Get in. Get Happy," which have both gotten around 3.3 million views and the teaser for Toyota's ad, which has gotten 3.2 million. YouTube did not include Hyundai's "Don't Tell" ad (see gallery above), which had 3.9 million views as of Thursday afternoon. A YouTube rep said the Hyundai spot wasn't considered because it was published in September.

Toyota's dominance is surprising, especially in light of all the interest around VW. In 2011, VW's "The Force" became the most-shared ad of all time. Consumers were interested to see what the brand came up with this time. There was also a dash of controversy about the ad. Set in an office environment, the spot shows a white guy sporting a Jamaican accent and an upbeat attitude. Critics were quick to charge the ad with racism. However, a Today.com poll showed that 93% of respondents didn't think the ad was racist. (Audi's "Prom" ad, meanwhile, also has gotten 3.3 million views so far.)

In addition to being the most-viewed ad, the Star Trek spot is also the most-shared. According to Unruly, the ad has been shared more than 575,000 times. The chart-topping Toyota ad, meanwhile, was 23 on the most-shared list.

Above are Unruly's top 10 most-shared 2013 Super Bowl ads  so far.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Google has added Grand Canyon to the list of its Street View-supported locations in Google Maps, and it's really a sight to behold.

To create this new Street View experience, which includes more than 75 miles of trails and surrounding rounds, Google took 9,500 panoramas of the Grand Canyon. The Google Maps team walked through the canyon carrying the Android-operated, 40-pound Trekker backpacks  a 15-lens camera system that took the images.

"The narrow ridges and steep, exposed trails of the Grand Canyon provide the perfect terrain for our newest camera system. The Trekkerwhich its operator controls via an Android phone and automatically gathers photos as he walksenables the collection of high-quality imagery from places that are only accessible on foot," Google wrote in October 2012, when the images were taken.

The sights include the Bright Angel Trail, South Kaibab Trail, the Meteor Crater and other famous locations in one of the world's largest canyons.

Start exploring the Grand Canyon here and tell us how you like the experience in the comments!
--------------------------------------------------------------
Even if you have the $4 million or so to place a 30-second ad during the Super Bowl, that doesn't mean the ad will air. It first must be submitted to the network for approval. CBS, which is broadcasting the game this year, has banned just a few commercials to date; the fate of the others will lie in public opinion.

However, some commercials make a killing from getting banned  drawing more viewers onYouTube than their approved counterparts.

Here are four complaints that can get advertisers booed by fans or even bumped from the game.

In the porn business? Forget the Super Bowl. PornHub, an online provider of adult entertainment, learned that when submitting an anything-but-racy ad  featuring an elderly couple sitting on a bench. But then perhaps it was just a public relations ploy to drive visitors to its site, as BuzzFeed suggested. (Last year, AshleyMadison.com, a dating site for married people looking to stray, pulled a similar stunt.) PornHub has posted its ad on YouTube and is running a poll on a safe-for-work site. To date, 79% of voters have said, "Air it."

SodaStream got its rejection from CBS last Friday, making its commercial the first serious ad to be denied a 2013 Super Bowl slot. The home soda-making equipment company apparently crossed the line by including actors in uniforms of Coke and Pepsi  two major Super Bowl advertisers. However, the company had a backup plan. "SodaStream is still in the game with an older spot we tweaked," the ad's creator, Alex Bogusky, tweeted.

Already Volkswagen is battling accusations of racism for its 2013 "Get Happy" ad that it posted to YouTube earlier this week  one of the few Super Bowl ads posted in its entirety instead of as a teaser. What's all the fuss about? A white man speaks in a Jamaican accent to dramatize his happiness after buying a new Volkswagen Beetle. The Jamaican government officially has endorsed the ad and has added a clip of Jimmy Cliff singing, "C'mon get happy," to its website.

Taco Bell earlier this week withdrew a game day-themed ad (though not specifically for the Super Bowl) because people claimed that it was offensive to vegetarians. In the ad, a narrator says, "Veggies on game day is like punting on fourth and one  its a cop-out. The Center for Science in the Public Interest launched a protest campaign on Twitter.

"It's bad enough that there aren't many ads on television for broccoli, kale or carrots," Margo G. Wootan, the center's nutrition policy director, said in a statement. "The last thing healthy fruits and vegetables needed was to be the subject of attack ads."

Taco Bell will run its Super Bowl commercial in the second quarter of the game. The ad features a group of senior citizens who escape from a retirement home.

This article originally published at TechNewsDaily here
--------------------------------------------------------------
There are few holidays more hallowed in America than Super Bowl Sunday, when almost half the country tunes in to watch grown men throw a ball around. (Seriously, last year 47.8% of households in the top 56 U.S. markets watched the big game.) And with all those attentive eyeballs, the Super Bowl has become sacred ground for another competition: advertising.

Super Bowl ads are legendary for their wit and creativity, or, failing that, their sex appeal. And they should be, for what the advertisers are paying. In 2012, a 30-second Super Bowl ad cost an average $3.5 million, and that's after the comparable cost of actually producing the spot (see Coca-Cola's epic three-way desert chase scene this year, for example).

Increasingly, brands are releasing the ads online ahead of the game in a strategy that may up their views by as much as 600%. Does this hurt viewership during the game? Maybe not. As our own Todd Wasserman reports:

Still, here at Mashable we feel for those readers who just want to see the damn ads without having to sit through the whole game, so we've created this mash-up of some of our favorite Super Bowl 2013 commercials (or ones that have already been released, anyway). Enjoy!

What's your favorite Super Bowl ad of all time? Let us know in the comments!
--------------------------------------------------------------
If Josh Moore has his way, you won't be at work the day after the Super Bowl. That's because Moore, who owns the fantasy football website 4for4, has proposed the day after the Super Bowl be made into a national holiday.

"This has been an issue that my friends and I have been talking about for years," Moore told BusinessNewsDaily. "It seems like every year we talk about how many people watch the Super Bowl and how many people dont feel like going to work the next day. Then last week, I was actually at the WhiteHouse.gov petition site signing something that was a bit more policy-related and I thought it would be a great platform to get the idea about the Super Bowl thing from talk to actuality."

Moore seems to have the support of more than just his friends on his side. Since posting his petition on the White House We the People page, it has gained closed to 10,000 signatures. If the petition reaches 100,000 signatures by Feb. 23, it will warrant an official response from the Obama administration.

"I think we have a chance," said Moore, a lifelong Detroit Lions fan who also edits 4for4. "Obviously, we are a long ways away, but I think it seems to be picking up steam and has the chance to start snowballing. I have had hardly any negative feedback. One old lady emailed me and said she didnt like football, but that is about it."

Though the ultimate goal may seem far-fetched and Moore understands it is an uphill battle, he said that there would be a number of benefits from making the day after Super Bowl a holiday. In particular, Moore says that having the day after Super Bowl Sunday off would promote camaraderie on the day of the game and productivity at work in the days after.

"I am running on the assumption that the day after the Super Bowl is one of the least productive days of the work year, along with the day before Christmas and New Year's Eve," Moore said. "Having that day off would not make the workforce lose too much productivity."

At the time of publication, the petition is only 89,000 signatures away from being eligible for an official response.

This article originally published at BusinessNewsDaily here
--------------------------------------------------------------
If you're one of those people who feel the urge to document each and every breathing moment of your life, but think it's annoying to have to get out your smartphone to snap pictures and upload them every time, you're in luck.

Thanks to startup Always Innovating, you'll soon be able to have a mini-drone hover over your shoulder and do that job for you.

It's called MeCam and it's essentially a small quadrocopter flying robot that will be able to continuously follow you, snap pictures or videos with its built-in digital camera, stream them to an Android or iOS phone or tablet, and upload them to social networks like Facebook or YouTube.

SEE ALSO: Watch the World's Highest Resolution Drone-Mounted Camera in Action

The drone is equipped with 14 sensors "for perfect and safe hovering," the website states. It's controllable with voice commands, and when it comes out in early 2014, the price will be around $50.

Maybe the dad who tried to build a drone to follow his kid on the walk from the house to the school bus could use this one instead.

To find out more about the MeCam, check out the video above.

Would you buy one of these mini-drones? Tell us your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Sports Illustrated supermodel Nina Agdal is, not surprisingly, a beautiful woman. She's also, not surprisingly, on the skinny side.

But she won't stand for critics who hate on her being bereft of heft, and she took to Twitter on Thursday to set the record straight.

It all started when the @si_vault Twitter account, which shares photos from the venerable sports magazine, posted a link to a collection of Instagram shots by Sports Illustrated swimsuit models. That link included this image:

The photo prompted at least one reader to respond with a reference to anorexia and question why SI would promote such a body image.

Agdal was all over that, though, telling the world via Twitter that she is in fact a healthy human being and critics should step off:

Booya. Of course, Agdal's tweet left an opening for at least one courageous follower to take a romantic shot in the dark:

No word on how that's worked out, but Anand does get points here for trying.

SEE ALSO: Have the NFL Playoffs Killed Nate Silver's Mojo?
--------------------------------------------------------------
The 2013 SXSW feature film lineup was announced on Thursday and amongst the big name premieres are a number of projects that speak directly to digital audiences and communities.

From documentary focusing on the history of Napster, a profile of Improv Everywhere and Shakespeare performed by the Whedonverse, 109 films will screen at SXSW between March 8-16, 2013.

We've perused the full film lineup and here are some of the titles we'll be watching at SXSW 2013:

Downloaded

Director: Alex Winter

A documentary that explores the rise and fall of Napster and the birth of the digital revolution. It's about the teens that helped start this revolution, and the artists and industries who continue to be impacted by it. (World Premiere) Rewind This!

Director: Josh Johnson

Home video changed the world. The impact of the VHS tape was enormous. Rewind This! aims to trace the ripples of that impact. (World Premiere) We Cause Scenes

Director: Matt Adams

The extraordinary story of a group of twenty-somethings who seized the streets of New York, transforming the meaning of comedy, performance and art through forming "Improv Everywhere," a prank collective ten years in the making. (World Premiere) TPB AFK: The Pirate Bay Away From Keyboard (Sweden, Denmark, Norway)

Director: Simon Klose

The inside story of three hacktivists who became cult heroes for the internet generation and persecuted criminals to the media industry for running the worlds largest file sharing site.

(North American Premiere) Much Ado About Nothing

Director: Joss Whedon

Shakespeare's classic comedy is given a contemporary spin in Joss Whedon's film, Much Ado About Nothing. Cast: Amy Acker, Alexis Denisof, Nathan Fillion, Fran Kranz, Jillian Morgese (U.S. Premiere)

What films are you most interested in seeing from SXSW 2013? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Global tablet shipments reached a record of 52.5 million units in the fourth quarter of 2012, according to a new report.

Jumping from 29.9 million units in the fourth quarter of 2011, the tablet market grew a staggering 75.3% year over year. It also increased 74.3% from 30.1 million units in the previous quarter, the International Data Corporation wrote.

"Lower average selling prices, a wide range of new product offerings and increased holiday spending all acted as catalysts to push the already climbing tablet market to record levels."

Although Apple's iPad was the best-selling tablet, the Cupertino, Calif., company saw its market share dip for a second quarter in a row, due to strong competition. Even so, it had a 48.1% growth over the same quarter in 2011  shipping 22.9 million units  which was largely thanks to the recent iPad mini and fourth-generation iPad launches.

Samsung came in second place, shipping a total of 8 million Android and Windows tablets, or 15.1% of market share. The Korean electronics giant also experienced an impressive 263% year-over-year growth.

Amazon, Asus and Barnes & Noble with 11.5% market share, 5.8% and 1.9%, respectively, finish off the top-five list of tablet vendors. "Other" companies captured the remaining 22.1%.

Microsoft entered the market with its Surface tablet, but failed to make the top five after shipping less than 900,000 units.

"Devices based upon its new Windows 8 and Windows RT operating systems failed to gain much ground during their launch quarter, and reaction to the company's Surface with Windows RT tablet was muted at best," Ryan Reith, IDC program manager, said in a statement.

Which is your preferred tablet brand? Tell us in the comments, below.

Mashable composite from images courtesy of Microsoft, Barnes and Noble, Amazon, Apple and Google; chart courtesy of IDC
--------------------------------------------------------------
The two most significant words that BlackBerry CEO Thorsten Heins said during the company's big launch event this week may not have been "BlackBerry 10," but rather "working moms."

Sometime between unveiling the two new BlackBerry 10 smartphones that had already leaked weeks before and announcing that Research In Motion would finally change its name to BlackBerry, Heins revealed that the company wants to expand beyond those who work in a corporate setting and appeal to "artists, working moms, hundred-meter sprinters, you name it." Yet, it was the second group on that list that proved to be a focus of the event.

Heins talked about women multiple times during the event and drove the point home by announcing that singer Alicia Keys would serve as the company's global creative director. "I'm definitely going to start with other super women who also love BlackBerry  a big demographic for BlackBerry," Keys said on stage.

BlackBerry's decision to go after women may be surprising at first blush. Keys put it best during an interview later with USA Today. "When I think of BlackBerry I think of a more male-dominated space," she said. "But knowing how much the [female] demographic is growing and moving, there needs to be that attention there."

Yet, according to BlackBerry's chief marketing officer Frank Boulben, BlackBerry is anything but "male-dominated." As it turns out, the majority of BlackBerry's 80 million global customers right now  56%  are women.

"We entered the market through the corporate side that is male dominated, like finance, and probably that perception has remained, and we haven't done anything in marketing to change it really," Boulben told Mashable in an interview.

While the company was working on BlackBerry 10, its marketing team set out to identify the segment it most wanted to focus on, and ran down a list of traits: people of action, achievers, multi-taskers, people who are very connected and "want a tool more than a toy." In the end, Boulben says the team found these traits tended to be "slightly more skewed to women than men."

With these two points in mind, Boulben says BlackBerry decided to re-think its marketing approach to avoid coming off as "too male-oriented."

Getting Keys involved is the company's first significant step towards that goal. Boulben describes Keys as being the embodiment of a "very typical BlackBerry user" who is a "working mom" and runs a small business. Keys' role at the company will be broadly to engage with fans, but she won't be appearing in traditional product endorsements.

Boulben wouldn't offer up any details about possible ads that BlackBerry might air in the future to appeal to women, but he noted that the company's marketing campaign will be focused on "real-life use cases." Beyond that, he says BlackBerry may introduce more apps and accessories that are geared towards women.

Other smartphone and tablet makers have made efforts in recent months to market specifically to women. Microsoft, for example, brought on singer Gwen Stefani and actress Jessica Alba as spokeswomen late last year for the Windows phone. The spots position the two women as working mothers and are clearly intended to appeal to that audience. Likewise, Apple has been placing print ads for the iPad mini in women's magazines including Women's Health and Marie Claire.

However, if BlackBerry can already count some 45 million women as customers in spite of being perceived as a brand for men, targeting women more in the future could just prove to be the company's secret weapon for building up its user base.

"Faced up against guys with significant market share, BlackBerry needs to find areas where it can make headway in. They can't compete broadly and they can't compete everywhere," said Stephen Baker, a VP of industry analysis for consumer technology at NPD. "If they think women is how they can do that, and it's a big enough segment and there's an opportunity there, then God bless them, they should go for that."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Watch your board, Tony Hawk  you've got some competition.

YouTube user GeorgeThePlushie uploaded a video yesterday showcasing an almost inconceivable talent: the ability to beat Tony Hawk's Pro Skater 3 (THPS 3) on PC in just under 4 minutes.

Using professional skateboarder Jamie Thomas' character, he breezes through each level at a flawless pace and finishes the last competition at 3 minutes and 55 seconds. Watch it above.

SEE ALSO: The Secret World of Video Game Speed Runners

Admittedly, the game isn't "fully" completed. THPS 3 consists of nine levels, three of which are skating competitions. Each level has a 2-minute time limit along with a series of goals to complete. If a user unlocks a few goals, the next level is unlocked, even if several goals remain incomplete. For the skating competitions, it's the same idea  if enough points are racked up in the beginning, you can end early and have your score based off of whatever tricks you completed in the short period.

George, we'll call him, utilizes that to stop short and transfer to each new level once it's unlocked. Regardless, it's an amazing feat.

He says on his YouTube channel that the entire goal was just to medal each competition:

He adds that he'll be submitting the video to Speed Demos Archive, a website that compiles the fastest demos of players completing entire games.

THPS 3 was released in 2001, the third installment of the Tony Hawk's Pro Skater series, and has sold more than 2.4 million copies worldwide. It holds a score of 97/100 on Metacritic.

At time of writing, the video had more than 285,000 views on YouTube.

What other "speed runs" have you seen? Share them with us in the comments.

BONUS: 10 Video Games That Should Have Had Sequels 


--------------------------------------------------------------
Here's a design concept for a transparent iPad by artist Ricardo Afonso that might seem far-fetched, but transparent screens are certainly not impossible. Just look at the exquisite thinness and beauty of this iPad concept. It's downright mysterious-looking.

What's the mystery? Well, where are the working parts of this wispy tablet? Apparently, they must be in either those top or bottom sections, which are opaque and seemingly large enough to accommodate iPad innards that are much smaller than those of today's tablets.

However, given the pace of miniaturization of the iPad, placing all its electronics inside those two tiny spaces is not completely impossible. One thing's certain: Battery technology will have to improve to fit inside those miniature confines.

Afonso created a digital 3D model of what he calls a "futuristic tablet concept based on the Apple iPad," and is selling his files on digital media supply company Turbo Squid's website.

We think this is an absolutely lovely design. It's not altogether impossible, either. If some of the technology inherent in transparent displays we've seen at the past few techno-trade shows are brought into fruition, this design might be possible by about the same time the iPad 6 rolls out.

What do you think? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
With the tires of a monster truck and guts that pound the ground like a dinosaur, the T-Rex is not just the ultimate Tonka toy.

The truck simulates an earthquake, revealing the properties of rocks and sediments below to watching researchers, and therefore shedding light on how the ground shakes during a temblor.

The U.S. Network for Earthquake Engineering Simulation is sending T-Rex to New Zealand's South Island, to shake the soils around Christchurch, where a series of earthquakes in 2011 destroyed buildings and took lives.

SEE ALSO: Unreal Micro Art - How Do They Do It?

The earthquakes caused widespread liquefaction, a phenomenon in which shaking of water-logged soils turns the sediment temporarily from a solid to a liquid. The jiggly, wet soils undermined buildings and other structures. As many as 7,500 homes were abandoned. Parts of downtown Christchurch remain cordoned off due to the extensive damage.

The seismic data gathered with T-Rex will inform engineers, on an area-by-area basis, how to rebuild structures in Christchurch to resist future earthquakes, according to a statement from the Network for Earthquake Engineering Simulation. The seismic waves can find which soils are more likely to liquefy, and which soils are more stable. Engineers can design structures to withstand earthquakes, but first they need to know more about the soils in each area, the statement said.

"Designing a quake-resistant building starts with the soil," Brady Cox, a professor at the University of Texas at Austin, said in the statement. "The stiffness and layering of the soil has a profound effect on the strength of shaking felt during an earthquake."

The 64,000-pound (29,000 kilogram) shaker truck will sail overseas on Feb. 3, arriving in Christchurch in March.

This article originally published at Discovery News here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Twitter has been showing users the fail whale for a good chunk of the morning. The service went down for many users shortly after 10 a.m. Eastern Time and wasn't fully resolved until 12:50 p.m., the company said.

Several "Is it down" sites indicated the site wasn't working after 10 a.m., and Twitter confirmed the outage with a short update.

In an ironic extra confirmation of the outage, Twitter's status update had 0 tweets for over an hour after it was posted. A couple of hours after first acknowledging the issue, Twitter updated the post to say it was resolved. It said the problem affected both web and mobile users and that it was a global outage.

"We apologize to users who were affected by this, and were working to ensure that similar issues do not occur," the post reads.

For the first hour of the outage, Twitter was inaccessible to most users worldwide, according to postings from Facebook. Attempts to access Twitter.com displayed the traditional "Twitter is over capacity" message, along with the sites infamous "fail whale" icon. Some users saw the newer "Something is technically wrong" screen, which includes a cartoon drawing of a odd-looking robot missing a claw.

Twitter clients, such as TweetDeck, were affected as well. However, tweeting via Twitter's mobile apps and text message worked for many Twitter users at various times during the outage.

For most users in North America, access to Twitter was restored shortly before 11 a.m., although reports from other countries indicated the service was still down in other regions. Twitter now says it's resolved the issue fully.

How did the Twitter outage affect you? Share your experiences in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Michael Jordan hanging out with Justin Bieber? Apparently so, according to Twitter.

Our friends over at Skylines sorted through 34,220,279 unique Twitter photos from the past week and compiled the most shared and retweeted. Check out the gallery above to see the top 10.

SEE ALSO: Twitter 'Experimenting' With Vine Porn Censorship

Any cool pics we didn't include? Tell us your favorite photos from the past week in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Feeling down? This site is guaranteed to put you in a good mewd. Meet Vinecats, a vine aggregator that shows nine random six-second cat videos, in a grid, all the time.

The creation of q30 Design, the sites home page shows 9 different cats Vines at a time, simultaneously.

When you're ready for more, a Gimmie More Cats button refreshes the selections, providing you with more nap-taking, paw-licking action.

What do you think? Is this the purrfect way to browse Vine videos? Let us know your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Wall Street Journal revealed Thursday that it has been the victim of Chinese hackers "on and off during the past few years."

"Evidence shows that infiltration efforts target the monitoring of the Journal's coverage of China and are not an attempt to gain commercial advantage or to misappropriate customer information," Paula Keve, chief spokeswoman for Dow Jones & Co., said in a statement Thursday.

Keve told Journal reporters that the paper is working with "authorities and outside security specialists" to secure its network. The Journal completed on Thursday efforts to increase network security, possibly anticipating further attacks.

The Federal Bureau of Investigation has been looking into the phenomenon of Chinese hackers targeting American media outlets and considers it a national security matter, according to the Journal.

The Journal's revelation comes less than a day after the New York Times said that it had been infiltrated by Chinese hackers for four months. Unlike the Times, the Journal did not reveal the scope of the attack nor the methods used by hackers.

"The infiltration at the Journal, along with reports of computer network breaches at the New York Times and other news outlets, indicate that Chinese spying on U.S. media has become a widespread phenomenon," reported the Journal.

SEE ALSO: Chinese Hackers Attacked the 'New York Times' for Months

Chinese hackers have previously been blamed for attacks against other media companies including Bloomberg News and Google.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Wii.i.am took to the stage at Macworld Thursday to talk about the future of tech. Speaking alongside Intels resident futurist Bran David Johnson, the pair talked about where the next big changes are coming from.

Will.i.am thinks that education is a particular area important to tech, specifically teaching kids thats its cool to become an engineer.

Hes sees a future where kids are saying, I cant wait to change my ghetto, rather than having aspirations of getting out of it. He hopes that some of the work hes doing personally - some of which is with the help of Steve Jobs widow, Laurene Jobs  will help give kids the tools they need to succeed.

As for thinking outside the box when it comes to the future, he says, Everyones outside that b-tch now. Instead, he suggests staying inside the box, now that theres a ton of room to move around. Theres plenty of room for innovation and disruption in technology that already exists.

Staying inside the box, however, doesnt mean youre not changing things in radical ways.

Kick the fking sides, and when people come back they wont recognize it anymore,  he added.

One way Will.i.am is thinking in/outside of the box is with his new line of iPhone cases, which he proudly showed off on stage.

The pricey cases have their own camera sensor and keyboard, and work hand-in-hand with his own social photo app foto.sosho.

My dream is to have them in Apple Stores, says Will.i.am. Joking to the crowd, he added, So, if anyone knows anyone  if those could be in the Apple Store it would be the dope dot com.

Will.i.am wasn't the only celebrity to speak at Macworld this year. The fan event kicked off Thursday morning with a talk with Ashton Kutcher and Josh Gad, the stars of the upcoming film jOBS .



Photo by Emily Price, Mashable
--------------------------------------------------------------
Anyone looking for proof that Facebook and Google don't have the best working relationship got it during Facebook's earnings call on Wednesday.

"Our relationship with Google isn't one where the companies really talk," Facebook CEO Mark Zuckerberg said during the call in response to a question about Facebook's integration with iOS 6. "We are able to do a bunch of things because they have an open platform."

It was a striking admission and all the more so considering the glowing terms Zuckerberg used right after to describe Facebook's relationship with Apple: "They've been a great partner for us so far and we're really excited about doing more there and people enjoy the integration that we have with them."

Facebook and Google have clashed a bit more in public recently. In an interview with Wired earlier this month, Google CEO Larry Page slammed Facebook for doing a "really bad job" with its products.

Facebook's decision to get deeper into search with the launch of Graph Search  and to partner more closely with Google's rival Microsoft Bing  likely hasn't exactly helped close the rift between the companies. During Google's earnings call earlier this month, Page downplayed the threat Graph Search poses to its search business by noting that "we have been at that for quite a while and made investments in all sorts of areas."

Zuckerberg took a similar approach to deflect a question about competing with Google during the earnings call yesterday. "I think we're just coming from a completely different place," Zuckerberg said. "Our whole product is people in structured connections to other people and content and things that they like, whereas traditional Web search is the exact opposite... I think Google and others may be trying to put in some of the structured foundations, but we just have years of having built that up."

So there you have it: Both companies say they're not really concerned about competing with one another, and yet the two are still not on speaking terms.
--------------------------------------------------------------
If you believe Nate Silver, the San Francisco 49ers will beat the Baltimore Ravens on Sunday to win Super Bowl XLVII. The 49ers last took home the Lombardi Trophy thanks to Steve Young way back in 1995  a time when M.J. said "I'm back," O.J. said "I'm innocent" and beepers  excuse me, pagers  roamed the Earth. The year known as 1995 also birthed some of our favorite websites, most iconic films and timeless tunes.

Things were kickin' in '95, and with the 49ers back in the Big Game, what better time to take a nostalgic trip down memory lane? Here, we relive the year's biggest moments in tech, sports, news and popular culture. So button up your flannel, sip on some yak and roll with us, homies.



 NYTimes.com in 1996, via the Wayback Machine



 Match.com in 2000, via the Wayback Machine



 Craigslist in 2000, via the Wayback Machine



 Amazon in 1999, via the Wayback Machine

O.J. Simpson's trial for murder played out mostly in 1995, with a jury declaring him not guilty on Oct. 3.

Somehow, it did not last.

Gates was named the world's richest man in the same year that Windows 95 was released  bringing with it Internet Explorer  and MSN.com was launched.

"These days, beepersor, to give them their proper name, pagersadorn the belts and pocketbooks of all sorts of people," reads this Businessweek article from Jan. 15, 1995.



Before "Gangnam Style," kids, we had a little dance called "La Macarena."

All righty then! Jim Carrey's legend is born.



Toy Story introduces the world to a little company called Pixar, co-founded by some guy named Steve Jobs.

Where were you in 1995? What are your favorite moments and memories? Share with us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Internetoisseurs, this is your 2012  neatly packaged in one, retina-stimulating image.

Digital communications agency SYZYGY commissioned Parisian illustrated Niark1 to bring together 20 of the Internet's biggest moments of 2012 in a single picture. Rather than flex our web culture-packed noggins, we'll challenge you to identify all 20 of the news events, fuzzy memes and Star Wars characters featured.

BONUS: Ermahgerd! The 12 Best Memes of 2012
--------------------------------------------------------------
A man wakes up with a handcuff on his wrist and lipstick smeared all over his face while a woman  clad in panties and a t-shirt  sleeps in the bed next to him in t-shirt maker Gildan Activewear's first Super Bowl ad.

And the guy really wants his t-shirt back.

That's the premise of the brand's first Super Bowl ad. What seems like a one-night stand may not go over well with conservatives.

Levelwing, which worked with Bridgestone for its Super Bowl 2012 campaign, has been busy trying to create a buzz for the ad through social media. The company released a 10-second teaser earlier this week, which it promoted with paid search advertising, YouTube promoted video campaigns and Twitter and Facebook advertising. This, however, is the first time the ad has been released in full.

What do you think of the ad and its deployment strategy? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Apple has become the leading U.S. mobile-phone vendor for the first time last quarter, securing a record 34% of market share, and knocking rival Samsung off the top spot.

The Cupertino, Calif., company shipped 17.7 million phones during the fourth quarter, growing 4% annually, according to a new report by research firm Strategy Analytics. For comparison, that number jumped from 12.8 million in the fourth quarter of 2011, when Apple captured 25% of the market.

"Apple's success has been driven by its popular ecosystem of iPhones and App Store, generous carrier subsidies, and extensive marketing around the new iPhone 5 model," the report said.

Samsung took second place in the last quarter of 2012, shipping 16.8 million phones for 32% market share. The Korean electronics giant had been the top mobile-phone vendor in the U.S. since 2008, but failed to fight Apple off despite what Strategy Analytics called a "good performance."

Taking the third spot, LG shipped 4.7 million phones for 9% share.

Overall, mobile-phone shipments grew 4% annually to 52 million in the fourth quarter of 2012 from 50.2 million in the fourth quarter of 2011, according to Strategy Analytics.

"Growth was driven by robust demand among consumers for 4G smartphones and 3G feature phones."

This boost, however, is tempered by the fact that the U.S. mobile-phone market had shrunk during the first three quarters of 2012 due to "economic uncertainty and tighter carrier upgrade policies," the report added, saying that shipments fell 11% from 186.8 million phones in 2011 to 166.9 million in 2012.

What is your preferred mobile-phone brand? Tell us in the comments, below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Apple Vice President for education John Couch is reportedly in talks with the Turkish government about the countrys goal to make tablets accessible to 15 million schoolchildren.

Turkeys presidential website posted a photo and video of Couchs meeting with president Abdullah Gl. MacRumors reports (via local source Elma Dergisi) that the meeting concerned the countrys $4.5 billion tablet program.

"Apple has reportedly been pushing for the contract, but negotiations are said to still be underway," said the source, adding that the meeting also tackled the layout of Turkeys unique F-keyboard on iOS devices.

Another source suggested that the meeting  which is not the first between Apple and Turkey concerning tablets in education  wasnt quite as positive, with government officials criticizing the second-class treatment it receives from Apple.

In particular, WorldBulletin.net reports that Gl was unhappy that it takes so long for Apple products to reach the local market and even asked Apple to open some authorized retail stores in the country to speed up the process.

Couch reportedly refused to commit to anything at the time, but did say that he would speak to CEO Tim Cook on the matter in the near future.

Turkey is one the worlds fastest growing economies and has touted its tablet program for more than two years.

The country first promised to bring tablets to school children in November 2010. Since then, officials have been in contact with a host of budget Android vendors in the last year. At one stage, Turkey was in talks with DataWind, maker of Indias $35 Aakash tablet.

In the first signs of a country-wide tablet rollout one year ago, the government partnered with General Mobile and Samsung to deploy 12,000 tablets across 52 schools. That was part of a project to eventually bring tablets to 40,000 schools.

This article originally published at TabTimes here
--------------------------------------------------------------
A server from an Applebee's restaurant in St. Louis, Mo., was fired this week after posting a photo of a receipt from a customer who refused to tip  presumably because of religious reasons.

Chelsea Welch, the former server, posted the above photo to Reddit's r/atheism channel on Tuesday, Jan. 29.

The photo shows a receipt for a $34.93 bill, with an 18% gratuity ($6.29) added underneath, which the customer had scribbled over with the phrase "I give God 10%. Why do you get 18?"

The photo quickly spread across Reddit, Facebook and a handful of blogs. Before long, word made its way to the woman who left the note  later identified as Pastor Alois Bell  who called the restaurant and demanded the entire staff be fired, Consumerist reported.

The next day, on Wednesday, Jan. 30, Welch was let go.

SEE ALSO: Death of Foodstagram? Restaurants Ban Customers From Taking Food Pics

"I posted a picture to make people laugh," she said in an article for the Guardian. "When I posted this, I didn't represent Applebee's in a bad light. In fact, I didn't represent them at all."

Welch said the note was actually from a co-worker's table  she only took a picture and posted it as a light-hearted joke. The automatic 18% gratuity is part of the restaurant's policy for parties of eight or greater, as Bell's was.

The original photo included Bell's full signature, which Welch told Consumerist she had thought to be illegible. After commenters on Reddit began taking cracks at the name, Welch replaced the photo with the signature cropped out  by then, though, Bell had already caught wind of it.

Welch said in the Guardian article that she was well-liked at the restaurant and had no previous incidents. She was even anticipating on being promoted to a managerial role in the near future.

In an interview with The Smoking Gun, Bell  who heads a 15-member church in St. Louis  said she regretted her remarks and referred to the incident as a "lapse" in her character and judgment.

"My heart is really broken ... Ive brought embarrassment to my church and ministry."

Applebee's spokesperson Dan Smith said the incident had violated the privacy rights of Bell, The Smoking Gun added. 

 

Welch had been waiting tables to save money for college. Read her full account in the Guardian here.

Do you think it was fair for Welch to be fired? Tell us below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Audi has committed $4 million to air a 30-second commercial during the Super Bowl on Sunday  funds the auto manufacturer could have used to take over the front page of Yahoo for a week, to generate 100 million impressions on Hulu or to purchase any number of other high-profile digital ad placements. How come?

Loren Angelo, GM of Marketing for Audi, says it's past years' results that are driving Audi's investment in the Super Bowl for the sixth consecutive year. "We've achieved record levels of awareness and showroom traffic with national consideration numbers showing significant spikes post game," Angelo wrote in an email to Mashable, adding that it's an "ideal time" to tell the brand's story on "one of the world's most-watched stages."

The spot, titled "Prom," is a good one  in fact, it's already racked up more than 4.2 million views since its Jan. 24 debut on YouTube. A teenage boy, who is too frankly too good-looking to be the dateless-to-prom type, is, nevertheless, heading to prom without a girl on his arm, and he's clearly disappointed that that's the case. Before he leaves home, his father tosses him the keys to a 2013 Audi S6, and by the time he arrives at the dance, he's brimming with confidence  dangerously so, as the ad illustrates:

Angelo says the spot, which was created in collaboration with San Francisco-based agency Venables Bell and Partners, was designed to celebrate emotion, individuality and bravery in a way that's not only entertaining, but also relatable. The automaker is encouraging viewers to share their own feats of bravery using the hashtag #BraveryWins on social media leading into and during the game. According to CNBC, about half of Super Bowl ads will feature a hashtag this year.

Angelo said that, for advertisers, the lead-up to the Super Bowl can be just as important as game day, and thus his team decided to release the commercial in full  rather than as a preview, or not at all  more than a week before the game. "It's a unique period in time when audiences around the world are focused on your brand," he observed.
--------------------------------------------------------------
NFL players are used to lifting weights and rigorous workouts, but theyre probably happy to replace bulky playbooks with iPads. The tablets come loaded with apps that detail all the Xs and Os of the paper version as well as video clips of opponents.

Almost half of the NFL teams use iPads with digital playbook apps, including the Super Bowl-bound Baltimore Ravens, who are in New Orleans preparing for this Sunday's big game.

In fact, the Ravens were the first team to go digital with their playbooks, according the Wall Street Journal. And when Chuck Pagano left the Ravens to coach the Indianapolis Colts in 2012, he converted the team to digital playbooks as well.

The iPads replaced 20-pound playbooks. "We like to have the heavy lifting back in the weight room, not carrying around playbooks," Ryan Fannin, director of football information systems for the Colts, told the WSJ.

Raven's star Ray Lewis was grilled this week on charges he once used a banned performance-enhancing-drug to recover from an injury. Lewis denied the charge and said it was an old, false accusation the media should stop asking him about. "I only want my face to be stuck in the iPad," Lewis said.

The Journal was unable to confirm if the Ravens opponent, the San Francisco 49ers, also use iPads or digital playbooks. However, the team has said it aims to make its new stadium, set to open in 2014, the most tech-friendly of any to date.

"With new technology hitting the market frequently (iPads, smartphones), we want our tech infrastructure to be adaptable and our hardware to be scalable," a team official told ESPN last year.

The three major companies that make iPad apps for the NFL are Global Apptitude LLC, the maker of GamePlan, PlayerLync LLC and DragonFly Athletics LLC. "The majority of the teams that made the playoffs use this technology," Bob Paulsen, co-founder and CEO of PlayerLync, told the WSJ.

Phil Taylor, senior writer for Sports Illustrated, said he was surprised to hear so many NFL teams havent made the transition to putting their playbooks on tablets.

"Its really hard to believe, maybe thats why those teams arent in the playoffs," Taylor told TabTimes.

"It would seem to be a great competitive advantage to be able to use iPads. I can remember teams having to distribute new pages every time there was a change to the playbook. Now they can easily add, substract and modify plays very quickly and show all those video clips."

This article originally published at TabTimes here
--------------------------------------------------------------
As promised, controversial app Bang With Friends unveiled an option for users to bed members of the same sex, after it received criticism for catering exclusively to heterosexuals.

"We've had extraordinary feedback and requests to bring this to the gay community," C, one of the app's three California-based co-founders told Mashable over the phone. (The 20-something men have chosen to remain anonymous for the time being.) He added that they received over 1,000 emails requesting the feature.

Bang With Friends, which anonymously hooks users up with their Facebook friends, claims to have seen 235,000 sign-ups, and matched over 15,500 couples, since its controversial launch last week.

But despite this success  which inspired a media frenzy and copycat site  questions remain about the app's viability and future.

Moral outrage has brewed over Bang With Friends' frank attempt to simplify sexual interaction, with one Facebook user commenting on Mashable's post about the app:

C dismissed people who hold this view as "prudes."

"This is just how people really are in real life. We should just be more honest in sexuality, and what we are looking for," he said.

But this perspective of Bang With Friends as Frat-boy-esque and low-brow may prove damaging, potentially making it difficult for the app to appeal to mainstream advertisers, as well as a female audience.

While the creators are "not too focused on monetization yet"  instead putting their energy into expansion  C said they are addressing the anticipated gender imbalance by customizing messaging based on gender and sexual orientation, and making it less aggressive. "We definitely have changes coming up that are going to try to appeal to all types of users instead of just our demographic."

Still, he added, "The site is very much a creation of our humor and our personalities. We don't think we should hide that."

What Bang With Friends can't prevent, however, is the lack of anonymity prospective users face when signing up for its Facebook app. A pop-up window identifies other friends that have signed up.

"We do everything we can to keep it discreet for the user," C said, adding that all Facebook apps have the same issue. "There's not much we can do other than petition [Facebook]."

As for its expansion to include same-sex selection, Bang With Friends is entering a market already saturated by established apps that help gay men and women find lovers, including Grindr, Blendr, Qrushr, Scruff and Manhunt. What then, will make the company stand out?

It's a "safe, friends-with-benefits option," C said, adding that Bang With Friends hooks users up with people they are already familiar with. "[We're] doing it in a lightweight way, not as forceful as Grindr can come across to a lot of people."

What challenges do you think Bang With Friends will face? How do you think the company should address them? Discuss in the comments below.

Thumbnail courtesy of Flickr, Nat Nunn; top image courtesy of Bang With Friends; bottom image courtesy of Jonathan Moyal
--------------------------------------------------------------
And the award for world's luckiest actor goes to...Jesse Heiman.

Heiman, who as AdFreak points out "is not known for his movie star looks," noisily sucks face with Isreali supermodel Bar Refaeli in GoDaddy's latest Super Bowl ad. (The other dropped a week ago.) In the ad, Refaeli plays GoDaddy's sexy side while Heiman represents its smart side. Refaeli certainly earned her paycheck doing the ad. Heiman told AdFreak that it took 45 takes.

GoDaddy is hoping that the hashtag #thekiss, featured in the ad, will spur some conversation on Twitter. Given the 6-second duration of the kiss and its extreme closeup, that seems like a no-brainer.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Just like football teams need to bring their A-game on the field during the Super Bowl, advertisers need to bring their A-game for the commercial breaks  especially now, considering how costly the ads are this year.

There have certainly been plenty of lousy ads over the years, but there have also been dozens and dozens of creative and entertaining commercials from brands big and small. In some cases, the ads have lived longer in our cultural memory than any single play or outcome from the game itself.

SEE ALL SUPER BOWL COVERAGE HERE

Who could forget the iconic Coke ad when Mean Joe Green tossed his jersey to a fan who gave him a coke to the Star Wars-themed Volkswagen ad from 2011 that quickly became a viral sensation?

It remains to be seen whether any ads from this year's big game will rank among these classics, but there are already some promising contenders, including Hyundai's playful 60-second spot featuring The Flaming Lips, Audi's prom ad and Samsung's commercial with Seth Rogen and Paul Rudd.

Did we miss any of your favorite Super Bowl ads? Share in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The new BlackBerry Z10 smartphone won't be out for weeks, but you can already get your hands on it via eBay for about $1,500.

BlackBerry  the company formerly known as Research In Motion (RIM)  announced the new smartphone at an event earlier this week and handed out samples to guests and members of the press in attendance. It didn't take long for the Z10, which could potentially turn around the struggling company, to pop up on eBay.

One page notes "this particular device was given to all attendees of the Jan. 30, 2013 product launch."

BlackBerry didn't tell attendees what they can or can't do with the device, which comes unlocked, according to the listing, and without a SIM card.

Four units are currently being sold on eBay, with bids starting at $800 and rising quickly. The auction for the one going for $1,500, which has eight bids so far, will end this afternoon.

Images by Mashable and via eBay, eBay
--------------------------------------------------------------
This post originally appeared on the American Express OPEN Forum, where Mashable regularly contributes articles about leveraging social media and technology in small business.

Managing your business in the cloud is appealing for many reasons  it gives you flexibility to access information from various devices, no matter where you are, plus, it keeps remote employees up to date and involved in brainstorms. No longer is the time when a computer crash or losing a phone meant your business lost valuable contacts or data.

But most importantly, cloud information is there when you need it. In a world where technology is accelerating the way business is done, having your company's latest stats on demand can enable faster decisions and enable you to spot and respond to a potential crisis more quickly.

Software is increasingly is built for the cloud. From accounting to team meetings to customer relationship management, most tasks can be done through a smartphone app or a browser, with an account you're signed into, so you can access this information wherever you are.

Because customer interactions are happening online, these tools can help track and optimize those relationships.

"Every business has a web presence," says Melinda Emerson, president of MFE Consulting. Whether business takes place online or not matters little. She sees some service businesses  personal trainers, nail salons, cleaning services  operating almost exclusively from a smartphone.

Other tasks, including human resources, sales pipelines, document sharing and employee collaboration are becoming more and more popular in various web applications. Sharing a Dropbox folder is much easier than emailing lots of files, and a project management app such as Asana allows the entire team to see how all the pieces in a workflow come together.

Dan Norris is an entrepreneur who worked with small businesses for many years to help them use their information more effectively.

More and more business owners are running with a cloud-based platform like Xero. Same goes for a lot of other tools," he says, mentioning CRMs and project management tools.

It's not just ecommerce businesses shifting to using the cloud. Ilana Eberson, founder and CEO of B3 Global, notes that while tech and marketing companies are early adopters, all small businesses and startups can make good use of these programs. "Cloud services are so much cheaper and more within their bootstrapped budgets," she says.

But, logging in to all these services separately can be a time suck, and involves bookmarking sites and remembering a lot of passwords. Norris recently released his tool, Informly, to the public, after various versions of it had been popular with his own clients.

The app aims to pull the data from various services and put it in a single dashboard so small business owners can easily see trends and make decisions faster. Right now Informly can access data from 15 services, including Mailchimp, Quickbooks, Xero and Google Analytics, and based on feedback from beta users, he is working on adding 30-40 more.

It helps by getting a high level view of everything in your business so you can choose to dedicate your limited time to the places that need the most attention, Norris says.

What cloud-based programs does your business use? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The New York Times, which detailed a massive attack upon its computer systems on Jan. 31, is certainly not the first U.S. company to be hit by hackers apparently working for Chinese interests.

Hundreds of Western companies, organizations and government agencies have been attacked by hackers from China over the past five years. But the Times is among the few companies  Google is another  willing both to disclose details of the attack and to accuse Beijing of being behind it.

For every cyberattack or data breach you do hear about, countless others will never be disclosed.

Why don't more companies come clean? There are many reasons.

"Some companies that get hit like this never realize they were hit," said Mikko Hypponen, chief research officer at F-Secure in Helsinki, Finland. "Many of the companies that get hit are defense contractors. They'd rather not tell anyone they were hacked."

"It's not good publicity, which can negatively impact the company or organization in many ways," said Roel Schouwenberg, senior anti-virus researcher in the Woburn, Mass., office of Kaspersky Lab. "It may also interfere with ongoing investigations by law enforcement."

There might be other reasons to avoid blaming China, Hypponen said.

"Some of the targets are human-rights organizations and freedom-of-speech organizations," he said. "They might be simply afraid."

When most companies disclose data breaches or cyberattacks, it's because they have to. Hospitals, insurance companies and health agencies must disclose breaches of patient information. Publicly traded companies have to mention effects on earnings or profits in reports to shareholders.

"If certain types of data have been stolen (such as PII and customer records) there may be legal and moral obligations to issue a press release and guidance for those who could be impacted," said Graham Cluley, senior technology consultant at Sophos in Abingdon, Oxfordshire, England.

PII stand for "personally identifiable information." Unlike most companies who are required to or choose to disclose a data breach, the Times was especially candid, providing readers with a timeline and breakdown of how the attack occurred.

The newspaper broke the news in a front-page story and even went as far as to link the hackers to the Chinese military, an accusation that's rarely made overtly.

One reason it's hard to openly blame China is because the attackers almost always use compromised servers in other countries or hide behind proxy services, veiling their true origins.

"How do you prove that it was Chinese hackers?" Cluley asked. "Even if an attack was traced back to a Chinese IP [Internet Protocol] address, how can you prove that that computer wasn't also compromised and under the control of a hacker in, say, Belgium?"

"Forensics is difficult and never perfect. I expect most companies don't admit they've been hacked because they often don't have a complete picture themselves," F-Secure's security advisor Sean Sullivan said.

Even if the attackers seem to be operating in the interest of the Chinese government, that doesn't mean they were sponsored by it.

"I wouldn't blame 'China,' because it could very well be Chinese nationals," Sullivan said. "There are all sorts of hackers in the world, and many of them are patriotic Chinese citizens that act on their own."

"Chinese hackers aren't as often to blame as fear mongers in the press want to report," said Robert Graham, founder and chief executive officer of Errata Security in Atlanta.

SEE ALSO: 10 Top Targets for a 'Cyber Pearl Harbor

George Smith, a senior fellow at the Alexandria, Va., think tank GlobalSecurity.org, believes corporations might be concerned that blaming China will make it harder to do business in China.

"The Chinese actually have been blamed for a long time," Smith said. "However, many U.S. multi-nationals, unsurprisingly, have business in China and aims directed at exploiting markets there.

"You can see where such a business would think it's in a bind if it needs permissions and cooperation from [the] Chinese central government and, at the same time, finds out it has been penetrated by cyber-espionage efforts that may originate from the same."

Smith noted that the Times had a motivation for being forthcoming. It's simply a great news story, and one the newspaper was sure not to let anyone else get to first. The Times "has many incentives to cover the story and provide details, as well as the capability to do it well and to shape it from a first-hand account, in advance of competing news outlets," Smith said.

The Times' willingness to spill the beans may trigger more openness about cyberattacks and data breaches.

"Given the amount of stories about high-profile hits in recent and not-so-recent times, people have gotten more used to this type of news," Schouwenberg said. "Slowly people have come to realize that this happens to everyone. I definitely think the negative impact is not as severe as it once was."

"Disclosure from @nytimes is good," Schouwenberg later tweeted. "But the security industry needs tech details to make sure other targets are better protected."

"Somehow I suspect its [the New York Times'] rivals will soon be more eager to admit to being targets of the Chinese," Sullivan said. "I think that could become a badge of honor among news-media outlets."

Hypponen also saw today's disclosure as a positive step. "Google and the New York Times did a service to all of us by publicly coming out and announcing they've been had," he said.

This article originally published at TechNewsDaily here
--------------------------------------------------------------
UPDATE: According to reports, this iPhone case is a joke from the video-makers, and it is not an actual product.

OK maybe its an iPhone case that doubles as a cup holder. The UpperCup has a circular bevvie holder that pops up when you need it and then folds flat against the phone when youve had your fill.

If you simply cant put down your drink while you're texting, gaming or Internetting, then this might be the iPhone case for you. Developers are promoting the holder on the crowdfunding website Indiegogo. They hope to raise $25,000. Right now theyre at $900.

You can donate $25 now for the iPhone 4 or $30 for the iPhone 5 and receive the $35 cup holder after it goes into production.

This article originally published at Discovery News here
--------------------------------------------------------------
There is no correct set of tools every developer should be using. The right tool is the one best suited to you.

We've compiled a list of 10 exceptional free or open source apps for developers to help keep costs minimal, improve productivity and simplify workflow. You will find some old favorites listed; however, you might discover some new tools for your arsenal.

SEE ALSO: 12 Essential Resources for Building a Killer Mobile App

Please note, it doesn't contain any browser tools. Tune in when we cover those in a later post.

Are there any free or open source apps you use as a developer on a daily basis? If so, please leave a comment and let us know.
--------------------------------------------------------------
"Ever noticed you never seem to have a condom when you need one?" asks a new app from Durex that promises to save you from those awkward situations. The SOS Condoms iOS app claims to provide discreet delivery of the protection you're looking for.

Just fire up the app, locate yourself, choose the product you need, and a delivery person  disguised as a pizza delivery man, police officer or tourist (apparently so as not to draw suspicion)  will deliver it to you for cash on delivery, says the app.

Don't get too excited about this lifesaver though. So far it's only available in Dubai (but the app's website is taking votes for which cities should get it next). And while we're trying not to get too worked up about this public service from Durex, we might just go ahead and file this under "viral marketing campaign."

UPDATE: The head of social media and PR at French agency Buzzman, Hubert Munyazikwiye, tells Mashable "it's kind of a viral marketing campaign with the viral film, but we actually see [it] as a real and tangible service."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Ed Koch, former Mayor of New York City, passed away early Friday morning due to congestive heart failure. He was 88.

Koch was known for his blunt, unique style which defined New York City "chutzpah." Many credit Koch, who served as mayor from 1978-1989, with pulling the city out of fiscal misery. However, he has been criticized for failing to do enough for the homeless or adequately respond to the city's HIV/AIDS crisis that sprung up during his tenure.

Upon hearing the news, many Twitter users in New York City and elsewhere sent messages of condolences or otherwise reflected on Koch's life and mayoralty:
--------------------------------------------------------------
A male bulldog was saved from execution earlier this week after a clamorous Facebook campaign jumped to its defense.

According to the Daily Dot, the dog  pictured here  was returned to the Tennessee shelter where it was purchased after its owner found it snuggling over another male dog, which led her to believe it was gay.

Facebook user Jackson TN Euthanasia posted about the dog last week:

"He hunched over another male dog so his owner threw him away bc he refuses to have a gay dog! Even if that weren't the most assinine [sic] thing I've ever heard, its still discrimination! Don't let this gorgeous dog die bc his owner is ignorant of normal dog behavior!"

The post asked visitors to save the dog, who at the time was a day away from being put down, by sharing the picture. It worked  the photo was shared more than 4,300 times and racked up more than 1,300 comments.

SEE ALSO: Sisters With Viral Facebook Campaign Pick Their Puppy

Several users offered to rescue the dog, the Daily Dot reported, and a woman has officially taken responsibility to adopt it.

What other effective social media campaigns have you seen?
--------------------------------------------------------------
Everyone has that one crazy Facebook friend. They overshare, write cryptic statuses or worse, type in all caps.

Those seemingly annoying posts, or lack thereof, could be more than just news feed fodder. Facebook profiles could be used as insight into mental health issues, a new study says.

According to researchers at the University of Missouri, whether you post once an hour or once a month can be an indicator of your psychological state. Researchers surveyed more than 200 college students to gauge their levels of extroversion and support of strange beliefs, then asked participants to print their Facebook activity. Students had the option of blacking out portions of their Timeline.

What they chose to conceal revealed information about their psychological state, study researcher Elizabeth Martin says in a statement.

Some individuals exhibited social anhedonia, a condition characterized by lack of pleasure from communicating and interacting with others. Their symptoms ranged from social withdrawal to odd beliefs, and those same people posted less photos, communicated less frequently via Facebook and had a lower friend count.

Others showed signs of paranoia based on how much information they blacked out on their profile.

The idea for the study came through a conversation between Martin and the second author, Drew Bailey, who doesn't have a Facebook profile. A discussion arose about profile content and its correlation to psychology.

"The Internet is novel way to study human psychology because it can ameliorate some of the self-report biases associated with paper-and-pencil reports," Martin told Mashable in an email. "Because of the real or imagined perception of anonymity, the Internet may allow unique access to the psyche. Ones social networking information can be understood as an example of ones naturalistic behavior."

Though it's unclear whether or not therapists and psychologists can use social networks for treatment, Martin says the study is a first step to using the information to possibly provide a more complete clinical picture.

What do you think your Facebook profile says about you? Do you believe this may be an effective measure of mental health? Let us know what you think in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Fandango is getting into the Valentine's Day spirit with "Love Is a Bracketfield," a tournament-style competition pitting top romance movies against one aother.

Participants, who will play along via a Facebook app, could win a year's worth of movie tickets from online movie ticketer Fandango (that's a lot of date nights).

"Love Is a Bracketfield" launched Friday and will end when the 32 romance movies are whittled down to the best one as determined by voters. These movies are vying for your vote:

You'll see Pretty Woman battling Bridget Jones Diary as well as Titantic versus Brokeback Mountain. The app is just one component of Fandango's Valentine's Day-related blitz.

Fandango also unleashed Valentine's Day-themed Fandango gift cards and released some interesting stats from a poll it conducted:
--------------------------------------------------------------
Actress Felicity Huffman may have given up the close knit neighborhood of Wisteria Lane when Desperate Housewives came to an end, but she's created her own community on the Internet at WhattheFlicka.com.

It's a website for women and moms where they can "gather, make mistakes, say they're losing their mind, trade tips and offer advice to one another," Huffman told Mashable.

She discovered, after having kids, that it was a tough job and there wasn't a lot of opportunity to talk about it. "There's no conversation for parenting, no one to say 'it's hard' to." When she finally met someone who could relate, she felt a strong sense of community  so she created that community for other moms online.

As the mom on Desperate Housewives, Huffman found a lot of fans connected with her character, Lynette. "Motherhood is a heroic profession and I wanted to keep that group going when Desperate Housewives ended."

Huffman herself writes some of the content on the site, injecting personal stories along with advice and resources. She also has mom bloggers and others contributing posts on everything from parenting to health and lifestyle, baby items and kids issues. Huffman calls it a "hanging room" for moms.

You'll see a mix of posts like "Humpday Cocktails" to articles like "Mom and Dad Calendars" where Huffman describes the "cocktail mix of guilt and self-recrimination" at leaving her kids behind when traveling. She offers tips she learned along the way for dealing with those issues.

When Huffman began the site, she wasn't on Twitter or Facebook and knew very little about social media. Now, she's learned to tweet so she can reach out to her community. "I love the people who follow me, I like to tweet. It's fun, I don't find it an imposition or invasive."

Huffman has also since learned how to use technology to multitask and organize her family. When we met with her, she was in New York as a spokesperson for Microsoft's Office 365 software. She explains as a busy mom she works constantly, and loves being able to grab 10 minutes while waiting on the carpool line, or picking up her daughter from dance class, and when she gets home, her documents and emails are updated on her desktop.

If you're wondering where the website's name came from, it's the childhood name her mother gave her  it means 'little girl' in Swedish.

Huffman's own kids are 10 and 12 and though they want them very badly, they don't have cellphones yet. "You lose them, the head goes down and they text all the time," Huffman laments, so she's holding out as long as possible.

Even though she has time to devote to the site and new projects, Huffman says it was sad saying goodbye to Desperate Housewives. She recounts how she recently saw on TV the scene where her character Lynette and Doug get back together, and "Doug (Savant) just acted the sh*t out of that. I thought, that's sweet, i just love them, even though I'm one of them."

Apparently, her husband William H. Macy loved them too. When she and her TV character were split up, Macy told her "I don't like this story line, why are they splitting up, why is this happening?"

Huffman says she was so lucky to be a part of it all.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It requires a thick skin and tough attitude to play football, especially if you want to make it to the Super Bowl.

Fortunately for us, it does not require looking good for the camera. Players pay attention to the game, not who's watching it. There's no time for that if you want to win...unless you're Brandon Lloyd.

SEE ALSO: Bad Lip Readings Give NFL Games a Hilarious New Soundtrack

The Baltimore Ravens play the San Francisco 49ers on Sunday, and they definitely did not get to the top for being photogenic.

Here are a few tips on how to win the NFL's biggest night.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Federal Trade Commission suggested Apple, Google, app developers and advertising networks should implement mobile Do Not Track (DNT) features in new mobile privacy guidelines issued Friday.

Do Not Track is designed to block third parties such as advertising networks from tracking your activity on the web. It's becoming increasingly popular as many plugins and several of the newest browsers offer it as a feature with varying degrees of efficacy.

Advertising companies argue tracking is necessary for delivering relevant ads. Tracking is also used by many websites to remember your login information and for other web experience-enhancing features. However, some people view Internet tracking as an invasion of privacy.

The FTC, which oversees digital privacy issues, argues in its report that mobile Do Not Track would offer consumers a choice between tracking and trackless browsing with the benefits and disadvantages either selection would bring.

"A mobile DNT mechanism, which a majority of the Commission has endorsed, would allow consumers to choose to prevent tracking by ad networks or other third parties as they navigate among apps on their phones," reads the FTC's report.

The FTC's report had several other privacy suggestions for mobile platform providers, app developers and advertising networks.

It argues Apple, Google and other platforms should be required to get your consent before accessing geolocation and other "sensitive content," consider developing cross-app privacy dashboards and consider developing an icon showing when user data is being transmitted, among other privacy reforms.

App developers, meanwhile, should have easily-accessible privacy policies, get your direct consent before sharing sensitive data and take steps to better understand the third-party ad networks many developers incorporate into their apps, says the FTC's report.

The report also advised developers to take part in self-regulation and "trade associations," which could help form industry-wide privacy standards.

"The mobile world is expanding and innovating at breathtaking speed, allowing consumers to do things that would have been hard to imagine only a few years ago," said FTC Chairman Jon Leibowitz in a statement. "These best practices will help to safeguard consumer privacy and build trust in the mobile marketplace, ensuring that the market can continue to thrive."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Have you ever wondered what the future of humanity holds? We know you have, we do it all the time here at Mashable. And frankly, looking ahead is pretty much an integral part of human nature.

Our friends at Information Is Beautiful Studio have compiled 38 predictions about the future of tech, science, and humanity in general  with an educated guess as to their odds of actually becoming reality. There are predictions for all kinds of tastes: your computer will have a sense of smell, Pinterest will be bought by Google, the appearance of the first human clones, the territory of the moon will be claimed by china, and many more.

Check out the infographic below and see for yourself what the future might hold. What do you think about this predictions? Tell us your thoughts in the comments.

Infographic courtesy of Information Is Beautiful Studio for BBC Future. Homepage image via iStockphoto, VallarieE.
--------------------------------------------------------------
You love .GIFs, right? Of course you do  tweeting them, Tumbling them, sending them via Google Chat.

The only problem with the Internet's favorite animated art form is that it can be a real challenge to find the absolute perfect .GIF for a given situation  but not anymore. Allow us to introduce Giphy, your new favorite search engine.

Giphy's user interface is dead simple: just search for a .GIF the same way you'd search for something on Google. Searching for "Doctor Who," as an example, brings up 363 results of animated Time Lord goodness.

Thankfully for load times, the results won't start GIFing until you hover your mouse over them.

Giphy's homepage, also has links to the most popular searches, including "Funny," "Emma Stone" and "Star Wars." It's also just a little bit cocky  "This is Giphy. You're welcome," reads the homepage.

What are you waiting for? Get .GIF searching.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Today one of America's busiest railroad stations, Grand Central Terminal in New York, turns 100 years old. The iconic structure, located in the heart of Manhattan, serves thousands of passengers every day and is one of the most popular tourist attractions in the world. Originally built by the New York Central Railroad, today it is used exclusively by Metro-North Railroad, New York's regional commuter rail line.

In the days and weeks leading to the Feb. 1 centennial, historians and fans alike have been preparing for a series of celebrations and have been promoting the hashtag #GCT100 on Twitter. Of course, not everyone will be able to get to New York City to celebrate this important milestone, but thanks to the Internet, you don't have to miss out. With sites like YouTube, Flickr, and Facebook, it's possibly to take a tour through the last century at Grand Central.

Some of the oldest artifacts of Grand Central can be found on the Library of Congress' Flickr page, including these historic views.

YouTube also has some great content featuring Grand Central Terminal, including a handful of video tours (see below) that show both the station's gothic grandeur and engaging history. Did you know that there is a secret train just for the president far below the station? Or that the station was almost demolished in the 1970s? Or how about the fact that 2,000 coats are left behind in the station every year?

Grand Central is more than just trains and travel, however. The legendary building has also inspired poets, performers, and artists. And to see some of that work, all one has to do is look up. High above the main hall of the station is a backwards painted zodiac (that wasn't done on purpose) that is lit with LED lights.

Of course, at the end of the day, Grand Central is a place that people use to go to and from. Every day 750,000 people pass through the station. That can be a hard number to comprehend, but thankfully someone has taken the time to capture just a small clip of it in some awesome time lapse footage. Check that out before catching the next train home (which has also been time lapsed to save time).

If all of that is not enough, then the next best stop is the I Ride The Harlem Line Blog and related Facebook page. Created by a graphic designer and commuter named Emily, this page has an endless wealth of information regarding the terminal and the history and culture that surround it.

This article originally published at The Daily Dot here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Apple TV owners may be able to access HBO shows on their set tops by mid-year.

According to Bloomberg, Apple is in talks with Time Warner to make its HBO Go app, which already allows HBO subscribers to watch shows on their iPhone and iPad devices, available on Apple's Internet-connected TV console. The $99 device lets viewers watch TV shows and films purchased on iTunes and stream content from providers like Netflix, Hulu Plus, YouTube and more.

An Apple spokesperson declined to comment on the report.

The move would make Apple TV more competitive  in the eyes of HBO subscribers, at least  with other Internet-connected set top boxes, such as Roku and Xbox 360, which already have the HBO Go app. (PlayStation 3 devices also lack HBO Go access.) Apple sold more than 2 million Apple TVs in the holiday quarter, the company said on its fiscal 2013 earnings call.

Meanwhile, Apple is reportedly testing designs for a full-fledged TV set.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Well, this sure makes me want to do some science this weekend. Seventh graders at Cornerstone Christian School performed this experiment on "the effects of altitude on air pressure and temperature." And presumably also on a Hello Kitty doll inside a lovingly spray-painted rocket ship.

This article originally published at The Mary Sue here
--------------------------------------------------------------
It's been a very cold winter  especially for the homeless.

In a new campaign called "Days of Hope," people who are homeless stand in place of TV weathermen to bring awareness to the harsh impact of the cold winter in Europe, Osocio reports. Real men and women are invited from the streets to read the weather. When they're done presenting, they can ask the audience to make donations to local charities.

The above news cast is from Romania, a similar weather program is running in Russia, and more will soon roll out in Germany, Poland and Switzerland.

SEE ALSO: Homeless Man Uses Flip Cam, YouTube to Spread Awareness

Though these stand-in weathermen don't give particularly exciting performances, the campaign's shock value as a reminder of what weather means to real people on the streets still pervades.

Do you think the campaign is effective? Let us know your reactions in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Quick, what's 23 times 46? No time to think, your mind has already figured it out.

Confused? No need for an explanation, your mind is two steps ahead of you.

Sometimes your brain is working so fast it's getting everything wrong. And sometimes it's working so well, it makes you blind.

It doesn't make much sense, until ASAPScience lays it out. It all boils down to the fact that our mind is constantly playing tricks on us, but for our own good. This video explains that without a system of "slow" and "fast" thinking, our brains would be exhausted from menial tasks and we'd treat brushing our teeth like long division.

SEE ALSO: Why Your Mind Is the Most Powerful Thing in the Universe

So watch the video above to learn just how smart and dumb your brain can be at the same time.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Few brands are as committed to advertising during the Super Bowl as Hyundai, but the company's track record with its ads has been mixed.

Hyundai bought ad space during every Super Bowl game since 2008. In that time, it has never cracked the top five most-popular commercials on USA Today's AdMeter, and only once had a commercial in the top 10  a list that is typically dominated by companies outside the auto industry like Budweiser and Doritos. However, in three of those five years, Hyundai did have the dubious distinction of seeing at least one commercial rank among the bottom five.

Despite this, Hyundai is once again pulling out all the stops for the Super Bowl: sponsoring the pre-game show, buying up the only 60-second spot between the coin toss and kickoff and airing five commercials during the game itself. So why does Hyundai continue to devote so much time and planning year after year to the Super Bowl? To paraphrase Woody Allen, for Hyundai, just showing up really is 80% of the game.

"It has been part of an overall strategy to act bigger than we are," Steve Shannon, Hyundai's VP of marketing, told Mashable in an interview. He says this idea of punching above its weight is also why the company chooses to be a sponsor for other big events like the Academy Awards. "That's very much been the spirit of this brand."

Even though Hyundai hasn't had the same kind of viral success with its Super Bowl ads as other car companies  including Volkswagen's playful Star Wars ad "The Force" and Chrysler's comeback spot featuring Eminem  the company still credits its presence during the big game with helping to boost brand awareness and sales in the U.S.

"If six years ago, we were selling 250,000 cars a year, last year we did over 700,000," Shannon says. "I wouldn't put that all on the Super Bowl ... but it has been part of it."

Given how important the Super Bowl is to Hyundai's marketing efforts, the company typically starts mapping out its strategy in mid-summer. These early brainstorming sessions focus on deciding which vehicles to showcase in the ads and what kind of story it wants to tell. This time around, Hyundai's team reviewed about 15 concepts for commercials and gradually winnowed it down, relying in part on feedback from a focus group of Americans who are self-described fans of the Super Bowl and the ads that air during it.

While Hyundai's ad buying strategy for this year's Super Bowl is essentially the same as the last year, it has tweaked what appears in those ads and the digital components that promote the ads.

For starters, you might notice a few familiar faces in the big 60-second ad this year. Hyundai got the members of indie rock darlings The Flaming Lips to make a cameo in the ad (seen below) and to write a new song for it. The commercial, called "Epic Playdate," shows a family living to the fullest in their Hyundai Santa Fe while the band members egg them on. This represents a bit of a departure from the past for Hyundai as the company generally refrains from featuring celebrities in its ads (Jeff Bridges, however, provides voiceovers) in favor of being more unassuming, but according to Shannon, Hyundai is more open to including some well known faces if it relates to music.

Shannon chalks up the collaboration between The Flaming Lips and Hyundai to good timing. Hyundai actually developed the basic idea for the commercial without intending it to air during the game, but soon realized that it was "Super Bowl-worthy." As the company started working more on the commercial, it realized the ad would work better with a band whose personality matched that of the "rebellious" and "playful" family. It just so happened that The Flaming Lips were working on a new album at the time, so Hyundai reached out to collaborate on a new track.

"The relationship between The Flaming Lips and Hyundai is a true musical collaboration," Shannon says. "While the band had full creative control in composing the track, the brand was able to provide creative inspiration."

Hyundai also took advantage of this partnership with the band to make a strong push into the digital side of Super Bowl marketing this year. In addition to releasing videos for this and several other commercials on YouTube in advance of the game, Hyundai sponsored a music video for the song that was featured on Rolling Stone and Billboard, and gave away free downloads of the track on its website to 100,000 fans.

The company also launched a Facebook sweepstakes inspired by one of its 30-second commercials called "Team" (seen below), which asks viewers to assemble their own team of seven friends online  the number of passengers who can fit in the Santa Fe  for a chance to win seven tickets to the 2014 Super Bowl.

Shannon says Hyundai's marketing team thought about the social media and digital marketing components "a little bit more ahead of time" than for last year's Super Bowl.

"This year we are doing fewer things better," he said. "I think that last year  I don't want to say we threw a lot of stuff against the wall  but we were experimenting a bit."

Shannon continues: "We put some things out there on YouTube that we thought were clever and funny. We did a decent number, but not a great number. There was some learning from last year: Let's plan a little more ahead and plan a couple big social media ideas."

Beyond all that, Hyundai's marketing team also made the decision to spotlight its more mainstream vehicles this year  advertising the Santa Fe and Sonata Turbo rather than the niche sporty cars it showcased in 2012  and to focus on product during the 60-second spot rather emphasizing the company culture, as it did last year.

"The Super Bowl is so strong for us that it almost works no matter what you're doing," Shannon says. "We've had two years in a row where we did somewhat of a different thing, but it still works for us."

Who knows, perhaps this will be the year that Hyundai gets a viral hit, but even if it doesn't, the company is just happy to be part of the big game.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The iPad has proven to be an especially useful communication tool for young people with autism. It provides a way to express themselves through words and images; it can be used to teach them about everyday scenarios and give them more independence. It's also far less bulky than some communication devices of the past.

Autism Spectrum Disorders are developmental disabilities that affect about one in every 88 children, and one in 54 boys.

Jonathan Izak's 12-year-old autistic brother inspired him to develop the AutisMate app for iPad. His brother, Oriel, is mostly nonverbal and used to struggle to communicate, sometimes throwing tantrums when he was unable to get his point across, Izak tells Mashable.

At 7 years old, Oriel had to wear a heavy communication device around his neck, which further set him apart from other children at school. Now, Oriel carries an iPad and uses the app his brother developed to communicate and learn new behaviors like how to act in specific social situations.

With AutisMate, parents or caretakers take and upload photos of their child's bedroom, the kitchen, his or her school to the app. When the app launches, the iPad's GPS will know where the user is and allows them to tap pictures of their surrounding environment. The child can tap the refrigerator, for instance, to express that he or she is hungry.

Izak says these visual tools for communication don't become a permanent crutch but rather promote speech and communication.

It's not uncommon for children with autism to be nonverbal and need the iPad to communicate. AutismSpeaks.org says it's estimated that 25% of people with autism are completely nonverbal.

Izak explains that, for someone with autism, the unknowns in life can be scary, so to prepare that person for the world, apps like AutisMate show scenes of how to do everyday things like go to a restaurant or the doctor's office.

Parents, caretakers and doctors know early intervention with autism is a key factor to increasing their child's likelihood of communicating, which is probably why most autism apps focus on children. iPad apps to help children with autism develop their communication skills are part of a rapidly growing market and have proved to be effective tools. Check out some of the apps we found and others recommended to us. Let us know if you know of any other useful apps for people with autism.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Although Apple's iTunes platform continues to dominate the movie-on-demand market, consumers still like to rent and buy DVD and Blu-ray discs  at least for now, new data suggests.

According to a report by The NPD Group, the digital on-demand video market is going strong, making up about 16% of movie spending at home (up 2% from 2011). Even though DVD and Blu-ray rentals and purchases are down to 61% (from 64% last year), it still occupies a much larger piece of the overall in-home spending pie.

SEE ALSO: Why Audi Chose a $4 Million Super Bowl Spot Over a Digital Campaign

There is a significant base of video customers in the U.S. who continue to be comfortable with physical formats, and a large majority havent made the complete transition from discs to digital video, Crupnick said. For the time being, at least, consumers still like to own and rent movies and TV shows on DVD and Blu-ray, even in a world of where connected devices and digital rental, streaming, and ownership options are becoming more accepted and commonplace.

However, digital movie downloads via iTunes (45%) far outshine competitors in the category, beating Amazon Instant Video (18%); Vudu (15%); Zune, Xbox Video (14%) and others (8%).

TV programming is also having a big impact on the home-video market. In fact, about 80% of Netflix Watch Instantly rental transactions were TV shows compared to movies.

In the market for television content, Netflix has amassed a strong slate of popular programs, including Breaking Bad and The West Wing, all of which capitalize on time-shifting behavior because they immerse the viewer for shorter time frames than full-length movies do, said Crupnick. As long as TV content remains compelling and easily available, we can expect to see that sector of home video expand.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Bars are too crowded. Parties get old. Actually going to New Orleans is prohibitively expensive and completely out of the question.

Simply watching the Super Bowl at home may in fact be your best bet, thanks to the ability to live stream the game while following the social media conversation online. A handful of digital innovations mean you can do it bigger than ever this year. This is how to live stream Super Bowl XLVII like a boss.

First, CBSSports.com's live stream will bring more options that ever. It will include Beyonce's halftime show, as well as a DVR-like capability allowing you to rewind great plays and pause for important bean dip refills. You can also watch those all-important Super Bowl commercials on-demand after they air.

But the CBS live stream's coolest feature is likely its Fan Choice camera angle selector. Based on user polling throughout the game, a traditional broadcast format will be augmented by a revolving Fan Choice camera option showing the game from one of four unique and rarely seen angles.

The CBSSports.com live stream is available as a pop-up video console accessible via tablet, laptop or desktop computer with no authentication required. It also includes a curated Twitter stream to bring in the social media conversation  but that's not the only way you can give your Super Bowl experience a social media twist.

Offerings from both HootSuite and Livefyre will provide access to a global social conversation about the game. Already up and running, HootSuite's "Super Bowl XLVII Command Center" lets anyone check out updating statistics on tweet volume about teams, quarterbacks and head coaches, as well as track social media sentiment surrounding both the San Francisco 49ers and Baltimore Ravens. Livefyre's Super Bowl NewsHub, meanwhile, will aggregate the most popular tweets, commercials and Instagram photos on the social web, and works for iOS, Android and web devices.

How will second-screen technology factor into your Super Bowl watching? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Ten years ago on Feb. 1, 2003, Space Shuttle Columbia disintegrated during its re-entry into Earth's atmosphere, killing all seven crew members on board.

Many of us can still recall where we were and what we were doing when the news of the Columbia disaster broke. It was a tragedy that fundamentally changed NASA.

One of the most poignant tributes came in just seven tweets (embedded below) from NASA astronaut Mike Massimino, who knew all the crew members of mission STS-107. He gave one humanizing, powerful, memory of each person.

The accident, which was a result of damage the shuttle sustained during its launch, spurred an extensive investigation of space flight safety. NASA was forced to relearn the hard lesson that space is a dangerous place. Ultimately, the Columbia disaster led to the official end of the agency's space shuttle program in July 2011.

SEE ALSO: In the Ashes of Space Shuttle Columbia, an Untold Story

On the anniversary of the disaster today, astronauts and agency employees are setting politics aside and remembering the most important thing we lost that day: our people.

NASA deemed Feb. 1 as a national Day of Remembrance for the crews of Columbia, Challenger and Apollo 1. In a statement released today, President Obama commented on the challenges on space exploration, but he also notes that it is an important risk that the United States must continue to take on.

As we undertake the next generation of discovery, today we pause to remember those who paid the ultimate sacrifice on the journey of exploration. Right now we are working to fulfill their highest aspirations by pursuing a path in space never seen before, one that will eventually put Americans on Mars.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The long and lackluster life of the MinDisc is finally coming to an end. Sony is reportedly planning to end shipments of its MiniDisc players in March after more than 20 years.

Like many reading this, my first reaction was shock  not shock about the news that the MiniDisc player is about to be discontinued, but shock at the realization that the device is still around at all. The MiniDisc is very much of another era  the pre-iPod period  when the biggest innovations in the music world were things like better anti-shock protection for portable CD players so you could walk around without songs skipping too much. And even then, the MiniDisc seemed destined to be a fad.

Sony originally launched the MiniDisc in 1992, but it only sold 50,000 units in the first year. The problem was that Sony priced the device way too high (more than $500) and, as The Guardian put it in an article last year, struggled to "lure teenagers away from cassettes and CDs." Fast forward a few years. In 1998, Sony decided to effectively re-launch the MiniDisc player with a $30 million marketing campaign, which focused on promoting the product as a recording device that could supplement CDs rather than replace them.

Om Malik, who went on to found GigaOM a few years later, summed up the sentiment at the time in a piece for Forbes:

So what kind of sucker actually fell for Sony's marketing campaign and believed MiniDiscs just might be the future? That would be me.

Around this time, I was transitioning from middle school to high school and just starting to develop my own taste in music. So what if that included bands like Third Eye Blind and Live bands that seem as dated now as the MiniDisc  at least it was my music and not my parents' music. Though I don't remember the exact date and place where I first saw the player/recorder, it was likely during one of my weekly trips to browse CDs at Circuit City (another relic of the era) with my father. There, among the bulky Walkman players and expensive CD players, the MiniDisc looked sleek, portable, relatively cheap and, most importantly, new. It struck me as a way to truly differentiate my music experience from my father's.

For the better part of two years, I was a MiniDisc evangelist, somehow convincing several of my closest friends that it really was the future. My friends and I would spend weekends together biking to used record stores nearby and buying up cheap CDs by the dozen. Then each of us would head home and make mix tapes of our favorite bands on MiniDisc, which we would trade with each other on the bus to school during the week. I still have many of these MiniDiscs in a shoebox in my parents' house, and I can trace the evolution of my musical tastes through them  from generic pop like Matchbox 20 to grunge rock like Soundgarden and Alice in Chains to throwbacks like The Beatles and David Bowie.

For me, the thrill I found with MiniDiscs wasn't distancing myself from my father's way of listening, but rather replicating it under the guise of a new technology. My father had hundreds if not thousands of cassette tapes that he had recorded over decades for car rides and his long daily commute to work. Growing up, he had often recorded songs straight from the radio and traded those tapes with friends and family  his generation's version of p2p file sharing. He put incredible time and care into recording these tapes, plotting out the number of songs that could fit on each side, writing out track listings by hand and organizing the tapes alphabetically and chronologically.

I was brought up to believe that music is its most rewarding when treated as something precious and deeply personal. MiniDiscs provided my friends and I with a way to do that.

It wasn't particularly easy to record MiniDiscs. There was no quick and simple way to "burn" another copy and the discs didn't work with other existing music technology at the time. Yet, for a brief period, I viewed all of these negatives as positives. Each MiniDisc I made  flaws and all  felt like it had been created with care, and the simple act of trading discs with friends carried more weight because the discs themselves were unique and irreplaceable.

While this made for a meaningful music experience for me, it didn't make for a good business model for Sony. The company was once again pushing a proprietary format at a time when consumers were about to move in the compete opposite direction thanks to the rise of MP3 players, CD burners and eventually the iPod. It's no wonder, then, that it has joined the ranks of LaserDisc and the Walkman, which Sony started phasing out in 2010.

Most of my friends abandoned MiniDiscs for CD-R players by 2000 and I eventually followed suit. I still listened to my MiniDiscs in private from time to time as well as sneaking in some of my father's tapes. Then, a couple of years later, I cashed in my piggy bank of change to buy a second-generation iPod and left my MiniDisc days behind. With each new device, music consumption got noticeably easier, but in the back of my mind, I've always felt that each made music appreciation more difficult. I've discovered more music through services like Spotify and Pandora than ever before and had easier access to these tracks thanks to my iPhone, but none of these listening experiences feels as memorable to me now as the day my friend passed me his Radiohead MiniDisc (Vol. 2) on the bus and I listened to it on repeat for days.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Forget a teaser video, BlackBerry is going with a teaser image.

The company, which just announced its intention to buy a Super Bowl ad last week, on Friday released the image above. A rep didn't offer much insight about the spot, except to say, "This unique execution will be part of a broad marketing campaign about the totally re-designed, re-engineered and re-invented BlackBerry."

CMO Frank Boulben, who spoke to us after the launch of BlackBerry 10 this week, was similarly opaque: "All of our marketing campaign moving forward will be very consistent around the 'Keep Moving' tagline and putting it in real-life use cases. The objective with the Super Bowl commercial is to let people know that the BlackBerry is back."

So we ask you, Mashable readers: What do you make of the image? Some theories:

What do you think? Let us know.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Are you a fair-weather football fan? The type who jumps on the bandwagon when Super Bowl time comes around just to make sure you have plans on a Sunday night? Do you actually question the nacho-dipping, beer-chugging traditions?

Well you can stop hiding that deep dark secret because this guy is blowing the roof off this thing we call the Super Bowl.

Turns out, there are actually a lot of people who are just as baffled by America's obsession with the sport (though most of them are overseas) as you are. And for good reason.

It seems our obsession with the sport is in reality just a fixation with ads, since the time that is devoted to game play is just 11 minutes of the three hour broadcast.

The rest of what we watch are ads, injured players, coaches and cheerleaders ... and then some more ads. But there is still something gripping that manages to get us to spend a collective 300 million man hours watching the game yearly.

Could it be those hunky football players? No one is sure, but this guy gets pretty close with his whirlwind of football fun facts.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Obama administration, frustrated by a lack of cooperation from the Chinese government, is now considering a range of options in retaliation for Chinese hackers' attacks on U.S. businesses, according a to a report.

The Director of National Intelligence is working on a new report that will argue the Chinese government is directly involved in cyberattacks against the United States, reports the Associated Press. The report will focus on the negative impact of economic cybercrime on the U.S. economy, per former U.S. officials who spoke to the AP on condition of anonymity.

Hackers have long infiltrated foreign business' computer systems to steal intellectual property in order to sell or copy it. It's difficult to asses the exact loss to the U.S. economy as a result of economic cybercrime, but some estimates are in range of tens-to-hundreds of billions of dollars.

"We have to begin making it clear to the Chinese that the United States is going to have to take action to protect not only our government's, but our private sector, from this kind of illegal intrusions," said outgoing Secretary of State Hillary Clinton Thursday.

SEE ALSO: Chinese Hackers Attacked 'The New York Times' for Months

News of the upcoming report comes a day after the New York Times and The Wall Street Journal revealed they have both been the target of cyberattacks which security experts believe originated in China. The Times was specifically targeted following its publication of a story embarrassing to Chinese Prime Minister Wen Jiabo.

China's government has flatly denied involvement in these and other cyberattacks for which it is blamed, including attacks against Bloomberg News, Google, the U.S. Department of Defense and other American organizations.

How should the United States respond to cyberattacks from China? Share in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Internet has fallen in love with Disney's Oscar-nominated short Paperman, a six-minute clip that follows two love-struck office workers in New York City who are brought together by a pile of papers.

But soon after the film was posted online earlier this week, viewers recognized similar plot lines and scenes to a popular YouTube film called Signs which debuted nearly four years ago.

SEE ALSO: Fall in Love With This Oscar-Nominated Disney Short

Are the two connected? According to sources close to the matter, the similarities are only a charming coincidence.

Fans of Paperman  which uses both hand-drawn animation and computer graphics  began commenting on the Signs YouTube page earlier this week. Although the films are unrelated, the couples in both are brought together by paper and office building windows.

Other than that, the films take on a life of their own. If you haven't seen them yet, both heartwarming clips are worth your time.

UPDATE: This story has been updated from its original version with more information from a source close to the matter.

Images courtesy of Disney via YouTube; steveymcdonald via YouTube
--------------------------------------------------------------
Social network Path has settled Federal Trade Commission charges that it "deceived users"  including children under 13  by collecting their personal information without consent.

The San Francisco-based company, which makes a mobile app that lets users focus on private updates from close friends and family, must set up a "comprehensive privacy program" and get "independent privacy assessments" every other year for the next 20 years, the FTC announced Friday. Path is also required to pay $800,000 to settle charges that it violated the Childrens Online Privacy Protection Act by illegally collecting personal information from children without parental consent, the commission added.

"There was clear deception ... [and] it involved kids," FTC chairman Jon Leibowitz told reporters in a conference call Friday. "That is a sort of red-flag combination for us."

In a statement on its blog, Path painted a different picture  one not of deception, but rather unintentional oversight. (Leibowitz did say, however, that Path "recognized they were at fault.")

"From a developer's perspective, we understand the tendency to focus all attention on the process of building amazing new things," the company wrote. "It wasn't until we gave our account verification system a second look that we realized there was a problem."

Path explained that there was a time period when its system did not automatically reject users that identified as being under 13 years old. The company said it fixed the sign-up process and suspended under-age accounts before the FTC were in contact.

"A very small number of affected accounts have since been closed by Path."

SEE ALSO: Path Adds Fresh Security Features to Mobile App

In the FTC's complaint, it called the user interface for Path's iOS app "misleading," and said the company automatically collected and stored personal information  including full names, addresses and phone numbers  from users' mobile address book even if they did not opt to select a "Find friends from your contacts" option. The FTC also alleged this personal information was taken despite Path's claims that it only took IP addresses, operating systems, browser types and other non-sensitive information.

It also said Path collected personal information from around 3,000 children under 13 without getting parental consent, allowing them to create journals, upload photos and share their locations.

The FTC's aim, Leibowitz emphasized, is ensuring that consumers have control over their data. Having robust and clear data policies can help a company build trust with its users. "In the long term, I think it's in the best interest of the company," he said.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Ever wondered what exactly the "hut" a quarterback shouts at the center actually means? If you'll believe Pizza Hut's Super Bowl 2013 ad, it might be quarterbacks giving a shout-out to the restaurant. And in return, Pizza Hut salutes quarterbacks in this year's Super Bowl commercial.

Check it out, above.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Users of the social news site Reddit have helped raise more than $10,000 in less than 24 hours for an Atlanta shopping mall manager turned Internet hero.

Property manager Darien Long became an overnight Internet celebrity after an eight-month-old video of him dealing with two violent women collected more than 1 million views in less than three days.

The video shows Long telling two truculent women to back up outside Atlanta's Metro Mall while a group of young children looked on. After about three minutes worth of yelling at the women to stand down, one decides to attack Long, who was wearing a video camera on his bulletproof vest and had a pistol in his possession. Long was hit on the head repeatedly and was ultimately forced to taser the woman.

"I feel like the taser and the camera are the two most effective tools that I have," Long told Atlanta news station WSB-TV. "Do what you're supposed to do or you get what's coming to you."

The video was posted Tuesday to Reddit, where Long was praised for his fortitude. Now the community wants to show Long their gratitude by raising money to help "enable him to get better and more gear."

The Reddit community started a campaign on CrowdTilt, a new crowdfunding platform, Thursday evening and has since collected $10,665 from 349 different contributors.

"He is a nice guy and that area is very dangerous," noted redditor RyuKenya, who started the CrowdTilt campaign after reaching out to Long. "There is a cop station around the block but people still sell drugs around there. He has to wear kevlar and has his own mugshot book. He was not too proud about tasing the woman and wished it could have been avoided."

The woman who attacked Long was charged with disorderly conduct, criminal trespassing, contributing to the delinquency of a minor and simple battery.

This article originally published at The Daily Dot here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Rep. Zoe Lofgren (D-Calif.) has revised and expanded "Aaron's Law," her proposal to reform the Computer Fraud and Abuse Act in honor of Aaron Swartz. The congresswoman posted the revised bill on Reddit Friday afternoon.

"Thank you, Reddit and everyone else who provided feedback to the original rough draft bill to reform the Computer Fraud and Abuse Act (CFAA) and the wire fraud statute  the laws the government used to unfairly prosecute Aaron Swartz," Lofgren wrote in the post.

The new draft addresses some of the concerns that were raised when the first proposal was made public. The bill still de-criminalizes terms of service violations, just like the first version did, but it also adds other modifications that were previously lacking.

First and foremost, the new bill defines what "access without authorization" actually means. This was the main concern of a number of legal experts such as Lawrence Lessig or the Electronic Frontier Foundation's Marcia Hoffmann, who said at the time that Lofgren's proposal came up short.

In the revised draft, unauthorized access is basically defined as the circumvention of technological barriers. The draft goes as far as to define what does not constitute unauthorized access as well. These changes would give the CFAA a level of clarity that it previously lacked.

The new bill also ensures that changing one's IP or MAC address is not a violation of either the CFAA or the Wire Fraud act.

Aaron's Law was proposed after Swartz's family and friends, as well as other Internet activists, accused Swartz's prosecutor of being overzealous and playing a role in his suicide. Swartz was found dead in his Brooklyn apartment on Jan. 11.

Lofgren thinks these changes should be enough to prevent another case like Aaron's.

"The changes in this draft should prevent the kind of abusive prosecution directed at Aaron Swartz and would help protect other Internet users from outsized liability for everyday activity," she wrote.

In the post, the congresswoman makes clear that this these changes are not the end, but just the beginning of a more comprehensive overhaul of the CFAA, as she told Mashable in an exclusive interview on Jan. 18.

"If we succeed in getting this draft bill enacted into law, it will be in honor of Aaron Swartz, and should be seen as a beginning of a concerted effort to bring reform to these broader issues," she wrote.

SEE ALSO: Lawmakers Demand Answers About Aaron Swartz Case

The California representative originally introduced the bill on Reddit in order to crowdsource suggestions and advice. These new changes seem to be the result of that collaborative effort.

Lofgren also expresses her intention to introduce a final version of the bill to the House "soon" and reveals that Senator Ron Wyden (D-Ore.) is working on a version of the same bill to be introduced in the Senate.

"As SOPA showed, when the Internet speaks, lawmakers listen," wrote Lofgren at the end of her post on Reddit.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Sesame Street has transformed Downton Abbey's Violet Crawley and Charles Carson into Muppet versions of the Dowager Countess of Grantham and her butler. 

 

The Muppet duo star in Sesame Street's new "Upside Downton Abbey" skit, which will air during the show's season 43 premiere on Feb. 4 on PBS. The spoof literally turns the Golden Globe-winning British period drama on its head, causing dinner woes for the hungry Crawley.

Downton Abbey recently took home a SAG Award for Outstanding Performance by an Ensemble in a Drama Series, while Maggie Smith (who plays the Dowager Countess) won this year's Golden Globe for Best Performance by an Actress in a Supporting Role in a Series, Miniseries or Motion Picture Made for Television.

SEE ALSO: 'Downton Abbey' Hits iTunes Before Episodes Air on TV

Sesame Street's new season will feature a star-studded guest cast, including Kristen Bell, Jon Hamm, Matt Kemp, Joseph Gordon-Levitt, Melissa McCarthy, Paula Patton, Amy Ryan, Donald Glover, Kareem Abdul-Jabbar, Bobby Moynihan and Dax Shepard.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Researchers have created software that predicts when and where disease outbreaks might occur based on two decades of New York Times articles and other online data. The research comes from Microsoft and the Technion-Israel Institute of Technology.

The system could someday help aid organizations and others be more proactive in tackling disease outbreaks or other problems, says Eric Horvitz, distinguished scientist and codirector at Microsoft Research. I truly view this as a foreshadowing of whats to come, he says. Eventually this kind of work will start to have an influence on how things go for people. Horvitz did the research in collaboration with Kira Radinsky, a PhD researcher at the Technion-Israel Institute.

The system provides striking results when tested on historical data. For example, reports of droughts in Angola in 2006 triggered a warning about possible cholera outbreaks in the country, because previous events had taught the system that cholera outbreaks were more likely in years following droughts. A second warning about cholera in Angola was triggered by news reports of large storms in Africa in early 2007; less than a week later, reports appeared that cholera had become established. In similar tests involving forecasts of disease, violence, and a significant numbers of deaths, the systems warnings were correct between 70-90% of the time.

Horvitz says the performance is good enough to suggest that a more refined version could be used in real settings, to assist experts at, for example, government aid agencies involved in planning humanitarian response and readiness. Weve done some reaching out and plan to do some follow-up work with such people, says Horvitz.

The system was built using 22 years of New York Times archives, from 1986 to 2007, but it also draws on data from the web to learn about what leads up to major news events.

One source we found useful was DBpedia, which is a structured form of the information inside Wikipedia constructed using crowdsourcing, says Radinsky. We can understand, or see, the location of the places in the news articles, how much money people earn there, and even information about politics. Other sources included WordNet, which helps software understand the meaning of words, and OpenCyc, a database of common knowledge.

All this information provides valuable context thats not available in news article, and which is necessary to figure out general rules for what events precede others. For example, the system could infer connections between events in Rwandan and Angolan cities based on the fact that they are both in Africa, have similar GDPs, and other factors. That approach led the software to conclude that, in predicting cholera outbreaks, it should consider a country or citys location, proportion of land covered by water, population density, GDP, and whether there had been a drought the year before.

Horvitz and Radinsky are not the first to consider using online news and other data to forecast future events, but they say they make use of more data sources  more than 90 in total  which allows their system to be more general-purpose.

Theres already a small market for predictive tools. For example, a startup called Recorded Future makes predictions about future events harvested from forward-looking statements online and other sources, and it includes government intelligence agencies among its customers (see See the Future With a Search). Christopher Ahlberg, the companys CEO and cofounder, says that the new research is good work that shows how predictions can be made using hard data, but also notes that turning the prototype system into a product would require further development.

Microsoft doesnt have plans to commercialize Horvitz and Radinskys research as yet, but the project will continue, says Horvitz, who wants to mine more newspaper archives as well as digitized books.

Many things about the world have changed in recent decades, but human nature and many aspects of the environment have stayed the same, Horvitz says, so software may be able to learn patterns from even very old data that can suggest whats ahead. Im personally interested in getting data further back in time, he says.

This article originally published at MIT Technology Review here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Sony will launch a PS3 successor on February 20, the Wall Street Journal reports citing sources familiar with the matter.

Sony has officially announced an event on that date, saying the fans will "see the future" of PlayStation, but has not disclosed what, exactly, will be revealed at the event.

According to WSJ's sources, Sony will start selling its next-generation PlayStation later this year, competing for attention with Microsoft, which is also likely to launch a new gaming console in 2013.

With the PS4 (if that's what it'll be called), Sony plans to focus more on the social gaming aspects than on the machine's specifications. The next-gen PlayStation will reportedly keep an optical drive, but it will have an AMD CPU and graphics processor, replacing the Cell processor architecture from the previous models.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Paramount's new Star Trek app for iOS and Android is now available. The app is going to play an important role in Paramount's Super Bowl ad for the film Star Trek Into Darkness.

At CES 2013, Paramount and Qualcomm showed off the app, which uses context-aware technologies to bring specific information to users at specific times.

The app was designed to be a one-stop shop for Star Trek fans. It includes a news feed feature that shows off Star Trek news articles from around the web. When the film gets closer to release, users will also be able to pre-order tickets for the app from Fandango.

In addition to information, the app also has a series of various "missions" that fans can participate in to unlock access to exclusive images, video clips and the chance to win Star Trek prizes.

One mission is to watch the Star Trek Into Darkness teaser trailer. Using the app, users press a "listen" button and when held up against a computer screen or TV. The app then scans the soundwaves and unlocks content for users.

During the Super Bowl, fans are encouraged to use the app to "tag" (i.e., record the sound of) the Star Trek Into Darkness TV spot in order to unlock content, thus creating a second-screen ad experience during the big game.

The app also has a very slick image-recognition feature that lets users unlock images. The image scan functionality is really, really fast. Just focus your phone on an image  either physical or digital  and the app will recognize the image and unlock content.

There are physical missions too. In various cities across the U.S., users can earn points by visiting locations that are special to the Star Trek universe.

Also look for the app to integrate and pull in content from the "1701" viral campaign for the film.

When I was given a preview of the app last month, Paramount told me that the goal wasn't to create just another promotional app for a film, it also wanted to find a way to bridge the greater Star Trek fan experience in ways that will directly appeal to digital and social audiences.

As time goes on, more missions will be added to the app. "There will be a few big tentpole content experiences," a Paramount rep told us, "but there will be a steady flow of fresh content in the app through its theatrical release in May."

The experience also doesn't have to stop with just Star Trek Into Darkness. "This is the official Star Trek," Paramount said. "While we're focusing on the J.J. Abrams Star Trek universe, we're not necessarily limiting the app and its content to just this film."

If this campaign is successful, expect to see Paramount integrate these kinds of digital and social features into apps for future films.

The Star Trek app is now available in the App Store and Google Play.
--------------------------------------------------------------
As the Baltimore Ravens and San Francisco 49ers prepare to battle at the Super Bowl, there is another competition taking place off the football field.

Every year, millions of dollars are spent by brands to attract the attention of consumers 30-second ad spots at a time. One ad can change the fortunes of an organization for the better or for the worse. Some brands decide to unveil their ads early on YouTube while others wait for the big reveal on Super Bowl Sunday.

Join Mashable today at 2:30 p.m. EST for a Google+ Hangout where Mashable Business and Marketing Editor Todd Wasserman, Associate Business Editor Lauren Indvik, Mojiva Inc. VP for Global Research and Strategic Communications Amy Vale and Publicis Kaplan Thaler CTO and Managing Director, Publicis Modem Brian Skahan will discuss everything Super Bowl ads. They'll cover some of the most talked-about ads so far, the costs that go into producing a 30-second spot and whether brands should release their videos early.

Do you have any questions regarding this year's Super Bowl ads? Share your questions in the comments below and we may answer them during the live chat.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Ravens vs. 49ers. San Francisco vs. Baltimore. Harbaugh vs. Harbaugh.

Super Bowl XLVII is less than 48 hours away and there's little left to do other than channel all your rooting energy and focus toward one goal: the Vince Lombardi Trophy.

There is, however, one last thing you can do while killing time until the Big Game  compare the pre-game Spotify playlists of San Francisco and Baltimore's respective mayors.

Montell Jordan or MC Hammer? Kiss or Queen? Kanye or ... Kanye? These are the questions.

Both Baltimore Mayor Stephanie Rawlings-Blake and San Francisco Mayor Ed Lee provided Spotify with lists of Super Bowl-themed tunes, and we've got our hands on them here. Both mayors' lists include a mix of hip-hop and rock, while Lee throws in a couple old school throwbacks for good measure. Each mayor also reveals a soft spot for tunes with specific connections to their respective cities.

Now, without further ado, on to the music. Here's Mayor Lee's list:

Notable selections include: "Tony Montana," the 49ers special teams unit's kick off pump-up song; "Who's Got It Better," a track that's named after coach Jim Harbaugh's locker room rallying cry and comes from a local San Francisco rapper; "2 Legit 2 Quit," the Hammer classic Lee turned into a legendary political ad in 2011; and "San Francisco (Be Sure to Wear Flowers in Your Hair)," which he says is dedicated to Mayor Rawlings-Blake.

Notable selections here include: "Lose Yourself " and "Seven Nation Army," both of which are often heard inside the Ravens' home stadium; "Hot in Herre," Ray Lewis' traditional pre-game entrance music; and "Let Me Love You" by Mario, a Baltimore native who has done a lot of charity work in the city.

And there you have it. Just one question remains: Which Super Bowl mayor has the better musical taste? Give us your take in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Stock up on snack foods, prep the chicken wings and send for more beer  Super Bowl Sunday is here.

Whether you're a die-hard fan or a sucker for the commercials, you'll tune along with millions of others this Sunday.

SEE ALSO: Volkswagen's Super Bowl Ad Has a Jamaican Accent

In its 47 years, the Super Bowl has hosted its share of iconic fumbles and flops. From either the games or the extravagant half-time shows, we've pulled together eight memorable moments from Super Bowls past.

Click through the videos above and let us know your fondest Super Bowl memories in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A Turkish guard was killed on Friday when a suicide bomber struck the United States Embassy in Ankara, Turkey, according to reports. The number of casualties may increase as more details are uncovered.

"We are very sad of course that we lost one of our Turkish guards at the gate," U.S. Ambassador Francis Ricciardone told Reuters.

Footage of the aftermath was quickly uploaded to YouTube, seen above. The embassy also confirmed the attack via Twitter:
--------------------------------------------------------------
Twitter issued a blog post late Friday announcing a possible security breach and live attack that may have given hackers access to 250,000 users' information.

This week, we detected unusual access patterns that led to us identifying unauthorized access attempts to Twitter user data. We discovered one live attack and were able to shut it down in process moments later. However, our investigation has thus far indicated that the attackers may have had access to limited user information  usernames, email addresses, session tokens and encrypted/salted versions of passwords  for approximately 250,000 users.

Twitter's director of information security, Bob Lord, said in the post that the site has reset passwords and revoked session tokens for the accounts that may have been compromised.

He didn't say who may be behind the attack, but Lord wrote that the company is working with federal law enforcement to find and prosecute the attackers. "This attack was not the work of amateurs, and we do not believe it was an isolated incident," he wrote. "The attackers were extremely sophisticated, and we believe other companies and organizations have also been recently similarly attacked."

The attack on Twitter follows a recent string of high-profile sites, including the New York Times and Wall Street Journal, targeted by hackers. The news organizations said evidence showed the attacks originating in China.

Those users who may have been affected will receive, if they haven't yet, an email notifying them of the password reset.

"Twitter believes that your account may have been compromised by a website or service not associated with Twitter," the notification email says. "We've reset your password to prevent others from accessing your account."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Another Valentine's Day is upon us, and many of you are wondering how you can beat years past.

Not only have we rounded up the best apps and sites to create the ideal Valentine's Day for your special someone, but we'll show you how to use them creatively and unexpectedly. Ladies love surprises, and any of these tips would make her swoon.

So read on for romantic ways to woo your partner and ensure you have a truly memorable V-Day.

Planning ahead will show your lady you are thoughtful, that you are genuinely looking forward to celebrating the day with her. A simple message like, "Can't wait to see you tonight, beautiful" will go a long ways. Trust me.

I recommend sending a physical card, of course. Ladies are sentimental, and we love having physical mementos to remind us of a fun experience.

Although a little clich, every woman loves to receive flowers. The key is to make the flowers a surprise. Preparation is important here; florists can charge a ton if you make a last minute order on Valentine's Day, so schedule a delivery a few days beforehand, if possible.

Whether from her favorite romantic comedy or her favorite poem, ladies swoon over beautifully expressed displays of affection. Find a line you know she loves and memorize it, then say it to her over dinner. Or write a few of these lines on pieces of paper and slip one into her purse, one into her coat pocket or maybe a gym bag. This is just another little way you can bring a smile to your special someone's face.

Valentine's Day constantly gets knocked for being overpriced, but one way to beat the pricey restaurant rush is to avoid it completely by planning a delicious meal at home. A dinner at home will be much more intimate. Also, staying in will let you enjoy more time together without pesky commuting. Maybe choose something that you have been wanting to try for awhile, or spice up an all-time favorite.

I recommend choosing a meal equal to your cooking experience. For example, if you never ever cook you probably shouldn't try Julia Child's Bouef Bourguignon for your Valentine's meal. Maybe try experimenting with some new sides or seasonings, without the fear of messing up the entire dinner.

There aren't many holidays that beg for wine or champagne like Valentine's Day, but don't get intimidated by the overwhelming choices out there. Everyone can benefit from a sommelier's experience with the fantastic wine pairing apps in the market. One great rule of thumb, choose a wine with a similar intensity as the food you are preparing. You wouldn't want to serve a Pinot Noir with a NY steak; instead, choose a bolder and more flavor-forward wine, like Merlot or Zinfandel.

When I polled a group of friends about their ideal Valentine's Days, great conversation was the one constant among them all. If you go through all the preparations listed above but then have nothing to talk about over the delicious dinner you just made, the night is going to feel awkward. In order to avoid this situation, brush up on current events or peruse conversation-starters online.

There's something about beautiful music that strikes a certain chord with the ladies (pun intended). As far as planning the music for your special night is concerned, there are two basic ways you can go about it: 1) Draft a playlist of meaningful music that recalls experiences or inside jokes, or 2) Choose an artist or a mood and let the Internet create a playlist for you.

If you have an iPod dock or connected stereo, I recommend downloading the app and playing from there. Typically the speakers are better, and aesthetically it will look better in the room than an open laptop.

Additionally, I recommend playing an Internet-generated playlist while you are cooking and socializing before dinner, because you will probably just be chatting and distracted. Afterwards, I think it would be ideal to put on a more personalized playlist, so you could reminisce and relive some memories associated with old songs together over dinner (and wine, of course).

After a delicious dinner together, you are both probably feeling full and lethargic. Grab your coats and take a stroll hand in hand; the fresh air will revitalize you. Also, this time will allow you to decide what to do the rest of the evening...

Dinner and a movie is the go-to date scenario, but if you're looking for something a little different, find a local live music show. Whether it is a jazz quartet or a musician you both enjoy together, there's something inherently liberating about listening to live music.

If you're not into music, you can always try finding some stand-up comedy or a new art gallery you haven't been to.

I'm pretty sure you all know where I'm going with this one. If you and your lady are already intimate, try mixing things up in the bedroom. You've already had an incredible evening together; keep it going into the night by experimenting with some new positions. She'll be thrilled to know that you've thought ahead about how to please her, and I'm sure she'll return the favor.

Valentine's Day isn't a typical day, so your night shouldn't be typical either. Don't be afraid to step out of your comfort zone and try something new. If it doesn't go well, you and your partner can laugh about it later.

If you're having trouble getting the mood set, put this song on. If this doesn't help, I don't know what will.

So now you know how to create the perfect Valentine's Day using apps and websites. Pick and and choose the tips you like best, or use all 10 to really impress your special lady.

What do you think makes the perfect Valentine's Day? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
While it's traditional to ask someone "Be My Valentine" with flowers and chocolates, here at Mashable we prefer to make our affectionate declarations with unicorns, meme cats and 8-bit hearts.

SEE ALSO: 8 Adorable Pixel Heart Gifts for Valentine's Day

We have found 10 great geeky gifts for the special nerd in your life. Get your dork on and take a look through our superb selection of romantic geekery in the gallery above.

Please share in the comments below any other love-themed nerd gifts you've seen online this year.
--------------------------------------------------------------
As smartphone users know by now, monthly bills can be pricey. To help customers save on costs, Verizon Wireless announced on Friday two prepaid plans for those on a budget.

The plans  which are available for various 3G smartphones running Android, BlackBerry and iOS operating systems  include unlimited talk and texts on two data plans: 500 MB of data for $60 or 2GB of data for $70.

Although those price points are still more than T-Mobile, which offers a $30 plan for "unlimited" data on 3G, although the carrier will throttle connections that go over 5GB per month. T-Mobile's 3G network, which is based on HSPA technology, was even found to be faster than Verizon's 3G network (based on EV-DO) by PC World.

SEE ALSO: AT&T Will Buy Spectrum From Verizon For $1.9 Billion in Cash

You don't have to buy a new smartphone either: "A new smartphone isnt necessary to take advantage of the prepaid plans," Verizon said in a blog post. "Often, a no-longer-used smartphone sitting in a drawer at home can be activated on a prepaid plan with no annual contract."

For those that go over their data allowance within the 30-day period, 1GB of data can be purchased for $20. Adding money to your account can be done up to one month in advance.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Never underestimate the power of social media.

One woman in search of her biological parents found her apparent birth mother and father after posting a picture of herself on Facebook. On Jan. 27, Jenessa Simons shared a photo of herself holding a handwritten sign with her birth information.

Two days later, her birth mother reached out to her.

Simons' search began when she was 18, but she had to wait three years before submitting paperwork to the state. She decided to try her luck on Facebook while waiting, after seeing the success of posters who garnered 1 million likes for a puppy.

Her photo included what little information she knew: her birthday, hospital, parents' dates of birth and contact information. They were 16 at the time, and they named her Whitney. The image spread quickly, with more than 14,000 likes and 160,763 shares at time of writing.

On Tuesday, Simons announced on Facebook that she found her birth mother and, later, contact information for her birth father. A high school friend of the two contacted Simons' biological mother, who got in touch with the 21-year-old.

She was skeptical at first, reports an ABC affiliate, until the woman sent her baby pictures Simons' adoptive mother had given her.

There are numerous pages on Facebook geared toward those searching for their birth parents, and Simons hopes others will use the social network to reconnect with loved ones. In her post on Wednesday, she thanked those who shared her photo and story:

All of you are the reason that I can say I now know my birth family. Please, please continue to use this page to talk, to connect, and to build a community of birth parents and adoptees who want to come together, for whatever purpose ... Thank you, thank you, thank you. Without you, I would still be searching.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Newark, N.J., Mayor Cory Booker ticked off Frank Lautenberg by announcing he was running for the Democrat's Senate seat even before the 89-year old announced any retirement plans. Lautenberg and his New Jersey Democratic allies have been criticizing Booker's record as mayor and questioning his readiness for higher office, both publicly and anonymously, ever since.

But rather than strike back on TwitterBooker's preferred format for communication with the world-at-largehes been taking a very Zen-like approach, tweeting ancient proverbs and quotes about kindness.

Last week, Lautenberg compared Booker to one of his disobedient children, whom he loves but needs a spanking. A couple of days later, Lautenberg criticized Bookers job performance, telling National Journal that "hes got a lot of work to doa lot of work that should have been done and hasnt been done."

Later that evening, Booker tweeted an ancient proverb on mudslinging. He didn't mention Lautenberg or his comments, but it prompted BuzzFeeds Andrew Kaczynski to ponder whether it was a passive-aggressive tweet toward Frank Lautenberg?

On Thursday night, Lautenberg again slighted Booker during the New Jersey Chamber of Commerce annual dinner, saying: "I'm disappointed that Cory Booker couldn't be here tonight. I'd think spending time out of the city was one of his favorite activities." Later in the evening, someone tweeted at Booker that Lautenberg likes to take cheap shots. Booker responded by praising the senator:

Eight minutes later, he followed it up with this Dalai Lama quote:

And less than an hour later, he tweeted his own Bookerism on how to respond to political criticism:

This election isn't until 2014, so there is still plenty of time for meditative-like responses. Booker would be well served to keep a book of proverbs handy, but he may need to get a little more aggressive if he continues to be on the receiving end of intraparty attacks.

This article originally published at National Journal here
--------------------------------------------------------------
It can be tough to keep up with all the new apps released every week. But you're in luck  we take care of that for you, creating a roundup each weekend of our favorite new and updated apps.

This week we found an app that will help make sure your home theater is set up perfectly for the big game, and another that will help you find new friends to have dinner with if you'd rather go out.

A new app for businesses helps owners learn more about their recent and most faithful customers, and a new Star Trek app awards fans for their support with exclusive content.

Take a look at the gallery above for a look at this week's highlights.

Still looking for more? Check out last week's Apps You Don't Want To Miss for more great apps worth a look.

Think we left a one off the list? Let us know about your own app highlights from this week in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
When BlackBerry set out to design the phones that would take the company into the next decade, it faced a big challenge. The flagship device of the new BlackBerry 10 platform needed to simultaneously satisfy what today's customers want in a smartphone while at the same time stay true to the essence of BlackBerry  which, if the company's market over the last few years is any indication, customers didn't want.

The man tasked with redesigning BlackBerry phones was Todd Wood, the company's senior vice president of design. Leading industrial design at BlackBerry since 2006, Wood is a veteran of industrial design, previously doing design work for Nokia and, before that, Nortel. Mashable sat down with Wood this week while he was in town for the BlackBerry 10 launch.

Wood speaks with the same thoughtfulness of other design leaders, such as Apple's Jony Ive, but with none of the showiness. He's been with BlackBerry (formerly Research In Motion) for long enough to see its fortunes rise and fall. As he describes the Z10, you feel that he's heard enough praise and criticism about BlackBerry's products that it all just bounces off.

SEE ALSO: The First BlackBerry 10 Phone Is Exceptional, But Perplexing

When I bring up the BlackBerry Storm  the company's previous (failed) attempt to create a touchscreen phone  Wood doesn't bristle or even acknowledge the disaster it was. He simply describes certain design elements that a similar to the BlackBerry Z10, BlackBerry's new flagship phone. And he makes them sound kind of cool.

"There's still the 'waterfall' that was pronounced on Storm  these flowing surfaces," Wood says as he points to the top and bottom of the Z10, which are ever-so-slightly sloped. "We've brought that with the margins [on the Z10], but it's very subtle. There are some principles that we carry forward, but nothing's been cut and pasted."

As CEO Thorsten Heins described at the launch, BlackBerry faced a decision three years ago: adopt someone else's mobile OS or go it alone. It opted for the latter, acquiring QNX software in 2010 and adapting it to build first the PlayBook, then BlackBerry 10.

Completely switching mobile platforms was risky and extremely challenging, but it was also a huge design opportunity, says Wood.

"We were starting the platform from scratch. We wanted to build on the design DNA [BlackBerry] had, and we wanted to keep certain attributes  the fit to face, fit to hand  the general comfort of the device, the build quality of the device."

Key decisions about the device itself depended on how the software worked. There's no home button on the Z10, for example  a user controls basic functions (like switching between apps) via gestures, such as swiping up from the edge of the screen.

Much of the design was influenced by the need for easy, one-handed operation.

"How can you design a system where you could multitask more elegantly?" Wood asks, rhetorically. "It's not unlike shuffling cards. And we started to realize you can really do that with one hand and one thumb.

"Almost every phone has a UI paradigm of 'You go home to go somewhere else.' Here you can flow from app to app."

The phone has a semi-rubberized back, a material that BlackBerry refers to as "soft touch." The company has used it before  in the trim of the latest Bold smartphone, for example. But in the Z10, Wood's team added a perforated pattern.

"Soft touch is a special coating that we use," he explains. "It provides grip, and it's very silky. What we did was add some microtexture to it, which is something that you don't notice until you pick the phone up and run your hand across it. It's a nice subtlety."

If you've ever thought the physical buttons on Samsung's phones felt cheap, or the iPhone's too bland, you'll appreciate RIM's contoured buttons for volume and media playback. The volume buttons have a slight notch on one side, and the play/pause button has a small upraised piece  all detectable by touch.

"We wanted to keep them really precise and clean," says Wood. "We sculpted the keys so it's always really apparent without looking, almost like braille, exactly where you are."

Wood also played a role in choosing the system font for BlackBerry 10, which is called Slate. Designed by Canadian Rod McDonald (who also designed the font for Maclean's, one of Canada's top national news magazines), BlackBerry chose Slate for its legibility, Wood says.

"Slate really works for screen and print, so we decided to adopt it. When you have such a high-res display, you get really accurate letterforms. When you have a really great font design, that improves productivity. You're not squinting, and letters are not misinterpreted."

Of course, Wood also led the team that designed the Q10, the BlackBerry 10 phone with a physical QWERTY keyboard, coming about a month after the Z10 debuts. Although the Q10 borrows more design DNA from the BlackBerry of old, BB10 afforded some big departures as well.

For starters, the Q10's keyboard is straight whereas most previous BlackBerry phone keyboards had a curve to them  which even led to the company calling one of its product lines the Curve.

"That is a big change," Wood says of straightening out the keyboard for the Q10. "It was very logical, but also it signals 'This is different.' And there's no performance tradeoff with it being straight  we've measured it."

Besides being straight, the keyboard is larger than the ones on previous BlackBerry phones.

"What allows us to get that extra size is we've replaced the home key, the back key and the send/end keys, since everything in BB10 is controlled by gestures and direct manipulation of the data. Without the curve, each key is the same size, and they're 3% larger."

No BlackBerry phone would be complete without the trademark  and at times notorious  blinking red LED that indicates a message is waiting. Wood says the attribute is hard-wired into BlackBerry design at this point and at no point did the company consider ditching it.

"That's probably the strongest, most iconic element of the DNA we carry forward," he says. "It's origins were 'Let's save on battery life,' and it continues today. For us, we call it the spark, or the splat. It's a hallmark of BlackBerry it makes some people excited, and it makes some people neurotic, but it's up to end users to manage that."

How do you like the design of BlackBerry's new phones? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Let's get real: Deep down, we all really want to be astronauts when we grow up. Probably because we never really outgrow the awe we first felt for outer space; the vastness, the infinite possibilities for exploration, the unknown.

More importantly, we wonder, what would life in space be like for our gravity-normalized minds and bodies? On Wednesday, Jan. 30, some 200 Canadian elementary school children gathered in the country's Aviation and Space Museum in Ottawa to find out.

Cmdr. Chris Hadfield, the first Canadian commander of the International Space Station, was on hand, live from space, to answer any and all questions the kids could come up with about what it's like to inhabit the endlessly fascinating, zero-gravity world outside the earth's atmosphere.

SEE ALSO: Astronaut Captures Dramatic Pics of Australian Bushfires From Space

The conversation's moderator, David Johnston, the governor general of Canada, fielded all kinds of questions from the curious kids, who wondered about every little thing in space, from what happens when you sneeze to how you wash your hands.

When one child asked what would happen to a marshmallow outside the space station, Hadfield reminded the rapt students that, in the vacuum of space, where it's approximately 300 degrees Fahrenheit in the sun and -184 in the shade, a marshmallow would swell up and go gooey or freeze, like a snowball.

But, he cheerfully cautioned, "If we had a marshmallow on the inside of the space ship, I'd eat it."

Hadfield, who said he exercises two hours every day to stay strong, also tapped into that preternatural fascination with space we all possess, telling the kids that floating through it is "like magic" and that spending five months outside the confines of gravity is a "tremendous gift."

To see the highlights of what everyday life is like in space, from washing your hair to making a burrito, check out our video, above. To see the complete Q&A, and hear some adorable interactions with the inquisitive students, we've embedded the full video below.

And, remember, you're never too old for Space Camp.

Video courtesy of YouTube, Canadian Space Agency; Image courtesy of Flickr, NASA Goddard Photo and Video
--------------------------------------------------------------
We're already a month into the new year, and the tech and social media worlds have seen some awesome developments. Before you settle down to watch the Super Bowl this weekend, we've rounded up Mashable's top picks of the week.

There are tons of digital media resources here  we've got you covered on everything from Apple's new iOS 6.1 release to some apps to help you plan your Valentine's Day. Check them out below.

For more social media news and resources, you can follow Mashable's social media channel on Twitter and become a fan on Facebook.

For more business news and resources, you can follow Mashable's business channel on Twitter and become a fan on Facebook.

For more tech news and resources, you can follow Mashable's tech channel on Twitter and become a fan on Facebook.
--------------------------------------------------------------
When Alabama high-school teacher and football coach Bob Grisham went on a rant against "fat butt Michelle Obama" and "queers" in a classroom, little did he know that an unidentified student was recording audio of his remarks.

Grisham is still teaching psychology at Lauderdale County High School in Rogersville, Alabama, but according to Times Daily, schools superintendent Jennifer Grey says the local school board has plans for a meeting within the next two weeks to figure out what to do about his politically incorrect diatribe.

Grisham, head football coach of the school's team that went to the state semifinals this year, has worked at that school since 1991. Apparently, that long career and winning football season gave him a tremendous amount of confidence.

However, teachers who have a tendency to make hateful and homophobic remarks need to remember that most of their students have recording devices in their possession.

As you can hear in the clip above, not only did Grisham unleash a series of intemperate remarks, but he didn't correct any of his students who added additional racist comments in response.

Grisham: Like those lunches - you get 600-calorie lunches - you know who's behind that? Grisham: And look  look at her. She looks like she weighs 185 or 190. She's overweight. Grisham: I'm serious. Y'all, our country is, is, is going in the wrong direction. Different voice: It's going straight to hell. Grisham: You'd better be aware of it. And people running around like, oh it'll get better, it'll get better. No, it ain't gone get no better until things change. I can give you example after example of that, but I don't want to use any local names to give you examples. Things won't get better until there's a change in some areas and stuff. And you know what his platform was? Change. We're gone change. We're all  aw it's OK . for  and  y'all can get pissed off at me or not. You can go tell the principal, you can call the superintendent and tell her. I don't believe in queers, I don't like queers. I don't  I don't hate them as a person but what they do is wrong, it's an abomination against God. I don't like being around queers.

Is this what passes for education in U.S. schools? While this couldn't be a widespread phenomenon, we have to wonder how often this type of commentary finds its way into classrooms. Please let us know what you think in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Finnish multinational communications giant Nokia is set to develop graphene, a "super-material" that will be the strongest in the world, thanks to a $1.35 billion grant from the European Union.

The grant comes from the EU's future and emerging technologies program (FET), whose mission is "to promote high risk research, offset by potential breakthrough with high technological or societal impact."

Nokia is part of the Graphene Flagship Consortium, a group of industry leaders "looking to improve the world using graphene," which is the name of the super-material being developed by the group.

Graphene is super-thin  only one atom thick  and the company claims it's 300 times stronger than steel. "Oh, and it's also the lightest and best intrinsic conductor, too," according to a statement by Nokia.

Henry Tirri, EVP, CTO of Nokia, noted that the company has "deep roots in the field  we first started working with graphene already in 2006. Since then, we have come to identify multiple areas where this material can be applied in modern computing environments."

Tirri also stressed that the research the grant would foster is of vital importance: "Weve done some very promising work so far, but I believe the greatest innovations have yet to be discovered.

The EU's hefty investment in the graphene consortium will be spread over a period of 10 years. For more about the material and its potential uses in the consumer market, check out the video above.
--------------------------------------------------------------
If you can't make it all the way to Gobbler's Knob in Punxsutawney, Pa. on Feb. 2, don't worry, you can still celebrate Groundhog Day this year.

We dug up 10 fun Etsy finds that celebrate both the traditional weather forecasting event, and the excellent Bill Murray film.

SEE ALSO: 9 Star Wars Tech Accessories From a Galaxy Far, Far Away

So, campers, rise and shine, and don't forget your booties as you take a look through our gallery of groundhog-themed goodies. Please be sure as heckfire to let us know in the comments which items you like.
--------------------------------------------------------------
If you've been anywhere near the North American continent for the past month, you probably know that the clash of the brothers Harbaugh known as the Super Bowl is upon us.

With it has come the annual crush of slick, snappy advertisements as marketing departments everywhere bring out their best and brightest (and empty their bank accounts) to grab the attention of millions of eyeballs that will be glued to television screens Sunday. Yes, there's a marketing super bowl going on at the same time as the game.

We know it's a big day for you, marketing professionals, and in that spirit Insightera has put together a Super Bowl infographic, below, detailing not the impending showdown between Ravens and 49ers, but the daily battles you face in marketing.

As the graphic illustrates, you're out there every day, relying on your MVPs: SEO and social media. Like Flacco and Lewis out on the astroturf, they're the backbone of any solid marketing strategy.

SEE ALSO: YouTube: Super Bowl Ads Shown Before the Game Get 600% More Views

And no team is going to get its hands on that storied Lombardi trophy of advertising  the Clio  without a reliable lineup of crackerjack playmakers. When the going gets rough, the offensive line of PR professionals is there, taking the hits from linebackers charging toward the QB, the heart of the team, the director of marketing.

Some things just belong together. Peanut butter and jelly, the Super Bowl and chicken wings. But what would the big day be without its marketing blitz?
--------------------------------------------------------------
Pics or it didn't happen. That's what some on the Internet called out after President Obama told the New Republic, in an interview released on January 27, that he had gone skeet shooting at Camp David.

Obama shoots skeet a lot. "Yes, in fact, up at Camp David, we do skeet shooting all the time," the President told Franklin Foer and Chris Hughes. He went on to talk about his respect for hunting culture and traditions of the United States, and touched on gun control and the his attempts to bridge the ideology gaps between Republicans and Democrats during his second term.

SEE ALSO: Gun Control Petition is Most Popular Ever Posted to White House Site

In response to some commenters disbelief and inability to imagine the President shooting at clay pigeons, the White House quickly posted this photo on their official Flickr account.

The photo was taken on Saturday, August 4, 2012 at Camp David. Looks like President Obama is a lefty and has a tight square stance. Nice shot, Mr. President.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Anyone who's taken a midsummer stroll through Manhattan might appreciate this. Light-colored, heat-reflecting asphalt and paint makes a parking lot cooler by 40 degrees Fahrenheit (22 degrees Celsius) on a hot day.

The idea of painting city sidewalks, walls and roofs white isn't new, but we happened to run into a nice demonstration of it recently. The Lawrence Berkeley National Laboratory in Northern California has painted one of its parking lots with several commercially available heat-reflecting coatings, to show what a difference they can make and to test how they'll fare over time.

In general, heat-reflecting surfaces keep cities more comfortable, reduce residents' electricity use for air conditioning and reduce the amount of heat that cities reflect back into the atmosphere, contributing to global warming.

They can even improve air quality. "Across an entire city, small changes in air temperature could be a huge benefit as it can slow the formation of smog," Haley Gilbert, a research assistant at the Berkeley Lab who studies heat in cities, said in a statement.

White-painted roofs usually get the most attention, but paler pavements could make a big difference, too, researchers say. Pavement accounts for 35-50% of the surfaces in city, according to the Berkeley Lab. Since city dwellers spend much more time on sidewalks than they do on roofs, paler pavement would be an improvement they could immediately appreciate.

This article originally published at TechNewsDaily here
--------------------------------------------------------------
A short time ago, on a chicken ranch not so far away, Lucasfilm's biggest in-house Star Wars fan began to turn his private collection of Star Wars stuff into a nonprofit museum.

His name was Steve Sansweet, a former Wall Street Journal reporter whose life was changed forever when he saw a press preview of the original Star Wars  now known as Episode IV  in May 1977. An inveterate collector of robot toys, baseball cards and swizzle sticks, Sansweet soon channeled all of his passion into corralling as many Star Wars-related items as he could.

After writing the first edition of the Star Wars Encyclopedia, Sansweet was offered a job at Lucasfilm as Director of Content Management and Head of Fan Relations in 1996. He organized the first annual global gathering of the faithful, known as Celebration, in 1999. By the time Sansweet stepped down from his full-time role in 2011, George Lucas himself had dubbed Sansweet "the ultimate fan."

It's not hard to see why; Sansweet's collection contains much that even Lucas doesn't own. It's a riotous melange of bootleg merchandise, fan-built labors of love, movie-set memorabilia (Sansweet rushed in to get the remnants of Qui-Gon Jinn after the Jedi master's corpose was burned in Phantom Menace, to take one small example) and just about every commercial Star Wars item known to man, woman and (especially) children.

Sansweet bought a former chicken ranch in Petaluma, Calif., a short drive from Skywalker Ranch. Its long barn was perfect for housing his increasingly unwieldy collection. At first, he would just show friends around  but fans were clamoring to get in, and it was expensive to maintain.

"I made the plunge and decided to invest a good deal of my money," Sansweet says. "It would be not just a warehouse for my stuff, but a real look at Star Wars through the prism of merchandising." Two good friends, Anne Neumann and Consetta Parker, helped convince him to form a nonprofit and now help him run it.

Rancho Obi-Wan officially opened its doors in 2011; its staff of three is constantly tweaking and adding new components to what has become a three-hour tour. (Yes, a three-hour tour.) It isn't cheap, or easy to book  tours start at $200 for two people, and Sansweet only does a handful a week  but it is eminently customizable.

"It's not just a place to walk through, it's about sharing my stories," he says. "The human stories: 'I was really lucky to get that item, but boy, I really screwed up with that one at that price'. It's always different depending on who it is; what their level of Star Wars is; whether there are kids along."

Sansweet gave Mashable the works: a full tour of the library containing just about every piece of printed material and poster relating to the franchise, and an extended look at the museum itself.

Check out our gallery above  one of the largest we've ever done  for some of our highlights and the stories behind them. (It was a tough choice to keep the number as low as 98; we were reluctant to leave 200 pictures on the cutting room floor.)

To book a tour or become a member of the nascent nonprofit, head over to Ranchoobiwan.org.

And if you get a chance to go, check out the shack out back, next to Yoda Trail and Jedi Way. Why is the tumbledown thing out there? Because a true fan never throws away his cardboard backs.
--------------------------------------------------------------
If you've ever wanted to learn how to game the French lottery of 1728 (and who hasn't, amirite?), you've come to the right place. This week's edition of Reddit Facts has some delightful tidbits about the Fab Four, a famous photograph and a funky fruit.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Working for a startup has become the new hip thing to do; working a corporate job just doesn't have the same appeal these days. Fortunately, 65% of respondents in a recent HireArt survey of 147 startups agree that recruiting is one of their top three priorities right now. However, the survey also revealed that 50% of candidates don't know what it means to actually work for a startup.

Co-founder of HireArt Elli Sharef commented on the disparity between expectations and reality for candidates applying to startups: "People think these days they want to work at a startup. It's a new hot thing. There is an ethos, like 'Oh startups are so sexy,' but people don't really understand what it means. It's a ton of grunt work, the pay is really low, a lot of startups are pressure cookers and you have to achieve results quickly. Yeah, there are some really fun parts to it, but one of the things we found is that people aren't realistic about what working for a startup really is."

So how do we close the gap between the glamorized perception and the reality of working at a startup? Below we will delve deeper into HireArt's findings and explore the five most scarce skills in startups, and how to make sure you're a good fit for a specific company.

For those pursuing a job at a startup, knowing the skills that are difficult to fill could be an advantage; if you have certain skill sets that are high in demand they will set you apart from the competition. The five most difficult skills to fill at startups are described below.

1. Sales Experience: Most startups are selling something, and they often need effective salespeople. But very few experienced salespeople are applying to work at startups. In the absence of previous experience, startups also look for people with the right attitude for sales: self-starter, high energy and persistent.

2. Marketers With SEO/SEM Skills: Although there are many people looking for marketing and social media positions at startups, very few appear to have the necessary qualifications. Chief among these skills is SEO/SEM, which any startup with a website (every company ever) would like to have.

3. Data Analysis: If entrepreneurship is a management science, then knowing what to measure and how to measure it is important. But rarely do startups get candidates that have appropriate experience to conduct data analysis for starting companies.

4. Engineering Experience: Plain and simple. Engineers are the most coveted hires at startups and that still has not changed. For web development, most startups are looking for Ruby or Python skills, while app-based products vie for iOS and Android developers.

5. Ability to Wear Multiple Hats: If you are not an engineer, it is very helpful and nearly necessary to have at least two of these skills. Startups are looking for people who have experience in different areas and give intelligent opinions about nearly everything, so the more specialty skills you have, the more valuable you are.

Although it is important to be skilled in many different areas, Elli Sharef recommends picking one skill that you are particularly good at and emphasizing it: "Some people we interview come in and say 'I'm an awesome marketer, but in addition I'm really great at business development, and by the way I'm also really wonderful at design, and I also know how to code.' No, clearly you aren't excellent at all those things. Pick one thing you're good at, and emphasizing that will help you land a job at a startup for sure."

If you've got a few of these skills, it looks like you're in a great position to apply to a startup. However, finding the right company is extremely important. In regards to employee retention, 25% of companies reported losing 50% or more of their non-technical hires within six months. Of the candidates who left within six months, companies said the biggest reason was "bad fit."

In order to decrease this high turnover rate, Elli Sharef shared some insight into how you can see if you're a good fit for the company: "Envision a day in the life, and ask the founder: What will I really be doing all day? Break it down to me in terms of hours. And really think that through. Also really know yourself, and really know what a startup is before you jump into it."

So, before you decide to work at a startup, make sure you have the necessary skills and a realistic mindset about what your day-to-day will look like. Also, do some soul-searching to make sure that a startup is where you really want to be, and that the company is the right fit for you.

What else do you think you should know before applying to a startup? Let us know in the comments.

The Mashable Job Board connects job-seekers across the U.S. with unique career opportunities in the digital space. While we publish a wide range of job listings, we have selected a few job opportunities from the past two weeks to help get you started. Happy hunting!
--------------------------------------------------------------
With Sunday's Super Bowl XLVII, even the non-sports fans in the office have become interested in the financial aspects of American football's biggest game, which also happens to be the single biggest-gambling day of the year  last year, more than $93 million was on the line in the United States, and some estimate that world-wide gambling on the game could be as much as $8 billion.

We're not football experts here, however, so if you really want to risk your hard-earned lucre on Super Bowl 2013 betting, listen to this guy. But we can compare the Las Vegas odds of various Super Bowl happenings with the InTrade odds of real world events to put everything in perspective.

Note that sports gambling markets are far more liquid than InTrade and thus provide more accurate odds. With apologies to Nate Silver and professional gamblers everywhere, here we go:

The odds of the San Francisco 49ers winning the Super Bowl by more than 4 points (62%) are slightly better than the odds of the movie Argo winning the Academy Award for Best Picture (60.7%). The odds of the Baltimore Ravens beating the spread  either by winning outright or losing by less than four points  (41%) aren't as good as the chances of the Republican party winning the 2016 presidential election (47.4%). The odds that the first pass thrown by 49ers quarterback Colin Kaepernick will be incomplete or intercepted by the other team (40%) are the same as the odds of the Dow Jones closing at or above 14,250 by the end of February (40%). The odds that the first score of the game will be a 49ers touchdown pass (18.2%) are roughly the same as the odds that Germany's Social Democratic Union will win the country's chancellorship in the 2013 German federal elections (18.5%) The odds that the player to score the first touchdown will be Baltimore running back Ray Rice (9%) are about the same as the odds that Mario Monti will be elected Italy's Prime Minister in 2013 (9%). The odds that Baltimore wide receiver Torrey Smith will win the game's Most Valuable Player award (5%) are roughly the same as the odds that Japan will announce that has acquired a nuclear weapon by the end of 2013 (5%). The odds that the game's Most Valuable Player will thank his family before anyone else (14%) are about the same as the odds that Ang Lee will win the Academy Award for Best Director for Life of Pi (14%). Notably, the two teams are coached by brothers, Jim and John Harbaugh. The odds that Jim will be shown on television before John (55.5%) are slightly better than the odds that Bashar al-Assad won't be Syria's president by the end of June 2013 (55%). The odds that Gatorade dumped on the winning coach will be lime green (15%) are slightly more favorable than the chances that the United States and/or Israel will launch an air strike against Iran before the end of June (14%).

And the comparison to the the odds that the United Kingdom's economy will go into recession in 2013 (77%)? No one will take odds like that gambling on sports.

This article originally published at Quartz here
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Baltimore Ravens square off with the San Francisco 49ers at Super Bowl XLVII on Sunday. Competitiveness between the opposite coast cities has already inspired plenty of trash talking between Baltimoreans and San Franciscans  Charm City versus the City by the Bay.

Football is a great American pastime and all, but imagine if the Super Bowl took a pop culture twist. Instead of burly men in tight pants, each city was represented by a television show that took place in their respective cities.

Imagine no more because we've matched up the Baltimore and San Francisco's most representative TV shows  The Wire and Full House, of course  in a battle for Super Bowl rivalry bragging rights. That's right  The Wire and Full House, in the same video.

Trash talking hits a new level when Omar Little's "you come at the king, you best not miss" faces Stephanie Tanner's "how rude." Barksdale versus Gladstone, Prop Joe versus Kimmy Gibler  have mercy.

Let's all cheer for a Chicago Bears, Miami Dolphins Super Bowl next year so we can see a Perfect Strangers, Dexter mashup.

BONUS: The 10 Best Super Bowl Ads of All Time
--------------------------------------------------------------
It was another exciting week in tech, with a major announcement  the new BlackBerry 10, and a slew of other great stories.

The biggest story of the week was probably the launch of a new flagship phone, the touchscreen-only BlackBerry 10. The product that the company, now named simply BlackBerry, has bet its entire future on. The other two product announcements were not as earth-shattering perhaps, but still significant: Apple confirmed it's launching a 128GB iPad and Nokia launched a Spotify competitor.

It was a great week for science and robotics too. NASA unveiled a bot that will mine the moon, and we had the chance to see how powerful the highest resolution camera  mounted on a drone  can be.

Oh, and if you like drones, it's your lucky week  a small startup announced a mini-drone designed to hover over your shoulder and follow you around all day, taking pictures and videos.

This week, we also have our full comprehensive review of Office 2013 and some updates on the exciting Google Glass project.

Take a look at our Top 10 Tech This Week to see what else happened this week in the world of technology.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Being a Twitter sports pundit is a game within the game. Fans of social media and sports know that chatter about the game on Twitter is often as entertaining as the game itself.

If the ref makes an awful call, a coach does something stupid (or really cool) or the commentators miss a beat, someone will immediately and succinctly let them hear about it on Twitter. Conversely, Twitter is also a place to praise an excellent performance  though much less often.

SEE ALSO: 36% of Viewers Will Use Second Screen During Super Bowl

Scroll through the gallery above for 10 Twitter accounts to follow during the Super Bowl. Most were selected because they're funny  some intentionally, some by accident. Enjoy a sample of their work, follow the links to their pages and hit that follow button.

Did we leave out one of your favorites? Who do you like to follow during a big game?
--------------------------------------------------------------
Sometimes parents just don't understand. (Modern technology, that is.)

SEE ALSO: More Sunday Comics

While '80s video game graphics may seem ancient to today's younger generations, nostalgia has given 8-bit a place in web culture once more. Retro will always be hip.

Comic illustration by Toothpaste For Dinner. Published with permission; all rights reserved.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Former Vice President Al Gore spoke in favor of leveraging the Internet against big business and politicians, saying corporations have "hacked" democracy in the U.S.

Discussing his new book, The Future, Gore explained to the BBC that global electronic communications is one of the six drivers of change, and it's necessary to combat big money.

"Our democracy has been hacked," Gore says. "The operating system has been taken over and turned to uses that are somewhat different than the ones our founders intended to emerge."

His proposed solution is to use the Internet as a force of good to revitalize democracy, emphasizing the prominence of fact-checking and citizen journalists. Gore touched on the rise of bloggers and their impact on policy debates, as well as younger generations being empowered by new forms of communication.

Gore, who's had his share of influence on the government's view of the Internet, said that people must use its power to hold politicians accountable.

His latest book discusses mobile phones and the Internet in developing countries. While it poses the opportunity for robust democratic discourse; these growths present new issues of cybersecurity and privacy.

What do you think of Gore's ideas to use the Internet to save democracy? Let us know your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Unlike recent Super Bowl national anthem performances from other musicians, Alicia Keys opted to play piano while singing "The Star-Spangled Banner."

Viewers on Twitter had mixed reviews for Keys, who just days before game day was appointed BlackBerry's global creative director.

Keys is the first artist to use a piano during a national anthem performance at a Super Bowl since Billy Joel in 2007.

Kelly Clarkson sang the national anthem in 2012, a year after Christina Aguilera flubbed the song's lyrics at the previous Super Bowl (watch below). Other past performers include Whitney Houston, Garth Brooks, Mariah Carey, Faith Hill, Neil Diamond, Diana Ross, Jewel, Harry Connick Jr., Dixie Chicks and Cher.

Keys, a 14-time Grammy winner, will embark on a North American concert tour in March. Her fifth studio album, Girl on Fire, debuted atop the Billboard 200 albums chart in November.

SEE ALSO: Alicia Keys Joins Pinterest With Boards for Individual Songs
--------------------------------------------------------------
Alicia Keys woke up on Super Bowl Sunday and apparently had the urge to tweet, sharing a rehearsal photo of herself behind a piano in an empty Mercedes-Benz Superdome.

Keys, who was just named Blackberry's global creative director, will sing "The Star-Spangled Banner" before kickoff and the photo suggests she'll do so while playing piano.

If Keys does pound the keys tonight, she will be the first musician to do so during a Super Bowl national anthem performance since Billy Joel in 2007 (see video in gallery below).

Update: Keys also tweeted the red dress she'll wear during her performance.

Kelly Clarkson sang the national anthem in 2012, a year after Christina Aguilera flubbed the song's lyrics at the previous Super Bowl (watch below). Other past performers include Whitney Houston, Garth Brooks, Mariah Carey, Faith Hill, Neil Diamond, Diana Ross, Jewel, Harry Connick Jr., Dixie Chicks and Cher.

Keys, a 14-time Grammy winner, will embark on a North American concert tour in March. Her fifth studio album, Girl on Fire, debuted atop the Billboard 200 albums chart in November.

SEE ALSO: Alicia Keys Joins Pinterest With Boards for Individual Songs

Keys is set to perform the national anthem at 6:30 p.m. ET on CBS.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The magazine industry had little to celebrate at the close of 2012, with ad pages down 8.2% across the industry, according to figures published by the Publishers Information Bureau. But Linda Wells, founding editor of Allure magazine, and Agnes Chapski, its publisher, did. The Conde Nast-owned title finished the year with ad pages up 18.5% from 2011. Why, with the proliferation of free online makeup content on beauty blogs and YouTube channels, is a print magazine doing so well?

Allure's success can be attributed partly to a favorable advertising environment. Across 12 print advertising categories, only two  toiletries/cosmetics and apparel/accessories  grew in the first quarter of 2012, up 7.1% and 13.2% year-over-year, respectively, according to digital/luxury research firm L2. That was bad news for magazines with a diverse base of advertisers, but great for Allure, Colin Gilbert, a strategic consultant at L2, points out. Allure primarily covers one industry  beauty  and the beauty industry is Allure's biggest advertiser.

But Allure's own efforts to experiment, both in advertising and editorial, deserve to be commended as well, industry observers say.

"Allure is seen as an innovator when it comes to blurring the line between editorial content and commerce," Gilbert contends, citing Allure's mobile scan-to-win giveaways and e-commerce integration with Quidsi-owned BeautyBar.

As part of a website redesign in 2011, "Buy" buttons began appearing on products recommended by Allure's Product Finder tool, and later on content and slideshows as well. Though it's a year-and-a-half old, it's still one of the most seamless e-commerce integrations I've seen to date: Every product you click to "Buy" is saved to an on-site shopping cart, and you're able to check out at a single retailer at the end. About half of the products on the site are available for purchase, according to Wells.

Samir Husni, director of Magazine Innovation Center at the University of Mississippi, points to the strength of Allure's editorial product. "Allure is much more than a beauty handbook ... every issue is sufficient and relevant," he says. "Its achievement is another reminder that no matter how much beauty and fashion sites proliferate, there is still a space for something delivered in a complete package."

Wells herself attributes Allure's success to a strong editorial vision, tailored for different platforms  print, smartphone, tablet and web  that is then customized for advertisers. In a sit-down interview last month, Wells acknowledged that print still "leads the way" because, with a circulation of 1.1 million, it is the platform through which the brand is best known.

"But one thing can't have all the attention," says Wells. "It used to be that if you couldn't fit something in the magazine, you put it on the website. We're not doing that anymore."

Wells believes that what works well for Allure the magazine doesn't always  or even usually  work on the web, and vice versa. What people want on the website are not necessarily the glossy, slick photo spreads published in the magazine, but answers to specific questions, she says.

Allure.com's cornerstone offering is its product reviews  there are more than 4,300 of them  which users can access from search engines (both third party and Allure.com's own), and through its Beauty Product Finder tool, launched in 2011. The tool, featured prominently on Allure's homepage, is a diagnostic questionnaire, helping users find the best products for their hair or skin needs based on their respective styles, budgets and concerns. In addition to product reviews, visitors can also find brief news items and features, often presented as slideshow lists, such as "How to Shop for Skin-Care Products" and "The 13 Best Celebrity Cuts Right Now."

Although the magazine and website take different approaches to content, ideas from the website often fuel concepts for print, and sometimes it's the other way around. For example, when Allure saw how enthusiastically web readers responded to content about curly hair, the magazine decided to do a photo story about embracing, rather than straightening, curly hair, something it hadn't done in perhaps half a decade, says Wells.

One other thing that differentiates Allure's website from the magazine, as Gilbert mentioned, is the ability to buy what you read about. E-commerce integration comes with its own set of risks  namely, maintaining readers' trust. When a "Buy" button is placed beneath a positive review, wary readers are apt to question the integrity of that review. (Wells says the magazine always reviews a product whether or not it's sold by e-commerce partner BeatyBar.) "We're not in e-commerce business to make a killing on e-commerce; it's not a part of our revenue strategy," says Wells, noting that readers have long torn out pages of the magazine and used them to find products in stores. "That isn't ideal  this is really there to complete the user experience."

Like other editors, Wells, who previously covered beauty and food for The New York Times and its magazine, has to balance editorial independence with advertisers' needs. Editorial independence is "something we've fought really hard to establish, and we work hard and fight for it every day."

It's that very quality that Wells believes has fortified the Allure brand against the onslaught of beauty blogs, YouTube channels and other forms of free online beauty content. "There's a lot of beauty content on the web," Wells acknowledges. "What really distinguishes us is that we've been doing this for 21 years. We are experts, we consult experts and we produce really trusted content. There is a level of integrity and trust that goes into everything we do, that distinguishes us on the web ... no one here can work for a cosmetics company. And there are certainly bloggers who accept money to blog about products, but we don't do that."

As a frequent consumer of beauty content, I agree that Allure's knowledge is deep and its editorial integrity is strong  as strong, arguably, as any other editorial operation covering the beauty industry. The commercial success of the products Allure gives its annual "Best of Beauty" awards to suggests other beauty consumers feel the same way. According to one industry source, Walmart saw a 30% lift in sales on brands bearing Allure's Best of Beauty seal.

There's another way that Allure asserts its leadership among online beauty content producers, and that is through its Beauty Blogger Awards, now entering its second year. Thousands of bloggers applied for the award, of which 15 were invited to compete in five weeks' worth of challenges for the top spot. Last year's winner received a profile in Allure, a trip to New York Fashion Week and an Allure seal on her blog  all of which helped Allure position itself as a judge of who's who in the beauty blogging world. "It's a way to credentialize bloggers," says Chapski. "We have this stamp of authority to say your voice means something or it doesn't mean anything ... we're the authorities and consumers believe us," she says.

Still, Allure's position is not impervious to market forces. Its readership, for one thing, is aging: In 1991, the average reader was 28; now, she's 34. Most pre-teen and teenage girls aren't picking up magazines. Instead, they're looking for nail art inspiration on Tumblr, turning to YouTube to find a hairstyle for prom, or turning to blogs  some of which, like Into The Gloss and The Cut's beauty section, are helmed by veteran magazine talent. How can Allure hope to capture them?

"First of all, our circulation was 250,000 in 1991," Wells counters. "This is such a different time, and we are such a different-sized magazine. And yes, today the average reader is older, but we have a wide span of ages. You can enter Allure as a 14-year-old and read about acne, and then in your 60s you can read about face lifts and injections and everything in between. Subject matter is important [to capture younger readers], as is presence on social media, as are our partnerships with beauty bloggers. And we're coming up with new ideas for mobile and tablets that will appeal to young consumers as well."

Allure's tablet experience is, like most tablet editions, largely a replica of the monthly print magazine, but data Allure has been able to collect about tablet readers has shaped the order in which you see the pages. In the tablet edition, for instance, the masthead has been pushed to the back, as has "stuff your mother looks at," says Wells. Allure also added pages to its Reporter section after discovering it was so popular with tablet readers. Over time, Allure has scaled back the number of digital "bells and whistles" attached to the tablet version. "As much fun as we had with it, we found that it wasn't crucial to readers, and it took readers a long time to download," says Wells.

Allure's experiments with mobile has been more varied, ranging from standalone apps (like this one) to smartphone/print tie-ins, which encourage readers to interact with the print magazine by scanning 2D barcodes with their mobile devices. Wells hinted strongly that Allure is working on another mobile app, one that will recommend products and locate the stores that carry them, as well as reviews for products shoppers saw in stores.

Allure's current success in balancing print and digital doesn't insulate it from the future. If teen girls aren't buying print magazines, the overall trend isn't good. Does Wells see a day when Allure goes out of print?

"I don't see it happening. The habits of the American consumer are changing; that's a reality. The important thing is not to wring our hands, but find other ways to attract and reach these people, and we have," says Wells. "We're fortunate that circulation is growing; it ends up strengthening us, giving us an enormous amount of robustness in an unpredictable climate."

I asked Wells where she thought Allure would be in 10 years. "I hope it's bigger than my wildest imaginations, but frankly I have no idea. But that's the excitement. We're reading everything, adapting to everything and we're not dismissing new things just because they're unfamiliar."
--------------------------------------------------------------
This week's collection of apps for kids has the basics down pat: Dr. Seuss, reading, writing and  everyone's favorite  fractions.

SEE ALSO: 5 Premium Apps for Car Enthusiasts

Children's Technology Review shared these 5 top apps for kids with us from their comprehensive monthly database of kid-tested reviews. The site covers everything from math and counting to reading and phonics.

Check back next week for more Top Kids Apps from Children's Technology Review.

Chris Crowell is a veteran kindergarten teacher and contributing editor to Children's Technology Review, a web-based archive of articles and reviews on apps, technology toys and video games. Download a free issue of CTR here.
--------------------------------------------------------------
This week brought with it a ton of great new apps.

A new app from THX helps you make sure you've got your home theater set up perfectly, and Grubwithus released a new iPhone app to help you find new friends to have dinner with.

Facebook added the ability to record and share video to its app, and Android owners finally got the ability to experience Epic Games' Epic Citadel.

Curious what these new apps really look like? Check out the video above for a visual run-through of some of our top apps of the week.

Have you given any of this week's top apps a try? Tell us about your favorites in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
If you haven't seen Fred Armisen on television, then chances are you recognize him from the web. The Saturday Night Live and Portlandia star has impersonated everyone from Steve Jobs to President Obama, turning himself into a bit of a viral video star in the process.

While you might have seen Armisen's face around the web, Armisen himself doesn't have a presence on sites like Facebook and Twitter. The reason? He doesn't think he's any good at social networking.

"When I do something I want to be good at it. I don't go out and play jazz music because I'm not good at it; I'm not an athlete. I don't play football. I leave it to other people. Social media: I don't think I'm good at it, the actor told Mashable.

"I'm too self-conscious to come up with anything funny. The stand-up comedians are so good  I'm like, 'You guys do it.' I think it's as simple as that."

Armisen doesn't rule out returning to the world of tweets and status updates in the future, especially if he decides to tour and needs to get the word out. Touring is just one of the ways his show Portlandia uses social networking.

"We did a tour last year and that's how we sold tickets. We would just make an announcement online and Twitter and that's how people got tickets.

Social networking is also playing a significant role at SNL, where Armisen is one of the longest-running cast members on the show. He says that sites like YouTube have changed the process for adding new characters.

"There used to be a time where we used to have to do a sketch a few times  like repeat characters  to get a recurring sketch on, and now you have to do it less. Because sketches get repeated online so much that people kind of get it, he says.

"Now you could do something once and it has a long shelf life because of technology. People find it, and they just play it over and over. Portlandia especially, man it could just live online. I can write sketches and I don't have to sweat that stuff as much.

Armisen was in San Francisco this week at Macworld, an annual fan event for Apple and its products.

Speaking about the late Steve Jobs, Armisen says, "I was really wanting to do an impression of him and I would go online  this is early days  and I would just look at whenever he made a big announcement of his new products, and I was like front row. I was like 'Yes, gotta see this!'"

Armisen says he typically travels with his iPad, iPhone, and an iPod Classic as his only gadgets, joking "I travel light." The iPod Classic is a big one for him. He doesn't store music on his iPhone or iPad, and uses the device to listen to tunes while on the road  whole albums in succession, the way the original artist intended.

When he comes up with ideas for sketches while out and about, he writes them down using Notes, the stock note-taking app pre-installed on iOS devices. As for other apps, as a drummer, most of his favorites are music-related. Bloom tops his list for favorite app, he also enjoys drumming app iTR-909 V2, and several of the iOS solutions for looping.

You can catch Armisen on Portlandia, Fridays at 10pm ET on IFC, and online on the show's official YouTube channel.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Six astronauts living in space may not have gravity, fresh food or a shower, but there is one Earth necessity they won't miss Sunday: They're going to watch the Super Bowl.

NASA's Mission Control at the Johnson Space Center in Houston will beam the Super Bowl XLVII showdown between the San Francisco 49ers and the Baltimore Ravens live to the International Space Station so its astronaut crew can watch the big game along with every other football fan on Earth.

"Yes they are going to watch it this weekend," NASA spokesman Josh Byerly told SPACE.com in an email. Byerly said Mission Control made a special point on Friday (Feb. 1) of asking the station astronauts if they wanted to catch the game.

"And they said they definitely wanted to see it," Byerly said.

The space station is currently home to two American astronauts (commander Kevin Ford and flight engineer Tom Marshburn), Canadian astronaut Chris Hadfield and Russian cosmonauts Evgeny Tarelkin, Oleg Novitskiy and Roman Romanenko. Together they make up the station's Expedition 34 team.

Whether the space station crew will throw a traditional Super Bowl party, hold a zero-gravity football game, or just float around with the game on in the background is unknown. But the International Space Station, is just about the same size (tip to tip) as the football field the 49ers and Ravens will play on in New Orleans during Sunday's game.

Space travel seems to be taking a spotlight in the Super Bowl this year.

Car manufacturer Kia will debut its new "Space Babies" TV commercial for the Kia Sorento, in which a father tells his son that all babies (even animal tots) actually come from the alien planet Babylandia, and launch on epic space mission in order to reach their parents on Earth.

Just after the Super Bowl, the AXE personal care products company is expected to unveil the first winner of its AXE Apollo Space Academy contest to launch 22 people on private trips to space. The contest was announced in January, with AXE teaming up with XCOR Aerospace  builder of the private suborbital space plane Lynx  and cosmic tourism firm Space Expedition Curacao to offer the trips.

The other 21 winners from the AXE Apollo Space Academy are slated to be selected after a final competition  the AXE Global Space Camp  to be held in Orlando, Fla. The winners will then be launched into space, one at a time, once XCOR's Lynx space plane begins operational flights with Space Expedition Curacao, contest organizers said.

The contest is open to both men and women in more than 60 countries. Entrants must sign up at the AXE Apollo Space Academy website (AXEApollo.com) and write about why they should fly in space. Website visitors will then vote on the entries. The deadline to enter is Feb. 3 (Super Bowl Sunday).

Photo via iStockphoto, Scibak and CBS Sports. Composite by Mashable/Charlie White

This article originally published at Space.com here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Super Bowl XLVII is not only a game between San Francisco and Baltimore  it's a bi-coastal competition for bragging rights.

Trash-talking between the East and West Coast has already commenced in preparation for Sunday's game. The winner will determine the size of each side's egos for the following weeks, but maybe we should take more into consideration. (Especially if you don't care about football.)

SEE ALSO: The Many Faces of American Football

We've already mashed up Full House against The Wire. These other pop culture face-offs will help you choose which legion you're siding with.

Which city will come out on top in the Baltimore vs. San Francisco pop culture battle? Cast your votes in the comments below.

Take your pick: Sunny Bob Saget-dwelling San Francisco, where family issues become American comedy entertainment? Or Baltimore, where illegal drug trades and harsh realities are so amazingly intense, you'll be left on pins and needles?

Don't let the weather sway your vote. Though Counting Crows frontman Adam Duritz might tug on your heartstrings with this Baltimore ballad, the song is a worthy contender against Mckenzie's more carefree description of San Francisco.

In a battle between phony icons, both coasts are guilty. The "San Francisco Treat" was born in said city, but the Golden Grain Company that now owns it is based in Illinois. Baltimore's beloved signature beer is now owned by the Pabst Brewing Company and is brewed under contract at the MillerCoors brewing facilities in North Carolina.

Mashable composite, courtesy of Golden Grain, Co., Pabst Brewing Company



 



 



Ginsberg was the author of "Howl" and figurehead behind the San Francisco Renaissance. Poe was born in Baltimore and part of the American Romantic Movement. Everyone wins.



Mashable composite, courtesy of Wikimedia Commons 



 



 



It's tough to say who is crazier and/or more brilliant: the Baltimore mind behind Pink Flamingos and Hairspray or the Dirty Harry San Francisco one that talks to invisible chairs.



 



 



 



Both are fourth in the series of iconic action films. Tom Cruise must stop a sizable missile headed straight for San Francisco. Bruce Willis must fight a gang of cyber terrorists who plan to hack the FBI. 



Mashable composite, courtesy of Wikimedia Commons



 7. City of Angels vs Sleepless in Seattle 



 



Sleepless in Seattle Meg Ryan was based in Baltimore. City of Angels Meg Ryan was set in L.A., but much of it was filmed in San Francisco and northern California. Either way, both characters will leave you a sobbing baby by the end of the film.



 



 



 



In one corner, we have Whoopi Goldberg as a fake nun in a San Francisco convent. In the other, we have a "pleasantly plump" Ricki Lake singing about Baltimore on top of a dump truck. Both turned into Broadway musicals, sequels and remakes. Who wins?



 



 



 



Clancy is best known for his best-selling, detailed military science fiction, but he is also part-owner of the Baltimore Orioles. Steel, a former longtime San Francisco resident, is one of the most commercially successful romantic novelists of all time. 



 



 



 



Two U.S. Olympic gold medalists. Two very separate coasts. 



 



 




--------------------------------------------------------------
To get you warmed up for Beyonc's halftime performance at the Super Bowl tonight, we found this prime example of what the singing superstar should definitely not do tonight in front of hundreds of millions of viewers.

There she is, innocently singing her song and strolling down the aisle, when a fan pleads with her ... for something. But Beyonc, that fan's not asking you for the mic, is she? Even if she were, don't give in. Don't do it. Ever. You never know what's going to happen.

SEE ALSO: Watch Beyonce Stunningly Address Her Lip-Syncing Controversy

Thank you, dogs and orangutans in the video, for your opinion about this surprise vocalization. Are they vocalizing because they like that sound (noise), or is it painful to them?

The only kind of howling going on around here is uncontrollable laughter.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Beyonce's mysterious Super Bowl halftime show will begin with a 30-second crowdsourced intro video. Pepsi exclusively told Mashable that this video will feature a slew of celebrities.

Among the stars who will be in the video  which will be filled with hundreds of submitted photos of football fans' faces  will be Victor Cruz, Drew Brees, Lamarr Woodley, Demarco Murray, Perez Hilton, Hunter Hayes and Luke James.

Additionally, a full official video of Beyonce's performance will be made available on Pepsi.com immediately after the game and will be there for only one month.

The intro was made using "object replacement animation" to infuse fans' pictures.

"The technology ... utilizes a consistent object across multiple frames of photography," Angelique Krembs, VP of marketing at PepsiCo, told Mashable. "Pepsi's first-ever crowd-sourced Super Bowl XLVII Halftime Show introduction starring hundreds of real fans from around the country used more than 500 frames."

SEE ALSO: Watch Destiny's Child Join Beyonce in Super Bowl Show

At 10:30 EST, viewers can watch the Pepsi 5th Quarter in the French Quarter Post-Game Bash featuring Grammy-nominated performers Hunter Hayes and The Roots, with a special guest appearance by New Orleans icon and jazz superstar Trombone Shorty.

In conjunction, a new social media consumer program dubbed "Frame by Frame + 5th QTR Unlock" contest will give people a chance to win a ticket to next year's Super Bowl halftime performance.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Not much is known about Beyonce's mysterious Super Bowl halftime show performance, but on game day via a YouTube video, she's exposing what the spectacle means to her.

"I was on my way here and I was looking at the Superdome, and I felt very proud because I know this is my legacy," she says. "And I'm really happy it's in the South ... It feels nice to be where my family is from  Louisiana. It feels like everything is coming back around full circle."

The video is the third in a series of teasers. The first two are filled with rehearsal footage, some of which reveal dance moves that hint at the songs Beyonce might perform: "Single Ladies (Put a Ring On It)," "End of Time" and "Run the World (Girls)."

When asked this week at a press conference whether she'll lip-sync during the Feb. 3 Super Bowl halftime show, Beyonce quipped, "I will absolutely be singing live ... I'm ready."

SEE ALSO: Watch Beyonce Stunningly Address Her Lip-Syncing Controversy

At that press conference, Beyonce didn't say which artists, if any, will join her on stage. Rumors suggest the 31-year-old mother will bring out husband, Jay-Z, and fellow Destiny's Child members Kelly Rowland and Michelle Williams.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Beyonce's snazzy Super Bowl halftime show was shrouded in mystery right up until go time on Sunday night  even though she had teased the spectacle in a series of videos.

Pepsi even spilt some secrets, but the setlist and guest performers remained unknown.

Come showtime, the pop star roared onto the stage with "Love on Top" before entertaining the audience with such songs as "Crazy In Love," "End Of Time" and "Baby Boy."

Then, fellow Destiny's Child members Kelly Rowland and Michelle Williams joined for "Bootylicious," "Independent Women" and "Single Ladies." Beyonce closed with "Halo."

Watch Alicia's National Anthem SEE ALSO: Super Bowl Show in 10 Fierce Photos

You can watch the entire show here (NOTE: If the video below doesn't work, click here or scroll down for a YouTube clip of the full performance):
--------------------------------------------------------------
Beyonce dominated the Super Bowl half-time with a fierce performance. Queen B was so electric, she may have even knocked out power to the Super Dome.

If you missed Bey's marvelous performance  or just want to relive it over and over  take a scroll through 10 photos below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Recent studies show that only approximately 1% of tech entrepreneurs in Silicon Valley are black. Many people blame the U.S. education system and its inadequate science, technology, engineering and mathematics (STEM) curricula. Others find fault with a deficiency of basic information to help students enter these fields.

The 1% figure, however, doesn't mean there aren't black entrepreneurs and pioneers who have made noteworthy breakthroughs in the tech world.

SEE ALSO: Startup Accelerator Supports Minorities and Women in Tech

Below, we've listed 20 notable black leaders and innovators in STEM fields. Some are well-known, some should be better known, and others might still be considered up-and-coming in their industries. Nevertheless, they have all contributed to the STEM fields in novel ways.

This certainly isn't an exhaustive list by any means  there are many other notable (and often unsung) black innovators in tech. After reading, feel free to add to the list in the comments.

Considered one of the first black technologists, Frank Greene developed high-speed computer systems in the 1960s. He also founded the software companies Technology Development Corp. and ZeroOne Systems, Inc. Greene died in 2009.

Roy Clay is a Silicon Valley pioneer, having worked as the research and development director of Hewlett-Packard (HP)'s computer division, working on the design and construction of the company's first computers in the 1960s. He later founded Rod-L Electronics, which tests for safety in electrical equipment.

Mark Dean helped develop the once-ubiquitous IBM PC, holding three of IBM's nine original patents. In 1999, he sought to create a voice-activated tablet, and wrote in 2011 that he uses a tablet as his primary computer. Dean is now the CTO for IBM Middle East and Africa.

Guion Bluford Jr. was the first black man and Mae Jemison the first black woman to travel in space (in 1983 and 1992, respectively). Bluford is an engineer and was a colonel in the United States Air Force before participating in four space shuttle flights. Jemison, a physician by trade, has received numerous awards and honorary doctorates.

James West invented the first practical electret microphone, which uses a charged material instead of needing a polarizing power supply. It is commonly used in cellphones, cameras and digital recorders around the world. West won the Benjamin Franklin Medal in electrical engineering from the Franklin Institute in 2010.

During his doctoral fellowship at the University of Michigan in the 1980s, Philip Emeagwali researched how to simulate the detection of oil reservoirs through the use of computers. Originally from Nigeria, he knew more about oil drilling than many of his contemporaries, and he used more than 65,000 microprocessors instead of the proposed eight supercomputers, breaking computation speed records.

Kennedy Reed is a theoretical physicist at the University of California's Lawrence Livermore National Lab. He received the Presidential Award for Excellence in Science, Mathematics and Engineering Mentoring in 2009.

Al Zollar worked for IBM for over 30 years before retiring, most recently working as general manager of IBM Tivoli Software, where he was in charge of strategy and profit and loss management. He has a degree in applied mathematics from the University of California at San Diego, where he was recently named one of 50 distinguished alumni.

When John Thompson was chairman and CEO of computer security software company Symantec, he was the only African American to hold such a position at a major tech company. He is now the CEO of Virtual Instruments and is the only black man on Microsoft's board of directors.

Emmitt McHenry co-founded Network Solutions, Inc., one of the early leading Internet domain services providers. In 1995, he founded NetCom Solutions International, a telecommunications and engineering company that has won awards from IBM and NASA, among other places.

In the 1970s, Gerald Lawson created the first video game console with interchangeable cartridges at Fairchild Semiconductor, paving the way for the future of gaming. He died in 2011.

Wanda Austin is the president and CEO of the Aerospace Corporation, a non-profit that assists and contributes to national space programs. When she was senior vice president of the Engineering and Technology Group in the early 2000s, she led a staff of 1,000 engineers and scientists.

Lester Lyles is the chair of the National Academies Committee on the rationale and goals of the U.S. civil space program. He holds degrees in mechanical and nuclear engineering. He formerly served as the Air Force's vice chief of staff and as the commander of the Air Force Materiel Command at Wright-Patterson Air Force Base in Ohio. He was also appointed to President Obamas Intelligence Advisory Board.

Dixie Garr served as Cisco Systems' vice president of customer success engineering for seven years. She drove change throughout the company's engineering processes and business practices to better help the needs of customers around the world. She has been awarded several honors, including the 1997 Black Engineer of the Year Award.

Lori Perine is currently the managing principle at InterpreTech, where she once worked as president and CEO. Companies consult InterpreTech in economic innovation, science, energy and technology. Perine also served as deputy to the associate director of the White House Office of Science and Tech Policy until 2001.

Herman Chinery-Hesse was born in Ireland, studied in the United States and worked in England, but decided to return to his roots in Ghana to start a software company called SOFTtribe. He has been called "Africa's father of technology" and is often likened to Bill Gates.

Chad Womack is the director of STEM education initiatives and the fellowship program at the United Negro College Fund (UNCF). He is also a biotechnology scientist and he serves on the board of directors of the National Biotechnology and Pharmaceutical Association.

Robin Petgrave is the founder and executive director of Tomorrow's Aeronautical Museum, where at-risk youths are introduced to aviation, math and science. His students have broken several aviation world records.

In 2011, Kimberly Bryant launched Black Girls Code, an organization devoted to teaching young girls of color computer coding and programming languages, such as Scratch and Ruby on Rails. Through classes and programs, Bryant and the rest of the Black Girls Code team hope to grow the number of black women in technology and give underprivileged girls better opportunities.

Images via iStockphoto, amphotora; courtesy of WikiMedia Commons, NASA; Flickr, Michael Cot; WikiMedia Commons, R.D. Ward for Department of Defense; Flickr, Robert Nyman.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The BlackBerry Z10 does so much that BlackBerry gave up trying to explain it all and instead released an ad showing fanciful things it can't do.

That's the premise of the brand's first-ever Super Bowl ad, which just ran in the third quarter of the game. The ad, from London's AMV BBDO. The spot is designed to confuse the viewer at first by showing a guy using the phone to set himself aflame and then put himself out. Then he grows elephant legs, disappears into a colorful puff of smoke, reemerges from a manhole cover and turns a careening oil truck heading his direction into thousands of rubber ducks.

A voiceover delivers the punchline: "In 30 seconds, it's quicker to show you what it can't do."

CMO Frank Boulben told Mashable that the ad was designed to get users to go online to check out the Z10. Said Boulben: "We're leaving viewers a call to action to check by themselves."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Maybe you should grab a tissue while you reach for your beer. Budweiser departs from its string of its light-hearted, comedic commercials to tug at your heartstrings in this new Super Bowl ad.

In this year's commercial, "The Clydesdales: Brotherhood," a horse breeder raises his foal to become one of the beer's famous Clydesdale horses. Cue tear-jerking scenes of the baby animal taking its first steps, the owner sleeping in the stable, and the horse running alongside his moving car.

SEE ALSO: The 10 Best Super Bowl Ads of All Time

Then comes the fateful day when Budweiser comes to pick up the horse, and the two part until the Clydesdales make an appearance in Chicago, where they finally reunite. Did we mention the sentimental soundtrack of Fleetwood Mac's "Landslide?"

Budweiser used its newest foal in the Super Bowl ad, with the animal making its debut at just seven days old.

What do you think of the company's new commercial?
--------------------------------------------------------------
Coca Cola had big plans for Super Bowl XLVII. Not only would it run an entertaining ad during the big game, but it would also launch a concurrent online competition, tied to the ad. It was supposed to fun and innovative. Instead, the online portion failed as soon as Coke ran its first in-game Super Bowl TV ad.

In the ad, three teams  bus-driving Vegas Show Girls, Mad Max types and cowboys all compete to reach a giant Coke bottle first. Online, viewers could vote for which team would actually achieve this goal. Unfortunately, as soon as the ad ran, the site lost all interactivity, though it came back at times. For many viewers, there was no more voting, no video, just the lonely Coke bottle in the sand dunes.

Coke was hoping to collect votes during the game. The plan was for Coca Cola to run an ad with the winning team in a complete narrative right after the game ends. At this writing, the site's interactivity has gone up and down several times.

It's the kind of digital fail a brand and advertiser dreads most. It's not the only online fail. Twitter, which is hosting more than a few Super Bowl promoted tweets started suffering through hiccups for some users. The trouble started moments after Oreo Cookies unveiled its own Super Bowl ad and digital campaign. The latter portion included an Instagram tie-in where viewers could decide if the cookie or the creme was more important.

Did you try and vote in the Coca Cola Super Bowl ad game or were you, too frustrated? What other digital fails (and wins) have you seen during the game? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A baby's first steps are a milestone for any parent. It's one of those unforgettable moments, especially when your child's first walk around the living room leads her into a fresh pile of poop.

Most are eager to capture the momentous occasion on camera, and we're certainly glad Grandma was around to record this one for posterity. Adorable baby Lydia shuffles toward the camera with a bit of help from mom, and the family dog wants in on the action.

SEE ALSO: 10 Infectious YouTube Clips of Babies Laughing at Dogs

Watch Lydia strut with confidence toward the couch, followed by her ecstatic giggles and grandma's encouragement. Yay! As if another cute baby video isn't enough, little Lydia's journey isn't quite over yet.

The dog steals the show by dropping one right next to her. And just like any baby new to walking, she has her share of tumbles ... right into puppy's little present.

We bet mom will have the most embarrassing story to retell for years.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Lucasfilm and Disney have officially chosen J.J. Abrams to direct the new Star Wars, which will hit theaters in 2015. But don't tease Abrams for his overuse of "lens flares"  reflections of light across the screen  in his Star Trek films.

Our friends Nitrozac and Snaggy at The Joy of Tech imagined how Abrams might respond to the jabs from across the web, revealing some plot points in the process.

SEE ALSO: More Sunday Comics

Comic illustration provided by The Joy of Tech. Published with permission; all rights reserved.
--------------------------------------------------------------
With smartphone adoption rates on the rise, it seems like it's possible to do almost anything from the comfort of your cellphone  why should applying for a job be any different? For applicants, it wouldn't be such a hassle, really, if job recruiters would get on board with the idea.

Although a growing number of job seekers use their mobile devices to seek out career opportunities, employers are still behind on implementing mobile recruitment strategies to cater to applicant needs, according to a study published by online recruiting research lab Potentialpark.

For the study, Potentialpark surveyed more than 25,000 job seekers worldwide and analyzed the mobile career presence of nearly 700 top employers in the U.S., Europe and Asia. Mashable spoke with Potentialpark about its findings.

The study found that 26% of job seekers use their mobile devices for career-related purposes (and another 59% could imagine doing so), yet only 13% of employers have a mobile version of their career website.

Survey respondents were most interested in mobile features that would enable them to look for job openings (69%), track the status of their applications (63%), and research companies and career opportunities (47%). Respondents seem to be bullish on apps, too, with 56% saying theyd use a career app, up from 47% last year.

Not all employees are lacking on the mobile recruitment front, though. Potentialpark conducted a thorough investigation of the mobile career presences of nearly 700 top employers, finding that some actually had some sweet goods to offer.

Potentialparks research identified Orange, PepsiCo and Credit Suisse as the top three organizations with thorough mobile recruitment communications in place. Each of the three organizations have both a mobile career site and a career app, which they have in common with only 10 other companies of the 698 analyzed.

Orange, a French telecommunications company, topped the list of standout mobile recruiters with its mobile career app, which features many of the functions that job seekers expect, including a job search, the ability to share and email jobs, company information and an events calendar.

International beverage company PepsiCo came in right behind Orange for its mobile recruiting efforts. The Pepsi Possibilities app and mobile career site enable users to search job listings, email listings, catch up on PepsiCos recruiting feeds on the social web, activate job alerts, and apply via mobile. That's an improvement from 2012 when applicants could not apply from their phones, as mentioned in a Dice interview with PepsiCo recruiter Chris Hoyt (see embedded video above).

Ranking third on the list was financial services group Credit Suisse, with its mobile site and recruiting apps for Apple and Android devices. It appears to be a big jump from Orange and PepsiCos highly functional apps, though. The Credit Suisse app focuses on providing users with information about internship training programs, Credit Suisse business areas, employee profiles, career advice, and other recruiting tips. The app  called Campus Recruiting  is geared toward college students and also features a business trivia game called BizWhiz.

Other top-ten organizations on the mobile talent communications list included Sodexo, Accenture U.S., KPMG, Accenture Germany, Daimler, Shell and Fresenius.

While the study highlighted how far behind employers are with mobile recruiting, it wasnt the bearer of all bad news. Of all mobile career sites, 71% of them offered a functioning job search, the top expectation among job seekers as

determined by Potentialparks survey. So, there seems to be reason for hope.

If youre in the market for a new job, let us know how you're using mobile for your job search in the comments below.

The Mashable Job Board connects job seekers across the U.S. with unique career opportunities in the digital space. While we publish a wide range of job listings, we have selected a few job opportunities from the past two weeks to help get you started. Happy hunting!
--------------------------------------------------------------
In the battle between elementary school students and pro football players, second graders reign supreme. When it comes to grammar, that is.

Second graders at a New York school had some help from Twitter for their grammar lessons, using the tweets of NFL players to correct spelling, punctuation and sentence structure.

While working in groups, the students "found several mistakes in these tweets, including the incorrect spelling of 'a lot,'" explains a post on Elmwood Franklin School's Facebook page.

The students corrected one gem from 49ers' Chris Culliver who posted, "I pray to God I'm never dieing broke" (tweet has since been deleted), along with other statuses from Patriots' Wes Welker and Lions' Titus Young.

Check out the kids' corrections, below.

Though Twitter isn't exactly the most PG of places for kids, they took to the printed tweets with red pens in hand, circling errors and rewriting sentences.

Dare we ask for next year's halftime show to include a spelling bee face off?
--------------------------------------------------------------
When the first touchdown is scored on game day, some avid sports fans take to social media to announce their shared victory.

Aside from the beer and never-ending abundance of chicken wings, many Super Bowl viewers have their smartphones and tablets in hand. How exactly do millions of Americans stay connected to their favorite teams? Nielsen collected data from viewers to see how media converge leading up to the big game.

More than 111 million people watched the 2012 Super Bowl, and 13.1 million people visited NFL websites to check up on their teams in December. Don't count the ladies out, since women account for 45% of the television audience.

What can you do if you don't have multiple TVs in one room? One out of three tablet owners check sports scores on their devices while watching TV, and 60% of tablet and smartphone owners who look up sports-related content do it every day.

Nielsen says 26% of TV homes that watch the game had an income level of more than $100,000. Maybe it's all those extravagant Super Bowl parties?

SEE ALSO: Super Bowl Teams Are Losers on Facebook Likes

In this year's rivalry, the 49ers seem to have more of a dedicated online fan base. The team's website had 506,000 visitors compared to the Ravens, whose site garnered 376,000 visitors in December.

For more information, check out the stats on Nielsen's site. How have you stayed connected leading up to the Super Bowl? Let us know your thoughts in the comments.

Graphics courtesy Samsung and NFL, and via iStockphoto, Filo. Composite by Mashable/Charlie White
--------------------------------------------------------------
Barack Obama made his mark on Super Bowl Sunday in a pre-game interview with CBS's Scott Pelley at the White House. The U.S. president discussed more than just the big game, touching on topics about tax breaks, women in war and gays in the Boy Scouts.

The live chat began on the topic of football players' safety. Obama said the game needs to evolve so players in elementary school, high school and college and NFL remain healthy.

"I feel differently about the NFL  they're grown men, they're well compensated and they know the risks that are involved," Obama said.

SEE ALSO: Beyonce Talks Super Bowl Halftime Show, Saying 'This Is My Legacy'

Obama closed the interview with a comment on the Super Bowl: "It's going to be a great game; I have some wings waiting for me upstairs."

Earlier on Sunday, Obama's Facebook and Twitter accounts posted this image of the president tossing a football. Just hours before kick-off, the photo had been Liked nearly 500,000 times and retweeted more than 28,000 times.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A 3-second call-to-action at the end of Oreo's Super Bowl commercial, which debuted during the game Sunday, has increased Oreo's Instagram following by tens of thousands.

"Something we can all disagree on: Choose your side on Instagram @Oreo," the final frame read.

Oreo began promoting its Instagram account on Facebook beginning Thursday. Before the commercial aired, Oreo had around 2,200 followers, a company spokesperson told Mashable. Shortly after, its following climbed to nearly 20,000, and is now nearing the 30,000 mark.

According to CNBC, about half of Super Bowl commercials have included a hashtag to spark conversations on social media during and after the game.

Oreo's is the first Instagram call-out we've seen thus far. Although the commercial has had a sizable impact on Oreo's Instagram following, given that the commercial cost $4 million for the media buy alone, one could say that Oreo has paid a hefty price for each new follower  about $200 apiece  Lee Garfinkel, chairman of Havas Worldwide New York, pointed out in Mashable's Super Bowl live blog. The commercial's impact might have been greater if Oreo had included the website URL for its Instagram account  instagram.com/oreo  which is much easier for viewers to access.
--------------------------------------------------------------
When the power went out at the Mercedes-Benz Superdome during the third quarter of the Super Bowl, many people tweeted their suspicions on what caused the outage.

But in all the blackout noise, Oreo had the best response by far.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Feeling left out on all the Sunday fun because football isn't your thing? Tired of watching the same B-roll footage leading up to the big game? Well puppies are everybody's thing, and today is the biggest day in dog "competition": the Puppy Bowl.

Animal Planet is hosting its annual cute pup showcase, and you can watch it live online. At the time of publication, the Puppy Bowl puppies were sound asleep. But hey, everyone needs a good Sunday nap, right?

Discovery has plenty of videos analyzing these puppies' best plays, so you can watch those until the dogs are up and running around again.

But really, even at nap time, puppies are never boring. Here's photographic proof:
--------------------------------------------------------------
Each Super Bowl Sunday, Animal Planet counters burly NFL players with roly-poly, fuzzy-wuzzy doggies for the Puppy Bowl.

Imagine if Animal Planet expanded its cute animals line-up for the big game. We did just that and came up with five really terrible ideas that the network would most likely reject. Well, maybe another station will consider airing the Cat Lingerie Bowl  OWN, are you listening?

The objectification of cats made this half-time show option pawsitively terrible.

Mashable composite. Images courtesy of Flickr: Carterse, Andy Roberts and The Lingerie Addict

Fish are 84% less cute than puppies (it's science, people), making "Fish Bowl" an angle not worth hooking.

The cleaning bill for getting glitter out of water made Ke$hrimp too much of a liability.

Justin Beaver's recent birch bark smoking incident made this crooning dam-builder lose his chance at headlining the halftime show.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Seth Rogen and Paul Rudd try to impress a rep for Samsung in this 2-minute spot set to air during the Super Bowl that pokes fun at itself and other advertisers during the big game.

The ad starts with the two meeting up after being separately called for a meeting to pitch ideas to Samsung. Both are surprised that the other was called in to be "The next big thing."

"Maybe in 1998 you were the next big thing," Rogen says of Rudd. "Wow, I've never seen you this excited about something that isn't food" Rudd counters. "Are you sure you're not here to see a guy named 'Sam Sung'?"

The two then pitch a Samsung rep (Mr. Show's Bob Odenkirk) on ideas that sound strikingly familiar, like talking babies (E*Trade), crowdsourcing (Doritos), sending a fan into space (Axe) and Asian rappers (Wonderful PIstachios). The ad ends on a meta note with LeBron James making a cameo on a tablet. "You get LeBron James and you've got the next big thing," says Rudd. "You don't even need anybody else." Odenkirk then has an epiphany: "No, no we don't need anyone else."

What did you think of the spot? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Shontelle has seen her hit song "Impossible" from 2010 continue to be a popular cover song from musicians carving their careers on YouTube. Not long ago, she was in their position.

"I remember being that unsigned artist sitting and staring at YouTube views  looking at the counter," Shontelle told Mashable. "If you get just two more views, you get excited."

Now, the 27-year-old singer will join forces with three of YouTube's talented musicians for a performance at the 3rd Streamy Awards, a live-streamed ceremony honoring online video content. The show  hosted by Talking Dead host Chris Hardwick  will stream Feb. 17.

Shontelle revealed she'll be singing "Impossible," a song recently covered on the U.S. and British versions of The X Factor, with Kurt Hugo Schneider, Sam Tsui and Savannah Outen.

Meanwhile, Vanilla Ice will light up the stage with Chester See, DeStorm, Mike Tompkins and Epic Rap Battles' Peter Shukoff and Lloyd Ahlquist.

Nominees, many of whom have previously appeared in Mashable coverage, will compete in a slew of categories for music, news, drama, comedy, fashion and more.

"There needed to be an award show for online video," Shontelle said. "It's to a point where people are putting real good production into stuff."

Shontelle noted Maddie Jane's slick video for her version of "Impossible," for example, has attracted 42 million views in roughly two years since being posted on YouTube.

"There are covers of 'Impossible' that have as many views as mine," Shontelle acknowledged. "It makes me feel good as an artist that people are relating to my music."

SEE ALSO: Adam Carolla Launches 'Video Podcast Network' on YouTube

The Streamy Awards comes from the minds at Tubefilter and Dick Clark Productions, which puts on other specials such as the American Music Awards, Academy of Country Music Awards, Golden Globe Awards and Dick Clark's New Year's Rockin' Eve with Ryan Seacrest.

Tickets to attend the Streamys at the Hollywood Palladium will be available closer to Feb. 17.

Images via Getty Images, Jason Merritt and Getty Images for Catch Roof, Michael Stewart
--------------------------------------------------------------
We all know the commercials are the best part of the Super Bowl (OK, maybe not all of us know that), but they are often the most neglected of the game experience. After all, commercials were simply built into television as perfect little pitstops for us to refill on snacks and have bathroom breaks.

Now that the game is over, you can spend Super Monday (and let's be honest, Super Tuesday through Friday) catching up on the ads that make capitalism oh so awesome, funny and sometimes sexy. And these little 30 second spots deserve their moment in the spotlight considering their $4 million price tag.

Whether you are licking your wounds or causing debauchery from the sweet taste of victory, let's take a moment and honor the true warriors of the game  the sponsors.

This year's advertisers held nothing back, employing everything from social media to fuel their ads (Coke, Doritos and Oreos), using baby horses to stir up some heart warming sentiment (Budweiser), making us laugh with funny men Seth Rogen and Paul Rudd (Samsung Galaxy) to simply grossing us out with a steamy make-out sesh between Bar Refaeli and a nerdy guy (Go Daddy).

So set aside team favoritism and relive this year's Super Bowl by watching the ads in the gallery above.

Which ad was your favorite? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Looking forward to Super Bowl XLVII this weekend, kicking off on Sunday at 6:30 p.m. ET on CBS? We certainly are, and to enhance your enjoyment, we've set out to discover just how super the Super Bowl really is.

We wanted to find out about records broken in advertising, viewers and players, as well as the technology of CBS's video coverage, a little local color about New Orleans and its venerable Superdome, and some perspective of Super Bowls from days gone by.

So if you couldn't shell out $3,000 for a ticket to the Super Bowl in the Superdome in New Orleans, no need to fret. You'll be able to see the game (and its 47 minutes of commercials) much better on your TV set at home, anyway. And the stats we're bringing you here are certain to make you the life of any Super Bowl party:

$1.85 billion: spent on Super Bowl advertising over the past 10 years ($262.5 million spent on last year's broadcast), according to MediaLife 111.3 million: U.S. audience number for CBS to beat, a record set by NBC's 2012 Super Bowl XLVI broadcast, the most-watched TV show in U.S. history. $4 million: cost of some of the Super Bowl's 30-second spots, according to CBS chief Les Moonves. That's up from $3.5 million last year. 2,105,441: streaming video viewers needed to beat last year's record set by NBC's live-streaming Super Bowl coverage, the first time the Super Bowl was offered live via streaming video. Unlike last year, this year's stream will give you DVR-like capability that lets you rewind and pause, the ability to watch all commercials on demand, and will include Beyonc's halftime performance. $88,000: paid to each winning player; each losing player gets $46,000. 4K: resolution of CBS's six new "HEYEper Zoom" (yes, that's how they're spelling it) super-duper slow-mo cameras, according to TVNewsCheck. With four times the resolution of conventional HD replays, shots can be zoomed in while still displaying HDTV resolution. 120: decibels of noise typically created by a capacity crowd in the New Orleans Superdome, according to the Hollywood Reporter. 73: percentage of Super Bowls where the odds-on favorite wins. 62: cameras (up from 57 last year) under the direction of Mike Arnold, directing his third Super Bowl, all of which were for CBS. 47: average number of minutes of ads shown during the past three Super Bowls. 31: age of half-time performer Beyonc, youngest to do so since Justin Timberlake (then 23 years old) in the "wardrobe malfunction" half-time show of 2002.

 22: Players visible on the camera angle available via CBS's streaming Super Bowl coverage on CBSSports.com and NFL.com. This high-angle 50-yard-line view shows all the players at once. It's an angle formerly forbidden for distribution or sale by the NFL (until June, 2012, according to the Wall Street Journal) because it reveals what the NFL calls "proprietary coaching information." 18: Super Bowls covered by CBS. Next year, it's Fox's turn. 11: Games won by San Francisco in the regular 2012 NFL season; Baltimore won 10. 8: number of Super Bowl appearances for 49ers and Ravens combined; 6 for the 49ers, 2 for the Ravens. 6: unique camera views to be played back on-screen at the same time, using multi-camera high-resolution playback tech called Mosaic. 5: high-speed cameras that can shoot at 300-500 frames per second at 1080i, according to TV Technology. 4: announcers for CBS during the big game. They will be Jim Nantz (play-by-play), Phil Simms (color analyst), Steve Tasker and Solomon Wilcots. 3.5: point spread; 49ers are favored, according to the Vegas bookies. (This number, of course, is subject to change.) 3: straight years the Super Bowl has broken all-time U.S. viewing records. 1: winner. Which team are you picking this year  Ravens or 49ers? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
There's a lot at stake as gladiators go head to head to win the hearts of fans across the USA. No, we're not talking about the action on the field, we're talking about the Super Bowl ads.

Actually, we're talking about the ads right now, and you're invited. Join me, ad industry legend Lee Garfinkel, branding guru Hayes Roth of Landor Associates, Amy Vale, vp of global research & strategic communications at Mojiva, and many others as we live-blog the Super Bowl ads. The action started at 6 p.m. ET, so tune in right here.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Disney aired a new trailer for its coming movie The Lone Ranger Sunday night during the Super Bowl.

From producer Jerry Bruckheimer and director Gore Verbinski, Armie Hammer stars as The Lone Ranger's title character, and Johnny Depp plays his stalwart sidekick Tonto. Disney released the first peek of the trailer back in October.

Will you see Disney's movie this summer? Tell us in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Ravens won, the 49ers lost and Beyonce sashayed so hard that the Super Dome lights went out. Super Bowl XLVII  or the Harbowl, if you insist  packed in the drama, making the game ripe for meme-ing.

We intercepted the best Super Bowl memes from the Internet and pass them off to you below. Try not to fumble Grumpy Cat.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Power to half of Mercedes-Benz Superdome, including the scoreboard, went dark with 13:22 left in the third quarter of the Super Bowl.

Gameplay resumed at 9:10 p.m. ET after nearly 35 minutes of head scratching.

During the outage, Twitter lit up with speculation as to what caused the outage. Oreo also shared a yummy reactionary tweet.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Instant replays just won't cut it on Super Bowl Sunday.

SEE ALSO: More Sunday Comics
--------------------------------------------------------------
Super Bowl Sunday is finally here and the big matchup is just hours away. There are plenty of cool ways you can follow along online, but this may be among the most interesting.

The word cloud above tracks hot terms among Super Bowl fans on social media, but comes with a special catch: it updates every five minutes so you can see how the conversation ebbs and flows in nearly real time. Which plays will generate the most reaction? Which ads will get the most buzz? Refresh this page throughout the game to find out. And the word cloud is already live, so you can actually start seeing what's hot now.

The cool visualization comes by way of the social media analysis company Taykey, which tracks thousands of data sources in real time to see which topics are hottest on Twitter, Facebook, blogs and other channels. Each update reflects the past 20 minutes or so.

If you're looking for other ways to digitally augment your Super Bowl experience, CBSSports.com's live stream includes stats and alternative camera angles. HootSuite has a social media command center to track the online chatter, and Livefyre's social news hub aggregates popular tweets, commercials and Instagram photos. You can read more about those options here.

UPDATE: With Super Bowl XLVII in the books, the word cloud has since been frozen to reflect conversation for the entire game, not the most recent 20 minutes.

How will second-screen technology factor into your Super Bowl experience? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Hoo is having the best weekend of the year? Our nocturnal bird of prey buddy, the owl. Sorry, NFL. An easy slide of the space in Super Bowl makes it Superb Owl, delighting birdbrained non-football fans.

The clever folks over at McSweeney's even came up with a list of words that could be used to describe both the Super Bowl and Superb Owl:

Here are a few superb owls to top off your celebrations:
--------------------------------------------------------------
Even in the 21st century, there are still a lot of unsolved mysteries when it comes to the human brain. It is a complicated machine that neuroscientists continually try to understand.

A new scientific endeavor hopes to unravel some of these mysteries by creating a highly detailed simulation of the human brain. Essentially, researchers will use a supercomputer to build a working replica of our minds.

With $1.6 billion in funding and more than 200 researchers, the Human Brain Project is the largest, most ambitious cooperative experiment of its kind. Serious hardware is necessary for a project of this kind  to pack the simulation into a single computer would require a system 1,000 times more powerful than todays supercomputers.

The project will officially begin later this year. It will take Europe 10 years to map all of the 100 billion neurons connected by 100,000 billion synapses that make up a human brain.
--------------------------------------------------------------
With almost 1,000 comments, 11 Bizarre Facebook Apps You Won't Believe was by far our most-discussed post this week. The catch? Even though each comment was posted by a unique reader, they all basically said the same thing:

Why the hell isn't Pot Farm on the first slide?

Although the order of the list was random, Pot Farm's Facebook and Twitter account promised free in-game goods if its pot farmers commented on the story to "correct" the alleged mistake of listing the app in the second slide. The first app listed, ironically, was a religion-focused app called "God Wants You to Know."

SEE ALSO: 18 Facebook Fossils We'll Remember Forever

Our story on Apple's 128GB iPad also saw a lot of reader feedback, with many commenters saying they thought 128GB of storage was unnecessary, while others were happy to hear the news.

French officials recently announced that the word "hashtag" is now illegal in France in an effort to protect the French language from Anglicisms. The story was met with mixed reactions; some blamed French culture, while others argued that such legislation won't actually change anything.

Finally, a handful of Instagram users were recently asked to provide photo ID to verify their identities, a move that privacy rights, and some shared their personal experiences with such policies.

What was the biggest story of the week for you and why? Let us know what you think and you may see your comment here next week.
--------------------------------------------------------------
If you were too busy planning your Super Bowl party and missed out on this week's viral video recap, we've got you covered.

We've scoured the interwebs for all things cute, crazy and just plain weird. From the unlikely, budding friendship between a kitten and a hedgehog to a bizarre flurry of tumbleweeds in Texas, this week's best viral goodness is showcased in the video above.

The Slow Mo Guys take their talents to another level by blowing up five, enormous cooling towers, and of course we've left room for what really matters in the Super Bowl: cute animals.

Watch Jimmy Fallon use the power of puppies to predict the outcome of the big game (these hungry guys are Baltimore fans), and Teddy Bear the Porcupine joins in on the fun.

Finally, never to be outdone, kittens steal the spotlight in a dramatic display of...themselves, lounging in bowls.

Which viral video do you like the most? Tell us in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Allegations of idea appropriation are nothing new in advertising. However, when the stakes are as high as they are as in the Super Bowl, the charges have a bit more weight.

Thanks to YouTube, the accusations began well before the game as Lee Garfinkel, the chairman of Havas Worldwide NY, noted the similarities between an ad he worked on in the '90s and Taco Bell's Game Day ad. The other two ads were called to task almost immediately, thanks to social media.

What do you think? Do these people have a case?
--------------------------------------------------------------
Iranian President Madmoud Ahmadinejad announced Monday his lofty post-presidential goal: to be Iran's Neil Armstrong.

"I'm ready to be the first Iranian to sacrifice myself for our country's scientists," said Ahmadinejad as quoted by an official Iranian news agency and reported by the Associated Press.

Iran's space program has a goal of putting an Iranian in space within the next five to seven years. Iran just last Monday claimed to have shot a monkey into space and back, although the success of that mission is being called into question.

SEE ALSO: Iran Claims to Have Launched This Monkey Into Space

A hypothetical astronaut Ahmadinejad wouldn't be the first Iranian in space: entrepreneur Anousheh Ansari paid $20 million for a trip to the International Space Station aboard a Russian Soyuz rocket in 2006.

Iran has yet to send one of its own into space with homegrown technology. It claimed to send a mouse, a turtle and a handful of worms to space in 2010.

Iran has claimed its space program is intended for telecommunications and military monitoring. However, some experts believe Iran's space launches are a thinly veiled method of testing offensive military rocket technology.

Ahmadinejad's current term as president ends in August. He is not eligible under current Iranian law to run for another term.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Im sure there are plenty of boomers who rank Angry Birds at the top of their app list, but my hunch is that for most people age 50+ this list of apps will rank higher on a best-loved scale.

Boomers tend to be practical, health and diet conscious and need a little bit of a helping hand every now and then.

SEE ALSO: How Baby Boomers Are Embracing Digital Media

These apps range from flashlights that help you read the menu in dark restaurants to apps that help find your car in an unfamiliar location.

Browse through the gallery above to see them all. And let us know  are there any good ones we missed?
--------------------------------------------------------------
With online banking and mobile apps for managing your accounts, how often do you actually step into your bank to handle transactions anymore? Direct deposit, remote check capture (the feature that allows you to deposit a check by taking a picture of it with your phone) and online bill pay have largely eliminated the need for you to do your banking with a live person.

Enter a new crop of accountsand even whole banksthat are foregoing their in-person services and instead focusing on innovative online-only features. Want to make the switch to a more tech-savvy financial institution? Whether youre looking for excellent interest rates at no monthly charge, a sleek app that simplifies your transactions, or a full set of mobile tools that show you where youre spending each penny, theres an online-only option for you.

One of the newer players in banking, Green Dots GoBank is mobile-only and proud of it. Its not a mobile app that was bolted onto an online version of a brick-and-mortar bank, explained Green Dot founder and CEO Steve Streit at the companys recent launch. Rather, the bank was created from scratch, optimized to be exclusively mobile and targeted at those who are tired of waiting for their current financial institutions to catch up with the tech world.

Within the app, you can open accounts, order debit cards, and pay your bills. Best of all, the app has a transparent fee scheduleyou decide how much you want to pay each month between $0 and $9. The voluntary monthly fee shows the creators are pretty sure youre going to love their app and find it worth your money.

If youre looking to simplify the money you have coming in and out of your account, GoBank makes sense. (Looking to earn high interest rates or establish your savings? Not so much.)



Named Best Online Bank by Money Magazine in 2012, Allys a good choice if you keep higher balances in your accounts and are looking for online savings options that earn strong interest rates. With no maintenance or ATM fees (Ally even reimburses other banks ATM fees), Ally offers better interest rates on its checking accounts than many banks do on their savings accounts. The bank recently added mobile check deposits to its app, making the service even more convenient.



While some of USAAs products and services are only available to members of the military and their families, its investment products, most checking and savings products, and credit cards are available to civilians, too. Bank accounts include nice perks at no extra cost, such as free checking and savings, free checks and online bill pay, unlimited transfers to any U.S. bank and more.

If you want to do the majority of your banking online, but want to have the option of occasionally doing transactions in person, with USAA you can make deposits at select UPS Store locations. If ATM access is enough for you, the bank will refund other banks fees. The big drawback is that mobile deposit options are only available to those who meet certain eligibility requirements based on your account history with the bank and whether you are eligible for its auto or property insurance.



For online checking accounts, Charles Schwabs High Yield Investor Checking gets some of the best reviewsand with good reason. The account requires no minimum balance (rare for a checking account that earns interest) and charges no monthly service fee, at a time when many large banks are discontinuing their free checking accounts. Plus, you get fee rebates from any ATM worldwide, in addition to having access to online and mobile bill pay and mobile deposit, plus free checks for those who dont want to do everything by debit card.



Okay, PNC isnt online-only, but the banks Virtual Wallet online and mobile banking interface is one of the best Ive seen from a brick-and-mortar institution. It gives you three ways to group your money: everyday spending and bills, short-term savings and long-term growth. The Money Bar feature gives you a visual of the money youve got going out, the savings youve stashed, and what youve got left to spend, which helps you to adjust your priorities accordingly. Additional analytics in the tool encourage good budgeting habits and savings.

Our favorite feature, the calendar described as a digital assistant that simplifies your banking needs, shows you everything from your spending habits to bill payment reminders. It will even let you know when your balance might fall below zero, based on the payments youve scheduled, so you know when you need to closely watch your spending. And apps for your Apple and Android phones and tablets let you take control of your money wherever you are.

 

How do you decide where to do your banking? Which features matter most to you?

This article originally published at The Muse here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Beyonce's drop-dead Super Bowl halftime performance was more force of nature than musical act, leading many to speculate only half-jokingly that it was the cause of a thirty-minute stadium power outage that delayed the game's third quarter. (Update: it wasn't.)

SEE ALSO: Watch Destiny's Child Join Beyonce in Super Bowl Show

While the social media world publicly went gaga over Beyonce, she shared a touching moment backstage after the performance with husband Jay-Z, who wrapped her in a giant hug after she left the stage. The photo below, posted to Instagram by user 1774inc, was reportedly taken just minutes after Beyonce's show ended.

Jay-Z, however, didn't just register his support in private, also posting this popular tweet during Sunday's game:
--------------------------------------------------------------
Did Beyonce take a bit of dance inspiration from Saturday Night Live? Bey's Super Bowl performance included a move that looked identical to Mokiki's Sloppy Swish.

Redditor colorblindkeys pointed out the eerie similarity in rhythmic leg flailing under the caption "Beyonce does the Sloppy Swish."

SEE ALSO: Beyonce's Super Bowl Show in 10 Fierce Photos

Do you think Mrs. Carter got splashed with Mokiki's green slime venom?
--------------------------------------------------------------
Looks like Queen B is embracing her title.

After an explosive performance at this year's Super Bowl, the diva took to YouTube to announce plans for her upcoming world tour. Beyonce will kick off "The Mrs. Carter Show" (in honor of hubby Jay-Z's real name, Shawn Carter) in Europe, then return stateside, ending at Brooklyn's Barclays Center in August.

The YouTube video is nothing short of regal, showing B donning her sparkliest corset and jewels and parading in front of her court.

SEE ALSO: Watch Destiny's Child Join Beyonce in Super Bowl Show

The tour title has already received some flak, many wondering why the advocate for "Independent Women" and "Single Ladies" everywhere has forgone her last name for Hova's. Others, however, say the name may be hinting that Jay-Z will join her on stage. No confirmation on that yet, but we'd love to see the Queen and King rule the stage together.

And, no matter what, all hail to Queen B.
--------------------------------------------------------------
With your eyes on multiple screens Sunday night, you saw Beyonce get viewers instantly reacting on social media to her sizzling Super Bowl halftime show. But just how furiously were viewers typing their thoughts on Instagram, Facebook and Twitter?

SEE ALSO: Watch Destiny's Child Join Beyonce in Super Bowl Show

The show generated 5.5 million tweets, helping bring the total for the game and halftime to 24.1 million. These moments were the most popular topics.

Among the tweets was one from first lady Michelle Obama.

SEE ALSO: 15 Things That May Have Caused Super Bowl Power Outage

Instagram users posted more than 200 Beyonce-related photos per second during halftime. In total, they shared more than 3 million Super Bowl-related photos.

Beyonce even got in on the action, giving fans virtual backstage access with snapshots.

Facebook users elevated their chatter for the halftime show, with these phrases increasing significantly in mentions when compared to before the show started.

Overall, two halftime moments made it into Facebook top 10 moments list.

Analytics company Bluefin Labs says the most social moment of the Super Bowl was halftime.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Now this is an ad. BlackBerry may have fumbled with its commercial during the Super Bowl, but the company redeems itself with its first ad spot targeting Canadian customers.

BlackBerry posted an ad called "BlackBerry Z10 Keep Moving" to its YouTube channel on Monday night, just before the handset goes on sale in Canada.

Frankly, this ad  or a variation thereof  is what should have aired during the Super Bowl. It's engaging, well-shot and most importantly, it highlights some of the coolest features of the Z10 and BlackBerry 10.

Even the song  "Elephant" by Tame Impala (iTunes link)  is catchy. Plus, intentional or not, the transitions seem to be an homage to Mike Nichols' famous musical montage in The Graduate.

BlackBerry also cut together a 30-second version of the ad, which you can watch, below. Let us know what you think about BlackBerry's "Keep Moving" ad campaign in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
When the company formerly known as RIM announced that it was doing a major Super Bowl ad, the idea seemed to be that this was an opportunity to show off BlackBerry 10 and its new Z10 handset. Chief Marketing Officer Frank Boulben told Mashable that "the objective with the Super Bowl commercial is to let people know that the BlackBerry is back."

Instead, the lackluster ad was a wasted opportunity for the new brand and the new product.

If you haven't seen the ad, check it out:

A company struggling for market share and relevance spends $4 million for air time alone and that is the result? Seriously, in what universe does that ad tell America that "BlackBerry is back"?

The concept behind the ad was that the BlackBerry Z10 is so powerful, it's impossible to show all the new features in just 30 seconds, so people might as well see all kinds of ridiculous things the phone can't do.

Here's the problem: BlackBerry's current reputation in the United States is that it's a phone that can't do anything. It's the phone that has no apps, that requires a reboot to install app updates, and that is slow to access the web.

Rather than showcase the many new apps now available for BlackBerry 10, the ability to separate work and personal profiles or the slick new time warp camera function, BlackBerry thought it would be better to show a guy reading his phone and turning a truck into lots of rubber ducky toys.

I thought the BlackBerry Storm ad campaign back in 2008 missed the mark. But after last night's Super Bowl ad, I kind of wish we could see stuff like this again:

Aside from a poor concept, I'm also confused by the timing of this Super Bowl spot. When BlackBerry announced it was participating in the Super Bowl, it made sense  after all, the Big Game took place just a few days after the BlackBerry 10 launch.

The problem is, BlackBerry 10 won't be coming to the United States until March  and probably late March at that. Is it really worth spending $4 million on an ad that confuses users when your phone won't be out for two months?

BlackBerry seems to be under the impression that it is not a troubled brand. While the brand's resilience is impressive  especially considering the damage done to it over the last four years  make no mistake, this is a company on the ropes. BlackBerry 10 is its last shot at making a big comeback.

There is a lot to like about BlackBerry 10. I've been using the Z10 for the last few days and am impressed  and a bit relieved  to see BlackBerry finally deliver a modern smartphone and smartphone OS.

Rather than pretending the negative connotation surrounding the brand and platform doesn't exist, BlackBerry should address it head on. Maybe say something like, "you think you can't do X with BlackBerry? Think again."

Or maybe BlackBerry should take advantage of its new global creative director, Alicia Keys. Keys made an appearance at the Super Bowl, singing the national anthem, but it's hard to turn that into a marketing opportunity. An ad simply showing her using a Z10 might have done the trick.

If BlackBerry is going to spend the money on celebrity endorsements, it should actually feature celebrities in its advertising.

Ultimately, this was yet another lost opportunity for BlackBerry to reinvent itself and reassert itself as a new company.

Over the last year, the company has made lots of movements to prove that it is now different. It has a new CEO, a new CMO, a new operating system. It even has a new company name.

That's why it's so frustrating to see reminders of the past  such as a holster case for the Z10  and advertising that is out of touch with market realties.

If BlackBerry really is going to come back, let's hope its next round of commercials go in a decidedly different direction.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The body of the lost and vilified English king Richard III has finally been found.

Archaeologists announced Feb. 4 that bones excavated from underneath a parking lot in Leicester, "beyond reasonable doubt," belong to the medieval king. Archaeologists announced the discovery of the skeleton in September. They suspected then they might have Richard III on their hands because the skeleton showed signs of the spinal disorder scoliosis, which Richard III likely had, and because battle wounds on the bones matched accounts of Richard III's death in the War of the Roses.

The announcement comes a day after the archaeologists had released an image of the king's battle-scarred skull.

SEE ALSO: Royals Lost and Found

To confirm the hunch, however, researchers at the University of Leicester conducted a series of tests, including extracting DNA from the teeth and a bone for comparison with Michael Ibsen, a modern-day descendant of Richard III's sister Anne of York.

Indeed, the researchers found the genetics matched up between Ibsen and that from the skeleton. "The DNA remains points to these being the remains of Richard III," University of Leicester genetics expert Turi King said during a press briefing.

Richard III was born in 1452 and ruled England from 1483 to 1485, a reign cut short by his death at the Battle of Bosworth Field, the decisive battle in the English civil war known as the War of the Roses. (See Images of the Skull & Search for Richard III's Grave)

Richard III's historical reputation is a twisted one, rife with accusations that he had his two young nephews murdered to secure his spot on the throne. The Shakespeare play "Richard III" cemented the king's villainous reputation about 100 years after the monarch died.

SEE ALSO: Oldest Message in a Bottle Found

But Richard III's true legacy is a source of controversy. According to the Richard III Society, which has been involved in the archaeological search for the king's remains, many of the crimes Shakespeare attributes to Richard III are on shaky grounds. Even the deaths of the young princes remain in dispute.

After the king's death in battle, he was brought to Leicester and reportedly interred at the church of the Grey Friars, a location long lost to history. Unsubstantiated rumors sprung up around the missing grave, such as that Richard III's bones had been dug up and thrown in a river, or that his coffin was used as a horse-trough.

Relying on historical records, University of Leicester archaeologists began excavating a city council parking lot in Leicester in August 2012 in search of the Grey Friars church. They soon found medieval window frames, glazed floor tiles and roof fragments, suggesting that they were on the right track.

Shortly thereafter, the team unearthed human remains, including both a female skeleton (possibly an early church founder) and a male skeleton with a spine curved by scoliosis. The male skeleton's skull was cleaved with a blade, and a barbed metal arrowhead was lodged among the vertebrae of the upper back.

An analysis of the skeleton, ongoing ever since, revealed many characteristics consistent with Richard III, including that the man died in his late 20s or 30s (Richard III supposedly died at age 32), and he had a slender, "almost female build," said Jo Appleby, the University of Leicester's osteology expert. (Science of Death: 10 Tales from the Crypt & Beyond)

The man would've had so-called idiopathic adolescent-onset scoliosis, meaning the cause is unclear though the individual would have developed the disorder after age 10; the curvature would've put pressure on the man's heart and lungs and could've caused pain, Appleby said. However, unlike historical records would suggest, the skeleton of Richard III showed no signs of a withered arm.

Appleby and her colleagues found and examined 10 wounds on the skeleton, including eight on the skull. None of the wounds could have been inflicted after the body was buried, though some of the wounds are consistent with being post-mortem, possibly as a way to further humiliate the king in 1485, Appleby said.

What does the discovery mean for the king's villainous reputation?

"It will be a whole new era for Richard III," Lynda Pidgeon of the Richard III Society told the Associated Press. "It's certainly going to spark a lot more interest. Hopefully people will have a more open mind toward Richard."

Where will they be re-interred? The University of Leicester has jurisdiction over the remains, and said today the Richard III skeleton would be buried under Leicester Cathedral.

Other interested parties had voiced their own opinions: The Richard III Foundation and the Society of Friends of Richard III, based in York, England, argue the remains should be reburied in York, since the king was fond of that city. The Richard III Society has remained officially neutral. Meanwhile, some online petitions have argued the reburial should take place at Westminster Abbey or Windsor Castle.

Jeanna Bryner of LiveScience.com also contributed to this report. Image courtesy of The National Portrait Gallery History of the Kings and Queens of England, Creative Commons

This article originally published at Discovery News here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Advertisers shell out big money each year to get it front of millions of eyeballs on Super Bowl Sunday, but some brands banked on social media to create buzz. In many cases, it paid off  companies that were quick on their feet during opportune moments such as the stadium blackout became a huge topic of conversation on the web, seemingly cost free.

The strongest example of this is Oreo, whose quick-witted ad hit just minutes after the power went out at the Mercedes-Benz Superdome. The ad  which said, "No power? No problem. You can still dunk in the dark"  was retweeted nearly 15,000 times and won respect for making the most of the situation. It created even more buzz than its TV ad.

It was clear Oreo was ready for the night though. Prior to that tweet, it sent out another clever message during the Half Time show in reference to Beyonce's performance.

Tide also worked fast to get a timely ad online.

Calvin Klein not only capitalized on the blackout, it also embraced the hottest new trend on the Internet by sending a Vine, a new service from Twitter which allows you to string together short video clips. The company tweeted a six-second video of a ripped man doing sit-ups, with the message "Since the lights are still out..."

Jim Beam posted a picture of its Black Double Aged liquor to Facebook, saying "in case you missed the memo... tonight's big game 'power outage' was sponsored by Jim Beam Black."

PBS also won big encouraging people to switch the channel to watch its popular TV show, Downton Abbey.

Walgreens got in on the action too.

Meanwhile, Audi said it would be sending some LED lights to the Superdome as soon as possible.

Twitter said it took just four minutes after the lights went out for the first advertiser to bid on "power outage" as a search term. Brands such as Bud Light and Speed Stick were among the bidders, while Calvin Klein purchased "blackout." This means anyone on the micro-blogging site searching for those key words were shown tweets from those brands at the top.

Which brand do you think best capitalized on the blackout? Let us know your thoughts in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Budweiser's poignant "Brotherhood" ad, which features a man raising a baby Clydesdale and then reuniting with him a few years later, is now the No. 3 most-shared Super Bowl ad of all time, according to Unruly.

On Monday morning, the ad had more than 1.5 million shares, the vast majority of which came from Facebook. That puts it behind No. 1 on the list, Volkswagen's 2011 Super Bowl ad "The Force," with 5.5 million shares. No. 2 is Bud's own "9/11" ad with 2.3 million shares. "Brotherhood" is No. 24 for most-shared ever.

The spot features a horse breeder who raises his foal to become one of the beer's famous Clydesdale horses. Cue tear-jerking scenes of the baby animal taking its first steps, the owner sleeping in the stable, and the horse running alongside his moving car. All of this is set to Fleetwood Mac's "Landslide."

The foal, which was born on Jan. 16, was the subject of Budweiser's first tweet, which asked fans to name the animal. Budweiser also posted the ad on its Facebook Page. The post received more than 19,000 likes and more than 16,000 shares.
--------------------------------------------------------------
For the second year in a row, Coca Cola tried an ambitious plan to run a Super Bowl marketing campaign on TV and online during the game simultaneously, but it looks like Coke's success this year was mixed compared to 2012.

In addition to running a traditional television spot during the Super Bowl, the soda company also ran a campaign online called "Coke Chase," in which three teams  Cowboys, Vegas Show Girls and Mad Max types  competed against each other in a race to get a giant bottle of Coke. Viewers could go online to vote for a team or to "sabotage" a team by throwing obstacles in their way.

Since the company unveiled the campaign on Jan. 22, 1.3 million people visited the CokeChase.com website, according to a Coke rep. Coke received 910,000 votes for the campaign and 7.3 million sabotages.

While the engagement numbers per visitor seem strong, it appears fewer people took part in the online campaign than the previous year. For the 2012 Super Bowl, Coke ran a live feed during the game showing the company's famous polar bears watching and reacting to the game. Coke later revealed that some 9 million people had checked-in across various platforms to see the polar bears.

Part of the problem, as Mashable reported Sunday night, is that the website suffered from glitches during the game. The voting and video features stopped working for many users during the game and came back intermittently.

That said, it appears the 60-second spot for Coke Chase was significantly more popular than the videos for polar bear campaign in 2012. Coke says this year's 60-second spot has been viewed more than 2.5 million times, while the Polar Bowl spots were viewed 1.7 million times collectively.
--------------------------------------------------------------
We asked you to get creative with Vine and send us your best works of art and visual creativity, and the Mashable community on Vine did not disappoint!

SEE ALSO: What Makes Vine So Hot?



Vine users shared a plethora of eye-catching videos using the hashtag #VineArt. The submissions we saw ranged from a stop motion man who really needs a cup of coffee to creative visual magic.

Here are some of our favorites. Keep the Vine art coming!

Image composite by Mashable via iStockphoto, Wylius and courtesy of Apple, Inc
--------------------------------------------------------------
Mac computers are normally very stable machines, but theyre not perfect, and a new flaw proves it. It turns out if you type "File:///" (no quotes) into most programs on a system running Mac OS X, that program will crash.

When testing this bug out in a number of programs, almost all of them quit immediately. This reportedly only works in the current Mountain Lion version of OS X, so maybe its a cool new feature? Will File:/// replace Command-Q?

The tests we ran let File:/// crash nearly any app that had a search feature of some kind. Typing it into the search or address bar of any of my browsers crashed them immediately except for Safari, which in this case had not been updated in quite some time. That browser froze halfway through typing the test characters.

Typing the characters into a text field of a website didnt seem to affect anything. When typing it in as my username and password to access my email account, and the browser window held up just fine. Typing it into the text field of WordPress did not have any adverse effects either. When sending an email to File:/// and the window still didnt crash.

The bug is being blamed on the Data Detectors feature of OS X, which gives programs the ability to recognize dates, locations and other data to help users easily integrate things like Calendar and Address Book. Data Detectors is triggered when File:/// is typed, and tries to extract a file from a path that isnt there. Then madness ensues, and the whole application crashes. Thats a bit of an overreaction considering the flaw is in something as small as Data Detectors.

Apple is probably flooded with error reports about this, so it will likely get patched at some point in the future, but considering how rarely most people would ever need to type File:/// its probably not a huge priority.

In the meantime, disabling Correct spelling automatically and Use symbol and text substitutions in the Language & Text section of System Preferences should prevent the bug from crashing programs, and you can go back to typing File:/// with impunity.

This article originally published at Geekosystem here
--------------------------------------------------------------
How far back do your Facebook albums go? If you were one of the service's first users in 2004, you were probably still printing pictures at the convenience store  or using Snapfish, if you were tech-savvy.

So whats a photography nut to do with her digitally undocumented pre-21st century memories? Grab those shoe boxes filled with prints and old-school scrapbooks. It's time to introduce your paper past to its digital destiny.

Some scanning apps offer decent results via your smartphones camera. Don't expect the highest quality results  a glaring overhead light will ruin your scan. However, free apps like DocScan (iOS only) and DocScanner offer a quick fix when you need a digital double on the double.

Transforming an extensive library of paper prints into an electronic anthology is a big task. Any flatbed scanner or multifunction printer will do, but for the best  and fastest  results, invest in a dedicated device like Kodaks P811R Personal Photo and Negative Scanner, which accepts everything from wallet-sized to 8x10 images. Canons highly rated CanoScan 9000F is much pricier but offers automatic corrections like fading and backlight. It can also handle slides and 35mm film.

If youre not into manually feeding each image into a scanner, sites like GoPhoto, Snapfish and ScanMyPhotos will gladly accept a box of your old photos and turn them into digital delights. These services can often improve your images, as well as provide a DVD or CD. Expect to pay as low as $0.08 per photo (for large bulk orders from ScanMyPhotos) or up to $0.44.

Photo-preservation sites like ScanDigital.com offer additional services, such as translating video and film footage onto DVDs. DigMyPics and ScanCafe are also worth checking out. If sending your precious pics through the mail makes you uneasy, visit a store that offers restoration services, like Walgreens.

Its important to bring some sense of order to your newfound digital mess. Shutterfly lets users upload and archive an unlimited number of photos. Other sites like Photobucket, Flickr, SmugMug and Googles Picasa limit storage. You can purchase more space for a nominal monthly fee: as little as $2, depending which site and which features you like. Of course, Facebook is another free and popular option.

Regardless which you choose, dont put your eggs all in one basket  or all your photos in one cloud. External hard drives are your friend. Back up all your photos for extra safety.

Now that your photos are digitized, bring them back to print in a fresh way  puzzles, t-shirts, mugs, cards, magnets. You name it, and theres a website out there that will make it for you. Some favorites include Image3D View-Master reels, PostalPix aluminum prints and iPhone cases, CanvasPop photo mosaics and Artifact Uprising softcover books.

How have you digitally preserved, stored and breathed new life into old photos? Share your own tips and tricks in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Dropping prices on iPhone and iPad apps drastically improves revenue and download volumes, according to one study. Developers can gain a revenue increase of 159% in a week with price changes on iPhone apps, mobile app analytics firm Distimo reports.

Price cuts have a greater effect on iPhone software, with average downloads growing by 1665% in a five-day span. For iPads, downloads increased by 871%.

Developers can see an impact in a short period of time. Distimo's study shows that in just three days, an increase is already visible. And the positive effect is lasting: the longer the sale, the larger the revenue growth.

SEE ALSO: Apple's App Store Has Record Revenue, Google Play Boasts Faster Growth

"There is a two-fold explanation for this lagged revenue growth effect: either an increase in income from one-off fees or an increase in income generated by in-app purchases," the company explains in its report.

Not surprisingly, the spike in interest is cut short when app costs rise. Downloads drop by -57% for iPad apps and -46% for the iPhone.

The report showed 850 unique iPhone applications and 930 iPad applications changing costs at least once in December, and their price changes fell within a $1 to $3 range.

Apple's app store continues to grow at a steady rate, with increased revenue in the fourth quarter of 2012. Developers can follow suit by discounting prices, since its payoffs are far reaching. The same results were found for applications in Google Play, though not to the same extent of iOS App Store.

What do you think of the study's results? Tell us your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
You know those Dyson hand dryers you're used to seeing in the bathrooms of airports, restaurants and hotels? The company unveiled on Monday a new way we'll likely dry our hands in the future  directly within the sink itself.

Along with a motor that essentially scrapes water off hands in a few swoops of air, Dyson has been developing new concepts intended to make drying your hands faster and easier than before.

Instead of dripping water across the floor as you make your way to the dryer, you'll be able to do it all in one place in the future, the company said. The new system called the Airblade Tap uses infrared sensors to determine whether or not you are putting your hands underneath to wash or dry them.

Mashable gave it a try, and it was much easier to use than we thought. Unlike some sensor-based sinks, which make you wave your hands under a few times before it registers, the Airblade Tap easily recognized when hands were centered for washing and off to the side for drying.

Another concept  called the Airblade mk2  is a sleek and angled wall model, which also touts the same super high tech motor. It took more than seven years to create and can skyrocket to 92,000 rpm in less than a second. The motor uses bonded magnet encased in a carbon fiber sleeve, and is one of the world's smallest integrated 1400W motors.

In addition, the company has re-engineered its original hand dryer with the new motor. The Dyson Airblade mk2 has two sheets of air  flying at 420mph - to scrape water off hands like a windshield wiper in just 12 seconds.

For a full look at the models, check out the gallery below.

Images courtesy of Dyson and by Mashable
--------------------------------------------------------------
Facebook is developing a new app that keeps track of user location, and reports that information to friends when they're nearby, according to a report.

The app will be released mid-March, and will run even when it isn't open on users' phones, Bloomberg reports. For example, Facebook user Shirley may get a notification that says Bob is around the corner  even if neither of them happens to be using the app at that time.

Facebook is showing a keen interest in location-sharing. The company tested a Find Friends Nearby feature in its mobile app last June. Designed to facilitate meeting new people, users can quickly add the "John Smith" they meet at a party, without confusing him with the dozens of other John Smiths on Facebook.

Friendthem, another company, accused Facebook of stealing the idea, however; and shortly after, the social-network giant removed the feature from its mobile app.

Facebook's new app would be similar to location-sharing apps, Glancee and Highlight, and would run in the background of users' phones. Highlight, for instance, analyzes users' Facebook information to let them know when they're near friends, as well as when they're close to people with whom they share mutual friends or similar interests on the site.

Facebook acquired Glancee last May. The company's staff joined Facebook, and at the time indicated that it would be creating products for the site's community as a whole. Members of Glancee's engineering team are a part of the group creating the new app, Bloomberg reported.

Would you use a location-sharing app made by Facebook? Tell us what you think in the comments, below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Video games retailer GameStop is pledging $10 million to help independent mobile game developers refine and distribute their creations.

The program is being run through Kongregate, the web game distribution platform GameStop purchased in 2010. Kongregate will offer developers financial services, consultation to improve their product and marketing support. Most importantly, it will offer developers a distribution platform across Kongregate (which has 15 million monthly unique visitors), GameStop's mobile apps, the company's website and its more than 6,000 stores.

Kongregate is bringing on former Zynga general manger Panayoti Haritatos as the vice president of the mobile division. Haritatos was the founder and CEO of indie studio Urbansquall, which was purchased by Zynga in 2009.

Developers are increasingly finding it harder to get their games discovered through the different app stores, said Haritatos. I personally faced these challenges in 2009 while managing my own game studio. Utilizing the Kongregate platform made my games successful, which ultimately led to my studio being acquired by Zynga.

Some of the other services available for developers include quality assurance testing, PR and marketing, assistance with in-game monetization, and financial assistance for those in the final stages of development.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A fierce debate over gay rights has gripped the Boy Scouts of America's Facebook profile as its leaders meet this week to decide whether to reverse their ban on gay members.

More than 4,000 replies have been sent in response to the Scouts' latest Facebook post  a simple message providing contact details for those who want to have their voice heard regarding the organization's vote.

The debate over whether to change that policy centers around a struggle between religious teachings and discrimination based on sexual preference.

Religion has long been at the core of the Boy Scouts of America, with more than two-thirds of Scouting groups affiliated with a religious body of some kind. Many of the Scout-affiliated religions teach that homosexuality is a sin, causing a hesitancy to allow gay members.

However, LGBT groups, some Scout members and affiliated churches think it's time to open the doors of membership to all, regardless of sexual preference.

The Facebook replies range from well-reasoned arguments to borderline hate speech from both sides of the debate.

"I think everyone should have the chance to take part in Scouting," wrote Marie Mullins. "I support an end to the ban on gay scouts and scout leaders."

"LGBT, Stop infringing on others rights," wrote Connie Lopez. "There are many who like this organization the way it is. If you don't like it, don't join. There are other clubs to join I'm sure."

"Banning someone just because of their sexual orientation is wrong," wrote Eugene Ramirez. "It's not about the 'gay agenda' it's about equality and supporting inclusion of any person. If they were considering allowing White people who were banned, or Black people who were banned, or fat people, or old people, or disabled people..I'D BE JUST AS SUPPORTIVE [sic]."

"If you do not like the way people do things then go else were," wrote Bernie Standiford. "If we dont want ot be gay...and we dont want to hang out with gays we dont go to a gay bar... if you dont want to be straight then keep going to the gay bars. But you trying to force your ways on folks will not work, it is by choice not a race ro a sickness [sic]."

"We do not have to change and cave to this pressure," wrote Dan Bailey. "Only the boys will suffer in the long run. If you look at the Youth Protection training online, it clearly shows man touching a boy inappropriately, and we all should agree that this is wrong. Why increase the chances that this will happen to your son?"

The Scouts are expected to announce a decision on the ban Wednesday, per NBC News.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A decade-plus of anthropological fieldwork among hackers and like-minded geeks has led me to the firm conviction that these people are building one of the most vibrant civil liberties movements weve ever seen. It is a culture committed to freeing information, insisting on privacy and fighting censorship, which in turn propels wide-ranging political activity. In the last year alone, hackers have been behind some of the most powerful political currents out there.

Before I elaborate, a brief word on the term hacker is probably in order. Even among hackers, it provokes debate. For instance, on the technical front, a hacker might program, administer a network, or tinker with hardware. Ethically and politically, the variability is just as prominent. Some hackers are part of a transgressive, law-breaking tradition, their activities opaque and below the radar.

Other hackers write open-source software and pride themselves on access and transparency. While many steer clear of political activity, an increasingly important subset rise up to defend their productive autonomy, or engage in broader social justice and human rights campaigns.

Despite their differences, there are certain websites and conferences that bring the various hacker clans together. Like any political movement, it is internally diverse but, under the right conditions, individuals with distinct abilities will work in unison toward a cause.

Take, for instance, the reaction to the Stop Online Piracy Act (SOPA), a far-reaching copyright bill meant to curtail piracy online. SOPA was unraveled before being codified into law due to a massive and elaborate outpouring of dissent driven by the hacker movement.

The linchpin was a Blackout Daya web-based protest of unprecedented scale. To voice their opposition to the bill, on Jan. 17, 2012, nonprofits, some big web companies, public interest groups, and thousands of individuals momentarily removed their websites from the Internet and thousands of other citizens called or emailed their representatives. Journalists eventually wrote a torrent of articles. Less than a week later, in response to these stunning events, SOPA and PIPA, its counterpart in the Senate, were tabled.

The victory hinged on its broad base of support cultivated by hackers and geeks. The participation of corporate giants like Google, respected Internet personalities like Jimmy Wales, and the civil liberties organization EFF was crucial to its success. But the geek and hacker contingent was palpably present, and included, of course, Anonymous. Since 2008, activists have rallied under this banner to initiate targeted demonstrations, publicize various wrongdoings, leak sensitive data, engage in digital direct action and provide technology assistance for revolutionary movements.

As part of the SOPA protests, Anonymous churned out videos and propaganda posters and provided constant updates on several prominent Twitter accounts, such as Your Anonymous News, which are brimming with followers. When the blackout ended, corporate players naturally receded from the limelight and went back to work. Anonymous and others, however, continue to fight for Internet freedoms.

In fact, just the next day, on Jan. 18, 2012, federal authorities orchestrated the takedown of the popular file-sharing site MegaUpload. The companys gregarious and controversial founder Kim Dotcom was also arrested in a dramatic early morning raid in New Zealand. The removal of this popular website was received ominously by Anonymous activists: It seemed to confirm that if bills like SOPA become law, censorship would become a far more common fixture on the Internet. Even though no court had yet found Kim Dotcom guilty of piracy, his property was still confiscated and his website knocked off the Internet.

As soon as the news broke, Anonymous coordinated its largest distributed denial of service campaign to date. It took down a slew of websites, including the homepage of Universal Music, the FBI, the U.S. Copyright Office, the Recording Industry Association of America and the Motion Picture Association of America.

Just a few weeks later, in Europe, as massive online and offline demonstrations, notably in Denmark and Poland, were unfolding to protest ACTA, another international copyright agreement, Anonymous again appeared.

After the Polish government agreed to ratify ACTA, Anonymous took down a slew of government websites and publicized street protests sweeping Krakow. Soon after, the left-leaning Polish Party, Palikots Movement Party, adopted the signature Anonymous symbol, the Guy Fawkes masks, wearing them during a parliamentary session to protest ACTA. Amidst this and many other outcries, the European Union scrapped this proposed law in July 2012.

So powerful was Anonymous in these events that a few weeks after they passed, I received a call from a venture capitalist involved with organizing the SOPA protests. He wanted to learn more about how Anonymous operated and whether its participants could be harnessed a little more directly. The beauty and frustration of Anonymous lies in an unruly and unpredictable spontaneityas they like to boast, We are not your personal army. But his intuitionthat they were an important part of the mixwas correct.

One key ingredient to the success of Anonymous lies in its participatory nature, especially when compared to spheres of hacker action where technical skill is a prerequisite for participation (and often respect). Skilled hackers are indeed vital to Anonymouss networksthey set up communication infrastructure and grab most of the headlinesfor instance, when they hack into servers to search for information on government or corporate corruption.

Hacking, however, still remains one tool of many (and some Anonymous subgroups oppose hacking and defacing). There is other work to be done: stirring press releases to write, propaganda posters to design and videos to edit. Geeks and hackers may have different skills sets, but they are often traveling companions online, ingesting similar news, following similar geeky cultural currents and defending Internet freedom, although using distinct methods and styles of organizing.

The depth, extent and especially diversity of this geek political movement was made evident to me just recently, not at an official political event but at a memorial service that doubled as an informal political rally. More than 1,000 people gathered in New York Citys regal Cooper Union Hall to honor Aaron Swartz, a hacker and self-proclaimed activist who had recently taken his own life, some say due to government overreach in his federal case concerning the legality of downloading millions of academic articles from MITs library website.

They spoke about Aarons life, quirky personality and especially his political accomplishments and aspirations. Like his peers, he abhorred censorship, and thus naturally joined the fight against SOPA; the service featured snippets of his famous keynote address at the Freedom to Connect conference from May 2012, when Swartz said, It was really stopped by the people themselves.

He had been instrumental in fundamental ways, for he had founded an organization, Demand Progress, a nonprofit that had effectively harnessed this citizen discontent over SOPA through petitions and other campaigns.

Unlike Anonymous, which has no single mission, physical address or official spokesperson, Demand Progress is an institution with a board and executive director located in the heart of political power, Washington, D.C. Although it channels, quite effectively, grassroots activities in the service of protecting civil liberties, a contained group can coordinate action with deliberation and precision.

Clearly geeks and hackers are behind distinct modalities of political organizing, willing to deploy a diverse array of tactics. Demand Progress, along with the prominence of the Pirate Party in Western Europe, demonstrates the willingness of geeks and hackers to work within existing institutional channels. And all signs point to this type of traditional political activity becoming more common. But it will likely exist alongside the loosely organized acts of disobedience, defiance, and protests that have also become more frequent and visible in the last few years, in large part thanks to Anonymous.

But on that Saturday afternoon, any differences were largely cast aside in favor of standing united in grief, in commemoration, especially in the conviction that the battle to preserve civil liberties has really only just begun.

This article originally published at MIT Technology Review here
--------------------------------------------------------------
For a stretch there, it looked like the Super Bowl had jumped the shark. This was during that 35-minute power outage when the world uttered a collective WTF? As commentators tried to fill dead air, the social media chatter became the focus of attention.

Oreo won the night with an apropos tweet connecting the incident to its brand:

At that point  a few minutes into the third quarter, it looked like the torch really had been passed from traditional TV to social media. As Lee Garfinkel, chairman of Havas Worldwide NY, noted during Mashable's live blog, "This could be the first Super Bowl where a tweet wins best ad."

It didn't turn out that way. Just as San Francisco executed a nutty, unforseen comeback on the field, so did traditional TV and in a more decisive way. The post-outage portion of the game was the showcase for some of the best ads, including Chrysler's "Farmers," Mercedes' "Deal with the Devil," Samsung's "Next Big Thing," and Budweiser's "Brotherhood." Just as viewers realized that there was a real game going on on field, they also noticed that traditional TV ads had some life left in them.

And they will for some time. People often balk at the nearly $4 million price of a Super Bowl ad, but there's no other venue in which ads are scrutinized so closely and watched by so many people at once. True, you can buy a lot of digital advertising for the same price, but you have to figure that the TV ad buy comes with a significant amount of built-in social media buzz. In other words, TV ads don't exist in a vacuum. They act as a complement and impetus for discussion in social media.

But let's set aside the medium. What really propelled the discussion was good advertising. That's a highly subjective term, but perhaps we can define good advertising as advertising that evokes an emotional response that connects well to the brand. Hence the real duds from last night are the ones that flickered on your screen for 30 seconds and then were quickly forgotten. (I'm talking to you, BlackBerry.) But it's hard to forget Budweiser's "Brotherhood" ad once you've seen it and it's hard not to project some of that goodwill onto the brand. (However, the ad seems to have resonated best with women, who don't fit the stereotypical profile of a Bud drinker.)

Masterfully delivered tweets like Oreo's also prompt an emotional response  laughter and an acknowledgement that yes, this weird incident (the blackout) really is happening. However, it's pretty ephemeral. Notice that everyone's talking about Oreo's tweet, but few are discussing its so-so ad. That's because ads that appear to be mainly about driving social media activity (Instagram in Oreo's case) are rarely memorable in themselves. That's a missed opportunity. Advertising isn't a means, it's an end to itself. You can play the game differently, but you can't change the game itself.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Making travel arrangements can be a hassle, especially when booking flights. Oftentimes, picking an airport to fly into can determine vacation budgets, but luckily, Google's got it covered.

Instead of searching by destination, Google Flights Search now allows you to look up regions. The broader set of results lets users see various airports in the area, instead of focusing on a specific location. The web-based tool, launched in 2011, gives the option of booking flights based on your available range of time or budget.

Now, with its new feature, instead of typing in "London" and being automatically directed to a list of flights, you can enter "England, United Kingdom." A list of different airports and prices in the region will appear, from Bristol to Leeds. And just in case you're willing to switch up your plans, Google plots prices for surrounding areas in France and Ireland, too.

Purchasing a trip on Google Flights only works from the U.S. or Canada, but includes global destinations. For those who are still unsure of where to head for spring break, searching by region might be easier on the pocketbook.
--------------------------------------------------------------
That gem of a quote from a hitchhiking good Samaritan looks poised to join "Hide your kids, hide your wife," and the erstwhile "Ain't nobody got time for that" in the lexicon of catchphrases culled from local newscasts gone viral.

The quote comes from Kai (no last name given) a hitchhiking surfer dude "straight out of Dogtown." Kai was passing through Fresno, Calif., when he saw a man attack a Pacific Gas & Electric worker with a car and assault a nearby woman. Our hero Kai then hit the man in the back of the head with a hatchet three times  hence the triple-smash quote  and ended the attack. The story has since been gaining steam on the social web over the past two days.

And here  riddled with NSFW language  is an extended YouTube clip of Kai's epic interview:

The awesome footage makes us wonder what would happen if Kai had a run-in with this sassy reporter.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Hewlett-Packard has launched its first ever Chrome OS-based laptop: the HP Pavilion 14 Chromebook.

The 14-inch device, whose existence was first confirmed in a leak last week, comes with a 1.1GHz Intel Celeron 847 processor, 2GB of RAM, 16GB of flash storage memory, and a 1,366x768 pixel screen.

The device is quite heavy for a Chromebook: according to HP, it weighs "just under 4 pounds."

On the connectivity front, it sports three USB 2.0 sockets, Ethernet, HDMI and an SD memory card reader. Buyers also get 100GB of Google Drive space for two years.

The specifications are quite good, but the price of HP's foray into Chromebooks is high compared to the competitors: $330. For comparison, Samsung's Chromebook costs $249, but has a weaker CPU and lags behind when it comes to connectivity.

The HP Pavilion 14 Chromebook is available in the U.S. right now over at HPDirect.com.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Super Bowl 47 was full of surprises. The first-ever championship game black-out, a dull game turned into a nail biter, and a host of summer-blockbuster movie trailers to drool over. OK, the last part wasn't all that surprising, since we expected virtually every movie trailer (and commercial) we saw. Some like the Lone Ranger were rich and finally gave us a feel for, for example, what Johnny Depp's Tonto interpretation would really be like (not as serious as we thought). Robert Downey Jr.'s Iron Man 3, on the other hand, was 31 seconds of nail-biting fun, but all-too short.

The Iron Man 3 teaser Marvel Studios ran Sunday night during the Super Bowl and soon-after hit YouTube and iTunes features Air Force One being blown out of the sky. Iron Man (Downey) has to save 13 passengers, though he can only handle four at a time. The bit is lighter than the last teaser we saw, but adds little to our understanding of the story line. At the end of the trailer, however, Marvel leads you to its Iron Man Facebook page where you can digest a far longer, "extended" clip, which also incorporates the Super Bowl (and YouTube-residing) trailer.

The best part of the Facebook trailer, though, is the first few moments where Downey more or less stares at the screen and then says, "That might have been more 'extensive' than 'extended.' " Expect that little clip to end up on the Blu-ray edition.

The third chapter in the Iron Man saga hits theaters on May.

If you're fans of the metal guy as we are, we're sure you'll want to watch both. The short one is above and Facebook's version is below. Isn't it nice to see how Marvel is spreading the love? I wonder if Mark Zuckerberg is happy about this.

Let us know what you think of the latest trailers in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Jawbone, a wearable technology company, announced Monday that it has acquired Massive Health, a mobile app developer, for an undisclosed sum.

Jawbone started out as a wireless gadget maker, but then took a step into the health industry in 2011 with the release of UP, a bracelet that tracks your diet, sleep and exercise similar to Nike+ Fuelband and Fitbit. Massive Health was founded in 2010 and attracted a fair amount of press and venture funding for its goal of using apps and big data to foster healthy living. The startup's first app, the Eatery, encourages users to eat healthier through an Instagram-style community.

Massive Health's team  along with the team of Visere, a seperate design firm Jawbone acquired at the same time  will now be joining Jawbone's staff. In a statement, Jawbone CEO Hosain Rahman said that the two startups will "help us to develop software that's both simple and beautiful and build the very best integrated hardware, software, and data platforms in the world."

Aza Raskin, founder of Massive Health, added that the partnership "marks a major step toward revolutionizing the way the world thinks about health" and "develop the next generation of beautiful experiences."

Both TechCrunch and TheNextWeb report hearing from sources that Jawbone paid "tens of millions" to acquire Massive Health.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Whether you're unemployed, underemployed or just looking for something a bit more interesting, Mashable Job Board is full of listings to take your career to the next level.

Since 2005, Mashable has been committed to bringing the top digital, social and tech news and resources to our readers. Over time, we've built a readership of 20 million people who are well versed in digital trends, social media and all the hottest technologies. So when the world's best companies are looking to fill open positions, they post them on the Mashable Job Board. New jobs are added every day, and many positions are exclusive  employers know that if they're going to find the right person for the job, they're going to find them reading Mashable.

Below, we've rounded up five recently posted jobs; check the Mashable Job Board daily for more open positions, and be sure to read our Job Search Series for tips on how to land your dream job.

"StyleCaster Media Group is the social media company for people that have a passion for style and culture. This disruptive digital media company empowers style enthusiasts and the brands that want to reach them. StyleCaster combines the art of traditional media with the science of new media to create premium content, engaging experiences, and integrated advertising solutions for all of its online destinations."

"We are looking for a Social Media Manager that can direct and oversee the social strategy for our four editorial properties "StyleCaster, Beauty High, The Vivant, and Daily Makeover" as well as develop innovative new strategies and ideas around the StyleCaster community and other social platforms. Our social media manager is a key part of our editorial team, as he or she is charged with representing our brand across all social media platforms, both in voice and in sensibility."

"Tableau Software is one of the fastest growing technology companies in the world, with nearly 100% annual sales growth. Tableau makes fast analytics and visualization products that help people see and understand data of any size or format. The company is on its way to becoming a large, market-defining company in the business intelligence industry and is next in a long line of high profile Stanford spinouts (e.g., Google, Yahoo, VMWare). Customers of all sizes use our products, from Fortune 500 companies, to video game designers, to scientists in the jungles of Central America, to high school principals."

"Tableaus culture is casual yet high energy. We are passionate about our product and loyal to each other and our company. We value work/life balance, efficiency, simplicity, freakishly friendly customer service, and making a difference in the world. Tableau offers exceptional professional and financial growth potential."

Position: Application Developer

Company: The Metropolitan Museum of Art

Location: New York

"This Application Developer will be responsible for designing, implementing, and maintaining Enterprise SharePoint 2010/SharePoint 365 environments, which include department sites, team sites, and workflow applications. This person will be responsible for maintaining SharePoint custom applications, creating and maintaining SharePoint sites, proposing and implementing governance strategy and controls."

"As a top-ranked, global non-profit focused on developing leadership, CCL aspires to extend its reach, influence and impact around the world. We develop more than 22,000 leaders annually and are opening offices in Shanghai, Johannesburg and New Delhi to complement our existing campuses in the US, Western Europe and Southeast Asia. Key to our success is advancing CCLs digital marketing and user experience to enhance CCLs reputation globally, engage our networks of alumni and buyers and generate the revenue needed to support our mission. This role oversees a mix of Web sites, social media outlets, client portals, mobile browsing, Apps and an e-Commerce system. Were recruiting a proven leader, strong communicator and skilled strategist to enhance CCLs presence in the digital world."

"The Social Media Director is responsible for the strategic vision and oversight of the University of Michigans central social media efforts for the Office of the Vice President for Global Communications. This person will act as the leader and primary resource for social media specialists from across the University."

"The candidate must have an established digital footprint and a continuous professional presence in the social media space (through blogs, Twitter, Facebook, Instagram, LinkedIn, Tumblr, YouTube, and other emerging platforms). The Social Media Director must be recognized as a thought leader and have an unquestionable passion about this work, with a proven track record demonstrating community management and brand strategy. He or she must have a finger on the pulse of emerging technology and mobile trends."

Check out these and other jobs on Mashable's Job Board. New positions are added every day, ranging from entry-level to C-suite positions.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Baltimore Ravens quarterback Joe Flacco had a nice little Sunday: His team won the Super Bowl, he played a stellar game, he was named MVP and he'll reportedly soon get a pay raise worth up to $18 million per year.

In the video above, which has been a viral hit online since the Big Game ended and originally aired live on CBS, Flacco tells us just how awesome it all is.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Prepare to take aim at the kill switch, silly humans, because the robot takeover has started. Bot domination is beginning in an unlikely place  Little Caesars Pizza.

YouTube user Stealing Axion spotted the early stages of the top secret plot in action. Hide yo kids, hide yo wife  robots will be our new overlords in 3...2...
--------------------------------------------------------------
Sen. John McCain found himself in some hot water Monday morning after tweeting a joke implying that Iranian president Mahmoud Ahmadinejad is a space monkey.

"So Ahmadinejad wants to be first Iranian in space - wasn't he just there last week?" tweeted McCain in reference to two recent stories: Iran's claims that it shot a monkey into space 

and Ahmadinejad's desire to be the first person Iran sends to space.

The joke was seen by some to be in poor taste:

Others didn't mind it one bit:

Some pointed out the joke was apparently hijacked from comedian and television host Jimmy Kimmel:

McCain later implored people to "lighten up."

Ahmadinejad wouldn't be the first Iranian to space  that honor belongs to Anousheh Ansari, who paid $20 million for a Russian Soyuz trip to the International Space Station in 2006.

Should McCain apologize for the joke, or is it okay by you? Share your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Welcome to this morning's edition of "First To Know," a series in which we keep you in the know on what's happening in the digital world.

Today, we're looking at three particularly interesting stories. Apple sort of revealed a new developer feature during one of the many entertaining Super Bowl ads. The Super Bowl did not go exactly as planned, though, as a power outage brought the game to a halt. And, if you want to hear a feel-good success story, look no further than Mojang, developers of the wildly popular Minecraft game, who earned around $101.4 million in 2012.

Check out the video above for more on these stories.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Despite attempts by Hollywood to curtail the practice, movie pirating continues to be quite popular amongst Internet users.

TorrentFreak provided a list of the top 10 films pirated through BitTorrent for the past week, and several popular favorites made the list, including several that are still in theaters  and up for contention at this year's Academy Awards.

Leading the list at number one, however, is Wreck-It Ralph, lighter fare not nominated for an Oscar. Disney's CG-animated comedy/adventure features a video game villain trying to create a new life for himself. The film has made $183 million at the box office, so pirating hasn't done too much damage to its earnings, though the movie is a bit less profitable than most Pixar-produced films.

James Bond's latest adventure, Skyfall, claims the second spot, though the movie is still expected to earn plenty from paying customers with its release on DVD/Blu-Ray next Tuesday.

A number of Oscar contenders also managed to make the list. The colorful Ang Lee epic Life of Pi sits firmly at number three; Paul Thomas Anderson's drama The Master, which follows a "lost soul" joining up with a cult, ranked in at number five.

Argo, Ben Affleck's tale of a real-life hostage rescue, comes in at number seven, and Silver Linings Playbook, David O. Russell's frequently nominated love story featuring Bradley Cooper and Jennifer Lawrence, ranked number six. (That film, however, is still doing well at the box office, on its way to a $100 million haul from strong word-of mouth.)

However, one film that could very well be suffering damage from pirating is Warner Bros.' crime drama Gangster Squad, which features Sean Penn and Josh Brolin. The film has made only $43 million at the box office thus far, lower than expected considering its star-studded cast.

This article originally published at TechNewsDaily here
--------------------------------------------------------------
NASA's Mars rover Curiosity has pounded into a Red Planet rock with its drill for the first time, bringing the 1-ton robot a big step closer to initiating its first full-bore drilling operations.

The Curiosity rover hammered the rock using the arm-mounted drill's percussive action over the weekend, completing another test along the path toward spinning the bit and biting into rock for the first time.

"We tapped this rock on Mars with our drill. Keep it classy everyone," Curiosity flight director Bobak Ferdowsi  who gained fame as "Mohawk Guy" during the rover's nail-biting landing on the night of Aug. 5, 2012  wrote in a Twitter post Sunday (Feb. 3), sharing a photo of the pounded rock.

Curiosity's drill can bore 1 inch (2.5 centimeters) into Martian rock, deeper than any rover has been able to go before. Using the drill and its associated systems is a complex operation, so the mission team has been building up slowly to the first drilling activity on the Red Planet.

Last week, Curiosity performed some "pre-load" tests, pressing down on a rock with its drill in several different places to see if the amount of force applied matches predictions.

The six-wheeled robot has also been carefully evaluating its target rock, which is part of an outcrop the mission team has named "John Klein," after a former Curiosity deputy project manager who died in 2011.

Curiosity's main goal is to determine if its Gale Crater landing sitecould ever have supported microbial life. Along with the rover's 10 science instruments and 17 cameras, the drill is viewed as key in this quest, as it allows Curiosity to dig deep into Martian rocks for potential signs of past habitability.

The mission team wants to test the drill out on a target with scientific value, and John Klein seems to qualify. The outcrop shows many signs of past exposure to liquid water, including light-colored mineral veins that were apparently deposited by flowing water long ago.

This article originally published at Space.com here
--------------------------------------------------------------
NASA plans to use a toddler's toy robot designed for "sensory exploration" to explore something else  planets. Yes, you read that right. The robot, which looks like a lattice of cables, rods and beads could be NASA's future rover.

At least that's the idea the space agency is working on at a lab in Silicon Valley, Calif., under its Innovative Advanced Concepts Program.

"The components are very simple," Adrian Agogino, a NASA engineer, told the the BBC. "Theyre just rods and cables connected together, and rods never connect to rods and cables never connect to cables. A child can hit themselves over the head with it and they wont get hurt. That happens to be great for what we want."

What they want is a structure that could land more easily on planets than the regular rovers NASA currently uses, which need complicated procedures to avoid damage when they land on Mars or any other planet in the solar system. This robot is flexible, and it bounces off surfaces, without being damaged by the impact.

 

 SEE ALSO: Astronaut's Columbia Tribute Is Only 165 Words, But It's Perfect

NASA is devising a mission to Saturn's moon Titan, where the Super Ball Bot could get through the thick atmosphere and land safely on the surface.

To learn more about this unique robot, watch the video above.
--------------------------------------------------------------
In case of an imminent threat, President Obama is authorized to order a pre-emptive strike using cyberweapons against the enemy, according to a secret legal review of U.S. cyberwar policies revealed by the New York Times on Monday.

The Obama administration has been drafting rules controlling the use of malware, and the rules of engagement in cyberwarfare. Some of these policies have been revealed by administration officials who spoke to Times on condition of anonymity because the rules are supposed to be highly classified.

Despite warnings by experts, including Obama's former cybersecurity czar Howard Schmidt, it appears the administration is ready to grant broad powers to the President to attack an enemy even when there's no declared war, but simply an imminent danger.

Allowing the President to order a pre-emptive cyberstrike when there hasn't been a declaration of war is bound to create controversy. "It is unclear how you would ever convince others that the attack was justified," Adam Segal, a fellow at the Council on Foreign Relations, said in an email to Mashable. "What proof could you offer that another country was preparing a digital attack? And how would we react if another country did the same? Without some agreed norms of how states can use these weapons and what targets are legitimate, we end up with a great deal of uncertainty and competition."

To Segal, those "agreed norms" shouldn't come in the form of international treaties, but rather "diplomatic talks and confidence-building measures like greater transparency about doctrine," he said.

But having secret policies can have its advantages too. Allan Friedman, a cybersecurity expert and fellow at the Brookings Institution, thinks that cyberwarfare is a field that "is not mature enough to expect anyone to have very clear lines, very clear public laws, and standards defining their use," he said in a phone interview with Mashable. "We simply don't know enough about the technology to develop that. So any policy is going to have a certain lack of transparency."

Also, for Friedman, secret policies allow for greater flexibility. "I think that allows at least a responsible administration to treat each incident as separate and unique, he said.

At the same time, Friedman thinks that having the power to strike pre-emptively and taking on the role of an international peace-maker is a huge responsibility that can't be taken lightly. "If we want to have the dominant offensive capacity as a way of trying to deter other people from being overly active in that space, then we can't use it ourselves, or we have to be very circumspect about using it ourselves," he said.

SEE ALSO: Cybersecurity Guru Calls for More Online Regulation

Officially, there is no record of any cyberattack between nations, although speculation has run rampant in the last few months. The United States is believed to be behind the Stuxnet virus that hit Iranian nuclear facilities, spinning their centrifuges out of control. This is believed to be the first cyberattack to prove that digital weapons can have an effect on real-life infrastructure, causing real damage.

According to the anonymous officials, cyberweapons are even more powerful than previously thought. "There are levels of cyberwarfare that are far more aggressive than anything that has been used or recommended to be done," one official told the Times.

Other attacks, allegedly carried out by nation-sponsored hackers, have been reported.

Last week, the New York Times itself revealed it had been the target of an attack  allegedly from Chinese hackers. And rumors indicated that the White House considered retaliation, with senior officials launching stern warnings to the regime. "We have to begin making it clear to the Chinese that the United States is going to have to take action to protect not only our government's, but our private sector, from this kind of illegal intrusions," said outgoing Secretary of State Hillary Clinton on Thursday.

In January, the Russian online security firm Kaspersky Lab releaved a 5-year cyberespionage operation codenamed Red October. Its authors are unknown, but experts have speculated that either Russia or China could have been behind it. And in June of last year, Kaspersky also uncovered Flame, another cyber operation that might have been orchestrated by the United States and Israel.

For Friedman, there's no doubt that this is an international issue, not only limited to the United States. "We are in a cyber arms race already," he said.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It's easy to take flying for granted nowadays. NASA is developing an airplane that will cut fuel consumption by half. Filmmakers are trying to use robot planes to shoot Hollywood flicks. We live in a world where 3D-printed planesare a reality.

But before Orville and Wilbur Wright built the world's first successful airplane, hundreds of wannabe inventors tried to find a way to take flight. Some came up with planes similar to the now-famous Wright Brothers Flyer. A few more went for bicycle-powered flying machines. And a couple of chaps even strapped on giant wings and roller skated off a cliff. Masters of aviation they're not quite.

Watch Mashable's compilation of funny flight fails culled from Internet Archives, and be glad you're living in an era when flying is as natural as taking a bus. A little turbulence doesn't seem so bad any more, eh?
--------------------------------------------------------------
Pinterest updated its iOS apps Monday, adding some new editing options as well as improving how users scroll while navigating the app.

Now, users can edit a pin's description, change its board location or delete the pin entirely  directly from the mobile app. Comments can also be deleted anywhere on Pinterest using the app, so users can remove offensive comments from their own pins, or fix typos in comments they make on other pins.

Pinterest first launched its app for iPad last August, alongside the first version of its Android app.

The latest version of Pinterest's iPad app is now available on the App Store.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Looking for public Wi-Fi in your town or city? The hunt may be about to get easier: the Federal Communications Commission is reportedly considering the development of free and public "super Wi-Fi" networks across the United States.

The proposal, first reported by The Washington Post, would require local television stations and broadcasters to sell wireless spectrum  the so-called "white spaces"  to the government. The government would then use that spectrum to build public Wi-Fi networks.

The public networks would be much stronger than average by virtue of the spectrum used to build them their signal would hypothetically travel for long distances and penetrate thick walls and other objects.

Update: The government is not building national Wi-Fi networks. Mashable regrets the error.

The plan has immense disruptive potential: If successful, it could cause many people to cancel their cellular and Internet plans in favor of connecting to the Internet via the free public Wi-Fi networks. The idea has thus driven a wedge between telecom providers and the world's biggest technology companies.

Many of the major cell phone carriers, including AT&T, Verizon, T-Mobile and Qualcomm, are reportedly lobbying hard against the proposal. Their argument? The FCC should auction the spectrum to businesses instead of forcing its sale to the government. Some of those companies are also claiming the hypothetical network might cause interference with local broadcasts.

Google and Microsoft, meanwhile, have partnered up in a rare move to support the public Wi-Fi networks. They argue that national Wi-Fi networks would spark a wave of gadgetry innovation. Both companies also manufacture myriad devices or platforms which would benefit from massive public Wi-Fi networks, from Google's Android operating system to Microsoft's Windows Phone and Xbox gaming consoles.

FCC chairman Julius Genachowski has come down in favor of Google and Microsoft's argument.

"Freeing up unlicensed spectrum is a vibrantly free-market approach that offers low barriers to entry to innovators developing the technologies of the future and benefits consumers," said Genachowski in a statement e-mailed to The Washington Post.

An FCC spokesperson told Mashable that the theoretical public Wi-Fi network is only one part of the Commission's plans to develop mobile broadband infrastructure.

"The FCCs incentive auction proposal, launched in September of last year, would unleash substantial spectrum for licensed uses like 4G LTE," an FCC spokesperson told Mashable. "It would also free up unlicensed spectrum for uses including, but not limited to, next generation Wi-Fi. As the demand for mobile broadband continues to grow rapidly, we need to free up significant amounts of spectrum for commercial use, and both licensed and unlicensed spectrum must be part of the solution."

The plan could also serve as a boon to underserved communities, members of whom often use smartphones as their on-ramp to the Internet.

The five-member FCC panel has yet to vote on the proposal.

Should the government provide massive free Wi-Fi networks? Share your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It's not enough for us to constantly be plugged into our devices, avoiding each others' eyes while texting and walking down the street or reaching for our phones during awkward silences. Now, you can stay easily connected to your beloved iPhone during meals.

The Anti-Loneliness Ramen Bowl gives new meaning to face time. Designed to keep solo diners entertained, the noodle bowl has a built-in iPhone dock placed on one end so you can comfortably view your device while slurping away. Your phone may be vulnerable to splashes of soup, though, as the design does leave it a little exposed. Check out the video, above, for more.

The dock's positioning and sound amplification lets you watch your favorite show with ease or share dinner with a friend on Skype and let him get a good look at your forkful of Sriracha. Just the dinnerware that everyone's been waiting for.

Japanese-based company MisoSoupDesign created the prototype and is taking pre-orders for this spring, the company says on its Facebook page.

Is it ingenious? Sad? A little bit of both? Let us know what you think in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
On Bosworth Field he lost his life, England's most infamous monarch, the supposed killer of princes. His body was taken from the battle and rushed by monks, the Red Cross of the Middle Ages, to the nearest monastic institution, the Gray Friary in nearby Leicester.

There it was buried, perhaps in an unmarked grave to prevent tomb-robbing retribution from the new king, the Welsh usurper Henry Tudor. There the body remained, despite rumors that the Tudor king had exhumed it and used his coffin as a horse trough.

Richard's body was undisturbed 50 years later, when Henry Tudor's son and his minister Thomas Cromwell started knocking down monastic buildings, including the Friary. The dead Plantagenet king remained unmoved by the construction of a 20th century parking lot, even as scandalous movies of his life played nearby.

But historians had not forgotten him. By the time I was growing up in the North of England  Richard's ancestral home, where he was always popular  a full-scale revival of the monarch's reputation was underway. The search for him was kept alive by a book, catalyzed by a screenwriter, and finally made possible by some very modern technology.

SEE ALSO: Bones of King Richard III Found Beneath Parking Lot

I was one of the first generations of English schoolchildren to be taught that the brilliant Tudor propagandist William Shakespeare had turned Richard into a cartoon villain for the ages.

There had been a very successful novel from 1951 by Josephine Tey, called The Daughter of Time. In the book, a bed-bound Scotland Yard detective and his American sidekick investigate the killing of the Princes in the Tower, tear apart the Tudor lies and propaganda  and conclude that Richard III could not have done it.

The Daughter of Time was so popular, then-Prime Minister Winston Churchill felt he had to huffily refute it. Regardless, it became a classic. Christopher Hitchens' brother, author Peter Hitchens, last year called it a "masterpiece" and "one of the most important books ever written ... [because] you will never again believe anything you're told until you've checked it personally."

It was a detective novel, then, that kept a King's flame alive. Generations of historians (and journalists) read it. It was one of the books that led me to study history at Oxford. It almost certainly helped inspire screenwriter Phillipa Langley, who became the next link in the chain to finding Richard when she was researching a movie that would present him as a misunderstood man.

Langley went on a detective hunt of her own, investigating the parking lot in Leicester where the Gray Friary was supposed to have stood  and sneaking into the closed lot next door. It was there, she says in a UK Channel 4 documentary screened Monday, that she got the "strongest sensation" that Richard was buried beneath a stall marked "R" (for reserved, of course.)

"I know how mad this sounds," Langley said. "But I had the strongest sensation that I was walking on Richards grave."

Most of us would dismiss such hunches. But Langley swung into action. She got the city's permission for an archeological dig, hired the University of Leicester to do it, and personally raised the 13,000 ($20,000) needed, much of it from Richard III believers around the world, in just two weeks.

Well done, Internet. You did it again! You paid to find Richard III!

So here we are, one year later: Richard has finally been unearthed, his slumber disturbed after half a millennium. Sudden and uncomfortable questions present themselves to British authorities: Where should this King in the North be buried? The nearby cathedral? Westminster Abbey? Should he finally be granted the state funeral due to a monarch?

None of that delicious disruption would have been possible without modern technology and historical knowledge working hand in hand. Researchers did radiocarbon dating on the rib bones, which showed they were from a man who died between 1455 and 1540 (Bosworth was 1485).

They also did a DNA test on the bones and compared it to two of Richard's descendants on the female line, 17 generations later. They got two matches.

As if that weren't enough, the bone structure was found to be consistent with that of a man who ate a lot of animal protein  which, historians knew, made him a man who spent a lot of time at court. He also evidently died in battle, covered in sword wounds. And he had scoliosis, which would have given him a nasty-looking curved spine. Not all of what Shakespeare wrote was propaganda; he was Richard Crookback.

We may have found his body, but Richard's character is very much up in the air. Recently unearthed documents show that the disappearance of the Princes in the Tower was being talked about during Richard's reign, making it less likely that Henry Tudor did the dirty deed. The Daughter of Time, for all its inspirational power, does not reflect current historical thinking.

The fact is, we simply don't know what manner of man Richard III was. He could have been a murderous usurper himself, a man capable of ordering the deaths of children who stood between him and the throne. Contemporary accounts are minimal. There's no radiocarbon dating for his soul.

Modern science lets us play CSI on a 518-year-old regicide, seeing the angle of the sword blows that ended his life. It also lets us digitally reconstruct his face (something the Richard III society has been working on, and will be officially unveiled tomorrow).

But the verdict on his death? Was it the justified killing of a child-killer, or the slaughter of a maligned, disabled man? That's entirely up to you.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The evolution of the Internet is one of the biggest game changers in the way we interact with technology today. As weve moved from the highly primitive ARPANet to America Online to browsing and streaming from a highly sophisticated wireless network, its hard to imagine life without going online.

You can thank the router for that. Yes, that little box with all those ports that you plug into the wall is actually the magical gateway for all of your devices to connect simultaneously to the Internet. Without it, you wouldnt be able to click through your beloved GIFs of cats, stream Netflix or even connect to Google. Have you ever wondered how it really works? The anatomy of a router may surprise you  especially since it hasnt changed much in the four decades of its existence.

Needless to say, the first system that functioned the same as a router  ARPANETs "gateway"  was a massive machine that looked more like a refrigerator than an integral part to building and sustaining an internetwork of computers. Now, the typical home router can be picked up in one hand. Todays most common routers work on just a few elements to efficiently translate your home's cable or DSL into a wireless or ethernet connection: a computer processor, RAM and flash memory, and ethernet ports. The few materials needed to make a working router means that computer-savvy folks can actually make routers out of an old computer.

What routers have an abundance of are reliable ports through which to feed the Internet connection. All routers have a WAN port, the cabled connection that connects the router to your cable or DSL. Then, theres a multitude of LAN ports  local area network connections that allow you to wire everything, from your Xbox to your DVR, to the Internet. Looking for the magical wireless device? Thats usually the antenna flanking the modem, operated often at radio frequencies of both 2.4 Ghz and 5 Ghz to accommodate all devices without interference (thus the term dual-band router).

Activating a router usually takes little more than plugging all the necessary cables and powering it all up, but configuration can be done through the routers available dashboard. In fact, you can log into your router by plugging in your IP (the number assigned to your Internet connection, usually beginning with "192.168") into your browser and logging into the system. However, different routers have different online dashboards, so check your user manual.

The way a router runs is fairly straightforward, since the system has become incredibly efficient over time. By taking in the cable or DSL information through a WAN connection, the router directs the information flowing through to ensure that all of the data is transmitted to the various devices connected to the Internet at any given time. The router is able to do that by individually assigning local ISPs to every computer, and simultaneously handling each system as a separate avenue to the Internet.

In addition to translating data connections and routing, the router is also the technology responsible for your firewall. As a hardware-based network security device, its the router that works with your computers software security protocols to prevent unsolicited Internet traffic  which could contain malware or other hacking technologies. Think of your router as the first line of defense in your firewall, throwing out any unwanted noise that doesnt look like its assigned to any computer in the network. This keeps your computer safe, meaning youll be able to happily surf online securely.

Its also worth noting that while routers dont necessarily differ on how they obtain, transmit and output data, not all routers are equal. This is particularly relevant when looking at wireless routers, which have become ubiquitous for their ease and access. Wireless routers operate on two separate protocols, 802.11g and 802.11n (also known as G or N). Newer models can handle the faster wireless speeds that an N-enabled router can provide, but if your computer has an older wireless card, then youll have to stick with a G router. N-enabled routers also have greater ranges than G-enabled routers, so if you find yourself discouraged with how far your Wi-Fi travels, check your router and consider switching standards.

No matter what your routers capabilities, this all adds up to one thing: Internet for everyone!

The way a router actually communicates with a DSL or Cable modem to provide Internet is an interesting concept that can be explained with a few abstract principles.

First, its important to note that every piece of information that the Internet has is actually called a packet. When you log onto a web page, for example, your computer sends out a packet of data and receives a packet in return that loads the information you request. This is actually a series of communication protocols between nodes, or specific endpoints by which the information travels.

Routers have a key role in transmitting these packets, serving as a sort of switchboard operator for every packet that you send and receive. They actually communicate to each other across the wider IP system to ensure the data is taken and returned to proper nodes (say, from your computer to Googles servers and back). In this context, the router is not only your translator but also your director, parsing all of your data to call up that cat picture you desperately wanted to see.

Without the router, wed all be living in the analog ages. In short, there are very few things more necessary to the Internet than that little box gathering dust in a guest room or behind your television, so make sure to thank it when you fall into your next Internet binge.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Samsung introduced a new innovation center, investments funds, and international R&D center Monday, all part of the companys Global Engine to Accelerate Innovation and Drive New Business Creation.

The new Samsung Strategy and Innovation Center (SSIC) will have a headquarters in Menlo Park, Calif., with offices in Korea and Israel. The project is being led by Samsungs President and Chief Strategy Officer of device Solutions, Young Sohn.

Sohn was on hand in Menlo Park Monday afternoon to make the announcement.

"We're in a very disruptive time," says Sohn. "It's a time of post-PC era."

Initial focus for the center will be in cloud infrastructure, mobile privacy, Internet of Things human interface, and mobile health. Entrepreneurs and innovators who are part of the project will gain access to Samsung resources including:

During the event in Menlo Park, Sohn spoke on what we will potentially see from Samsung, and technology as a whole, in the future. By 2020, for instance, Sohn sees smartphones incorporating Samsung's flexible YOUM display, and sporting 5G technology. He sees an opportunity for Samsung and entrepreneurs to work with new technologies, and improve how they can communicate with one another.

He thinks that battery scaling, security, new demographic needs, and data vs. insight are some of the challenges that will require innovation over next few years. For instance, these new devices will need batteries that can support them, and as more devices are created there will be new demographics of people that will emerge with different needs.

"This is an exciting opportunity for us to engage with entrepreneurs and innovators and empower them to leverage Samsung's technology and global brand presence to bring our collective visions to market," says Sohn.

To jumpstart Samsung's $100 million Samsung Catalyst Fund the SSIC will be holding a competition, SamsungCreate Challenge, later this year. The contest will award $10 million in seed investments for the winners, and will include incubation and support from SSIC's Innovation and technology Fellows and partnerships with Samsung R&D technologists.
--------------------------------------------------------------
In a time of darkness  er, power outage  Shaq provided all with a little bit of light.

During Beyonc's Super Bowl halftime performance, most within phone-distance of the stage had their devices pointed in that direction. Not Shaq. The basketball legend filmed a video of himself lip-syncing "Halo." Perhaps Bey should take notes.

SEE ALSO: Beyonce's Super Bowl Show in 10 Fierce Photos

Fortunately, Shaq is a social media superstar, otherwise we would've missed the most underrated part of the Super Bowl. He tweeted the video and shared it to Tout. Our friends at Tastefully Offensive uploaded the clip to YouTube so you can see for yourself.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Warning: Squirrels are on Reddit, and they saw that popular thread on "How to Cook and Eat a Squirrel."

SEE ALSO: Ugh, Teen Squirrels These Days
--------------------------------------------------------------
A partial blackout hit the Superdome in New Orleans on Sunday night less than two minutes into the third quarter of Super Bowl XLVII. Some of the stadium's lights, television equipment and the teams' electronic gear went dark for at least some of the 34-minute blackout. Other gear survived on backup generators.

What was the blackout like from inside the NFL's control room? CBS, which carried Sunday's big game, released the above report from its chief investigative reporter Armen Keteyian, who was in the room when the blackout struck.

SEE ALSO: 15 Things That May Have Caused Super Bowl Power Outage

The blackout was a popular subject on Twitter, generating 231,500 tweets per minute as spectators shared photos of the nearly pitch-black stadium and television watchers made fun of the situation.

 

Photo via Ezra Shaw/Getty Images
--------------------------------------------------------------
How will Super Bowl XLVII be remembered? As the night San Francisco almost suffered a humiliating defeat, only to come very close to snatching victory away from the Baltimore Ravens? As the night the playing field was left without power for almost 40 minutes? As the night Ray Lewis retired?

If social media is any indication, it may be primarily remembered as the night Beyonce won the Super Bowl. The singer dominated the evening on Twitter, Facebook and Instagram. Her halftime performance helped make this Super Bowl the highest rated Super Bowl in television history.

The halftime show, until the early 90s, was more of a pageant than a concert. Commonly sponsored by Disney, the halftime show was not seen as primetime for ratings during the big game. Things began to change in 1991, when New Kids on the Block performed at Super Bowl XXV. Even the pop group, however, put on a typically Disney-esque show. But when Michael Jackson blew the ratings out of the water in 1993, the sponsors moved to showcase pop stars at halftime. For this week's Music Monday, we rounded up the setlists of the iconic musicians who have played at halftime since Michael himself.

What are your favorite Super Bowl halftime songs? Who were your favorite performers? Let us know in the comments, and share any we may have missed!

Here's how you can share your favorite halftime songs:
--------------------------------------------------------------
Facebook has compiled a list of top moments from yesterday's Super Bowl game, revealing that two of the three most talked-about moments actually had little to do with football.

The top moment from the game was, of course, the ending: Ravens winning the Super Bowl. The second and third most talked-about moments were Beyonce's energetic half-time performance, and the power outage which left half of the Superdome in the dark.

By 8:22, Facebook claims, mentions of Beyonce's name had jumped nearly 49,000%. The fact that the phrase "killed it" jumped in popularity right after she left the stage proves that she, well, killed it. And when the power went out at around 8:37, mentions of "lights" jumped 66,000%.

These three moments were followed by the three touchdowns by the Ravens and Frank Gore's 6 yard run. The eighth most-discussed moment from the game was, again, not football related: It was the moment when Destiny's Child joined Beyonce on stage during the halftime show.

SEE ALSO: 15 Things That May Have Caused Super Bowl Power Outage

The ninth and tenth most popular moments from the game were Ray Lewis' retirment and the 49ers' field goal.

To compile this data, Facebook anonymously aggregated mentions of keywords made in posts and comments throughout the game. Check the rest of the stats, including the list of most-share terms from the game, over at the Facebook Newsroom.
--------------------------------------------------------------
When you factor in a power outage, killer ads and Beyonce, is it any surprise?

In addition to Jacoby Jones' 108-yard touchdown, social media users chatted about the Superdome's 34-minute electricity outage. Conversations during the technical difficulties topped 5.8 million social mentions, or 11% of the day's total conversation.

For perspective, Beyonce's halftime show ran from 8:10 to 8:22 p.m. and totaled approximately 3.1 million mentions, not including the "halo" effect after her performance (pun intended).

SEE ALSO: Super Bowl 2013 Commercials: Watch Them All Here

Overall, the social sentiment was 49% positive, 25% neutral and 26% negative. About 88% of the social conversation took place on mobile devices; of those gadgets, 60% were iPhone, 28% Android and 5% Blackberry.

Learn more about the Super Bowl social breakdown from the infographic below, created by Trendrr, which measures social media activity related to specific television shows (e.g., mentions, likes, check-ins) across Twitter, Facebook, GetGlue and Viggle. To see daily rankings, check out Trendrr.TV.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Of the 20.9 million Super Bowl-related tweets sent during the game Sunday evening, nearly 30% were about the ads, according to digital consulting agency Whispr Group.

A good ad didn't necessarily mean more tweets. GoDaddy's ad, in which model Bar Refaeli makes out, rather grotesquely, with an overweight "nerd," netted 290,000 reactions on Twitter  126,000 more than the runner-up, Budweiser. However, that chatter proved mostly negative. In fact, only 14% of the tweets about GoDaddy during the game were termed "positive," whereas every other brand noted in the study had a positive rating of 60% or higher.

In most cases, the ads did not significantly impact brands' followings on Twitter. Taco Bell and Budweiser brought in the most new followers  around 10,000 apiece  followed by Oreo, whose timely, blackout-related tweet helped it attract 7,700 new followers. Oreo spent approximately half the amount of money on commercial advertising that Taco Bell and Budweiser did. Even then, it cost Oreo about $495 per new Twitter follower.

Overall, Taco Bell's "Viva Young" ad, in which a group of retirement-age men and women sneak out for a night of clubbing, tatooing and (of course) late-night Taco Bell snacking, emerged victorious on Twitter, scoring the highest across all categories for volume of tweets, positive sentiment, new followers and ROI.

Other agencies recorded much higher Twitter activity during the matchup. Twitter itself says 24.1 million Super-Bowl related tweets were sent during the game and half time, excluding mentions of ads. Nielsen's SocialGuide tallied 26.1 million tweets overall, noting that the game generated almost as much Twitter activity as all three Presidential Debates combined.

For a deeper dive into the data, check out the infographic below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Twitter's report for Sunday's Super Bowl game is out, and it was a huge event on the social network, with users posting 24.1 million tweets about the game and the halftime show.

Twitter counts tweet volume in tweets per minute, and by that measure, Beyonce was the biggest star of the event, with the conclusion of her show generating 268,000 TPM.

The end of the game generated 183,000 TPM, and the 108-yard kickoff return TD for the Ravens by Jacoby Jones generated 185,000 TPM. Still, both moments were bested by the power outage in the second half, which generated 231,500 TPM.

As far as individual players go, the most mentioned players during the game were Ray Lewis (@Raylewis), Joe Flacco (@teamflacco), Colin Kaepernick (@Kaepernick7) and Jacoby Jones.

SEE ALSO: Super Bowl on Facebook: Beyonce and Power Outage Steal the Show

Twitter also highlights the way brands used the power outage for the promotion. Brands such as Tide, Oreo and Calvin Klein reacted quickly and posted clever ads related to the outage.

Check out the rest of the stats over at Twitter's official blog.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The toolbox of the average rebel fighting in Syria is full of things you have probably never touched: an AK-47, grenades, sniper rifle. But it also has something you might use every day: Microsoft Skype.

Skype is the go-to social network for communication between rebels, anti-government activists, journalists and officials inside and outside of Syria.

Why? Skype uses wiretapping-resistant Voice over IP (VoIP) technology, making it safer for transmitting messages while under the watchful eyes and ears of government censors. It's free to download and easy to use, both positives for cash-strapped rebels and activists. Its video-based chatting makes it easier to identify the person on the other line, important when verifying information as legit amidst the fog of war. And it provides an easy way for Syrians to gather electronically in areas where assembling in person poses too great a security risk.

"Skype was big in Libya, but it was just kind of emerging and the conflict was shorter," said Lara Setrakian, founder of Syria Deeply, the dedicated Syria news startup. "Skype is now where you go first. And we've been invited into private chat rooms, we've had some of them translated for us in real time. That is where rebel groups are posting updates and activists inside and out are having conversations."

Setrakian said that Syrian rebels have been smart about their Internet use in order to fly under the radar of government monitors.

"They've done a lot of savvy dodging, things like everyone using electricity at the same time of day to gate-crash censors, using satellite connections in hope those are better in terms of Internet," she said. "They know in Syria that Skype itself is not compromised ... but if the government gets into your computer, it may be able to access your contact list and that would compromise your contacts."

"But that doesn't seem to be stopping anyone," she added, "and what we have found is that activists inside the country, they figure Skype is better than the phone and any other option they've had, so they're willing to take that risk."

SEE ALSO: Social Media Becoming Online Battlefield in Syria

There are some technology experts among the rebels and activists  but they've also been getting help from the outside. The U.S. State Department has been actively working to keep Syrians connected despite Internet blackouts and other obstructions, including the threat of government monitors and malware.

"The U.S. State Department has been providing a considerable amount of non-lethal assistance with a pretty significant focus on technology to the Syrian opposition," a U.S. government official told Mashable. He added that a part of that assistance is training on the safe use of communications technology, including Skype.

"I've read in some circles people have referred to this particular crisis as the 'Skype Revolution' much as the Iranian revolution was referred to as the 'Twitter Revolution,'" said the official. "I would say that Skype is a primary means of communication for folks within the country and for folks outside the country as well."

In addition to training, the State Department has also been providing Syrian activists with equipment to stay connected. The equipment, which is at least partially satellite-based, was put into "great use" during a country-wide Internet blackout last year, according to the official.

"We equipped the activists so they can communicate where there are no government networks where there's no cell phone or Internet coverage," said the official.

State Department spokeswoman Victoria Nuland previously told Syria Deeply that the communications equipment provided to rebels keeps them "secure from regime tampering, from regime listening, from regime interruption."

The official said he has attempted to work with Microsoft to add additional security measures to Skype, but said that it was "mostly a one-way conversation." Microsoft did not return a request for comment for this article.

Skype, for all its advantages, requires an Internet connection to work  a connection the rebels have been working hard to establish and preserve with outside help. The rebels, said the official, deserve credit for leveraging communications technologies "often in a novel way." When asked about those methods, the official declined to comment for security reasons, but did say that "most of them have to do with augmenting these networks in a certain ways that are not necessarily intended."

"It's extremely impressive that all available technologies are being deployed by the Syrian opposition," said the official.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It's harder now than ever to accept a gun-toting badass's heroic qualities at face value. In our fiction, we've come to demand more realism. Who is this character who stepped on screen to save the day? Why is he so powerful and strong, able to take every punch and keep on fighting?

The success of Christopher Nolan's Batman trilogy attests that, nowadays, we prefer flawed heroes, with an extra helping of grit.

Lara Croft's return to the game world borrows from this idea. Crystal Dynamics has spent the last four years working on Tomb Raider, and studio head Darrell Gallagher hopes Lara's "origin story" will deliver a deeper emotional experience for players.

Lara is not in her element in this incarnation of the game. Sure, she's bright and plucky and resourceful, but the game plays upon far more reality than most action-adventure games. Most people wouldn't be sure of what to do when their boat crashes into a mysterious island, and Lara is no exception.

"It's not that she's unempowered or weak, but she's definitely out of her element and on the defense at the start of the game," Gallagher says.

Gallagher said his team focused on making the player feel Lara's weakness and fear. Escaping through a tight cave illustrates a claustrophobe's nightmare, as the camera jolts around Lara's head. Lara talks to herself the whole time  cursing, shouting, expressing fear  and her in-game animations show someone clearly on edge.

The studio focused on some real life survival stories, including Aron Ralston's experiences portrayed in the biopic 127 Hours, as inspiration for Lara's experiences.

"It's not just about getting to the summit of Mount Everest and planting a flag. It's about all the the things you survive on the way up there that make an interesting story," Gallagher says.

The gameplay had to be adapted to this change of mood, as well. Tomb Raider historically features strong puzzles in the game, but Gallagher says the reboot's challenges are focused on survival escapes.

"Many classic game puzzles have no emotional value or context for the player," Gallagher says. "We wanted to change that."

Instead, the puzzles and exploration all focus on surviving, and have a realistic bent. Much of the exploration centers around large hubs that would span several real-world miles. Lara can't access everything in these at once; she'll need tools she discovers through her travels, such as an axe, and bow and arrow that shoots ropes for zip lines. Things get easier for Lara as she uncovers the tools and weapons she needs to succeed, but from the looks of the game you'll have to work for every one.

In fact, Lara starts the game with no tools or weapons, and no way to defend herself for the first hour. It's not exactly a common convention in AAA games, especially because the world doesn't stop just if you're unarmed.

This is the first Tomb Raider to receive an M rating from the ESRB, as well.

This may not be the Lara Croft fans know, but Gallagher hopes she'll be able to communicate a powerful emotional journey. Tomb Raider will be out March 5 for Xbox 360, PlayStation 3 and PC.

BONUS: 5 Games You Should Play This Weekend
--------------------------------------------------------------
Is it okay to say, Twitter, I love you? Because I do.

My relationship with you, you old micro-blogging social media platform, has only grown stronger since we first met in 2007. My tale of distaste, acceptance and then adoration is well known, but that fact makes me no more amazed that our relationship has yet to cool.

This was no clearer to me than last night when I sat with my laptop ajar and TweetDeck blazing as the Baltimore Ravens, the San Francisco 49ers and the New Orleans electrical grid created one of the most entertaining Super Bowls in recent memory.

I dont care about football. I rarely watch regular season games and only tune into the playoffs when a New York team is involved. The Super Bowl is different. Its a massive, global, cultural event  a heady mix of intense competition, highly-produced marketing, expensive advertising, early looks at movies I want to see (and a good number I dont)  and now, a massive, roiling undercurrent of high-speed social engagement.

For you, the action may be on your HDTV. For me, its all on small screens, whichever one matches the occasion. (For the most intense Twitter-events, I need a physical keyboard).

The numbers for Super Bowl XLVII were humongous, by the way. 24 million tweets regarding the game and halftime show. Sure, the blackout played a role. The sudden loss of power a little more than halfway through the competition was unexpected, and launched some of the best and most clever Tweets Ive ever seen on the platform.

Facebook, which turned nine today (Happy Birthday, somewhat less interesting social platform), certainly had some traction during the game. They reported all kinds of big moments, with huge jumps in mentions of Beyonc and lights.

Where it matters most, though, I dont know if there was as much Super Bowl action  at least the kind Im looking for  on Facebook. At one point during the game, my wife looked over at me and said she wondered if anyone was watching the game.

"Of course they are. My Twitter feed is exploding," I said.

"No one on Facebook is talking about the game," she told me.

Later, though, she shared the games most touching commercial, The Budweiser Clydesdale Brotherhood spot, and got more than a few similarly weepy responses.

Thats nice for Facebook, but its not the same as what was going on on Twitter. From the half-time show through the blackout and right until the nail-biting last few seconds of the game, Twitter was on creativity over-drive. I threw in observations and jokes where I thought appropriate. Many of my tweets were retweeted dozens of times. It seemed as if the world was watching.

The more I posted, the more the Twitter community responded. It was intense and fun. So was the game. I was having a great time.

Its not a new experience. It happens with other big events, like the Olympics, the Oscars and the recent presidential election.

Each time, I see Twitter at its best and Im reminded of how perfectly suited we are for each other.

As a social media platform, Twitter is a senior member of the clan. But by technology standards, Twitter is still young. In those early years it was awkward and unfocused as a pubescent teenager. Tweets were mostly about nothing, with only the occasional cracked voice of maturity as evidence that it could be something more.

I witnessed that maturation first hand as Twitter transitioned to a rich, crowdsourced, micro-burst newsfeed. Without that change, Twitter would never have caught the Miracle on the Hudson photo or been a critical communication tool for hurricane Sandy information sharing.

As with any relationship, Im not always happy with the changes I see in Twitter. Promoted tweets are a necessary evil, but they distort the feed. I see something atop trends and for a brief moment think its important. Its usually not.

The slow-but-steady crushing of third-party API partners (at least those that do not serve Twitters purpose) has been painful. And while I was initially a fan of Twitters TweetDeck revamp, Ive grown to find it frustrating and sometime useless. In my Me feed, it tends to hide more than it shows (retweets, please!). For anyone measuring engagement, this all but kills the utility.

Meanwhile, Twitters homepage has not changed enough. I prefer it becomes more like TweetDeck with tabbed feeds that you can, just as with Twitters new Cards, expand and collapse at will.

It also pains me to see how broken the relationship is among Google, Facebook and Twitter. Though it isnt Twitters fault, Facebooks petulant decision to pull Instagram from Twitter cards is something Im sure the two companies could have worked out if they simply talked about it.

I get the sense that Twitter and Facebook execs rarely, if ever, talk.

Its also still too hard to search for Tweets on Google; Twitters solution for helping devoted users like me search back through our tweets is to perform the task on an offline file  which we have to download.

Even last night, at the apex of my Twitter pleasure, there were some issues. The service was at points overwhelmed by the Twitter traffic. For minutes at a time, I couldnt see my Twitter or Interaction feeds. The social platform might be due for an infrastructure overhaul.

Based on the recent security breach, it most certainly needs some protection hardening.

Despite all this, nothing has diminished my Twitter adoration. If Jack Dorsey hadn't invented it, it would have sprung into existence on its own. Its just such a natural fit for the twenty-first century.

I used to believe that Twitters time on the social stage would be short lived. That it would have the peripatetic existence of a MySpace or, worse, Friendster. I didnt realize how, despite its flaws, truly perfect it is.

BONUS: Super Bowl 2013 Commercials: Watch Them All Here
--------------------------------------------------------------
The big winner of the Super Bowl may have been Twitter.

Not only was this the most tweeted Super Bowl ever with more than 24 million tweets about the game, but Twitter as a company was also mentioned in far more ads than any of its social media competitors.

Twitter was mentioned in about half of the 52 national commercials that aired between kickoff and the final seconds of the game, according to a tally by Matt McGee at MarketingLand. Facebook, by comparison, was mentioned in just four national ads, or about 8%.

According to McGee, Twitter and Facebook were each mentioned in eight commercials during the 2012 Super Bowl, suggesting that Twitter has rocketed past Facebook in terms of prominence in Super Bowl ads.

Just like last year, Google+ wasn't mentioned at all. Instagram, meanwhile, got its first mention and a prominent one at that. Oreo promoted its Instagram account with a call-to-action.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Is your office dreary and dull? Do you work from a soulless cubicle? Does the very sight of your desk depress you? We can help.

We found 10 accessories for your office that celebrate the most mystical of mythical beasts: the unicorn. Why not "cornify" your desk? Then you can turn your workspace into your happy place.

SEE ALSO: Winter Warmers: 10 Gadgets to Keep You Cozy

Get your sparkle on and take a look through our gallery above. Share in the comments below any other unicorn-themed items you've seen.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Defying gravity is always sweeter when there's a board involved, as proven time and time again by the incredible athletes that compete at the X Games.

Case in point: This video montage of some of the best urban snowboarding we've ever seen. Eight of the worlds best urban snowboarders submitted short videos for the 2013 Winter X Games Real Snow competition, and this video is a compilation of their submissions.

The winner of the competition was Louif Paradis, but each of the athletes in the video has some really cool tricks up his sleeve. Check out the video above and tell us what you think in the comments!
--------------------------------------------------------------
On Feb. 14 you can be as mushy as you like with your significant other. If you're all loved up, why not tell the world with an adorable pair of matching t-shirts?

We have found 10 cute designs perfect for couples to wear on the day of love.

SEE ALSO: 10 Valentine's Day Cards for Your Geeky Sweetheart

Take a look through our selection in the gallery above. Let us know in the comments below if you and your sweetie would consider wearing the same tee  or if you think it's just a bit too icky.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Atlanta: Where everyone knows your name wants to slurp your brains out through your eye sockets. (Cue laugh track.)

The zombie-infested world of AMC's The Walking Dead is hardly a laughing matter. But throw in some cheesy synth music and colorful block font? Suddenly it doesn't seem as scary anymore.

YouTube user Matin Comedy uploaded a new, '80s sitcom-style version of the show's intro that might just be wholesome enough for the Seaver family to enjoy. It's got laughs, life lessons and  of course  lots of lost limbs.

SEE ALSO: 'The Exorcist' Re-Imagined as 80s Sitcom is Disturbingly Jovial

Here's to hoping Rick Grimes doesn't get any zombie blood on his Cosby sweater. Bleach is almost impossible to find during the apocalypse.

The third season of The Walking Dead resumes on AMC on Sunday, Feb. 10 at 9 p.m. EST.

What are some of the best serious-to-funny (or funny-to-serious) parodies you've seen? Tell us below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Call it the miracle on Francis Street. Last year Ryan and Jenny Carpenter got a deal seemingly too good to be true in their Kansas City, Mo., neighborhood: an installer from Google Fiber wired their bungalow to give them at least 50 times their previous Internet access speed and a substantially better TV service, all for only $125 a month, tax includedjust a few dollars more than theyd been paying Time Warner Cable.

Ryan Carpenter still speaks in amazed tones of the December night when he simultaneously streamed four high-definition TV shows (two Christmas specials, an episode of The Office and a Kansas University basketball game), recording three of them on the included two-terabyte DVR. Thats two more shows than he could previously watch at once, with plenty of capacity to spare.

It just blows my mindwe can be running video via Wi-Fi on two smartphones and on two laptops and also be watching and recording TV shows all at the same time, he says. Its a vastly superior service. And thats even without touching high-bandwidth web apps that work seamlessly at superfast speeds, such as 3D maps of cities that have imperceptible load times.

The question of how Google offered this value is a mystery to the coupleand to much of the rest of the nation. Its not that the technology involved is groundbreaking; the fiber and connections are off-the-shelf technology. Yet Googles supercharged service is priced at just $70 per month, or $120 with bundled television, plus tax.

For the TV service, Google struck content deals, including for some sports channelsthough HBO is not yet part of the mix. And all of this comes with a Nexus 7 tablet remote and two terabytes of DVR storage plus another a terabyte of cloud storage. And a Google spokeswoman says the company expects to operate profitably and that Google Fiber is neither a loss leader nor a PR stunt.

If thats true, then why isnt it being made available everywhere? The answer is that there are no compelling business incentives for the established players, says Blair Levin, a former U.S. Federal Communications Commission chief of staff, who helped write the National Broadband Plan and is now executive director of Gig.U, a consortium of universities trying to deploy very fast networks in local neighborhoods.

In parts of the country, slower-speed copper, fast-download cable, and a few fiber networks are already built out. The cable distribution giants like Time Warner Cable and Comcast are already making a 97% margin on their almost comically profitable Internet services, according to Craig Moffet, an analyst at the Wall Street firm Bernstein Research. As Levin points out, If you are making that kind of margin, its hard to improve it. And most Americans have no choice but to deal with their local cable company.

While Verizon operates the fiber network serving the largest number of home subscribers in the nation, the company is backing off from installing additional U.S. fiber connectivity. The companys fiber service, called FiOS, offers basic service starting at 15 megabits per second (which can be upgraded in some areas to as much as 300 megabits per second). As of last year, FiOS had about 5 million subscribers (most of whom also take the optional bundled television service)or roughly one-third of the possible market where the company has strung fiber. But CFO Fran Shammo said in a conference call last fall that there are no plans to expand FiOS beyond those areas.

At this point we have to capitalize on what we have invested, he said. The basic goal is to sign up more people in the existing service areas, which adds the most revenue without increasing capital costs.

The story is similar with other carriers: Comcasts Xfinity Platinum offers 300 megabit-per-second download cable service in some locations (for about $300 a month), and Time Warner Cable is installing some fiber in New York City office buildings, but the companies are focused on capitalizing on existing cable infrastructure, not emulating Google Fiber by building out fiber connections to homes and businesses.

In Kansas City, Time Warner Cable in late January (likely in response to Google Fibers presence) boosted speeds and lowered prices, offering download speeds of 100 megabits per second for $75 a month. For $199 users can get cable bundled with TV and phone service, with two DVRs.

In the United States, areas taking the one-gigabit plunge have benefited from some special circumstances. In Kansas City, Google has a good reason to experiment: its long-term corporate fortunes are closely tied to heavy web usage. At the end of the day, more web trafficand more eyeballs on that trafficmeans more ad revenue for Google.

All the same, Google is likely making a profit on fiber subscription sales alone, says Susan Crawford, a telecom policy expert who is a professor at the Benjamin N. Cardozo School of Law in New York and former special assistant for science, technology, and innovation policy in the Obama administration. They are making money on sign-ups, and not counting on indirect effects, she says.

Google wouldnt grant an interview about Google Fiberor even give the number of installations (though neighborhood sizes suggest it cant be more than a few thousand). But during an earnings call earlier this month, Google CFO Patrick Pichette said the company plans to finish building out the whole city, on both the Kansas and Missouri sides of the state line, and added that the effort is not a hobby: we really think that we should be making good business with this opportunity, and we are going to continue to look at the possibility of expanding.

Other special circumstances favoring one-gigabit construction can be found around universities, which themselves have skin in the fast-Internet-access game. Universities supporting the Gig.U initiative want to make sure they stay attractive to students and researchers who might want to access data and computing resources, and competitive with other institutions around the world that have such speeds.

Their efforts include a deal with a private company, Gigabit Squared, to deliver one-gigabit service in Seattle and Chicago in collaboration with local governments and universities. A similar effort is taking shape among several universities and communities in North Carolina.

A final kind of special case is cities that are taking matters into their own hands. One example is Chattanooga, Tenn. There, the local power utility in 2010 managed to score $111 million in federal stimulus money to speed up the build-out of a one-gigabit network for a smart electric grid. It is now offering one-gigabit Internet access, albeit for about $300 a month, depending what TV service you get with it.

But overall, the United States languishes in the middle of the pack of the worlds developed nations in Internet access speeds, with average download speeds of just 11.6 megabits per second. In many Asian and European countries, customers can commonly get affordable service providing hundreds of megabits or more.

So what would it take to get Google Fiberlike service everywhere else in the United States? Not everyone has the ambition and the deep pockets to wage long-term, labor-intensive, block-by-block warfare with existing, well-heeled telecom companies. Other startups trying to disrupt the Comcasts, Verizons, and Time Warners of the world will need similar access to capital as can be found in Googles deep pockets, Crawford says.

Crawford says broader access to low-interest financing would help, as would federal legislation to supersede state laws that make it hard for local governments to build networks. For example, in 2011, after the city of Wilson, North Carolina, built its own fast networkcompeting with existing carriersthe North Carolina legislature, amid industry lobbying, passed a law that made it harder for local governments to build networks and prevented Wilson from expanding its network beyond a county line, she said.

But even if costs and legal barriers are lowered, fiber economics wont work for private companies everywherenot even for Google. After all, as Levin points out, 80% of the cost of running fiber is in the labor, not the fiber and equipment, and not all houses are as closely spaced as the tidy bungalows on Francis Street, where the Carpenters live.

There are a lot of cities where the math wouldnt workareas not densely built enough or where construction costs are too high. In California, the environmental permitting provisions make it cost-prohibitive, Levin added.

The FCC says it wants to help. Last month, at a U.S. Conference of Mayors meeting, FCC Chairman Julius Genachowski called for broadband providers and state and city officials to build out at least one gigabit community in all 50 states by 2015. And the FCC plans to hold workshops in which broadband providers and state and municipal leaders can find and remove barriers, lower costs, and boost incentives for getting it done. Requests to the FCC for interviews went unanswered last week.

At any such meetings, its likely that Googles strategy and example will be a central topic. To help keep labor costs as low as possible, Google secured guarantees from the Kansas City government that it would get rapid responses on mundane but important matters like city inspections, access to rights-of-way, and even free rein to run fiber in sewers. Kansas City says it will provide the same breaks to other companies willing to provide similar service. Google also adopted a novel preregistration scheme, which had it start stringing fiber in a given neighborhood only after a certain percentage of residents  5 to 25%  committed to the service.

Its a good start, but the United States has a long road ahead to achieve widespread one-gigabit service. Not every town has a university. Not every mayor can get his or her hands on low-interest financing. The FCCs efforts may fall short, and its possible that Congress and the FCC wont make it easier for upstarts to compete with major carriers.

That might well leave Google or other aggressive companies to do the job. Crawford and Levin say they expect Google to expand to other cities. If that happens, then Google, with its long-term sights on web advertising dollars, might wind up giving an entirely new meaning to the term sponsored link.

This article originally published at MIT Technology Review here
--------------------------------------------------------------
There's a hot new startup in the limelight more often than not  but the cold truth is 90% of technology startups fail. Even companies which make it big out of the gate often lose momentum and shift from a potential powerhouse to a thing of the past.

A new inforgraphic from Allmand Law analyzes the successes and failures of well-known tech startups from Zynga and Shopkick to AirTime and MySpace, helping us understand why some companies fall short.

"The successful startups seem to be flexible enough to shift with changes in the tech climate," an Allmand Law spokesperson told Mashable. "Whereas with the failed startups, some fail due to a lack of vision and others have terrible timing. Ultimately, there is a lack of foresight which might have saved their companies."

Check out the infographic below for a deeper look at some of the industry's biggest success stories  and their not so lucky counterparts.

Why do you think some startups succeed while others fail? Let us know your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
You've seen Bar Rafaeli making out with that nerd, you've seen the Budweiser Clydesdales and you've seen Kate Upton for Mercedes.

But the Super Bowl ad getting the most online buzz Monday actually may actually be the one the fewest fans saw on Sunday.

It stars iconic funny man Will Ferrell and is a promotion for Old Milwaukee beer. A mustachioed Ferrell enjoys a passionate, extended make-out session with a middle-aged Asian woman over an obscure soundtrack. We can't quite tell if it's more awesome or uncomfortable.

The video clip above is taken from the Super Bowl broadcast of a local CBS affiliate in Ardmore, Okla. Rumor has it the ad only aired in three markets: Ardmore; Sherman, Texas; and Glendive, Mont.

Confused? Ferrell has long had some strange soft spot for Old Milwaukee, and during last year's Super Bowl an ad for the lager featuring him ran only in tiny North Platte, Neb. Here it is:

He's also produced a small handful of other Old Milwaukee spots, airing those in Sweden. Check them out here. And below, check out our compilation of all the major ads from this year's Super Bowl:

Funny or fail? What's your verdict on Will Ferrell's latest Old Milwaukee spot?
--------------------------------------------------------------
Fewer women are entering science and technology professions, and this new infographic created for City Town Info may tell us why.

Based on data from a new Women in Global Science and Technology report, the infographic reveals that women are outnumbered and outearned in science, with men taking home an average of $1,117 to a woman's $853 per week. Additionally, there are 3,000 more males in the biological sciences realm.

The mean suggested starting salary was lower for women as well. While some might argue that women take time off work when having children, not all females decide to become mothers, and both moms and non-moms alike are at a disadvantage in this line of work.

Luckily, the government has plans to support science education and careers for girls by partnering with private and nonprofit partners, and institutions of higher education like the University of Wisconsin-Madison has a growing female science faculty. But, as you can see below, there's still a long way to go.

This article originally published at The Jane Dough here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Ready to take your career to the next level? If so, youre in the right place  our Dream Job series explores what recruiters at awesome startups are looking for in candidates. Check out previous stories to learn how to score a gig at Birchbox or Klout.

Today, were going to talk about Fab, the ecommerce site with a special focus on design. The company famously pivoted from Fabulis, a gay social network, to a flash sales site for design-driven products. Now, the site is less focused on the steep discounts that once drew visitors but remains a design haven for its customers  65% are return buyers  with tasteful product selection.

Referring to Fabs growth, co-founder Jason Goldberg says in a 99U presentation, Thats not an ecommerce website, thats a movement.

In 2013, the company plans to continue its incredible growth in what Goldberg calls its third pivot. The direction may be influenced by one of Fab's value: To celebrate challenges more than successes. Last year, the company combated slow shipping times by opening its first warehouse, called The Rack, and has a second one planned for the west coast (already christened Rack West). Pending incarnations of Fab are likely to continue its identity as a well-oiled force for customer service, with fantastic design.

Interested in making customers smile with Fabs ever-growing staff? Be sure youre up for the challenge, current employees say.

The Openings: Just this week, Fab posted a desirable position: SVP of Product Development and Sourcing. Because Fab's brand is so wrapped up in great design taste and ability to present interesting products not found elsewhere  scaling product sourcing while improving quality is a chance for the right person to shine.

Fab is hiring across departments and locations, from a buyer for its pets category to a director of human resources in India, where its engineering team is based.

Most of Fab's open positions are for its key offices New York and Berlin.

"Fab was made to be in New York and Berlin, we're kind of two design-energy culture cities," says Goldberg. "It's very different than Silicon Valley  were a technology company, but were a design company first."

But the other locations are no less Fab than headquarters.

SEE ALSO: Fab.com: Behind the Design of the Sleek Ecommerce Site

"[Many] people would never spend money decorating the warehouse, but we do, and we feel that wherever you go when you're a Fab employee, the environment that you're in speaks to the company you work for, so we wanted to make sure that the warehouse and people who work in the warehouse as Fab employees feel like theyre part of Fab," says John Wu, SVP of logistics.

Since Fab's warehouse is nicknamed The Rack, naturally, workers there are called Rack Stars (similarly cute, Fab's customer service team members are called Crackerjacks). The company even has a guide book on how to recreate the Fab office, down to the desks and what color the walls should be.

"If you look around Fab, everythings starts with the products," says Goldberg. "This place looks like Fab. It's very authentic."

Hiring Process: Depending on the position, each candidate will go through a few rounds of interviews  sometimes including a special assignment, group activity or project. The next step is called the "Why Fab"  basically, it's an essay in which potential employees explain why they would like to further their career at Fab.

"Is this just a job, or just an opportunity, or a fast growing startup, there's got to be something deeper than that  why are you at this moment at this company?" Goldberg says.

It's a letter that both founders, Goldberg and Bradford Shellhammer read, says Director of Recruiting Renee Harper Lee.

Upon hire, Fab has a special gift bag messengered to the new employee's home  it includes a T-shirt, a poster and several other of Fab's unique products. Another welcoming gesture comes on the first day of work: The new employee is assigned a lunch buddy for the daily catered lunch, who will show them the ropes.

The Ideal Candidate: Quirky. Thats the word Goldberg used to describe what traits all Fab employees have in common. A presentation by Fab leadership recently posted on Goldberg's personal blog, describes what they call The Fab Way in more detail.

We're the best collection of smart hardworking misfits in the world, Goldberg says.

When interviewing and reviewing resumes, Fab's recruiting team looks for something unique.

"It's something that's not just ability to do the job, but that unique quality that takes them a step beyond," Lee says. "Maybe it's something that they've done, somewhere they've stood out, gone beyond the norm. It's that unique element that really just makes them an exceptional, 'Wow, thats a Fab fit.'"

Perks and Benefits: By far, the people and the work environment were most often cited as the best part about working at Fab. Goldberg says benefits such as free lunches and gym discounts should be seen as the gravy on top  the greatest perk he can offer is a challenging and meaningful work. Plus, the benefits are just there to allow employees to focus on the task at hand.

"We provide people great projects to work on with great employees to work next to and people who challenge each other, who are constantly trying to make this company greater," says Goldberg. "It is incredibly rewarding and incredibly demanding."

Nevertheless, Fab is on par with the generous benefits offered by leading technology companies: 100% benefit coverage for employees 80% for dependents, stock options, 401(k), competitive pay, sick time as needed, three weeks of vacation, catered lunch, unlimited snacks, site discount and amazing work environment. As Lee points out, the site discount is a ginormous perk for Fab enthusiasts-turned-staff  they can purchase Fab products at warehouse prices.

The best part of working here is 

When I first started working here, I was surprised by 
--------------------------------------------------------------
Emma Stone, Vanessa Williams, Tom Hanks and Samuel L. Jackson are among the celebrities who are uniting to "stand up to cancer."

In a new video PSA, above, the famous faces reveal who they supported on World Cancer Day, which took place on Feb. 4.

Viewers are urged to participate on social media by using the hashtags #istandupfor and #worldcancerday on Twitter, and to visit the Stand Up To Cancer Facebook page.

Did you participate in World Cancer Day? Tell us in the comments, below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
YouTube, which has live streamed shows during New York Fashion Week for the past three seasons, will not be doing so this season, Mashable has learned. A spokesperson for YouTube confirmed the news Monday.

YouTube, in partnership with its sponsor, Maybelline, has served as the live video hub for NYFW, hosting as many as 30 shows during the last NYFW in September.

This season, host IMG has partnered with video distribution platform Rightster to live stream all 54 of the shows taking place at Lincoln Center on its own website, mbfashionweek.com. The nine shows taking place at NYFW's other (significantly smaller) hub, MADE Fashion Week, will be hosted on http://new.livestream.com/madefashionweek. Still others, such as Oscar de la Renta's and Donna Karan's shows, will be hosted on the designers' own websites.

YouTube declined to respond to inquiries about its reasons for not hosting any live streams this season, only saying that it expects to begin live streaming shows again during the next NYFW in September.
--------------------------------------------------------------
When you think of someone who codes, you might picture a person hunched over a laptop in a dark garage. But that was the stereotype of yesteryear. Today, STEM careers have taken on a wildly different perception, and some of the coolest jobs around require a background in science, technology, engineering and math. After all, someone had to build and program all of the apps and gadgets you can't live without, right?

Below, we highlight 10 cool STEM jobs you should be jealous of. (And soon you could be an asteroid hunter!) Know someone else with a sweet science or tech gig? Let us know in the comments.

Liv Buli is the resident data journalist with upstart music analytics company Next Big Sound, where she creates a narrative around music and artist data. She helps to educate music industry professionals on the value of data, and she's helping these professionals understand how to apply technology in what has traditionally been "a strictly creative industry," explains Buli.

Part of her job is to write content for the Next Big Sound (NBS) blog, some of which is syndicated to Hypebot, MTV's O music awards blog, Billboard.biz and Sidewinder. She trolls through data to search for general trends in the industry, writes about buzzworthy events, festivals and appearances from the data perspective or she'll feature artists whose numbers are on the rise.

NBS syndicates the two charts to Billboard Magazine  the Social 50 chart, which ranks the biggest artists across the Internet, and the Next Big Sound chart, which tracks the fastest accelerating artists online. Buli curates the NBS chart to ensure the data is accurate. As a music fan, she finds this task exciting, since big name artists likes Alabama Shakes, Gary Clark Jr and the The Lumineers have all appeared on this chart long before their big break, and Buli is then privy to great new music before it goes mainstream.

Buli spends a lot of time in Excel and is learning to use mySQL and to query in R. In addition to the technical software, a music data journalist needs to have a basic understanding of the do's and don't's of chart and graph design, in addition to being very familiar with current events in the music industry. "My background is in journalism, so I often feel like writing is the easy part," says Buli.

"I am constantly challenged and feel as though I am part of something groundbreaking," she says. "I get to serve on A&R committees and speak on panels about what we are doing, and basically learn something new every day."

Who doesn't love Curiosity? The Mars rover touched down on the Red Planet in August and has beamed back photos, news of the weather, checked in on Foursquare and scored a nomination to be Time's Person of the Year. While we're all in the awe of this amazing robot, you might not realize that there is a human at the helm, navigating Curiosity over Martian terrain. One of the drivers is Vandi Tompkins (shown above with Curiosity's Earth twin), and she has one of the coolest jobs on (and beyond) earth. She holds a Ph.D. in Robotics, M.S. in Robotics, M.S. in Computer Science and a B.S. in Electrical Engineering, and spends her days "problem-solving with an incredible team." Interested in hearing about her day-to-day? Check her out on Twitter.

Staff scientists at 3M tend to be one of two things. There are R&D types, who are extremely knowledgable in a particular field (such as organic chemistry or optical physics), and there are people on the inventor/developer side. Ray Johnston is the latter, and he invented 3M's LED Advanced Lighting, 3M's first-ever consumer bulb, which boasts a 25-year lifespan.

"I get to work with all these people to examine a basic question, an idea that I might have for a product or a product platform," says Johnston, who was trained as a chemical engineer and holds numerous patents. "It doesnt make a lot of sense that I'd be the inventor of a lightbulb, but that's the beauty of a science and engineering background ... I like to say that I get paid to play." The LED bulb was a germ of an idea in 2009, and he bounced it off several people, received encouragement and advice, and brought the bulb to market in 2012.

To do their job, Johnston and the other 100 or so staff scientists talk to customers about pain points and scan the world outside 3M to find out about new and emerging technologies, then think about how they can be applied to 3M products. These scientists have nailed the work-life balance; Johnston says they're cross-country skiiers, weight lifters, dancers, and these extracurriculars help the scientists be better at their jobs, since they're exposing themselves to various environments that could be fertile ground for innovative new products.

"One of the things I really enjoy about working at 3M is getting the chance to work with very intelligent people, which helps you come up come up with really cool ideas," he says. "It's extremely fun, rewarding and challenging."

Johnston also revels in the fact that 3M works on new technologies, such as the films in the iPhone display, in addition to improving older products, like the 100-year-old sandpaper industry.

Johnston has been at 3M since 1980, but his career's been exciting because there's always something new to explore and the culture is one of innovation. "We're compensated pretty well, we're technically trained and we're professionals," he says. "But the other thing is that as you're trained and you develop proficiency in science and engineering, you really have developed a capability that allows you to do almost anything. You develop the skillset of how to learn, which makes the process of learning easier, so you can be very adaptable. You can grow older and develop new interests. So getting that background literally opens the world to you, it really opens doors."

Those EA golf games are pretty lifelike, huh? That's because it's someone's job to fly around the world and scan famous golf courses and arenas so they can be as real as possible. That someone is Shannon Yates, who's been an environmental modeler for 12 years, and has been working on Tiger Woods PGA Tour since 2008. For his work on the golf game, Yates spends up to eight days capturing thousands of high resolution photos and surveying an entire golf course using HDS (high definition survey) equipment, Cyclone and Scene. He logs as many as 150 scan locations on a golf course, which provides raw data that's within 6mm of accuracy.

After returning to the studio, Yates and team process and export the data to Maya, the 3D modeling application EA uses to create and texture the art you see and interact with in game. So don't take that lush grass for granted  there's a lot of data in each blade, and you can thank Yates for it.

Yates says it's fun to stay on top of ever-improving technology, explaining that "each day presents new problems to solve and interaction with some of the most talented individuals in this industry." And because EA wants every release to be better than the last, modelers are encouraged to innovate and test.

 

Then there's the travel. "Seeing the world, working in some of the most beautiful environments you can imagine and then seeing those same environments come to life in game  Whats not to love?"



Tumblr is home to 92.7 million blogs, which churn out 76,139,943 pieces of content per day and yield 20 billion monthly pageviews. The word "Tumblr" has pretty much become synonymous with "blog," and it takes a lot of work to keep a product like that top-notch. Renee Perron is project manager at Tumblr, where she helps the product engineering team complete their projects on time and with all the tools they need, so that Tumblr can become better and better. "What that involves is some QA, light coding, filing and assigning site bugs, helping to prioritize new features, working with outside partners, and lots of running around and asking people for favors," says Perron. She works in the project management system Atlassian JIRA, combs through Zendesk support tickets and makes small PHP changes to improve the Tumblr experience for its millions of users.

Perron earned a master's in Multimedia Journalism, and it was in that program where she learned her first bits of HTML and got involved in social media. Soon after, she started working for Tumblr Support, where she picked up more about the Internet and programming, and she recently started working for the product team.

"Besides working with a great team who all love what they do, the best thing about my job is the ability to learn while I'm working," she says. "I'm constantly picking up new skills (and hopefully new languages), and as long as I'm not afraid of taking something else on, there's always something new to do."

Yes, you can make a living by knowing every detail about RBIs, third-down conversions and triple-doubles. That's right, if you've ever wondered how announcers come up with those totally obscure stats right after a play, the answer is that it's someone's job to research that data. It's also someone's job to figure out how to optimize plays by studying the numbers  should we go for the two-point conversion? Should we switch up the pitcher now?

We've all seen Moneyball  sports are games of data. That's why many teams have statisticians on-hand, and ESPN has an entire analyst group. Dean Oliver is one of the best analysts around, having helped to pioneer the statistical evaluation of basketball (a.k.a. APBRmetrics), which he explains in Basketball on Paper. "I build statistical tools to better understand sports, who is good, what tactics work, and how to put all the pieces together," explains Oliver, who uses statistics, engineering, economics and a good understanding of sports to create his models.

Oliver joined ESPN as director of production analytics in 2011 after spending several years with the Denver Nuggets and Seattle Supersonics, where he some programming language, statistical packages, databases and Excel to provide insights to management about trades, free agency, draft analysis and coaching issues. Oliver earned a Ph.D. from the University of North Carolina in 1994, having worked in environmental engineering, risk analysis and mathematical modeling.

Pay attention to Oliver's statistical models  they could help you draft some killer sleepers for your fantasy team.

Erik Bernhardsson is technical lead at Spotify, where he helped to build a music recommendation system based on large-scale machine learning algorithms, mainly matrix factorization of big matrices using Hadoop. He moved into this role after heading the Business Intelligence team, where he collected, aggregated and made sense of all the data at Spotify, whether that's ad-hoc insights, A/B testing, visualization or ad optimization.

Bernhardsson's roots at Spotify date back to 2008, when he interned for the company while writing his master's thesis on systems for automatic music recommendations (he was awarded master's thesis of the year by Naturvetarna, and we all know where that led).

William Wagner is a hybrid of a 3D Printing Engineer and a Materials manager. In short, he ensures that each customer's creations are produced as quickly as possible, and he also explores how new materials can be integrated into 3D printing (Shapeways prints in ceramic, steel and more) to enhance the technology. He's always looking to improve product quality and production efficiency.

"Additive manufacturing is a relatively new field, so the technology is still in a volatile state of evolution," explains Wagner. "My job is to find new uses for materials and finishes that will bring Additive products closer to traditionally manufactured alternatives. This often involves hacking into industrial 3D printers and getting my hands dirty messing with resins, molten metal, glass, and aerosol coatings. How cool is that?"

David Parker is the Director of R&D at Novacoast, where he works in computer security, often dabbling in "James Bond-like projects." Penetration testing, which is also known as ethical hacking or white hat hacking, is the term used to describe what Parker does when anyone from banks to hospitals to educational institutions and government hires him to break into their systems as a malicious hacker or unhappy employee would. After breaking in, Parker and his team present a detailed report that "usually shocks the executives," and then he helps them remediate their security vulnerabilities and develop custom software to make their systems safer yet easy to use.

"It's always fun and a little scary when you get deep into an assessment and realize you're one flip of a switch away from printing bank checks, adding your coworker's mugshot into a police department database, or shutting down a state's primary gas pipeline," says Parker, who has a degree in computer science. "The job takes a good deal of curiosity, persistence, creativity, a strong technical background, understanding of the languages that computers and networks use to communicate with each other, and a bit of competitive spirit."

Who doesn't love playing with Legos? Now imagine putting your "architectural expertise" to work, building roller coasters for the Legoland. That's the job of Mandy Jouan, a model designer who designs the Lego models at Legoland, the thrill-inducing nerd mecca.

Jouan graduated with a degree in sculpture and took a few electrical design courses, which helps her integrate animations into the models. To build models, she uses several computer programs, such as Rhino, Photoshop and a proprietary program created specifically for master model builders (though she sometimes does it the old-fashioned way and draws ideas with pen and paper).

 

She says her favorite part of the job is taking a Lego model design from concept to finish. "It is incredibly rewarding being able to see it a final product that I designed out in the public making the guests smile and hopefully inspire them to be creative in their own lives," she says.

Want to get your science on? Here are 10 must-follow science Tumblrs...
--------------------------------------------------------------
It's nothing but net for this 2-year-old who is putting the NBA to shame.

Titus (baller name, kid) has been playing b-ball since he was 18-months-old. He likes to casually shoot hoops while sucking on a pacifier and lounging on a trampoline. He'll fit right in with the pros.

SEE ALSO: Is This the Coolest Basketball Coach of All Time?

We suggest LeBron James and Carmelo Anthony start training with him now and Nike start pestering him with a shoe deal ASAP.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Aaron Swartz, the late digital rights activist and hacker, did not kill himself because he was depressed, according to his girlfriend.

Taren Stinebrickner-Kauffman found Swartz dead in their Brooklyn apartment on Jan. 11, and as she explains, she is the person Swartz spent the most time with in the last 20 months of his life  living together, commuting together and working together. And for her, that person she spent so much time with was not showing symptoms of depression, according to an emotional blog post on Tumblr.

At the time of his death, Swartz was facing a potential conviction of 35 years and up to $1 million in fines for allegedly downloading thousands of scholarly articles from the online database JSTOR with a hidden computer connected to the Massachusetts Institute of Technology's network. His family and supporters have been repeatedly pointing their finger at overzealous prosecutors to explain his suicide. And Stinebrickner-Kauffman agrees, even if she isn't sure what killed him.

"I dont know exactly why Aaron killed himself. I dont know exactly what was going through his mind. If I had known those things on January 11, if I had even known the right questions to ask, maybe I could have stopped him. Since January 11, I think about it every hour of every day. . . I believe Aarons death was caused by exhaustion, by fear, and by uncertainty. I believe that Aarons death was caused by a persecution and a prosecution that had already wound on for 2 years (what happened to our right to a speedy trial?) and had already drained all of his financial resources. I believe that Aarons death was caused by a criminal justice system that prioritizes power over mercy, vengeance over justice; a system that punishes innocent people for trying to prove their innocence instead of accepting plea deals that mark them as criminals in perpetuity; a system where incentives and power structures align for prosecutors to destroy the life of an innovator like Aaron in the pursuit of their own ambitions."

Stinebrickner-Kauffman doesn't believe Aaron was depressed in the first place, as she told The Atlantic Wire. That's why she thinks the sole cause of his suicide was his criminal case.

"If on January 10, Steve Heymann and Carmen Ortiz at the Massachusetts US Attorneys office had called Aarons lawyer and said theyd realized their mistake and that they were dropping all charges  or even for that matter that they were ready to offer a reasonable plea deal that wouldnt have marked Aaron as a felon for the rest of his life  would Aaron have killed himself on January 11? The answer is unquestionably no."

At the Aaron Swartz memorial in New York on Jan. 19, a teary-eyed Stinebrickner-Kauffman revealed Swartz had told her he wanted to get married to her just two months before his suicide. Was he or wasn't he depressed when he killed himself? It's hard to know, but Swartz suffered from depression before.

SEE ALSO: Anonymous Hacks US Government Site, Threatens Supreme 'Warheads'

After Swartz's death, the prosecution has come under scrutiny and not only from his family and supporters. MIT's president appointed a professor to lead an investigation into the school's role in Swartz's case and several lawmakers are demanding answers from the Department of Justice on its handling of the case.

U.S. Attorney Carmen Ortiz, the leading prosecutor in the case, defended her office's conduct, calling it appropriate and revealing that they never intended to ask for the maximum sentence but just six months of prison.

At the same time, Rep. Zoe Lofgren (D-Calif.) has been working on reforming the Computer Abuse and Fraud Act, the 1986 law that was being used to bring charges against Swartz.
--------------------------------------------------------------
About.me wants to be a startup again.

About.me, which lets users quickly create visually impressive online calling cards, was acquired by AOL in 2010 just four days after it launched publicly. Now, a little more than two years later, the two founders of About.me announced in a blog post that they are buying the company back from AOL.

"During the past two years, weve been thankful for the tremendous resources and support of our friends and partners at AOL," the founders wrote on Tuesday. "Today, were thrilled to announce that well be spinning about.me back out, returning to life as an independent company that is financially backed by our management team and a truly amazing group of investors."

Since the startup was acquired, it has focused on building up its user base by releasing an app, working with celebrities to bring attention to the service and partnering with companies like Moo.com to offer users printed business cards based on their About.me profiles. However, not much has changed with About.me's core product since it was acquired.

Tony Conrad, co-founder of About.me, told The New York Times that the team thinks it can build the startup "so much faster" by being independent. The founders did not disclose how much they're paying to take back About.me, but they did tell the Times that it was a small percentage of what AOL paid to acquire it originally. AOL will continue to hold a 8% stake in the startup.

The Times also reports that the startup is planning to announce a $5.7 million round of funding later this week.
--------------------------------------------------------------
On Tuesday, Instagram announced that users can now browse photo feeds on the web  something users have only been able to do on their mobile devices for the past two-odd years. The feed is, essentially, just a blown-up version of the one that exists on mobile, with one big difference: There's plenty of room in the margins for ads.

SEE ALSO: Finally! Your Full Instagram Feed Hits the Web

Our senior tech analyst, Christina Warren, created a mockup of what Instagram.com could look like if it began displaying ads in the style of its parent company, Facebook. A column of ads could sit just to the right of Instagram's photo feed, seamlessly mimicking the format of Facebook's News Feed pages. Navigation that links Instagram to Facebook could easily be integrated in the left rail, for that matter.

This is, of course, purely speculation. Neither Facebook nor Instagram have announced plans to incorporate advertising into Instagram's apps.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Amazon on Tuesday announced a new virtual currency called Amazon Coins that's billed as an "easy way for Kindle Fire customers to spend money on developers apps in the Amazon Appstore."

The company will introduce the currency in May with "tens of millions of dollars' worth of free Amazon Coins" to spend on developers' apps. Amazon will also make it quick and easy for customers to buy the coins with their accounts. Developers, meanwhile, will make 70% on every purchase, with the rest going to Amazon.

Developers of Amazon apps don't need to do anything to use Amazon Coins. Developers whose apps aren't in the Appstore yet have to get their app approved by April 25 to be ready when Coins officially launches.

Amazon Coins will vie with other forms of online currency, most notably, Facebook Credits.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Amazon may have struggled to meet demand for its Kindle Paperwhite e-reader over the holidays, but evidence suggests its large-format Android tablet, the Kindle Fire 8.9, may not be as popular with consumers.

As part of a Valentine's Day promotion, Amazon is offering $50 off the $499 and $599 4G LTE versions, and $30 off the $299 and $369 WiFi-only editions with the discount code "FIRELOVE" between now and Feb. 8. As ZDNet notes, this is the third time Amazon has discounted the device in the last three months. Amazon ran the same discount for a single day in December, and as a student promotion in January.

The 8.9-inch Kindle Fire HD sports a 1920x1200 resolution screen, a 1.5Ghz dual-core processor, a front-facing HD camera and 16 to 32GB of storage memory. If you decide to pick one up, be sure to check out our getting started guide.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Nothing inspires Valentine's Day ideas more than tales of romance and passion. Just in time for the season of love, Amazon launched an interactive map of "50 Great American Love Stories," complete with heart-shaped bubbles and a pink-tinted U.S.A.

The site is "paying tribute to all the ways love transforms lives" with one story from each state, the page explains. Click on a heart to jump to your state's selection, with bonus picks included for some regions.

SEE ALSO: 10 Valentine's Day Cards for Your Geeky Sweetheart

Georgia will take you to Margaret Mitchell's Civil War-era romance, Gone With the Wind, while Arizona leads to a more contemporary, alien story with The Host, by Stephenie Meyer. The editors' picks range from true stories of dark, twisted passion to tear-jerking family bonds.

Readers can also email in recommendations for their own favorites not listed on the map.

It's not the first time Amazon implemented interactive maps to promote best sellers. For the 2012 U.S. presidential election, the site created a heat map of "blue" and "red" states to follow the trend of top political books read by Americans.
--------------------------------------------------------------
An asteroid will give Earth a historically close shave next week, but there's no chance that the space rock will slam into our planet on this pass, experts say.

The 150-foot-wide (45 meters) asteroid 2012 DA14 will zoom within 17,200 miles (27,700 kilometers) of our planet on Feb. 15, coming nearer than the ring of satellites in geosynchronous orbit. While the flyby will be the closest ever known in advance for such a large asteroid, there's no reason to retreat to the doomsday bunker.

"NASA's Near-Earth Object Program Office can accurately predict the asteroid's path with the observations obtained, and it is therefore known that there is no chance that the asteroid might be on a collision course with Earth," officials at the space agency's Jet Propulsion Laboratory in Pasadena, Calif., wrote in a statement Friday (Feb. 1).

"Nevertheless, the flyby will provide a unique opportunity for researchers to study a near-Earth object up close," the statement added.

SEE ALSO: Asteroid 2012 DA14's Feb. 15 Flyby: Fact vs. Fiction (Video)

NASA will hold a press conference at 2 p.m. EST (1900 GMT) this Thursday (Feb. 7) to discuss the space rock's close flyby.

2012 DA 14 was discovered in February of last year by astronomers with the La Sagra Sky Survey in Spain. The near-Earth asteroid has recently been zipping around the sun once every 368 days, though next week's close pass will reduce its orbital period to 317 days, researchers said.

At its closest approach on Feb. 15, the space rock will be just 1/13th as far from Earth as the moon is. 2012 DA 14 will whiz by our planet quickly, zipping through space at about 17,400 mph (28,000 kph) as it makes its closest pass for at least the next 30 years.

The asteroid will present an intriguing target for skywatchers, becoming visible as a point of light through binoculars and small telescopes during the close encounter. The best observing will be from Eastern Europe, Asia and Australia, NASA officials said. (2012 DA 14 will have faded considerably by the time Earth's rotation brings the object into view for folks in the continental United States.)

Researchers at NASA and other institutions plan to take advantage of the flyby to learn more about 2012 DA14 and its orbit.

"Radar astronomers plan to take images of the asteroid about eight hours after closest approach using the Goldstone antenna in California's Mojave Desert, which is part of NASA's Deep Space Network," space agency officials wrote in Friday's statement.

Several other known asteroids have given Earth an even closer shave than 2012 DA14 will, but those objects were all smaller. Asteroids of 2012 DA14's size probably make such close flybys once every 40 years and actually hit Earth every 1,200 years or so, researchers said.

Of course, other relatively large asteroids have probably zipped very close to Earth recently without being spotted. Astronomers have identified more than 9,000 near-Earth asteroids to date, but perhaps a million or more such space rocks are thought to exist.

If 2012 DA14 did strike our planet, it would likely cause serious damage on a local scale. An object of similar size flattened 800 square miles (2,000 square km) of forest when it exploded above Siberia's Podkamennaya Tunguska River in 1908.

This article originally published at Space.com here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Wikipedia is loaded with articles on space. And now Wikipedia is in space, too  specifically, as an asteroid newly named "Wikipedia." The Committee for Small Body Nomenclature has renamed a main belt asteroid, previously labeled number 274301, with an official moniker: Henceforth, it's known as Wikipedia.

Astronomers at the Audrushivka Astronomical Observatory in Ukraine first spotted the asteroid in August 2008. Observatories in Caussols-ODAS in France and Mt. Lemmon Survey and Steward Observatory in Arizona also observed the asteroid. The Committee handed down the official name on Jan. 27, based on a suggestion from a member of the Wikimedia Foundation in Ukraine.

Researchers also posted some scientific facts about Wikipedia (the asteroid), including its measurement of one to two kilometers (about a mile) in diameter and its orbit, which takes it around the sun every 3.68 Earth years. And it won't collide with Earth, so no need to call Bruce Willis.

Astronomers around the world, and at NASA, regularly scan the night sky in order to search for near-Earth asteroids and other objects that could potentially pose an impact threat to Earth. (The latest, with the less-elegant name "2012 DA14," is due to pass within 17,200 miles of the Earth on Feb. 15.)

This article originally published at TechNewsDaily here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Few cable subscribers realize it, but each time they switch channels, their TV provider makes a note of it. Today, that data is primarily used for internal research and to inform ratings. But newly published work from researchers at AT&T shows how it could also be used to make TV advertising more compelling.

The methods tested by researchers at AT&T Labs in Florham Park, N.J., are detailed in a paper that was presented at the International Conference on Data Mining last month. While they dont allow for ads to be targeted to individual viewers, they could make TV commercials more effectiveand more valuable.

TV advertising is today bought and sold in much the same way it has been for decades. A company that wants to advertise works out who it wants to see its message, and tells that to a TV station, where experts use ratings information from surveys, and their own judgment, to decide when best to run the commercial and how much to charge.

By contrast, few humans are involved in the process of targeting online advertising. Advertisers choose their target audience, and software does the rest, automatically matching ads with specific web pages and even people.

Data from the set-top boxes of an unspecified major television provider (presumably AT&T) was used in the new research. The dataanonymized to remove identifying data such as namesincluded details of channel changes and volume adjustments plus some demographic information.

By assuming that someone was watching a channel any time a TV stayed tuned to it for more than 20 seconds but less than one and a half hours, the researchers built up a record of which subscribers had watched what channels, and when. That was used to predict when different demographic segments would be watching TV in the futurepredictions that could be used to plan when to show commercials.

The AT&T researchers tested that approach with two large TV advertisers that they identify only as an upscale car manufacturer and a large investment/retirement planning firm. Both companies planned four-week-long campaigns using the conventional manual approach.

The two campaigns were aired on schedules devised using the conventional method, but once they had aired, it was possible to use data from set-top boxes to show that the more-targeted system would have delivered more-targeted results. The big-data approach would have allowed a commercial to reach around 18% more targeted people for the same outlay on airtime. For a campaign willing to run up to six ads in any one hour, the cost of achieving 1,000 views from targeted people would be about half that of the conventional campaign.

Heather Way, an advertising technology analyst with Parks Associates, says that AT&Ts results underline that TV companies, advertisers, and viewers all have something to gain if the TV commercial business becomes more like online advertising. Says Way, Its more efficient for the ad buyer; the provider can get a higher rate for their ad; the consumer is not bombarded by a bunch of content thats not relevant.

There is hope within the industry, Way says, that one day such approaches could make it possible to schedule ads in real time in response to who is tuning in, and perhaps even target them to individuals.

Most people dont know that their TV provider tracks channel changes. Some advocacy groups may protest the possible privacy implications of such techniques, but Way believes viewers will likely be even less concerned than they are about online ad targeting. Its a medium that consumers are just more comfortable with, she says.

AT&T is not the only company exploring new uses for set-top-box data, says Way, although most efforts are focused on replacing the use of ratings based on surveys to guess at viewing figures. Theyre all looking to mine that set-top-box data and use it better and use it for audience profiles, she says.

AT&T declined to respond to questions about its TV targeting research and so it is unknown whether this might become more than just a research project. But the company last year launched a new service called AdWorks that offers advertisers ways to measure TV campaigns using set-top-box data and to make TV ads interactive via a subscribers remote.

This article originally published at MIT Technology Review here
--------------------------------------------------------------
'Gangnam Style' is dead. But guess what? Babies are bringing it back!

Especially this baby, Amaya, who can apparently sleep through various music medleys but when Psy comes on, she's just gotta shake it.

SEE ALSO: 2-Year-Old Dancing Sensation Is a YouTube Star [VIDEO]

You rock that 'Gangnam Style' like it's 2012 again, Amaya. At least you look good doin' it.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Another day, another lip-dub parody of Barack Obama.

This time around, the U.S. president is "singing" the Pokmon theme song, courtesy of the folks from Barack's Dubs.

Be sure to watch the video until the end, or you'll miss a message from a special guest; then, tell us what you think of the video in the comments, below.

SEE ALSO: The Many Faces of Barack Obama
--------------------------------------------------------------
Developers who commit to BlackBerry 10 early will be walking away with their own limited edition Z10 in red.

BlackBerrys Alec Saunders announced the limited edition handsets  which were previously promised to developers  via a blog post Tuesday.

In the post he thanks developers for attending BlackBerry Jam events around the world, and for believing in the operating system

Since we cant say thank you enough, were releasing 12,000 Limited Edition BlackBerry Z10 devices, in red, Saunders said in the post. Because youve earned them.

In order to receive one of the phones, developers have to create an app for BlackBerry 10 and have it approved before Feb. 28, 2013. Those developers who have their apps approved can then opt to return their pre-launch Dev Alpha device in exchange for a limited edition Z10 in red.

Blackberry unveiled the red Z10 at a developer event in Amsterdam alongside a new Dev Alpha C device, which mimics the experience of the companys upcoming BlackBerry Q10.

The Blackberry Z10 was officially unveiled on Jan. 30. The phone will be available to the general public in both black and white.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Early photos of BlackBerry (ne RIM)'s Z10 smartphone left many with the impression that it was an iPhone 5 knockoff. Same size, shape and screen and just one less button on its face.

It's clear today, however, that the BlackBerry Z10 is a different kind of animal. Substantially taller, wider, thicker and heavier than the elegant iPhone 5, the Z10 also does something Apple has never tried with a smartphone  it opens up.

The BlackBerry's Z10's entire back comes off to reveal a large battery, micro SIM and a slot for a micro SD card. To open the phone, you usually use your finger nail to gently pry the body and rubberized back apart. It comes apart easily, then snaps smartly back into place.

We wondered, though: if the back is removable, would it also fly off if you drop the device? To test this, we tried dropping the phone from three different heights and in three different locations: In the Mashable's office on the carpeted floor; on a wood floor; finally, on the concrete sidewalks of New York City.

SEE ALSO: BlackBerry's Super Bowl Ad Shows All the Things the Z10 Can't Do

Indoors, the Blackberry 10 phone bounced, but never broke. It took until it reached its top height for the back to start separating. Yet even as it bounced off the hard wood flooring, the back never came off completely. Indoors, the Blackberry Z10 also resisted scratches.

Then we took the poor bugger outside.

Once again, we performed three drop tests. Strike that. We only got through two. When dropped from a waist-level position, the phone hit the concrete hard and suffered its first few scratches and dents. The back separated a little, but not entirely. Then we dropped it from phone-call, or ear-level. The results were not good.

The back popped clear off and the long battery launched out of the back. With the phone landing face down, we couldn't see the extent of the damage until we flipped it over. The BlackBerry Z10's screen was shattered. While the phone powered back up, the touch screen had become completely unresponsive.

Our conclusion? In most situations, the BlackBerry Z10 is a pretty sturdy smartphone. But if you plan on making calls in the heart of any city, buy a strong case or be very, very careful.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Readers may be doing more of their book shopping online, but some recent studies suggest they still discover more books they want to read in bricks-and-mortar bookstores rather than on websites. Now, one new website hopes to improve book discovery online and it has the backing of some of the biggest players in the publishing industry.

Bookish, which launched Tuesday, mixes cutting-edge technology with a team of seasoned editors to help readers discover new print and digital book titles that they might want to read next. The website features exclusive book excerpts, interviews with authors and editor's picks across 18 different categories  similar to many literary publications  but it also uses machine learning and big data to pull up relevant recommendations for hundreds of thousands of books.

"Our approach is that we want to empower many paths to discovery," Bookish CEO Ardy Khazaei told Mashable. "By doing this, you help expand the market. If you remove the discovery friction, by default more books are going to be bought." With that in mind, Bookish has built-in ecommerce links that let users buy books from a range of websites, including Amazon, Barnes and Noble, Kobo and Apple's iTunes store, among others.

Bookish certainly isn't the first website to take a stab at improving book discovery, but it is particularly notable given the long list of companies who have partnered with it. Three of the "big six" publishers  Hachette, Penguin and Simon & Schuster  are directly funding the website, and more than a dozen other publishers, including Random House and Harper Collins, have agreed to provide Bookish with exclusive content. Bookish has also partnered with USA Today to share original editorial content with the newspaper.

The website was once scheduled to launch in 2011, but was delayed by nearly two years, a period during which three different CEOs took the helm. Khazaei, who took over as CEO in October, chalks up the delays to "technology challenges," which he admits frustrated the publishers backing the project. "You can imagine they invested and it was delayed and they had concerns," he said.

Until now, popular retail websites like Amazon have generally made recommendations about what users might want to buy next based on what they or their friends have purchased in the past. But the team at Bookish felt this wasn't the best tactic for dealing with book recommendations. "It's not based on an understanding of the book itself," Khazaei said. To that end, he says Bookish developed technology to analyze data about the book and reader reviews to surface particular themes and motifs  or what Khazaei refers to as the book's "fingerprint"  in order to automatically generate the best recommendations.

On top of all that, editors have the option to offer their own feedback on selections. There are currently 22 people on the Bookish team, including seven people in editorial, several of whom previously worked as editors at AOL.

The downside to the Bookish recommendation engine is that it requires a certain amount of data from each book and reader reviews in order to make suggestions. For that reason, even though there are about 1.2 million books featured on Bookish, only about 250,000 of these have recommendations attached at the moment. Khazaei says this number will certainly increase over time, but it may prove difficult to offer recommendations for more obscure books that have been read and reviewed less.

Going forward, the goal is to continue improving site navigation and the recommendation engine, as well as to add more tools that allow the user to have a personalized experience, including the option to create more bookshelves (similar to Goodreads). There are no immediate plans to build out mobile apps, though Khazaei says the team will work on optimizing the website for mobile.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Artificial intelligence has brought us a lot of things, like Kinect, Watson and Haley Joel Osment. In the 90s, the chatty web application Cleverbot wowed us with the ability to hold conversation, gradually "learning" from human input.

Today, that sort of technology is found in most assistant software and even search engines. How does Cleverbot measure in comparison?

YouTube user Chris Wilson sat down with Cleverbot to collaborate on a movie script. Wilson writes in the film description that he tried to chat with the bot just as he would a human writing partner.

SEE ALSO: Robot Takeover Starts With Little Caesars

"I set up scenarios and Cleverbot provided all of the dialog content for the scene," explains Wison.

Watch the machine's bizarre, but heroic love story and tell us what you think. Should Spielberg be worried about the robots?

BONUS: 10 Amazing Robots We Met in 2012



 



Image courtesy of YouTube, Chris Wilson
--------------------------------------------------------------
A secure password can be your first line of defense against would-be hackers. Creating a secure password, however, isnt always as easy as it looks. As the Internet has gotten larger, hackers have gotten smarter, making it so even passwords that seem like theyre secure arent necessarily anymore.

Not sure how to make a truly secure password? Check out the video above for a look at what you might be doing wrong, and some solutions that can make your online accounts a bit more secure.

Have your own tips for creating secure passwords? Tell us about them the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Back in Oct. 2011, two developers, Adam Grossman and Jack Turner, put a video on Kickstarter with an ambitious goal: help them bring their magical-looking short-term weather prediction app to the public.

The app is called Dark Sky [iTunes link], and it's a weather app with a very cool twist: It just offers short-term, hyperlocal forecasts. Using the app, you can find out if it will rain or snow in the next 15 minutes in your given location. Moreover, you can find out how long it is projected to rain and look at real-time radar maps.

On Kickstarter, Dark Sky raised almost $40,000 from 1,200 backers. When the app launched in April, it was immediately praised for its interface design and functionality.

By the time the team rolled out version 2.0 in August, the app had sold more than 35,000 copies.

The most amazing thing about the app? It works. Really, really well. In fact, the app works so well, the developers offer access to its API so other developers can bring in Dark Sky's short-term weather predictions in their own apps.

That's an interesting decision because it means that developers could conceivably build apps that compete with Dark Sky. However, because Dark Sky charges developers for API access once it reaches a certain number of calls a day, a successful app using Dark Sky's API is still a success for Dark Sky.

A month after shipping version 1.0 of Dark Sky, the team shared some of the lessons it learned along the way.

Because Dark Sky is a digital product, the team faced some challenges when it came time to distribute the finished app.

On the Dark Sky blog, founder Jason LaPorte details the process of figuring out how to get 1,200 users copies of an app that would cost money in Apple's App Store.

The solution we settled on was Apple's gifting mechanism: essentially, buying each of our backers their copy of the app. This isn't quite as arduous as it sounds: Everything is done right from within iTunes, and you are allowed to provide Apple a comma-separated list of email addresses to gift to, though there is a limit on the number of characters that can be submitted at once; we were able to send about fifty copies of the app in each batch. A couple hours later, each of our Kickstarter backers had an email with their copy of Dark Sky.

Of course, the solution wasn't foolproof. The team faced challenges including:

In the end, the LaPorte wrote that while the team would do the Kickstarter route again, it would budget time and money more carefully.

LaPorte also discussed some of the lessons the team learned when it came time to deliver the physical rewards to its backers. Backers who pledged more than $40 got a T-shirt, while pledges of $150 or more also got an umbrella.

Shipping those items, it turns out, was more expensive than the team has anticipated.

We looked at every reputable carrier we could find, and in the end found that the United States Postal Service had the best domestic and international rates by far (via flat-rate priority mail boxes), but even then it cost us as much to ship the rewards as it did to have them made (and, in the case of international orders, up to three or four times as much).

LaPorte recommends that Kickstarter project leaders start working on delivering physical goods as soon as the project is successfully backed.

Dark Sky is a great app but for the project to be a success, people need to find it. The challenge the developers faced was that searches for terms such as "weather" and "forecast" in the App Store didn't lead to its app showing up in the top 20 or even 100 results.

In August, Dark Sky's Adam Grossman blogged about the team's journey with App Store optimization. This is kind of like Search Engine Optimization is for Google and Bing, except it's focused on discoverability in the App Store.

While the rules for App Store optimization are much more ambiguous than SEO rules and best practices for Google, making changes to the name of the app and its description and keywords can have a big impact on discoverability.

Rather than just having the title be the simple, elegant "Dark Sky," the team found much more success with its current app title, "Dark Sky  Weather Radar, Hyperlocal Forecasts and Storm Alerts."

Dark Sky is proof that an app can find success outside of Kickstarter, both in the App Store and as a developer platform in and of itself.

What we find most interesting about the team is how transparent and open it has been about its journey.

What do you think of Dark Sky and its approach to app development? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Would you want to see a Star Wars movie all about Yoda? How about Boba Fett, Admiral Ackbar or Lando Calrissian?

That's the sort of thing we can expect now that Disney has bought Lucasfilm, according to Disney CEO Bob Iger. Speaking on CNBC Tuesday afternoon, Iger confirmed rumors that the company was working on "standalone" Star Wars films about various big names from the Lucas universe.

"I can confirm we're working on a few standalone films," Iger said, adding that Lawrence Kasdan (who wrote Empire Strikes Back) and Simon Kinberg (writer of several X-Men films) were already working on them. "They are not part of the overall saga."

So these films would not be part of the regular chronological stream of franchise movies in the series  Episodes VII, VIII and IX are already confirmed and in the planning stages, with J.J. Abrams confirmed to direct the first.

Rather, each of the films Iger is alluding to would focus on a separate Star Wars character, and have more of a biographical bent. The plan is to release them in the same period of time as Episodes VII through IX  in other words, between 2015 and 2021.

Marvel, also owned by Disney, is the presumed model here: we're talking about the Star Wars equivalent of the Captain America, Thor and Hulk films, whereas the regular Star Wars Episode movies would be the ensemble equivalent of the Avengers.

Harry Knowles of Ain't It Cool News, a mainstay of Hollywood gossip, had reported Monday that a standalone Yoda movie was in the works  though Knowles was unsure about what period of Yoda's live the movie would cover.

"At this stage specifics are sparse, but [Lucasfilm chief] Kathleen Kennedy is putting together a Star Wars slate," Knowles said.

Given that Yoda lived for 900 years, there's plenty of potential story to choose from when covering our little green friend. Indeed, there's potential for a whole new trilogy.

What Star Wars character movies would you like to see? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Frat boys rejoice, making a beer pong table does not have to cost much.

According to HackCollege, $30 and some duct tape can have you well on your way to debauchery. And at that price, those of us over the age of 21 may actually return to the days of dorm rooms and Ping-Pong balls (let's be honest, cocktail happy hour is never as fun as they make it sound).

SEE ALSO: 6 Easy Life Hacks to Make You More Awesome

And to top it all off, any DIY involving lumber makes it less old-lady-craft-hour and much more macho-cool-kids project. So grab those Solo cups (or splurge on the high-quality since you've saved so much money on a table) and get to work.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Why have a pet that looks like an animal when you can have a best furry friend that looks like your Uncle Sal? Meet Tonik, the dog with a human face.

Tonik is part poodle, part Shih Tzu and all adorable  and adoptable. The human-faced pooch was rescued from a kill shelter in Kentucky and is currently living in Indiana while waiting for a new home.

BONUS: 12 Most Miserable Dogs on National Dress Up Your Pet Day
--------------------------------------------------------------
A dog scooting butt-down across the carpet may not seem like the clever animal that comes closest to human babies in communication skills. But a web app aims to build on the discovery by enabling thousands of dog owners to record the results of playful experiments with their canine companions.

The "Dognition" project could revolutionize scientific understanding of dogs by gathering data from man's best friends all over the world. Such an effort would help answer broad questions such as whether different dog breeds really have different levels of intelligence  even as dog owners gain new appreciation of their beloved pets' individual personalities.

"In a weekend, we could have 10,000, maybe 50,000 people give data," said Brian Hare, associate professor in evolutionary anthropology at Duke University and director of Duke's Canine Cognition Center. "I can't even say how big of a quantum leap this will be."

Dogs are "absolutely vapid" in many forms of intelligence compared to chimpanzees or bonobos, who have closer genetic relationships to humans, Hare explained. But dogs excel in understanding the human intent to communicate  the same skill that has proved crucial for human babies in developing language and culture. By learning more about dogs, humans can learn more about themselves.

As a tool for better understanding dogs, the Dognition web app launched on Feb. 5 to coincide with a new book titled The Genius of Dogs: How Dogs are Smarter Than You Think (Dutton, 2013). Hare co-authored the book with his wife, Vanessa Woods.

"There are lots of dog books, but there has never been a way for someone to learn about their dog using the same tasks that scientists have developed to study a wide variety of dogs," Hare told TechNewsDaily.

The free Dognition app starts out by asking dog owners to answer questions about their pets' behavior. (Some sample questions: "Does Benjy ever 'intervene' in an argument between other members of the household?" "When you laugh, does Benjy wag his tail?")

SEE ALSO: The 5 Smartest Non-Primates on the Planet

But the meat of the Dognition experience comes from games people can play with their dogs to assess five dimensions of intelligence: empathy, communication, cunning, memory and reasoning. Such games are similar to what Hare used to test dogs at his Duke University lab  dog owners just need plastic cups, treats, several sheets of paper, sticky notes, another human helper and their dogs.

The testing can show "what makes a dog a great companion" by revealing cognitive strengths and weaknesses. That might allow owners to better understand why their dogs behave the way they do.

"Maybe you find out your dog doesn't have very good memory compared to other dogs," Hare said. "Or maybe your dog is incredibly wily and is judging when you're watching them or not. Some dogs know the difference between a person's eyes being open or closed."

Hare became inspired to create Dognition after seeing a parade of dog owners fly in from New York and California to volunteer their dogs for cognitive testing at Duke University in Durham, N.C. When the dog owners would ask about finding out more about the science, Hare used to refer them to scientific papers  a "completely naive response" on his part, Hare admits now.

Dognition's data will allow scientists to search for the most intriguing behavioral or cognitive patterns and set up lab experiments to confirm the findings. It's an ideal scenario for how "citizen science" and professional science can work together.

The web app's findings could end up sweeping away ideas taken for granted by many dog owners, such as the belief that intelligence can distinguish different dog breeds ("There's some nice work showing that a lot of what people attribute to their dogs in terms of intelligence is based on their physical characteristics," Hare said.) Or, if cognitive profiles do exist for certain breeds, scientists could investigate the profiles of mixed breeds.

The web app's data could also confirm fascinating ideas raised by small studies, such as the direction of a dog's hair whorl corresponding to the location of certain mental functions on the left or right side of the brain.

As lifelong dog owner, Hare looks forward to trying out Dognition with his latest dog, a "shelter mutt" named Tasmania. He hopes that the Dognition project could eventually help future dog owners better understand the dogs they adopt down the road.

"When you get the dog from a shelter, wouldn't it be nice to know what their cognitive profile is?" Hare said. "Not to judge them, but to have a successful relationship."

This article originally published at TechNewsDaily here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Global ecommerce sales passed $1 trillion in 2012 for the first time ever, fueled by growth in North America and the Asia-Pacific region, according to a new report from eMarketer. North America sales increased 13.9% year-over-year to about $365 billion and Asia-Pacific sales increased by 33% to about $332 billion.

While North America currently dominates for ecommerce sales, eMarketer predicts this will change next year. EMarketer projects that North America sales will grow at a slightly lower rate of 12.2% in 2013 to $409 billion. Asia-Pacific sales, on the other hand, will grow by 30% to $433 billion.

"The rapid growth in Asia-Pacific sales is a result of several factors," eMarketer notes in its report. "Three Asia-Pacific marketsChina, India and Indonesiawill see faster B2C ecommerce sales growth than all other markets worldwide this year, while Japan will continue to take a large share of global sales."

Global ecommerce sales are expected to grow to just shy of $1.3 trillion in the coming year.

However, the United States will continue to have the highest ecommerce sales of any country at least through 2016. eMarketer projects that US ecommerce sales will grow from $343 billion in 2012 to $385 billion in 2013, more than double the sales of China, which is expected to grow to $182 billion in 2013 from $110 billion in 2012.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The U.S. Department of Energy was the victim of a cyberattack last month that compromised several hundred employees' and contractors' personal data. No classified information was accessed during the attack.

Department officials notified all employees of the attack in a Friday email obtained by The New York Times. Employees were urged in the e-mail to encrypt sensitive data and avoid using government networks for personal communications.

The Energy Department has been taking steps to beef up security in light of the event. The agency is working with federal investigators to determine its origin, which hasn't been revealed.

Several high-profile targets, including The New York Times, the Wall Street Journal and the Washington Post, have recently been the target of cyberattacks.

The Energy Department's responsibilities include energy-related research as well as overseeing the country's nuclear weapons and nuclear energy programs.

The full e-mail sent to Energy Department employees:

The Department of Energy (DOE) has just confirmed a recent cyber incident that occurred in mid-January which targeted the Headquarters network and resulted in the unauthorized disclosure of employee and contractor Personally Identifiable

Information (PII). The Department is strongly committed to protecting the integrity of each employees PII and takes any cyber incident very seriously. The Departments Cybersecurity Team, the Office of Health, Safety and Security and the Inspector Generals office are working with federal law enforcement to promptly gather detailed information on the nature and scope of the incident and assess the potential impacts to DOE staff and contractors. Based on the findings of this investigation, no classified data was compromised. We believe several hundred DOE employees and contractors PII may have been affected. As individual affected employees are identified, they will be notified and offered assistance on steps they can take to protect themselves from potential identity theft. Once the full nature and extent of this incident is known, the Department will implement a full remediation plan. As more specific information is gathered regarding affected employees and contractors, the Department will make further notifications. The Department is also leading an aggressive effort to reduce the likelihood of these events occurring again. These efforts include leveraging the combined expertise and capabilities of the Departments Joint Cybersecurity Coordination Center to address this incident, increasing monitoring across all of the Departments networks and deploying specialized defense tools to protect sensitive assets. Cybersecurity is a shared responsibility, and we all play an important role in maintaining the integrity and security of our networks. To help minimize impacts and reduce any potential risks, please keep the following best practices in mind: * Encrypt all files and emails containing PII or sensitive information, including files stored on hard drives or on the shared network.

* Do not store or email non-government related PII on DOE network computers
--------------------------------------------------------------
Your big day is drawing near  are you prepared? Valentine's Day, for some couples, is as important an event as their anniversary, and a special gesture of love and affection goes a long way.

What better place to find a gift than Etsy, known for handmade, vintage and personalized products. If your significant other is a forward-thinking, smartphone-toting geek like many of us, he or she will love one of the tech-minded gifts in our gallery.

SEE ALSO: 20 NSFW Etsy Products That Will Make You Blush

Also, find gift ideas for friends who might not be celebrating this year's V-day in a romantic way. And if youre alone this year, why not splurge on yourself? Remember, youre worth it.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Starting soon, the icon below will let you know that Facebook is tracking you for third-party ads. The symbol, which was introduced last year, will be prominent when you hover your cursor over a Facebook ad that has been served up for a third party.

For instance, if you see an Amazon ad on Facebook for a book you were just checking out, then you'll likely see the icon. Such ads are served up by Facebook Ad Exchange. The measure comes after Facebook's agreement with the Council of Better Business Bureau on Monday.

The Digital Advertising Alliance launched the icon last January to raise consumer awareness about ads based on behavioral targeting. An advocacy group, the DAA reasons that more information about behavioral targeting (or "interest-based advertising," as it prefers), will address fear and mistaken assumptions about the practice. In the video below, the organization explains the thinking behind the symbol:
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Pew Research Center released a survey on Facebook Tuesday, and it's causing quite a stir. The reason? It found 61% of Facebook users have at some point "taken a break" from the world's top social network. Facebook is leaking users! Sound the alarm!

Nah, not really. The closer you look at the study, the less of a big deal this statistic seems. First of all, it's a fairly small sample size. Pew reached 1,006 adults in the continental U.S. by phone during three days in December. Some 860 of them use the Internet, and 525 use Facebook.

Those 525 were asked if they had "voluntarily taken a break from using Facebook for a period of several weeks or more"  not just in the last year, but at any point in their lives. This was the question to which 61% of those 525 users answered yes.

Think about it: that includes everyone who's ever taken a two-week vacation without looking at the Internet, or had their heads down on a project, or otherwise sworn off social media for an extended period of time. In mid-December 2012, many users would have just taken breaks after the most divisive election in the history of social media.

Look at it that way, and it is probably more surprising that 39% of users in the survey said they'd never taken a break.

Indeed, the number one reason users gave Pew for taking a break is less about Facebook, and more about their own lives: they were simply too busy. (Pew also found there was no correlation between lower use of Facebook and greater use of rival social networks.)

Facebook, in fact, can take heart from the survey. It found a good portion of users believe the service to be more vital in their lives than it used to be, especially among women:

The final questions Pew asked looked at whether respondents would use Facebook more, less or about the same during the coming year. Remember, this was in mid-December, with a festival of gluttony on the horizon and the promise of stern resolutions to put everything right in the New Year; resolutions where we vow to rid ourselves of our time-sucks and unhealthy habits.

Even so, just 27% of those 525 Facebook users declared their intention to use the service less in 2013. We have to wonder how many of them went so far as to make it a resolution, let alone follow through.

That means that among those who take Facebook breaks, a clear majority don't end up planning to ditch the service in any meaningful way. Facebook breaks, then, are kind of a safety valve; a vacation from something we fear we may be addicted to; one that allows us to use it just the same way when we return.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Love 'em or hate 'em, you have to admit Go Daddy's Super Bowl ads are effective.

The company on Tuesday reported that the Monday after the game was its biggest sales day in company history. The company provided Mashable with the following stats that illustrate a big increase over the comparable day in 2012:

Go Daddy, a Super Bowl advertiser for the past nine years, ran two ads during the game, including "Perfect Match," which featured supermodel Bar Refaeli making out with a nerdy-looking guy and "YourBigIdea.co," which showed entrepreneurs across the world coming up with ideas though only one acts fast and secures a .co domain name. created the ads. 



Despite Go Daddy's success, viewers didn't seem to like the ads: "The Perfect Match" spot scored dead last in USA Today's Ad Meter.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Google is celebrating Safer Internet Day on Tuesday with the redesign of its "Good to Know" site, offering more tips and resources about how to stay safe online.

The website  which launched last year and is the company's biggest consumer education campaign focused on web safety  now includes more advice to help protect yourself from dangers of the Internet, from identity theft and scams to online fraud. It also provides suggestions on how to make computers and mobile devices more secure.

The redesign comes as more unsafe websites appear on the web and there is a greater need to stay protected.

SEE ALSO: Twitter Might Boost Security With Two-Level Authentication

"Every day we identify more than 10,000 unsafe websitesand we inform users and other web companies what weve found," Alma Whitten, director of privacy, product and engineering at Google. "We show warnings on up to 14 million Google Search results and 300,000 downloads, telling our users that there might be something suspicious going on behind a particular website or link. We share that data with other online companies so they can warn their users."

Google has also added 10 tips from Google Security experts that every Interent user should follow. Here's a look:

 Use a long, unique password made up of numbers, letters and symbols for each of your important accounts like email and online banking.

 Dont send your password via email, and dont share it with others.

 Set up your password recovery options and keep them up-to-date.

 Avoid scams - dont reply if you see a suspicious email, instant message or webpage asking for your personal or financial information.

 Report and flag content that is abusive or illegal.

 Frequently check your privacy and security settings, and customize how you want to share your content.

 Be mindful of your digital reputation  think twice before you post something embarrassing, harmful or inappropriate.

 Keep your devices browser and operating system up-to-date. When you do install software, make sure youre getting the software from a trusted source.

 Pay close attention when asked to sign in online. Check to see if the web address begins with https://  which signals that your connection to the website is encrypted and more resistant to snooping or tampering.

 Always lock your screen when you're finished using your computer, tablet or phone, and for added security, set it to lock automatically when it goes to sleep.

Google isn't the only big tech company celebrating Safer Internet Day. Microsoft has launched a Safer Online Teen Challenge for those between the ages of 13 and 18, designed to help teens learn more about online safety issues.
--------------------------------------------------------------
If you don't want to feel bad about where you work, you should probably stop reading now. These pictures are from Google's new office in Tel Aviv, Israel, which takes up eight floors of the Electra Tower.

The images speak for themselves, but it's pretty incredible when you consider that this much variation has been stuffed into eight floors. Just about every design aesthetic you can think of is here somewhere. Rustic? Check. Futuristic. That's there. Beach? Got some of that. Mid-to-upscale urban restaurant? Of course. The list goes on and on, but none of that stuff matters, because apparently there's a tunnel slide you can take from one floor to another, and that is just way too awesome.

Each floor has its own theme, and it's just the social areas that are decked out. The working areas and cubicles are fairly standard office space fare, although they still manage to be a lot nicer looking than where most of us probably work. And, despite all the pomp, the offices are pretty eco-friendly, too. The Google Tel Aviv offices are currently applying for LEED Platinum certification, which would be a first in Israel.

This article originally published at Chip Chick here
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Federal Communications Commission is not proposing to build a national Wi-Fi network, contrary to recent media reports suggesting otherwise.

In actuality, the FCC's newest proposal is to set aside from proposed incentive auctions a greater amount of wireless spectrum in the so-called "White Spaces" for unlicensed use than it previously suggested.

All wireless devices, from cell phone networks to radio stations, require some amount of spectrum on which to operate. The FCC has long proposed suggested spectrum incentive auctions as a means of meeting the country's constantly growing demand for wireless connectivity.

"Unlicensed use" refers to wireless communication which doesn't require an FCC license  your home Wi-Fi network is unlicensed; a radio station is licensed. The term "White Spaces" refers specifically to spectrum that is assigned to a certain function at the national level, but isn't being used locally, a problem of inefficiency that has proven difficult to solve.

The FCC has previously proposed asking local television broadcasters to relinquish their underutilized spectrum rights in exchange for a share of the proceeds gained from auctioning that spectrum, mostly to mobile data providers. TV broadcasters would then share spectrum blocks with neighboring stations. That plan got Congress' approval last year but has yet to be implemented.

Confusion over the FCC's plan was first sparked by a Washington Post story published Monday. Several media outlets, including Mashable, mistakenly understood the Post's report to have suggested the government itself would be building public Wi-Fi networks.

The complicated spectrum reallocation that Congress mandated last year wont happen at all unless enough local TV broadcasters agree to sell back unused or underused frequencies in a novel incentive auction before shuffling their signals over to neighboring stations available channels. If that works, the FCC will auction off most of the recovered airwaves to mobile data services. But the commission now also proposes to set aside extra slivers of spectrum among those frequencies for unlicensed useanybody could offer wireless service in those bands, just as you dont need to file with the FCC before booting up a WiFi router.

Ars Technica adds that effectively using White Spaces would require a great deal of management and regulation:

Because White Spaces spectrum is shared between unlicensed uses such as Wi-Fi and TV broadcasters, a sophisticated database system is needed to manage use of the airwaves. One set of airwaves might be available to consumer devices in certain places and certain timesbut in other places and times those same airwaves would be reserved for TV broadcasters, making them off-limits to the public. Consumer devices getting on the Internet via White Spaces airwaves would have to connect to databases that act like air traffic controllers. The point is, White Spaces (and similar spectrum sharing plans) take planning and organization. It's not a free-for-all.

If the FCC plan to turn over some amount of White Spaces spectrum to the public is successful, who might pay to build wireless networks with it? The American Prospect believes Google, which provides Wi-Fi networks in Mountain View, Calif. and New York City, is a potential candidate.

"But it could be that somebody like Google would establish a network using this part of the spectrum, let's say for a city or a region, and then if you wanted to get on that network they'd be the gatekeeper, meaning you could get on as long as you signed in with your Gmail account," wrote Waldman.

Mashable apologies for any confusion created by our earlier reporting on the subject.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Predictions for Sunday's 55th Grammy Awards continue to roll in. Not one to miss out on the fun, music-streaming service Spotify is placing its bets on which nominees will win.

Spotify based its predictions on users' listening behavior via streaming data to guess the artists, songs and albums who will take home coveted gramophones.

SEE ALSO: Grammy Amplifier Wants to Boost Social Reach of Undiscovered Artists

Here are Spotify's winner predictions  in bold  along with a list of contenders in each category. Listen to their music in the players below, or make your predictions here. 


--------------------------------------------------------------
New York's Grand Central Terminal celebrated its 100th birthday last Friday and, to celebrate, delighted commuters and tourists with a surprise light show.

More than 100 Improv Everywhere participants, equipped with LED flashlights and camera flashes, dazzled on-lookers along three floors of the grand windows.

SEE ALSO: Grand Central at 100: Cool Stuff You Didn't Know

According to a company blog post, the project was part of Grand Central Terminal's centennial celebration. Improv Everywhere worked with the MTA Arts for Transit to make it happen.

If you couldn't make the impromptu show, you can watch the video above to witness some of the magic.
--------------------------------------------------------------
So many blogs, so little time. For those who can't get enough of the news, but don't have hours to comb through sites and streams for the latest information, a new iPad app called Guide packages articles into video so you don't have to read.

The best part is you can pick an avatar of your liking to serve as your broadcaster  want a kitten to read you stories about animals? No problem. How about a British journalist to fill you in on breaking news about foreign policy? Coming right up.

The concept  developed by founder and CEO Freddie Laker and COO Leslie Bradshaw, a co-founder of popular digital agency JESS3  aims to make getting the news easier than ever.

"There are people who are passionate about news and web content, and don't have time to read it all," Laker told Mashable. "This allows you to consume that content while getting dressed in the morning or keeping a tablet next to the computer while you work. Because you can also see embedded videos, the app is essentially a visual news reader."

Similar to how you can leave the TV on for background noise, Guide can be left on and automatically pulls articles from the sites you love. It also integrates with Facebook and Twitter, so it will turn those stories into video reports based on what links have been shared in your social networking feeds.

SEE ALSO: 9 Brands That Thought Fast on Social Media During the Super Bowl

The company said it is looking into partnerships with celebrities, so you could get your news from a Hollywood star as an in-app purchase.

"People will eventually be able to purchase celebrity avatars because wouldn't it be so fun to have Mr. T read you the news?" Laker added. "There is a lot of room for expression and brand partnerships too."

Although the app is only available for the iPad now (in alpha form), it will roll out to other platforms soon. Its beta public launch is scheduled for March.

To try it out now, click here.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Halley VI Antarctic research station, which opens this week, was built with the harsh conditions in mind. The most southerly research station operated by the British Antarctic Survey (BAS) will be home to more than 50 scientists.

Hugh Broughton Architects' competition-winning design for the self-sufficient base includes hydraulically elevated ski-based modules. These respond to annually rising snow levels and the need to relocate the base if the site were to separate off as an iceberg.

Rather than struggling as a fixed structure, the base can use these legs on skis to lift above the ground and also be towed to a new location if required, Engadget reports.

The Halley VI features eight connected modules, made up of labs and living spaces, with a central module that provides an open plan social area at the heart of the station. This larger, red module features a climbing wall, a salad garden, specially-designed shades and lamps with daylight bulbs that simulate sunrise.

This article originally published at PSFK here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Imagine how great your iPhone cat videos would be if a Grammy and Academy Award winning composer wrote the soundtrack. You probably know what's coming next: Yes, there's an app for that.

The app, available exclusively for iOS, is called VJAM. World-renowned music composer and producer Hans Zimmer helped develop the app with UJAM, a company he co-founded several years ago.

Not only did Zimmer lend his creative expertise to the project, he also contributed one original composition, which is available to use, along with 10 other songs/themes, with the free version of the app.

"We feel we have created a basic app that does something very powerful," UJAM CEO Axel Hensen tells Mashable. "We're not looking for a quick viral success that's yesterday's news in a few months."

"We want to build something that provides a value to people for years to come. VJAM is just the beginning."

SEE ALSO: New Web App Customizes Music for TV and Movies

VJAM employs a freemium model, so if you get bored of the free themes, there are more options available for purchase. The goal of the app is to allow users to easily turn their iPhone videos into more cinematic creations.

The app is smart and simple to use. In less than five minutes, I turned a short video of my baby cousin eating lunch into an epic, using the theme "Slow Mo Hero," which features Zimmer's "Woad to Ruin" composition.

"VJAM looks simple, but we have made leaps in cloud technology, music technology and musical intelligence that puts us ahead of the game," Hensen says.

To get a better feel for what makes VJAM tick, Mashable caught up with Zimmer for a short chat about music and technology. You may know Zimmer's work from films such as Inception, The Lion King, Gladiator, The Dark Knight, The Dark Knight Rises, along with many others.

Even though he has already achieved significant success  including four Grammys, two Golden Globe Awards and an Oscar  Zimmer does not seem afraid to alter his methods; rather, he embraces change. He started composing in the late 1970s. Sporting coiffed hair and some sharp duds, he played his synthesizers in MTV's first music video, The Buggles "Video Kill the Radio Star."

Since then, Zimmer has stayed on the cutting edge of technology, including playing a significant role in the mobile app revolution. Check out the following Q&A section for his thoughts on technology, music, media and more.

How has your background shaped your views on music and technology?

I've come from a confused family. My mother was very musical, basically a musician, and my father was an engineer and an inventor. So, I grew up modifying the piano, shall we say, which made my mother gasp in horror, and my father would think it was fantastic when I would attach chainsaws and stuff like that to the piano because he thought it was an evolution in technology.

I think as a kid I started with one foot in the music camp and the other foot in the technology camp.

It was all the same thing to me because all I wanted to do was go and invent, and figure out...how to make new sounds.

You're already a successful composer and producer. Why did you decide to get involved with mobile apps such as VJAM?

It came from a lengthy conversation Pharrell Williams and I had. We were talking about this idea: We're really lucky because we get to do music as a living, and we get to do it everyday.

Neither of us has a grand musical education. My grand musical education is two weeks of piano lessons. So I'm not a good player, but I'm a good programmer. I've always felt that the computer was my instrument.

We thought, wouldn't it be fun to figure out how to use the technology within an iPhone to help people make their home videos a little better, and at the same time, do it in a way that it could be done instantaneously, where there wasn't a big learning curve involved.

What was your role in the creation of the VJAM?

I'm sort of the disturbance in the force. I'm the one who's forever going, "Why couldn't it do this? Why can't it do more of this?"

When everybody thinks it's finished and it's a masterpiece, I'm the one who comes in and throws a grenade into the middle of the room and goes, "Let's go and get all differently."

That's really my job  creative nuisance  I think that should be my title. Question everything at all times, and then execute Plan B flawlessly.

Clearly you have your hands in whatever current technological revolution is happening, but this isn't your first go-round. You were also involved with advent of music videos. You even appeared in the first MTV music video, "Video Killed the Radio Star," with The Buggles. What was that like?

It was really Trevor Horn's doing. It was sort of his band, and I was the guy who had the synth.

And it was actually quite hard, because nobody wanted to hear about it; nobody wanted to give us a record deal. MTV was still two years away, but we just had this gut feeling that this thing was coming, something was coming that was going to marry visuals and music. It just seemed obvious to us; it was instinct.

In those days I was the coolest guy around because I had a computer that had 16K of memory.

People kept asking, "What are you going to do with all that memory?" They thought it was outrageous that someone could have that much memory inside his computer.

How has technology fueled change more recently?

The technological shift has already happened. It's an evolution, not a revolution.

I think the whole iPhone thing is fantastic. For Inception, I did a whole app that was far more interesting for me to do than a soundtrack album.

Now we're at that point where everybody can sort of add into the musical publicization or into the personal publicization in a very inexpensive way.

The first revolution came when the electric guitar became affordable. But nowadays, the technology really truly lets you express all those things you have in your head.

What does your studio look like now compared to when you first started?

It isn't that different. There sort of comes a point where there are diminishing returns.

Thirty-inch monitors are as big as you want to go for your computer, because otherwise your head is bobbing side-to-side like in a tennis game. The musical keyboard in front me is just a convenient way of having 88 switches at my disposal.

So, some things are sort of the same, it's just that my computer power has gone up tremendously. It's just an upscaling of the same paradigm.

You have accomplished a great deal to this point in your career, including numerous awards. If you had to give yourself an award for something you've worked on in your life, what is your proudest accomplishment?

It would be the award for not coveting awards. Because really honestly, it has nothing to do with pride or any of those things.

Every morning I check with myself, "Do I want to go to the studio and write some music?" And to this day, it's still the most exciting thing I can do.

I still get fired up and I still get excited about making music.

What does the future look like?

From a musician's point of view, I think the future looks very similarly to this. But because of YouTube and because of the Internet, you now have access to finding a lot more really interesting people to work with. I do that a lot. I go to YouTube; I hear someone perform; I find out who they are; I give them a ring. Next thing I know, we're in a room together making music.

The thing that hasn't changed, and I don't think will ever change, is that the operative word in music is "play." You have to have a playfulness about it. As the world shifts, it's starting to understand more and more that to have a playfulness about any and everything is actually the way of having a better life, or being more creative, or being more productive.

The rules are: The more playful we get, the more we can get rid of the rules.

That's really what VJAM is supposed to be about. You're shooting your little video on your iPhone or something, and it's not all that great. But you can put a little piece of music with it, and the technology will do it in a relatively intelligent way.

Suddenly, your rather banal little video of your cat becomes something you can share with your friends.

If you want to be pretentious, you can call it art. But if you just want to talk about it like a normal human being, you can do something fun and share it with your friends.

Any last thoughts about technology or music?

The bottom line is, for me, there has never been a difference between a composer and someone who is building technology.

It's all about inventing and it's all about that playfulness, and that game and aesthetics. I get on very well with technologists because I think they're sort of doing the same thing. Figure out a way to express ourselves and make the world a slightly smaller place, in a good way.

Images courtesy of Flickr, yausser, and Inception - The App

BONUS: 5 iPhone Apps for Better Photos and Videos
--------------------------------------------------------------
There are thought to be more than 500,000 Holocaust survivors worldwide. The average age of a survivor is 79 and nearly a quarter of them are 85 or older.

While many elderly Holocaust survivors leave behind rich narratives of their lives through manuscripts, oral histories or art work, many do not. Some fear that as this aging generation fades away, so too will the personal accounts of the horrors they experienced. In an age of Holocaust deniers like Iranian President Mahmoud Ahmadinejad, the preservation of survivors oral histories is even more critical.

Taking this preservation into the 21st century is a group led by the University of Southern Californias Shoah Foundation, which, for the last 18 months, has been creating three-dimensional holograms of nearly a dozen Holocaust survivors. The project is called New Dimensions in Testimony.

John Rogers recent article for the Associated Press told the story of 80-year-old Pinchus Gutter and how he was filmed for hours in 3D, in front of a green screen, over the course of five days as he answered some 500 questions about his life and experiences. USC researchers are still editing the footage and working with voice recognition software so that Gutters hologram will not only tell his story, it will be able to recognize and respond to questions.

Once Gutters holographic doppelgnger is finished, visitors to the U.S. Holocaust Memorial Museum in Washington, D.C. could find themselves talking face-to-face with him and the holograms of other Holocaust survivors. According the AP article, this could happen within the next one to five years.

Having actually put it together, its clear this will happen, Paul Debevec told the AP. Debevec is associate director of the universitys Institute for Creative Technologies, which is creating the hologram projects infrastructure. The institute has also worked on Hollywood films such as Avatar and The Curious Case of Benjamin Button.

Ever since deceased rapper Tupac Shakur made a beyond-the-grave, 3D hologram-like appearance at last years Coachella Valley Music and Arts Festival, hologram tech has gained footing in popular consciousness. However, technically, Tupacs image wasnt a hologram because it was projected onto a thin sheet invisible to the audience.

This takes it one step further as far as you wont be projecting onto a screen, youll be projecting into space, Stephen Smith, the Shoah Foundations executive director said of the project.

This article originally published at Discovery News here
--------------------------------------------------------------
The volume of tweets containing anti-gay slurs was far higher than normal on Super Bowl Sunday, according to the Twitter-tracking site NoHomphobes.com.

Tweets containing the word "faggot" showed up more than 51,000 times on the day of the big game, Feb. 3. (That's compared to 39,000 times on Feb. 2 and about 25,000 times on Feb. 4.) The phrase "no homo," meanwhile, was tweeted 20,000 times on Super Bowl Sunday, representing about 7,000 more mentions than any of the preceding several days. The phrase "so gay" saw a slight increase as well.

NoHomophobes.com is a project of the University of Alberta's Institute for Sexual Minority Studies and Services. The chart below shows how homophobic tweets trended between Jan. 29 and Feb. 4. The green line shows tweets containing "faggot," the red line is tweets with "no homo," the blue line is tweets with "so gay" and the yellow line shows tweets containing "dyke."

Flagged tweets drop sharply, to a rate below the entire preceding week, on Feb. 4  which suggests that the Feb. 3 data could simply be a function of standard deviation.

But a look at NoHomophobes.com's interactive records dating back to July 15, 2012, shows Feb. 3 (represented by the green dot at the far right) to be among the most homophobic days on Twitter in the past several months:

You'd have to sift through millions of posts to see exactly what each homophobic tweet referred to on Super Bowl Sunday. But it's not unreasonable to think that an increase in anti-gay language would correlate with America's largest sporting event.

The simple answer: an online sports culture where the ability to publish unfiltered thoughts enables ugly, threatening behavior toward other fans and players. Death threats from fans have become commonplace. Some observers see sports trolls as a serious threat to Twitter's appeal for celebrity athletes.

SEE ALSO: Are Twitter's Sports Trolls Out of Control?

But there's another factor: football's uniquely macho culture. Some players, all with tens of thousands of followers, have posted homophobic tweets themselves.

San Francisco 49ers cornerback Chris Culliver drew widespread criticism last week for saying in a radio interview that he would not welcome a gay teammate. The team later apologized for Culliver's statements. But homophobia in football manifests itself online repeatedly.

Jeff Weiner, who runs ESBL Social Media, says he's had to tell NFL clients to take down unintentionally homophobic tweets on multiple occasions. Phrases such as "no homo" (used to strip a compliment of any possible homosexual undertones) and "pause" (after a potentially misinterpreted statement) are popular among Twitter's male sports fans, football players included.

Houston Texans running back Ben Tate told Mashable in April that phrases such as "no homo" simply don't strike many players as being offensive. Weiner called him minutes after he posted a tweet including the phrase last year.

"I think almost everyone I know uses the word, but when Jeff called I was like, 'Damn, I shouldn't have done that,'" he said. "When you're an athlete and people potentially look up to you, you want to stay away from that."

While Tate believes NFL players are becoming more conscious of homophobic language online, there's a long way to go with the league's millions of digitally connected fans.

"I think players are becoming more aware, but I think there's always going to be that chance because it's just something that's still in our culture and in our society," he says. "Little kids say it  I mean, my 12-year-old cousin says 'no homo.'"

Is the Super Bowl spike in homophobic language just coincidence? Let us know what you think in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Hewlett-Packard board is studying a break-up of the US tech company among several options the directors are considering to obtain maximum value for shareholders, people familiar with the matter said.

The HP directors have discussed the details of a possible breakup scenario, but also the merits of the company staying whole, since a recovery seems to be slowly taking hold and its share price has gained steam since it fell below $12 last November, the people added. In January, the stock went above $17 and has been trading around $16.50 in recent days.

There is no overt pressure to break up HPwhose divisions include units selling computers, corporate servers and servicesand no final decision has been made, the people said. If it seems that HP will be able to recover from its recent troubles, then a separation of its units may not be in the cards, they said. But the discussions among board members come amid some discontent from HP shareholders who feel the company is worth much more than its recent share price.

In a Dec. 27 SEC filing, HP said it was evaluating the potential disposition of assets and businesses that may no longer help us meet our objectives. But the board has not formed a special committee to assess a breakup option and does not currently have plans to do so, the people familiar with the matter said.

The idea of parting with at least one of HPs units is not new. Former chief executive Leo Apotheker decided in 2011 to spin off HPs PC division. But Apotheker was pushed out of the company that year after investors rejected his business decisions. He was replaced by former eBay head Meg Whitman, who reversed the spinoff decision.

The company said at that time that the PC unit was important to HP to boost purchasing power, among other reasons. But because HPs value had fallen substantially in the last several months, a breakup plan is now being studied, the people familiar with the matter said.

The rationale behind a breakup is that HPs divisions could be worth more as separate units than they are bundled together as a whole. The thinking also reflects a trend in recent years. Kraft, McGraw-Hill, Tyco and other companies have broken up and shed a division that was dragging the rest of the company down or better focused a particular business among a firms multiple products or services.

Some analysts and others in the tech industry have called for a breakup of HP in light of its recent troubles. Analysts have estimated that if HPs units were separated, the total value of the divisions could be worth more than $20 a share, and as much as $29 a share, as against the current $16.50 share price range.

HP and other PC makers have struggled to keep up with changing trends as consumers turn more toward mobile devices and tablets. But HP has been reeling from its own problems, including a revolving door of chief executives and costly acquisitions.

Most recently, HPs share price fell dramatically in the wake of an alleged accounting scandal at British software company Autonomy, a firm HP bought in 2011 for about $12 billion.Regulators in the US and the UK have been investigating Autonomy since HP said it had found accounting and disclosure problems at the company. HP said in November it would write down nearly $9 billion because of the Autonomy acquisition.

The decision to buy Autonomy was made under Apotheker, who left the company after shareholders sharply criticized the Autonomy purchase as too expensive.

This article originally published at Quartz here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Instagram has done amazing things for plated meals and the wings of planes, but the photo-sharing app has had a very positive impact on one more unexpected profession: tattooing.

Whether you're a die-hard tattoo collector or just a casual fan of the art form, it can be hard to stay abreast of the work done by the best artists in the industry. Most tattooists' websites are notoriously out of date. Facebook has made it easier for artists to update their online portfolio without the help of a web developer, but it's not being used as a resource with any great consistency. The innately addictive nature of Instagram, however, has empowered and encouraged artists to share their work on a daily basis. This is very good for us, the enthusiasts.

What's even more interesting and impressive is the access to their process that some tattooists are using Instagram to grant. We can glimpse a tattoo's entire lifespan  from sketch to stencil to completion. Its no longer about the high-resolution photograph of the finished product. One becomes a virtual voyeur to a painful and indelible process. If youve ever been tattooed, this brings the sense-memory racing back to you: the small cups of ink, the smell of the disinfectant soap, the whir of the machine, the blood and sweat.

Below is a list, broken down by genre, of some of the best tattooists you should be following on Instagram. Of course there are many great other tattooists on Instagram in each of these styles, but this is focused on artists who primarily shoot their work and things related to the art of the tattoo. After all, do you really care what a tattooist is having for lunch?

Whenever I share Hurtado's work with someone, the usual response is: "That's a painting, that's not a tattoo!" Wrong. It's definitely a tattoo; though his amazing use of a broad color palette, mastery of realistic shading, and control of the tattoo machine does make his work look like it belongs in a museum.

Quintanar is doing some of the bestif not the bestblack and grey tattoos in the United States. With his West Coast lettering style and his intricately shaded portraits, you wont mind overlooking the pictures of Travis Barker (whom he has tattooed extensively).

Hooper has taken mandalic patterns and sacred geometry to new heights with his refined ornamental work and intricate pointillism. His work is often large, sometimes dizzying, and always beautiful.

If you don't know the name Horiyoshi III, you don't know anything about the Japanese tattoo. Horiyoshi III has been tattooing for more than 40 years. In his feed youll see not only the famous bodysuit work for which he's known, but a sense of the tradition he works in: fascinating antique photographs of Japanese tattooing, and Ukiyo-e woodblock prints from which the tattoos are derived.

Rubendall and O'Donnell have a long history of working together in NYC and both have a deep passion for the traditions of Japanese iconography. They have also added their own modernizations, and inevitably "Americanized," twists to the genre. Rubendall and ODonnells shading and gradation of color are complex without being overbearing; their choices are somehow rebellious yet respectful; and, most importantly, they both tattoo some really amazing skulls!

These aint your average pin ups. If the size of Joe Capobianco's pompadour is a symbol of anything, it's that he's all about big curves. The hips and lips on these ladies are large and plump, and their chests are as robust as Capobianco's color palette. For pin ups that are cartoonish, more than a little naughty, and always beautifully executed, be sure to follow this account.

Skulls and anchors and daggers, oh my! If you pine for the "Good Ole Days" of tattooing, you need to tune into the work of Philip Szlosek. His lines are tight and crisp, he churns out flash sheets on a regular basis, and most of all, he breathes new life into the traditional tattoo iconography of panthers, gypsy girls and the like.

When I was 8 years old, my father bought a book called The Japanese Tattoo. It took me 20 more years to take the plunge to get one for myself andafter 100 hours beneath the needleI havent regretted any of my decisions. Thats because I did my research and I did it the hard way: by walking into shops and flipping through hard-copy portfolios.

Im envious of the next generation who can do their tattoo homework from an iPhone.

Brian Grosz is an actor, writer and musician living in Brooklyn, N.Y. Follow him on Twitter and Instagram or read about his recent backpiece tattoo. He also writes for the tattoo blog needlesandsins.com.

This article originally published at The Daily Dot here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Ever wanted to browse your full Instagram feed  that is, the latest stuff in real time from everyone you're following on the photo service  without having to reach for your smartphone? Ever wished it was all just available at Instagram.com? You finally got your wish.

Instagram announced Tuesday in a blog post that Instagram.com would no longer be a placeholder front page. If you're logged into the service online, you will see your full feed just as you would on a mobile device.

"Simply put," writes Instagram co-founder Kevin Systrom, "weve brought a simple, powerful, and beautiful Instagram browsing experience to the web." Here's how it works:

Your Instagram Feed on the web functions much like it does on your mobile phone. You can browse through the latest photos of people whom you follow with updates as people post new photos. Like photos by double clicking on them or pressing the like button. Or, engage in a conversation around a photo with inline commenting. Browse through pages of the most recent images to keep up on whats happening with the people you follow in realtime. And shrink your browser down to a single column for your feed to look more like your mobile feed.

You could previously browse your own pictures at a specific URL  instagram.com/futurechris, for example  but this is the first time a real-time feed of the mostly mobile service has been made available on a browser.

There are, of course, still a number of differences between Instagram.com and the mobile app. Most importantly, you still can't upload pictures or add filters at Instagram.com. The website is for passive viewing, Liking and commenting.

And browsing your feed on the site simply isn't as addictive. That familiar, addictive orange dialog box that appears when you load the app  showing you how many people have Liked and commented on your pictures since last you checked  isn't present on the web.

But there are advantages to web viewing. First and foremost, the site can inform you when new pictures arrive. In the mobile app, you have to hit reload to get the same effect. Instagram.com will tell you how many posts from people you follow have been added since last you looked, and the number pops up in your browser tab  just as it does with Twitter's web client.

There's plenty of white space down the side of your feed, suggesting this might be one area where Instagram can put ads in the future, as Facebook looks for more ways to monetize the service.

What do you make of your feed on Instagram.com? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------


 

This Valentine's Day, tell your beloved to shove off and sing a song of lust and wonderment dedicated to your favorite Internet memes. Memes never forget your anniversary or get touchy with your best friend.

Our mustached-friend here has remixed the classic Journey song "Faithfully" to tell Grumpy Cat, Success Kid and Overly Attached Girlfriend just how much joy their meme-isms bring to his life.

Clearly this guy owes a lot to his laptop  without Tumblr and Facebook, he would just be another desperate fool unable to experience the all consuming feelings of undeniable passion. This song will forever go down in history as one of the true love ballads of our digitally-obsessed time.

BONUS: Ermahgerd! The 12 Best Memes of 2012
--------------------------------------------------------------
Apple added its new 128GB iPad to the Apple Store on Tuesday. The site promises any orders will ship in one to three days.

The pricey new device comes in two models: Wi-Fi only ($799) and Wi-Fi+LTE ($929). Previously, the 9.7-inch iPad with retina display was available only with 16GB, 32GB or 64GB of storage. 

Apart from the increased memory, the new iPad is identical to the other models in the line, and customers can choose between two colors: black or white.

When Apple debuted the third-generation iPad with retina display, many expressed concerns that apps that support the higher resolution would demand more memory, and that low-capacity models  especially the 16GB version  wouldn't be able to hold many retina apps. With a 128GB retina iPad, fears about inadequate storage are mitigated... for a price.

With twice the storage capacity and an unparalleled selection of over 300,000 native iPad apps, enterprises, educators and artists have even more reasons to use iPad for all their business and personal needs, said Philip Schiller, Apples senior vice president of Worldwide Marketing, in a statement.

SEE ALSO: Apple Overtakes Samsung as Top U.S. Mobile-Phone Vendor

Following a circulation of rumors, Apple announced last week it would be introducing a 128 GB iPad with retina display to its product lineup. Despite its typical fanfare announcements, the company said in a press release it would be coming to stores in the near future.
--------------------------------------------------------------
What better way to say "I love you" this Valentine's Day than with an X-ray? Former White Stripes front man Jack White teamed up with Butthole Surfers' Gibby Haynes to release a three-song single on Feb. 14, pressed on old medical X-rays.

Keeping up with White's love for reinventing vinyl, Third Man Records will release the collaboration on what they call "flex-ray discs." The 7-inch single, "The Gibby Haynes Blues Series," features White on guitar and Haynes on vocals.

If you're wondering what this radiologic mix will sound like, it'll be "exploiting a range of subjects from teenagers on fire, Equine love affairs, and Recession shotgun stories," the site explains.

Perhaps White drew inspiration from the Cold War era, when people smuggled censored American music into the Soviet Union via X-ray film. But the musician is well known for his quirky uses of vinyl: In 2012 he released his single "Sixteen Saltines" on clear vinyl filled with blue liquid. His Grammy-nominated song, "Freedom at 21," was distributed via balloon launch. White released 1,000 helium balloons into the air attached with flexi-discs of the single from his debut solo album.

The limited copies of the X-ray records will be sold exclusively through Third Man Records' Rolling Record Store at South by Southwest in Austin, Texas, but the single is available for presale on the company's website.

Would you buy an X-ray album? Let us know your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A handful of tweets appear in Jason Mraz's music video for "The Woman I Love." The Twitter missives, which pop up as animations, propel the video's overall concept.

Mraz last summer challenged Twitter users to answer the question, "What does 'The Woman I Love' mean to you?" More than 10,000 responses flowed in with #MrazingTheVideo.

Mraz rewarded fans whose ideas were used by putting their handles at the video's end.

"It's an idea that's never been done before in terms of fan-sourcing on Twitter," Thanh Nguyen, digital marketer at Mraz's label, Atlantic Records, previously told Mashable.

SEE ALSO: Stop-Motion Music Video Uses Hundreds of Polaroid Pictures

"The Woman I Love" is from Mraz's Love Is a Four Letter Word album, which peaked at number two on Billboard's Hot 200 albums chart in 2012.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Welcome to this morning's edition of "First To Know," a series in which we keep you in the know on what's happening in the digital world.

Today, we're looking at three particularly interesting stories. Twitter might be looking into enhancing its security with two-step authentication. And while we're on the subject of security, Oracle expedited the release of its Java security patch. Originally scheduled for release on Feb. 19, the tech company released the patch on Monday. Finally, Richard III continues to trend on Twitter after a team of researchers confirmed they had found the British king buried beneath a parking lot.

Check out the video above for more on these stories.
--------------------------------------------------------------
In a victory for women and Weibo, an American has won a landmark divorce case against her wealthy Chinese celebrity husband, whose vicious beatings she chronicled in visceral detail on the country's largest social network in 2011.

A Beijing district court on Sunday granted Kim Lee divorce from her husband, Li Yang, the multi-millionaire founder of Li Yang's Crazy English, a chain of private English language schools and publisher of hundreds of instructional books. In addition to awarding Lee 12 million yuan ($1.9 million) and full custody of the couple's three daughters, the court imposed a three-month restraining order on Li  the first time ever in the nation's capital, according to the New York Times.

In August, 2011, Lee published a series of pictures to her public Sina Weibo account that showed in graphic detail her husband's alleged abuse. In one, her forehead is swollen red with a golf-ball sized welt where Li Yang had smashed her head into the floor. Others showed her scraped and bruised knees and a raspberry-colored bruise painfully blooming on her left ear.

My back is weak after having kids, Lee wrote, describing the brutal attack as it took place in front of their children. You weigh much more than me. Lydia screamed and scratched your arm to get you to stop. When you did, I got up, grabbed our passports, grabbed her and ran to the police station.

Sina Weibo is China's Facebook and Twitter analog. Lee's multi-lingual posts spread with viral speed across the 400-million strong network, as hundreds of thousands shared and commented on her pictures. She was breaking Chinese cultural taboos to take on her husband in public. It's not exactly normal to talk about internal family problems with outsiders, much less 60,000 Weibo followers.

In the beginning, I did it for my daughters. I wanted to show them I was strong, Lee told the New York Times. But as women's rights groups began following the case closely, she also gladly took on a role as vanguard of a broader cause.

If I can help to change the very wrong concepts that domestic violence is common, acceptable, should not be disclosed, the fault of the wife, part of Chinese culture then I feel both honored and obligated to do so, she wrote in October, 2011.

The case highlights how social media can work as a catalyst for important social changes in China, even as users post under the constant shadow of the countrys censorship regime. For many Chinese, Sina Weibo and similar microblogging services provide their first opportunity to share and learn information not directly controlled by government censors.

While there is widespread censorship on Weibo, it tends to focus on sensitive political issues, not social and cultural problems that don't directly threaten the regime. If Lee had gone to a state-controlled newspaper, it may have ignored her entirely. But thanks to Sina Weibo, she had a direct dialogue with 60,000 people every day.

Kim is doing something extremely valuable for Chinese women, one of Lee's followers wrote during Domestic Awareness Violence Month in October, 2011. This is exactly the kind of thing a well-known person needs to bring attention to before it can really shock people.

One in four women are estimated to be victims of spousal abuse in China. Domestic violence is illegal in the country under a 2005 law, but that has hardly protected women in a largely conservative society where spousal abuse is often considered a private family matter.

Indeed, in a far more foreboding sign, a woman from Sichuan province was recently found guilty of killing her husband after suffering months of abuse at his hands. She pleaded with authorities to help her, showing them her bruises and scars from cigarette burns. She was pushed aside. It was a "private family matter," she was told. Hundreds of activists and lawyers have frantically petitioned to see her sentence commuted. They failed. She will likely be executed in the next few days.

This article originally published at The Daily Dot here
--------------------------------------------------------------
It's the story of outsiders finding their place, love, loss, the constant struggle between good and evil, and a revolution to quell unfair leadership.

And of course, Tina Fey. Wasn't Mean Girls awesome?

If you ask us, replace Tina Fey with Anne Hathaway and you've got yourself a dead ringer for the Les Miserables screenplay. And yes, Les Mis technically came first and all but that's besides the point.

The true point is that Les Mis and Mean Girls just have so much in common. Regina George and Javert were clearly cut out of the same vicious cloth. Amanda Seyfried plays a dumb blonde in both movies (mind blown, right?). And high school is pretty much the same thing as revolutionary France.

SEE ALSO: I Dreamed a Meme: Les Miserables Meets the Internet

Mean Girls even had a musical number. How could anyone ever forgot the "Plastics" rendition of "Jingle Bell Rock"? We're thinking a Les Mis sequel where Lindsay Lohan belts out Fantine's "I Dreamed a Dream" would do great.

With all these blatant overlaps, how could Tumblr not call it out in terrific meme style? Check out the brilliance of Les Mean Girls Tumblr in the gallery above.
--------------------------------------------------------------
After the Ravens beat the 49ers to win Super Bowl XLVII on Sunday, fans poured into the streets of Baltimore to celebrate the win. They yelled, screamed, whooped and hollered. But one man with a camera captured something most unusual: a romantic fellow bended down on one knee to propose to his overjoyed girlfriend. It makes for an amazing piece of YouTube gold  even if it's shot in that super-annoying vertical format. The fun gets started around the 0:35 mark, so check it out above and let us know what you think in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Surface Pro is the product Microsoft should have debuted to carry the banner of Windows 8 last fall. More powerful than the Surface RT tablet that's been met with "muted" response from the market, the Surface Pro fulfills the promise of Windows 8: Your PC and your tablet  your entire digital life, really  all on one device you can take anywhere.

Well, more or less anywhere. The Surface Pro  which goes on sale Feb. 9  is certainly portable, but it's chunkier than other tablets in its size class. Like the RT model, the Pro has the same 10.6-inch screen, but it's noticeably heavier (2 instead of 1.5 pounds) and a bit thicker (0.53 to 0.37 inch). The extra bulk is all muscle, though: Inside the Surface Pro is an Intel Core i5 processor, 4GB of RAM and either 64 ($899) or 128GB ($999) of storage, putting it in a class with most Ultrabooks. The Surface Pro is a laptop in tablet form.

Certainly, we've seen plenty of variations on the PC-as-tablet idea ever since the launch of Windows 8, but the Surface Pro feels more special. This, after all, is Microsoft's vision of how computing with its re-imagined Windows should be. And the vision is compelling: Your work and personal lives combined in a single device, made as minimalist as possible.

I've been using the Surface Pro as my primary tablet and PC, and I have to say, it's been a very capable substitute for my actual MacBook Pro/iPad setup. While the Pro still suffers from some of the ongoing problems with Windows 8  notably the lack of native apps and oddness with how the new user interface sometimes works  the Surface Pro has won me over with its portability and power. Just for the reclaimed desk space alone, it's a win.

From a distance, the Surface Pro looks almost exactly like the Surface RT, but it's easy to tell the two apart when you look close or even just hold them both in your hand. The Pro isn't just thicker  it has a telltale seam on the back that serves as a vent for the cooling fan. The fan is also a giveaway, audible when the tablet needs to tax its processor (which happens often), although it's much quieter than my MacBook.

Both the Surface Pro and RT have a kickstand that allows them to stand upright at what Microsoft deems the ideal angle (22 degrees) for tabletop use. I found that angle to be a bit steep, but I am 6'4". Connectors are somewhat different: Although both have a single USB port, the Pro's is version 3.0 to the RT's 2.0. The Pro also has a Mini DisplayPort for connection to an external display  something you're going to be much more inclined to do with this device  whereas the RT sports the microHDMI connector that's more common on phones.

Generally, though, the two Surfaces are very similar, and it shows in their shared compatibility with Microsoft's much-hyped Touch Cover. The accessory fits both models perfectly, attaching to the magnetic connectors with the exact same click sound. I actually opted for the Type Cover since I find the lack of tactile response on the flat Touch version unnerving (Microsoft was kind enough to let us borrow one of each for this review).

I initially thought the Pro would suffer when I used it as a literal laptop, but the kickstand actually does a decent job of keeping the tablet standing up on your lap when, say, chilling on the couch with it. Also, the Type and Touch Covers are nice and solid, connecting with a strong magnetic grip, so no problems there. The only issue is that fixed kickstand angle, but I didn't find it heinous.

The Surface Pro serves as a competent tablet or laptop substitute except for one thing: battery life. The Core i5 processor is a power hog (there's a reason the majority of tablets that run Windows 8 proper pack Intel's mobile Atom processors), and I was lucky to get even 3 hours out of it when using it as a tablet  and just 2.5 when it was connected to a workstation (with the Pro's screen on).

Of course, if the Surface Pro is plugged into a workstation  which I expect the most common use case to be  it'll most likely be plugged into power, so battery life won't be a factor. The Surface Pro is at its strongest when it's the vehicle driving a full PC experience, complete with monitor, USB hub and speakers. It's more than up to the task, and in many cases provides a better experience than other Windows 8 tablets and hybrids.

Whereas hybrids like the Lenovo Yoga and Dell XPS 12 focus first on the laptop experience and contort (quite literally in the Yoga's case) to let the user occasionally do something else, the Surface Pro re-thinks the experience from the start. It imagines that for serious "computing," you're going to be using plenty of accessories anyway. In such a setup, the Pro does a great job of powering the whole experience, while getting out of the way as much as possible.

Then, when it's time to relax, the Surface Pro can go solo, becoming one of the lightest PCs you can buy. At 2 pounds, it's a tad heavier than other tablets, but it's still easier to carry than pretty much anything with a built-in keyboard. And remember: This is still your PC  with all your files, apps and games  ready to get serious again, anytime, anywhere. When that important document arrives during an evening Netflix session, all it takes is a couple of taps (and probably a Touch Cover) to deal with it.

SEE ALSO: Surface Is a Tablet Windows Users Will Love [REVIEW]

Thanks to its connectors, the Surface Pro slipped into my MacBook's workstation very easily  jacking into my USB hub (with multiple accessories) and 23-inch 1080p Acer monitor as if it always belonged there. The Pro defaulted to mirroring its display to the Acer, which made sense because it's the same resolution as the Pro's 10.6-inch screen. However, when I used solely the second screen, some details  such as the density of the Start screen's live tiles  were rendered better for the larger area, so I opted for that. Turning off the Pro's display also doesn't tax its battery as much.

While the Surface Pro certainly has superior connectivity that its RT cousin, I was irritated by the lack of an Ethernet port. This is a common issue on tablets and Ultrabooks due to the size of the connector (only HP has a good solution), and most deal with it by supplying a USB adapter, but one isn't provided with the Surface Pro. You'd best invest in one  preferably one that can take advantage of USB 3.0 speeds  to really get the most out of the device.

Something you do get in the box, however, is the Pro's digitizing Pen, which is made to work specifically with this device (it won't work with other tablets or the Surface RT). The Pen is a pressure-sensitive stylus with a button to "click" input. It can attach to the magnetic ports on the pro when you're not using it, but it's not a powered device.

Microsoft says the pen has 1,024 levels of pressure sensitivity, painting thicker lines when you press harder, for example. However, that only works in apps that are designed to take advantage of the ability: Pressing hard worked extremely well in Microsoft's FreshPaint, for example, but not in Autodesk Sketchbook Express.

The "eraser" end of the Pen has a cool function: It actually works as an eraser. The end is made of soft plastic to ensure it glides nicely along the screen (a rubberized tip would likely drag). Again, drawing apps need to be able to recognize the eraser, but the two I mentioned had no problems. The diameter of the eraser, however, is about the same as the pen, and isn't easily changed. It provides a natural experience but isn't super useful for erasing anything big.

The Pen has advantages outside of drawing apps as well. Similar to Samsung's Galaxy Note line, the Pro can detect when the Pen is hovering above the screen, showing a mouse cursor. With the Pen, you'll be able to actually see "mouseover" effects, such as drop-down menus on many sites. You can use it to copy and paste with precision  with a little practice, that is.

Although the fact that the Pen only works with the Surface Pro bestows these advantages, it's also a weakness. It would be great to pair the Surface Pro with a touch-enabled external monitor that you could use as an easel, but that wouldn't work  unless of course you bought another stylus specific for that monitor. For that reason, the Pen can occasionally be a helpful and fun accessory, but it's not a game changer.

Since it runs Windows 8 Pro, the Surface Pro is a real option as a workhorse PC  as opposed to the Surface RT, which is primarily a "consumption" oriented device. The RT is a tablet that can do some work-related tasks; the Pro is a PC that moonlights as a tablet.

My workflow requires me to have several different browsers open at any one time, and by being able to run Firefox and Chrome, I could actually work on the Pro. Since I use a Mac most of the time, I always have a keyboard customizer installed on any Windows device so I can switch the Control and Alt keys  making it more like a Mac. But the one I use (AutoHotKey) is a Windows 7 app and can't run on Windows RT. Of course, it works perfectly on the Pro.

If the Surface Pro is stymied by anything, it's Windows 8 itself. I encountered the same bugginess with the Pro that I've been seeing on Windows 8 devices for the last few months. A couple of times when I detached the Pro from its workstation, the accelerometer for some reason flipped the display and became unresponsive for an extended period.

Wi-Fi was finicky, giving me a "Limited" connection every now and then on networks it was working fine on just minutes before. I've been having Wi-Fi issues with Windows 8 since the Consumer Preview; they happen far less often now (only twice in a week) but they're still there.

Finally, the onscreen keyboard (again, rarely) sometimes doesn't appear. These are relatively minor quirks, and they're always fixed with either closing problem apps or rebooting the device, but bottom line: Windows 8 is still buggy.

One problem that isn't a bug, however, and affects the overall experience far more is the lack of support for Windows 8 apps, and the unexpectedly poor ways the few apps that exist sometimes behave.

Case in point: I use IM+ as an instant-messaging aggregator, and was pleased to see it has a Windows 8 app. While the app's core functionality is good, it overlooks some convenience details. Searching your contacts isn't as easy as simply typing (something I expect when I'm in the new UI environment now) and there's no easy path to "Home" by simply right-clicking, as is the case with most of Microsoft's homegrown apps.

This isn't hard stuff, but it does indicate that developers still aren't used to the new UI paradigms of Windows 8. As I've said before, they're powerful, but it's up to developers to unlock that power, and so far they're kinda, sorta doing it, but not really.

SEE ALSO: The Problem With Windows 8

Another frustrating example is the new-UI version of Google Chrome. Like many, I prefer to use Chrome as my primary browser, but its odd behavior in the Windows 8 environment had me switching back to Internet Explorer, and using Chrome in desktop mode. The desktop version of Chrome, however, isn't optimized for display on a second screen, and always looked fuzzy.

On top of that, Chrome for Windows 8 defaults to a full-screen mode at startup. But Windows 8 is already full-screen, so the full-screen mode for Chrome amounts to robbing you of the ability to see (or even create) tabs other than the one you're working on. Why does this "full screen" mode even exist in Chrome when I'm running it in the new UI? It doesn't make sense.

I could go on, but I'm already venturing too far into general problems with Windows 8, and not the Surface Pro. However, the Pro is intended to fulfill the promise of Windows 8  a digital world that's driven by touch interfaces, austere design and constant connectivity. All that's well and good, but the execution is in the details, and some of those still need work.

Despite the challenges of Windows 8, the Surface Pro is still a device I'd recommend because it really solves a problem. If you're like me, your digital life  both personal and professional  is vast, and it involves more than just access to apps and documents. It's also about having a device with the power to really unlock their potential. It's not good enough to just have access to photos; you want to run Photoshop, too.

The Surface Pro is a great all-in-one gateway to your digital life, work and play. It's better than a laptop because it's more portable. It's better than a phone because you can get more done on a big screen. It's better than other Windows 8 tablets because it's more powerful. And it's better than an iPad because it's made for productivity from the start.

All of this has a big asterisk beside it, though  that being mobility can't be a top priority. With its anemic battery life and relative bulk, the Surface Pro should not be your go-to device if you really want a tablet experience. But there's a difference between mobility and mobile computing. For the latter, the Microsoft Surface Pro offers one of the best experiences you can get.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It takes a certain skill to be minimalistic  in life, in art and even when developing an app or designing a website.

This charming comic by Grant Snider of Incidental Comics illustrates some sound advice if you're looking to get the most out of the simple things. But be prepared  it's harder than it looks.

Comic illustration by Grant Snider, Incidental Comics. Published with permission; all rights reserved.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Hey, fools. Stop whatever boring thing you're doing and follow Mr. T on Twitter.

If you're still twiddling your tweeting thumbs, behold the Mr. T 140-character wisdom you're missing:

The A-Team star joined Twitter last month and has gained a steady following of '80s TV and gold jewelry-loving tweeters. Part of the reason for Mr. T's foray into social media seems to be the launch of his official app.

You can Mr. T yourself, people. There's also a discount for early bird fools.

Twitter understandably seems pretty stocked about Mr. T joining the platform too.

Oh, and Mr. T also has a YouTube channel too.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The web will once again play a vital role during New York Fashion Week, which returns to New York City on Thursday.

In an effort to reach consumers as well as buyers and press, many designers plan to unveil their Fall/Winter 2013 collections through live-streaming video on their websites, Facebook and elsewhere. Still more will upload backstage footage on social networks such as Twitter, Viddy and Google+. Meanwhile, members of the fashion press will churn out 140-character reviews and mobile snapshots live from the shows, while posting longer, slideshow-accompanied reviews on their respective news sites.

With so much to choose from, following NYFW online can feel nearly as overwhelming as attending in person, which is why we've gathered the best resources for enjoying the goings-on via your desktop and mobile phone. If we've missed any, please let us know in the comments section below.

For the first time in years, YouTube will not live-stream any shows from NYFW. Instead, livestreams of 54 shows at Lincoln Center will be displayed at mbfashionweek.com, the schedule for which is available here.

Shows from MADE Fashion Week in downtown Manhattan, including Jeremy Scott's and Sophie Theallet's, will be hosted on livestream.com, and still others will be hosted on the websites of individual designers and press agencies such as KCD. A schedule of those, below:

For those who prefer more editorially heavy coverage, here our top five picks for fashion news and imagery throughout the week:

Style.com: Thorough collection reviews, plus real-time and high-res photos.

Heard on the Runway: Blog-style coverage and slideshows from The Wall Street Journal.

On the Runway: The New York Times' style blog contains short updates from on and around the runway, often accompanied by slideshows.

Women's Wear Daily: Reviews and highlights from the collections.

We've created a Twitter list featuring our favorite Twitter users to follow for play-by-play action during NYFW. To monitor the broader conversation, follow the hashtags #nyfw and #mbfw.

These days, fashion show attendees surely snap a runway photo (or six) to upload to Instagram, sometimes even mid-show. Some of our favorites: showstudio_nick_knight, evachen212, EHolmesWSJ, kawaks, tmagazine.

Looking for immediate, photo-rich coverage of New York Fashion Week? Tumblr is your best bet. Our picks: Tumblr.com/NYFW, WGSN, WWD, From Me To You, Teen Vogue and Eva Chen.

Like Instagram and Tumblr, Pinterest has become a popular repository for backstage footage. Check out boards from Oscar de la Renta, The Wall Street Journal and WWD.

Google has created a NYFW hub on Google+ with running backstage footage and a schedule of Hangouts with designers.
--------------------------------------------------------------
In your bizarre North Korea news of the day, the country's leaders have apparently used footage from the popular Call of Duty series in a new anti-American propaganda video.

Update: The video has since been removed from YouTube following a copyright claim from Activision, which publishes the Call of Duty series.

The video, posted by North Korean official propaganda agency Uriminzokkiri, tells the strange tale of a young North Korean man falling asleep and dreaming of a hypothetical missile attack on New York City.

It combines homemade renderings of a spaceship-style aircraft with footage of New York's skyscrapers in flames that was taken directly from Modern Warfare 3, first noticed by Kotaku.

Adding yet another strange layer to the video is the choice of soundtrack: a version of "We Are the World," originally written by Michael Jackson and Lionel Richie for an African famine relief benefit.
--------------------------------------------------------------
What role does technology play in your social life? Do you Google someone before the first date? Is Facebook the first place you go to announce your relationship status? Is sexting a part of your flirting?

The folks at Match.com were wondering too, and conducted a digital dating survey, asking over 5,000 single and married people about their dating habits.

It seems women do much of their pre-date homework online; 48% of single women research a partner on Facebook before the first date (vs. 38% of men). But men would rather find out for themselves in person  nearly half of single men (49%) think researching someone prior to a first date is unacceptable.

Before you clean up your apartment, you might want to clean up your Facebook page. Across all ages, 27% of single men and 26% of single women have or would clean up their Facebook wall before accepting a friend request from a potential date. Singles in their 20s (36%) particularly likely to keep their Facebook walls nice and tidy.

Interestingly, not many singles are using Facebook to find a date, though that may change soon with the release of Facebook's Graph Search. Almost three quarters of singles are on Facebook, but only 7% used sites like Facebook to find their most recent dates.

SEE ALSO: 10 Dating Apps to Help You Find True Love

When it comes to sexting, the survey found 32% of singles have sent a sext and 51% have received one.

Dr. Helen Fisher, biological anthropologist and chief scientific adviser to Match.com says sexting is the modern way to find a mate  using technology to act on a deep evolutionary strategy. "Young people have to reproduce, have to pass on their DNA," she says, and "sexting is like a peacock shimmering its tail feathers."

As for the risky behavior, Fisher says it's a brain thing. "If you're madly in love, certain parts of the brain actually shut down, you make poor decisions. Sexting among the young is because someone has fallen in love and wants to win someone else." So it's true we're not always thinking with our brains.

There's more info about digital and dating in the below infographic. Take a look and let us know if any of the stats surprise you.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The developers of the OUYA, the $99 hackable Android console that raised more than $8 million on Kickstarter last year, say the console will become available at retail outlets in June of this year.

Consumers will be able to pick up the console from Target, Best Buy, GameStop and Amazon. Amazon has already launched a flashy preorder splash page with details about the console.

The OUYA, which includes its own software development kit with every console, has already hit the hands of developers that backed the Kickstarter page. Those who pledged via Kickstarter are expected to receive the console in March, and preorders made on the company's website will be fulfilled in April, the company promises.

The OUYA will be entering a crowded next-gen console market in 2013, with Sony and Microsoft expected to announce new consoles available by the holiday season.

The news of the retail partnership was broken by The Wall Street Journal when it ran an interview with OUYA founder Julie Uhrman. She told the Journal she wasn't worried about competing with the larger consoles because the OUYA had its own market.

"We dont need to beat Xbox or Sony or any console that enters the marketplace, we need to carve out our own niche. OUYA offers a very different value proposition to the gaming you can currently experience. Its a box designed specifically for the television that leverages the screen, we support 3D gaming, HD, we support the controller, we added a touchpad to the controller. The kind of content youll see on OUYA, itll be inventive and creative and has never been on the television," Uhrman said.

The OUYA will retail for $99 everywhere and extra controllers, which include a touch screen, will retail for $49.99.

Check out the gallery below for some hands-on pictures of the OUYA.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Happy National Pancake Day! It's the most syrup-covered holiday this side of Waffle Day.

To celebrate the day that honors all things pancake, hotcake and flapjack, we found a couple cool dads who boast mad breakfast art skill(ets). Whip up your favorite pancake recipe  or break open the Bisquick  and flip through the gallery for inspiration.

It might also help to watch Nathan Sapian of Sapian Pancakes and his YouTube how-to for creating crazy pancakes:
--------------------------------------------------------------
"Hey guys! Tried calling your phones about doing the dishes, but looks like you're really busy :) It just says on the schedule that it's both your turns tonight. Oh well, guess I'll just assume from now on our plans will fall through :) If you could remember though, that'd be really great ;D Hope you're having fun with whatever you're doing!! xx"

Ugh. If only everyone could just be as blunt as Mr. Heckles from Friends.

SEE ALSO: Social Site Nextdoor Wants to Connect You With Your Neighbors

Whether it's during a quarrel with a friend or an attempt to get your next-door neighbors to stop playing "Who Let The Dogs Out?" at 4 a.m., the passive-aggressive art form  in all its cringe-worthy, emoticon-heavy glory  is best used sparingly. Really, it just makes things more awkward.

When it is used, though, it's always appreciated when people take photographic evidence. Check out our compilation above of some of the most politely sassy notes left by neighbors.

And be sure to flip through Happy Place's "Insane Neighbor Notes" for more confrontation-averting scribbles.

What are some of the best passive-aggressive notes you've received? Share them with us below  and please, don't be passive about it.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Pinterest, which raised $100 million from investors at a valuation of $1.5 billion just last May, is reportedly seeking yet another round of financing  one that values the three-year-old visual bookmarking site in the range of $2 billion to $2.5 billion.

According to The Wall Street Journal, Pinterest is merely in talks and no deal has yet been finalized. A spokesperson for Pinterest told Mashable, "We dont have anything to share at this time."

What has Pinterest done with its last $100 million? From a consumer angle, the changes have been steady if somewhat minor. The company has rolled out updates to its website and iPhone apps, including the introduction of "secret boards," and launched apps for Android and iPad devices. On the back-end, Pinterest has hired up, opened a new office in San Francisco, cracked down on spam and acquired recipe-sharing site Punchfork. Traffic is also nearly four times what it was a year ago, coming in at 28 million uniques in December, according to comScore figures published by the WSJl.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A stripped-down version of the Raspberry Pi is now available in Europe for $25, and will debut to the rest of the world "very soon."

Called the Model A, the Linux-based microcomputer comes with one USB port and 256MB of RAM, but has no Ethernet, the UK-based developer announced Monday.

The pocket-sized PC consumes around one-third of the power of its $35 counterpart, the popular Model B. For more on the bare-bones device, watch the video, above.

SEE ALSO: This $35 Computer Is an Interactive Gift for Geeky Kids

Would you purchase the Raspberry Pi? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Like watching how things are made? Like fast cars? If you've answered those two questions with a "yes," we have a video treat for you.

Titled "RB9 Rhythm of the Factory," the video shows us fascinating details from the production of Infiniti Red Bull's new racing car, the RB9.

In the video, in which the manufacturing sounds are mixed with the music to create a cool soundtrack, you can see how the car's transmission is made and assembled by hand as well as bits and pieces of the testing process.

Check out the video above and share your thoughts in the comments!
--------------------------------------------------------------
Online ads that sing, dance and otherwise distract readers won't be part of social news site Reddit's experience.

The folks at Adblock Plus, a browser add-on that blocks so-called "annoying ads," announced that all ads on social news site Reddit meet the company's requirements for being non-intrusive, That means users of the add-on will see ads even with the ad blocker installed.

Adblock Plus was designed to reward sites that don't take "bad" ads and thereby minimizes disruptions to visitors while still allowing a site to make money.

So what makes for a bad ad? According to Adblock Plus, any ad that covers content, is stuck in the middle of text, automatically starts playing music or a video when the page loads or includes animations (yep, we're talking to you, obnoxious belly fat ads) is flagged as an obtrusive ad and blocked.

Reddit isn't the only site that doesn't take obtrusive ads. Amazon and Ehow have similar policies and have received the Adblock seal of approval, which means that even without Adblock Plus you won't see dancers and jiggling bellies.

This article originally published at TechNewsDaily here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Redditors have done it again. Several weeks ago, users produced a list of the 100 most beautiful songs. This week the theme is relaxation.

Posting a r/AskReddit thread on Monday, user polishklops questioned, "Hands down, what is the most relaxing song you know?" After nearly 9,000 comments, they came up with a list of more than 100 songs.

SEE ALSO: Listen to the Most Surprising Breakout Billboard Hits

We didn't want you to have to stress about finding all the songs, so we embedded 81 of the selections in the Spotify playlist below. Since almost a quarter of the songs do not appear on Spotify, however, you can follow the links below the playlist to YouTube clips of many of the remaining songs.

Be sure to visit the comment section and let us know about the music that calms your nerves.

Songs From Reddit's List That Aren't on Spotify
--------------------------------------------------------------
UPDATE: After weeks of rumors, Dell announced Tuesday that it is officially planning to go private. The company will pay shareholders $13.65 a share in cash, in a deal worth about $24.4 billion.

Michael Dell, the company's founder, is financing the deal along with private equity firm Silver Lake. Microsoft also loaned $2 billion towards the deal.

The deal still needs to be approved by the company's shareholders.

Dell's board met Monday night to vote on a $24 billion offer to take the company private, according to a report.

According to Bloomberg, the deal may be announced Tuesday morning. The report adds that the offer puts Dell's value at $13.50 to $13.75 a share. Dell closed Monday at $13.27 giving it a market value of around $23 billion.

Among the backers in the plan is Microsoft, which is investing $2 billion and Silver Lake Management, which will invest $1 billion-plus. CEO and Founder Michael Dell will contribute his 15.7% stake, which is valued at $3.6 billion, and invest another $700 million, which will give him a majority stake in his company.

Reps from Dell could not be reached for comment on the report.

Reports about taking the company private began surfacing in mid-January. Dell's stock has been up about 31% since the beginning of the year.

Taking the company private would in theory give it more freedom to pursue growth strategies without worrying about challenges from investors.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Launchpad is a series that introduces Mashable readers to compelling startups. If you would like to have your startup considered for inclusion, please see the details here.



One-Liner Pitch: Ribbon makes it easier to sell physical and digital goods through Facebook and Twitter.

Why It's Taking Off: The startup plans to unify the payment process across a wide range of major social platforms.

Several startups have launched in the past year with the goal of helping businesses and individual sellers process payments on social networks like Facebook and Twitter. Now, one startup is going a step further by creating the first streamlined solution for payments across these and other social platforms.

Ribbon, a payments service, came out of stealth in November and unveiled a tool that lets sellers create a special link to a one-page checkout that can be copy and pasted directly into the Twitter news feed. Any Twitter user interested in purchasing the item can preview a description and video of it in the tweet and then click on the link to make the purchase. Ribbon handles the rest, including processing the payment for the seller and e-mailing a receipt to the customer.

On Tuesday, Ribbon introduced a similar option for processing payments in the Facebook news feed. As with the Twitter option, sellers just paste the Ribbon link into a Facebook post and it will direct customers straight to the checkout page where they can purchase the item with one click The startup plans to roll out this feature for YouTube next and hopes to expand it to other social networks like Pinterest in the future.

The big selling point for Ribbon's service is that sellers can copy and paste the same link into posts on any of these social networks and it will automatically customize the checkout experience.

"The idea is to make buying and selling frictionless so that it happens on whatever platform the user is already on, rather than pushing him somewhere else and losing him," Hany Rashwan, Ribbon's co-founder and CEO, told Mashable. "All you do as a seller is just copy and paste."

Since the service launched publicly last year, Hany says it has attracted sellers ranging from musicians selling songs and tickets to Etsy and Craigslist users selling physical goods. While Hany says his company isn't directly competing against these websites, he admits that part of the goal of Ribbon is to "cut your middle man out and sell directly to your fans and followers through your own channels."

Ribbon, as it exists today, is a bit different than the original plan Hany had for the company. When Hany was first accepted into the AngelPad startup accelerator program in the fall of 2011, the goal was to build a "simpler version of Shopify," an ecommerce platform that lets users create their own online stores. After a few months, though, Hany and his team shifted to focus on the problem that others like Soldsie and Chirpify have attempted to solve: how to monetize your following on various websites. As Hany puts it, "The problem is I've cultivated an online following on Twitter, or on my own website, but I'm not empowered to monetize my own users."

Ribbon announced this week that it has raised a $1.6 million seed round led by Draper Associates to solve that problem. This is on top of the $120,000 that Ribbon raised through AngelPad.

The startup generates revenue by taking a 5% cut of every purchase and charging a $0.30 fee per transaction.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Scientists cheered NASA's decision to send a new rover to Mars in 2020, but stressed that the mission should pave the way to return Martian rocks to Earth  a major goal of the planetary science community.

In a set of statements released Jan. 28 and Jan. 30, two large and well-respected groups of scientists  the Planetary Society and the American Astronomical Society's Division for Planetary Sciences (DPS), respectively  shared their views on the plan to send another robotic explorer to the Red Planet in seven years.

The new Mars rover mission was announced Dec. 4 by John Grunsfeld, NASA's associate administrator for science, at the annual meeting of the American Geophysical Union in San Francisco. The new rover will share some design features with NASA's Mars Science Laboratory (MSL) Curiosity rover, which landed on Mars in August to begin at least a two-year mission.

"We welcome the recent announcement that NASA will return to Mars in 2020 with a new rover derived from the MSL Curiosity design," the Planetary Society statement read. "Continued exploration of Mars is crucial to the scientific community and important for building upon our decades-long investment in engineering and technology development. However, we strongly believe that the mission should have the capability to collect and store Martian rock samples as recommended by the National Research Council's Planetary Science Decadal Survey."

SEE ALSO: NASA to Launch Mars Rover in 2020

The Decadal Survey is a report undertaken every 10 years by an independent group of scientists to determine the highest priorities for the field of planetary science (other fields, such as astronomy and astrophysics, have their own surveys). This report is generally well-respected and highly influential in allocating the limited funding within NASA's science budget.

"We strongly believe that the mission should carry a payload consistent with the recommendations given in the National Research Councils decadal survey for planetary science, Vision and Voyages," the DPS statement read. "It is of the utmost importance that NASA and Congress follow the recommendations laid forth in the Decadal Survey in order to maximize science return and support a balanced and affordable approach to exploration in our solar system."

NASA has released scant details on the new rover plan, and it's unclear yet whether the robot will be able to collect Martian rock samples intended to be brought back to Earth. Most plans for returning Mars samples are multi-phase, with an initial mission to collect, or cache, the rocks, and later missions to rendezvous with the collector and return the samples to Earth.

"The question of caching is going to be a trade-off case," Grunsfeld said when he announced the rover. "The science definition team is going to have to weigh, what science do we want to get done? How much mass and power do we have available? What can we get to the surface, and where do we want to go?"

Both statements also pushed against budget cuts to NASA's planetary sciencedivision suggested by the Obama administration's February 2012 budget proposal. If implemented, those cuts could force NASA to retire early some of its current solar system probes, such as the Cassini Saturn orbiter and the Messenger Mercury probe, and delay future missions.

"We find the shift in budgetary priority deeply troubling," the Planetary Society scientists wrote. "Namely, it represents a step backwards from our nation's long commitment to exploration and the pursuit of answers to the big questions of 'where do we come from?' and 'are we alone?'"

The proposed budget cuts would also exclude the possibility of a mission to Jupiter's moon Europa, "long considered one of the most compelling and scientifically rich destinations in the solar system," the DPS statement read.

While many scientists agree that Mars is a valuable destination, some wish the Red Planet didn't hog all the glory  and the budget.

This article originally published at Space.com here
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Twitter Fail Whale sheds its cartoonish look for a classy makeover at the hands of Deviant Artist *ka-92. Gone are the playful orange birdies lifting the mammoth marine mammal, replaced with fancier fowl.

If Herman Melville ever wrote a sequel to Moby Dick for the digital age, it might look a little something like this.

BONUS: 10 Spectacular Paintings You Won't Believe Were Made on an iPhone
--------------------------------------------------------------
UK company O2 has collaborated with designer Sean Miles to create fully functional phones using recycled handsets and vintage shoes. This upcycling project, called Walkie Talkies, is part of the communication companys O2 Recycle campaign, which gives money to those who recycle their gadgets and aims to highlight what can happen when you recycle your old handset instead of send it to the landfill.

Miles created four designs using a Christian Louboutin heel, a classic mens brogue, a Nike Air trainer and a Hunter Welly. They contain old Nokia and LG handsets sent in by O2 Recycle customers. Each shoe phone, which doubles as a piece of art, can be used like a normal phone as a keypad has been incorporated into the sole.

The Walkie Talkies are the first in a range of products that Sean Miles is developing for The O2 Recycle Collection, including handbags and gloves. The complete set will be on display at an exhibition in March where visitors will be able to win all of the items. Miles said:

I wondered how I could make phones that people might be embarrassed to be seen with into something that would give them a new lease of life  which is what upcycling is all about. I hoped that, by turning them into Walkie Talkies, I would raise a smile and perhaps a laugh and create things that people wanted once again. Ive been using them while out with friends and they never fail to start a conversation, even when Im not using them as a phone! I hope that they can get more people talking about the need to recycle old gadgets rather than binning them.

This article originally published at PSFK here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Oh cats, you insanely cunning little creatures. If they are hungry, they will eat; If you stop them, they will show no mercy.

Poor Simon stands no chance. Better he just bow down to his almighty cat now than face feline humiliation later. But some of us just have to learn the hard way.

SEE ALSO: Eyebrow Cat Looks Really Nervous

Hopefully, Simon won't forget this lesson in who really is the king of the jungle after his cat walks all over him  literally.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Super snuggly, roly poly animals aren't just for the Internet. The Puppy Bowl worked its cute little wet nose into the cable top 10 this week, capitalizing on the Super Bowl buzz.

But the San Francisco 49ers, Baltimore Ravens and majorly talented babe Beyonce took the prize for social media engagement this week. Super Bowl chatter topped 55 million mentions, a figure three times higher than 2012's event.

SEE ALSO: Super Bowl 2013 Commercials: Watch Them All Here

Finally, our beloved 30 Rock dropped the curtain with its series finale last Thursday. According to Trendrr, the finale episode experienced a 249% growth in social over the premiere on Oct. 4, 2012. The top hashtag was #30rock, with 52,133 uses, and coming in second was #farewell30rock, with 6,567 uses.

The data is courtesy of Trendrr, which measures social media activity related to specific television shows (e.g. mentions, likes, check-ins) across Twitter, Facebook, GetGlue and Viggle. To see daily rankings, check out Trendrr.TV.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Super Bowl XLVII was more popular with online viewers than any other sporting event in American history, according to third-party data released by CBS Sports and the NFL on Tuesday.

CBSSports.com's live stream of the game drew 3 million unique viewers who collectively generated almost 10 million live streams that totaled 114.4 million digitally broadcasted minutes. Unique viewers increased by 43% over last year's Super Bowl, total live streams increased by over 100% and total minutes streamed rose by 46%.

Each viewer spent an average of 38 minutes watching the game via live stream. The Super Bowl also set a number of social media records.

Our live stream of Super Bowl XLVII not only set online viewership and social-media records but set the standard for a second-screen sports experience, Jim Lanzone, president of CBS Interactive, said in a press release. Our goal was to create an environment that would serve as the perfect complement to CBS Sports coverage of the game. Were extremely proud of this historic experience.

The Super Bowl live stream offered a viewing option for sports fans without television access, but also functioned as a complementary second-screen experience for fans watching at home. Live stats and other updates augmented the action on the field, while alternative camera options showed the game from a series of four unique angles rarely seen in traditional broadcasts.

Beyonce's halftime performance was live streamed as well  a first for a Super Bowl halftime show  and fans were able to watch hit commercials on demand after they aired.

The Super Bowl's smashing success online, however, was still dwarfed by CBS' televised broadcast of the game, which drew a record 164.1 million viewers.

How long before more people watch the Super Bowl online than on TV? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Remember the good old days of reading textbooks in school and taking notes from a chalkboard? Yeah, neither do we.

PBS Learning Media, in preparation for Digital Learning Day on Wednesday, Feb. 6, conducted a national survey of pre-K to 12th grade teachers to find out how many incorporate technology into their day-to-day classroom activities.

According to a press release, close to 74% of all teachers surveyed said they use digital resources  tablets, computers  to expand and reinforce on content in their classrooms.

Among the other highlights: 69% of those surveyed said educational technology helps them do much more than ever before for their students, with the most commonly used resources being online lesson plans, interactive web games and online articles.

More than one-third said they use a tablet or e-reader in their classrooms  up from 20% last year.

SEE ALSO: An Apple a Day Is Great, But Teachers Really Want More Tech

Take a look at the graphic below to see the rest of the results. What do you think of increased technology use in today's classrooms?
--------------------------------------------------------------
Business Insider broke the story Monday, reporting that this is Twitter's biggest acquisition to date. Twitter and Bluefin both confirmed the acquisition today on their respective blogs.

For Twitter this is proof that the company is doubling down on its efforts in social TV. In December, Twitter partnered with Nielsen to create the Nielsen Twitter TV Rating using the SocialGuide platform Nielsen acquired in November 2012.

Twitter says that while it "intends to honor existing Bluefin customer contracts," it won't sell Bluefin's product suite beyond the contract. Instead, it plans to use Nielsen's SocialGuide platform "to help brands, agencies, and networks fully understand the combined value of Twitter and TV."

Twitter is having huge success in TV. The Super Bowl alone generated 24.1 million tweets and the social network was mentioned in half of all Super Bowl ads.

More to the point  advertisers are open to using Twitter as a metric for engagement/future ad buys.

This time last year, there were at least half a dozen startups trying to do social TV analytics. I got the sense from a number of advertisers and television executives that doubling down on using social analytics for ad buys or ad research would only happen once it was clear what services would survive and what services would fizzle out.

Now that two of the leading players  Bluefin and SocialGuide  have been acquired, it will be much easier to get executive level buy-in around these services. The fact that Twitter is now actively investing in social TV proves to networks and advertisers that it's a platform that deserves attention.

Dan Neely, the CEO of Networked Insights, another big social analytics company, thinks the acquisition "validates the value of social analytics." Neely told Mashable, "Twitter needs to prove to advertisers that they are are a great place to spend media dollars at scale, so Bluefin makes perfect sense for them." Neely noted that we've seen this kind of acquisition before, namely when Google acquired Urchin in 2005 to build out what became known as Google Analytics.

For Twitter, having an ownership stake in this type of technology has huge potential. Within minutes of the Super Bowl blackout, brands including Oreo took to Twitter to promote viral marketing spots or to buy Twitter ads.

Imagine how much better and faster that process could be if Twitter had the ability to let its advertisers access more acute data and research?

When I first saw a demo of Bluefin's product during the summer of 2011, it was clear that, as a measurement tool, it had great potential for advertisers and networks. I can't wait to see what happens now that the company is part of Twitter.

What do you think of Twitter's decision to double down on social TV? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
BlackBerry released its Z10 smartphone last week  naturally, social media responded by retweeting a photo of the device more than 8,000 times.

Our friends over at Skylines sifted through 31,644,435 unique Twitter photos from the past week. Take a look through the gallery above to see the top 10 retweeted images, including the Z10.

SEE ALSO: Jason Mraz Uses Fans' Tweets to Fuel Music Video

What were your favorite pictures from the past week? Tell us below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Shortly after a hacker attack compromised the accounts of some 250,000 users, Twitter is looking into enhancing its users' security by adding two-level authentication, The Guardian reports.

The news comes from a Twitter job posting. The company is looking for a software engineer that would "design and develop user-facing security features, such as multifactor authentication and fraudulent login detection."

The job posting itself does not mean that Twitter will launch the feature soon (or ever), but given the number of high-profile hacker attacks on Twitter users in the past couple of users, it would probably be a wise move.

Two-level authentication usually works as follows: whenever you login from a new device, besides logging in with your standard login credentials (user name and password), you're also required to enter a code sent to your cell phone. Once you authorize a device, you don't have to enter that code again in the next 30 days.

This method makes it a lot harder for a hacker to take over your account; even if he or she manages to capture your password, it's still useless without the code, which is tied to a specific device, your cell phone.

Several high-profile web companies are already offering two-level authentication  Google has it as an option for Gmail, and Dropbox also offers two-step authentication as an option for its users.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Mini-drones are not just a luxury for us civilians. After all, if a technology like this comes to the average Joe, it's often because it already existed in the battlefield. Enter the Black Hornet, a palm-sized spy-copter used by British troops in Afghanistan.

The drone, which weighs about half an ounce and measures just 4 inches, is manufactured by the Norwegian company Proxy Dynamics. It's designed to be used by a single soldier as a reconnaissance and spying device. The drone is equipped with a camera that shoots videos and takes pictures. The soldier flies it with a mouse-like controller and receives its image and video feed on an hand-held device.

SEE ALSO: Watch the World's Highest Resolution Drone-Mounted Camera in Action

"Black Hornet gives our troops the benefits of surveillance in the palm of their hands. It is extremely light and portable whilst out on patrol," Philip Dunne, minister for defence equipment, support and technology, said in a statement.

Learn more about this nano-copter drone by watching the video above.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Do something different this Valentine's Day, and share a vine.

This year, we're challenging you to send a Valentine's Day vine  or "Valenvine"  to convey your feelings. Whether you're single and want to use your six-second video to show your romantic independence, or you opt to send a stop-motion note to your sweetheart, get creative with your vine! (If you're looking for tips on how to get started with Vine, check out our how-to post.)

You could create a miniature love story or a display of adorable artwork. Be sure to tweet your creation and share it with the hashtag #Valenvine. We'll be on the lookout for standout Valenvines and will feature them in a follow-up post here on Mashable.

SEE ALSO: 10 Works of Art on Vine

As an example of a #Valenvine, we created this geeky love story starring a few stuffed friends from around the office. We can't wait to see what you come up with!

Image composite by Mashable from image via iStockphoto, franckreporter
--------------------------------------------------------------
Searching for a way to use your code-slinging skills to help build a smarter government? Then try applying for round two of the White House's Presidential Innovation Fellows Program, announced Tuesday.

The Presidential Innovation Fellows Program calls upon a handful of innovators from a variety of fields to "help develop innovation solutions in areas of national significance," per the White House's blog post.

The first round of Fellows launched a variety of projects, from open data initiatives to a sort of eBay for small business' bids on government contracts. The next Fellows will work on those projects as well as a handful of new ones, including an "industrial Internet" and the pre-positioning of critical technology infrastructure ahead of a natural disaster.

"We are looking for incredibly talented, entrepreneurial people from a diverse array of backgrounds and with a wide range of experiences," wrote U.S. Chief Technology Officer Todd Park and U.S. Chief Information Officer Steven VanRoekel, pointing out that most but not all of the Fellowships require technology experience.

"Many of the Fellowship roles require coding and other tech skills, but not all do," reads the pair's post. "We are also looking for gifted and accomplished change agents with skills in user experience design, product management, project management, business development, operations reengineering, and more. In a nutshell, we are looking for people who can help make big things happen rapidly to advance the public good."

When the White House first announced the Presidential Innovation Fellows program, 600 people applied within 24 hours. Interested in becoming a Presidential Innovation Fellow? Apply at whitehouse.gov/InnovationFellows.

How would you use your technology skills to improve government? Share your ideas in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
This Japanese zoo is taking full precautions so that none of its animals go missing during an earthquake. To prepare, the Tama Zoo outside Tokyo is running what may be the wackiest drill EVER created.

To create a realistic sense of fear and emergency (we imagine), the zoo employs a human to dress in a zebra costume and terrorize the other workers.

SEE ALSO: This Houdini Horse Can Escape From Anything

The BBC captured the drill in which the human-zebra pretty much head-butts one of the guys holding the barricade so they are forced to "tranquilize" it. We also wonder if the zebra was targeted as the jail-breaker because of its predisposition to black and white stripes.

God bless you, Japan, for always being prepared.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Zynga reported better-than-expected revenue and earnings for the fourth quarter, but the business still has a long way to go towards profitability.

The gaming company reported earnings per share of $0.01 on revenue of $311.2 million in the December quarter, coming in well ahead of Wall Street's consensus estimate for EPS of -$0.03 on revenue of $212 million. Zynga also reported bookings of $261.3 million for the quarter, beating estimates of $222.4 million.

This, combined with better-than-expected guidance for the first quarter of 2013, helped push the stock price up by as much as 7% in after hours trading. However, this may be more of an indication of Wall Street's low expectations for the company than a significant improvement in Zynga's business.

Even though revenues beat estimates, they were still flat year-over-year. Likewise, bookings declined 15% from the same quarter in 2011. What's more, both monthly and daily active users were down quarter-over-quarter.

Despite the company's efforts to cut costs by eliminating games and laying off employees, Zynga still reported a net loss of more than $48 million. That's a significant improvement from the $435 million net loss the company posted in the same quarter a year ago, but most of that loss in 2011 was related to employee stock compensation costs resulting from Zynga's IPO.

In total, Zynga posted a net loss of more than $200 million for all of 2012. That may be better than what analysts had expected, but the company has a long way to go before it can be considered a winner.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Some 10 billion business cards are printed in the U.S. every year, and yet 88% of them are discarded one week after they're handed to a business contact, according to StatisticBrain. In response, developers have released apps, like Bump, that enable users to exchange information more seamlessly by tapping their phones. Still others have sought to make traditional business cards more effective by making them more engaging, emblazoning them with QR codes and embedding them with NFC chips to achieve a number of effects, such as smartphone-activated augmented reality displays.

One of the latest additions to the novelty category is CallingCube, a 3D business card that comes in the shape of a six-sided die. The hollow cube is just shy of 1" x 1" x 1", and five of the six sides can be inscribed with text and/or simple graphics in a variety of basic colors. The cards are made using 3D Systems' ZPrinter 650, a spokesperson for Ohio-based CallingCube tells us, and cost $299 for a set of 80. The company is planning to introduce additional forms, including the house-shaped one below, in the coming months:

The CallingCube cards are sure conversation starters, but there's no guarantee, of course, that they won't be discarded as quickly as traditional business cards. There's also the difficulty of transporting them. Beyond a messenger bag or purse, CallingCard suggests keeping a few in a front pant pocket, or in the interior pocket of a sports coat.

Is this something you would consider using to share your contact information at a networking event? Would you be more likely to hold on to one if it was handed to you in lieu of a traditional business card?
--------------------------------------------------------------
Lots of people use 3D printers to sculpt plastic. But some are using them to shape cells.

A team of researchers at Heriot-Watt University in Scotland, led by Will Shu, has built a printer that can lay down human stem cells in tiny spheres. Printing human cells has been done before, with bone marrow or skin. Those types of cells, however, are resilient compared to the more delicate embryonic stem cells.

The technique will allow us to create more accurate human tissue models which are essential to in vitro drug development and toxicity-testing. Since the majority of drug discovery is targeting human disease, it makes sense to use human tissues. Shu said in a press release.

SEE ALSO: Stem Cells For Babies

The scientists used a printer that has specialized valves, which are adjustable and control the rate at which the cells are released. That allowed them to put the stem cells where they are needed and keep them intact.

Stem cells are the building blocks of organs and tissues; they are generic cells that can become specific kinds when exposed to the right conditions. But one of the difficulties with them is that they are delicate; if the printer doesnt treat them gently they will lose their ability to differentiate into various cell types.

Shu and his team built a printer that forms the cells into tiny spheres, while keeping them alive.

SEE ALSO: Molecular Fountain of Youth Discovered

In the longer term, the printer could help build organs for transplants or repair. Since the printer can put stem cells in a three-dimensional pattern, it could build a small patch for a heart or kidney that would be made from stem cells cloned from the patient.

Shus team worked in partnership with Roslin Cellab, a company that plans to commercialize the technology. The work was published in the Feb. 5 issue of the journal Biofabrication.

This article originally published at Discovery News here
--------------------------------------------------------------
When Bianca Giaever asked a six-year-old what her movie should be she got an earful.

And she turned that earful into a piece of simple wonderment.

The movie, called the Scared is scared, tells the tale of a bear, a mouse, swimming pools, sleepovers, friendship, pizza and life. It's excitement, fear, joy and bewilderment wrapped up into a story full of heart and humor that only a six-year-old's imagination could provide.

SEE ALSO: Watch the Best Pep Talk Ever  Given by a Kid

Finally, a movie with a plot we can get on board with. Academy, take note.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Apple announced Wednesday that customers have purchased 25 billion songs from the iTunes store.

The 25 billionth song purchased was "Monkey Drums" by Chase Buch and it was bought by a man in Germany who will receive an iTunes gift card worth about $13,500.

"We are grateful to our users whose passion for music over the past 10 years has made iTunes the number one music retailer in the world, said Eddy Cue, Apples senior vice president of Internet Software and Services, in a statement. Cue added that iTunes users now download an average of more than 15,000 songs per minute through the service.

Apple launched the iTunes music store in 2003 and it took a little more than two years to sell one billion songs and another four years after that to hit the 10 billion song mark.

While 25 billion songs is certainly an impressive number  the equivalent of more than three songs for every man, woman and child on the planet  it still pales in comparison to the number of apps that have been downloaded. More than 40 billion apps have been downloaded from Apple's App Store to date, though of course many of these are free.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The BBC on Wednesday launched its first mobile app for international sports audiences, looking to capitalize on the increasing tendency of fans to turn to their smartphones for analysis and information.

The free app for iPhone and iPod Touch devices  an Android version will follow soon  includes a range of BBC Sport content such as live scores, stats, schedules, standings and commentary. A customizable menu lets users highlight the sports that most interest them.

Most fans will likely use the app to follow English Premier League soccer and other major international leagues, but the app also focuses on covering Formula One auto racing, rugby, golf, cricket and tennis. Major events of international relevance in other sports will be covered as well.

"More and more, we're finding that fans want to follow results on their mobile devices while they're on the move," James Montgomery, controller of digital and technology for BBC Global News, told Mashable in an interview. "That's the direction things are heading in, and this gives us another way to be competitive."

It's a smart move for the BBC to make, given fans' increased reliance on mobile technology and the Premier League's global fan base and top-dog status in world soccer . Montgomery says a third of traffic to the BBC Sport homepage now comes via mobile. During major sporting days, he says, that figure can rise to 40%.

BBC Sport also recently introduced a responsive design mobile site, which automatically resizes for smartphones and small tablets, as the media giant seeks to continue adapting to the growth of mobile technology. It will be interesting to see how many fans download the app as opposed to simply relying on the improved mobile site, but either way, the BBC looks well-positioned to serve the next generation of global sports fans.

You can download the BBC Sport app here (iTunes link).

 

Is this an app you'll check out? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Beyonc delivered a showstopping performance at the halftime show of Super Bowl XLVII, but the original plan was even more outlandish. The singer was originally going to appear in a 2014 Corvette Stingray that was also a transformer.

A person who says they were one of the extras in Beyonc's halftime show described the plan in archived journal entries on MTV's House of Style site. In the Jan. 31 entry, the person talks about seeing the Corvette at rehearsal on one end of the stage, then witnessed its transforming trick once Beyonc took the stage:

She arrived on the stage fresh faced and gorgeous, signature honey blond hair swept to the side, a black long sleeve tee and a pair of Phillip Lim harem pants. Suddenly, the Corvette turned into a transformer before our eyes and we realized Beyonc herself was going to be coming out of it.

Of course, the Super Bowl was on Sunday and there was no Corvette to be seen, except for a blink-and-you'll-miss-it appearance when one was awarded to Baltimore Ravens quarterback Joe Flacco for being named the game's MVP. What happened?

The extra puts the blame on Beyonce for the muscle car's absence, but also says it was the right call: "We werent even sure what to expect, as she had axed the red Corvette from the show, but she definitely made the right decisions."

SEE ALSO: Beyonce's Super Bowl Show Lights Up Instagram, Facebook and Twitter

GM confirmed to Mashable that it had worked with the NFL to include the Corvette in the broadcast, but those efforts ultimately fell apart. A spokesperson did not elaborate as to why. Reps for the NFL didn't immediately respond to a request for comment.

What do you think of the Corvette's almost-appearance at Super Bowl XLVII as a Transformer  awesome or cheesy? Share your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
That's right, even Queen B can photobomb.

But when Beyonce photobombs, it's not just some awkward selfie or boring landscape shot  she only photobombs the best. Like here, with Baltimore Ravens defensive end Haloti Ngata just after he WON the Super Bowl.

SEE ALSO: Beyonce's Super Bowl Show in 10 Fierce Photos

Redditor ralstyr009 called the picture out and notes that Ngata is holding a movie featuring Ravens teammate Terrell Suggs.

We didn't think it was possible but Beyonce just got cooler.
--------------------------------------------------------------
In a poetic moment, filmmaker Neels Castillon captured this stunning image of hundreds of birds ebbing and flowing in the wind. He calls it the "Bird Ballet."

These birds, known as starlings, float throughout the sky above Marseille, France, forming, dissolving and reforming into brilliant patterns.

SEE ALSO: Rare 'Dolphin Stampede' Captured in Breathtaking Viral Video

According to BBC Nature, starlings are known for "these wonderful swirling aerial displays, done at dusk as they get ready to roost for the winter."

The video shows the true grace and beauty that nature can provide when it's least expected.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A BlackBerry 10 device with a physical keyboard, the newly revealed Q10, will likely arrive in the U.S. much later than the BlackBerry Z10, which is slated to hit the market in March, the Associated Press reports.

Citing BlackBerry CEO Thorsten Heins, the AP says the BlackBerry Q10 will probably arrive eight to 10 weeks after the BlackBerry Z10, which should arrive mid-March. That means we'll likely see Q10 in the U.S. in May or even June.

"We're trying to get it as close as we can," Heins told the AP in an interview this week.

Globally, the Q10 is scheduled for an April release.

Both the keyboardless Z10 and the Q10 are arriving later than BlackBerry would've liked, since U.S. carriers need to test the new devices prior to putting them on the market.

"We need to respect that. Am I a bit disappointed? Yeah, I would be lying saying no. But it is what it is, and we're working with all our carrier partners to speed it up as much as we can," said Heins.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The launch of the Z10, the first phone to run the BlackBerry 10 operating system, produced BlackBerry's "best day ever" for a product launch in Canada, the company said in a statement.

BlackBerry (formerly Research in Motion) launched the Z10 on Feb. 5 in its home and native land of Canada, which the company promised would be one of the first countries to get the new smartphone along with the U.K. CEO Thorsten Heins said it would be in 110 markets worldwide by the end of February. It's expected to arrive in the U.S. in March.

In Canada, yesterday was the best day ever for the first day of a launch of a new BlackBerry smartphone," Heins said in a statement. "In fact, it was more than 50% better than any other launch day in our history in Canada. In the U.K., we have seen close to three times our best performance ever for the first week of sales for a BlackBerry smartphone.

Reports from Canadian wireless carriers give credence to BlackBerry's claim. BCE (a.k.a. Bell Canada) says orders for the BlackBerry Z10, which it began taking pre-orders for in January, are stronger than any previous BlackBerry phone, Bloomberg reports. Rogers and Telus also made statements, saying customer response to the Z10 has been "very positive."

In the U.S., Verizon, AT&T and T-Mobile have all said they would be carrying the Z10, with March as the expected release date. Sprint said it would carry the Q10  the first BlackBerry 10 phone with a QWERTY keyboard  though so far has no plans for the Z10.

Were you part of the initial rush for the Z10 in Canada? Why did you buy one? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Monopoly fans decided on Wednesday that there's a new cat in town, replacing the board game's iron token with a furry, four-legged upgrade.

SEE ALSO: Shocker! Internet Votes Cat as New Monopoly Piece

While some were saddened by Monopoly's new iron deficiency, most weren't surprised. The Internet loves cats, after all.

Even cats themselves are excited about the new piece. (Ok, maybe not Grumpy Cat.)

At least now, there will be less fighting over the scottie dog.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Building on his statements from last year, a congressman behind the Cyber Intelligence Sharing and Protection Act (CISPA) has confirmed his commitment to reintroducing the bill in the House of Representatives this year.

One of CISPA's authors, Rep. Dutch Ruppersberger (D-Md.), told The Hill that he and co-author Chairman Mike Rogers (R-Mich.) are working with the White House to rid the specter of a veto before re-introducing the bill.

"We're working on some things ... working with the White House to make sure that hopefully they can be more supportive of our bill than they were the last time," Ruppersberger told The Hill.

CISPA passed in the House last year under threat of veto from Obama. However, the Senate, which was debating its own version of a cybersecurity bill, didn't take it up. Ruppersberger and Rogers said last year they would reintroduce the bill this year.

SEE ALSO: CISPA Cybersecurity Bill Authors: 'This Isn't SOPA'

Ruppersberger and Rogers may find themselves short on time to pass their version of cybersecurity reform; following the White House's veto threat against CISPA, a draft executive order on cybersecurity was leaked to the media. Some version of that order may be signed in the near future.

However, the White House's cooperation with the bill's authors signals the administration may hold off on executive action regarding cybersecurity until these talks come to a close.

CISPA would allow private companies and the government to share information about cyberattacks with one another to bolster security. Many technology companies, including Facebook and Google, supported the bill when it was first introduced last year. Privacy advocates argued it would allow the government to snoop on citizens' personal data.

Do you support CISPA? Why or why not? Share your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A NASA spacecraft has captured its first photos of comet ISON, an icy wanderer that some scientists say could dazzle as a "comet of the century" when it swings through the inner solar system later this year.

The photos were taken by NASA's Deep Impact probe and reveal comet ISON as a bright, dusty ball moving against a star-filled background. The spacecraft snapped the pictures on Jan. 17 and Jan. 18 from a distance of about 493 million miles (793 million kilometers).

Comet ISON has been the focus of much anticipation among scientists and stargazers because of its potential to put on a spectacular display in late November, when it makes its closest approach to the sun. Some forecasts predict the comet could shine brighter than the full moon. As of mid-January, the comet's tail was more than 40,000 miles (64,400 km).

Some projections state that comet ISON, which is officially designated comet C/20012 S1 (ISON), could shine extremely bright in the nighttime sky, possibly even rivaling the full moon. Whether the comet will meet expectations or fizzle out remains to be seen, but it has already become a target for NASA and amateur astronomers.

SEE ALSO: Photos of Comet ISON in Night Sky

"This is the fourth comet on which we have performed science observations and the farthest point from Earth from which we've tried to transmit data on a comet," Deep Impact project manager Tim Larson, of the agency's Jet Propulsion Laboratory in Pasadena, Calif., said in a statement Tuesday (Feb. 5) "The distance limits our bandwidth, so it's a little like communicating through a modem after being used to DSL. But we're going to coordinate our science collection and playback so we maximize our return on this potentially spectacular comet."

The Deep Impact spacecraft has flown close by two comets, Tempel 1 and Hartley 2, and taken detailed observations of another  comet Garradd before turning its camera eyes on Comet ISON. The spacecraft used its Medium-Resolution Imager to snap pictures of ISON during a 36-hour period between Jan. 17 and 18, NASA officials said.

Comet ISON was discovered in September 2012 by Russian astronomers Vitali Nevski and Artyom Novichonok using a 15.7-inch (0.4-meter) telescope of the International Scientific Optical Network (ISON), near Kislovodsk. The comet is most likely making its first trip through the inner solar system from the Oort cloud, a vast shell of icy objects at the outer edge of the solar system that extends one-third of the way to the nearest star, NASA scientists said.

"Having not come this way before means the comet's pristine surface has a higher probability of being laden with volatile material just spoiling for some of the sun's energy to heat it up and help it escape," NASA officials wrote in a statement. "With the exodus of these clean ices could come a boatload of dust, held in check since the beginnings of our solar system. This released gas and dust is what is seen on Earth as comprising a comet's atmosphere (coma) and tail.

Comet ISON will make its closest approach to the sun on Nov. 28, when it will approach within 800,000 miles (1.2 million km) of the star's surface. If the comet survives the approach, and does not fade or break apart, it could transform into a spectacular celestial sight, scientists have said.

The comet will make its closest approach to Earth on Dec. 26, when it will fly within 40 million miles (64 million km) of the planet. It poses no impact threat to the Earth, NASA scientists said.

NASA's Deep Impact spacecraft is currently flying on an extended mission across the solar system. The probe launched in 2005 on a mission to rendezvous with the Tempel 1 comet in July 2005. The encounter was successful, with Deep Impact dropping an impactor onto the comet to create an artificial crater that revealed the inner makeup of the object.

In November 2010, the Deep Impact spacecraft flew by comet Hartley 2 as part of its extended mission. The spacecraft observed comet Garradd from afar in January 2012. Since its launch, Deep Impact has traveled about 4.39 billion miles (7.06 billion km), NASA officials said.

This article originally published at Space.com here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Tenacity: if you don't have it, online dating isn't for you. Though match-making websites may seem like a quick alternative to meeting your one true love at a bar, perusing pages of potential dates calls for some dedication. And if you have a deep appreciation for spreadsheets, that helps, too.

Armed with charts, lists and formulas, Amy Webb used what she knew best to outsmart the online dating algorithms: math. Repeated failures at meeting her match spurred the digital strategy expert to crack the code, leading straight to her future husband.

Webb, CEO of WebbMedia Group, spent a month crunching numbers and analyzing key words to optimize her JDate profile. She chronicles her journey in her new book, Data, A Love Story. The concept of math and technology bringing people together first attracted her to online dating sites, but she quickly realized it wasn't going to work.

"I'm pretty open about being not religious," Webb tells Mashable. "A few of these sites kept trying to match me up with Orthodox Jewish rabbis, which could not have been further away ... I looked at the data and realized it was really going to be impossible for an algorithm to match me with somebody."

Her initial matches were so bad, she took to sending mid-date email updates to family and friends while hiding from her suitors in the bar's bathroom. There was the guy who smoked a huge joint after dinner, the one who gave continuous high-fives, and of course, the married one.

For those who've had their fair share of awful matchmaker dates, the clich "It's not you, it's me" actually rings true. It's your own doing, Webb says. The information in these sites' databases are user generated, and most people don't have the ability to be 100% effective. Bad data goes into the algorithm, so bad data goes out, leaving you mismatched.

Many people will pour hours into perfecting their rsum, but won't invest the same amount of time into their digital presence. The commitment to your profile is necessary, says Webb.

"When you think about it, online dating is sort of the ultimate exercise in product marketing. Except that you are the product. So how can you leverage what youve got, how can you make sure youre being seen by the most number of people?" she explains. "If you think of (it) as more of a catalog database ... as long as you know exactly what youre looking for, its no different from doing a search in a library or doing a search for shoes on Zappos."

Therein lies the difficulty for most frustrated site users. Finding out what you really want is the first step, she says. Webb created a list of 72 different data points with qualities she wanted most in a mate.

Next, she needed to assess the competition. What type of women were her dream men attracting? The only way to find out was the log back into JDate, but this time as a man (no catfishing, just data collection).

After analyzing the competition, Webb found a pattern in the most popular women on JDate. Their profile pictures showed some skin, they kept their bios short and optimistic, and waited approximately 22 to 23 hours before responding to messages.

One of the biggest mistakes people make, she says, is over-sharing, over-explaining and using sarcasm. Women who were popular had an average of 97 words in their summary section. Webb's initial dating profile on the other hand, wasn't as promising. She used her rsum as her bio and posted three of her "least bad" pictures.

After "SEO-ing" her JDate page, Webb replaced her photos (including an unflattering picture with the family dog) with new pictures in natural light and in clothing she would typically wear on a date. She replaced her copy-pasted rsum with three, succinct sentences. The next day, she received 14 new messages and her super profile had 68 views overnight.

SEE ALSO: Dating Website 'High Season' Means More Fish in the Sea

"Within a few days I was the most popular profile on the site. It was like I was the prom queen of JDate. Ive never been that popular before. I probably never will be again," Webb jokes.

The tips learned in her experience can be applied to other networks, whether it's Match.com or LinkedIn. Understanding your target audience is key in any social site. Once you understand your goal, she says, you can then re-engineer your resources for the best result. Webb argues that the overwhelming majority of online daters are being mostly truthful about themselves, they just need to be more effective.

"Nobody wants to replicate the experiment or do the math, but anyone can identify what they want and come up with a system," Webb says. "I didn't have to rely on the way that I look; I relied on my smarts. Nerds of the world are finally able to unite using math to find love."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Poolhouse announced an update for Dogbook for iOS Wednesday, making the dog-only social network a little more like Foursquare.

Now your favorite furball can check in to his favorite spots, ultimately earning the coveted King status for his most-frequented haunts. The app's at its best when there are other dogs around; Fidos friends can get push notifications, for instance, when he checks in to the local dog park so they can come play together.

Posse not around? The app also has a new Meet Friends feature your canine can use to scope out other dogs in the area and find potential friends. If hes on the search for a new crew, a search function in the app can also help him find dogs that are a specific breed, or live in a particular location to set up future adventures. Looking for a Boxer who lives near Central Park? No problem.

Much like Foursquare, the app has a number of different badges your pup can earn from checking in at different locations ranging from Hair-Of-The Dog, for checking in to four happy hours, to Air Bud, for checking in at an airport.

All of the features have been available for current users of the app since October of last year, however, they were officially announced on Wednesday. An Android app is also currently in the works.

Check out the video below for a pretty entertaining look at how some of the new features work.

Is your dog on Dogbook? Tell us about your poochs social networking skills in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Your long-held dream of playing a heroic Edgar Allan Poe in an 8-bit style, Victorian-era adventure game is about to come true.

EDGAR, the first project of indie developer Wrought Iron Games, takes the classic side-scroller and looter concepts and combines them with Victorian literary themes and characters. Dracula, Sherlock Holmes and Jekyll and Hyde are just a few examples of the characters you'll find among the game's imaginary streets, which will be available on Mac, PC and Linux.

SEE ALSO: 'Tomb Raider' Reboot Explores Lara Croft's Origins and Insecurities

In EDGAR's alternate history, Poe and his wife are on vacation in London at the time of the 1851 World's Fair. When his wife goes missing after a string of murders, Poe believes infamous serial killer Jack the Ripper is the culprit. As Poe sets out to rescue his wife, he's confronted with a variety of evil creatures, and he even has the option to team up with Jules Verne.

"The story is one of the things I'm most excited about [in] the game, as it will be very layered," Kyle Reid, producer and lead designer at Wrought Iron Games, told Mashable. "Those who have read the [Victorian] books will pick up on things that others may not. This is a game where stopping and examining the surroundings will be very important, as details have been crammed into every single pixel."

The concept behind EDGAR came from Reid's fascination with Victorian literature. Even though Victorian lit has spawned innumerable film adaptations and video games  think Dracula and Castlevania  Reid thought it was time for a game that mashes up all of the classic tales.

"It wasn't long after that first idea was formed that the decision to use Edgar Allan Poe arrived. He's not the obvious choice for a Victorian-esque monster slayer...but something just clicked, and we knew that Poe was the right choice," he said.

But selecting Jack the Ripper as the villain was a much easier choice, Reid says.

"He's the epitome of Victorian evil, the first infamous serial killer and someone whose identity is still unknown... We couldn't pass up the opportunity to have fun twisting that mystery," he said.

Wrought Iron Games is made up of a small team of people working on EDGAR in their free time. Reid lives in Southern California, where all of the company's business is conducted, but the efforts for making the game as great as possible come from team members around the world.



Note: Gameplay has been updated since this teaser video was released.

At the moment, Wrought Iron Games has completed the very basics of the game  player movement, combat, enemy AI, real-time lighting, etc. However, Reid said they still have a lot of work ahead of them  eight distinct levels, cut-scenes and randomized loot  which is why they plan on starting a Kickstarter campaign within the next few weeks.

They're looking at a goal of $20,000, which isn't a final estimate, but the money will go toward Unity Pro licenses, Photoshop licenses, an original soundtrack, servers for network testing, miscellaneous expenses and reward fulfillment, and supporting three to four months of solid development.

"If our crowdfunding campaign is successful, our goal is have a solid beta of the game by summer, and then be nearly finished by the end of the year. That is an optimistic goal, but that's what we're aiming for," Reid said.

You can follow Wrought Iron Games' progress on EDGAR through Facebook, Twitter, IndieDB and even a subreddit.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Facebook addiction is a tough habit to kick. But if you're brave enough to attempt a short break from the social media site, a little paper agreement might be a good idea  just to be sure you don't cheat.

Boston-based Paul Baier signed a "Facebook Deactivation Agreement" with his 14-year-old daughter. The contract states that if she remains Facebook-free from Feb. 4 to June 26, 2013, Baier will pay her a total of $200. She's given him the password to her account, so he's changed it and deactivated it  again, just to be sure.

There's a bit of a grace rule, though. It appears if she only lasts past April 15, Baier will still pay her $50.

Baier posted the photo on his blog Practical Sustainability.

SEE ALSO: Most of Us Take Facebook Breaks, Then We Come Back

His daughter's journey has only just begun, so we'll have to wait and see if she makes it. And as for what she plans to spend the reward on if she does succeed? "Stuff."

Would you stay off Facebook for nearly five months for $200?
--------------------------------------------------------------
Facebook launched Developers Live Wednesday, a new way for developers to stay on top of everything Facebook.

An extension of Facebooks existing developers site, Facebook says the new live portion of the site will be a central place to learn about the latest tools and to get access to product manager and engineers who created them.

The curated video channel will include live as well as recorded broadcasts, often with an interactive element for developers to get questions answered by Facebook staff. Videos on growing your mobile app and Graph Search have already been added to the site's video library.

The first live event, What Developers Need to Know in 2013, will be held Feb. 19 at 10:30 a.m. PST/1:30 p.m. EST. Hosted by Doug Purdy, Facebooks director of platform product, mobile, web, and gaming developers will hear first hand what the social network believes they should be thinking about this year. He will also answer developers questions.

Developers can RSVP for the event on Facebook.
--------------------------------------------------------------
You may want to think twice before unfriending someone on Facebook. That's because new research has found that serious real-world consequences come from unfriending someone on social media.

In particular, researchers found that 40% of people say they would avoid someone who unfriended them on Facebook, while 50% say they would not avoid a person who unfriended them. Women were more likely than men to avoid someone who unfriended them, the researchers found.

"People think social networks are just for fun," said study author Christopher Sibona, a doctoral student at the University of Colorado Denver Business School. "But in fact what you do on those sites can have real-world consequences."

Some of those consequences highlight the way social media relationships affect people in the real world. Sibona says the survey results show the effects of being ostracized on social media, citing respondents who reported reduced self-esteem, feelings of not belonging and a loss of control after being unfriended. Respondents also say they had a worse mood after a social media breakup.

"The cost of maintaining online relationships is really low, and in the real world, the costs are higher," Sibona said. "In the real world, you have to talk to people, go see them to maintain face-to-face relationships. That's not the case in online relationships. Since it's done online there is an air of unreality to it but in fact there are real-life consequences. We are still trying to come to grips as a society on how to handle elements of social media. The etiquette is different and often quite stark."

The research, which was based on 583 responses gathered through Twitter, also found there were several factors that would predict whether or not a person would avoid someone who unfriended them. Those factors were:

"People who are unfriended may face similar psychological effectsbecause unfriending may be viewed as a form of social exclusion," Sibona said. "The study makes clear that unfriending is meaningful and has important psychological consequences for those to whom it occurs."

The study was published by the Hawaii International Conference on System Sciences.

This article originally published at BusinessNewsDaily here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Lionel Messi is the world's greatest soccer player and one popular dude with fans. In December, a guy stormed the field during a match between FC Barcelona and Atletico Madrid to give Messi a sweaty hug before being led away by police.

But a fan on Wednesday decided to take things a step further. During Argentina's friendly against Sweden, a fan wearing Messi's number-10 Barca jersey snuck onto the field to give Leo a quick smooch and head rub before security took him away. There's video of the moment above, so check it out to see Messi's cool reaction.

SEE ALSO: 6 of Lionel Messi's Greatest Fashion Moments

Last month, Messi won his fourth-straight Ballon d'Or trophy, given to the world's top player each year. He's the world's best human at the world's most popular sport, and in 2012 broke a 40-year-old soccer record by scoring 91 goals during the calendar year. You can check out a pretty epic super cut of his amazing year here.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Last fall, longtime sports fan, technologist and entrepreneur Brandon Ramsey had an epiphany: Fans love to banter over games and matches, but there's not one go-to destination where they can easily talk trash, make friendly wagers and have a convenient record-holder of bets and predictions.

Enter Fanhood, Ramsey's Facebook app startup that marries sports gaming with the possibilities of Facebook's social graph to entice fans into betting virtual currency on not just games but general sports knowledge.

Just four months after its October launch, Ramsey says the company has registered 170,000 users; 10,000 of those people use the app daily and more than 40,000 use it monthly. Fanhood's appeal is simple, according to Ramsey.

"We saw a huge audience, sports fans, that wasn't being served in a proven category, the social casino," he says.

SEE ALSO: NFL Star 'Marries' 6-Year-Old Fan After Heartbroken YouTube Video

Of course, Fanhood isn't the only company to have noticed that opportunity over the past several months. Pickmoto, DraftDay and StarStreet are just a few of many startups looking to put a digital twist on sports gaming, while major brands such as ESPN have entered the fray as well.

Variety and ease of use are the main things Ramsey says set Fanhood apart from the rest of the field. Users can bet on individual games, March Madness-style tournaments, bingo-style cards featuring multiple games and more. Facebook's social graph lets the app notify users when their favorite team will go up against a friend's, as well as which of their friends are fans of a particular game or sport. NBA, NFL, college football and basketball, Major League Soccer and the English Premier League are all supported, with more sports to come.

But users need not even find an actual live game to attach their betting to. Another feature quizzes on sports trivia, while one called SportsPop briefly flashes famous sports photos to be ID'd. In both cases, users can bet virtual currency against "the house" or challenge friends directly.

Fanhood is made up of 10 fulltime employees whose backgrounds include time at Yahoo, Zynga, Slide and a number of startups. Ramsey declined to discuss Fanhood's funding numbers, but firms including First Round Capital, Mayfield Fund and Foundation Capital have all invested.

Next up for the company: continuing its user growth and beginning to monetize, which Ramsey says will be done primarily through selling virtual currency.

Do you think Fanhood will be able to monetize its popular sports games? Give us your take in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Federal Reserve admitted Tuesday that it was hacked Sunday following claims from hacktivist group Anonymous that it had successfully breached the Fed's security systems.

Hackers accessed a Fed internal server and broke into the database of the St. Louis Fed Emergency Communications System, an emergency communications system that delivers important messages to banks during natural disasters.

"The Federal Reserve system is aware that information was obtained by exploiting a temporary vulnerability in a website vendor product," a Fed spokeswoman told Reuters. "Exposure was fixed shortly after discovery and is no longer an issue. This incident did not affect critical operations of the Federal Reserve system."

The Fed notified affected users with a letter later obtained by ZDNet and Reuters. In the letter the Fed acknowledges the attack and identifies the types of sensitive information obtained, but it claims passwords were not compromised  even though hashed passwords can potentially be decrypted. As a measure of precaution, every member's password has been reset.

The first reports of a possible attack started circulating on Sunday after the hacktivist group Anonymous claimed they had hacked a website connected to the Fed. It later posted online names and private information of more than 4,000 U.S. bankers, as first reported by ZDnet.

The Fed did not confirm the identify of the hackers.

SEE ALSO: Anonymous Hacks US Government Site, Threatens Supreme 'Warheads'

Anonymous' claimed attack is the latest from the so-called Operation Last Resort, a campaign the group launched to avenge Aaron Swartz's death.

Anonymous posted the information it claimed to obtain from the Fed on a separate government website and on Pastebin. The spreadsheet contained usernames, IP addresses, names, emails, phone numbers and hashed passwords of bankers who had shared their contact information with the ECS.

According to a security and privacy expert contacted by Mashable, the risk now is that malicious hackers will use the private information dumped on the Internet to orchestrate social engineering attacks or targeted phishing emails, tricking the targets to submit even more personal and sensitive information.

"Having identity and contact information for bank executives allows an attacker to craft targeted phishing campaigns for these individuals," explains Ashkan Soltani in an email. "Ultimately,the weakest link in security are humans.'Social engineering' is typically much easier than trying to attack a bank from the outside.A 'forged' email from a service you use that contains your home address or contact information would be slightly more credible than a generic one since it contains what you perceive as 'private information' that only a trusted party would have (exploiting your social ties)."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Listen, kids, if you're going to get busted with Xanax pills (or "bars" if you're really in the know), show a little respect to the judge.

Penelope Soto went before Miami-Dade Circuit Judge Jorge Rodriguez-Chomat on Monday. After receiving her sentence, she responded by flipping off the judge, leading to a 30 day stint in county jail. Soto's face palm-worthy court appearance spread on the Internet after it was uploaded to YouTube.

Don't say you didn't learn anything today.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Founders of Flipboard Evan Doll and Mike McCue essentially met on a blind date at a coffee shop. They instantly knew they wanted to build something together, but they weren't sure what.

On this episode of the Valley Girl Show, Doll shares that the duo tried quite a few things before settling on the right product. The initial idea came from trying to re-invent the web browser.

"With startups you can always get rid of the product and build another one, but it's harder to change the team," he says.

Design is another important element that came into play. "The iPad is what crystallized everything for us," Doll adds. It didn't take them long to realize that it would enable people to peruse content in a magazine-like way.

With so much happening on social networks these days, Flipboard is one of the only content curation products that has clearly cut through the noise. It's not just news, it's personalized news. "We try to bring relevancy to it," says Doll.

Doll taught the first ever class on iPhone app development at Stanford University. As an added bonus in this episode, Doll teaches us to code.

Jesse Draper is creator and host of The Valley Girl Show, through which she's become a spokesperson for startups and helped pioneer the way of new media content distribution. Formerly a Nickelodeon star, Draper is now CEO of Valley Girl, where she oversees the show and runs technology blog Lalawag.com.

More Video from the Valley Girl Show
--------------------------------------------------------------
The National Academy of Sciences unsuccessfully recommended the federal government establish an independent agency for advancing forensic science similar to one in the Netherlands that recently helped authorities conduct a DNA sweep to nab a rapist who in 1999 murdered a 16-year-old.

The academy in 2009 advised the U.S. government to spin off forensic DNA research and development from the Justice Department into an independent National Institute of Forensic Science. Justices priorities inherently are at odds with advancing the discipline, concluded an academy report.

What is needed to support and oversee the forensic science community is a new, strong and independent entity that can perform in a way that is as objective and free of bias as possibleone with no ties to the past and with the authority and resources to implement a fresh agenda, the authors wrote.

Across the Atlantic, the Dutch have created such an entity in the form of the Netherlands Forensic Institute, a nonprofit, government-owned agency. Officials at the organization, which is not part of the countrys police or prosecution office, say the institute is neutral on questions of guilt or innocence and offers services to politicians, the media and competitors.

Theyve invested significantly in modern technology, and they have prioritized filling vacancies with new hires, said Tom OReilly, a former U.S. Justice official who invited one of the institutes leaders to speak at Rutgers University, where OReilly now serves as executive director of the Police Institute.

In October 2012, following a recent change in Netherlands law to allow mass DNA screenings, Dutch government officials invited more than 8,000 men to contribute DNA so that police could locate relatives of whoever killed 16-year-old Marianne Vaatstra, according to institute officials.

Investigators believed the killer might have lived close to the crime scene. A mans DNA was found there on a locally-bought cigarette lighter but no match existed in the Netherlands national DNA database of offenders. They decided to screen the DNA of all males who, in 1999, were aged between 16 and 60 and lived nearby, the institutes website states.

The episode might have been the biggest familial DNA search carried out worldwide, according to the institute. The Amsterdam Herald reported the perpetrator, who was arrested in November, was a direct match, meaning he was one of the throng of men who showed up to submit DNA.

The average analysis time at the institute, founded in 1999, is among the fastest in the world, according to Netherlands officials. Typically, the turnaround period is slightly less than two weeks. A priority crime-scene case, involving processing and comparisons, is guaranteed for delivery within six hours, but usually arrives within 3.5 hours.

By contrast, Justice officials said processing times in the United States vary, depending on other factors including the type of case  a homicide or rape might be processed ahead of a property crime  whether the case is pending trial, and the number of backlogged cases. The Dutch institute has no backlog.

For the violent rape case, the Netherlands institute used a tool called Bonaparte developed in cooperation with the Radboud University Nijmegen. The automated technology relies on mathematical probabilistic methods to quickly and accurately find one-to-one matches and pedigree matches, or familial connections derived from partial and full family trees, according to agency literature.

Privacy concerns stateside might have scuttled this kind of plan before the invitations ever went out.

DNA dragnets  thats pretty much unheard of, said Kelly Walsh, a researcher with the Justice Policy Center at the Urban Institute, a nonprofit think tank. She added that such activities are rare, not necessarily because America lacks the technical foundations, but rather Justice faces a "constant tradeoff between protecting civil liberties and how quickly you can implement new technology.

Some civil liberties advocates agreed that catching offenders through DNA lineups would not go over well in the United States.

The idea that the government would coerce people to submit their DNA. . . It doesnt seem like solving that one crime justifies collecting DNA from all those people, said Jennifer Lynch, staff attorney for the Electronic Frontier Foundation, a privacy group. Its not just the individual person whose privacy is implicated but also that persons family members. Theres always the issue of what happens to that DNA after the fact. At least in America, there are worries that stored DNA may be reused for separate purposes, such as solving future criminal cases, determining insurance costs or denying employment.

Officials for the Netherlands institute said the samples collected for the 1999 murder case would only be used for that investigation and destroyed afterwards.

Unlike Justices congressionally funded National Institute of Justice, which finances stateside DNA research and development, the Netherlands institute supports itself by charging Dutch and international organizations for technology and services. The independent agency conducts forensic investigations, like most forensic labs, but also has the freedom and funding to act as an entrepreneur.

Research and development, in order to create innovative proprietary products and services, is one of the main activities of the NFI, said Tjark Tjin-A-Tsoi, chief executive officer of the Netherlands Forensic Institute.

The country used the same Bonaparte software to identify all 103 fatalities in a 2001 Afriqiyah Airways crash in Tripoli  within three weeks. The United States can identify victims of disasters within an equivalent amount of time, using different technology, according to Justice statistics. In 2001, it took less than two months to identify the 265 casualties of an American Airlines crash in Queens, N.Y., partly because the groundwork for analyzing mass remains had been laid months earlier, during the Sept. 11 terrorist attacks.

Justice uses software it developed called CODIS to name missing persons and disaster victims, according to FBI officials. The same technology allows crime laboratories nationwide to store and compare DNA records. FBI officials noted that the Netherlands Forensic Institute currently uses CODIS to operate the Netherlands national DNA database of offenders. Although bureau officials have seen a demonstration of Bonaparte, they said CODIS ability to identify individuals meets the FBIs needs.

National Institute of Justice and FBI officials declined to comment on the academys recommendation that the government relocate research and development to an independent forensic science agency.

This article originally published at Nextgov here
--------------------------------------------------------------
If you're looking for a great gift for your geeky sweety this Feb. 14, we have just the thing. We dug up 10 heart-themed pieces of jewelry for both sexes for sale on Etsy  all with a delightfully nerdy twist.

SEE ALSO: 10 Valentine's Day Gifts for the Special Geek in Your Life

Take a look through our gorgeously geeky selection in the image gallery above. Let us know in the comments below which items make your heart beat faster.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It's not exactly the most thrilling document George Lucas has ever put his pen to. The Star Wars creator filed prospectus form S-3 with the Securities and Exchange Commission Wednesday  one that basically allows him to sell off the $2 billion he got in Disney stock as part of the sale of Lucasfilm.

But is Lucas, who became Disney's second largest shareholder after the estate of Steve Jobs, really prepping to sell his entire stake? That would be a profoundly un-Jedi-like decision, not to mention a dumb investment move.

Lucas' Disney shares are numerous enough  37,076,679 of them, to be precise  that selling them all at once would likely trigger a run on the stock. It would send a signal to the market that he lacks confidence in CEO Bob Iger, which would be odd given that Lucas and Iger have known each other for years (ever since they collaborated on Young Indiana Jones for ABC). The old friends negotiated the sale personally.

While it might allow Disney to produce the upcoming Star Wars movies  the third trilogy and the recently confirmed "character" spin-offs  without fear of what its second-largest investor might think of them, it would also lead Star Wars fans to believe that Lucas is disgruntled with the way Disney (and his handpicked successor at Lucasfilm, Kathleen Kennedy) is handling his franchise.

Given how well-received Kennedy's decisions have been so far  not least of which is securing J.J. Abrams as the director of Episode VII  that seems as likely as Princess Leia making out with a wookiee in a Super Bowl commercial.

That's why the key phrase in the SEC document is "Approximate Date of Commencement of Proposed Sale to the Public: From time to time after this Registration Statement becomes effective."

Just in case anyone missed that on the first page, the phrase "from time to time" appears twice on page two. "The securities are being registered to permit the selling security holder to sell the securities from time to time through ordinary brokerage transactions," it reads.

Translation: Lucas can sell as much or as little as he wants, when he's ready, and when the market is ripe. Given that this man made one of the canniest business decisions of the 20th century, to retain merchandising rights in the deal for the initial Star Wars movie, we expect he'll wait until Disney is flying even higher than it is now  when Episode VII comes out in 2015, perhaps?  and sell in small chunks.

Basically, Lucas  who has signed Bill Gates' and Warren Buffett's "Giving Pledge," vowing to give away half his wealth before his death  is giving himself the option to go liquid whenever he needs to. His personal wealth is estimated in the $1 billion to $2 billion range; he's not going to be hurting any time soon.

And he's already given the $2 billion he got from Disney in cash to his educational foundation, so that's the pledge taken care of for now. As far as teachers everywhere are concerned, the Force is already with him.

How would you spend a $2 billion fortune? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Google on Wednesday acquired Channel Intelligence, a data service that helps brands and retailers boost ecommerce sales, for $125 million in cash as part of an ongoing effort to improve on the Google Shopping experience.

Channel Intelligence announced the acquisition in a post on its blog. "For over 10 years, we have focused on making it easy for consumers to find and buy products online and help our clients grow their business," the company said. "Weve worked with Google for years, and look forward to the great things we will be able to do together."

In fact, Channel Intelligence was one of original launch partners for Google Shopping. The service helps retailers measure their marketing efforts and manage product details on multiple websites. By working solely with Google, Channel Intelligence could help Google provide sellers with better tools to manage and market their products across the web.

Google confirmed the deal to Mashable in an e-mail, noting that the deal should improve the shopping experience for buyers and sellers.

"We want to help consumers save time and money by improving the online shopping experience," a Google rep said in a statement. "We think Channel Intelligence will help create a better shopping experience for users and help merchants increase sales across the web.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Google on Wednesday upgraded its AdWords program to let advertisers customize their placements on mobile by such factors as type of device, time of day and geographic proximity.

The upgrade, called Enhanced Campaigns, will let business owners build a campaign while taking those factors into consideration. However, Google promises that you'll be able to manage it all in a single place.

The company offered a few examples of how Enhanced Campaigns will work. For instance:

A breakfast cafe wants to reach people nearby searching for "coffee" or "breakfast" on a smartphone. Using bid adjustments, with three simple entries, they can bid 25% higher for people searching a half-mile away, 20% lower for searches after 11am, and 50% higher for searches on smartphones. These bid adjustments can apply to all ads and all keywords in one single campaign.

In another example, an advertiser can vary its ads by the device on which it is seen:

A national retailer with both physical locations and a website can show ads with click-to-call and location extensions for people searching on their smartphones, while showing an ad for their e-commerce website to people searching on a PC  all within a single campaign.

Finally, advertisers can use Google data to see which ads are most effective:

Google claims the upgrades will start rolling out within the next few weeks. By mid-year, it will be universally available.
--------------------------------------------------------------
By now, we've heard ad nauseum about measurements related to ads that ran during the Super Bowl, but what about some info on how local merchants fared?

Square, the mobile payments company, has offered the map above, which shows transactions during the Super Bowl weekend near the Mercedes-Benz Superdome in New Orleans. Not surprisingly, the closer you get to the arena, the more business occurs.

According to Square, the total take for its merchants during the weekend was $800,000. Considering Square makes 2.75% of those transactions, that's $22,000. (That's not an exact figure; partners may also be taking advantage of a flat $275 monthly fee instead.)

Most significantly, this demonstrates what kind of data Square now has access to.
--------------------------------------------------------------
When BlackBerry launched its new line of smartphones last week, the country most interested was Indonesia, a new Twitter-based study has found. That country alone accounted for 15% of the Twitter users who tweeted about the launch, the most from any nation.

The study examined 900,000 tweets between Jan. 29 and Feb. 2 (the launch was on Jan. 30) and was conducted by Salorix, a social media marketing company. Indonesia was the top country for tweets, followed by the U.S. and then Canada (where BlackBerry is based). BlackBerry said its launch of the Z10 smartphone in Canada on Feb. 5 produced its "best day ever" for that country.

Indonesia, however, is clearly an important market for BlackBerry. Half of Indonesia's smartphone shipments in 2012 were BlackBerrys, the study said, and it's the company's third-largest market after the U.S. and U.K. Still, smartphone penetration in the country is relatively low, at 20%, a recent study found.

SEE ALSO: RIM Stock Tanks After Revealing BlackBerry 10

The high interest in its brand coupled with the large number of potential customers is a significant opportunity for BlackBerry. The situation is similar in other emerging markets where smartphone adoption is still low (notably India and Brazil) although interest in the brand isn't as high.

The Twitter study also showed that the most-mentioned app for BlackBerry is QuickPull, although that likely had little to do with the launch of BlackBerry 10. QuickPull is a BlackBerry 7 app that simulates manual battery removal. When users integrate the app with Twitter, it automatically sends a tweet every time it's used, telling the user's followers that they've gone offline temporarily.

Did you tweet about the BlackBerry 10 launch? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Welcome to this morning's edition of "First To Know," a series in which we keep you in the know on what's happening in the digital world.

Today, we're looking at three particularly interesting stories. Instagram announced Tuesday you can now browse your feed on the web, and Vine has updated its age rating in the App Store to 17+. On the darker side of social media, numbers from one tracking company indicate the prevalence of homophobic tweets spiked during the Super Bowl.

Check out the video above for more on these stories.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Instagram.com transformed monumentally on Tuesday. The company introduced its first web feed, meaning users can now scroll through filtered photographs to their hearts' content  all from their PCs.

Such frictionless browsing was previously only available via Instagram's mobile app. But since Facebook acquired the company in April 2012, the image-centric social network has gradually ported more and more features to its web platform.

So, go ahead and bookmark Instagram.com. In fact, add it to your bookmarks bar. Better yet, leave the tab open at the top of your browser, next to Facebook and Twitter.

Just don't blame us when it feels completely unnatural.

The Instagram.com web feed will posion the social network's original user experience: mobile intimacy.

Instagram is (or was) a treat, an artistic pleasure users could peruse at their leisure. You would save it for your lunch hour, for your commute home, for your bedtime. You saved it for a free moment, like a chocolate bar or a glass of wine at the end of a hard day.

Partially, you saved it because you had to. Because during the workday, you aren't attached to your smartphone like you are your laptop. Before Tuesday, you didn't have the option to instantly check your Instagram feed between a round of emails and your next conference call. At least, not as spontaneously as opening a new browser tab.

But now users everywhere will make a little extra room on their bookmark bars for Instagram.com. And they'll soon be absent-mindedly clicking to refresh their photo dashboards as compulsively as their Facebook news feeds. Every couple of hours, their cursors will float up to that bookmark in a brief moment of distraction. The ticker on that Instagram browser tab will haunt them, begging to be checked.

Only thing is, Instagram wasn't designed for quick, careless consumption. It wasn't built like Twitter; we don't sit at our desks pulling down to refresh our Instagram feeds every eight seconds, eager to pounce on and repost the latest food porn or baby photo.

Instagram wasn't modeled after Facebook; it's not a place for all your friends, but rather, for a select and special few.

I predict that an Instagram web feed will cheapen the user experience. When we can log in at any quick, careless moment, interactions will feel rushed. The feed will seem more like a blog, less like the cozy mobile community it once was.

On the other hand, It appears Instagram has designed its web feed to mirror the mobile UI. Like mobile, each web image fills the screen almost completely, demanding a conscious and measured scroll. Its commenting practices are near identical, and those damn filters look better than ever.

But on the web, we encounter a feed that looks eerily similar to Tumblr's dashboard, where images appear more disconnected than ever. No longer are we viewing images on a mobile screen, experiencing photos how their original photographers captured them: snapped from an 8-megapixel lens on a four-inch screen. We're viewing images taken overwhelmingly on mobile devices and blown up to fit browser screens.

Pardon my French, but that's what Facebook is for.

For a minute, though, let's leave out the sentimentalities and the obvious time-suck arguments. We can't talk about any major social media decision without approaching the monetization question.

Even the major social properties struggle to monetize on mobile. Facebook is still laboring with relevant yet unobtrusive advertising iterations across its mobile platform; in April of last year, Twitter started implementing sponsored tweets with relative success; and some platforms, such as Pinterest, haven't even begun to approach the challenge.

We learned from Instagram's updated terms of service debacle last December that the company's intention is "to experiment with innovative advertising that feels appropriate on Instagram." We can only imagine some of that ad "experimentation" will take place on its web platform. However, if one of Instagram's major intentions for developing a web feed is monetization, I propose an alternative: Incorporate meaningful, relevant advertising into the mobile experience and leave the rest off the web.

Alas, we're not expecting Instagram to reverse its web decisions any time soon. But here's hoping the move to web won't depreciate our overall Instagram experience.

Now, I'll close my laptop at 11:30 p.m., brush my teeth and bring a glass of water to bed. In my other hand, I'll type the passcode into my iPhone and snuggle under my comforter. I'll launch Instagram and say goodnight to my college roommate's new puppy, my co-worker's adorable toddler and my best friend's champagne toast. I've been looking forward to them all day.
--------------------------------------------------------------
J.J. Abrams is working on becoming the geek's favorite director; Abrams and Valve Software's CEO announced the two were collaborating on making Half Life and Portal into movies, among other projects.

Abrams and Valve's Gabe Newell held a joint talk at the DICE conference in Las Vegas Wednesday on the subject of Storytelling Across Platforms: Who Benefits Most, the Audience or the Player?. According to Wired, the pair made the announcement they were working together at the end of their keynote, which kicked off the games industry conference.

Newell and Abrams would also collaborate on a game produced by Abrams' production company, Bad Robot, who will also head up the production of the two films if they become a reality.

Abrams is already probably one of the busiest directors in Hollywood. His next installment of the Star Trek reboot, Into Darkness is coming out later this year, and it was just announced he'll direct Disney's foray into the Star Wars universe with Star Wars: Episode VII.

Game blog Gamasutra has an in-depth interview with Abrams, where he said Valve " is obviously one of the greatest minds and producers of games that I've experienced. Their games have awesome humor, inspiring scope and characters that make you laugh and think."

In that same interview, Abrams says he has been influenced recently by games with great stories, like Limbo and Journey.

Would you like to see Half-Life and Portal as feature films? Let us know your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Small children, grown ups, pets, guys, aliens and basically everyone else, avert your eyes. What is about to transpire in this video is not pretty.

It's downright awful. It's Justin Bieber macking on a mannequin head. That has to be illegal in at least nine states.

SEE ALSO: Justin Bieber's Bare Butt Gets 100,000 Likes on Instagram

The teen idol was on "Late Night With Jimmy Fallon," playing a game which involved throwing objects into a net. He decided to instead forfeit the game and smooch this lifeless piece of plastic.

Oh yeah, he used tongue.

He must really miss Selena.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Justin Timberlake unleashed interactive art for his forthcoming The 20/20 Experience album on image-tagging startup Stipple's website. People can hover over the art (above) to reveal the album's track listing. Timberlake is an investor in Stipple.

He previously used another social site  Myspace  to promote "Suit & Tie," which is the first single released from The 20/20 Experience. Timberlake took an ownership stake in Myspace in 2011.

In an email to Mashable, Stipple says its "technology enables anyone to share an array of interactive content from a single post or image. From an image, Stipple dots expand to offer information, embedded videos, music, shop buttons, and more. The 20/20 Experience album art has multiple Stipple dots, which when hovered over, premiere the album track list, first single off the album on iTunes and YouTube, and photography credit."

"Suit & Tie" featuring Jay-Z recently broke airplay records and globally charted atop iTunes' top-selling singles rankings in its debut week.

SEE ALSO: Watch Justin Timberlake's Spiffy Video for 'Suit & Tie'

Timberlake had teased a musical comeback this month only several days before releasing the song on iTunes on the same night as the Golden Globes.

Timberlake directed his 16 million Twitter followers to the new album art via this tweet:

In conjunction with the song's release, he put this letter on Countdown.JustinTimberlake.com:

I hope this gets to you the right way. It's the only way I know to do it. Some people may criticize me for the last 3 days. But it was fun, right?? Right?!?! Besides, I'd rather speak directly to all of you. And, who can knock me for having a little bit of fun with it? Well... No more teasing. Although, it was A LOT of fun. (Did I mention that I'm having fun with this?? Ha!) This year is an exciting one for me. As you probably have heard through the "grapevine," I'm gearing up for a big 2013. Back in June of last year, I quietly started working on what is now, my next journey with that thing I love called MUSIC. The inspiration for this really came out of the blue and to be honest, I didn't expect anything out of it. I just went into the studio and started playing around with some sounds and songs. It was probably the best time I've had in my career... Just creating with no rules and/or end goal in mind and really enjoying the process. What I came up with is something I couldn't be more excited about! It is full of inspiration that I grew up listening to and some newfound muses that I've discovered along the way. I'm calling it "The 20/20 Experience," and it's coming out this year. I hope you enjoy listening to it as much as I enjoyed making it. That's all I'm giving you for now... I know, I know! Again, with the teasing!!! Get ready. This is going to be fun (well, at least it is for me).
--------------------------------------------------------------
And on the eighth day, to quote a famous speech, God looked down on his planned paradise and said, "I need a caretaker."

So God, to paraphrase said speech, made Kai.

That's Kai the hitchhiker. Kai the hatchet-wielding saver of lives. Kai the longhaired viral sensation who's become known around the globe despite an off-the-grid lifestyle that's left him apparently oblivious to his burgeoning fame.

See, last Friday, down in Fresno, Calif., Kai helped save a man and a woman. He helped save them from an epithet-spewing, Jesus-invoking mountain of a man hell-bent on violence and destruction. The man had purposely run his car into an African-American utility worker then attacked the woman when she tried to intervene. His attack didn't stop until Kai, a drifter simply thumbing his way through town, went at him with a hatchet. The man lived, but the attack ended.

Kai then gave an all-time classic interview about the incident to KMPH FOX 26 reporter Jessob Reisbeck. The clip, featuring an epic "Smash! Smash! Suh-MASH!" hatchet reenactment, has since gone wildly viral online. (Check it out at the top of this post.)

Reisbeck's report and an unedited version of Kai's profanity-laced interview have been viewed on YouTube more than 1.6 million times since Saturday. People from as far away as Ireland and Australia have lauded Kai and his ebullient personality  part adrenaline-jacked stoner, part existential bodhisattva  as a paragon of positivity. Multiple Facebook Pages have sprung up in his honor. Reisbeck says a producer from Keeping Up With the Kardashians has even called his phone in hopes of getting in touch with Kai.

But there's just one problem.

Aside from a sporadic series of Facebook updates, Kai has disappeared from public view almost entirely. He's a chosen vagabond, largely cut off from communication, digital or otherwise. For now, at least, he exists apart from the mainstream world that so badly wants a piece of him.

"He's kind of like a superhero," Reisbeck tells Mashable. "He's impossible to get ahold of because he has no phone and he's this mysterious guy, but he has this hero status."

"Do you have a last name?" Reisbeck asked Kai during their Friday interview.

"No, bro," Kai said. "I don't have anything,"

The deed  some might call it a miracle  that made Kai famous almost went unnoticed.

Reisbeck is a sports reporter who's been helping out on the news beat for KMPH while the station looks to fill a position. He's all set to leave for a sports shoot Friday afternoon, when a call comes over the scanner. Someone's crashed into a utility worker. A drunk driver maybe? Then the next call comes over the scanner: a homeless guy with a hatchet is going after the man with the car.

Reisbeck skips his sports shoot and heads over with a crew to investigate.

He's interviewing people, trying to piece together just what happened. Then the woman who was attacked by the crazed driver says, "There's the hero right there who saved my life."

Reisbeck gets the interview. Other news stations show up at the scene and look to get their five minutes with the longhaired, bandana-wearing hitchhiker who's apparently a hero. Reisbeck knows he has the first interview, but still his stomach sinks.

But Kai has one more trick up his sleeve.

"After the interview, all the other stations came up and he just lifted his hands said, 'No comment, bro,'" Reisbeck says. "In sports they say to win a major or to win a Super Bowl you need a little bit of luck. That was my little piece of luck."

Reisbeck's Kai coverage has since been featured on CNN, Jim Rome, The Soup and The Colbert Report. Cartoons and memes have been made in Kai's honor.

But until meeting with Reisbeck on Wednesday for a follow-up interview set to air later this week, Kai himself has had virtually nothing to say. No one, it seems, can get ahold of him. (Believe us, we've tried.)

Kai's most recent post, also from Monday:

Christian Worzalla lives in Wisconsin. He's 32 years old. He's never met Kai. He's one of the admins of the "Kai of Dogtown fanpage" on Facebook. He also runs a GoFundMe campaign that aims to raise $1,500 for Kai.

"There's people that see him as just just another meme  'Hey, look at this guy. Crazy personality. Haha. Look at him,'" Worzalla tells Mashable. "Then you have the other group that really sees Kai as who he is and who they want him to be. His personality. That's what's garnered the most interest and support for him.'"

In two days, 32 people have donated $321 to the GoFundMe campaign.

"The Internet's an amazing place," Worzalla says.

During Reisbeck's second interview with Kai, on Wednesday, the one that will air later this week, they went back to the scene of the crime.

A man in a pickup truck drove by. "Kai! Is that you?" he yelled. The man  "star struck," according to Reisbeck  pulled over to take photos with Kai. But Kai still may not understand just how famous he's become.

"I don't think he has a total grasp on it," Reisbeck says. "It's only a matter of time before he does, but then he might never. I have no idea if he ever will. He doesn't have a smartphone, he's rarely near a computer, and those are the same type of people he's always around."

Rest assured, more "Smash! Smash! Suh-MASH!" autotunes will come. Kai's viral fame will grow. Maybe that producer from The Kardashians will finally get in touch, and who knows what he has to say.

But for now, little has changed, according to Reisbeck. Kai has designs on getting up to Humboldt County, but that's about it for the time being.

"He's just doing the exact same thing he's always done," Reisbeck says. "Living a homefree life, as he calls it. He's living the same homefree life that he's always lived, man."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Plenty of LED desk lamps are either in the prototype stage or newly available for sale. This one, by a company called Satechi, is a high-quality, versatile product at a fair price ($100). It includes innovative features we haven't seen anywhere else. Let's take a close look.

What's so great about LEDs, anyway? Their most attractive attribute: energy savings. This 11-Watt LED desk lamp can give you as much light as a 75-Watt incandescent light bulb. That lets you illuminate your desk or nightstand for about 1/7th the energy you're probably using now. And since the 27 LEDs in this lamp each last more than 40,000 hours, it's likely you won't ever need to change them.

The downside of LEDs: Their light can look other-worldly or too blue. The Satechi lamp solves that problem. Similar to lighting used in the International Space Station, it gives you four different settings for the type of the light you'd like. Each one of its four modes is easily selected via a capacitive touchpad in the base.

Of the 4 modes, Study Mode is the brightest, using mostly white LEDs for a color temperature of between 6,000K and 7,000K. (Color temperature is measured in degrees Kelvin, with the higher numbers closely resembling daylight, and lower numbers representing the warmer, more yellow color you'd get from an incandescent lamp.)

Reading Mode (4,300K to 5,300K) mixes in more of the yellow spectrum, Relaxation Mode brings the color temperature down to 2,500K and looks quite warm, and Bedtime Mode is a similar hue, but even dimmer.

Speaking of dimmers, you can select one of four brightness modes as well, also selected by capacitive touch on the lamp's base. Another handy feature is the 60-second timer, letting you tap its icon on the base and the light automatically turns off an hour later.

There's a USB port in the back of the base, but that's the feature that disappoints. The problem is, that port only emits 5 Watts (at .7 amps) of electricity for your charging needs. That's enough to charge an iPod, but it comes up short with an iPhone, which needs a full amp of current to charge efficiently.

There's certainly not enough current for an iPad; its charger delivers 10 Watts of power and 2.1 amps of current to allow it to charge at full speed. So this lamp's USB port might be useful to top off a charge or keep a device running, but it's not powerful enough to be completely useful.

The lamp's array of LEDs is supported by a sturdy base. Available in black or white, the glossy fixture has a couple of flexible joints that let you position its illuminated head however you'd like. Its heavy base keeps it stable regardless of the position in which you place its head, and you can rotate it 130 to shine precisely where you want it.

Satechi first announced the price of its Smart LED Desk Lamp at $149.99, but just as it shipped, the price was cut to $99.99. If you're looking for a well-designed and versatile LED desk lamp, it's a bargain.
--------------------------------------------------------------
In what has to be one of the most imaginative do-it-yourself projects to involve Legos, two DIYers have built a Lego mini drone blimp called "flying fortress."

Tyler Westmoreland and Chris Shepard, used Lego parts, two NXTBee wireless adapters that communicate with the remote controller, adjustable propellers, and a pair of 55-inch helium balloons. The two DIYers have also released the source code to program the blimp, so anybody with a few Legos and the right equipment can reproduce their creation.

SEE ALSO: Mini-Drone Will Watch Wherever You Go

This is not the first time Legos are used to create drones, as we've seen before. Learn more about this DIY blimp by watching the video above.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Streaming live on Mashable, "Moxie Maven" Alexia Vernon will answer questions from readers at 3 p.m. ET (12 p.m. PT) Thursday, Feb. 7. As part of the Young Entrepreneur Councils #StartupLab initiative, a virtual mentorship program, Vernon will appear live via video chat broadcast on this site.

Branded a Moxie Maven by the White House, since winning the Miss Junior America competition Alexia Vernon has been empowering companies, campuses and community organizations to build a new generation of heart-centered, high-impact communicators and ethical leaders. Vernon is the creator of Step Into Your Moxie, a womens empowerment platform that teaches presentation skills, negotiation strategies, conflict resolution and interpersonal communication.

Vernon has shared her advice with CNN, NBC, the Wall Street Journal, FOX Business News, CBS MoneyWatch, Mint.com, CareerBuilder.com, Monster.com and Forbes. She is the author of 90 Days 90 Ways: Onboard Young Professionals to Peak Performance and Awaken Your CAREERpreneour: A Holistic Road Map to Climb from Your Calling to Your Career.

When not helping people and companies shift obstacles into opportunities, Vernon stays active in the sexual abuse prevention and rehabilitation movement, lets go through yoga and meditation and drinks a lot of green juice. You can learn more about Vernon and receive her 7 Biggest Obstacles to Success and the Sinfully Simple Formula to Shift Them Into Opportunities at AlexiaVernon.com and connect on Twitter @AlexiaVernon.

#StartupLab is a free virtual mentorship program created by The Young Entrepreneur Council (YEC), an invite-only organization comprised of hundreds of Americas most successful young entrepreneurs. #StartupLab takes YEC's mission to help more people start successful businesses to the next level by offering millions of entrepreneurs direct access to YEC members through interactive video chats, email lessons and a library of how-to articles, videos and eBooks. Whether you're just starting up, a current business owner, or you run an organization that supports entrepreneurs, sign up for #StartupLab today for real-world advice from some of the coolest entrepreneurs on the planet.

Check Mashable tomorrow afternoon at 3 p.m. ET (12 p.m. PT), when Vernon will answer questions from the audience live via video chat.

You can also sign up for an email reminder of the chat by visiting this registration page
--------------------------------------------------------------
We're happy to announce the return of MashBash at SXSWi 2013! Amid the plethora of panels, presentations and parties, Mashable will be hosting one of the biggest and most memorable events in Austin.

Join Mashable and the SXSWi community on Sunday, March 10 from 9 p.m. to 2 a.m. for an evening of music, dancing and digital inspiration, along with an open bar. And as always, there will be a few surprises along the way.

Joining us as the talent behind the turntables will be DJ Mick Boogie, whose arsenal of tunes range from 80s, rock and soul, to disco, house and electro. Make sure to come with your dancing shoes on.

Our MashBash sponsors Yappem and 3M will make the evening truly unique with their special digital activations, which will be revealed at the party.

In addition to the MashBash on Sunday night, we have some exciting plans that we'll be announcing soon, so stay tuned!

RSVP Policy

The event is open to all 21+ SXSWi badge holders. Please RSVP on Eventbrite.



Socialize

Follow #MashSXSW on Twitter, Facebook, Google+, Foursquare, and Instagram.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Microsoft and Symantec joined forces to shut down a botnet controlling hundreds of thousands of computers on Wednesday, according to a report.

Between 300,000 and 600,000 computers were freed from botnet control when technicians and U.S. federal marshals seized a server in Weekhawken, N.J., and got another operator to disable a server in the Netherlands on Wednesday, reports Reuters.

The raid's target was the Bamital botnet, a click-fraud operation that first surfaced in 2010.

Users infected with Bamital malware had their search results unknowingly redirected to websites that profited from advertising impressions made by the visitors. The botnet's controllers may have also instructed infected computers to repeatedly click those advertisements, generating additional revenue.

Bamital potentially made $1 million or more annually for those involved, according to Microsoft and Symantec's estimates.

Computers infected with Bamital malware will now display a warning notification after making search queries alerting users their computer "is very likely to be infected by malware that redirects the results of your search queries." If you see this error message, it's a good idea to download and install free anti-malware tools provided by Microsoft and Symantec.

SEE ALSO: The Year in Cybersecurity: Malware, Social Media and Web Exploits

Botnets, short for "robot network," are created by hackers who unleash malicious software that, when installed by an unsuspecting user, hands some or all control of infected computers to the hacker. Aside from click-fraud schemes, they are often used for distributed denial of service (DDoS) attacks in which a massive amount of bogus traffic is directed at a target server in the hopes of knocking it offline.
--------------------------------------------------------------
By the end of 2013, there will be more mobile devices on Earth than people, a new report suggests.

According to Cisco's Visual Networking Index Global Mobile Data Traffic Forecast Update, consumers' mobile appetite has grown a lot in the past year, and it shows no signs of slowing. In fact, Cisco predicts global mobile data traffic will increase 13-fold by 2017, with more than 10 billion mobile-connected devices by then. It also believes mobile network speeds will grow by seven times what it is now.

SEE ALSO: 12 Essential Resources for Building a Killer Mobile App

In 2012, the number of mobile-connected tablets grew 2.5 times to 36 million, and each tablet generated 2.4 times more traffic than the average smartphone. Android also beat iPhone levels of data usage in the U.S. and Western Europe.

With connected devices on the rise, mobile data usage is skyrocketing too  mobile traffic worldwide grew 70% in 2012, nearly double what it was the year before. It's now 12 times what the global Internet was in 2000.

Consumers can't get enough of mobile video too. It grew 50% for the first time in 2012 and made up nearly 51% of mobile traffic. By 2017, Cisco believes two-thirds of global mobile data traffic will be video.
--------------------------------------------------------------
This is what happens when you let the Internet choose.

Hasbro let fans decide on a new token for the game (and which of the old tokens to boot) on Jan. 9. The voting closed Tuesday night. The result: The iron is out and a new character, a cat, is in. Here's a look:

The cat's ascendance isn't hugely surprising given the Internet's fetish for all things feline. And there's no corresponding craze for LOL Irons. As the chart below shows, the race to the bottom between the iron, the wheelbarrow and the shoe was a real nail-biter:

Other new pieces that vied for contention included a robot, a helicopter, a guitar and a diamond ring. Oddly, Hasbro announced the new token Wednesday morning well before it told fans via its Facebook Page. While Hasbro was teasing the announcement in a status update, fans let the gamemaker know that they already knew who won the prize.

SEE ALSO: Cats Salute the Newest Monopoly Member
--------------------------------------------------------------
Jennifer Linnabary's dying wish to see her son graduate was granted with a little help from the school. Ben Linnabary of Colerain High School received an early diploma on February 2 at the hospital's critical care unit, where his mother died a day later from lymphoma.

The early ceremony was attended by family, friends, school faculty and one of the district's superintendents. Ben wore a gown, threw his cap and received his diploma all within feet of his mother. They even played the "Pomp and Circumstance March" to make the celebrations feel more authentic.

Watch the moving ceremony in the YouTube video above, filmed by Barking Squirrel Media.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The U.S. Navy may soon be introducing a set of robots that could smell their way across aircraft carriers, Wired reports.

The project will use an artificial pheromone to track and lead a team of robots to and from the weapons prep area of ships, allowing them to transport bombs by following a trail of scents.

Initially, the proposal says, a human-controlled "leader robot" would disperse the chemical along the chosen route; then, the "follower" robots would pick up the scent, analyze it, and follow suit.

SEE ALSO: Hey, Sexy Sailors: Navy Officer Cadets Do 'Gangnam Style'

The feat has its fair share of challenges. To start, the bots would have to carry 1,000-pound bombs up nine levels to upper parts of each ship, where wind and water could sweep away the scent.

Plus, the odors would need to dissipate within 20 minutes after each run as to not interfere with the next line of bots.

Currently, Wired says, it takes between 3 and 6 soldiers to move a single bomb pallet.

The project is still in its proposal stage. At the moment, the team behind it is developing a system to both encode and decode the pheromone with data that the robots could analyze.

Watch the video above to learn more. The Navy's full proposal for the project is available here.

What else do you think this odor-sniffing method could be used for?
--------------------------------------------------------------
Sports are pretty insignificant in the grand scheme of things, but sometimes they bring small mercies that take on poignant meaning when set against life's bigger picture.

That's what happened this week at Newtown High when basketball player Mike Daubert hit an amazing buzzer-beating three pointer at the buzzer to give the Connecticut school a Senior Night win over visiting New Milford. The shot was featured as SportsCenter's top play of Tuesday night, and surely brought a welcome bit of joy to to at least some residents in a town that's still recovering from December's mass shooting at Sandy Hook Elementary School.

SEE ALSO: Viral Campaign Lands Inspiring Kid on 'SportsCenter' Top 10 Plays

Watch the shot above, then let us know when you think in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
You don't have to work in the film industry to get your hands on an Oscar statuette.

One of the golden Academy Awards trophies is on a 21-day roadtrip, and people across the U.S. get to decide  via Twitter  where the Oscar goes in each city.

Be warned: The 13-and-half-inch Oscar is heavier than it appears, weighing 8.5 pounds.

The Academy of Motion Picture Arts and Sciences launched Oscar Roadtrip this week to build buzz for the 85th Academy Awards on Feb. 24. The @OscarRoadTrip Twitter account will reveal the pitstops and also ask followers to choose between two locations.

3 Kickstarter-Backed Films Earn Oscar Nods SEE ALSO: List of Oscar Nominees

Comedians Ben Gleib and Angie Greenup  who stopped by Mashable's New York City office to chat about the trip (see video) and let us hold the Oscar  will accompany the statuette until the trip ends on the red carpet in Holloywood on Oscar night.

The trip began in NYC this week and will travel to Philadelphia, Washington, D.C., Baltimore, Chicago, St. Louis, Kansas City, Houston, Dallas, Phoenix and Los Angeles. 

 BONUS: Oscar Nominees Star in 'Les Zero Silver Djargo of Southern Pincoln'
--------------------------------------------------------------
Bitcoin, the decentralized digital currency, can be used to pay for online strippers, drugs, and even WordPress services. Now you can add pizza delivery to that list.

The aptly, albeit somewhat unimaginatively, named Pizzaforcoins.com makes it possible for anyone to place a pizza order and pay for it using Bitcoins.

To place an order, enter your name and address. The site then redirects you to an online order menu that has various options and their respective prices (in BTC). Once a selection is made, Pizzaforcoins verifies that the payment has been made and an order is placed within 10 minutes.

The site essentially acts as a middleman between the customer and the pizza joint.

Orders can currently only be placed with Domino's Pizza, but the site's fine print indicates that they'll soon be adding Pizza Hut and Papa John's into the mix. The order options also appear to be limited to a few items and deals.

One of the offers available is two medium two-topping pizzas for 0.71 BTC. There is no one static dollar equivalent to this figure, given that the value of Bitcoin fluctuates based on demand. As of this writing, that amounted to $14.97 (one coin equals $21.01). For context, the same order would cost us $18.59 (tax included).

The site is the brainchild of Matt Burkinshaw and Riley Alexander, who state in the "about us" section that they did it "to further expand the usability of bitcoins on the open market." The site does not disclose if it is intended to be a profit-earning enterprise.

It's fitting that Burkinshaw and Alexander chose to go with the popular Italian dish. Back in May 2010, and individual going by the handle laszlo offered to pay 10,000 BTC for approximately $25 dollars worth of pizza. Back then, that equated to roughly $40.

The Daily Dot reached out to Burkinshaw and Alexander for comment on this story but the duo has yet to reply.

This article originally published at The Daily Dot here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Touchscreen devices have gone a long way in the first couple of years, but one problem has stayed the same: dirty screens. No matter how much you clean your smartphone or tablet, it only takes a couple of seconds of operation for its screen to become covered in greasy fingerprints.

Enter AutoMee S by Takara Tomy, a 2.75-inch screen cleaner that slides around your tablet's screen like a tiny Roomba.

The palm-sized bot is small enough to be used on smartphones as well, and smart enough not to fall over the edge of the device. Running on a single double AA battery, AutoMee S cleans the screen using special cleaning paper, which sounds good enough, although Takara Tomy doesn't guarantee it won't damage your device.

The price for AutoMeeS when it goes on sale in Japan next month will be 1,575 ($16.80).
--------------------------------------------------------------
What would you do if I sang out of tune? Would you stand up and move in with me?

Jonathan Mann of Brooklyn, N.Y., needs a roommate. But rather than the usual post-the-room-to-Craiglist technique, he composed a song and uploaded it to YouTube instead.

In the video, he shows off  err, sings off  his Williamsburg apartment and its many amenities: a 7-minute commute the Bedford Ave. "L" train, an assortment of video games and a tastefully placed exposed brick wall. He goes old-school too, by referencing Better Than Ezra's "Good" towards the end of the song.

SEE ALSO: Roommate Wanted: Apartable Helps You Find Compatible Roommates

In December, we reported on Mann and his then-girlfriend, Ivory, splitting up via another video  which might explain the now-vacant room.

In any case, here's to hoping he finds someone worthy of that Xbox 360 and convenient walk to Bedford.
--------------------------------------------------------------
In time for New York Fashion Week, PETA has released a short video that imagines if the runway roles of humans and animals were reversed  that is, a fashion show in which animals, functioning as models, donned human skin and hair on the runway, rather than the other way around.

The results are strange rather than grotesque, until the camera moves backstage, revealing human skins (computer-generated, of course) slung casually over runway racks, a bloodied corpse and, finally, a Chinese girl huddled in a cage, shivering, frightened.

The spot, created by the Beijing office of ad agency Ogilvy & Mather, isn't just aimed at Fashion Week designers and attendees. According to PETA spokesperson Shakira Croce, PETA's primary target are young Chinese consumers. "China [is] our number-one target for its lack of animal-protection penalties," she wrote in an email to Mashable. "For obvious political reasons, protest is pointless in China, so ... [we] created this slick short to provoke debate among young consumers without targeting a specific brand and drawing the ire of trade officials," she added.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A couple years before Sheryl Sandberg joined Facebook as the company's second-in-command, she passed up the opportunity to run another major social network: LinkedIn.

In the summer of 2006, while Sandberg was working as an exec at Google, LinkedIn's founder Reid Hoffman reached out to her about the possibility of taking over as the company's CEO. "I thought it was a great opportunity, and after five years in the same position at Google I was ready for a new challenge," Sandberg writes in Lean In, her first book set to be released next month, according to an excerpt in The Wall Street Journal.

Ultimately, though, Sandberg decided to turn down the offer to focus on her family. "The timing was tricky," she writes. "I was 37 years old and wanted to have a second child. I told Reid the truth: regrettably, I had to pass 

Hoffman eventually appointed Jeff Weiner to serve as LinkedIn's CEO in mid-2009, almost three years later.

Sandberg, meanwhile, stayed at Google for nearly two more years before Facebook CEO Mark Zuckerberg convinced her to become the company's first chief operating officer. As the story goes, Zuckerberg met Sandberg at a Christmas party in 2007 and spent six weeks trying to get her to come to Facebook. Sandberg has since gone on to become the first woman on Facebook's board and one of the most powerful women in Silicon Valley, if not the entire country.

There have been rumors in recent months that Sandberg might leave Facebook for a government job, though she has stated publicly that she "loves" her current job.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Siri will soon be a feature on Mac computers, if a job posting on Apple's website is to be believed. A position entitled "Siri UI Engineer" calls for someone with experience with Unix, and specifically with OS X.

The posting has since been removed (searching for "Siri" in Apple's database does call up various other jobs related to the virtual assistant, though), but not before it was spotted by TechCrunch and Apple Insider. The position mentions OS X but not iOS, the only OS Siri currently runs on.

Rumors about Siri coming to OS X have been circulating for some time, but they gained new traction last fall when early builds of the next major release of the system software, 10.9, were supposedly being tested. 9to5 Mac quoted "reliable sources" that Siri would be a feature in OS X 10.9.

SEE ALSO: Hands On With In-Car Siri

With version 10.8 "Mountain Lion," all Macs include dictation software, and Siri is the next logical step. Apple pursued a similar progression on the iPad, which first got dictation with iOS 5.1 and Siri with iOS 6.

The job listing hints that Siri on the Mac might have even have more expansive abilities than on iOS, Apple Insder reports. The posting says applicants should "consider [Siri] a an entire miniature OS within the OS, and you get a good idea of the scope."

Other parts of the listing describe close collaboration with other app designers, which suggests Siri for OS X would have greater integration with other apps  something that has been slow to progress with Siri for iOS. For example, you might describe, in natural language, what you want to do in a photo editor ("Make this photo less fuzzy") and Siri would apply the appropriate filter.

That sort of functionality probably wouldn't be ready when Siri arrives on the Mac, but at least the potential will be unlocked. Apple is rumored to be unveiling OS X 10.9 later this year.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It's been 50 glorious, action-packed years of gun-wielding James Bond sexiness on the big screen.

Sometimes you get caught up in all the train-dodging, British-accented fun and don't realize just how you actually got somewhere, plot wise. It's ok to step back and ask, "What just happened here?"

Luckily, Honest Trailers isn't letting Daniel Craig, the cast of Inception, and the director of Dark Knight Rises off that easily. It's doing a deep investigative look into Skyfall to really blow the roof off this whole thing (pun kind of intended).

SEE ALSO: This 'Lord of the Rings' Trailer Reveals the Hobbit-Tickling Truth

So, sit back, relax and put an end to whatever belief you had in modern motion picture screenplay writers.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Have you been pining for the velvety baritone of YouTube sensation Tay Zonday? Have you also been traversing the wintry holds of The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim on a quest to defeat Alduin the world-eater and save Tamriel from cosmic doom?

Well, good. Because the guy who made "Chocolate Rain" a thing hasn't been sitting on his Internet famous laurels for the past five years. No. He continues to tap into the zeitgeist with epic covers like the one above.

Kudos, Mr. Zonday, for singing in the original dragon tongue. Alhough your accent could use a little work.
--------------------------------------------------------------
If you're on popular social networking sites such as Facebook and Twitter, you can probably group friends into categories based on their online behavior. There's the vaguebooker. The humblebragger. The guy that won't stop talking about politics. And the one who spoils every good scene to your favorite TV show.

According to a social behavior study by MyLife, which was conducted among 890 adults ages 18 and older, there's a good chance you fit into one of these personas. In fact, if you're a young parent, you are 88% likely to post pictures of your kids or talk about parenting at least once a month. Not to mention 25% of users are "vaguebooking" by posting intentionally vague updates which encourage people to react and inquire for more details.

SEE ALSO: 20 Things Your Most Annoying Friends Do on Facebook

The survey's infographic also has some interesting findings about searching behaviors on social media sites too. In fact, nearly 25% of men under the age of 35 admit to looking at a former girlfriend's social media profile page once a month. Women do this less often (20%).

What's your social networking persona? Find out via the infographic and let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Comic book legend Stan Lee proved once again that even at his venerable age of 90, he's at the forefront of digital culture. On Saturday, he launched his new imprint, Kid's Universe, which wants to be digital-oriented as the current times require  other than traditional books, it will offer ebooks, and apps.

The imprint is a joint venture between Lee's POW! Entertainment and 1821 Comics' Terry Dougas. The two "were looking in book stores and on the Internet, and we noticed that theres really nothing that great, we thought, for very young children  children who are just starting to read. So we thought we could try to produce some reading matter for them and introduce them to the joy of reading," Lee told The Hollywood Reporter.

SEE ALSO: How Stan Lee Became a Social Media Superhero [EXCLUSIVE]

The first book of the series Monsters and Kittens, was also launched on Saturday, and made available on Monday. The book features kid-friendly characters and will be available also as en e-book along with with a video game.

Lee, who is famous for creating some comic book's history best superheroes like Spider-Man or the X-Men, is the creative director for the book, although Dani Jones is the one who illustrated and wrote it.

Lee and Dougas are also launching Goobeez: Pirate Adventure, a mobile game for smartphones and tablets.

"We're building cute stuff that we want to give to our kids, and then give it to the rest of the kids," Dougas told USA Today.

You can watch Lee reading the book out loud at the launch in the video above.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Another day, another set of Star Wars spin-off movie rumors. Disney CEO Bob Iger confirmed Tuesday that his new subsidiary Lucasfilm was working on character-based Star Wars spinoff movies  not just the plain vanilla Episode VII through IX. Harry Knowles, the Dean of Hollywood gossip, confidently announced that Yoda was among the first characters being considered for his own feature.

Now Entertainment Weekly chimes in with an exclusive, claiming that bounty hunter Boba Fett and young Han Solo are the first spin-off movies on the slate.

The magazine adds that the timeframe of these movies  between Revenge of the Sith and A New Hope  would allow for Darth Vader and Jabba the Hutt to return as villains. Though the report also cautions that "it's very early in the process." (Indeed, Deadline Hollywood has a source close to the process saying it's just at the "kicking around ideas" stage at the moment.)

Now, therefore, is the time for fans to chime in. Let your voices be heard throughout Lucasfilm HQ in the San Francisco Presidio with this poll. Who would you most want to see a Star Wars spinoff movie focus on? If you don't see your favorite character here, tell us in the comments and we can add him, her or it to the poll.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Your bank calls you to verify your recent $750 bill at an out-of-state Taco Bell, but you havent left town in weeks. You quickly contest the charge and request a new credit card, but when you check your wallet the compromised card is still there. You try to think of shady ATMs or recent cashiers, but nothing comes to mind. Nothing, except the online purchase you made while browsing the Internet at your local coffee shop.

The number of free public Wi-Fi hotspots is growing, but not every hotspot can provide the protection of a private home network. Your notebook, tablet or smartphones default settings and firewalls may not be enough to keep you safe from prying eyes while on the go. If you want to keep your information and files secure, read these essential tips for protecting yourself when youre away from home.

You may share your music library, printers or files, or even allow remote login from other computers on your Wi-Fi network in the privacy of your own home. Unless you disable these settings before connecting to a public Wi-Fi network, anyone else in the vicinity may be able to hack into your PC.

If youre using a Windows PC, youll want to start by opening the advanced sharing settings of the Homegroup section of the Network and Internet settings in the Control Panel. From here, youll be able to toggle file and printer sharing as well as network discovery, which will make your computer visible to anyone connected to the same network. For Mac, just go to System Preferences, then Sharing, and make sure none of the options are checked.

The most secure way to browse on a public network is to use a virtual private network. A VPN routes your traffic through a secure network even on public Wi-Fi, giving you all the perks of your private network while still having the freedom of public Wi-Fi.

While free VPN services exist, a paid VPN service guarantees the connections integrity. If you regularly connect to unknown networks, setting up a VPN is smart to protect your personal information.

One VPN provider is Private Internet Access, which costs $6.95 monthly and allows for unlimited bandwidth and multiple exit points, which will let you choose which country your network traffic is routed through.

Your smartphone or tablet may be set to automatically connect to any available Wi-Fi hotspot, a setting that can seriously endanger your privacy. Not only will this allow your device to connect to public networks without your express permission, you may also be automatically connecting to malicious networks set up specifically to steal your information.]

Most modern smartphones have this option disabled by default, but this isnt always the case, and its a setting you should always double-check. First, open the Wi-Fi section of your phones settings app. If you dont see an option to disable auto-connecting, youre already safe. Otherwise, turn this setting off.

Regular websites transfer content in plain text, making it an easy target for anyone who has hacked into your network connection. Many websites use SSL to encrypt the transfer data, but youshouldn'trely on the website or Web service to keep you protected.

You can create this encrypted connection with the browser extension SSL Everywhere. With this plugin enabled, almost all website connections are secured with SSL, ensuring that any data transfer is safe from prying eyes.

Two-factor authentication means you need two pieces of information to log into an account: One is something you know and the other is something you have. Most often this takes the form of a password and a code sent to your cellphone.

Many popular websites and services support two-factor authentication. This means that even if someone is able to get your password due to a hole in a public Wi-Fi network, they wont be able to log into your account.

To enable this feature for Gmail, log into your account and open the settings page. Navigate to the Accounts And Import tab and click Other Google Account Settings. The second section will be two-step verification, and you can click Settings to start.

First, enter your phone number and choose whether youd like a text message or a phone call. Next, Google will send a six-digit code to your phone. Enter this when prompted. Now, whenever you log into Google from a new computer, youll be asked to verify your identity by entering both pieces of info.

The login process will now take a few extra seconds when you use a different device, but you can rest peacefully knowing that your account is safe and secure.

Sometimes hackers will set up a fake Wi-Fi network to attract unwitting public Wi-Fi users. The Starbucks public Wi-Fi network might not be named Free Starbucks Wi-Fi. Connecting to a fake network could put your device into the hands of a malicious neer-do-well.

If youre not sure if youre connecting to the official network, ask. If youre in a caf or coffee shop, employees will know the name of the official network and help you get connected. If theres no one around to ask, you may want to move to a different location where you can be sure that the Wi-Fi network isnt fake.

Using unique passwords for different accounts can help if one of your accounts is compromised. Keeping track of multiple secure passwords can be tricky, so using a password manager such as KeePass or LastPass can help keep you safe and secure.

Both KeePass and LastPass are free, but they store your information in different ways. KeePass keeps an encrypted database file on your computer, while LastPass stores your credentials in the cloud. There are pros and cons to each approach, but both services are completely secure.

Most OSs include a built-in firewall, which monitors incoming and outgoing connections. A firewall wont provide complete protection, but its a setting that should always be enabled.

On a Windows notebook, locate your firewall settings in the Control Panel under System And Security. Click on Windows Firewall, then click Turn Windows Firewall On or Off. Enter your administrator password, then verify that the Windows Firewall is on.

These settings are in System Preferences, then Security & Privacy on a Mac. Navigate to the Firewall tab and click Turn On Firewall. If these settings are grayed out, click the padlock icon in the lower left, enter your password, then follow these steps again.

Always running up-to-date anti-virus software can help provide the first alert if your system has been compromised while connected to an unsecured network. An alert will be displayed if any known viruses are loaded onto your PC or if theres any suspicious behavior, such as modifications to registry files.

While running anti-virus software might not catch all unauthorized activity, its a great way to protect against most attacks.

This article originally published at LAPTOP Magazine here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Microsoft will officially launch the Surface Pro  the larger, more powerful version of its Surface tablet  on Feb. 9. The reviews are already in, though, and if there's one consistent knock against the device it's battery life, which lasts only a few hours. However, Microsoft's engineering team has revealed that external batteries may be in the works.

The Surface engineering team hosted an AMA (ask me anything) about the Surface Pro on Reddit Wednesday afternoon, and one redditor asked if any kind of keyboard accessory with a built-in battery  which is the norm for other companies' Windows tablets such as the Samsung Series 7  was in the works.

One of the multiple Microsoft engineers on the AMA, which was led by Surface general manager Panos Panay, replied that such an accessory would only be possible if the magnetic accessory connector was designed to transfer high current between the peripheral and tablet's battery.

Then he wrote, "Which we did..."

Redditors expressed excitement about this reply, taking it to mean Microsoft may have external battery solutions in the works for the Surface Pro, possibly including a keyboard. However, no one from Microsoft elaborated what sort of products would be forthcoming, or even if there would be any. Spokespeople for Microsoft didn't immediately reply to a request for confirmation.

SEE ALSO: Microsoft Surface Pro: Finally, a Worthy Flagship for Windows 8

The Surface engineering team revealed a couple of other interesting tidbits about the new tablet during the AMA. The reason the Pro version of the tablet came three months after the Surface RT is because Microsoft didn't start working on it until three months after development for the RT version began. Clearly Microsoft prioritized the simpler, lighter tablet, presumably to have its proper competitor to the iPad on the market as soon as possible.

One of the engineers also said Microsoft was working "aggressively" on improving how the Surface Pro outputs its display to an external monitor. Since the Surface Pro has such a high-resolution screen it scales the desktop to 150% on its relatively small 10.6-inch screen. However, if extending to an external display, the zoom can't be different between the two screens  a feature Microsoft will apparently be adding soon.

Does Microsoft's AMA make you more interested in the Surface Pro? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A Netherlands-based fashion designer has created a high-tech dress line that turns clear when you get excited. How's that for being transparent on a date?

Called Intimacy  from designer Daan Roosegaarde, founder of Studio Roosegaarde  the project aims to explore the relationship between technology and the body's interactions. The dresses, which are called 'Intimacy White' and 'Intimacy Black,' are made out of opaque smart e-foils. When the body gets excited and the heart races, the coils turn clear.

The smart foils have a blend of wireless technology, LED lights, cooper and other materials. "Social interactions determine the garments level of transparency, creating a sensual play of disclosure," the company says on its site.

Although the concept isn't entirely new  the company has been working on prototypes since 2010  its new 2.0 line has been making its rounds online in advance of Valentine's Day. The dresses are currently on display privately in Hong Kong and Paris and will be shown at Kent State University in Ohio in September.

SEE ALSO: How to Follow New York Fashion Week Online

Will you be able to get your hands on a dress like this in the future? "The next line will be available for a wider audience," a spokesperson told Mashable.

Studio Roosegaarde also has other high-tech garments in mind: "We're currently working on a suit for men which becomes transparent when they lie."

Would you wear an outfit that changes colors based on your feelings and actions? Let us know in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Twitter updated its iOS and Android apps Wednesday, as well as mobile.twitter.com, making it easier to find information.

Previously broken up by type, now all of the content from the Discover tab appears as a single stream in both the iPhone and Android apps, so you can see tweets, activity, trends, and suggestions of accounts to follow as a single content stream, rather than having to scroll past one group of content to get to another. Activity and Trend information can be launched by tapping on tiles at the top of the Discover page, both of which display a snapshot of that information. For instance, the Activity tile shows four people you follow who have recent activity on the service, while the Trend tile shows a few of the current trends.

Search results are also now displayed in a single stream, surfacing the most relevant mix of tweets, photos, and accounts all in one stream. Twitter also added a search button in the iPhone app, allowing you to perform searches from anywhere in the app, a feature already available in the iPad and Android versions.

Clicking a link within a tweet now takes you directly to that website, rather than expanding the tweet and then taking you the website. Definitely a useful feature for people who use Twitter as a news feed and want the ability to get to content a little quicker.

While Twitter officially announced the update on its website, neither the Android or iOS apps appear to be live in the store just yet.
--------------------------------------------------------------
This content has been removed at the request of the publisher. See the original story here.

This article originally published at Discovery News here
--------------------------------------------------------------
The U.S. Postal Service will reportedly announce Wednesday that it will stop delivering letters on Saturdays beginning Aug. 1.

The postal service will continue to deliver packages on Saturday. Some post offices will also stay open on Saturdays to accept packages and sell stamps, but likely for limited hours.

The postal service posted a $15.9 billion net loss in the 2012 fiscal year. Ending Saturday mail delivery is a cost-cutting measure that will save $2 billion a year for the financially troubled organization, according to sources cited by The Washington Post.

E-mail and other digital communications have played a significant role in the postal service's decline  it's much easier, cheaper and faster to send an e-mail or Facebook message than it is to write a letter, buy an envelope and stamps and wait for delivery. For some, it may be surprising that it took several decades of mainstream Internet use to trigger service cutbacks or other significant reactions from the postal service.

The Internet, however, isn't the only problem facing the postal service: Competition from private carriers, such as UPS, FedEx and DHS, have also cut into the USPS's profit margins. Congressionally-mandated pre-funding of retirement heath care benefits, as well, have been eating into the postal service's budget.

Will you miss Saturday delivery? Is the Internet primarily to blame for the postal service's woes? Share your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
After being flooded with pornographic images, the iPhone app for Twitter's video sharing service Vine has changed its rating from 12+ to 17+.

This means users will have to confirm they are 17 years old or over before using the app.

Originally, Vine was rated 12+, but it decided to change the rating after adult images started showing up on the service, some even in the "Editors' Picks" category.

Photo sharing app 500px as well as Tumblr were also forced to change the rating of their apps due to adult content.

The new rating has been introduced in the new version of Vine (1.0.5), which also brings the ability to share vines to Twitter or Facebook after posting, report or block a profile and various bug fixes.

You can download the Vine app for iOS over at Apple's App Store.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Vine is the hot new iPhone app leaving users in a hate-love relationship.

This app has so much potential. It opens doors for creative individuals and allows users to tell stories that photos can't  all while accommodating the social masses' short attention span.

But Twitter's new video-sharing baby is still missing many features that are keeping most from completely falling head over heels. Some are more vital to Vine's shelf life, while other add-on's are simply pipedreams. But the company is listening  share features were updated Tuesday evening.

SEE ALSO: 11 Things We'd Change About Instagram

Mashable's VP of design and Vine enthusiast, Chris Phillips, helped conjure up this wishlist. What features do you hope to see included in the future? Share your picks in the comments below.

Users who don't want to share with their entire social audience are also short-handed by the lack of sharing capabilities. They can create a private Twitter account solely to upload vines. But even then, if there's occasional vines you do want to share, the app won't allow you to manage multiple accounts.

Anyone managing a personal and business-related account would benefit from the ability to select which account uploads the vine.

Every iPhone has one  why not take advantage of it? Users should be able to switch back and forth between the two cameras. This could open the doors for some really creative dialogue vines, and self-vining.

Most users have likely experienced the frustration that comes with losing a vine, likely due to bugs, incoming phone activity or dead batteries.

There should be a feature that allows users to save mid-vine, like a Twitter draft. If everyone rushes to upload his or her post before a bug ruins it, Vine increases the potential for half-assed content, which we already have plenty of on every other platform.

Allow users to take the time to craft quality content, and you automatically encourage more creative content. Everyone wins.

One of the distinct features that truly makes Vine so great is the audio. Some vines are made prominently for the audio, whereas others are visually enticing.

If users could opt to lay separately created audio over the post, it would replace the choppy sound that often accompanies cuts. And users should also have an option to remove sound altogether.

When a user is recording content, he should at least be able to zoom. The entire capture screen as a record button is useful and handy on the go, but it would be more intuitive if a user could record from a button on the bottom. That way, users could zoom with the ubiquitous pinch feature.

This would also make it possible to focus on objects before recording. The camera often focuses mid-record, making vines distracting and blurry.

Users can "Find my Friends" on Vine, but it's not an accurate list of who you follow. For example, I follow 1,172 people, but there are only five people who use Vine according to the app. I know for a fact that's not true, so I had to search one by one for people I follow that were using the app.

The first step to better engagement would be giving users to more simply and accurately find their friends.

Vine is a social app lacking in the social department. Users can't engage with each other on the app, aside from commenting. But there is no way to tag other users, despite its Foursquare-implemented location map, similar to Instagram.

Allow users to tag people in captions and comments. On Instagram, Twitter and Facebook, the "@" symbol acknowledges the user is trying to tag someone and a drop-down menu filters the selection process. On Vine, using the "@" sign will recognize the username in a tweet, as shown below, but it should just sync your Twitter contacts to Vine in the first place.

When users share a vine, the link displays a user's profile picture, but there is nothing to interact with. Users should have the ability to manage posts, likes and at least your own profile from the web. Specifically, it would be nice to have a place that houses all of your vines online.

Currently, users looking for new and interesting content navigate the "Explore" tab, which relies on specific editors to hand-pick new vines. There are also a handful of popular tags Vine has chosen to highlight.

It would be helpful to discover new content and users through an improved and richer browsing feature, perhaps on the web.

Images courtesy of Vine and via iStockphoto, belterz
--------------------------------------------------------------
Will the days of taking your video game to a friend's house or trading it in for another soon be over?

Edge magazine has posted a report indicating Microsoft could be moving forward with an Internet-based business model for its next Xbox game console, which has been code-named "Durango."

According to the report, games that are produced for the system will require an online connection and an activation code that will align players on that particular console.

Activation codes are nothing new in the gaming world; a number of third-party publishers require them for online play with their titles. Electronic Arts started this trend years ago with its sports games, and with action games soon afterward. Its latest release, Dead Space 3, requires such a code if you want to play cooperatively with a friend online.

However, Microsoft's approach is a bit different. The report indicates that a continuous online connection would be needed for the games to run. By contrast, the company's current system, the Xbox 360, lets users play offline  say, when taking their console to a game competition or a friend's house.

Among other impacts, this business choice could have a huge effect on the used-game market. Shops that specialize in sales of secondhand games, where customers trade them in or sell them for cash, could feel the crunch. In particular, GameStop, a highly popular brand of game stores, might be threatened with a huge business drop-off.

Also, there is network security to consider. What would happen with games being played on the next Xbox console when the network is down? Or, for that matter, what if someone hacks into it, forcing the company to take it down and restructure it?

That's happened before: Sony had to "fix" its PlayStation Network following a data breach in April 2011, leaving it down for just over a month. What would that do with the Durango?

Despite such issues, Microsoft may not be the only company considering the move. Sony, which will likely be announcing its next console at an event later this month, previously submitted a patent application for an "Electronic Content Processing System" and "Use Apparatus." The technology would link individual game discs with matched user accounts, so they couldn't play on other systems.

SEE ALSO: Is It Too Soon for a PlayStation 4?

Do keep in mind this is rumor at the moment, as neither company has confirmed using such technologies with their system models. If they do, however, it may change the way some of you play  and not entirely for the better.

This article originally published at TechNewsDaily here
--------------------------------------------------------------
A Zappos partner has offered a glimpse into the effectiveness of that online retailer's Facebook activity illustrating that Facebook posts prompted both traffic and purchases during a two-month period.

The retailer's status updates from Nov. 20, 2012 to Jan. 20, 2013 prompted 85,000 visits to Zappos's site, according to Kenshoo, a digital marketing specialist that works with the retailer. Zappos has 419,000 fans for its Facebook Page. Kenshoo found that 42% of Zappos's status updates during that period led to purchases. The other 58% didn't lead to sales, but prompted other activity like "Liking," shares and comments.

Overall, each status update during the period had a conversion rate of 1.75%, meaning that roughly one person in 50 clicked from the update to buy something. Bryan Eisenberg, a marketing ROI expert, says Zappos' results are decent since the average conversion rate for retail is 2% to 3%. Meanwhile, Kenshoo found that for one particular post, Zappos got a 3.5% click-through rate and a 3.4% conversion rate for a revenue per click of $4.90, which represented a 34X ROI. Eisenberg says that he recently worked with an unnamed "top 30 retailer" who got $0.55 per click and was spending $1.50 per click.

However, Eisenberg cautions that Zappos has a particular kind of customer. "They have visitors that keep coming back every few days," he says. "There's just a few companies  Overstock, Amazon, Zappos  that have that."

Another factor also helps boost results: Most Zappos status updates contains a URL with a link to the site.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Free throws have never been this cool  or cute.

Blake Harper, a 1st grader at a private learning institution called the Mater Dei school, hits a free throw to give his entire school a day off on the Monday following the Super Bowl.

According to the YouTube description, a 7th grader and 8th grader had each missed three-pointers for the same prize. Then young Blake steps up, ice water in his veins, hits the clutch freebie and is mobbed by an overjoyed student body.

Baller. Straight baller. Check it out for yourself in the video above.
--------------------------------------------------------------
On Feb. 5, Sony announced the World Photography Awards shortlist of finalists in both professional and open categories. From over 120,000 submissions, this list of 43 images has been curated from submissions spanning 170 countries a record number of entries to date.

Astrid Merget, creative director of the World Photography Organisation, said. The World Photography Organisation is dedicated to finding the best international contemporary photography from across the world. The shortlist is a clear indication of the exciting photography which is out there and, as we do every year, we are looking forward to presenting this collection of photographers to a global audience.

The photographers' work will be exhibited at Somerset House, London, from April 26 to May 12 as part of the 2013 Sony World Photography Awards Exhibition, and published in the 2013 edition of the Sony World Photography Awards book.

The Open and Youth category winners will be announced on March 19. Professional category winners will take home $25,000 and will be announced at a gala ceremony in London on April 25.

1. Jens Juul, using the six degrees of separation theory, took a series of photos depicting connections in Copenhagen. (Jens Juul, Denmark, Finalist, Portraiture, Professional, 2013 Sony World Photography Awards)


--------------------------------------------------------------
Sometimes, less truly is more. If you don't believe this adage, then you haven't yet heard of The Acoustic Guitar Project. Few have.

On a whim in April 2012, the project's founder, Dave Adams, decided to equip one of his many musician friends with an acoustic guitar and a handheld recorder. Adams told his friend to take a week to write and record a song, using only the provided equipment.

When the week was over, he instructed the songwriter to sign the guitar with a magic marker and pass it off, with the same instructions, to another musician.

Adams' guitar, an acoustic Takamine, has been traveling around New York City since April, providing the foundation for what has become known as The Acoustic Guitar Project.

"I just wanted to create something that gave people permission to create something raw," Adams tells Mashable. "We live in an age when everyone has access to so much production equipment that...it's almost unheard of not to produce it."

On the New Year's Eve leading into 2012, Adams drunkenly told his friends that his resolution was to quit his job and work on an artistic project.

Not a musician himself, Adams came up with an idea to inspire creativity in others. Buoyed by unexpected success, Adams left his full-time job as a copywriter in October.

"All I do is put as much money as I can afford, and every available minute into supporting this mission and making it happen," he says.

This music mission, which now includes three guitars, has spread to other cities around the world. Other than his money and time, Adams really has very little control over the projects. Once he places a guitar into a musician's hands, he has no choice but to sit back and see what develops.

"You talk about discovering new music, the people who can really discover it the best are musicians. They know who's good better than anybody," Adams says.

The musicians email their songs back to Adams, who uploads them onto the project's website, which currently features more than 40 songs. The site also includes pictures of the musicians and interviews detailing their various song-writing processes and their views on music.

In October, the project beat out 59 others for a $1,000 grant from The Awesome Foundation. Why did the foundation think Adams' project was so awesome? In a blog post, the foundation called The Acoustic Guitar Project "an unfiltered tribute to the power of music."

A visit to Finland in September provided Adams the impetus he needed to quit his job. He decided to bring another guitar, so he purchased a used Martin on Craigslist.

Adams publicized "Project 02" through a friend, a radio reporter in Helsinki. That same friend introduced Adams to Axel Ehnstrm, better known in Finland by his stage name, Paradise Oskar.

Ehnstrm was Finland's representative in Eurovision 2011, an extremely popular international songwriting contest that garners more than 125 million viewers once annually.

"It's really important for me to pick the first person wisely to make sure it's not only a good musician but also a good person," Adams says. "I look for a special person or a special story."

He trusted Ehnstrm with this considerable responsibility. After Ehnstrm, the Finland guitar passed to 19 other songwriters, but one had a particularly profound impact on Adams.

Eva Louhivuori, a member of the Finnish duo Eva & Manu, was the second musician to strum and pluck at the Martin's steel strings. After a week, she sent Adams a five-minute song. Expecting the song to fall flat, due to its length, he listened to it at work.

"I put it on and it was one of the best songs I had ever heard. I literally started crying at work; I had to turn it off," Adams says. "I was so overwhelmed that someone had sent me something so incredible. At that point I knew that this is special."

At the culmination of Project 02, earlier in January, Adams hosted a concert that featured 15 of the 20 musicians. In subzero temperatures, a cold night even by Finnish standards, the show was packed.

"For every song, everyone was completely silent, and there was just a roaring applause after every song," Adams says.

Below: Songwriter Matias Hernesniemi performs at The Acoustic Guitar Project concert in Helsinki

Adams says he has no plans of slowing down. He wants to circulate guitars around the world.

"I'm definitely going to do this in as many cities as I can possibly do," he says.

The original New York City project will go on indefinitely. The Helsinki guitar was retired after 20 musicians. Currently, there is a guitar in Colombia scheduled to circulate until 12 musicians have signed their names. The next guitar is scheduled to be released in Port-au-Prince, Haiti in a few weeks.

On Tuesday, Adams launched a Kickstarter Project. He hopes to raise money to produce a TV pilot based on the project. He envisions a sort of reality show connecting musicians' day-to-day lives with their songwriting processes. For each dollar donated, the project's backers will get one vote toward the city in which the show will be set.

"There's a story behind every musician," Adams says. "That's how this project has been: Get out of the way and let the magic happen."
--------------------------------------------------------------
These women may be best known as TV stars and sirens of the silver screen, but behind the scenes, they're accomplished women in STEM (science, technology, engineering and math).

For Girls in Science, a website where young girls can learn about STEM careers, research and educational opportunities, revealed three Hollywood starlets who have had prominent academic careers and spent time in the spotlight.

Sally Ride, the first American woman in space, Yahoo CEO Marissa Mayer and chemist Marie Curie were some of the more familiar faces on the list of lady inventors, scientists, engineers and mathemeticians. But there were three names that surprised us.

Winnie Cooper of The Wonder Years has a secret: She's something of a math wunderkind. As an undergrad at UCLA, Danica co-authored a physics-based hybrid theorem, which was honored in the British Journal of Physics.

After graduating with summa cum laude honors in mathematics, she went on to star in a variety of TV shows, including The West Wing and How I Met Your Mother. She also became a best-selling author of books that encourage young girls to have confidence and enjoy math. Her non-fiction titles include Math Doesn't Suck, Kiss My Math, Hot X: Algebra Exposed and Girls Get Curves: Geometry Takes Shape.



You probably know Mayim as Blossom or as Amy on The Big Bang Theory, but did you know that this former child star has a doctorate in neuroscience?

As a Ph.D. student at UCLA, Mayim researched obsessive-compulsive disorder in adolescents with Prader-Wili Syndrome, a rare genetic deficiency. During her studies, the actress gave birth to a son, inspiring her to become a certified lactation specialist and author a book on parenting called Beyond the Sling: A Real-Life Guide to Raising Confident, Loving Children the Attachment Parenting Way.

Hedy Lamarr, known for her risqu scenes on camera was considered one of the most beautiful women on film during her time, but she was much more than a great beauty.

The model-turned-movie-star was mathematically inclined, and, along with composer George Anthiel, invented a radio-controlled torpedo intended for use in World War II.

The frequency-changing device served as the foundation for secret communication operations during the 1962 naval blockade against Cuba, and many modern inventors recognize her importance in the development of the technology.

This article originally published at GeekSugar here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Airbnb had an incredible growth year in 2012.

The company put out some year-end numbers on Thursday, including the fact that 4 million people have now used Airbnb to book rooms, 3 million of whom did so in 2012 alone.

Airbnb also revealed that the number of rooms listed on the service more than doubled by the end of 2012, from 120,000 to 300,000. The variety of rooms listed is also improving, with Airbnb pointing out that there are now 500 castles and 200 tree houses listed, among other unusual lodgings.

On the business side, Airbnb launched in nine new markets including Rio, Thailand and Indonesia, and opened up 11 new offices around the world. While it's not mentioned in the report, Airbnb also made multiple acquisitions last year, including Crashpadder, a London-based competitor, and Localmind, a local crowdsourcing platform.

Airbnb did not reveal any revenue numbers for the year, but the company was most recently said to be valued at around $2 billion.
--------------------------------------------------------------
"Zero Dark Knight Thirty" mashes up two intense interrogation scenes  one from Batman flick The Dark Knight Rises and another from Best Picture Oscar nominee Zero Dark Thirty.

The new parody from The Warp Zone, the same comedic group that brought us the Halo 4 spoof last year, enlists Batman to help find the elusive terrorist Osama bin Laden.

3 Kickstarter-Backed Films Earn Oscar Nods SEE ALSO: List of Oscar Nominees

During the interrogation, Lisa Foiles gives her best impression of Oscar-nominated Jessica Chastain, pretty much nailing her "Why so serious?" facial expression in response to Batman's aggressive tactics.

BONUS: Oscar Nominees Star in 'Les Zero Silver Djargo of Southern Pincoln'
--------------------------------------------------------------
BlackBerry 10 might be finding early success in Canada but it won't extend to Japan.

First reported by Japanese newspaper the Nikkei business daily and confirmed by AllThingsD, Blackberry's global roll-out for its new platform and Z10 handset will not include Japan.

In a statement to AllThingsD, BlackBerry said in part:

The company will continue to support existing customer devices.

Although BlackBerry has strong support in parts of Asia  namely Indonesia  the company has struggled in Japan. In June 2012, BlackBerry's smartphone share was reported at under 0.4% according to comScore.

Speaking of Asia  BlackBerry's plans for a China launch are still unclear. We asked about specifics at the launch event last week but were not given a clear answer on carrier or release dates. BlackBerry has not responded to our requests for more information on its Asia strategy moving forward.
--------------------------------------------------------------
We never thought we'd hear Jeopardy! host Alex Trebek utter the lyrics to pop star Carly Rae Jepsen's viral hit "Call Me Maybe," but that's what the 72-year-old did  with much emotion  Wednesday night during an episode of Jeopardy! Teen Tournament.

Trebek so eloquently listed these categories, leaving the contestants visibly entertained:

Jepsen's "Call Me Maybe" is nominated for Song of the Year at the Feb. 10 Grammy Awards, where it will compete against Fun.'s "We Are Young," Ed Sheeran's "The A Team," Kelly Clarkson's "Stronger" and Miguel's "Adorn."

R.I.P. 'Call Me Maybe' SEE: 'Call Me Maybe' is Up for Grammys' Song of the Year

The song came out in Canada in September 2011, gaining little airplay. But then something "so absolutely shocking" happened, as Jepsen's manager Jonathan Simkin previously told Mashable: Social powerhouse Justin Bieber tweeted about it, and followed that with an appearance in a viral lip-dub video. Their efforts rocketed Jepsen into international stardom on the web, as more "Call Me Maybe" love (and mockery) rushed in from Harvard athletes, celebrities, half-naked models, Cookie Monster, musicians and others on YouTube.

The "Call Me Maybe" video has nearly 400 million views, making it one of YouTube's most-watched. The song hit No. 1 on Billboard's Hot 100 songs chart in June. Jepsen capitalized on the viral success of "Call Me Maybe" in September by releasing Kiss, her second studio album, which peaked at No. 6 on the Billboard 200 albums chart.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A cat dressed as a meth cook. You just can't make this stuff up, folks.

George the Kat is apparently a huge Breaking Bad fan, and thought he would don his best Heisenberg outfit for the camera. It's like seeing Bryan Cranston's double.

SEE ALSO: Eyebrow Cat Looks Really Nervous

Just get this Walter White cat some beakers and a highly unstable drug kingpin personality, and you have a star.

BONUS: The 10 Most Awesome Breaking Bad Finds on Pinterest
--------------------------------------------------------------
What good are feature phones anymore? With their lack of bells and whistles and their relative bulk, they're essentially plodding thugs in a world dominated by svelte panes of glass like the iPhone 5 and Galaxy S III. Can older phones do anything that today's smartphones can't do?

This video shows the answer is yes. Stood on end with vibrate mode engaged, two stocky feature phones don't topple when they're called  instead they slowly but surely advance on each other menacingly. Eventually they collide, with mildly violent results.

We think the winner is a Nokia, but it's hard to tell with the low resolution of the YouTube video. Smartphones, be warned: Feature phones may not be able to run all those fancy apps, but they can still shake you up.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Alexander Lervik has designed a lamp that is not only functional, but also very tasty. Inside a large block of chocolate sits an incandescent lightbulb. Once switched on, the bulb begins to warm up and slowly melt away the chocolate lampshade.

After 15 minutes, the chocolate completely melts away and is collected at the base of the lamp. It's now a fondue and is ready to be eaten with fruit for a light dessert.

The designer worked with Saas Instruments to create Lumiere au Chocolat. He describes the project:

The Poetry of Light chocolate lamp, unlike other lamps, is completely dark when you first turn it on, mimicking light spreading along the horizon at sunrise. The heat from the lamp causes the chocolate to begin melting, and it takes several minutes for the first rays of light to penetrate. Holes soon form and as the light grows the chocolate melts. The material and structure of the lamp are the result of pure curiosity. Alexander Lervik wanted to explore the possibility of creating a contrast to light, i.e. dark. The shape of the lamp has been devised based on extensive testing involving the melting process.

The lamp was unveiled this week at the Galleri Kleerup Jacobs torg 3 in Stockholm. Watch the video above to see the lamp melt away into a delicious treat.

This article originally published at PSFK here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Making good on its promise to invest in innovative startups that will help it one day sell more than just hardware, Samsung this week disclosed an investment in Cloudant, which provides cloud-based mobile services.

The investment is an interesting one for Samsung, but even more interesting for throwing light on Cloudants other investors. Which include, as it turns out, In-Q-Tel, the CIA's venture capital fund, headquartered on the 11th floor of a nondescript office building in Arlington, Va.

Lest you start panicking over Cloudants nefarious intentions, take a look at its impeccableand relatively innocuousstartup pedigree: the company was part of the 2008 class of Y Combinator, perhaps Americas most established startup incubator; it raised money from more traditional VC firms such as Avalon ventures; and its business is cloud-based database hosting and managementin other words, its a behind-the-scenes workhorse for web applications that rely on huge sets of data, which describes just about anything a software company might be minded to build these days.

What Cloudants nature says about In-Q-Tel is a bit more telling.

Launched in 1999, In-Q-Tel is in the business of discovering, investing in, and ultimately harnessing technologies that might benefit the American intelligence community. As George Tenet, who headed the CIA between 1997 and 2004, put it:

We decided to use our limited dollars to leverage technology developed elsewhere. In 1999 we chartered  In-Q-Tel.  While we pay the bills, In-Q-Tel is independent of CIA. CIA identifies pressing problems, and In-Q-Tel provides the technology to address them. The In-Q-Tel alliance has put the Agency back at the leading edge of technology  This  collaboration  enabled CIA to take advantage of the technology that Las Vegas uses to identify corrupt card players and apply it to link analysis for terrorists, and to adapt the technology that online booksellers use and convert it to scour millions of pages of documents looking for unexpected results.

In-Q-Tel isn't in the investment game to make a fast buck, but the cutting-edge nature of its investments (which ranged from $500,000 to $2 million per company by 2005) means its ventures sometimes pay off. In 2004, the fund invested in a a satellite mapping software startup called Keyhole. One year later, after Google had bought Keyhole and turned it into Google Earth, In-Q-Tel sold some Google shareswhich it had presumably received for Keyhole  for about $2.2 million (though its unclear how much In-Q-Tel initially invested in Keyhole, or whether those were all the Google shares it held).

In the past few months, In-Q-Tel has also invested in 10gen, another database management software company.

Here is a list of In-Q-Tel's other portfolio holdings. The companies provide services ranging from hi-tech language learning, to printing minuscule solar energy arrayas onto any surface, to cybercrime prevention, to "see-through-walls" microwave imaging.

All in all, its the kind of stuff one would expect the CIA to be interested in. Depending on where you stand, its either terrifying or reassuring to see the American intelligence community keeping its toe in the world of tech entrepreneurship.

This article originally published at Quartz here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Craigslist isn't designed for content discovery. Usually we know what we want  a cheap dining room table, a solid internship, a non-sketchy apartment  and we search for it with tunnel vision.

SEE ALSO: Red Flags for Job Searching on Craigslist

As a result, we can miss a lot that the site offers. Between a special YouTube channel, forums on a variety of topics and even a charitable grant program, there's more on Craigslist than you may have thought.

We put together a list of eight things you probably didn't know you could do on Craigslist in the gallery above. Did you discover some new content you'll use now? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Valentine's Day is always just one text away from heart-crushing devastation. The purveyors of texting fails at Damn You Autocorrect prove that point with 10 hilarious love messages gone awry.

Professing your love through text messages might not be the most sincere way to communicate with your significant other, but it's part of relationships in the techie age. And that sneaky autocorrect feature complicates things even more.

SEE ALSO: 'Damn You Auto Correct' Unveils 11 Funniest Texts of 2012

Take a flip through the gallery above and text with care this Valentine's season.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Mobile smash Doodle Jump has made the jump to the big screen. And we mean really big.

Doodle Jump arcade cabinets have been popping up in a few arcades around the country, notably some locations of Chuck E. Cheese and Dave & Buster's. This is the first one we've been able to see in the wild  it's at developer Lima Sky's PR agency offices in New York City.

The arcade version of Doodle Jump converts the game's tilt controls into a giant sliding joystick so you can navigate the game's main character, affectionately nicknamed The Doodler, between platforms as he hops his way up the screen.

The game features the same cute artwork as the original, which launched on the iPhone in 2009 and then moved to every other mobile platform shortly after. Doodle Jump has been downloaded more than 150 million times as of last summer. The game's creator, Igor Pusenjak, has told Mashable in the past that he's been looking into a lot of licensing opportunities, and this arcade machine only represents one of them.

Check out the photos above to see more of the arcade cabinet. If you've seen one in the wild, let us know where and when in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
There's much anticipation that comes with receiving a package. But sometimes excitement turns to disappointment when you finally get your parcel, only to discover it's been damaged.

Product development firm Cambridge Consultants developed a new method of keeping track of your shipment using a sensor system and app. DropTag uses Bluetooth low energy to connect the sensor to your smartphone, so the condition of your package can be monitored within a 150-foot range.

The app will automatically alert you if the box has been mishandled. The status changes quickly from "well handled" to "dropped," and a live graph plots the parcel's movements. If your deliverer happens to shake the box, a seismograph-like chart can track the activity. Check out the video, above, for more.

"The explosion in Internet shopping has led to a huge increase in the number of parcel deliveries," explains Tom Lawrie-Fussey, Cambridge Consultants' business development manager. " ... Existing parcel condition monitoring systems tend to be quite basic, mechanical sensors  or very expensive data loggers."

The company says the tracking device can be used for both distributors and customers, and its simple construction may make it possible for re-use. Distributors can use DropTag in warehouses to automatically check packages at each stage and ensure quick response time to any incident.

Developers are now working on improving the sensor to provide details on exactly what happened to the package and when, and are looking into potential temperature sensors for the food and pharmaceutical deliveries.

Would you use DropTag? Let us know your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Same quality but cheaper price sounds like a pretty good deal. The problem is, most of the time, it is not feasible. Despite this, Ellie, an online-only women's athletic clothing brand, wants to prove that it can make yoga pants, capris and tops on par with luxury label Lululemon  at half the cost.

The Canadian brand Lululemon has dominated the yoga gear market since it arrived on the scene in 1998, but it is equally known for its high price tag as well as its healthy mantra. This left a gap in the market, says Ellie co-founder Marcus Greinke.

"Lululemon is regarded as the pinnacle but it's also a luxury that many can't afford. That's why we realized there's truly no one in the market at the middle ground of $30 to $70," Greinke says.

Ellie is not your traditional fashion brand. It comes out of incubator company, Science Inc., based in Los Angeles. It uses the same high-quality fabrics (anti-microbial, moisture-wicking) and high tech processes as Lululemon but while Lululemon leggings costs $78, Ellie leggings will only cost you $42.

"We're applying a good bit of tech start-up mentality into a very traditional industry ... Why should you pay $130 or more for workout clothes like yoga pants? A healthy lifestyle should be attainable for everyone, and Ellie wants to make sure you look and feel good whether you begin or end your day with a trip to the gym," Greinke says.

The key is that Ellie is a vertically integrated company, so many aspects of the business that are normally outsourced are done in-house. The brand has its own design team and local manufacturing supply chain, and with no bricks-and-mortar-store, overhead costs are low.

Moreover, it uses social media to its advantage, turning to Facebook users to gather feedback. Since there is a pattern-maker onsite, a prototype can be made within 12 hours and then be shared on the site for fans to comment on.

The most popular styles can then go into production within four days and be made available for mass retail in 2-4 weeks, much quicker than normal. It would take a brand such as Lululemon 8-12 weeks to produce a similar garment. In this unique model, Ellie is building a relationship and having a conversation with their customers that will actually affect the product they make.

The company recently announced a 2 million dollar investment from Trinity Ventures, Rustic Canyon Partners and Blumberg Capital and launched its e-commerce site last week. Time will tell if the model is successful, but Lululemon should be shaking in its $78 luxury leggings.

This article originally published at PSFK here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Whether you're looking to make industry contacts or learn the latest trends in advertising, technology and media, Mashable's Events Board has something for you. We picked four of the latest events to be listed to give you an idea of the possibilities for networking, developing skills and moving your business forward. Check these out, or head over to the full listings to find relevant events in your area or preferred destination.

You can sort listings by when they were added, get discount codes for Mashable readers and maybe even see a YouTube video of a past event so you'll know what to expect. You can also follow our events account on Twitter so you'll catch the best events before they sell out.

Analytics With Purpose: The Human Edge of Big Data

Date: 2/11/2013 - 2/13/2013

Location: San Diego, Calif.

The Human Edge of Big Data will provide two full days of emerging approaches, thought-provoking conversations and meaningful interaction for practitioners and researchers alike. It will focus not only on the purpose of analytics, but also on the human side of data aggregation and analysis. Topics will range from Hands-On Analytics to Behavioral Economics to Making Data Friendly.

Confirmed speakers include: the Director of Advertising from Hyundai, the Global Director & GM Market Research from GE, the Senior Manager of The Coca-Cola Company and many more.

Now in its 4th year, Apps World has grown to be one of the leading global multi-platform events in the mobile industry.

This event is set to be the biggest yet with over 250 exhibitors confirmed and over 7500 attendees including developers, mobile marketers, mobile operators, device manufacturers, platform owners and industry professionals registered for two days of high level insight and discussion. With 10 targeted workshop tracks, speed meeting, one-to-one meetings, parties, and awards the event will be tackling a spectrum of issues across the app ecosystem.

The Corporate Social Media Summit New York

Date: 6/12/13 - 6/13/13

Location: New York, NY

The Corporate Social Media Summit is your one-stop-shop for all the latest social media insight and best practice. It gives you a 360 degree look into building, operationalizing and initiating a successful social media strategy at your company.

Confirmed speakers include: Southwest Airlines, Dell, AT&T, Whole Foods, McDonald's, ESPN, The Hershey's Company, Michael Kors, Caterpillar, FedEx, JetBlue, Wells Fargo, Schneider Electric, PETCO, General Mills, LEGO Group, L'Oreal and many more.

Register with discount code 'Mash20' for 20% off

Big Data TechCon features more than 55 practical how-to classes and workshops for Big Data pros, including database and business analysts, developers, software architects, data scientists, and project managers. Big Data TechCon is the how-to technical conference for professionals implementing Big Data.

Confirmed speakers include: Serge Blazhievsky: Principle Consultant at Think Big Analytics, Eddie Satterly: Big Data Evangelist at Splunk, Jeffrey Breen: Principal of the Think Big Academy at Think Big Analytics, and many more.

Enter MASHABLE to get $150 off current registration fees.

Visit our full list of upcoming conferences and events here.

Want to promote your event on Mashable's Events Board? Submit it here.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Ever been stung by some criticism, then visited Facebook and suddenly felt better about yourself? Turns out we're soothing our bruised egos with the social network all the time, according to a study from the University of Madison-Wisconsin.

Professor Catalina Toma, along with fellow Communication specialist Jeffrey Hancock at Cornell University, conducted a couple of experiments on students to see if Facebook helps improve self-worth. In the first, students were told they were going to be tested on their public speaking skills.

While waiting for unseen evaluators to grade their speeches, they were asked to do one of three things: browse their own Facebook profile, browse a stranger's profile, or write a quick essay. Then they were given feedback on their speeches, which was universally and unfairly negative.

But the students who had browsed their own Facebook profile for a few minutes said they felt better about the harsh feedback. In other words, seeing themselves on Facebook was like an inoculation against criticism.

"Participants who had examined their Facebook profiles for five minutes were more likely to assume responsibility and less likely to blame others when receiving negative feedback," Toma and Hancock write.

"Spending time on Facebook may fulfill important ego needs. By showcasing a version of self that is attractive, successful, and embedded in a network of meaningful relationships, Facebook enhances users perceptions of self-worth."

The pair did a second experiment, again telling the participating students they were practicing public speaking. This time, they were randomly assigned neutral or negative feedback on the speech first  then invited to do one of five activities for extra credit while waiting for feedback, one one of which was browsing Facebook.

Result? The students who'd been criticized "chose to spend time on Facebook at twice the rate of participants who didn't get negative feedback," Toma tells Mashable.

The study suggests that Facebook could be used for all kinds of self-affirmation  such as "decreasing resistance to antismoking messages among young adults." In other words, tell someone to go look at their profile for a few minutes, and they'll be more likely to accept something harsh you have to say to them.

How would you apply this in your life? Do you think the study is on to something? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Look on the bright side, Facebook: you saw a massive spike in traffic Thursday evening. Unfortunately, it was all going to an error page.

Another bright side: the web-wide Facebook redirect crisis  which essentially hijacked users of CNN, the HuffPo, Hulu, Kayak, Mashable, NBC, the Washington Post, Yelp, and every other one of the more than a million websites that lets you use Facebook to login  didn't last longer than oh, 25 minutes.

You helpfully pointed out it was a "short period of time" in a quick, unapologetic statement after the glitch was over. "The issue was quickly resolved, and Login with Facebook is now working as usual," you added. Nothing to see here! Panic over! Go about your business, Internet!

We wouldn't be surprised to see another, later statement with something closer to an apology and an explanation. No doubt everyone is scrambling behind the scenes to figure out exactly what went wrong here. More important is the discussion that needs to happen between the rest of us.

For the citizenry of Internetlandia, this brief earthquake  whether you experienced it personally or not  should be a wake-up call. Yes, it was 25 minutes or less. Yes, all you needed to do to take care of the problem was log out on Facebook. Real earthquakes last for seconds, and people in earthquake zones know the safest places to go when they strike.

But earthquakes also tend to spur a lot of discussion about whether our infrastructure is safe. And rightly so.

The problem here is that so much of our infrastructure is just lousy with Facebook plugins. Plugins to login, plugins to comment, plugins to Like that page on Facebook. And that's fine! I've used all of the above. I love that I rarely have to think about logging in to any site anywhere.

But we'd better start thinking about the monoculture this has created. Because apparently, at least one of those humble Facebook APIs had the ability to take millions of users away from the page they were trying to look at and redirect them to a Facebook page.

This wasn't an outage. It wasn't a denial of service attack, or a virus of any sort. It was something new in the universe. Call it a Facebook Black Hole. Not the kind you fall into when you're checking what high school friends are up to; the kind that has the potential to suck a million websites in.

No wonder many of the first tweets to respond reached for classic sci-fi "rise of the machines" metaphors:

They were kidding, of course. Facebook isn't Skynet. It isn't HAL. It isn't even the evil money-grubbing, privacy-snubbing company that many critics take it for. It's just an increasingly large group of talented engineers who think of themselves as fast-moving hackers and have reached an unprecedented level of users  one billion active users and counting.

Therein likes the problem. Facebook has become pretty much the largest, most-widely used thing on the planet that isn't some sort of public utility. We regulate our air, our water, our electricity, our mail to make sure bad things don't end up in them. We regulate our Internet providers, and are eager to make sure they don't start charging us more for certain kinds of traffic.

But as far as our #1 social network goes, it's pretty much the Wild West. Now there have been attempts, with successful class action lawsuits and the FTC privacy settlement, to rein in the site's excessive experiments. As soon as one potential excess is settled, however, another pops up. This is a company that is openly determined to "move fast and break things," in one of Zuckerberg's favorite phrases. It's acting like the very antithesis of a utility.

SEE ALSO Facebook in 2013: More Growing Pains Ahead

No guardian of the public interest has even started to look into these APIs, the tendrils that reach into every corner of the Internet. The best you can do is block them outright with browser extensions such as Facebook Disconnect.

It would be a shame if such tools were to become widespread. But if Facebook Black Holes occur again, there may be nothing else for it.

I suggested in my Facebook predictions for 2013 that this would be the year the world discovered what sort of service  what rowdy bunch of change-happy hackers  it has invited into its lives. Now it seems that's starting to play out.

The questions remain: will the benefits outweigh the breakages? Will Facebook realize it needs to start acting like a company with a billion users and handle with care? Or will its global power, so effortlessly gained, be wrested away from it by regulators?
--------------------------------------------------------------
For a few minutes this evening, Facebook was redirecting users visiting dozens of websites  including Mashable  to cryptic error pages.

The reaction online was pretty much what you'd expect, with  as the The Next Web noted  hashtags like "Facebookmageddon" and "Facebocalypse" common amongst Twitter users.

So what happened, exactly? There was an issue with the Facebook Connect API that caused users on sites that use that API to redirect users to Facebook error page.

For example, if you were visiting Mashable and logged into our site using your Facebook account (and you were also signed into Facebook), you were automatically redirected to a page that looked like this:

Exiting the page or attempting to re-access the original site would lead to another redirect. Back to this:

Sites such as The Huffington Post, Kayak, Hulu, The Daily Dot, Pinterest and hundreds of others were all impacted. The bug lasted less than 10 minutes.

In a statement, Facebook told Mashable: "For a short period of time, there was a bug that redirected people logging in with Facebook from third party sites. The issue was quickly resolved and Login with Facebook is now working as usual."

The bug may have been brief, but it has highlighted just how many important websites use Facebook Connect for user authentication. Over the span of just a few years, Facebook logins have become so pervasive that they are nearly second nature. It also shows that if Facebook has an issue, it can affect more than just its site  it can also impact the hundreds of thousands (millions?) of sites that integrate with Facebook's APIs.

What's interesting is that a user didn't even need to be performing the action for the error  and hijacking  to occur. Instead, simply being logged into both places (and having the accounts linked) was enough to force users off of a third-party website and onto Facebook's error page.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A massive winter storm is barreling down on the American Northeast, threatening to drop up to two feet of snow in parts of the country. The threat of nasty winter weather has already caused airlines to cancel nearly 1,000 flights as of Thursday afternoon.

How can you tell if your flight has been canceled? Aside from your airline's website, the best online tool is by far and away FlightAware.

FlightAware, which lets users track flights in midair and is home to an active aviation community, has a handy page dedicated to its real-time flight cancellation feature. Using FlightAware's tool, you can sort cancellations by airline, destination airport or arrival airport.

As of this writing, it lists 982 flight cancellations Friday, most of which involve travel in the United States. Saturday's not doing much better, either, with 255 cancellations.

Check out FlightAware's cancellations for Friday and Saturday, then tell us in the comments how you're handling the impending winterocalypse.
--------------------------------------------------------------
GetGlue's iPhone users woke up Thursday to a redesigned app. As with the website redesign of the social entertainment platform in 2012, the changes transform the app from just a check-in service into a personalized viewing guide.

The "Feed" tab shows a stream of friends' activity as well as TV shows' related media content such as images, videos, links and reviews. Known for mailing show-specific stickers to users, GetGlue now allows them to pick exactly which stickers they'll get every month. Meanwhile, users outside of the United States can receive stickers now.

The "Guide" tab, which ditches the traditional grid format of TV guides, appears as a scrolling list prioritized by what's on right now so people can easily see what's trending on TV, streaming and in theaters. GetGlue taps into users' check-in data to personalize the guide for each user. The tab also shows real-time scores and stats.

SEE ALSO: Justin Timberlake Releases Album Art on Image-Tagging Startup Stipple

"You can find new episodes, premieres, finales, movies, games, and major events happening in the coming weeks and months," GetGlue said in a statement, calling the guide a "full entertainment calendar."

Specific show pages let users interact with each other, networks and celebrities. Users can now even chat with Facebook friends who don't use GetGlue via a new "@ to mention" feature. The show pages also house videos, photos and recaps.

In addition to the app redesign, GetGlue on Thursday is touting a new advertising product  Promoted Entries  for brands, networks and studios. Promoted Entries can be a message, photo or video. They will will appear in the Feed and Guide tabs.

Pepsi during the Super Bowl was the first brand to use Promoted Entries, using the feature to promote the 30-second crowdsourced intro video that kicked off the Super Bowl halftime show. GetGlue says 15% of the tweets about Pepsi during the halftime came from GetGlue.
--------------------------------------------------------------
If your special someone is a wannabe astronaut, we found eight gift ideas for this Valentine's Day.

This season, we kept in mind all types of space lovers: NASA fans, Trekkies, Whovians and Mars enthusiasts. You'll also find romantic goodies here at all price points, from a few dollars to $200,000. Hey, a space-lover can dream, right?

SEE ALSO: Star Trek and Star Wars Have Been Hooking Up for Years

So go out and drum up some super-hot, out-of-this-world love this month. But, please, Captain, not in front of the Klingons.
--------------------------------------------------------------
For a geek, nothing says "I love you" like a gadget, so if you're still looking for a Valentine's Day gift for your special someone, we have some gift suggestions for you.

We found 14 techie gift ideas that don't include flowers and chocolate  not that there's anything wrong with the classics.

SEE ALSO: 10 Valentine's Day Cards for Your Geeky Sweetheart

They're just not very techie, that's all. So if you want a gift that's sure to impress, take a look through this gallery. We found everything from headphones and laptop sleeves to NSFW gift boxes and sheets with special technology designed to help you get a better night's sleep.

Let us know what you think. If you've already found a great Valentine's Day gifts for your special techie, please let us know in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Googling a new acquaintance is second nature, whether it's a date or potential employee. A huge disadvantage, however, is having your name automatically associated with arrest, even if you've never had a record.

One study by a Harvard professor says some of Google's ads discriminate, linking "racially associated" names to a possible criminal background. Government and technology professor Latanya Sweeney searched 2,184 full names on Google and Reuters.com, which uses Google AdWords advertisements. She found that "black identifying" names were more likely to show ads suggesting arrest, as compared to "white identifying" names.

Names often given to black babies, like DeShawn, Darnell and Jermaine, suggested criminal ads in 81 to 86% of searches on one site, and up to 95% on the other. Names like Geoffrey, Jill and Emma, typically assigned to white babies, resulted in these types of ads 23 to 29% of the time on one site and 0 to 60% on the other, Sweeney's study says.

Searching "Latonya Evans" resulted in ads saying, "Latonya Evans, Arrested?" while the name Laurie Ryan gave a result of "Background of Laurie Ryan."

InstantCheckmate, the website whose ads dominated studied results, told Sweeney the company gave the same ad text to Google for groups of last names. In response, Google says they don't conduct racial profiling.

"AdWords does not conduct any racial profiling," they said in a statement to ABC News. "We also have a policy which states that we will not allow ads that advocate against an organization, person or group of people. It is up to individual advertisers to decide which keywords they want to choose to trigger their ads."

Sweeney says more research is needed and the study is only a starting point, but suggests possible blame on Google's algorithm and financial interests with advertisers.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A wardrobe advisory CBS emailed to Sunday's attendees of the 55th Grammy Awards has tickled some Twitter users who are mocking the memo, which wants artists to not expose their "buttocks and female breasts" or "puffy bare skin" in the "genital region."

Here's the advisory, which Deadline first posted this week:

Please be sure that buttocks and female breasts are adequately covered. Thong type costumes are problematic. Please avoid exposing bare fleshy under curves of the buttocks and buttock crack. Bare sides or under curvature of the breasts is also problematic. Please avoid sheer see-through clothing that could possibly expose female breast nipples. Please be sure the genital region is adequately covered so that there is no visible puffy bare skin exposure. Please avoid commercial identification of actual brand name products on T-shirts. Foreign language on wardrobe will need to be cleared. OBSCENITY OR PARTIALLY SEEN OBSCENITY ON WARDROBE IS UNACCEPTABLE FOR BROADCAST. This as well, pertains to audience members that appear on camera. Finally, The Network requests that any organized cause visibly spelled out on talents wardrobe be avoided. This would include lapel pins or any other form of accessory.

Singer-songwriter Pink even laughed about the nudity ban with her 13 million followers:

At previous Grammy Awards ceremonies, artists have opted to show more skin than they would, at say, the Academy Awards or Golden Globes. Anyone remember Rihanna's cleavage-exposing dress from 2012?

Some people predict artists will protest CBS's advisory and show up in scandalous attire.

SEE ALSO: If Music Streams Swayed Grammys, These Nominees Would Win

The cast of pop music theater show Totally Tubular Time Machine plans to mock the nudity ban Sunday in New York City by dressing up  sexily  as Katy Perry, Nicki Minaj, J.Lo and Justin Bieber. Actress Concetta Rose Rella, who plays Jennifer Lopez, will wear an outfit similar to this show-stopper from 2000:
--------------------------------------------------------------
Going to the movies is one of the world's favorite pastimes. Thanks to the availability of better and more affordable technology, it's now easier to recreate that theater experience in your own home. But buying a great TV is just half the battle  you need to invest in great audio as well. It's the audio that delivers theater-quality sound that makes you feel like you're in the movie when you're actually on your couch.

Surround sound is great because it offers a more realistic viewing experience. Home audio and theater audio have come a long way in the last century. In the 1930s, movie theaters had just one single large speaker to deliver audio, and it was recorded for movies as a single channel. It would be a while before we broke away from monophonic sound.

The real precursor to surround sound was the introduction of two-channel stereophonic sound, where audio would differentiate depending if it was coming from the left or right channels. All modern headphones and computers can output at least stereo sound, and it's what we generally expect for the base level of television watching these days.

Surround sound is the next step in that evolution. Here our audio isn't just set within two channels, but is presented with a minimum with a five different channels of audio.

To achieve surround sound audio at home, you'll need a piece of technology known as a receiver. All of your devices route their audio into the receiver, including your cable box, DVD player and game consoles. The receiver also connects to the speaker system placed around the room.

To get the full audio effects of multi-channel sound, the receiver amplifies the power of the selected audio source. It then uses the internal decoder to separate the multiple tracks encoded in the movie or show and sends that signal to the correct speakers. These speaker directions are encoded in to the audio signal by those who made the movie or television show.

Getting booming sound that envelopes the viewers requires a lot of speakers, and to make things more complicated, there isn't just one setup possibility out there. You've probably seen numbers next to surround sound designations like 5.1, 6.1, 7.1 or even 10.2. These refer to the number of speakers needed, and their position around the room.

5.1 surround sound is the most common, and the type most receivers support. The 5 represents the five speakers required: the left, center, right, right surround and left surround.

The left and right speakers sit on their respective sides of the television, and project the audio from each side of the screen. These sit next to the center speaker, which is necessary for grounding the audio and plays all the same sounds from the left and right channels. These three speakers play the main audio tracks, like dialogue, from the movie.

The right and left surround speakers are responsible for playing background noises, like cars passing, noise in a restaurant, and other noises that make you fee "surrounded" by the scene, thus making the movie feel more realistic.

The .1 in the name represents the low frequency effects (LFE); it's the deep bass in movies that emanates from the subwoofer, usually also positioned in front of the television.

The variants in surround sound designation represent even more speakers. 6.1 surround sound adds an additional rear-center speaker for more "three dimensional" audio, and 7.1 splits that rear speaker into two channels.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Sean Eldridge (above on the left), husband of Facebook co-founder Chris Hughes, wants to be your Congressman  assuming you live in New York's Hudson Valley region.

Eldridge, a Democrat, filed paperwork which was processed earlier this week setting up a 2014 run for Congress in New York's 19th district, as first reported by Bloomberg.

An investor by trade, Eldridge founded Hudson River Ventures LLC in 2011. He has also worked for same-sex advocacy group Freedom to Marry since 2010, which credits him as being "instrumental" in the organization's success in legalizing gay marriage in New York State.

Eldridge has also made significant financial contributions to several Democratic campaigns.

SEE ALSO: Zuckerberg to Throw Fundraiser for New Jersey's Chris Christie

Running opposite Eldridge will be two-term incumbent Republican Chris Gibson, who won 53% of the vote in 2012 in a district that favored President Barack Obama over Mitt Romney by 52% to 46%.

If Eldridge wins next year, he would become one of the youngest members of Congress at 27 years old.
--------------------------------------------------------------
No one doubted New York City strap-hangers were a rare breed, but Rebecca Davis is proving it.

In a project she calls "New York Underground," Davis Instagrammed the most interesting, most mundane, most affectionate and most fascinating subway riders she witnessed over the course of a year. The narrative is gritty and intimate and shows real New Yorkers in their finest form.

SEE ALSO: Thousands Go Bare in Worldwide No Pants Subway Ride

Davis also created a Tumblr over the duration of the project so you can check out the shots individually.

BONUS: 'We Never Look Up' Is a Beautiful Tribute to the Tech Obsessed
--------------------------------------------------------------
If all goes according to law, Iran will get a new president later this year  and he might be a Redditor.

Hooshang Amirahmadi, a candidate for president of Iran, held a Reddit "Ask Me Anything" Thursday night in which he answered a variety of Redditors' questions.

Amirahmadi was born in Iran, but left for the United States in 1975 amid political turmoil preceding the 1979 Iranian Revolution. He has degrees from the University of Dallas and Cornell University and now works at Rutgers University as a professor and director of the Center for Middle Eastern Studies. He's returned to Iran numerous times and is a leading figure in American-Iranian relations.

In his Reddit AMA, Amirahmadi  who signed up for Reddit specifically for the occasion  argued that he was the candidate of peace and understanding while downplaying concerns his time spent in the United States would make him effectively unelectable:

"The biggest problem for Iran is a lack of trust between the US Iran. I have lived 40 years in the US, I understand both cultures and laungages. I can easily build trust between the two countries. particularly because I have never been part of the problem between the US and Iran. I have tried to be part of the solution for 25 years."

Amirahmadi also took potshots at his competition:

Amirahmadi said his administration would push for free speech, "including social media." That's particularly significant considering Iran's tight grip on the media and social media's role in Iranian anti-government demonstrations in 2009. However, Amirahmadi's commitment to free speech should be weighed against the relative lack of authority held by Iranian presidents compared to that afforded to religious leaders, a situation Amirahmadi acknowledged in his AMA.

Why would an Iranian presidential candidate do an interview on Reddit, a mostly Western website based in the United States? International attention, he said.

SEE ALSO: Iran Further Restricts Facebook and Twitter, Prepares Its Own Internet

Overall, Redditors overwhelmingly responded to Amirahmadi positively, with several responding to his ask for help.

"I'm a photographer from the UK, could I help out if I hypothetically came to Iran (which I'd love to do)? or do you need help within the UK," one Redditor asked, to which Amirahmadi responded with his email address.

"Will you be campaigning in Belgium? I live in Brussels and I work in the film industry working as a videographer and graphic designer. I would love to help out in any way I can, so let me know if you need me. Thank you, and good luck," wrote another.

Iranian President Mahmoud Ahmadinejad's final term ends in August. Amirahmadi's candidacy, which has been gaining increased media attention outside Iran, is something of a long-shot, particularly given Iran's less than stellar record of electoral fairness.

Read Amirahmadi's full Reddit AMA right here. What would you ask an Iranian presidential candidate? Share in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
What do a Massachusetts ice cream parlor, Senegalese street kids, juggling, the Paris Marathon and the crowdfunding site GoFundMe have in common?

Ross is a 27-year-old former Peace Corps volunteer in Senegal who now owns an ice cream store in Gloucester, Mass. He plans to run the Paris Marathon in April while continuously juggling three balls for the entire 26.2-mile course. He's using GoFundMe to attempt to raise $3,000 for a Senegalese organization he's involved with that works to improve conditions for Talibes  boys sent from their homes to study the Koran while often living in shambolic conditions and being forced to spend hours each day begging for change in the streets.

Ross has so far gotten more than $2,200 in donations through GoFundMe and with several weeks to go hopes to exceed his goal of $3,000.

SEE ALSO: For Double-Amputee Marathoner, Social Media a Force for Inspiration

That money will go toward The Association Talibert Senegal, a non-profit organization that helps kids lessen their need to beg to fund their room and board while studying. The organization has already helped fund a budding business in intricately decorated, nylon rice sacks. The bags are a commonplace part of life in Senegal, but the spruced up versions kids make have become a hit at Kiss on the Neck, Ross's seasonal ice cream shop in Massachusetts. They're sold there for money that's then sent back to Senegal.

The juggling marathon money, meanwhile, will help buy mechanical grinding mills to covert millet into the Senegalese equivalent of couscous. The kids' ability to then produce their own food from millet will further lessen their dependency on begging.

Now about the running while juggling  or "joggling," as the more-common-than-you'd-think practice is actually called. Ross ran his first marathon in high school and was co-captain of the juggling club at American University. He first combined the two in college and says "it was love at first sight."

Ross has run multiple marathons and joggled half-marathons, but never actually joggled a full marathon. To prepare, he's currently joggling about 40 miles per week in Senegal while working with Talibert. He'll go to Paris for the marathon then back to Massachusetts to open up shop selling ice cream and rice bags for the summer.

Furthering his work in Senegal, joggling the marathon and continuing to marry his ice cream shop to a longtime social good project promises to be a big moment for Ross.

"I've always wanted to put joggling to some sort of constructive use," he says. "So for many reasons this will be very significant."

You can visit Ross's GoFundMe site here and check out more in this video:
--------------------------------------------------------------
Less than 24 hours after releasing interactive art on image-tagging startup Stipple's website for his forthcoming album, The 20/20 Experience, Justin Timberlake has been appointed as Bud Light Platinum's new creative director.

"Justin Timberlake is one of the greatest creative minds in the entertainment industry, and his insights will help us further define Bud Light Platinum's identity in the lifestyle space," Paul Chibe, VP of Anheuser-Busch's U.S. marketing, said in a statement.

"Partnering with Justin as he makes his return to music brings a new level of relevance and credibility to the brand."

The company says Timberlake will bring "creative, musical and cultural curation for the brand." His first public appearance as the beer brand's creative director will happen Feb. 10, when a 60-second "Platinum Night" ad featuring Timberlake's new "Suit & Tie" song airs during the 55th Grammy Awards. Bud Light Platinum is teaming up with Steve Stoute's advertising agency, Translation, to help Timberlake in his creative director role. Timberlake plans to leverage other musicians in the creative process.

Timberlake has employed unusual methods, particularly his clout in the social media industry, to promote his latest musical endeavors. Just last night, he used a startup he invests in to reveal the album art and track listing for his upcoming album. He previously used Myspace, which he took part ownership stake in in 2011, to promote "Suit & Tie."

SEE ALSO: Watch Justin Timberlake's Spiffy Video for 'Suit & Tie'

Whether Timberlake plans to leverage Myspace or Stipple for Bud Light Platinum is unknown. What is known is that more brands are hiring musicians to bolster their brand identities. Most recently, BlackBerry named Alicia Keys as its global creative director.

BONUS: Watch Every Super Bowl Commercial Right Here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Kai the Hitchhiker hatcheted his way into the heart of the Internet this week. The eccentric home-free nomad found web fame when Fresno's KMPH FOX 26 interviewed Kai after he stepped in  hatchet in hand  to help a save a man and woman.

SEE ALSO: Shrouded in Viral Mystery, Kai the Hitchhiker Gains a Cult Following

Kai has now solidified his place as a viral sensation because YouTube autotune masters, The Gregory Brothers, have given him the remix treatment. The tune, titled "smash, Smash, SMASH!," is one part head-bopping music and two parts life inspiration.

With lyrics like "No matter what you've done, you deserve respect," we can learn a lesson from a drifter with a heart of awesome.
--------------------------------------------------------------
LinkedIn proved once again why it is Wall Street's favorite social media stock.

The company reported revenue of $304 million for the December quarter, a whopping 81% increase from the same quarter the year before and well ahead of Wall Street's consensus estimate for revenue of $278 million.

Much of the revenue growth came from a strong increase in sales of LinkedIn's talent solutions products for recruiters and businesses. Revenue from this segment nearly doubled from the year-ago quarter to $161 million. Revenue from premium subscription products also increased by nearly 80% to just under $60 million for the quarter.

All of this helped LinkedIn to come close to having its first billion-dollar year. The company reported revenue of $972.3 million for 2012, compared to $522 million in 2011.

While other Internet companies like Facebook and Twitter rushed to put revenue-generation strategies in place in 2012, LinkedIn showed steady growth from the business model it already had in place of providing job hunters, recruiters and businesses with premium paid tools.

LinkedIn's stock shot up by as much as 11% in after hours trading following the earnings report.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Got a question for Alexia? Use the chat feature above to get it answered live.

Branded a Moxie Maven by the White House, since winning the Miss Junior America competition Alexia Vernon has been empowering companies, campuses and community organizations to build a new generation of heart-centered, high-impact communicators and ethical leaders. Vernon is the creator of Step Into Your Moxie, a womens empowerment platform that teaches presentation skills, negotiation strategies, conflict resolution and interpersonal communication.

Vernon has shared her advice with CNN, NBC, the Wall Street Journal, FOX Business News, CBS MoneyWatch, Mint.com, CareerBuilder.com, Monster.com and Forbes. She is the author of 90 Days 90 Ways: Onboard Young Professionals to Peak Performance and Awaken Your CAREERpreneour: A Holistic Road Map to Climb from Your Calling to Your Career.

When not helping people and companies shift obstacles into opportunities, Vernon stays active in the sexual abuse prevention and rehabilitation movement, lets go through yoga and meditation and drinks a lot of green juice. You can learn more about Vernon and receive her 7 Biggest Obstacles to Success and the Sinfully Simple Formula to Shift Them Into Opportunities at AlexiaVernon.com and connect on Twitter @AlexiaVernon.

#StartupLab is a free virtual mentorship program created by The Young Entrepreneur Council (YEC), an invite-only organization comprised of hundreds of Americas most successful young entrepreneurs. #StartupLab takes YEC's mission to help more people start successful businesses to the next level by offering millions of entrepreneurs direct access to YEC members through interactive video chats, email lessons and a library of how-to articles, videos and eBooks. Whether you're just starting up, a current business owner, or you run an organization that supports entrepreneurs, sign up for #StartupLab today for real-world advice from some of the coolest entrepreneurs on the planet.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Logitech CEO and President Bracken Darrell is remarkably upbeat and open for a guy who only a few weeks ago delivered some pretty bad news to investors. The 30-plus-year-old peripheral companys sales* took a 14% haircut, year-over-year, and Darrell announced Logitech would look to divest its once industry-leading Harmony remote control business.

Since the announcement, Darrell has been on a goodwill tour of sorts  visiting media outlets to tell the Logitech story and assure us all that it has a bright future ahead of it.

When the former Whirlpool executive and newly-minted CEO sat down with Mashable this week, he was open and entertaining. Explaining that the Logitechs harmony remotes were "fantastic" products, but other sectors are more profitable and the Logitech could no longer justify the investment.

Instead, the company is focusing on expanding its mobile peripheral portfolio and looking to leverage whatever growth can be found in the somewhat flat PC business. Darrell acknowledged that hes taking over during a bit of a market trough for that sector, but points noted that there are "more computing devices sold year-over-year than there have ever been."

Of course, many of those devices are mobile: "We're moving from being a PC peripherals company to a PCs and mobility company. That's the change we're making right now."

There are opportunities, said Darrell, in the PC space. He pointed to growth in the PC gaming, unified communications and Windows 8, even though the latter still represents a very small percentage of the PC universe.

To wit, the company is introducing a new Windows 8 touch pad. The glass-topped, $79 device is ostensibly, a perfect fit for anyone upgrading an existing computer to the touch-friendly Windows 8.

Darrell also promised that Logitechs product development cycles would get shorter and noted the three month turnaround time on the companys new Ultrathin Keyboard mini for the iPad mini.

The new CEO is a compelling figure who deftly addressed the Google TV fiasco, a product partnership with Google that, according to previous CEO and current Chairman Guerrino De Luca, cost the company dearly.

Darrell called Google TV a very good idea that was a little premature for us.

"We're a lot better for things that look like a computer, a smartphone, a tablet, and of course a notebook, an ultra-book, a PC," said Darrell.

Will Logitech do TV again? Maybe. When we asked if Logitech would make peripherals for the highly anticipated, though still-only-rumor, Apple TV, Darrell said they will always look at all product opportunities from major manufacturers.

"We view ourselves as the quiet partner," he says, "just trying to make the experience that they're creating even better. If they come out with Apple TV, we'll certainly look at what we can do there."

Otherwise, Darrell was pretty tight-lipped about the product pipeline. He did say this: "We have a stream of innovation that will keep coming."

There's more detail and a personal surprise from Darrell in the video interview above. Watch and then tell us in the comments below how your rate Logitechs chances for a turnaround.

*[Editor's Note: An earlier version of this post mischaracterized Logitech's business performance. Logitech's sales dropped 14%, not revenues. We regret the error.]
--------------------------------------------------------------
Mailbox, the much-hyped email app that has been in limited beta since late last year, finally hit Apple's App Store on Thursday, but don't expect to be able to use it on your iPhone just yet.

Rather than let everyone download the app at the same time, the company is taking the unusual step of rolling it out gradually to users on a first-come-first-serve basis. Last month, Mailbox introduced an online reservation system to let users sign up to try the app; starting today, that reservation system is being phased out and the only way to reserve a spot is by downloading the app onto your phone.

After you download the app, you'll see an option to reserve an invite and another option to view your place in line. When it's your turn, the app will send you a push notification to unlock all the features. Until then, the app's only real feature will be showing you a real-time view of the line, including the number of people in front of you and behind you.

The app was created by Orchestra  the startup behind the popular to-do list app of the same name  and has attracted plenty of attention thanks to a set of novel features, including the option to schedule incoming emails to be resent later when you have time to read them. The goal is to help users get their inbox to zero and keep it that way.

SEE ALSO: Is Mailbox the Best Email App for iPhone Yet?

The reason for the staggered rollout is that the company is trying to ensure there are no server issues from thousands of people downloading and using the app all at once. Even before the app was released in the App Store, more than 250,000 people had signed off for a reservation to download it. Gentry Underwood, the CEO of Orchestra, told Mashable that the app's line-tracking feature is designed to ensure as much "transparency" in this process as possible while the app rolls out.

The Mailbox team won't say exactly how long users will have to wait to get the full app experience, but suffice it to say that if you are just reserving a spot in line now, it will probably be a little while. On the bright side, the app is currently free and according to Mailbox, the goal is to keep it free forever, though the company may add premium features down the road.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Matt Damon will guest star on Sunday's episode of dramedy House of Lies, Showtime has announced. The network reported the news via Twitter on Wednesday:

In the video teaser of his cameo (above), Damon sits down for a meeting with the show's main characters  Marty Kaan (Don Cheadle), Jeannie van der Hooven (Kristen Bell) and Clyde Oberholt (Ben Schwartz)  and talks about his love of swag, interoffice affairs and, as the kicker, "f***ing George Clooney" (his words, not ours.)

SEE ALSO: Watch Joe Biden's Charming 'Parks and Recreation' Cameo

This isn't Damon's first cameo. For years, he's had a "feud" with TV host Jimmy Kimmel  including a recent kidnapping video. In 2011, he starred in an ESPN video about Green Bay Packers coach Mike McCarthy as his former high school classmate. And, as Mashable reader Mike C. points out, Damon's various cameos in season 6 of Entourage are among his funniest.

House of Lies, which focuses on a team of management consultants based in Los Angeles, premiered in January 2012 and is based off the book House of Lies: How Management Consultants Steal Your Watch and Then Tell You the Time. The series is in its second season.

Cheadle won Best Actor in a TV Series at this year's Golden Globes for his portrayal of Kaan.

The episode featuring Damon will air on Sunday, Feb. 10 at 10 p.m. on Showtime.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Tumblr-famous Menswear Dog sauntered his way to the Mashable offices on Wednesday for what started as a typical fashion dish on skinny ties and cardigans.

After swigging a few glasses of whisky, the interview plunged into the type of debauchery typically reserved for Air Bud shindigs. Not that we're complaining about Menswear Dog's antics  we managed to snap the first, world exclusive naked photos of the stylish Shiba Inu.

Let's just do this whole thing TMZ-style for full effect:

Menswear Dog's rep is on Lindsay Lohan-style damage control after the typically dapper doggie was caught naked outside the Chateau Marmont. Sources tell MSH that the Internet sensation may spend up to 30 days at Promises for "exhaustion" and "dehydration" treatment.

Don't worry, Menswear Dog fans  before the naked romp, Mashable got the chance to glean a bit of fashion advice from the web's most stylish pooch. So stay tuned and get ready to take notes, dudes.
--------------------------------------------------------------
At a recent NBA game between the Houston Rockets and Los Angeles Clippers, Clippers star Blake Griffin's hand  inadvertently or not  made contact with the crotchal area of Rockets forward Chandler Parsons.

That prompted Parsons to tweet the video above  damning evidence  at Griffin and the sports blog Deadspin, sparking perhaps the greatest Twitter exchange in the NBA's long and storied history of great Twitter exchanges.

Looks like the beef has been squashed, so to speak.

Is this a productive use of Twitter? Give us your take in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Nothing like some good schadenfreude on Thursday morning, ain't that right sports fans?

Well then how about this video in which an NBA player airballs three shots in 40 seconds during a Wednesday night game. Our (anti-)hero here is Mirza Teletovic. He's 6-foot-9, 255 pounds, 27 years old and in his first NBA season playing for the Brooklyn Nets. Maybe he'll go on to be a fine player one day. Maybe he won't. Either way, he's never living this down.

He is, however, making $3 million this season. So the joke is, in fact, on us. But still we laugh.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Forget SpongeBob or Darth Vader. The coolest lunchbox we've ever seen is made out of a classic Nintendo Entertainment System.

Redditor Stanstanlol posted this heavily modified console to r/pics Thursday morning, saying it was a project he'd worked on the night before.

He told Mashable he'd found the non-working console for sale for $10. Since it was too badly damaged to ever play games again, Stanstanlol tried to come up with other uses for a busted NES.

"I had a friend years ago who used his Nintendo as a hiding spot from his parents. I didn't need a plastic safe, so my wife and I bounced ideas around," he said. "Turns out the lunchbox HAS been done before, but we thought we stumbled on something unique. I guess almost nothing is unique after the system has been out for about a quarter century."

Stanstanlol's wife is just as crafty; he posted pictures in the thread of a lamp she's created out of an NES Zapper light gun. For his next project, he says he's trying to decide what to do with a Nintendo 64 console with similar hardware damage.

Check out the photos above of this awesome conversion.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Ubisoft could release its next Assassin's Creed title as early as the end of the year, according to comments by the company's CEO during the quarterly earnings call.

The series, which follows different incarnations of one hero throughout time, has featured several different historical settings, including most recently the Revolutionary War. Ubisoft CEO Yves Guillemot confirmed the new game would feature a new hero and a new setting.

Assassin's Creed has become one of Ubisoft's most prolific franchises. This new, untitled game would be the fifth released in a five- to six-year span. Guillemot said the game would come out some time in the 2014 fiscal year, which could come at the end of the 2013 calendar year.

Ubisoft has also seen a lot of profit from the franchise. Assassin's Creed III shipped 12 million units before the end of 2012, according to Joystiq.

With new Sony and Microsoft consoles almost guaranteed to launch this year, it's a good assumption that the next game could appear on those.

What setting would you like to see in the next Assassin's Creed game? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The New York Times continued to grow its digital subscriber base in the fourth quarter, helping to slow the rate of decline for ad revenue, though it still has a long way to go.

The Times reported having 668,000 paid digital subscribers for the International Herald Tribune, Boston Globe and the flagship paper by the end of the December quarter, up from 592,000 at the end of the previous quarter. The vast majority of that increase came from the Times and IHT, which grew its digital subscriber base from 566,000 in the September quarter to 640,000 in the December quarter.

Advertising revenue declined by 8.3% from the same quarter a year ago (if you exclude the extra week covered in this quarter's earnings). That's certainly far from ideal, but it represented an improvement from the previous quarter when ad revenue declined 8.9% year-over-year. Print continues to lead the ad revenue declines, shrinking by about 10% from the year-ago quarter while digital ad revenues declined by about 1.7%

The company's new president and CEO Mark Thompson noted in a statement that "the advertising environment remained challenging in the fourth quarter," but touted the continued growth in subscribers as a positive sign for the future.

"The demonstrated willingness of users here and around the world to pay for the high quality journalism for which The New York Times and the Company's other titles are renowned will be a key building block in the strategy for growth, which we are currently developing and which I will have much more to say about later in the year," Thompson said.

The company's overall revenue for the quarter was $575.8 million, an increase of more than 5% from the same period a year ago and better than Wall Street's consensus estimate of $570.4 million, though that was primarily due to the extra week in the quarter. Without the extra week, overall revenue was actually down by 0.7% from the previous year. Meanwhile, profits shot up by about 200% thanks to the company's decision to sell off its stake in Indeed.com and offload About.com.

The New York Times Company's stock shot up by more than 15% in early trading Thursday following the earnings report.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Kaitlyn Collins is a former NFL cheerleader for the Green Bay Packers, but apparently that's not good enough for some people  namely, trolling fans of the rival Chicago Bears.

On Monday, the "Chicago Bears Fan" Facebook Page, which has more than 80,000 likes, uploaded the photo above with a caption reading: "Like if You Agree The Packers Have The Worst Cheerleaders In The NFL!"

The post has since been liked more than 3,400 times. It's received more than 1,400 comments. Many of those comments denigrate Collins' looks and make fun of her with ugly language. But more recently, the tenor has changed  Facebook users have lashed back against the preposterous post, attacking the poster and demanding it be taken down.

That change is due largely to a video Collins posted to YouTube on Wednesday. In the video she relates what happened in a powerful way  by silently holding up a series of written messages. She quotes hateful comments as well as supportive ones, and says she's thankful to have family and friends who tell her she's beautiful every day. But, she writes, "What about the people who dont' have that at home? What will happen when something like that happens to them?"

"STOP!!! Cyber-bullying and bullying in any form!!!" she writes. Here's the entire video:

Collins also writes that she's asked Facebook to take the post down, but that the company "has found it does not qualify as bullying under their standards."

Do you think the post should be taken down? Is this a good way to deal with cyberbullying? Give us your take in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The New York Civil Liberties Union released the iPhone version of its Stop and Frisk Watch app on Thursday, putting the police encounter documentation tool in the hands of thousands of additional New Yorkers.

Stop and Frisk Watch [iTunes link] is a mobile application designed to help citizens document police abuse stemming from the New York Police Department's controversial criminal prevention program commonly referred to as "stop and frisk." Users can record video, audio and geolocation data whenever they witness a police stop and the information is automatically sent to the NYCLU. The app also has a "listen" function which, when enabled, and using GPS data, alerts the user whenever somebody else is using Stop and Frisk Watch in the vicinity.

Seven months after its release, the Android version of the app has been downloaded more than 20,000 times. The organization has received more than 5,000 videos, as well as 1,000 written reports, "including documentation of police officers being verbally abusive during street stops, of officers drawing weapons during street stops, and one incident in which an officer used the floodlights of his car to prevent a bystander from recording video of a stop-and-frisk," according to a press release.

However, many of the videos sent in aren't relevant to the NYCLU's work  of those 5,000 submissions, only 200 document police incidents.

"Most of our submissions were of people just trying the app out  or in the case of the police officers in the video, flipping us off  which created a lot of needless video review for our attorneys," Jennifer Carnig, the Director of Communications of the NYCLU said in an email to Mashable.

Being able to offer the app for iOS users allows the campaign to have a wider reach. "Its important that its available for iPhone because that means that even more New Yorkers will have an easy, free way to hold the NYPD accountable,  a tool they can have in their pockets at all times," Carnig wrote.

The so-called stop and frisk program allows police officers in New York to stop and search people if they deem them suspicious. The program was started to give police a better tool to prevent crime, especially in high-risk locations. Civil rights organizations, however, have criticized it, saying it leads to racial profiling and illegal searches. According to an NYPD report [PDF Link] released on Monday, 9 out of 10 people searched in 2012 were minorities.

SEE ALSO: NYPD Radiation Scanners Identify Concealed Guns From Afar

When the civil rights organization released the Android app, it promised to publish the iPhone version by July 2012. Seven months later, the app is ready. Carnig said that the delay was caused by two things. "First, the iPhone is just not as flexible of a platform as Android so we had to make adjustments to the actual functionality of the app (no outside trigger button, for example)," she wrote.

The second reason was the Apple app review process, which, according to her, was "slow and opaque." The first time the NYCLU applied to have the app in the App Store, Apple rejected it because it didn't make a sound when it started recording. "So we were forced to add a quiet ding. I dont think it hurts the app, but clearly its not something we wanted and it required further development, Carnig said.

When a user records a video, he is asked to add circumstantial information to the report, like the location of the incident, the age and ethnicity of the person stopped, and how the officers behaved (whether they used force or whether they identified themselves.)

Stop and Frisk Watch has been criticized by police authorities. Paul J. Browne, the NYPD chief spokesman told The New York Times that providing information on where police is conducting searches could help criminals, and, according to him, the app might also raise privacy issues.

Mashable reached out to the NYPD for comment about the Stop and Frisk app. Paul J. Browne, the Deputy Commissioner of the NYPD responded: "Finally, a bonus for perps who steal iPhones; an app that tells them how to avoid police."
--------------------------------------------------------------
The OUYA game console will get a yearly hardware update and re-release, according comments the company's founder and CEO made to The Verge this week.

"Our plan is to have a yearly refresh of OUYA where we leverage the best-performing chips and take advantage of falling component prices to create the best experience we can at the $99 price point," Julie Uhrman told The Verge.

The OUYA is already significant for being a game console launched on Kickstarter; it raised $8.5 million during its 30-day backing period. Although the only people who have received their consoles are developers who put in extra cash to get it early, Uhrman's promise signifies the company is looking ahead.

The console is powered by a NVIDIA Tegra 3 processor, one of the fastest available for mobile hardware. It's the same processor available in the Nexus 10 tablet. But with the launch of the Tegra 4 at CES last month, mobile hardware will be advancing quickly enough that the OUYA cannot rest on its laurels. Anyone who owns a first generation iPad knows how quickly mobile hardware can be left behind by developers due to being underpowered.

And while Uhrman has been quoted in the past as not wanting to compete with big companies such as Sony, Microsoft and Nintendo in the console wars, having a console with yearly hardware updates would add something interesting to the tv-gaming playing field. There hasn't been a big console refresh in nearly eight years for Sony or Microsoft, and while both companies' rumored next-gen consoles could graphically squash anything the OUYA could output now, what will that be like in three years when we have much faster mobile processors?

But before we put the cart before the horse, OUYA's Kickstarter backers have to receive the 40,000 consoles they ordered in March. OUYA has also been taking preorders from its site for consoles that will be shipped in April, and Amazon has launched a pre-order page for consoles that will begin arriving in June, according to the company.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A nasty little parody video that Pepsi lobbed at Coke just before the Super Bowl helped it log more Super Bowl video views than its rival.

Pepsi tallied up the numbers and found it got more than 500,000 total views than Coke, according Shiv Singh, global head of digital for Pepsi. The figures are tallied below:

A decisive factor was "Behind the Scenes at #CokeChase," a video that Pepsi created with Funny Or Die and released Sunday morning before the game. The video, shown below, featured the putative cast of Coke's Super Bowl spot  actors dressed as cowboys, showgirls and Mad Max types  trying to get Pepsi Nexts out of a broken vending machine. When someone points out that a Coke machine is working, the actors think a second and then decide to keep trying the Pepsi machine.

Coke's Super Bowl spot, which featured the three teams trying to get a Coke in the desert, got mixed results though the ad itself got more views than Coke's 2012 "Polar Bears" Super Bowl spot.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Sometimes all we want is to disappear into our surroundings. This Hungarian photographer is making that happen.

In his "Transform" project, Bence Bakonyi turns casual clothes-wearing people into art, seamlessly blending them into their backgrounds.

SEE ALSO: 10 Mind-Bending Photos of Opposites From Mashable Readers

The illusion is simple, yet stunning, and the floating heads are nothing short of mind-bending.
--------------------------------------------------------------
On Twitter, 14 seconds can be a lifetime. It can even be long enough to get someone fired.

Thats how long a lewd tweet from Idaho Rep. Raul Labradors account lasted before being taken down. Unfortunately for the guy who reportedly tweeted it, longtime spokesman Phil Hardy, it was out there long enough for him to lose his job, according to The Idaho Statesman.

Hardy sent the tweet during a Super Bowl promotion for the show Two Broke Girls, in which the title characters wore skimpy outfits and pole-danced (see the video below).

While it is unknown whether Hardy did this intentionally, for those familiar with managing multiple Twitter accounts on Tweetdeck, this is a mistake of nightmares. It's all-too easy to confuse your organization's account with your personal one.

And while the tweet was quickly removed, nothing gets past the watchful eye of the Sunlight Foundation. Their Politwoops site, a project to catch messaging changes from U.S. politicians, posted the comment, saying, For Rep. Ral R. Labrador, the most memorable moment seemed to come during an ad for CBS's 2 Broke Girls involving a stripper pole, clothes being ripped off, and a cherry being seductively consumed.

Hardy worked as a regional director and spokesman for Labrador, jobs he also held in the 2010 campaign. Labrador is a go-to Republican to talk about immigration reform, raising the question: How might the representative handle his influx of calls without his usual spokesman?

This article originally published at National Journal here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Redbox Instant  the streaming service from Redbox and Verizon  is now available on the Xbox 360.

If you're a Redbox Instant user, look for an email with a link to a claim code. Redeem the code on your Xbox 360 and the Redbox Instant app will download to your dashboard.

The app lets users access Redbox subscription (streaming) films and also search for films to reserve for pickup at a Redbox kiosk.

In my tests, the video quality for the film I watched (the so-bad-it's-almost-good Stuart Saves His Family) was on par with the same film viewed via Netflix on the Xbox 360.

The layout of the app is similar to other Xbox video apps  most notably Amazon Instant Video.

Redbox Instant opened up its beta in December with a small selection of streaming titles and an app for iOS and Android. I gained access to the service at the beginning of January and have had the last few weeks to evaluate the offering.

In the first weeks that the service was available, there were less than 200 movies to stream. That number is now over 2,000, though Netflix or Amazon Prime users will be hard pressed to find studio content not already available on those services.

For instance, the bulk of Redbox's newer content comes from its deal with pay cabler Epix. Epix has had a deal with Netflix since 2010 and signed on with Amazon in September 2012.

The best way to describe Redbox Instant's selection is as a cross between the bargain DVD bin at a Blockbuster Video circa 2000 and the daytime programming on HBO and Cinemax during the mid 1990s.

That means lots of hits from the 1980s and 1990s  including comedies such as Roxanne and Back to School  interspersed with forgettable flicks such as Swordfish, Idle Hands and Romeo Must Die.

There are some gems in the collection  Lars and the Real Girl, Winter's Bone and The Conspirator, but those are few and far between. Instead, much of the catalogue consists of straight-to-video films, B-movies, documentaries of musicians and some truly terrible films (She Devil, the aforementioned Stuart Saves His Family, Catwoman).

For now, the biggest reason to try out Redbox Instant would be for those who find themselves renting from the kiosk a few times a month. Included in the $8 subscription are four kiosk credits. For $1 more a month, users can upgrade to Blu-ray.

The nice part of the Redbox app for iOS and Android  as well as on the Xbox 360  is that users can browse both category selections. That way, if I want to pick up John Carter on Blu-ray, I can do it at the same time I cue up Justin Bieber's Never Say Never to stream instantly. I'll end up cutting myself in order to get through either film, the point is I can control this torture from one interface.

Redbox Instant has a long way to go before it can compete with the likes of Netflix and Amazon. Still, I'm not willing to write the service off just yet. After all, when Amazon Prime Instant Video launched two years ago, the title selection was limited. If Redbox and Verizon are serious about competing for streaming eyeballs, the title selection will improve over time.

For those who are interested  the first month of Redbox Instant is free to try out and it includes four Redbox kiosk rentals.

I'll keep checking in with Redbox Instant to see how its catalogue evolves.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Apple's iPhone has jumped +2% to 36.3% of the U.S. smartphone market share in December 2012, comScore's latest data suggests.

In that same period, Google's Android rose +0.9% to 53.4%, retaining its first place by a large margin, while BlackBerry and Microsoft's Windows Phone lost a good chunk of their market share: -2% and -0.7%, respectively.

Symbian's market share has stayed the same in December: 0.6%.

On the manufacturer front, Apple did well, jumping +2% to 36.3%, as did Samsung, with an even bigger gain: +2.3% to 21%.

HTC and Motorola both lost market share (-1.8% and -0.7%, respectively), while LG posted a modest gain: +0.5% to 7.1%.

If you're wondering why Apple is doing so well (in January, Samsung had a sizeable lead over Apple), it's because comScore has switched to measuring smartphones only, so all the above figures relate to those devices.

With smartphones having a 54% mobile market penetration in the U.S. in December 2012 (up 5% since September 2012), it's an understandable move, but having an insight into the overall mobile market share would be interesting as well.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Two days after we found out that the long lost bones of Richard III were found in a parking lot, 528 years after his death, we can now 'meet' him. Or, more precisely, we can take a look at a 3D-printed reproduction of his face.

The project, funded by the Richard III Society, was led by Caroline Wilkinson, Professor of Craniofacial Identification at the University of Dundee. She used 3D scanning and printing, with a technique called stereolithography, to reconstruct Richard III's head, based on his actual remains. An artist, guided by Wilkinson, then painted the colorless head and added glass eyes, a wig, a hat and the appropriate clothes.

"It was a great privilege for us all in the Dundee team to work on this important investigation," said Professor Wilkinson. "It has been enormously exciting to rebuild and visualize the face that could be Richard III, and this depiction may allow us to see the King in a different light."

SEE ALSO: The High-Tech Miracle That Found King Richard III

Richard III has always been one of the most mysterious and vilified kings in British history. The eponymous Shakespeare play attributed many crimes to the monarch, including having his two young nephews killed to secure his spot on the throne. Historically, he's always been portrayed as a malformed, hideous person.

This 3D-printed replica of his face seems to contradict at least the claims about his appearance. "It's an interesting face, younger and fuller than we have been used to seeing, less careworn, and with the hint of a smile," said Phil Stone, chairman of the Richard III Society, which has worked on the archaeological search for his remains, and has always refuted Shakespeare's version of history.

The reconstruction will eventually be placed at the visitor center, adjacent to the parking lot where his skull was found, that the city of Leicester is planning to build to tell the story of Richard III.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Like Yellowstone Park, Macchu Pichu, the Vatican, Timbuktu and the Taj Mahal, Moscows Red Square is a UNESCO World Heritage Site.

Best visited in winter with snow on the ground and a furry hat on the head, the area is guarded by the startling onion dome of St. Basils Cathedral. It is an extraordinary place to experience, not only for its stark beauty, but because of its history and the events it has overseen.

More than two decades ago, it wasnt easy for a Westerner to visit the site. The Cold War was still raging, if dying, and applying for a visa to Russia meant endless bureaucracy and red tape. Visitors who did manage to procure visas had to be accompanied by an escort, shepherded to strategic places of the state's choosing.

When the Soviet Union was dissolved in 1991, Russia experienced turmoil as the country struggled to find its feet in a capitalist world. Widely viewed as a dangerous place to live and an even more perilous place to do business, it was infested with corruption, and gangsterism was the norm.

SEE ALSO: London: The Hottest Tech Scene Since Silicon Valley?

Previously housing many corrupt and dangerous regions, the country began investing heavily in creating a tech cluster in Moscow that supports local entrepreneurs and attracts foreign investment.

Fast-forward to 2013; Russian business and lifestyle are changing at a pell-mell pace. In addition to the 13% flat tax rate, people look forward to the upcoming 2014 Winter Olympics in Sochi and the 2018 World Cup in Russia.

Something is stirring on the wasteland 20 miles from Red Square: a plan that Russia hopes will further transform the image of its country.

Under the aegis of the Skolkovo Foundation, the city is welcoming a huge business park that will house more than 1,000 homespun Russian startups, as well as R&D departments at the worlds biggest brands, including Samsung, Intel, Cisco and Siemens. Last year Mark Zuckerberg visited the Skolkovo innovation hub, exploring the idea of a potential Facebook R&D facility there.

Founded in 2010, the Skolkovo Foundation is not only setting up the business park, a project it describes as "the biggest R&D project in the world," but it's also supporting plans for patents and IP to be handed back to the Russian creators and inventors who make them.

Presently innovation is stymied by the state, which employs would-be inventors and owns all subsequent IP and patents. But legislation expected become law in 2013 will transform the entrepreneurial sector by granting IP to those inventors.

Despite its moves in patent rights, Russia still lags in education. And entrepreneurs need to be educated in the first place. Out of the world's top 200 universities, not a single one is Russian, but the creation of the Skolkovo university in the park, in a partnership with MIT in Boston, is helping the country catch up.

Conor Lenihan is the VP of external economic relations for Skolkovo and previously served in several government ministries in Ireland, most recently as a minister for science, technology and innovation until March, 2011. He is an example of the global talent that Skolkovo is attracting to Moscow.

We are building something that will last for generations," Lenihan tells Mashable. "We are creating a VC-friendly environment that positions Moscow as the place for foreign companies to invest, and a legacy for Russian kids so they become entrepreneurs and stay in Russia, not seek their fortune elsewhere."

But its not just about companies in Skolkovo and Moscow. VisibleNation is an Anglo-Russian startup based in London and St. Petersberg that recently launched the worlds first "free social data comparison platform" after nine months in development.

The company has achieved seed investment of $500,000 from investors in the UK and Russia to create a site that will attempt to challenge and change the way people look at themselves, the world and their lifestyle decisions.

It uses a programming and design team in St. Petersburg, while one of the founders and the CTO are based in the UK, and the CFO is from the U.S. and graduated from MIT.

London is an excellent place to start a business in this space but it is expensive, so we chose a hybrid. We would have lower cost operations in Russia and business development in the UK," says Nikolai Puntikov, CEO of VisibleNation.

Russia has great intellectual talent, especially in software design and programming, but not the entrepreneurial mindsets of the West," he adds. "Russia has money and software skills; the UK has market experience and no money. Good alignment, I would say!

Back over at Skolkovo, one of its backed companies, 3D visualization company Vizerra, has developed Revizto, a software platform that allows users to create and view interactive 3D worlds. It helps architects, engineers and planners collaborate in city planning, industrial product design and virtual tourism industries.

Its clients include the City Planning Committee in Barcelona, Spain, the Organizing Committee of the XXII Olympic Winter Games and the XI Paralympic Winter Games of 2014 in the City of Sochi. Its CEO, Arman Gukaysan, is realistic about the unique challenges of doing business in Russia.

To create a startup in Russia is a great challenge," says Gukaysan. "It may sound ridiculous, but now the system integrators monopolize the market, so small business has no chances to get into the game, even if they want to.

So it is very hard to live and survive on such market. There is also a great gap in the mentality of new generation who grew up in a global world and the generation that is in charge of the government. But in the near future Im confident we will see dramatic changes in the Russian startup arena, he says.

Vizerra has also created extraordinary 3D models of some of the previously mentioned UNESCO World Heritage sites, such as Macchu Picchu, the Taj Mahal and Red Square.

The Skolkovo Foundation is not yet as famous as Red Square, but the work it's accomplishing may be as revolutionary as anything in this extraordinary country's history.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Amid the hubbub over CBS's hilariously ridiculed nudity ban for the Grammys, the Oscars is getting a little dirty with a new promo in which host Seth MacFarlane enters the Matrix and asks a thoughtful question about his penis.

List of Oscar Nominees SEE ALSO: Want to Hold an Oscar Statuette? Here's How

The promo is one in a series of YouTube videos (see all of them below) featuring MacFarlane, a two-time Emmy-award winner for his Family Guy series.

Producers of the 85th Academy Awards on Feb. 24 used a YouTube video to announce MacFarlane as host in October. That initial video showed MacFarlane telling his father the Oscar news.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It's a case of clever sports memery meets how not to manage your brand's online reputation.

A 28-year-old soccer fan has turned michelinguides.com into something completely different from the Michelin Guides recommendations books  and the company is none too happy.

The story starts with Englishman Adam Mascall, who saw the domain was available and bought it for just $9, according to a recent Sun report. But his site, unlike the famous French guidebooks, isn't anything about restaurant recommendations or where to find the best flamb.

Mascall's take is "Michel in Guides," referencing Michel Platini, a former French soccer star and current head of the Union of European Football Associations. It superimposes Platini's face into a series of situations involving guides  you know, like survival guides, travel guides and "Girl Guides," a Girl Scouts-like organization. Here are a few examples:

The Michelin Guide brand is pretty ticked off, however. It sent Mascall a legal warning, and a spokesperson to the Sun that While we appreciate the amusing nature of the website, we have to do everything possible to protect the Michelin brand.

Mascall told Mashable he couldn't talk about the legal issues, did have this to say in an email:

I just want to say i have the utmost respect for the Michelin brand and what they do. My website is nothing to do with what they do. I am giving the world what it wants and right now that is Michel in guides. There are future plans that I can't go into right now. I just hope everyone can be a part of this and together we can share a unique experience.

Do you think Mascall should have to give up michelinguides.com, or is this a case of finders-keepers? Give us your take in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Soundfreaq Sound Platform 2 has the same scintillating full-throated sound of its predecessor. But why use one set of speakers when you can use two?

This version 2.0 brings with it a unique new feature: the ability to combine two of the speaker units from a single source using Soundfreaq's new dual-system streaming (DSS) capability.

If you're familiar with Soundfreaq's products, you'll recognize the minimalist and clean styling of this $150 Bluetooth speaker. Keep in mind, this is not a dock, and that's not a bad thing. It works with just about any Bluetooth device, which sends its audio wirelessly to the speaker.

There's a ledge onto which you can place your Bluetooth device as it plays. You can charge it with a little help from a couple of USB ports in the back.

Those USB ports send 5 Volts at 1 Amp, just the right amount of power to charge an iPhone or any other USB-compatible device. If you want to charge an iPad or other tablets that require 2.1 Amps of current, it will still power the unit, but it won't be able to charge it at full speed.

Once you've connected your Bluetooth device to the Sound Platform 2, you can play any audio your device can output, including Internet radio such as Pandora, or any games, music or movies you have. If you don't have Bluetooth, you can connect your device via headphone jack to the aux input. And if you're so inclined, the Sound Platform 2 has an FM radio on board.

Listen to the unit and you can immediately tell it had plenty of power. Representatives told me there was a 40 W amplifier powering two 3-inch drivers under the hood. That means thumping bass you can feel in your gut, midrange response that makes a saxophone actually sound like a saxophone, and convincing highs that faithfully reproduce everything from cymbals to sibilance.

Now let's take a look at its newest feature, dual system streaming (DSS). At first I was wondering why Soundfreaq lent me two Sound Platform 2 units  but when I found out about DSS, I was eager to configure the speakers accordingly.

Pairing up the two speakers was just as easy as pairing a Bluetooth device to them  it was simply a matter of placing both of them into DSS mode, and then they found each other within a minute. You can place them as far as 33 feet away from each other, giving you just as much stereo separation as you desire.

When I added the second one, I was even more impressed with its lush stereo sound. The pairing of the two speakers works beautifully  when you adjust the volume either with your mobile device on one of the speakers itself, it controls the volume on both speakers. I wouldn't say the Sound Platform 2 sounds twice as good with two speakers, but it's close.

I noticed these units are small and light enough to carry around with you. Soundfreaq offers an optional battery for $49.99 that will let you unplug the speaker and play it for another six hours  at the beach, say.

The only thing missing in this package is a remote control. Perhaps it's redundant, since you can download a Soundfreaq app to control the system. But that's not the same as having a physical remote. There should be one included, or at least offered as an option.

The company is apparently aware of how effective a pair of these speakers works together  it's worked out a deal with Target to offer these speakers for $250 for a pair, or $149.99 each when it launches on Feb. 24.

I've been impressed by all of Soundfreaq's products so far, and this Sound Platform 2 is no exception. I think a pair of them is a tremendous value for $250, giving you full stereo separation with excellent sound. Even if you manage to just pick up one of them for $149.99, you're still getting excellent sound that turns your Bluetooth device into an instant party. Highly recommended.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Stuart Freeborn, a makeup artist best known for his work on George Lucas' "Star Wars" movies as well as Stanley Kubrick's "2001: A Space Odyssey," has died in London at the age of 98.

Born in 1914 in Leytonstone, England, Freeborn was largely self-taught. Some of his most recognizable creations include the apes from the "Dawn of man" sequence in "2001: A Space Odyssey," as well as Yoda and Chewbacca from "Star Wars".

He also worked as a makeup supervisor on the "Superman" films, as well as Kubrick's "Dr. Strangelove".

"Stuart was already a makeup legend when he started on Star Wars," said George Lucas in a statement.

"He brought with him not only decades of experience, but boundless creative energy. His artistry and craftsmanship will live on forever in the characters he created. His Star Wars creatures may be reinterpreted in new forms by new generations, but at their heart, they continue to be what Stuart created for the original films," said Lucas.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Sweet Brown  she of the legendary "Ain't nobody got time for that!" YouTube fame  has hit the big-time of small-time local TV advertising.

This ad for Shortline Dental in Tulsa, Okla., plays off Brown's autotune-ready news quote from last April. The spot's premise? Toothaches: Ain't nobody got time for that. Quality dental care: Everybody got time for that.

Check out the ad for yourself above and let us know what you think in the comments.

And here's the original video, just because:
--------------------------------------------------------------
We've all been there  you take out your smartphone to make a call and 10 minutes later, after checking your email, Twitter and Instagram, you forget why you took it out in the first place.

This comic by H. Caldwell Tanner of Loldwell shows that we're all guilty of it. Can you break the cycle? Let us know in the comments.

SEE ALSO: More Comics on Mashable

Comic illustration by H. Caldwell Tanner, Loldwell. Published with permission; all rights reserved.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It's that forbidden, imperfect connection  when things that don't make sense piece together perfectly.

Literally, it's everyday things fitting seamlessly into other everyday things.

In some sort of beautiful twist of nature, it seems that the manufacturers of very different products have created similar size standards. And the single topic Tumblr page "Things Fitting Perfectly Into Things" is dedicated to finding and displaying the miraculous act of pairing objects with their oddly wonderful same-sized mate.

SEE ALSO: Instagram Flipbook Shows There's No Filtering New York City

Images courtesy of Tumblr, Things Fitting Perfectly Into Other Things.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It's no secret that Twitter's data has been shown to predict box office performance weeks before a movie opening. However, the company's latest venture takes it much further back in the production cycle.

Adam Bain, president of global revenue at Twitter, said he was making the rounds in the Hollywood studios recently when a producer gave him a proposal: "One studio chief said 'This is amazing. Ive got a film in production right now and I'm making casting decisions. What can Twitter tell me about a movie thats going to appear two years from now?'"

That led Twitter to take part in what Bain calls a Moneyball-style effort to find undervalued actors. Bain didn't go into specifics, but said the actors are being considered not because of their follower counts, but because of their engagement. Bain declined to say which studio and which film Twitter is working with. As for the results? "We'll have to wait two years," he said.

Bain, who was an exec at Fox Sports and Fox Interactive Media before joining Twitter, told the anecdote during media-buying firm OMD's Social Day in New York on Thursday. Also in attendance was Deb Roy, the co-founder of Bluefin Labs, a social TV analytics firm. Twitter announced this week that it was buying Bluefin, which signals a deeper dive into providing data for the entertainment industry.

Roy compared what Bluefin does to providing a "social soundtrack" to entertainment properties. "At a high level, what we're going to do is take the amazing insight [from Bluefin] and fully integrate it into Twitter measurement and make all the data actionable," Bain said. Such data includes the performance of TV ads when they run during various entertainment properties. "You can see the same [ad] in one context and it will do well and in another the reaction will be muted," he said. Using Bluefin data, Twitter will also be able to offer an real-time performance data on new ads, Roy said. "These kinds of insights you can copy test to death" without finding a clear answer, he said. "You run it in the wild and get this instant feedback loop."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Twitter has started rolling out an update that allows you to see older tweets in search results.

Search results on Twitter were previously limited to tweets that had been made over the past week. The update significantly increases that time period (though Twitter has not said specifically by how much), surfacing older tweets based in part by how popular those tweets have been over time.

We look at a variety of types of engagement, like favorites, retweets and clicks, to determine which Tweets to show, Twitters Paul Burstein said in a blog post announcing the update. Well be steadily increasing this percentage over time, and ultimately, aim to surface the best content for your query.

Though it was announced Thursday, the search update was made Wednesday alongside updates to Twitter's iOS and Android applications. Amongst other enhancements, the app update made it so search results display as a single stream, surfacing what Twitter calls the most relevant mix of tweets, photos, and accounts together as a single scrollable timeline.

Have you seen any older tweets show up in your twitter searches? Let us know what you think about the update in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Ubuntu, the Linux-based operating system running on plenty of corporate servers, will arrive on smartphones in October 2013, according to the man leading the project. Developers will get access to the mobile OS in late February.

Mark Shuttleworth, CEO of Canonical, a company that provides services to companies that use Ubuntu software, had previously announced his company was taking Ubuntu to phones, but originally gave the target date of early 2014.

Speaking to the Wall Street Journal, Shuttleworth said the first Ubuntu-based phones would be coming in October. Developers, however, will get their hands on the software as early as this month.

Why would anyone try to compete with the likes of Android and iOS, especially when there are already alternative OSes such as BlackBerry and Windows Phone? Shuttleworth believes Ubuntu phones will really solve a problem, letting users stream corporate software  even Windows desktop apps  right on their handsets as well as boot up the full Ubuntu OS when they're docked to a workstation.

SEE ALSO: Ubuntu Wants to Be on Your Phones, Tablets and TVs

That could make Ubuntu handsets very attractive to a set of corporate IT departments who already use Ubuntu on the desktop and back end. For security-conscious companies that are heavily Linux-based, Ubuntu might even be a better choice than BlackBerry.

Ubuntu isn't the only dark-horse mobile OS trying to fill a niche that the larger platforms have seemingly overlooked. Mozilla is vying for a spot with its Firefox OS, and there's also Tizen (formerly MeeGo), which has gotten limited backing from Samsung.

Are you looking forward to Ubuntu's mobile OS? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Want to see something cool? How about a full 12 minutes of beautiful imagery to start your day? We've found just the right video for you.

Titled "This is what the Internet was made for 2012 Edition HD," the video is a compilation of some of the most memorable stunts and, simply, incredible moments we've seen on the internet throughout 2012. It was created by YouTube user MiamiViceStyle who promises more such videos in the future.

For the most part, the video focuses on extreme sports, but it also features bits from some popular viral videos, such as the Real life Fruit ninja and Epic Meal Time.

Warning: some parts of the video are slightly NSFW.

Check out the video above and tell us how you like it in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It didn't take long for brands to start running contests and giveaways on Pinterest, and now they're taking to yet another red-hot social network: Vine, the video app owned by Twitter.

From now until Feb. 11, the Cavendish London hotel is asking Vine users to create a romantic Vine and tweet it with the hashtag #ValentineVine to @Cavendish_Hotel. The submission deemed most romantic will win an overnight stay at the hotel on Friday, Feb. 15, including pre-dinner cocktails, a four-course dinner with wine and a full English breakfast the next morning, among other treats.

Neil Braude, general manager of the Cavendish London, says that the hotel began using social media in 2009 as a way to extend its customer service to more channels  giving directions to the hotel through Twitter, for instance. "We wanted to be an early adopter with Vine and for our social media supporters to have some fun," he said. "It will be interesting to see how many entries we receive."
--------------------------------------------------------------
First, it was 140-character posts  now it's six-second videos.

Since Twitter introduced Vine last month, its video-sharing app for iOS devices, we've seen users create masterful  and sometimes, ahem, graphic  works of art in the form of six-second, looping video shorts.

SEE ALSO: 10 Works of Art on Vine

If you're unfamiliar with the app, or haven't yet mustered up the courage to shoot your own, don't sweat it: Mashable's got you covered. Above, we've compiled some of our favorite tips for making your Vines as high-quality as possible.

Do you have any tips or creative Vines of your own? Share them with us below!

BONUS: How to Use Vine 


--------------------------------------------------------------
Megan Phelps-Roper and her sister Grace have walked away from the only life they've ever known. The siblings have renounced and left the Westboro Baptist Church.

For the unfamiliar, the WBC is a small congregation based out of Topeka, Kan., infamous for picketing fallen veterans' funerals and other high-profile events with signs that read "God Hates Fags." The church's activities are considered to be so heinous that a We The People petition asking the White House to label them as a hate group broke records by getting more than 270,000 signatures.

Megan Phelps-Roper's departure and renouncement of the church is a big deal. At one point, the Kansas City Star named her as the future of the WBC. She's credited as bringing the congregation into the social media age, being the first of the Phelps clan to join Twitter.

It was fitting then that Phelps-Roper announced her difficult decision online, penning a postalong with her sister Graceon Medium.com titled "Head Full of Doubt / Road Full of Promise." The post was also linked to on her Twitter account, which had been silent since Oct. 30, 2012.

"We know that weve done and said things that hurt people. Inflicting pain on others wasnt the goal, but it was one of the outcomes," the siblings write. "We wish it werent so, and regret that hurt."

"We know that we dearly love our family. They now consider us betrayers, and we are cut off from their lives, but we know they are well-intentioned. We will never not love them. "We know that we cant undo our whole lives. We cant even say wed want to if we could; we are who we are because of all the experiences that brought us to this point. What we can do is try to find a better way to live from here on. Thats our focus."

The breakup with the church didn't happen recently. In fact, according to Jeff Chu, an editor at Fast Company magazine who has also written about the WBC and broke the news over Medium, the separation occurred in November 2012.

"Her departure has hurt them alreadyshe knew it wouldyet there was no way she could stay," Chu recounts.

Chu also writes that Megan Phelps-Roper began questioning her beliefs after a series of online conversations with Israeli Web developer David Abitbol. In one of the exchanges, Abitbol asked Phelps-Roper about Jesus's stance on forgiveness.

"And then he connected it to another member of the church who had done something that, according to the Old Testament, was also punishable by death," she said, as quoted by Chu. "I realized that if the death penalty was instituted for any sin, you completely cut off the opportunity to repent. And thats what Jesus was talking about."

The announcement has been met with praise and support on Twitter.

The Daily Dot reached out to Margie Phelps, Megan Phelps-Roper's aunt and subject of a profile we did in July 2012, for comment. She replied via email:

"NO FORNICATION. That is the standard her parents taught her. That is the standard her grandparents taught her. That is the standard the Church of the Lord Jesus Christ (Westboro Baptist Church) taught her. What kindness they showed her! "This applies to every young person who has the great privilege of growing up on the streets of Mt. Zion (Westboro Baptist Church), and comes to years and chooses to enjoy the pleasures of sin for a very short season rather than obey God. Given the zeitgeist of proud sin that permeates the land, the miracle is the young people who do the opposite  who serve God, and reject the filthy manner of life of this nation."

This article originally published at The Daily Dot here
--------------------------------------------------------------
The first petition posted to the White House's We the People website has crossed the threshold to receive an official administration response since the threshold for such a response was raised in January.

The White House's Digital Strategy Office raised the threshold from 25,000 signatures in one month to 100,000 signatures in one month, saying it was difficult to provide full and timely responses under the existing threshold. The White House previously raised the threshold from 5,000 signatures just a few weeks after the petition site was launched in late 2011.

It took officials 54 days on average to respond to petitions that crossed the 25,000 signature threshold, according to a Nextgov analysis.

The first petition to cross the raised threshold asked the U.S. government to seek sanctions against Dutch officials who petitioners claim are responsible for the death of Russian political activist Alexander Dolmatove. Dolmatov committed suicide in a Dutch detention center in January after fleeing his homeland following President Vladimir Putins reelection.

The petition appeared to have crossed the response threshold late Wednesday or early Thursday. Administration officials have typically declined to substantively comment on petitions that fall under the purview of another national government.

Some We the People petitioners have complained that their petitions rarely lead officials to fundamentally rethink administration policies. Officials have responded that the site is better judged as a communication tool to let the government know what issues are important to the public. They have also cited a handful of situations in which petitions arguably led to rethinking policy including a proposed rule to more tightly restrict commercial dog breeders.

This article originally published at Nextgov here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Captain James Kirk of the Starship Enterprise called up an astronaut in space today for a cosmic conversation that began on Twitter and warped all the way into space.

Actor William Shatner, who famously portrayed Kirk in the original science fiction TV show Star Trek, called the International Space Station today (Feb. 7) to ask real-life astronaut Chris Hadfield what life is like on a spaceship.

"I'm so moved to be able to speak to you for this brief moment," Shatner told the astronaut via phone.

You can see a video of Shatner's call to the space station here.

Hadfield, representing the Canadian Space Agency, is serving a five-month tour on the football field-sized space station orbiting Earth. Last month, he and Shatner struck up avirtual conversation on Twitter when the actor wrote, "@Cmdr_Hadfield Are you tweeting from space?"

Eventually, their conversation pulled in other Star Trek notables like George Takei (who played Hikaru Sulu), Wil Wheaton (Wesley Crusher) and Leonard Nimoy (Spock).

Today, Shatner and Hadfield connected in real time for a chat about life in space, and life on the stage.

"You've been a test pilot, the utmost example of courage," Shatner said. "How do you deal with the fear, which is also applicable to space?"

"I read somewhere that you always knew your lines whenever you had a job in the acting profession," Hadfield replied. "I have tried to always know my lines. What I'm scared most of is not knowing what to do next  After years of training, you practice everything down to the details so you have the confidence that comes with that."

"The fear comes from something unexpected happening, like forgetting your worlds or an audience reaction that was unexpected," Shatner said. "In my case, your face flushes, in your case, you burn up. It's a little different."

"Well, in both cases you go down in flames," the astronaut shot back.

Shatner also got philosophical, asking whether flying in space helped Hadfield contemplate the enormity of the universe. "Are you able to see the unifying parts of it so that you become at one with the universe?" he asked.

Hadfield said that in between the everyday engineering problems that occupy his mind, he does think about how humanity is poised on the cusp of exploration, looking toward a future of living out in the solar system.

"I feel hugely connected to that," he said. "It's what inspired me as a kid. Now I'm doing my absolute best to help people see that, to help us understand where we are philosophically and historically in our increased understanding of where we are in the universe."

The fictional and real-life space travelers had a lot to talk about, but limited time, so the two made plans to continue their conversation at Hadfield's cottage in Ontario, after the astronaut returns home in May.

"It's a pleasure Chris, I look forward to meeting you in person and siting down with a whiskey and a cigar," Shatner said.

This article originally published at Space.com here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Welcome to this morning's edition of "First To Know," a series in which we keep you in the know on what's happening in the digital world.

Today, we're looking at three particularly interesting stories. Yahoo has partnered with Google for contextual advertising  but you probably wont notice much. What you will notice, is a change in Twitter's mobile apps, where Tweets, activity, trends and suggested follows are now condensed down into one big discover tab. Finally, Facebooks Developers Live debuted Wednesday.

Its a video channel that will host walkthroughs, keynotes and other content for Facebook app developers.

Check out the video above for more on these stories.
--------------------------------------------------------------
When Dominik Hofmann co-developed Vine, I bet he never envisioned people creating tiny, six-second animations. I say this because the Vine app is, in fact, somewhat ill-equipped for the task. So much so that Im amazed at what people have been able to create with this very basic iOS platform.

Ive created a handful of animations and now I realize there are at least seven simple things Vine (and parent company Twitter) can do right now to make Vine an exponentially better animation platform.

Obviously, you can already touch your iPhone screen to focus on virtually any part of the view. Inside Vine, though, a touch is intended as a record action. This severely limits your creative options and makes the addition of a steadying tripod almost a must. I suggest a little on-screen toggle to switch between "touch to record" (as soon as your finger moves off the screen, recording stops) and "tap to focus."

To make great animations, you need to control the lighting. But it would be a whole lot easier if you could tap on the screen to identify the area where exposure matters and to adjust for things like over-bright back-lighting. We already do this within the iPhones camera, so the native function is there. Again a toggle option between touch to record and tap to set exposure would make sense here.

Animations take time and planning. Typically, you cant move the phone or do anything else with Vine until a recording is finished and shared. If Vine introduces the concept of projects you can start an animation, put it aside to do a different random Vine and then return to the in-process six-second animation.

When youre creating an animation in Vine, moving the camera and potentially shifting your subjects out of position or out of the frame can ruin the effect. The animation could end up looking unnecessarily jerky or not like an animation at all. Again, the tripod will help, but if you dont have an iPhone-friendly tripod, you have to rely on your own steady hand. Imagine holding the phone then reaching around to move your subjects for the next frame. Exactly  good luck keeping the iPhone in the same spot. One solution might be for Vine to show a thumbnail of the last captured video segment or frame. Then you can eyeball the correct position for the next shot, similar to a panoramic photo option.

I cant tell you how limiting it is to have portrait shooting as your only video option. Animation is a cinematic experience. Even at six seconds, it really cries out for the wide-screen treatment. Vine just has to tap into the rotation option in every single iPhone in existence and be done with it.

Creative types like control. Even after the animation is done, we may want to cut away something around the edges: a chair, desk edge, accidental person sitting in the background. Alternatively, cropping the aspect ratio or shape of the fame to your liking is also a nice-to-have option.

Not too long ago I spent 10 minutes shooting a Vine animation only to discover that I had inadvertently filmed a frame or two with something obscuring the iPhone lens (see above). The animation was ruined and Vine offers no way of fixing the video. I don't expect full video editing tools in the free app, but since Vine videos are also automatically stored in your Photo Library, why not let us edit elsewhere (iMovie) and upload tiny (still six-second) videos back into Vine. I suspect Vine wont do this because the videos would end up shorter than six seconds. But, hey, we already know that some are actually a half second longer than six seconds, so whats the big deal if theyre a half-second-or-so shorter?

Do these things, Vine, and I think you will own the sharable animation space. Oh, and while youre at it, hurry up with that Android app. Im tired of hearing Droid owners complain.
--------------------------------------------------------------
As of December 2012, there are more than 2,700 breweries operating in the United States  more than at any other time since Prohibition. In 2011 alone, 174 new microbreweries opened their doors in the U.S.

The explosion of breweries in the past two decades would seem to suggest that this is an easy growth, cash cow market, but its much more difficult to annually turn a profit than these figures might suggest.

And some, like the Alaskan Brewing Company (which was the 67th brewery in the U.S. after Prohibition), have had to come up with innovative new ways to keep their business in the black. Thats where "Beer-Powered Beer" comes in.

The Alaskan Brewing Co., located in Juneau, Alaska, has started a process of reusing brewing ingredients as fuel, making their brewery more self-sustaining in an attempt to cut costs.

One of the main ingredients in most beer is a malt and barley mash. The grain is spent, or used, in the brewing process, leaving behind a wet biomass byproduct. Until recently, most breweries, including Alaskan Brewing Co., ship this residual grain mash to farms and agricultural operations, that then use the grain as a protein source in feed for livestock.

For many breweries in the contiguous 48 states, this is a fairly efficient means of spent grain disposal. But for a brewery based out of Juneau, where transportation in and out of the city is highly limited, this was an expensive part of the operation.

For every $60 per ton that the brewery received for their spent grain from farmers, it cost them $30 per ton to ship it there. Once the expense of drying the byproduct for shipping is tacked on, as well as other operating expenses, it was clear that this cycle would not sustain itself for long.

So they turned to an in-house recycling process. With the help of a nearly half-million dollar grant from the Federal Rural Energy for America Program, Alaskan Brewing Co. set out to create a special boiler system that ran entirely on spent grain for fuel.

According to the companys brewing operations and engineering manager, while some breweries currently utilize spent grain as a co-fuel, "nobody was burning spent grain as a sole fuel source for an energy recovery system, for a steam boiler."

The system, which cost $1.8 million and was developed with the help of an industrial furnace company in North Dakota, burns the dried spent grain to create steam. The steam, an often underutilized renewable energy source, then powers the entire facility. The boiler system, which is expected to save the company $450,000 annually, will offset energy costs by 70% and pay for itself in less than five years.

The green revolution tends to focus on wind and solar energy but, as is shown, there are many forms of renewable energy that are still largely untapped. While this model does not appear to be adaptable to larger brewing operations just yet, its a clear example of how businesses can become more energy efficient and more profitable.

This article originally published at PSFK here
--------------------------------------------------------------
For the first time in nearly a decade, AOL's business is actually growing again.

AOL reported revenue of $599.5 million in December, a slight 4% increase from the $576.8 million it generated during the same quarter in 2011. Not only did that beat Wall Street's estimates for revenue of $573 million, but it also represented the first year-over-year growth for the company in 8 years.

AOL returned to growth and generated significant value for shareholders in 2012, said Tim Armstrong, AOL's chairman and CEO, in a statement. AOL has strong momentum entering 2013 and is positioned to continue on our growth path by executing our strategy to build the next generation media and technology company.

Much of that growth was driven by increases in ad sales and a slower rate of decline for AOL's dial-up business. Global ad sales increased by 13% year-over-year to $410 million thanks to a 31% growth in revenue from its third party network and a 17% growth in search revenue. The subscription business, which was once AOL's core business, declined by 10% year-over-year to $174 million as people continue to move away from dial-up. However, the upside for AOL is this was the smallest year-over-year percentage decrease in subscription sales in six years and it actually represented a slight increase from the previous quarter.

AOL's stock was up more than 6% in pre-market trading following the earnings report.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It doesn't do any good to debate when Googles Project Glass will become ubiquitous, or how many billions of dollars the Augmented Reality industry will make by 2015. Youre missing the point.

Augmented Reality (AR) is not just a technology. Its a shortcut. Whether we can interact with data through a pair of glasses or contact lenses, the very nature of such technological immediacy will very quickly change human behavior.

First shortcut? Well get our hands back. Imagine your coffee and bagel, no spills  because youre checking email on AR-enabled glasses.

SEE ALSO: 7 Ways Augmented Reality Will Improve Your Life

Its the second shortcut that will be much more profound. Personalization algorithms already guiding your life will turn visual. And facial recognition technology combined with this articulated AR means your rose-colored glasses arent just a metaphor  youll only encounter the world you want, the people you want.

Theres a culture clash coming, only we're talking too much tech, not enough tact.

There are consequences to the technology were using that we cannot predict, says Vint Cerf, VP and chief Internet evangelist at Google, most widely known for being one of the inventors of the Internet. Were moving into a time weve never quite been in before. The information explosion has been with us for a long time. But the ability to process it has been less available to us.

Machines process faster than humans. While we may have a richer sense of context than our cyber counterparts, we dont have the same ability to interpret and communicate information on the scale and speed that currently exists for machines today.

As an example, Cerf notes how the wine industry has begun using sensors to monitor plants in real time to learn what nutrients are needed to maximize productivity for the overall vineyard. This maximizes yield and optimizes the quality of the fruit.

Along these lines, Cerf also notes Glooko, a company that manufactures a connector between an insulin monitoring delivery system and a mobile phone. The mobile gets data from the pump and reports a moment-by-moment record of a persons metabolic condition. "You could not do this in the past, before devices had such portability," notes Cerf. "There is an enormous power when linking these mobile devices to the Internet.

Along with faster computing power and device portability, its important to consider how these examples will manifest in an Augmented Reality world. The initial answer is obvious: It wont make a difference to the majority of us. Wine owners will utilize portable AR while tending their vines to keep their hands free, and people with diabetes will use a visual prompt to avoid high-glucose items.

But how about the effect on the restaurant owner serving wine to the diabetic? In the future, theyll likely see a visual marker above diners' heads, alerting them to food allergies. When offering a diabetic a wine list, they'll know not to offer a menu with high-glucose selections, as a point of culinary etiquette.

Our immediate future will focus more on these new cultural paradigms than technical concerns.

Screenshot courtesy of Girls Around Me

The data that is being pulled by these technologies and in particular with AR is already public, notes Polonetsky, director and co-chair of the Future of Privacy Forum, a Washington, D.C.-based think tank that seeks to advance responsible data practices. Like the recent controversy over the Girls Around Me app, people get upset when information they may have shared via Facebook or Foursquare gets revealed in a different, but still public, context.

Polonetsky notes that the stress were starting to see in such examples comes when data is portrayed in ways we werent expecting. The app Girls Around Me reveals womens physical locations after inferring they're looking for dates  whether or not they actually are.

Many of these data-oriented stressors already manifest in our analog world right now. For instance, mortgage data is publically available online. Whos to stop me from cornering a neighbor at a block party and saying, I cannot believe how much you paid for your house.

The fact that humans can't avoid some level of insensitivity is a given. The bigger quandary is what happens when data is revealed in a visual context to people wearing AR technologies, especially when privacy preferences may fail. In the mortgage situation, what's to stop me from insensitively avoiding that neighbor because Ive prejudged his financial status?

Similar situations will soon overtake driving. Fords MyKey technology, available since January 2011, lets parents program cars for teens, so they cant go over 80 mph and can't listen to the stereo until all seat belts are engaged.

While the features were originally designed for teen safety, the technical framework could certainly be utilized in a different context. Polonetsky anticipates one could use the technology to vet whether or not a parent is worthy of driving children in a car pool. The issue, as with teens, is still about safety. If via my "You Drive Like a Squirrel" AR app, I see you score a two out of ten on safety, my kid doesnt get in your car.

We need to figure out what moral or social boundaries we want to draw, notes Polonetsky. We dont know what the next adjustment or ethical framework looks like.

Our job is to figure out compelling ways to engage people and improve their well-being through web and mobile apps. says Chris Cartter, founder and general manager of MeYou Health (a subsidiary of Healthways), a company dedicated to helping people pursue, achieve and maintain a more healthy life by improving their well-being every day.

Most users sign in to the company's well-being product, Daily Challenge, using their Facebook IDs, which lets Cartter and his team quantify how users can support one another more effectively while trying to change behavior.

We want to learn how to improve the well-being of the entire connected network, a community where people will share deeply personal health related information if there is genuine context and trust," says Cartter.

This environment could easily be possible in an AR-enabled world. People walking down the street could virtually reveal their health status, how its trending up and down. And while there may eventually be facial recognition (via AR) for a billion people on the planet, I may only want to reveal my well-being score to a small selection of my Facebook friends, he adds.

But the precedent of Girls Around Me brings up an important question: How can we fully protect the original intention of any of our data? What will likely evolve is a visual taxonomy where people can set how theyre seen or perceived, via AR applications that work in conjunction with platforms like Google Glass.

An example of this is CacheTown, an AR technology initially being used to help retailers project offers for products or services in the virtual arena. But CEO and founder Andrew Couch is aware of the larger concerns of privacy; the company is currently building what is essentially a Visual Virus Protection system where users can determine how theyre projected in an augmented world.

Our assumption is that privacy will be the No. 1 area people may abuse within the Augmented Reality space," says Couch. "When people are able to enhance the perception of the world around them, they also need to be provided with a responsible mindset for these new interactions.

Couch is also working on a guide to ethics surrounding Augmented Reality that addresses these privacy concerns.

We tend to think about the future as something we dont have control over. We need to create a future that we want to be a part of, says Ramona Pringle, a faculty member at Ryerson University in Toronto, as well as host and producer of Rdigitalife, an online series that explores the relationships between humans and technology. She predicts that man and machine will inevitably merge on various levels, but insists that we need to discuss the ethics and culture of these advances over and above the technology itself.

While the idea of implanting technology in our bodies or wearing an AR-enabled contact lens tends to make most people uncomfortable, Pringle points out that were used to the idea of a nose job, a form of trading in our uniquely human attributes for brand features that reflect a specific perception of beauty. Again, these questions are not about technology, but of culture and context.

Within Rdigitalife, Pringle also researches artificial intelligence, specifically whether people could fall in love with inanimate objects, or robots. While this may seem far-fetched, ask yourself how much time you stare at your mobile screen, compared to the faces of your loved ones. And as a parent, have you found yourself telling your kids to turn off the TV while youre sending a text or email? How will that behavior change when the virtual world permeates your vision and surroundings? Will there be a time when you program your preferences to avoid seeing loved ones altogether, if youre busy or preoccupied?

Its this cultural paradigm Pringle most wants to address. Its the responsibility of every citizen to be a part of this conversation involving technology," she says. "You cant wake up in 20 years and say, I didnt think this would happen.

Im not trying to sell technology just so people will use it. I want people to spend less time tasking so they can create more value with their lives, says Christopher Rezendes, founder and president of INEX Advisors, which helps institutions understand how they can benefit from the deployment of Internet of Things, or M2M (machine-to-machine) solutions.

For someone so immersed in what many would call futuristic technologies, Rezendes actually points out networked technology has existed for years. His focus is on making intelligent and meaningful connections for people utilizing technology, versus moving forward with emerging media simply because they exist. He says, Just because we can, doesnt mean we should. We need to be intentional.

He also points out that as the world becomes more interconnected, by definition, well need to be more connected as communities. This isnt an altruistic or socialist view of the future  its about business and functional operability.

Citing the idea of self-driving cars, Rezendes points out, How can anyone release products that will hurt partners, if youre a single entity in a tightly connected commercial chain? We wont be able to operate independently of our upstream or downstream experience partners.

Now consider this physical supply chain in the context of seeing one anothers well-being, needs or talents displayed via visualizations, viewable through lenses outfitted with AR. How will we perceive each other in the near future, beyond our physical appearances? How will our positive and negative traits combine to form a visualization that instantly defines who we are?

One thing that will change, according to Rezendes: our vocabulary. I think in 10 years well be actively working to redefine the citizen to stop calling them consumers. The term is outmoded and refers to a time when peoples primary value came from gathering goods or wealth."

Rezendes has a vision for the future citizen of the connected world, where our focus can widen to better provide value in a more holistic sense of a human supply chain: Were going to call people creators.

Some say were losing serendipity, that the filters and personalization algorithms narrow our choices so we stop experiencing decisions weve dismissed in the past. But with AR, this form of tunnel vision will become literal.

I hope you agree, and I look forward to seeing you in the future. But evidently, that's up to you.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Whoever says Google search is better than Bing has never tried tracking down a secret American drone base in the desert sands of Saudi Arabia.

Microsoft's Bing Maps shows what may very well be the United States' until-recently secret drone base in Saudi Arabia. Google Maps, on the other hand, has squat in the same territory.

The exact location and images of what may be the drone base were first discovered by Wired's Noah Shactman.

Shactman could not confirm the images showed the same base outed by The Times, but he said several factors made it likely this is indeed the base: It's near the border with Yemen, where the Saudi-based drones are said to operate; it's too remote to be useful for civilian purposes; it has hangars similar to those seen at other confirmed American drone bases; two former American intelligence officials told Shactman these photos are indeed the American base in Saudi Arabia.

The base's geographic position relative to the border between Saudi Arabia (north) and Yemen (south), demarcated by the grey line:

The existence of the base was revealed this week by The New York Times, which along with other media outlets was sitting on the information at the request of the Central Intelligence Agency.

The Times' report on the base was included in a larger report on the American drone program and its chief architect, John Brennan, who this week answered questions about the drone program and other topics during Senate confirmation hearings for the position of C.I.A. director. The C.I.A. and administration officials rarely acknowledge the existence of the widely reported American drone operation in Yemen, which targets Al Qaeda and other terrorist groups operating in the country.
--------------------------------------------------------------
As Nemo descends, denizens across the northeast are flooding grocery stores and bodegas in search of essential supplies. After all, who wants to be stuck for a few days in a blizzard without bread and milk?

Certainly not Vic DiBitetto. The comedian posted a 30-second video to his YouTube account, the aptly named "Bread & Milk" and the clip has gone viral, accumulating over 327,000 views in just 24 hours.

We'll be honest  we're not exactly sure why this clip is so popular. It's certainly humorous, but its popularity surprises me. Though maybe I'm just missing something. Please feel free to educate me in the comments.

In the meantime, I'm heading out to get some bread and milk before Prospect Heights runs out.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Have you ever wondered if drones can fly over your head? That's still a very tough question to answer thoroughly  but now we have a better idea of who has applied for permission to use flying bots in American airspace.

The Federal Aviation Administration has released an updated list of public entities who have applied for a special permission  called certificate of authorization (COA)  to fly unmanned aerial vehicles.

The list was obtained by the digital rights advocacy group Electronic Frontier Foundation through a Freedom of Information Act lawsuit.

The EFF had already released in April a partial list of 61 entities that had applied for drone permits. With the new additions, the total goes up to 81.

The previous list specified which applications were active (thus approved), which ones expired and which ones were disapproved (including one from the Georgia Tech Police Department, which wanted to fly drones at football games.)

Among the 81 entities that applied to fly drones, there are several universities, police departments and government agencies including the U.S. Army, the FBI, the Defense Advanced Research Projects Agency (DARPA), NASA and the Department of Homeland Security (which already flies Predator drones to patrol the border with Mexico).

The current list doesn't specify the status of these applications, although there's a significant overlap between the two and the vast majority of the ones that were listed as active in April are still on the list. From these lists, however, it's not clear how many of these organizations are actually already flying drones  these are merely entities that have applied to have permission to use them. The FAA did not respond to Mashable's request for comment.

The EFF has also plotted the new list of drone permits on an interactive Google map. Each dot on the map opens a window with more information about every application.

SEE ALSO: Watch the World's Highest Resolution Drone-Mounted Camera in Action

Currently, flying unmanned aerial vehicles is practically banned if you're not a public organization, such as a university or a law enforcement agency, and you don't have a COA from the FAA. Even with a COA, those public agencies can only fly small drones at low altitudes and away from airports and urban centers. If you are a hobbyist, you can only fly your drone at a maximum of 400 feet of altitude and you have to keep it in your line of sight.

In February of 2012 Congress passed a law that required the FAA to clear the path for extended use of drones in America. The FAA is supposed to come up with guidelines and rules to integrate UAVs into to the airspace reserved to regular, manned aircrafts before 2015.

Civil liberties associations, including the EFF and the American Civil Liberties Union, have questioned the use of drones in American airspace, arguing that having flying bots equipped with cameras could violate citizens' privacy rights.

A number of legislators have raised the same questions. On Tuesday, Charlottsville, Va. became the first city in the United States to pass a resolution banning the use of unmanned aerial vehicles. Other legislators elsewhere have introduced or are working on introducing similar measures.



Click here to see an interactive, full-screen version of the map.
--------------------------------------------------------------
An astronaut and a rock singer recorded an original song together and released it on Feb. 8 as the first duet of new music performed simultaneously in space and on the ground.

A rocket launch and the beauty of planet Earth are the subjects of the song, performed in space by Canadian astronaut Chris Hadfield, while accompanied by Canadian singer Ed Robertson of the band Barenaked Ladies, and others on Earth.

The song's lyrics, called "I.S.S. (Is Somebody Singing)," focuses on the experience of a person in space missing his loved ones on the Earth below.

"If you could see our nation from the International Space Station, you'd know why I want to get back soon."

Hadfield and Robertson began co-writing the song when Hadfield was still in training in Russia for his five-month mission on the International Space Station. Next month, Hadfield will be the first Canadian commander on the orbiting complex when the Expedition 35 mission begins.

Hadfield and Robertson first met more than a decade ago when Hadfield gave the award-winning Barenaked Ladies band a tour of Mission Control in Houston.

The duet, mixed in Toronto earlier this week, included other members of the Barenaked Ladies as well as the Wexford Gleeks, a youth choir from the Wexford Collegiate School for the Arts. Hadfield performed from the cupola, which is an observation deck on the ISS.

"Welcome to the cupola. I'm ready to play a little music," Hadfield said, clutching a guitar, in a video of the song recording released today.

"Indeed. Your scenery looks a little nicer than ours," Robertson responded from the studio.

Hadfield then proudly showed off his guitar pick, to which Robertson quipped: "I know, yours matches your mission patch."

As the collaborators sang, Hadfield periodically looked up through the cupola windows to gaze at Earth. On one occasion, he did so right after singing, "Pushed back in my seat, look out my window  there goes home."

Despite the great distance between the collaborators, Robertson wrote that the work of writing the song mostly went smoothly between himself and the orbiting astronaut. The exception came when they were finalizing the chorus.

"Its a line in the chorus that I wrote, 'If you could see our nation from the International Space Station.' Chris always felt that it was a real mouthful, and it is a real mouthful, but thats whats cool about it," wrote Robertson on a blog for the Canadian Broadcasting Corp., Canada's national broadcaster.

"His alternate was 'From way up here on this space station.' So I said, 'You just sung the exact same number of syllables and haven't changed the meaning of it. You just didnt say 'International Space Station', which is this awesome place where you actually are, so I really want you to sing that line."

Hadfield is reportedly working on making enough songs for an album  in between his other duties on station. He released another original song from orbit in December called "Jewel in the Night."

When the album is released, Robertson already has a suggested title for Hadfield.

"How about, 'Turns Out in Space Lots of People Can Hear You Scream?'" he offered.

Hadfield isn't the first musical astronaut to perform on the space station. In April 2011, NASA astronaut Cady Colemancollaborated with Jethro Tull's Ian Andersonon the ground to play the band's song "Bourree" over a satellite connection. Coleman played the flute during the performance, which commemorated the 50th anniversary of humanity's first spaceflight by Yuri Gagarin on April 12, 1961.

This article originally published at Space.com here
--------------------------------------------------------------
A video that reveals Google's most advanced Chromebook computer "leaked" earlier this week, showing a powerful laptop with a Retina-like screen called the Chromebook Pixel. There's also a good chance it's a fake.

A company called Slinky.Me claims to have created the demo video for Google. After the leak, the CEO, Victor Koch, contacted Sergey Brin (publicly on Google+ of all places), tagging Brin as well as the developer who had initially posted the leaked video. Later Koch tweeted a link to the video.

SEE ALSO: HP Launches Its First Chromebook for $330

While there's reason for skepticism, the Chrome developer who posted the video, Franois Beaufort, said the laptop shown might be the upcoming "Google Link," so maybe Google does have a high-resolution Chromebook in the works after all. Certainly, displays on all devices are getting greater pixel densities all the time.

Might we see such a Chromebook at Google's developer conference this spring? We'll keep you posted. Until then, enjoy the unbelievably sexy Chromebook Pixel with its vaporous 2560x1700 display, designed entirely  or not at all  by Google. Let us know if you want one in the comments ... or your dreams.
--------------------------------------------------------------
In the small town of Brixen in Northern Italy, there is a climbing gym that is like no other. The exterior looks like a piece of crumpled tin foil, and what's more, when night falls the crumpled building becomes transparent, with the climbers inside on view for all to see.

The Vertikale Kletterhalle, or vertical climbing gym, was designed by architects Martin Mutschlechner and Barbara Lanz of Stadtlabor, in collaboration with local architect Wolfgang Meraner.

The walls of the building are made out of aluminum that is laced with miniscule perforations. During the day, the building has a ripple effect inspired by a curtain, and by night, the perforations allows the light from within to make the building appear transparent. Says Mutschlechner:

We wanted the building to be hermetic during daytime and completely transparent at night. The first idea was to create a curtain and the waving of the facade was added to create a moir effect. It was very important for us to have a facade that changes transparency during the day and changes pattern if you move around the building.

Part of the reasoning behind the see-through walls is that it brings the climbers closer to nature, giving them a view of the Dolomite Mountains during the day. Nature is transported into the building reads the architects project description. It also creates a dynamic relationship between the climbers inside and the people walking by, giving them a different view every night.

This article originally published at PSFK here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Computers are causing a great deal of stress in love lives. Two out of five U.S. adults who have a computer and also are in a relationship say computer-related issues have caused them some deal of stress, according to Crucial.com, an online retailer of computer memory products.

In fact, one of every five who responded to a Crucial.com survey said computer problems are more stressful and frustratingthan having an argument with his or her significant other.

Chief sources of tension include the belief that the person's partner is spending too much time on the computer and the performance of the computer itself, according to responses of 2,691 adults polled by Harris Interactive. The complaint about time spent was cited by 23% of the respondents.

"A computers performance can increase or lower stress in a relationship," said John Gray, the relationship counselor who wrote the 1992 best-seller Men Are from Mars, Women Are from Venus. "Were living in a world where most people spend moretime with a computer on a daily basis than they do with their spouse or significant other."

Women are also more likely than men to be disappointed by the performance of their computer, the researchers found.

The computer is not the most common cause of stress in relationships, however. Seventy-five percent of couples said they fight over finances, and 59 percent of couples said that work-related issues have caused a problem in their relationships.

Gray, 61, said, "These findings are fascinating because of the changing dynamic between people and their computers. I have a lot of couples coming to me about issues that cause tension in their relationships  of course, finances and job stress are the usual suspects, but I am also hearing more concern about time spent on the computer."

This article originally published at BusinessNewsDaily here
--------------------------------------------------------------
The most exciting thing I've gotten off of Craigslist is a roommate, and to be honest, she wasn't all that groovy. But amidst the creepy missed connections and sexist offers for massage therapy, you can actually find some decent swag  it just might take you a few days to locate it.

We want to know: What is the coolest thing you've scored off Craigslist?

Did you trade a bunch of leftover deep-dish pizza for a stack of vintage porn? Have you scored a pet goldfish? A bitchin' haircut? A prehistoric oval fossil?

SEE ALSO: 8 Things You Didn't Know You Could Do on Craigslist

Upload a photograph of your greatest Craigslist treasure in the comments below. You can copy/paste URLs from photo platforms like Twitpic, Imgur and Flickr. If all else, fails, tweet your photo with the hashtag #CLswag.

If your photo requires explanation (let's be honest, most do), be sure to include a bit of backstory. Choose wisely  your Craigslist booty could be featured on Mashable.

Send us your wacky finds by Friday, Feb. 15 at 12 p.m. ET.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Craigslist is probably the most eclectic listing of stuff ever compiled onto one domain.

While enough trolling may score you some one-of-a-kind vintage finds, there are plenty of things you should steer clear of. Think opened foods, prescription medications or pretty much anything found in a bathroom.

We know you're all savvy Internet users who wouldn't fall for these kinds of buys. You may, however, be tickled by some of the crazy household items Craigslist users try to sell  or even give away for free  to other users.

SEE ALSO: 8 Things You Didn't Know You Could Do on Craigslist

We rounded up 16 products posted on Craigslist no one should be purchasing. We didn't link to the products, because the links expire. But of course, if you're listening to our advice, you wouldn't be interested in purchasing, anyway...right?

What's the craziest thing you've bought or sold on Craigslist? Let us know what treasure you've dug up in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Not so long ago, we told you about the two English Bulldogs that are helping take Butler University basketball into the mainstream. Well guess what? The Georgetown Hoyas have a pair of live bulldog mascots of their own.

Butler's dogs  Blue II and Blue III  were passing through town as part of their national tour on Friday. The four mascots convened at Georgetown for a meeting of the minds and host Jack the Bulldog posted the photo above  which just might be the cutest in the history of college sports  to his Facebook page soon after.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Launchpad is a series that introduces Mashable readers to compelling startups. If you would like to have your startup considered for inclusion, please see the details here.



One-Liner Pitch: Create your ideal interior design using virtual pieces of furniture.

Why It's Taking Off: Decolabs lets you arrange virtual pieces of furniture in a photo of your room so that you can see how the items will look in your home.

Have you ever struggled to imagine how a piece of furniture might look in your room? Now you can picture it better using Decolabs.

Decolabs, a free app for iPad, lets you design a room using virtual furniture objects. The app's augmented reality tool allows you to select furniture from e-catalogs and position them onto real photos of your room to help you can visualize how the items will fit in your space.

To begin creating your own virtual interior designs, simply take a photo of the room you want to decorate. Then, you can choose your furniture by browsing through Decolabs e-catalogs, which feature products from top European designers and brands, including Arne Jacobsen, B&B Italia, Cassina, Fritz Hansen, Vitra and Molteni & C. The e-catalogs have detailed information about each product, such as the brand, designer, sizes and available colors.

Furniture prices are not included in the product descriptions because users dont have the option to purchase items from the app yet  the company is working on making this feature available to users and expanding its selection of furniture.

The creative process comes in once youve selected your furniture: you can start to decorate your ideal room by adding and positioning the three-dimensional items wherever you want them to go. After your designs are completed, you can share them on social media or with Decolabs community of designers, who are there to give you creative feedback and recommendations on your new room. There are options to share your room with the entire community, or with just a select few friends.

With Decolabs, its only a matter of seconds that you can start to configure your own interior designs, Nicolas Verellen, CEO and founder of Decolabs, told Mashable. The augmented reality feature allows you to make a better evaluation of how your furniture will fit in your space and helps you justify the big investment that youre about to make.

Decolabs was released in May 2012 and has been downloaded 6,000 times since then, with most of its users being 25 to 45-year-old women in Europe. The company has a white-label business model in which they charge brands a monthly fee for letting them feature their furniture items on the app. In return, the Decolabs team provides the brand owners with a full analytics platform that they can use as a marketing tool.

Verellen developed Decolabs while attending idealabs  a three-month startup accelerator program in Antwerp, Belgium  and worked with a partner who was knowledgeable about augmented reality. They started with seed funding from idealabs and received additional funding from angel investors in their network. In total, the startup has raised $200,000 in funding.

The company plans to release its app for Android in the future.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The need to clear a bottleneck of unanalyzed DNA is undermining the Justice Department's ability to drive innovations that could more quickly solve both the backlog problem and new cases, some law enforcement experts say.

While police technology is nowhere close to what audiences see on forensic science dramas such as CSI and NCIS, so-called rapid DNA tools could move law enforcement in that direction.

But, backlog reduction programs account for the majority of DNA funding from the National Institute of Justice,the department's research and development arm and the only federal agency that provides resources for unclogging backlogs at crime labs. A prime area for experimentation is rapid DNA portable technology that can identify suspects in less than 90 minutes.

According to rapid DNA evangelists, Justice has pushed research and development as far as fiscally possible, but backlog expenses are consuming science funding that could provide hard leads earlier in investigations.

NIJ is in the process of drafting its official DNA report for 2012 and does not have final numbers yet, officials said. However, for 2011, the total funding available was $125 million. Of this amount, $88.7 million was spent on the DNA Backlog Reduction Program, $4.4 million to solve cold cases, and $13.5 million for research and development. Hence, three-quarters of the DNA funding NIJ received from congress went directly to crime labs and police department to reduce the backlog of DNA evidence and increase laboratory capacity and improve processing time. The bulk of the remaining one-quarter went to training, technical assistance for the field, and for dissemination of information to the field.

An estimated 400,000 rape kits alone sit on lab shelves nationwide, sometimes for decades. In general, backlogs include untested DNA swabs taken from convicted offenders, people arrested for certain felonies, and evidence investigators discover at crime scenes.

Options for hastening screening come with tradeoffs: "Do I let my scientist do some hours of R&D, or do I have that analyst take two more cases out of the backlog," pondered Tom OReilly, a former U.S. Justice official who now serves as executive director of the Rutgers University Police Institute.

Shifting DNA technology research to a science-focused agency outside Justice "might facilitate a more rapid development of that product but I also think it needs to be grounded in real-world practice with assistance from experienced authorities, he said.

The National Academy of Sciences in 2009 argued that major advances in DNA technology are unlikely if the federal government does not remove forensic science from Justices jurisdiction. The academy suggested the creation of a new independent agency for DNA research and development that would be free of competing law enforcement priorities.

Because the institute and the FBI "both are part of a prosecutorial department of the government, they could be subject to subtle contextual biases that should not be allowed to undercut the power of forensic science, the authors of a 2009 academy committee report wrote. There was also a strong consensus in the committee that no existing or new division or unit within DoJ would be an appropriate location for a new entity governing the forensic science community.

Institute and FBI officials declined to comment on the recommendation that forensic science be relocated to a different government agency.

Other researchers, however, say that DNA testing advances are constrained by inadequate funding  period  not the federal agency in charge.

The challenge is that NIJ has so few resources to dedicate to this issue and most of those that they receive are earmarked by Congress to go toward backlog reduction efforts, said Kelly Walsh, a researcher with the Justice Policy Center at the Urban Institute, a nonprofit think tank. Congress has not appropriated Justice enough money to support technology implementation to the same degree as a larger grant-making agency like the National Science Foundation, she added.

Also, even if rapid DNA tools were ubiquitous, the central FBI database does not have the capability to instantly identify matches, Walsh said. The system, called CODIS, only lets analysts enter or search profiles once a week.

Justice officials responded that the department has made some major contributions to the international field of forensic science. CODIS, which the FBI developed more than 20 years ago, now operates national databases for 42 countries, officials said.

CODIS is a valuable technical advancement for all law enforcement agencies throughout the world, FBI spokeswoman Ann Todd said in a statement. CODIS has been particularly helpful to investigations that are very old and no longer producing new leads. Decades ago, crimes from cold cases would have remained unsolved."

This article originally published at Nextgov here
--------------------------------------------------------------
There's a good chance you haven't drawn anything since that required art class in high school. Why? Let's face it, most adults don't consider themselves creative, and being stared down by a blank piece of paper is just as terrifying as seeing how pathetic your stick figures turned out.

A new iPad app called DrawQuest [iTunes link] from tech startup Canvas launched Thursday with ambitions to shake up the art-creation world by making it adult friendly  for beginners and advanced drawers.

It gives users a launching point to build off of, such as an ocean and beach dweller or a hat that you can paint a scene around, and it also features a social community to follow other users, favorite drawings and share to social networks.

DrawQuest is the latest venture from Chris Poole, creator of the ultra-successful website 4chan and was voted as the most influential person online by Time in 2008. In addition to running the online bulletin board as "a side project," Poole is also running the content-sharing and remixing site Canvas.

SEE ALSO: 10 Works of Art on Vine

"If you pull people off of the street and ask them if they are artistic, most will say 'no,'" Poole told Mashable. "People don't view a blank slate or canvas as an opportunity to be creative, so we wanted to get the ball rolling by creating a template for them to work with."

The template provides one already-drawn object to serve as a starting point to build a scene. But the company doesn't want users to just draw something every now and again, it wants its fan base to return to the app daily. Although there are existing apps on the market, DrawQuest is the first with a community and the company believes this is what will bring people back for more.

"Hipstamatic had filters long before Instagram, but when you saved pictures, it just went to your camera roll," he said. "Instagram took a similar concept and created a powerful community around it. We wanted a platform in which you could really engage with others."

As of right now, the community is still a little limited; for example, you can't make comments yet. But you can favorite pictures, follow users and "play back" drawings so you can see how someone created an image.

The skill levels of users range dramatically, so you'll never feel out of place while perusing the app. DrawQuest rewards active users by giving coins that unlock new color palates in time.

To start, users have access to the colors of the rainbow  ROYGBIV  but can bypass the unlocking stages by purchasing coins for new shades ($0.99 - $4.99).

The app also integrates with Facebook and Twitter, so you can share creations to social networks. Think of it as a modern-day way to tack up art on your refrigerator.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Takeru Kobayashi is a legend among men, thanks to his incredible ability to consume mass quantities of food in very little time. Despite standing just five-foot-eight and weighing in well under 150 pounds, the 34-year-old holds Guinness World Records for eating and is essentially the Michael Jordan of events with names like The Glutton Bowl and Nathan's Famous July 4 International Hot Dog-Eating Contest.

SEE ALSO: Why Mr. Sato Took on the 1,050-Piece Bacon Burger [VIDEO]

On Super Bowl Sunday, Kobayashi was the life of whatever party he was at. How? By eating an entire 12-inch Domino's pizza in one minute. If that's not a solid party trick, we don't know what is. The YouTube video above has been watched more than 600,000 times since Monday, so grab some Pepto Bismol and check it out for yourself.

What Kobayashi does is incredible, but should it be considered a sport? Give us your take in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Eric Schmidt is cashing in on his massive pile of Google shares  to the tune of more than $2.5 billion.

The chairman and former CEO has filed the necessary paperwork with the SEC that will let him sell roughly 42% of his stake in the search giant over the next year, Google announced Friday after the markets closed.

Over his decade at the company, Schmidt has netted 7.3 million Google shares, representing nearly 3% of the company. At $785.37 a share  the stock's new record high, which it hit Friday afternoon  selling 42% would net him roughly $2.51 billion.

Schmidt, 57, is the 138th richest billionaire in the world and the 49th richest in the US, according to the latest Forbes magazine rankings. That's based on an estimated net worth of $7.5 billion  which would have risen anyway, given the stock's recent climb. (Google's soaring share price added $1.3 billion to Schmidt's net wealth between 2011 and 2012.)

The decision to sell may merely reflect a desire to make his wealth more liquid, though we doubt it: Schmidt sold $69.3 million in stock late last year, which is hard for a busy man to spend that fast.

Or it may reflect a sense that Google's share price can't go much higher than it currently is. Either way, traders reacted nervously, and Google (GOOG) slipped three points from its historic high in after-hours trading.

Schmidt's current annual salary as chairman: $1.25 million. He also got a $100 million stock bonus when he transitioned out of the CEO role in 2011.

Why do you think Schmidt is selling? Tell us in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
From the man who brought you Rush Hour 3, it's FarmVille ... the TV show?

Zynga's social game monolith is being turned into a television show, according to the Wall Street Journal.

Brett Ratner, the director of the Rush Hour trilogy as well as Tower Heist, has been tapped to produce the series by Canadian production company Six Eleven Media.

"FarmVille is one of the most exciting brands out there today and its cross-platform opportunities are endless. I am thrilled to be expanding the brand with existing fans and also engaging a whole new audience, Ratner told the WSJ.

FarmVille and its sequel FarmVille 2 are some of the biggest games on Facebook, attracting millions of players to create farmsteads and grow virtual crops.

The game has already made the jump to other mediums; last year Hasbro released a FarmVille board game along with several other titles it licensed from Zynga.

Brett Ratner is also working a Hercules movie starring Dwayne "The Rock" Johnson that is listed on IMDB as being in "pre-production." He also previously produced FOX's Prison Break and Horrible Bosses.

What do you think a FarmVille TV show would be like? We're accepting your script treatments in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A hacker has released emails and photos ostensibly belonging to President George W. Bush and other members of the Bush family, including President George H.W. Bush.

The emails, shared by the hacker with The Smoking Gun, include photos and family discussions of President George H.W. Bush's recent hospital stay, George W. Bush's paintings (including self-portraits in the bathtub, below) and correspondences between Bush family members and close friends.

Among the photos leaked by the hacker are images of George H.W. Bush with President Bill Clinton at the Bush family's Maine residence and George W. Bush with designer Ralph Lauren. Also included is a list of home addresses, phone numbers and emails for a handful of Bush family members, including both former presidents.

At least six email accounts were hacked, including an AOL account owned by George W. Bush's sister Dorothy Bush Koch. Bush family friends Williard Hemingway and CBS sportscaster Jim Nantz were also among the hacker's victims.

The hacker identified himself as "Guccifer," which some commentators have suggested is a combination of "Gucci" and "Lucifer." A Google search for "Guccifer", limiting results to a period of time before the news of the hack first surfaced, did not return any results, suggesting this is the hacker's first significant action or the hacker is using a new pseudonym.

The hacker told The Smoking Gun that law enforcement began investigating him "a long time ago."

I have an old game with the f_cking bastards inside, this is just another chapter in the game," he said.

A criminal investigation of the hack has been launched, reported the Washington Post, which also confirmed the hack with a Bush family spokesperson.

George W. Bush has been keeping a mostly low political profile since leaving office. His father, George H.W. Bush, was released from the hospital last month following a serious bout with bronchitis.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Welcome to this morning's edition of "First To Know," a series in which we keep you in the know on what's happening in the digital world.

Today, we're looking at three particularly interesting stories. Greenlight Capital sued Apple Thursday, hoping the action would get Apple to return more of its cash reserves to shareholders. LinkedIn reported fourth-quarter earnings Thursday, pulling in $303.6 million in revenue, which soared past analyst expectations by more than $20 million. And Facebook had a bad day yesterday: problems with the Facebook Connect API caused errors on countless sites around the web.

Check out the video above for more on these stories.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Drones are here to stay, which is now a thought that hardly anybody doubts. The technology is getting cheaper, its applications are endless, and soon new regulations will finally open the door for them to fly freely. Liberalization is going to be closely followed by miniaturization. We've already seen examples of miniature drones in the civilian as well as the military world.

A swedish startup is amongst the companies at the forefront of this trend. Its mini drone, called Crazyflie Nano, is already available for preorder and is expected to start shipping this spring.

The drone is a quadrocopter equipped with multiple sensors and an antenna, and it weighs just 0.7 ounces and is less than 4 inches long. The tiny UAV is completely open source and hackable. In fact, as Wired reports, the three engineers behind the project have already received countless suggestions which led to modifications like adding a camera and LEDs.

The basic model of the drone is available for pre-order on the website Seeed, for $149. There will also be a more advanced version for $179.

Learn more about this tiny drone, and watch it in action, in the video above.
--------------------------------------------------------------
If you frequent the Internet, you've surely by now stumbled across at least one of these bizarre, confusing, hilarious and wholly mesmerizing "Harlem Shake" videos over the past few days.

But have you seen 17 of these Internet artifacts in one place? Well, we've collected a few handfuls of our YouTube favorites here for you to do just that. No need to thank us.

And if you're totally confused, here's the deal in a nutshell:

The basic premise is always pretty much the same. The song "Harlem Shake" by Baauer begins in a nondescript location that's totally unremarkable save for one person slightly dancing while wearing a mask. Then the line "do the Harlem Shake" comes in, the beat drops and things, well, things just get real weird real fast. Then it all ends after 31 seconds.

Anyway, what a world. What an Internet. Check out all the variations in the gallery above, then let us know which ones are your favorites in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Turns out NHL players aren't the only ones who are tough as nails  hockey reporters ain't no pansies neither. In this video from a Thursday night NHL game, New York Rangers rink-side reporter John Giannone gets smacked in the face with an errant pass. Giannone's face is nastily bloodied, but he remains unbowed. When a colleague asks if he's alright, Giannone answers "Oh, it's all good" as a medical staffer dabs at the mess on his face.

The surprising video's become something of a hit on the sports web, so check it out for yourself above.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Ever hear someone say, "I dont have a musical bone in my body"? Well as it turns out, everyone may have that musical bone.

Designer Pietr-Jan Pietr believes that anyone can make music simply by moving their finger or tapping their foot. He developed five simple instruments that make music using natural human movements, calling the set Sound on Intuition.

The idea came out of Pietrs graduate thesis at the Design Academy Eindhoven. It is based on the notion that whenever someone learns an instrument, they must teach their body certain movements in order to be able to play.

A flautist must master his fingers, a drummer his coordination, but a player of Pietrs instruments? They simply have to move as they normally would. The result is "instruments where you skip the learning process and just play," says Pietr.

Theres the Wob which, like a theremin, does not require any physical touch but rather uses a sensor so that when you wave you hand above it, a sound mimicking that wave is emitted.

The Fngr attaches to your index finger, creating a sound with every tap. And should you bend your finger, the tone will change with the movement. The Scan uses your handwriting, translating dots and lines you write on a page into electronic beeps.

Then theres a sensor that wraps around your food, called the Kick, which turns toe-tapping into a digital drum.

"All our movements are unique, conscious or unconscious," Pietr says. "Sound on Intuition captures this uniqueness and transforms it into sound."

The epitome of Sound on Intution is the last instrument, the Heart, which uses a stethoscope-type tool to pick up the users heartbeat. Linked to a computer, the heartbeat is transformed into a drum, a clap or whatever you program it to be.

All the instruments are designed as MIDI controllers, so that they are plugged into a laptop and can play any sound as long as it is rhythmic. There lies the rub. The instruments have very limited range because there is no melody, only repetition.

But that doesnt mean they cannot add something original to a track using traditional instruments. They let the musically curious, if slightly inept, join the musically talented in making new sound. Sound on Intuition wants to give the gift of music without the years of practice.

The thing is, Pietrs instruments can never give the gift of rhythm or keeping time, an innate talent and something useful when playing the Kick or the Fngr. But anyone can play the Heart and dance right along to their own heartbeat, and thats kind of magical isnt it?

This article originally published at PSFK here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Emperor penguin colonies are not easy to find: Their breeding grounds are remote, icy expanses, that are unobservable at distances greater than just a few kilometers due to the curvature of the Earth.

So scientists who want to monitor how these birds are faring in an unstable environment have had to come up with inventive ways of spotting them. One effective option: Penguin guano stains, as viewed from space.

In 2009, researchers published a paper identifying 10 new penguin colony locations based on satellite images of "faecal staining."

"We can't see actual penguins on the satellite maps because the resolution isn't good enough. But during the breeding season the birds stay at a colony for eight months. The ice gets pretty dirty and it's the guano stains that we can see," Peter T. Fretwell, one of the paper's authors, told the Guardian at the time. In addition to the 10 new colonies, they were also able to confirm or revise the locations of 26 previously known colonies as well.

Now one of those 10 colonies has received its first human visitors. In December, a team of Belgian and Swiss explorers traveled by snowmobile and foot 30 miles from their base on the Derwael Ice Rise, where they are studying ice loss. They arrived at the colony around midnight (still light out in Antarctica at that time of year) and were stunned to find thousands upon thousands of penguins, some 9,000 or 10,000 all told, depending on who's counting.

"It was almost midnight when we succeeded in finding a way down to the ice through crevasses and approached the first of five groups of more than a thousand individuals, three quarters of which were chicks. This was unforgettable moment," Alain Hubert, the expedition's leader, said in a statement.

On NPR, Hubert described that moment to host Neal Conan(worth listening to in full), "After a few minutes, you have those penguins, you know, just comes to say hello and to look at you, because they are the local population. We are not." The guano, Hubert told Conan, doesn't smell  it's too cold. But, he reports, "I spoke to some scientists that and they told me, if it was a bit warmer, it's really smelly."

Pictures from the expedition capture that moment of first contact and more are available on Hubert's website.

Images courtesy of Global Ecology and Biogeography and International Polar Foundation

This article originally published at The Atlantic here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Iran showed images of its new "super-advanced" stealth jet last week, boasting its capabilities and trumpeting what would be a great step forward for its limited military force. If only it could actually fly. As it turns out, according to aviation experts, the plane might very well be a fake.

Aviation blogger David Cenciotti thought there was something fishy when he saw the plane. He broke down all his suspicions in a couple of posts on The Aviationist. "Overall, the plane seems to lack the characteristic rivets, bolts all aircraft, including stealthy ones, feature. Images released so far show it as a plastic-made aircraft," he writes.

Not only does it seem to be made of plastic, it might even be too tiny to be a real jet. "The cockpit seems to be too small, to such an extent a normal pilot doesnt properly fit in the ejection seat. Have you ever seen a pilot with his knees above the side borders of the cockpit and his helmet well beyond the ejection seats head pad?" he asks rhetorically.

SEE ALSO: Iran Claims to Have Launched This Monkey Into Space

The jet is so small, in fact, that as Foreign Policy points out, it's hard to believe it can carry all the equipment it's supposed to have on board.

To learn more about this alleged fake plane, watch the video above.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Sheer blouses and body-hugging sheath dresses weren't the only things designer Kimberly Ovitz sent down the runway at her Fall/Winter 2013 collection show on Thursday. Clasped on the hands, ears and around the necks of models were pieces of 3D-printed jewelry, which Ovitz released on the website of 3D-printing firm Shapeways immediately after the show.

There are five pieces from the collection available for purchase, ranging from a $35 ear cuff to a $250 necklace inspired by "the intricate exoskeletons found in nature," per Ovitz's description.

Elisa Richardson, manager of PR and social media at Shapeways, says Ovitz and her team reached out to Shapeways after reading up on 3D printing. Shapeways' platform allows anyone to upload designs for products that are only printed after customers place orders, eliminating minimum volume requirements and giving younger designers like Ovitz the confidence to experiment. It also enabled Ovitz to make her designs available for purchase immediately after the show.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Amazon has launched a new video ad for the Kindle HD 8.9, and it's not beating around the bush this time. The ad is a direct comparison with Apple's iPad, claiming the two devices' screens are virtually identical, while the price for the Kindle is much lower.

"This is the iPad with Retina display," says the text of the ad. "And this is the new Kindle Fire HD with an 8.9-inch display (...) You may not be able to tell the difference. But your wallet definitely can," the ad concludes.

The difference in price is, indeed, substantial. The Kindle Fire HD 8.9'' starts at $299, while the iPad starts at $499. In his review, Mashable's Lance Ulanoff called the device "good, but no iPad killer". However, if the price is crucial, it'll probably be the first choice for many buyers.

What do you think? Is the Kindle Fire HD 8.9 really a better bang for the buck? Share your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
On any given weekend across the country, tiny humans take the stage caked in makeup, spray tans and giant hair to be judged on beauty and character.

From the makers of Toddlers & Tiaras, comes the only show dedicated to baby hackers coding in basements. With iPads in their chubby hands, they're plotting to take over the world, one download at a time.

Anyway, that's one of many hilarious fake TV pitches during this week's game of MashTags: #WebRealityShows.



Use the hashtag on Twitter, not in the comments. We'll showcase the funniest hashtagged tweets below. The top three will be retweeted from @mashable.

Be sure to follow our Watercooler account, which will also retweet some of our favorites.
--------------------------------------------------------------
"Menswear Dog" made the Internet sit up straight and adjusted their skinny ties last week when he debuted on Tumblr. The handsome Shiba Inu with a flair for fashion models looks that any dapper gentleman would be keen to copy.

Grab a pencil for note-taking and prepare to absorb some valuable fashion advice worth barking about. Menswear Dog shared 10 of his top-shelf style tips with Mashable, just in time for Fashion Week.

SEE ALSO: 'Menswear Dog' Is Totally More Stylish Than You
--------------------------------------------------------------
Microsoft announced Friday that SkyDrive has hit a major milestone: there are now more than 1 billion Office documents stored on the cloud service.

SkyDrive has been around since 2007, but it really gained traction at the end of 2011 when Microsoft started rolling out SkyDrive apps for iPhone, Android and Windows phones. The service is also integrated more seamlessly into the latest version of Microsoft Office, which was released at the end of last month.

To help SkyDrive grow even more quickly, Microsoft announced that it will now let users share and edit documents from Office web apps without requiring them to sign in with a Microsoft account. It's not a huge change, but it does remove a restriction that may have stopped some from storing and sharing documents through the service.
--------------------------------------------------------------
On Feb. 22, NASA will host the first Google+ Hangout live from on board the International Space Station orbiting 240 miles above Earth.

NASA astronauts Kevin Ford and Tom Marshburn, along with the Canadian Space Agencys Chris Hadfield will be on hand to answer social media followers' questions about what it's like to live in space. You can submit a question by sending a video prior to the Hangout. Crew members will also take a few real-time questions from social media fans on Google+, Twitter and Facebook.

While this will be the first Google+ Hangout from space, it won't be the first time NASA has hosted a live video conference with astronauts on the ISS. The difference is that most of these chats have been a one-way video of the astronauts in space. A Google+ Hangout allows up to 10 people to video chat face-to-face, while thousands of people can watch via Google+ or YouTube.

SEE ALSO: 15 Twitter Accounts Every Space Lover Should Follow

On Feb. 7, NASA TV and the Canadian Space Agency live streamed a one-way video chat with Commander Hadfield (see video below). The 30-minute session was particularly popular because Star Trek's William Shatner called in to ask a couple of questions.

"You've been a test pilot, the utmost example of courage. How do you deal with the fear, which is also applicable to space?" Shatner asked Hadfield.

"What I'm scared most of is not knowing what to do next," he replied. "After years of training, you practice everything down to the details so you have the confidence that comes with that."

Hadfield, who has a large social media following himself, also took some questions from the public. One of the more interesting inquiries came from a Canadian woman named Katrina, who asked what astronomical objects can be seen from the ISS.

"Most of our glances are back towards Mother Earth, but we do have windows that face the rest of the universe," Hadfield replied. "The sky is almost white with the light of the universe and uncountable number of stars, but there is a lot of variation to it, even with just the naked eye. You can see the whole dark sections where there is dark matter or dust or whatever it is that is between us and the rest of the universe."

For the Google+ Hangout this month, NASA says crew members will likely to select the most "unique and original" questions. The live chat will start at 11 a.m. EST and is slated to last one hour.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The beauty of nature comes to life in GIF form on Tumblr blog Head Like an Orange.

A 28-year-old Dutchman and GIF-crafting master named Marinus started the oddly-named Tumblr that features stunning wildlife snippets. Take a stroll through nature without leaving your cubicle.
--------------------------------------------------------------
What do you get when you combine a massive winter storm with the potential to drop between one and three feet of snow with the latest and greatest video-sharing app? A torrent of excellent snowfall footage, that's what.

Mashable is curating the best Vine content from Winter Storm Nemo in this post. Have a video that you've safely taken? Post the link as a comment and we will consider adding it to our collection.

1. Boston is getting some of the worst of Nemo  it's already tough to park a car:

2. The snow's falling in Connecticut  and so are the Nemo jokes:

3. Some people are staying dry by hitting the bar:

4. and 5. It's getting slushy in New York City:

6. For some, snow means just one thing  it's time for sledding!

7. The storm isn't just bringing snow  it's bringing heavy winds, too:

8. Man's best friend is having a great time:

9. Syracuse University in Syracuse, N.Y., is getting it bad  but they're used to a bit of the white stuff there:

10. The best solution to a snowy weekend? Hang around a warm fireplace:
--------------------------------------------------------------
People young and old prefer reading paper books to tablets and e-readers, but older individuals could find themselves reading faster and with less effort on a tablet. The news came from a small study released this week in PLOS ONE from researchers at the historic epicenter of the printed word  Johannes Gutenberg University in Mainz, Germany.

Among 360 readers ages 21 to 34, no difference in reading speed or brain effort was detected between reading via a book, a Kindle e-reader and an iPad. But big differences were recorded among 21 users ages 60 to 77 when they read the same text on paper instead of the devices. In fact, using an iPad improved speed and reduced effort compared to paper and e-readers. Researchers measured eye movements and brain activity from EEG readings to determine ease of reading.

Traditional ereaders were no help: Reading a short page of text on a Kindle took the older group about 28 seconds, the longest of the three. Switching to the printed book shaved 1.5 seconds off the time. But reading on an iPad took just 24 seconds, that's 2.5 seconds faster than reading on paper. While that may not represent a big timesaver when skimming news headlines, it could save hours reading "War and Peace."

The researchers concluded that the iPad's backlighting, which was adjusted to thebrightest setting, made the difference. All tablets use backlighting, while e-readers use what's called an E Ink display that provides less contrast than a brighter tablet (although it allows people to read in bright sunlight).

But despite the physical findings, older adults and their younger counterparts said they got more pleasure reading from a paper book. The researchers said this was evidence of a cultural bias against digital books rather than a cognitive phenomenon.

It seems that for older individuals, at least, tradition trumps ease of use.

This article originally published at TechNewsDaily here
--------------------------------------------------------------
The school classroom experience is not just about pen and paper anymore  computers and tablets have changed all that. And wait until we let the robots take over. It might happen sooner rather than later, if a startup called RobotsLab has its way.

The company, which is the educational division of RobotAppStore, has launched a toolbox, simply called "RobotsLab BOX" to be used in classrooms. The box is equipped with all kinds of bots: a Parrot AR drone, a Sphero robotic ball, a Mobot two-wheeled modular robot vehicle, and an Armbot robotic arm.

This robot-filled box comes with a tablet too. The tablet not only serves as a remote control for the bots, but also contains everything a teacher needs to use the robots in a useful, educational way. There are 50 lessons from a STEM curriculum, instructions on how to use the robots, and quizzes.

The idea is to use the bots to teach kids in 7th to 12th grade geometry, algebra or physics  in a fun way.

"Students are much more engaged and excited when seeing abstract subjects, like Algebra, coming to life using robots," said Elad Inbar, CEO of RobotsLab in a press release.

SEE ALSO: Here Is the Robot That Will Extract Water From the Moon

The standard version of the box will cost $3,500. But there's also a deluxe version, with more lessons and an extended warranty for $3,999. For Evan Ackerman at IEEE Spectrum, the price might be a little bit too steep. "We love this idea, but the question here is really going to be whether the included curriculum is able to justify the added expense and complexity of the robots," he writes.

To learn more about this box full of robots, watch the video above. And, as a bonus, watch the video below to see a NAO Robot explain what's inside the box.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Valentine's Day is a difficult holiday. On Feb. 14, year after year, you remember that you're completely unoriginal and lack the qualities every rom-com character seems to possess by default.

SEE ALSO: 10 Valentine's Day Cards for Your Geeky Sweetheart

Yes, there are ways to use the web on this day of love without having to Google "romantic date ideas" or "things to do alone on Valentine's Day" (yikes). We've rounded up seven websites and tools to get your wooing wheel spinning. Use these ideas as guides to complement your V-Day plans.

Which ideas will you use for your special someone? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Despite being among the brightest objects in the sky, Mercury is a planet very rarely seen by even experienced stargazers. The next couple of weeks offer the best opportunity in 2013 for observers in the Northern Hemisphere to spot Mercury's tiny speck of light in the evening twilight sky.

The trick for spotting Mercury is first to find an observing location with a low unobstructed western horizon, wait for half an hour after sunset for the sky to darken, and then sweep to the left of the sunset with binoculars. Once you've initially located the planet with binoculars, you can usually see Mercury with the unaided eye. Don't wait too late, or Mercury will have set. In a telescope, Mercury appears as a tiny "half moon."

Probably the earliest you can spot Mercury will be on the night of Feb. 8. This is a special night because Mars will appear very close to Mercury in the sky, giving observers a view of two planets at once.

Appearances are deceptive, though, because Mercury will be on the near side of the sun while Mars is on the far side, putting them 1.162 times the distance of the Earth from the sun (108 million miles, or 174 million kilometers) apart. Because of its greater distance from both Earth and the sun, Mars will appear 2.2 magnitudes fainter than Mercury on astronomers' brightness scale.

SEE ALSO: How to See More Planets in February Night Sky

A second opportunity to catch Mercury and Mars will occur three evenings later on Monday (Feb. 11). Though not as close together, the near proximity of a slender crescent moon will make finding the pair easier. Look with binoculars for the "dark side" of the moon illuminated only by Earthshine: sunlight reflected from Earth.

A third opportunity to see Mercury occurs on Feb.15, when Mercury is at greatest elongation from the sun. This places Mercury at its highest altitude this month for observers in the Northern Hemisphere. Mars will probably have sunk too far toward the sun to be visible.

Why are some apparitions of Mercury better than others? It has to do with the angle between the observer's horizon and the ecliptic, the path that the sun and planets follow across the sky.

In the Northern Hemisphere, from February through April, the ecliptic at sunset is steeply angled to the horizon, placing Mercury relatively high. From August through October, the ecliptic lies almost parallel with the horizon at sunset, placing Mercury close to the horizon.

Take advantage of these opportunities to spot Mercury this month, and youll be able to say that you've seen something few astronomers have.

This article originally published at Space.com here
--------------------------------------------------------------
When youre ready to upgrade from your old tablet, you have a lot to think about. Should you sell or donate it? How do you make sure all of your personal information is safely wiped? We answer all of those questions and more, so you can rest easy as you shop for a new device.

Note: Be sure to back up any important information, such as old documents, receipts or passwords.

If you have an iPad, heres how to wipe it safely so you can still access your iTunes backup file from any of your other Apple devices:

If you have an Android tablet, heres how to restore it to factory settings. This will wipe your personal data from the device, so make sure youre ready to part with everything  the process cannot be reversed.

If you follow these steps for your Android or Apple tablet, the next owner wont be able to recover any of your personal data.

Lots of online programs will trade you cash for your tablet  that is, if its in good condition. Amazon, Best Buy and RadioShack offer trade-in programs for store gift cards, while eBays trade-in program pays you via PayPal.

Sites such as BuyBackWorld, Gazelle and NextWorth generally offer the most bang for your buck, though, and youll get cold, hard cash for your efforts to spend wherever you please.

Apples Recycling Program gave Apple Gift Cards of up to $105 for a 16GB Wi-Fi, 1st-gen iPad as of press time, while the 2nd- and 3rd-gen models were worth $175 and $200, respectively.

Unfortunately, Android tablets dont retain their value the same way Apple products do. A 32GB Wi-Fi Samsung Galaxy Tab 7.0 Plus went for only $62 on NextWorth and $94 on eBay, while the 8GB Amazon Kindle Fire was worth $60 on Amazon and $40 on BuyMyTronics.

Its also worth noting that many online retailers dont accept older-model Android tablets, so it will be harder to sell those back.

If youre feeling generous and simply want to donate your tablet, many programs can ensure it will go to someone who will appreciate it. For example, thanks to an Apple program, you can donate your old iPad to an Apple Store, which will then donate the machine to Teach for America.

Through other online donations services, such as Computers with Causes, Recycling for Charities and The Digital Office, you can donate your old tablet to schools, organizations or someone in need.

This article originally published at LAPTOP Magazine here
--------------------------------------------------------------
When you brainstorm ideas for Valentine's Day gifts, you probably think of flowers and chocolate. Or, since you're a Mashable reader, you might prefer more techie offerings, like chargers and phone or tablet accessories.

Here's an idea  have you thought of a sex toy? Some studies report more than half of women are using personal pleasure devices  vibrators. So why do they still seem taboo?

That might soon change as the adult industry becomes both a little more connected and more mainstream. OhMiBod, for instance, is a company based in New Hampshire started by a husband and wife. I first met Suki Dunham, founder of OhMiBod, when I was at the International Consumer Electronics Show in 2007. The pair was showing their music-driven vibrator at the Adult Entertainment Expo, taking place at the same time. It was the first such product on the market.

You could say they've come a long way, baby. Since then, they've released wireless, rechargeable versions and an iOS app. At the most recent CES, OhMiBod's third as an exhibitor, they unveiled the Club Vibe 3.OH, the first Bluetooth-controlled wearable vibrator.

Dunham says the technology enabled in their development "supports one of OhMiBod's primary missions: using sex-positive products to help both singles and couples alike to explore, discover and grow their passions."

SEE ALSO: 14 Fabulous Gift Ideas for Your Techie Valentine

Also at CES this year was the We-Vibe 3, designed for couples. Grant Bechthold, VP of product development for Standard Innovation, which makes the vibrators, says it's really about using tech for sexual health.

"Tech can replace the human experience," he told Mashable, "but we don't want tech to replace it. It's like contact lenses; we want a great user experience but don't want to know it's there."

He says men are typically threatened by these devices, but they shouldn't be. "Tech as an enhancer creates a better user couple experience  it doesn't interfere with the human touch, it helps to augment."

We've rounded up the latest connected sex toys for you to peruse. Some are connected to an app, some to a remote control. These can all be ordered online, and most come in luxury gift boxes complete with charger, satin storage pouch or bag and, in some cases, a user manual.

Let us know what you think as the adult entertainment world incorporates technology into its development.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Tackle the high pressure this Valentine's Day by arming yourself with humor. (Chocolate doesn't hurt either.) Someecards helps keep things light with rib-tickling ecards perfect for lovers, singletons and Scrooges.

Scroll through 10 of our favorites and share with your special someone.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The first 90 seconds of this video will probably bore you. Then your mind will be blown. Seriously  you'll be straight up gobsmacked.

Anderson Cooper discovered this talented treat when he held his own version of America's Got Talent on his talk show.

This painter showed up, promised Cooper and his co-judges (including Sharon Osbourne) a masterpiece in under two minutes. They were doubtful. Then they were proved wrong  very wrong.

SEE ALSO: 10 Works of Art on Vine

Who knew "speed painting" was even a thing?
--------------------------------------------------------------
I used to regard myself as one of those tech-savvy moms. You know the type - someone who knew how to set up a home network and was always up-to-date with the latest hardware and software. I even had my kids tech habits under control. There was a strict 'no-tech-before-homework' rule, parental controls on all the computers and a total of three hours a week set aside for video games. It worked well for about a year. Then everything went mobile and I lost control.

The lightning-fast transition to mobile technology has left me - and Im sure a lot of other parents - at a disadvantage. Our perfectly controlled worlds of scheduled tech time and filtered content have been replaced by an anytime, anywhere muddle of smartphones, tablets and connected gaming devices. As always, the device manufacturers are well ahead of the software developers when it comes to parental controls. While the iPhone, iPad and the latest Windows phones have some "pass-along controls" aimed at much younger kids, the majority of mobile devices leave our kids two clicks away from the most inappropriate content imaginable.

SEE ALSO: Parent's Dilemma: Are You Raising Tech-Addicted Kids?

So what is a concerned parent supposed to do? Well, one thing it has taught me is to focus more on being a mentor rather than a gatekeeper. If there is no way to block everything out, then the challenge is to teach good decision-making: to turn our kids into their own gatekeepers.

That, of course, is easier said than done. Take the case of mobile social networking. My daughters first smartphone roughly coincided with the time we let her have a Facebook account. Luckily, I was able to make a deal where all email notifications came to me, and almost 18 months and 500 friends later, she seems to have avoided any serious mishaps.

But as we know, things move fast in the world of technology. Soon after she got comfortable with Facebook, she wanted a Twitter account, and then Instagram. Then it was cool to SnapChat. Then videosharing came along with Keek and now Vine. None of these social networks and messaging tools have any controls worth talking about, although many of them are clearly aimed at a younger audience.

For parents, mobile technology has become a losing game of Whac-A-Mole, as we desperately try to keep up with all the various apps and communication platforms that are currently in vogue. And for every app that we think we understand, there are five more that we have yet to learn about. So here are some of my best practices you can follow to keep up:

Dont Wait  This is not 2011 - everything has changed drastically - kids younger and younger are exposed to and using technology - so start as soon as your child is born - learn about apps and learning tools and start planning ahead for every stage of your childs life. Regardless of age, install filters and anti-virus protection on your computer and on your mobile devices. The second you give your child a device, make sure he or she understands its not theirs. Its yours  you pay for it and you will activate restrictions on it for their protection. Have the trust conversation. Demonstrate how she starts with 100% of your trust - both parents represented is ideal, and explain that if she loses it - it will take a LONG time to gain it back. Start her on Facebook using your email account and clearly establish the rules of content and behavior that are expected of her and her friends. (Weve only stepped in once to block someone with a constant use of the F bomb). Remember that you know your child best. If you notice changes in behavior, step in and find out whats causing them immediately. Be positive about technology, dont blame it for the evils of the world, welcome it in support of her relationships with friends and school work. Play video games together (ask her to show you her favorites and why).

Now some advice for you. Turn off your smartphone at home as often as possible  be the person you want your child to become.

I dont think of myself as a tech-savvy mom anymore. Instead, Im just a concerned parent trying to keep up. What are some of your best practices? Share them with us in the comments below.

This post is part of a series on the dilemmas of raising digital kids. We'd like to hear some of the parenting issues technology has raised for you. Please let us know in the comments, or on our Mashable Lifestyle Facebook page. You can also follow and tweet us @mashlifestyle.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Proving that love and humor can come in the smallest of forms, Redditor afdlips's "newest hobby" is making the Internet happy today. Behold, tiny dads.

He takes fathers and makes them small, like tiny. Because nothing says "Gee, Pop, I love ya" than seeing him four inches tall and wearing a jet pack.

This is exactly why Photoshop was invented. No other reason at all.

So take a minute, reflect on all that your dad has given you and then submit a request to afdlips to get your own family portrait miniaturized.

SEE ALSO: Tumblr Discovers Things That Fit Perfectly Into Other Things

And whoever may try and say that the Internet is a soul-less place, we'd like to take a minute to point out that this experiment in photo editing has given this Redditor a true sense of nostalgia.

"If I can inspire at least one thing from small dadding, is that we all need to take more pics with our fathers. Also. Hire me. I'm a professional photographer and I'll shop your dad down."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Small cars are nice in a crowded city, where parking spaces are tight, but how small is too small? In the latest episode of Top Gear, Jeremy Clarkson tests the smallest car in the world  the P45.

Built by Clarkson himself, the P45 is not only far smaller than any car you've seen, it's even smaller than most bikes.

Of course, such tiny size comes with certain...disadvantages. Check out the video to see what they are, and tell us: would you consider buying such a car?
--------------------------------------------------------------
Here's a tiny development in cancer prevention with big potential. Researchers have identified a molecule that causes the immune system to prevent the formation and spread of tumors.

This molecule, called TIC10, triggers a cancer-killing protein researchers refer to as TRAIL, an acronym for Tumor necrosis factor Related Apoptosis Inducing Ligand.

Check out the video above for more about TRAIL.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Twitter quietly added a new (and still experimental) language option Friday, one for the Cheezburger cognoscenti. Under Settings > Language, just between Korean and Malay, you'll find this curious designation: Lolcat - LOLCATZ (beta).

The operative word here is "beta." Don't expect every word of every tweet to suddenly read like it came out of a hilarious cat meme. Probably its most amusing use case for now: changing your co-worker's Twitter feeds when they're not looking. (Your amusement may vary.)

So what's changed? "Who to follow" has become "HOO 2 FOLLOW," "home" is now "HUM," "view my profile page" becomes "VIEW MAH PROFILE PUJ" and "expand" has hilariously transformed into "EXPAN. KTHX." Check it out:

"KTHXBYE!" has also been randomly inserted into the "Trends" window, although as all LOLCat fans know, that should really be spelled BAI. Presumably that will change as the hardworking engineers of Twitter refine their LOLCat language skills.

We asked Twitter for comment, and a spokesperson directed us to this tweet:

Of course, making Twitter fully LOLCat-compliant won't require much adjustment. There are already plenty of users who think they're composing text messages and save characters by writing "ur" in place of "your."

Check out the beta version at twitter.com/?lang=lolc. And a big furry tip of the hat to The Next Web for spotting it first.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The way to bring that hoity-toity hipster in your life back down to Earth may not be a swift smack to the head after all. It may just be "Unpretentiousil," advertised in this new YouTube video as a "cure" for "hipster"  or, as it's less commonly known, "Hyper Involuntary Panic Stress Tension Elevation Response disorder." The ailment apparently afflicts men and women between the ages of 16 and 35, and is marked by a number of all-too-recognizable symptoms.

SEE ALSO: Is This the Hipster-est Hipster in Hipster History? [PIC]

This may just be the most relevant drug ad of our time, so check it out above and let us know what you think in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Reporters and other attendees of New York Fashion Week are continuing to explore new methods for live reporting. After embracing Instagram a year ago, and Viddy and other forms of mobile video in September, Twitter's newly released video app, Vine, has emerged as the recording (and sharing) platform of choice this season.

Vine has proved uniquely suited to NYFW coverage so far. Elizabeth Holmes, style reporter for The Wall Street Journal, and Stella Bugbee, editorial director of The Cut, are using the app to capture multiple looks  sometimes as many as six  in looping rotation. It's both more efficient and gives viewers a better sense of the clothes than Instagram, which, as a photo app, doesn't capture movement, and would take more time to edit and share as many looks.

Reporters aren't the only ones using Vine. Designers and retailers are also using the app to bring viewers backstage. Here, designer Christian Siriano shows model castings in progress:

We've rounded up a few more first-hand examples from Twitter's Jenna Mannos, style blogger Leandra Medine and fashion retailer MrPorter.com:
--------------------------------------------------------------
If you ask Twitter's CEO Dick Costolo why the company decided to buy Vine, an app for creating and sharing six-second videos, the answer is simple: It's the next big thing. "When Facebook bought Instagram, I said were not going do what those other guys did. Were looking for the next thing," Costolo told The Wall Street Journal in a recent interview. "We all agreed that this is the next thing down the road."

That might sound like little more than the trademark optimism of a Silicon Valley exec if not for how quickly the app has taken off. In just the two weeks since Vine launched on the iPhone, news outlets have used it to capture stories, brands have used it to create ads and contests, designers have used it to offer glimpses backstage during New York Fashion Week and big name-celebrities have used it to engage with their fans. In fact, the service has been talked about so much  both for good reasons and bad  that Jon Stewart recently dedicated a segment on The Daily Show to making fun of it.

What makes all this hype around the app particularly striking is that Vine isn't a new concept. During the past two years, dozens of startups have tried to accomplish what Twitter has come close to doing in about two weeks: bring mobile video sharing to the mainstream.

SEE ALSO: 7 Ways Vine Can Make Animation Easier

These startups tried a range of approaches and many raised seven or even eight-figure funding deals to meet that goal. Some, like Viddy and Socialcam, focused on applying visual Instagram-style filters to videos, while others like Strum focused on providing audio filters to create music videos. Some like Lightt and Lumify prompted users to capture short 10 to 20-second videos, others like Thwapr let users share videos up to 30-minutes long. Still others, like the recently shut down Color, focused on sharing live videos.

Vine's secret weapon is a combination of being simpler to use than most video apps and the fact that it has one of the biggest social networks in the world as a parent company and platform. "It's really beautifully integrated with Twitter and there's a new level of simplicity around video capture that they hit on that has made it intriguing to people," said Pam Kramer, president at Lightt and a former VP of consumer marketing at Twitter. "I think it moved a step ahead from integrating a still photo to integrating something more dynamic."

Most of the startups we spoke with believe that Twitter's decision to invest in Vine and the app's subsequent success is much-needed validation that social video apps are a worthwhile business venture. "When we launched Strum, there was a kind of skepticism around social video in general. People were saying it had come and gone and questioned if that was something people will ever want to do," said Prerna Gupta, chief product officer at Smule, the company behind Strum. "Vine re-legitimizes the social video space."

Yet, there is also an awareness among some of these companies that Vine's success could pose challenges going forward for other social video apps on the market  particularly those that are most similar to Vine.

"My perpective is that you know you've developed the right product when the 800-pound gorilla tries to develop a similar product," said Michael Downing, CEO of Tout, about Twitter's decision to enter the video space. "It's great because it validates we created the right product, but that validation now has us potentially competing with an 800-pound gorilla who is also a pioneer in the real-time web. It's great, but also stressful."

For Tout  which lets users capture 15-second videos, and works with brands and celebrities the concern is that Vine might eventually become the first choice for those companies and high-profile users. For other apps, the question is whether Vine will come to overshadow the rest of the market, or whether there is enough demand for different types of video experiences to support the many other video apps out there. "With photo, maybe you can say one app can serve 90% of use cases, but with video I think we see more use cases come out," Gupta says.

As it happens, Vine may have already claimed its first causality earlier this week. Viddy  one of the most well-known social video apps and one of the most well-funded  ditched its CEO due to declining user numbers and, reportedly, because of his fateful decision to turn down an acquisition offer from Twitter that could have put Viddy in Vine's place. Viddy declined to comment for this story.

Newcomers to the social video space are also grappling with the reality of competing with Twitter. Qwiki, a startup that launched in 2010 as a video search engine and later as a tool for publishers, pivoted into the mobile social video space this week with the launch of a new video-sharing app for iPhone. The app's focus is more on creating professional-looking videos based on the media already on your phone, but Qwiki's founder and CEO Doug Imbruce says his company has already found at least one disadvantage in dealing with Twitter. Any Vine video shared on Twitter automatically starts playing when a user taps to expand a tweet, but Twitter appears to be excluding other video apps from enjoying that feature.

"Twitter will not give us autoplay capability. You have to opt in to playing Qwiki," Imbruce says. It might sound small, but as Imbruce points out, "three seconds on the Internet is a lifetime. It's a big competitive advantage [for Vine]."

The silver lining for these startups is that they aren't the only ones figuring out how to compete with Twitter in the video space; bigger companies are likely thinking about this on some level as well. Both Downing and Gupta say they expect Facebook, Google and others to follow in Twitter's footsteps, either by building video-sharing applications in-house or by acquiring them. Downing, for his part, says that Tout has been approached by more potential acquirers since Vine's launch. "Since the Vine thing happened, that general theme of conversation has definitely peaked up a little bit," he says.

Even with the potential threat Twitter poses to their businesses, the startups we spoke with generally say they'd prefer to see Vine continue to be successful rather than go down as a fad. "I do sincerely believe it is better if Vine takes off. To me, it was really sad when we got those responses about people being so skeptical about video," Gupta says. "The more companies succeed in this space, the more it legitimizes it though there's always that risk that it's a winner-take-all scenario."

Mashable composite. Images courtesy of Vine and via iStockphoto, craftvision
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Pirate Bay documentary TPB AFK: The Pirate Bay Away From Keyboard is now available online.

The film made its premiere at the 63rd Berlin International Film Festival and simultaneously debuted online. TPB AFK chronicles the founders of The Pirate Bay during their legal battle in Sweden. In 2009, the founders were convicted of promoting piracy, sentenced to a year in prison and fined 30 million Swedish krona ($3.5 million).

The film, directed by Simon Klose, will make its U.S. premiere at SXSW 2013.

Understanding that the film  which was partially funded by Kickstarter  is about Internet culture, Klose chose to release the film under the Creative Commons license. As a result, viewers are free to copy, share and remix the film  they just can't sell it.

In addition to releasing the film on YouTube, the film is available for download on The Pirate Bay. Users can also pay to download the film and pre-order it on DVD.

I haven't had a chance to watch the film  but I look forward to viewing it tonight.

What do you think of the film and the way its director is choosing to distribute it to the world? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
IBM's cognitive supercomputer, called Watson, famously won Jeopardy two years ago. That was just the beginning. IBM has built six Watsons in the last year, deploying them to do what the system was designed for: Give healthcare professionals fast answers to complex medical questions.

Both the Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center and WellPoint have gotten themselves a Watson, and have been training them in the last year to apply its learning algorithms and vast computing power to helping patients. Similar to Siri, Watson was designed to give useful answers to natural-language questions. Rather than spitting back a series of links like a traditional search engine, Watson tries to find the single, correct answer to whatever it's asked.

For Memorial Sloan-Kettering, that means giving Watson more than 600,000 pieces of medical evidence, two million pages of text from medical journals, and 1.5 million patient records to sift through before it was ready to answer real questions about cancer treatment. WellPoint got Watson up to speed with a similar data dump, including 14,700 hours of hands-on training from nurses.

SEE ALSO: IBM's Watson Supercomputer Takes a Beating on Conan

As a result of all this programming and testing, the two companies are introducing a Watson-powered product, Interactive Care Insights for Oncology. It'll be the first Watson-based adviser for doctors, available via the cloud, designed to help them find the best treatment options for cancer patients. Lung cancer is the first target, but other types of cancer will follow.

WellPoint will offer two other Watson-based systems, an Interactive Care Guide and Interactive Care Reviewer, which are both intended to speed up initial testing for individuals.

Besides faster medical answers, Watson promises to address three issues in medicine: First, it can stay apprised of all new medical evidence in any field better than doctors, who typically spend just 5 hours a week learning new medicine. Second, it can take into account a patient's entire medical history, giving truly individualized care. Third, it frees medical expertise from location  since Watson is cloud-based, a patient in Bangladesh can potentially receive the same diagnosis as someone in New York City.

"The power of Watson expands access to care," Tracey Weisberg, medical oncology president of the Maine Center for Cancer, said at an IBM event to unveil the new Watson-based products. "I believe it has the power to personalize each patient's cancer care."

What do you think of doctors increasingly relying on computer systems like Watson? Share your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The winter storm that's hit the Northeastern U.S., dubbed "Nemo" by the Weather Channel, is testing first responders and emergency preparedness, but it's also testing the a newly implemented system to alert wireless subscribers of emergencies via their cellphones.

Several Verizon customers in the New York City area  including Mashable staff members  received an alert about the storm on Thursday. Some T-Mobile and Sprint customers got the alert, too. Sent via text message, the alerts are part of the new Wireless Emergency Alerts (WEA) system, a National Weather Service initiative that went into action in mid 2012.

SEE ALSO: National Weather Service to Send Weather Warnings to Smartphones

While many got the alert, the goal of WEA system is to send alerts to as many wireless subscribers in a given area as possible. That clearly didn't happen, as most AT&T customers in the Tri-State area appear to have been left out of the Nemo alerts, even though the carriers says it sent one to "compatible devices."

On Verizon iPhones, the alert appeared like this:

All four major carriers signed up to issue WEAs to their subscribers, but each carrier decides which phones to support with the system, and that's a subset of phones that are capable in the first place (Verizon offers a comprehensive list). The iPhone 5, for example, can receive WEAs, but only if it's running iOS 6 or later. Several Samsung phones are supported as well.

It appears the carriers sent out alerts, but the number of compatible device on some is so few that it made little difference. Many AT&T customers, for example, took to Twitter to express their disdain about not receiving one. Here's a typical tweet:

However, the following tweet indicates AT&T did send an alert, but only to customers with compatible phones, and sometime after other alerts went out:

When asked whether it not it issued a WEA, AT&T initially sent Mashable this statement:

As we typically do in these situations, were already sharing steps AT&T customers can take as storms converge on the Northeast. In addition, there are several mobile apps  including The Weather Channel and AccuWeather  that offer the option of push alert notifications. To turn them on, go to the app settings and set your preference for notifications. The National Weather Service also offers several weather radar and alert apps. As we told the FCC, we expect WEAs to be available on our LTE network this year and that WEA-capable LTE handsets will continue to enter the market throughout the year.

The last sentence seems to imply that AT&T's network is incapable of issuing WEAs, though the carrier's FAQ page about them says several phones were supposed to get the capability in fall 2012. AT&T subsequently contacted Mashable to explain it indeed sent the alert.

For its part, T-Mobile says it takes its WEA cues from the Department of Homeland Security and the Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA). The carrier got the nod from them and told Mashable that it "broadcasted multiple National Weather Service Blizzard Warnings as CMAS alerts in New York, New Jersey and New England, including the state of Maine."

Sprint says it sent a WEA, and photos of the alerts appeared on Twitter shortly thereafter.

The WEA system was created to alert subscribers about disasters, extreme weather, Amber alerts and "presidential" alerts (concerning national security).

Do you think WEAs are useful? How would you improve the system? Share your thoughts in the comments.

Update: This story originally implied Sprint may not have sent a WEA for the storm, but the carrier responded to Mashable's request for comment to assert that it did. We regret any implication otherwise.

Update 2: AT&T contacted us again about 24 hours after this story was initially published to say its customers in affected areas with compatible devices did receive a WEA.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Some things don't change as girls hit their teen years, no matter what technology is in vogue. Friends become the end-all, be-all of social life, parents are embarrassing and don't know anything, and getting cut down by your peers is devastating.

Add phones to the mix, and they can stunt a valuable part of child's growth: learning to relate to others, as well as understanding themselves.

Tweens' social media use and texting may look like positive social skills, but excessive use of these activities actually hinders emotional intelligence, or EI, which researchers agree is a better predictor of successful marriages, stronger friendships and even financial success.

As Daniel Goleman points out in his pivotal book, "Emotional Intelligence," 80% of a person's success depends on EI  skills like identifying, understanding and managing emotions in a way to relieve stress, communicate effectively and empathize with others. These are skills parents can teach and refine.

According to Cliff Nass, a professor of communication at Stanford, girls develop EI between eight and 12 years of age, while for boys, the development occurs over a longer period. But constant device use often disrupts EI development in girls, since they're more active media consumers at ever younger ages.

I thought about that while on a weekend soccer tournament with my own children. Streams of young girls in between games struck the all-too familiar position: heads down, concentration fixed on the smartphone, and fingers tapping away. What exactly are they doing, and how does it affect them?

So I sat down with a handful of these girls to hear, from the mouths of babes, how they use technology. After all, you hear a lot about what experts, advocates and researchers think about tweens and technology  so maybe it's time to ask the girls themselves.

The main attraction of phones is browsing and social networking, according to the middle-school aged girls, who had either feature phones or a tablet device with Internet access.

Two of the girls did have a Facebook account, but as Lauren said, "Facebook gets boring," and they all agreed: their favorite place was Instagram. They've used the photo sharing app for about a year and said it is the best place to connect with all their friends. Since they join with nicknames, they thought photo-sharing social network was more secure. None of the girls knew Facebook bought Instagram last year.

Instagram is at the forefront of a dizzying array of services designed to appeal to different ages and interests. They pop up and challenge Facebook, many with visual media sharing, which take away from verbal communication  a skill girls are traditionally good at.

Unlike Facebook, Instagram isn't driven by verbal postings such as "Today is going to be a good day!" but rather with pictures. When I asked for an example of a photo they shared, Kayla showed me a picture she took on a bright, sunny day. In it, her teammates stood in a circle with one leg pointed in toward the center. She took the picture from above, making the legs look like a spokes of a wheel, or in this case, rays of the sun  each one wearing different brightly colored socks and cleats.

Kayla put thought into composing the picture  the sports she loves, her friends and an interesting visual angle. For her, putting it on Instagram was self-expression, both of her identity and her interests.

Posting photos on Instagram gives tweens like Kayla a way to express feelings that words can't. Girls use pictures to represent themselves to their friends, as they enter an increasingly sophisticated social realm. But it also skips over the opportunity for face-to-face conversation to develop important interpersonal skills.

Beyond their own pictures, tweens share images from other sites too. Marissa, an 11-year-old, for example, scours Google for images of dogs and puppies to add to her Instagram page.

Others mentioned memes, the term to describe viral pictures like cats wearing sunglasses in front of a laptop. Good memes spread like wildfire, tickling people's interest at a rapid pace, aided by the power of mobile technology.

The girls share memes with one another, or search the Internet for them with phrases like, "LOL so true," "teenager post," "that awkward moment" or "you just realized." One girl said she uses iFunny, a free app, to find pictures to share. Searching the sites is nearly as fun as browsing Instagram.

The girls laugh as they mention these search terms, congratulating each other on their recommendations while adding their own. They talk in much the same way as they interact online, where they look at each other's pages and "like" or comment on them  and they feel gratified to get lots of positive comments.

Sam mentioned a meme that pokes fun of parents offering contradictory advice. "I got a ton of likes on that one," she added. The girls say it is fun when friends praise their posted images  whether a clever meme or a picture of Christmas gifts.

And even the comments on Instagram have images, thanks to the hundreds of emoji, which means pictograph, for the girls to use. Emoji, a Japanese term for picture characters, are the popular smiley faces that adorn digital communication, and a growing number of them come pre-installed on handsets.

"You can say so many different things with them," Riley said, explaining an inside joke where she'll insert a winking face. She'll insert the clapping hands emoji to congratulate. A lot of sharing and affirmation goes on in these Instagram circle, but there can be a lot of drama, too.

The girls said Instagram was important to their social life: They have a sleepover and document the fun while it's happening. And, when they feel bored, they can browse their friends' pages and see what they're doing.

The drama with Instagram usually arises when posted pictures exclude someone or an image expresses a controversial opinion. Arguments from school can spill over to the site too, which can host seemingly benign, but loaded, comments.

Larry Rosen, author of "IDisorder," which explores our obsession with technology and the drawbacks it hold on us, said teens on Facebook can have narcissistic tendencies, become more prone to depression and anxiety, and suffer in learning compared to those who don't regularly use social media.

But the girls disagree. They said they didn't use Instagram to flirt, since boys their age rarely use the site. That gels with research that suggests girls mature faster  and develop EI  earlier than boys.

For example, at the age of 10, girls and boys tend to show aggression equally, but by the age of 13, a meaningful difference begins to show between the sexes. The emotional response of boys, for example, changes little. Girls, meanwhile, develop skills like collective banning, gossiping and indirect communication to replace outright aggression.

Half the girls said they post to Instagram daily, while others said not every day  but almost. Some think relying on "likes" and comments makes girls vulnerable to judgment and criticism, but they said that isn't the case with them. One girl said, "I don't care if anyone doesn't like my picture, I put them there because I do."

Still, the girls had strong consensus that it's fun to have a popular picture  it feels good when they go and check their page and see lots of likes and comments  but it feels bad when friends overlook their efforts.

Whether you like it or not  or even if you wish it were otherwise  mobile technology plays a big role in how kids build and strengthen friendships during the sometimes awkward pre-teen years. A little of that isn't harmful, but experts say learning social skills can't be done solely online  and developing EI takes hard work and practice.

Tweens who devote most their time staring at a two-dimensional screen fail to understand body language, tone of voice and facial cues, which happens in face-to-face encounters. And down the road, that lack of EI may cost them in misunderstood relationships and poor work performance, to name a few.

Nass pointed out that in-person and online communication are not interchangeable, and kids must actively look and listen to the people they are with, instead of their smartphones.

"Face-to-face communication was positively associated with feelings of social success," he said, adding that it was "consistently associated with a range of positive socio-emotional outcomes."

So if you think your tween is learning good social skills on an app, you've been lulled into a false sense of security. Re-evaluate that perspective and talk to your kid about Instagram, Facebook and the apps they use.

And, when you do, Nass says, don't be afraid to say, "Look me in the eye when I speak to you," since that's one little way to get them to practice their emotional intelligence.

This article originally published at Mobiledia here
--------------------------------------------------------------
As winter storm Nemo descends on the eastern seaboard of the United States, many of us have gathered supplies and braced for the reality that we may be spending much of this weekend confined to our homes.

While the storm doesn't look like it will have the catastrophic effect of superstorm Sandy, states are bracing for impact. Inevitably roads will be messy and hundreds of flights out of airports across the northeast have been canceled.

Because we're anticipating being holed up for the weekend, we decided to put together a playlist of winter songs. You could call it our ultimate snowed-in soundtrack. Whether you've got your weekend defined by winter storm Nemo, you're experiencing winter in a different part of the world, or you just want to feel chilly from the sound coming out of your speakers, this playlist captures some of our favorite cold-weather tunes.

Check it out below, but we also want you to get involved. What's on your winter-weather soundtrack?

Here's how you can let us know what you're listening to when you're snowed in.

We can't wait to hear what's on your winter soundtrack.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Wondering what the massive winter storm barreling down on the American Northeast looks like from space? You're in luck. NASA released this satellite image Friday morning of the storm The Weather Channel has dubbed Nemo.

The photo "shows a western frontal system approaching the coastal low pressure area," says NASA.

That's bad news  things will get really nasty out there when the front and the low pressure merge, which they're forecast to do later Friday. The storm is expected to dump up to two to three feet of snow on parts of New England, with approximately one foot expected in New York City.

See the image in its full-resolution glory at NASA.gov.

If you're in the storm's path, how are you preparing? Share in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
A popular video showing off a 3D-printed automatic rifle magazine was removed Friday "as a violation of YouTube's policy against spam, scams, and commercially deceptive content."

The video featured the "Cuomo" 30-round magazine developed by Defense Distributed, a Texas-based initiative run by 24-year-old Cody Wilson. It quickly went viral after Defense Distributed posted it this week.

YouTube has not yet responded to Mashable's request for a comment on the video removal. The language now tied to the video, however, seems to suggest the company believes the video is somehow fraudulent.

Wilson told Mashable in an e-mail that he's attempting to re-upload the video to YouTube, but it's automatically rejecting the footage. He's now attempting to host the footage on an alternative service. Update: It's back:

Defense Distributed shot 342 rounds using the magazine during a successful test run, Wilson told Talking Points Memo.

An earlier video of one of Wilson's previous magazine designs is still playable on YouTube:

Wilson, a believer in open-source weapons design, told TPM he plans on releasing the schematics for the Cuomo this weekend. His previous designs have been already downloaded more than 100,000 times, he added.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It might not be a Beyonce-led halftime show, but the 2013 Grammy Awards on Sunday will at least be moderately entertaining.

Even with CBS-sanctioned conservative fashion choices, "music's biggest night" always finds a way to surprise with its one-time-only collaborations and major performances. The 55th annual outing promises to bring Justin Timberlake out safely from his labyrinth of hallways and will likely mark the return to the stage for Adele.

The ceremony airs 8 p.m. ET on CBS, so prep yourself for an onslaught of Two Broke Girls ads and some live GIFs on our Tumblr.

Here are the eight performers we're looking forward to watching.

Homepage image courtesy of Flickr, The Cosmopolitan of Las Vegas

This article originally published at The Daily Dot here
--------------------------------------------------------------
If you're unlucky enough to be under several feet of snow, you're going to need a good indoor distraction this weekend.

Even if you aren't in a place experiencing a lot of winter weather, it's always a great time for gaming. We've picked the best titles from mobile, console and social to play that are new and noteworthy this week.

SEE ALSO: This NES Lunchbox Will Make You the Coolest Kid in School

Give our list above a look for our suggestions. What are you playing this weekend? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It can be tough to keep up with all the new apps released every week. But you're in luck  we take care of that for you, creating a roundup each weekend of our favorite new and updated apps.

This week we found an app to help you keep up on your favorite sports, and another that will let you see all the newest blockbusters without breaking the bank.

A new app for Windows Phone ensures you always capture the perfect picture, and a popular television app saw an update that makes it easy for you to find the right thing to watch.

Check out the gallery above for a look at this week's highlights.

Still looking for more? Check out last week's Apps You Don't Want To Miss for more great apps worth a look.

Think we left one off the list? Let us know about your own app highlights from this week in the comments below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Why waste an entire 116 minutes watching the original Back to the Future when you can experience the movie in a mere 60 seconds? Strap yourselves in, because it's time to put the pedal to the metal for Speedrun: Back to the Future I.

Using animated line drawings, humorous sound effects, a heaping helping of plot compression and perhaps even a flux capacitor, 1A4 Studio created an entertaining minute that will remind you of how much you loved (or didn't love) Back to the Future. You'll feel like you're in a time-traveling DeLorean with Marty McFly, speeding through the film at a velocity that feels way faster than 88 mph.

YouTube user 1A4 Studio, an animator who vows to "create awesome animation until death do us part," must be doing something right, because despite admonitions to viewers to "don't subscribe to my YouTube channel," 1A4 Studio's YouTube channel has garnered 5,580 subscribers and 241,063 video views since Oct. 31, 2012.

What do you think, readers? Does this clever clip capture the essence of Back to the Future?
--------------------------------------------------------------
A bionic eye system will soon be available in the United States, Discovery reports.

The Argus II Retinal Prosthesis System, developed by Second Sight Medical Products, aims to bring sight in varying forms to those who are visually impaired  most specifically, those suffering from a genetic disease called retinitis pigmentosa, which affects roughly 100,000 people in the U.S.

The Argus II system consists of 60 electrodes, implanted in a patient's retina, and a pair of glasses equipped with a mini-camera. Retinitis pigmentosa disrupts the eye's retinal photoreceptors, which help convert light into impulses that are decoded into images, resulting in various degrees of visual impairment. The Argus II, then, simply acts as a replacement photoreceptor.

SEE ALSO: Man Climbs 103 Floors Using Thought-Controlled Bionic Leg

Already, Discovery says, the system has helped more than 60 people in Europe recover partial sight.

The product is available in various European countries for about $99,120. No U.S. price has been named yet, but it's expected to be released once it's officially approved by the FDA.

Watch the video above to learn more; the official Argus II product video is available here.

What other bionic advances have you seen this year?
--------------------------------------------------------------
NASA's Curiosity rover has drilled into a Martian rock and collected samples, marking the first time any robot has ever performed this complicated maneuver on the surface of another planet.

The 1-ton Curiosity rover used its arm-mounted drill to bore a hole 0.63 inches (1.6 centimeters) wide and 2.5 inches (6.4 cm) deep in a section of sedimentary bedrock on Friday (Feb. 8). The activity paves the way for the first-ever analysis of fresh Martian subsurface material and provides the last major checkout of the robot's gear and instruments, researchers said.

"The most advanced planetary robot ever designed now is a fully operating analytical laboratory on Mars," John Grunsfeld, associate administrator for NASA's Science Mission Directorate, said in a statement. "This is the biggest milestone accomplishment for the Curiosity team since the sky-crane landing last August, another proud day for America."

Curiosity will process the sample over the next few days, researchers said. The rover will use some of the material to scour its sample-handling hardware clean of any residues that may remain from Earth before transferring any powder to the analytical instruments on the rover's body.

"We'll take the powder we acquired and swish it around to scrub the internal surfaces of the drill bit assembly," said Curiosity drill systems engineer Scott McCloskey, of NASA's Jet Propulsion Laboratory (JPL) in Pasadena, Calif. "Then we'll use the arm to transfer the powder out of the drill into the scoop, which will be our first chance to see the acquired sample."

Drilling so deep into a Red Planet rock is a complex and unprecedented maneuver, so the mission team worked its way up to the first effort in a steady, stepwise fashion.

About two weeks ago, Curiosity began assessing the target rock, which is part of an outcrop called "John Klein" that was exposed to liquid water long ago. The rover first pressed down on the rock with its arm-mounted drill in a series of "pre-load" tests. It then used the drill's percussive action to hammer the outcrop without spinning the drill bit, which cleared the way for a recent "mini-drill" that bored into rock but didn't collect samples.

Getting Curiosity ready for all these steps  and for yesterday's successful full-up drilling run  also took a lot of prep work here on Earth, researchers said.

"Building a tool to interact forcefully with unpredictable rocks on Mars required an ambitious development and testing program," said JPL's Louise Jandura, chief engineer for Curiosity's sample system. "To get to the point of making this hole in a rock on Mars, we made eight drills and bored more than 1,200 holes in 20 types of rock on Earth."

Curiosity landed inside Mars' huge Gale Crater on the night of Aug. 5 to determine if the area has ever been capable of supporting microbial life. Along with its 10 science instruments and 17 cameras, the rover's drill is considered key to this quest, for it allows scientists to peer deep into Martian rocks for evidence of past habitability.

This article originally published at Space.com here
--------------------------------------------------------------
It has been another action-packed week. The Super Bowl happened Sunday, Facebook had a brief Internet takeover and ] the blizzard Nemo passed over to the Northeast.

We at Mashable have been busy covering the newest contraptions and gadgets in the digital world, and as always, our weekly features roundup will get you up to speed on social media, tech, business and lifestyles. With Valentine's Day fast approaching, we've also included several features to help you have a memorable holiday.

So if you were too preoccupied this week to keep up on all the news, read on  we've got you covered.

For more social media news and resources, you can follow Mashable's social media channel on Twitter and become a fan on Facebook.

For more business news and resources, you can follow Mashable's business channel on Twitter and become a fan on Facebook.

For more tech news and resources, you can follow Mashable's tech channel on Twitter and become a fan on Facebook.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Google's execs could be getting a serious travel upgrade with the proposed addition of an $82 million facility that would service their private jets at the Mineta San Jose International Airport.

The proposed 29-acre expansion will include an executive terminal, hangars and ramp space large enough to accomodate large business jets and aircraft servicing facilities, according to a statement from the airport released Friday.

Finding a home for Google's jets has proved difficult, according to the Mountain View Voice. The company's aircrafts are currently housed in the federally owned Moffett Field in Mountain View. The White House and NASA quashed a proposed $45 million restoration of Hangar One.

The San Jose airport, just over 10 miles from Google's headquarters in Mountain View, seems to be the next best option.

The airport completed more public renovations and upgrades in recent years, but will now focus on the private development on the West Side. The addition would also bring in new jobs and tax revenue to the area.

"Now, our focus must be the proposed private development and $82 million investment of the West Side by Signature Flight Support, to support the private aviation needs of local high-tech and other companies, most notably the personal aircraft of the principals at Google, Director of Aviation Bill Sherry said in the statement.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Apple's iOS 6.1, the latest publicly available version of the popular mobile operating system, has reportedly been causing widespread issues among iPhone users.

Released almost two weeks ago, iOS 6.1 has prompted a number of users to go to the Apple Support Community forum to report battery drain and overheating issues. These issues are said to be found in different iPhone models.

But the iPhone 4S, in particular, is said to be affected by an iOS 6.1 bug that's causing 3G problems for Vodafone.

As reported by iDownloadBlog, the British carrier has sent a text message to its subscribers informing them of the issue. In addition, it is advising them to wait for the next version of iOS if they haven't already installed iOS 6.1 on their iPhone 4S.

Vodafone has also elaborated on the issue through its online forum. It notes that some customers may experience intermittent problems connecting to the Internet or even just calling or texting.

Apple is already working on a solution to the issue.

Presumably, the solution is included in iOS 6.1.1, which Apple began seeding to developers a couple of days ago. But according to Apple's release notes, the beta software includes only improvements to Maps for Japan.

It was also thought to have been issued by Apple in order to patch the recently released evasi0n jailbreak. But iOS 6.1.1 turned out to be vulnerable to the untethered jailbreak as well.

In other iOS 6.1 bug news, 9to5Mac reports that AOL has disabled corporate meeting management via iDevices on iOS 6.1. This is on account of an iOS 6.1 issue that causes a continuous loop when synchronizing a recurring calendar meeting invitation.

This article originally published at AppAdvice here
--------------------------------------------------------------
Even if you've been overwhelmed with weather reports in the past 24 hours, here's one you don't want to miss. Not because it contains vital information ahead of a storm, but because it's simply adorable and hilarious. Watch as 9-year-old William Hallman helps deliver the forecast for NBC affiliate station KVLY in Fargo, ND.

SEE ALSO: Little Boy's Crazy Dance Moves Put NFL Cheerleaders to Shame

Hallman's got the gesticulation down, but, we understand, working a green screen while facing the camera's kind of like tapping your head and rubbing your belly simultaneously.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Kids as young as 11 are using coding skills to hack accounts on social media and gaming sites, according to one report. Antivirus firm AVG says children are writing malware to steal data and virtual currency from friends.

However, the hacks are still in their infancy, as researchers found errors that trace back to the original source. One author included his exact email address, password and additional information, revealing an 11-year-old boy in Canada. Most programming languages researchers found in the study were elementary, such as C# and Visual Basic. Check out the video, above, for more.

SEE ALSO: First Grader Becomes Youngest Person to Ever Develop a Mobile Game

As today's connected generations tinker with computers and smartphones at earlier ages, their familiarity with coding starts young. Worldwide initiatives are developing to teach kids to program, including CoderDojo and Codecademy. More children are learning to create their own apps, learning HTML and Javascript like a second language.

Kids need to be taught to code responsibly and educational guidelines should be implemented, says Yuval Ben-Itzhak, chief technology officer at AVG.

"You teach your children that you can't take a toy without paying - so I think this type of a message needs to get to the kids when they're writing software too," Ben-Itzhak tells BBC.

What do you think of teaching children to code? How can teachers and parents monitor their kids? Let us know your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
This post originally appeared on the American Express OPEN Forum, where Mashable regularly contributes articles about leveraging social media and technology in small business.

While there are currently tens of millions of blogs worldwide, close to 60 million powered by WordPress alone, many bloggers are not yet monetizing their sites. If you're one of these bloggers, a good place to start is with affiliate marketing: directing readers to a product or service in exchange for a commission on the sale (or other action) when it occurs.

SEE ALSO: Connect Your WordPress Blog With Twitter, Facebook and Tumblr

"If an individual is looking to monetize their blog, I would make a strong case for affiliate marketing as the best avenue for doing so," says Josh Waldron, founder of creative design firm Studio JWAL LLC. "Blogs with quality content attract loyal readers. Since readers benefit from the content offered, they grow to trust the authors of that content over time. Consequently, an author's blog posts are a logical place to promote relevant products and services without compromising the integrity of the content."

Here are four quick steps to monetizing your blog through affiliate marketing.

Affiliate ads pay per action, which means that readers will need to click on the ad and then either sign up or register for something, or make a purchase before you get paid for the action. The more relevant the ad is to your content, the higher the likelihood visitors will click on the ad and perform the desired action.

So, what type of affiliate program will provide the most relevant ads for your blog? If you're focused on a particular topic, you will want to join affiliates specifically associated with your content. For example, if you have a photography site, you might apply to be an affiliate with a camera equipment dealer.

Many bloggers start with Amazon Associates since Amazon sells millions of diverse products that are likely to be a fit for most bloggers. Amazon pays commissions of 4% to 15%, depending on volume and product type.

To find other targeted affiliate programs, check out popular affiliate clearinghouse sites such as Commission Junction, LinkShare, and ShareASale. All three offer access to thousands of affiliate programs, but you must apply separately to each one.

While you should choose programs related to your content, you don't have to feel restricted to stick too closely to your niche, says marketing consultant Dennis Duty. Think about what other types of products your audience might be interested in.

 

"Perhaps your Halo audience would enjoy other FPS games as well," says Duty.

If your blog topics are more diverse, you might consider a program such as VigLink, which automates access to more than 30,000 affiliate programs and monetizes the links on your site for you.

For example, if a blogger is writing about a new pair of shoes they found on Zappos, instead of having to sign up with the Zappos affiliate program directly, they can work with VigLink, which will automatically append the affiliate code to the link and pay the blogger their earned commissions. While VigLink typically keeps 25% for this service, the company claims that because of their size, they "often negotiate higher commissions that more than cover our share," says Oliver Deighton, vice president of marketing at VigLink.

In addition to automatically monetizing existing links, VigLink can also optionally insert new, ordinary links where none existed before. For example, if a blogger mentions a product, brand or store, they don't have to worry about linking it themselves: VigLink will take care of that with its link insertion technology, which optimizes for both user experience and revenue.

 

"For most websites, link insertion lifts VigLink revenue by more than 90%," adds Deighton.

Deighton notes that while any blogger can try VigLink, bloggers will find the most success if their content is geared toward commerce.

 

"Hobbies, fashion, tech gear, deals and savings are all topics that naturally lead to spending; religion, food, raising children are less ideal," adds Deighton.

Many bloggers will actually write reviews of products with affiliate marketing in mind.

 

"The power of a blog is that it's easy to aggregate a lot of loyal fans for niche topics. This lends itself to making recommendations and providing affiliate links to those recommendations," says Chris Conrey, a partner at digital marketing company Vuurr.com. But just throwing out links to products with no rhyme or reason will result in a quick exit by visitors, writes Lynn Truong, Editor-in-Chief of Wise Bread, a popular personal finance site.

"Think of affiliate ads as additional resources that complement your content," says Truong. "Don't put up a list of your favorite books, hoping people will click on the affiliate link and purchase the books just because you listed them. Take some time to write a detailed review, and use affiliate ads to point them in the right direction if they decide to act on your information."

If you do add affiliate links to your site, make sure you maintain a balance between monetization and user experience, suggests web designer Kevin Spence.

One way to do this is to keep the majority of your content ad-free.

 

"What I would recommend to people is to think of 5-10 great pages that you could use to promote affiliate offers related to your niche. Then link to those money pages from your sidebar, footer or somewhere else that will give them a lot of visibility from the other pages on your site. Keep the rest of your site ad-free," says Spence. "The goal is not to monetize every page, but for every page to be a potential gateway to monetization."
--------------------------------------------------------------
Does anyone really enjoy getting shots at the doctor's office? For most, it's one of the least enjoyable parts of the visit. But thanks to a team of researchers at King's College London, your next shot could be virtually painless.

The team developed a shot-delivering system that uses a patch of micro needles instead of a singular syringe (pictured below) to issue injections.

That part isn't the most groundbreaking  Fujifilm developed a similar system of micro needles last year. What's unique here, the team says, is that the patches are made entirely out of sugar, which allows them to harmlessly dissolve into the skin after each injection. Sweet deal, right?

The proposed system could be beneficial for several reasons. The patches can hold vaccines at room temperature, and the researchers say they're just as effective as needle-based solutions.

They're cheap to make, too, so hospitals in developing countries could easily produce and store them in large quantities without worrying about refrigeration space. Plus, since there's no hyperthermic needle involved, the risk of transmitting blood-borne diseases through injections is much lower.

The system is still undergoing animal testing, which should be completed shortly. Watch the video above to learn more.

Do you think you'd use this vaccination method for your next shot? Tell us what you think about it.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Winter storm Nemo hit the Eastern seaboard of the United States Friday night, dropping close to 36 inches of snow across Boston, New Hampshire and New York.

YouTube user thrillcats uploaded a video of a particularly nasty part of the storm from her home in Middle Island, NY. The video, shot around 6:30 p.m. ET, captures a rare "thundersnow" moment of thunder and lightning mixed in with the flurrying snowfall. The action starts around the 15-second mark.

SEE ALSO: Snowed In? Listen to Our Winter Storm Nemo Playlist

According to The Guardian, the "thundersnow" phenomenon occurs when cold air passes over long expanses of warm water  similar to the "lake-effect" of blizzards that sometimes hit the Great Lakes region of the U.S.

Check out the video for yourself above. Do you have any videos  or Vines  of the storm last night? Share them with us below.
--------------------------------------------------------------
New Yorkers awoke to a thick blanket of snow outside Saturday morning, following winter storm Nemo. By daybreak, the city was covered in nearly a foot of the stuff.

Mobile phone photographers didn't let that keep them from exploring some of the city to capture the aftermath of the storm. Check out a selection of images captured Saturday morning, and share with us in the comments your own wintry photos.
--------------------------------------------------------------
When we first noticed that a YouTube video of a super-hot nickel ball dropped onto a block of ice was trending big-time, we wondered what was so interesting about it.

Once we began watching this short clip that lasts less than a minute, we found it strangely mesmerizing. Watch the ball of nearly-molten nickel eating its way through the ice, as if it were some sort of ultra-powerful acid eating through glass. No wonder the thing's gone viral after being online for just one day.

It's part of an online collection of YouTube videos by a scientist and video producer who calls himself carsandwater. He aims to please, saying, "With a request to place a red-hot nickel ball on a block of ice, and also to satisfy my own curiosity, I do just that."

Did you like that one? Here's another by the same guy, taking an even larger white-hot nickel ball and dropping it in hot water. See what happens:
--------------------------------------------------------------
Some of the creators of Twitter have landed on a pretty new perch in San Francisco. Biz Stone and Evan Williams, both co-founders of Twitter, have secured office space at 760 Market Street as the headquarters of Obvious, their new venture, which recently launched Medium, a publishing platform.

"We need the right space from which to grow the Medium team and position Obvious to focus on bringing our new ideas to life," Obvious CEO Williams said in a statement. "We're excited to get three custom floors on Market Street, in the heart of downtown. Being surrounded by like-minded peers in a creative space also serves as an inspiration."

For more on the space, check out the video above.
--------------------------------------------------------------
This post originally appeared on the American Express OPEN Forum, where Mashable regularly contributes articles about leveraging social media and technology in small business.

Health care is a huge subject right now, regardless of your views on the Affordable Care Act. And for good reason. According to the Kaiser Foundation, the cost of employer-sponsored health coverage for families has increased nearly 100% during the past decade. In addition, total health spending accounted for approximately 18% of the U.S. Gross Domestic Product (GDP) in 2010.

Bottom line: Staying healthy not only costs a lot of money but requires an investment of time. The investment pays off in employee productivity, morale and high performance. Smart companies are starting to direct energy to educating employees to maintain a healthy lifestyle. It's good for employees, and it's good for business.

What better way to encourage employees to take care of themselves than by using social tools? After all, we have our phones and tablets with us all the time. Here are some ways you can take full advantage of the connectivity.

A persons health is a private matter. We have laws such as HIPAA that protect an individuals medical information. Any effort by an employee or company to use social tools for tracking health-related data will need to be secure.

Matt Gillin, CEO of Relay, a mobile interface that provides a simple and secure way for businesses and customers to communicate, shared how his customer, Independence Blue Cross (IBX) is using Relay to increase the level of service it delivers to members.

The IBX Wire will help members access information and support via a private, digital space, allowing them to more easily get things done  including staying on top of need-to-know personal health details, completing transactions and receiving one-to-one support exactly when they need it.

Through IBX Wire, the health insurer will deliver practical and usable account- and service-based information to members in real time through their private, customized message boards. This direct connection will give members a faster, easier way to stay on top of the status of their accounts, maximize plan benefits, learn ways to save money and get the support they need from IBX. When information is posted to a members personal Wire, a notification is sent to the members enrolled mobile device.

Gillin says future upgrades will include more interactive communications, such as the option to submit questions and get a response via this secure, HIPAA-compliant message service.

Regular exercise and activity is good for our health. We all know this. The challenge occurs when we have jobs that keep us from moving. Or, we cant find time to visit the gym. Some call those reasons excuses. Others say the issue is staying motivated.

The Endomondo Sports Tracker app turns GPS-enabled devices into a personal trainer and social motivator capable of tracking workouts, analyzing performance, and can aid in the discovery of new routes, activities and insights into fitness so people become and stay active. The app is being used by companies including Harley Davidson, Kimberly-Clark and The Coca-Cola Company.

Mette Lykke, co-founder of Endomondo, explains how the app works:

One feature of the app is called pep talk, in which users can send short, real-time messages to friends that are read aloud by the app during workouts. It is designed with the goal of keeping users more engaged, therefore spending more time exercising.

Plenty of employees will tell you theyre motivated. Thats not the issue. Their challenge is staying focused and on track. For many, exercise needs to be fun and have variety.

Arriving in Q1 2013 is a new app called Hotseat. The app uses nudges, social accountability and gameplay to create easy and fun two-minute office activity breaks. Using their smartphones, employees can select physical activities theyre comfortable with and capable of completing at the office. Then Hotseat inserts a rotating daily selection of activity breaks into a user's calendar, based on availability. In addition, employees can compete in collaborative or competitive challenges.

Fran Melmed founder and CEO of Context Communication and consultant to Hotseat, said simplicity and flexibility were key factors in the apps design. I know what a priority it is for employers and for us as a nation to increase our physical activity overall, but to also increase our regular movement throughout the day to lower our risk of heart disease, kidney disease, cancer, obesity and diabetes." Because 30 minutes of gym time doesnt counter the effects of too many hours sitting  and 10,000 steps might be unachievable for some people  Hotseat makes it easy. "I worked with the creative design folks at MadPow to create a tool that has a simple, playful look while at the same time provides a baby step toward greater activity for those currently less active," says Melmed.

Turning an activity into a habit is the key to success. Its not just exercising; its incorporating exercise into our daily routines  just like brushing our teeth. When we can see progress, it helps us stay motivated and focused. We want to do more because we are seeing a positive outcome.

Digifit offers a suite of fitness-tracking apps including iCardio, iBiker, iRunner and Spinning, which give users the ability to track and monitor activities while motivating them to be healthier and adopt healthy habits.

Christopher Means, marketing director at Digifit, Inc. says the key to developing good habits is starting out on the right path. Digifit offers users a series of fitness assessments that help establish fitness level, allowing users to be smart in developing an exercise routine. "Digifits fitness assessments were developed by experts and include a range of tests for beginners to advanced athletes including Beginner Cardio, Rockport Walking Test and the Cooper Running Test," says Means. Beginner assessments, such as the Rockport Walking Test, establish a baseline of fitness. The more-advanced tests establish "accurate low-end lactate thresholds used to calculate personalized heart-rate training zones," which helps users train at the right intensity to achieve their fitness goals, explains Means. "The assessments can be completed with a variety of activity types, including running, walking, cycling, spin or even custom cardio activities like elliptical."

Digifit also tracks other biometrics like weight, sleep, daily activity, nutrition and blood pressure to give users a comprehensive view of how multiple aspects of their lives are affected by other aspects and the choices they make. For groups, Digifit allows challenges to be set up with leaderboards and other inspirational activities or incentives based on a customizable set of criteria.

With all the choices available, companies have a big task ahead of them. Veterans United Home Loans the nationals number one dedicated VA lender, decided to create a Life Balance Department to support the health and wellness of its 1,200 employees.

Kate Quinn, life-balance coordinator at Veterans United Home Loans, said the company recognized the need to incorporate a technology-based solution in their wellness plans. Our summer Fitness Challenge introduced employees to the FitBit ultra tracker. The tracker allowed them to keep track of their calories burned and even their sleep patterns. Using the FitBit app, the employees were also able to log food, activities and more.

While the task of creating a program is major, Quinn shared that the results are worth it. The program has over 40% participation. The beauty is each employee has the ability to focus on his or her individual goals, while at the same time providing motivation and support to co-workers.

In addition, the apps progress reports opened the employees eyes. Quinn explains, "Awareness of their activity level has been the biggest takeaway from the use of the tracker. Many employees 'think' they are active until they see the pie chart that shows their daily activity levels with more than 50% of their time spent sedentary. This simple bit of knowledge is a big motivator!"

Both employees and employers are looking to "get healthy and stay healthy" in 2013. The good news is, lots of options exist to help with your organizations wellness goals. The key is finding tools people will use, because thats the key to staying motivated, engaged and getting results.

Is your company encouraging healthy living using social tools? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Sony wants to make a pillow that instead of just helping you fall asleep helps you wake up. In a patent filing, the company outlines a pillow that would have electrodes and sensors on it and would make napping more efficient.

"The present application relates to a sleep aid device and method, program and recording medium, and more particularly, to a sleep aid device and method, program and recording medium for having a short sleep efficiently," the patent application says. Imagine instead of setting your alarm for a pre-determined time before you lay down for a nap, your pillow could sense when you actually fall asleep  not when you began to try to sleep  and wake you up when you've slept soundly for your desired length of time.

Check out the video above to learn more about the patent application.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Here's the good news: Picking up a cellphone on a Valentine's Day date doesn't mean you'll be forever cursed into the single life. Here's the bad news: Picking up a cellphone on a Valentine's Day date may mean you'll be forever cursed into the single life.

There are no steadfast rules to abide by when it comes to technology use and the dating world, especially the dates that fall on Cupid's day. Since the rules of our world have so fully blurred the lines between plugged in and unplugged life, many wonder which category dating falls into.

One opinion has rose to the forefront: technology and dating do not mix. It might be a great tool to find your date, with a dating website or app, but once you meet the person it should be hands off the cellphone and hands on with the other person. But contrary to popular advice, Robert Weiss, author of Closer Together, Further Apart: The Effect of Technology and The Internet On Sex, Intimacy and Relationships, says technology is not the damnation of dating. Like most things in life, it really all depends on who you are and who the person is.

So while we can't provide you with faultless axioms to live your love life by, we can give you basic guidelines that can make sure you your Valentine's Day is a happier occasion.



Much like with every other aspect of dating, communication is key when it comes to tech use  especially on a first date. Since the first date is your first opportunity to understand the other person and the other person getting to know you, strive to be yourself. You don't want to leave your cellphone home for the first time in four years only to feel awkward, lost and craving to take some Instagram shots.

Weiss says a simple question at the start of the date like "Hey, I usually check in on Foursquare everywhere I go. Is it OK if I do that now?" will help set boundaries immediately. If the other person seems uncomfortable at the thought, you can back off. But you never know, the other person may feel at ease knowing they can now also Instagram dinner and your shared love of social media could eventually become a shared interest in your relationship.



No, we don't mean in the bedroom. We mean with the phone. If your date communicates that they are fine with your Foursquare check-in, don't take that to mean "I can now text three of my friends, answer a work email and make a quick phone call to my roommate to see if she DVR'ed the latest Girls episode." Don't let your tech overtake your attention at any point. Make sure you are still engaged in your current activities and whatever you do on your phone is quick.

Yes, you heard it right. Weiss says that if you are in a committed, long-term relationship, then it could be nice to share that love on social networks. Whether it's Instagramming your Valentine's Day present or changing your Facebook status, a simple online gesture could be sweet especially on Valentine's Day when PDA is mildly more acceptable.

SEE ALSO: 10 Steps to Plan the Perfect Valentine's Day Online

If you aren't in a committed, long-term, stable relationship don't take any PDA to any online space. At the end of the day, changing your Facebook status to "Having so much fun with my Smoochie-Poochie. Can't wait to spend every Valentine's Day forever with him" on your second date is embarrassing for him and for you if things end before you planned. It's not going to be fun having to let everyone in your network know your Smoochie-Poochie is no longer in your life.



Sometimes couples who are married or have been dating for longer periods of time will fall into a rut with their tech use. Either there is always a hands-off-the-phone policy or an anything goes mindset. For Valentine's Day, Weiss suggets switching things up. If you're part of a couple where you are the one constantly engaged with a cellphone, give your signifcant other the gift of your undivided attention and leave your phone at home. Or if your one and only is a Twitter addict, spend Valentine's Day reading and responding to her tweets. Showing that you will leave your comfort zone to enter theirs and take interest in one of their passtimes can be a bonding opportunity.



While it might be tempting to ask your Valentine for tech freedom on a date as a gift, it could really come off as insulting. If your date is really uncomfortable with the idea, then just accept that dating time is not phone time and drop the subject. Weiss says this is usually true of "digital immigrants," a.k.a. people usually over 35, who find technology to undoubtedly be intrusive in the dating world. Forcing tech use on them could cause bigger problems later that no one wants to deal with on Valentine's Day.



Not all of us have a beau or gal-pal to spend V-Day with, but that doesn't mean you have to spend it alone. The plethora of dating apps mean that you can make it much easier to find plans for the holiday. But if you are going the app option, Weiss reminds it's crucial to be safe and not make sure to meet new people in public places. Or opt for something like Grouper which sets up group dates so you can meet new people with the comfort of a few friends by your side.



Apps like Grindr or OkCupid may make it easier to find someone, and while they don't promise long-lasting love, they are always an option. But Weiss says apps make temptation that much easier and sometimes a decision made when you feel sad (especially on a day devoted to love) might be something you regret on Feb. 15. Weiss suggests instead of using tech to fill a void on Valentine's Day, just have fun with some friends or don't make any plans at all so you don't fall into the app trap.

What other rules do you have when it comes to tech and dating?
--------------------------------------------------------------
This week in tech was full of fascinating and often weird stories.

In the weird department, how about a dress that turns clear when you get turned on? Gives the word "transparency" a whole new meaning, and could probably make dates a bit more fun. The dress was created by a Netherlands-based fashion designer. As for fascinating, British archaeologists unearthed the remains of controversial King Richard III, beneath a parking lot  and researchers used them to create a 3D-printed reproduction of his face.

It was a week especially full of scientific news. A new project to simulate the human brain with a supercomputer was announced, and Nokia announced it has received funds from the European Union to develop graphene, which will be the strongest material on earth.

If you are an open-source enthusiast, finding out that Linux-based operating system Ubuntu will have its first phone sooner than expected must have been a pleasant surprise. In other open-source, geeky news, the first stripped-down Raspberry Pi computer is available in Europe, and will soon come to United States as well.

Take a look at our Top 10 Tech This Week to see what else happened this week in the world of technology.
--------------------------------------------------------------
In the age of social media, we have countless outlets for job searching. Platforms such as LinkedIn are the first to come to mind, but can candidates use Twitter to find jobs as well? This past Thursday the HR teams at Twitter and NPR collaborated in the first live #NPRTwitterChat aimed at helping job seekers use social media as a job search tool.

The chat was centered on six questions that received over 800 tweets from industry professionals all over the U.S., and even some from New Zealand and the UK. Below is a recap of the topics covered in the chat as well as tips you can use in your own job search.

To see a cool Storify roundup of the live chat, check out Amplify Talent, the blog run by NPR's Senior Director of Talent Acquisition and Innovation, Lars Schmidt.

The live chat started with a general inquiry into how to use the Twitter platform for job searching. Most responses touched on being an engaging member of the industry in which you want to work, and contributing content to build a social following. NPR's Schmidt talked about Twitter as a job search resource during an interview with Mashable: "Through Twitter you can learn from your peers in whatever discipline you're in, or use it as a platform to share content so you can build awareness of you as a professional, and ultimately position yourself as a thought leader in a particular expertise. Because it is an open network, it affords the opportunity to do that in a very public way."

The following are some of the other themes that came up during the live chat.

Twitter isnt the first social network someone typically thinks about when applying for a job, but it does have some unique advantages over other social platforms. The lack of barriers to connect with thought leaders was one of the most-mentioned advantages during the live chat.

Just having a Twitter handle isn't enough to attract the attention of recruiters. Theyre going to be looking at what kind of content you share on your account. You want to share a good mix of interesting and thought-provoking content, as well as tweets that give a taste of your personality.

There are best practices of use with any social media platform, and they become even more important when you're looking for a job. Schmidt elaborated on this issue: "Use social media to help others and to contribute your expertise to the communities where you work. If you do that, you'll be building up a lot of capital in those networks. So when you need a favor, people will be much more apt to help you out  because they know that you've contributed a lot to that network. You're not going to build a very good network if you just promote yourself."

At the end of the Twitter chat, the conversation turned to online presences replacing resumes. The overwhelming opinion was that resumes wont become obsolete, but candidates' online presence will enhance their resumes. Resumes are still useful for screening a large batch of applicants, and not every industry is well-represented online.

Schmidt added that although he doesn't think online presence will replace resumes completely, it is important for discoverability to have some presence online. "There are certain skill sets that aren't necessarily as active on social media," he says. Companies offering blue-collar jobs aren't as actively involved in social media, so that hiring is going to look more traditional. But having an online presence whether it is a blog, through social networks, having a social presence with links to your work to supplement your resume definitely enhances your offerings as a candidate. You want to have a digital presence on the web  you want recruiters to be able to find you."

How do you utilize Twitter as a job search resource? Let us know in the comments.

The Mashable Job Board connects job seekers across the U.S. with unique career opportunities in the digital space. While we publish a wide range of job listings, we have selected a few job opportunities from the past two weeks to help get you started. Happy hunting!
--------------------------------------------------------------
Now there is a way to see six Vine videos at the same time, and they're all about a single topic: Nemo, the blizzard that slammed into the Northeast.

It was allegedly written in an hour by GroupMe Founder Steve Martocci (@smart) and Poptip founder Kelsey Falter (@kfalter) as they both visited the Founders Weekend conference in Las Vegas. They're calling the pop-up site "Vining Nemo," and it's a video sixpack that starts playing the six videos right when you land.

The site is not completely stable at the moment, and when one video ends, you must click for another to load  and then click again to start it playing. And it seems like there's a limited number of accounts attached to it.

Even with all of those caveats, this is still a fascinating implementation of Vine. It points to what can be done with Vine in the hands of skilled coders. Imagine what this little page would look like if the two guys had actually spent a week or two putting it together.

We're thinking this idea could be extended beyond coverage of the blizzard. Imagine if Vine grows to such ubiquity that thousands of these 6.5-second videos are created every second, all about the same topic. There could be an entire screen full of videos playing at the same time, giving you views of the same event from multiple angles.

Now that we've given you the idea, go ahead and code that one, guys. We're guessing it might take a little more than an hour.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Winners of the 55th Grammy Awards, hosted by LL Cool J, will be revealed Sunday at 8 p.m. ET on CBS. You can enhance your 3-hour TV viewing experience with our digestible list of three ways to get more from tonight's Grammys.

SEE ALSO: 'Buttocks and Female Breasts' Ban for Grammys Inspires Mockery

Among the performers this year are Justin Timberlake, Rihanna, Taylor Swift, Kelly Clarkson, Fun, Mumford & Sons, Black Keys, Lumineers, Frank Ocean, Maroon 5, Carrie Underwood, Elton John, Sting, Bruno Mars, Miranda Lambert, Dierks Bentley, Ed Sheeran and more.

SEE ALSO: How Grammy Nominees Stack Up on Social Media

You can tune into Grammy Live video streams for VIP and backstage events before and during the televised ceremony at Grammy.com, CBS.com and on the Grammy app.

SEE ALSO: If Music Streams Swayed Grammys, These Nominees Would Win

You'll see red-carpet coverage, backstage interviews, pressroom question-and-answer sessions and winners portrait sessions, among other intimate moments.

Fifty percent of all active Twitter users follow at least one musician, and many of the most-followed Twitter users are musicians, so you can anticipate a significant spike in tweets tonight. The stars have already been busy tweeting in the hours before the show:

The Recording Academy encourages viewers to tweet using hashtags #Grammys and #TheWorldIsListening before, during and after the ceremony.

SEE ALSO: How Music Ruled Twitter in 2012

Twitter created a special Grammy Awards page, where you'll find celebrity live tweeters. Notable accounts to follow throughout the show include @TheGRAMMYS, @CBS, @TwitterMusic, @TwitterTV, @MashEntertain and Mashable's @BAHjournalist.

You can lock in your last-minute predictions using the Grammys' Android and iOS apps, which also let you listen to the nominees via Grammy Radio, see photos and view videos.

BONUS: Behind the Scenes at the Grammy Awards Broadcast
--------------------------------------------------------------
After new details emerged about an Apple smart watch on Sunday, we were wondering what such a timepiece might look like.

Of course, the Internet was more than happy to oblige, burgeoning as it is with various design concepts that purport to predict what Apple fans might be wearing on their wrists some day in the near future.

As you can see the gallery above, one of the concepts uses the curved glass screen that unnamed sources mentioned to The New York Times. Others look a lot like predecessors of the current iPod Nano strapped to a wrist. All seem useful in a variety of circumstances.

Take a look at these four imaginative concepts, and then let us know in the comments which one you think is most likely to most resemble the final product. Or, do you think Apple is not really working on a smart watch, and this is yet another false rumor about the Cupertino company?
--------------------------------------------------------------
Rumors of Apple developing a so-called smart watch  think of a small, wearable smartphone wrapped around your wrist  have been thrown around the Internet for some time now. But a New York Times story today suggests there is actually some truth to it.

The Times spoke with sources inside Apple's Cupertino headquarters, and they have confirmed Apple is working on a wristwatch made of curved glass. That kind of technology already exists, so using glass that can bend to make it wearable seems like a real possibility, even today.

"You can certainly make it wrap around a cylindrical object and that could be someones wrist," Pete Bocko, the chief technology officer for Corning Glass Technologies, told the Times. "Right now, if I tried to make something that looked like a watch, that could be done using this flexible glass," he added, referring to Willow Glass, a bendable glass that his company has worked on.

SEE ALSO: Apple Job Posting Suggests Siri Is Coming to the Mac

At this point, though, it's all speculation, since the company's actual plans are shrouded in secrecy.

And even if Apple is indeed working on an iWatch, that doesn't mean we'll see it in an Apple Store any time soon. Although experts agree that wearable technology is definitely something we'll see sooner rather than later  just think of Google Glass.

"Over the long term wearable computing is inevitable for Apple; devices are diversifying and the human body is a rich canvas for the computer, Sarah Rotman Epps, an expert in wearable computing, told the Times. "But Im not sure how close we are to a new piece of Apple hardware that is worn on the body."

Would you buy an Apple smart watch? What are the features you would like to see a watch like that offer? Tell us your thoughts in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Valentine's Day is coming up, and many of us are looking for that special someone  including the BlackBerry Z10.

Our friends Nitrozac and Snaggy at The Joy of Tech illustrate what might become a regular occurrence for the new smartphone. Would you give up your current mobile relationship for the new BlackBerry?

SEE ALSO: More Sunday Comics

Comic illustration provided by The Joy of Tech. Published with permission; all rights reserved.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Country crooner Carrie Underwood's grey dress turned into an animated light show during her performance of "Two Black Cadillacs" at the 55th Grammy Awards on Sunday.

Animated patterns such as falling rose petals and soaring butterflies projected onto the dress, at times matching the animations on the digital screens behind her.

Kelly Clarkson's Amazing Photobomb | Best GIFs | Grammys' Most Exciting Thing Is J-Lo's Leg

"They can do a lot of amazing things with projectors these days," Underwood told reporters backstage (see video below). "I said I should take that home where we can watch movies on it.  You wanna watch movies on my dress?"

Check out the projections in action in these six GIFs NowThisNews sent to Mashable:

The ball gown, which wasn't animated during her first song (see image four in gallery above), lit up Twitter with people reacting hilariously to the fascinating sight:

Underwood won Best Country Song and Best Country Solo Performance for "Blown Away," the first song she performed Sunday night.
--------------------------------------------------------------
We love the service Craigslist offers, but we're well aware of the potential for fraud, scams and other nefarious activities.

We have taken a look at some ways to try and spot a dodgy deal on Craigslist. While many seem like common sense, sometimes it's easy to get carried away with ads that seem ideal.

SEE ALSO: 8 Things You Didn't Know You Could Do on Craigslist

If you're worried about getting caught by a Craigslist scam, take a look through our tips below and do remember  if something seems too good to be true, it probably is.

Just don't do it. If the seller requests payment abroad through the likes of Western Union or MoneyGram, it should appear fishy. Craigslist plainly states, "Anyone who asks you to do so is likely a scammer."

Using an online escrow service might sound like a good idea, but chances are it's a scam. While genuine escrow services do exist, scammers can set up fake sites that look legitimate, but aren't.

Anyone that claims Craigslist will guarantee a transaction or offer any kind of protection is lying.

Craigslist clearly states it "is not involved in any transaction, and does not handle payments, guarantee transactions, provide escrow services, or offer 'buyer protection' or 'seller certification.'"

Never dispatch goods or carry out services on the basis of seeing a photo of a check or money order. Always wait for a check to arrive  and more crucially, clear  before completing a deal. Craiglist warns that fake cashier's checks are common. And you won't know it's fake until your bank bounces it.

Never accept a cashier's check for more than the amount, with the agreement to wire the excess back. This is undoutedly a scam  walk away from the deal immediately.

Do not pay any amount "up front," even if it's a small sum. Anyone asking you to send money first, or to secure something with a deposit, is almost certainly a scammer.

It is always best to meet people face-to-face to exchange money, goods or services. Craiglist advises, "Deal locally with folks you can meet in person  follow this one rule and avoid 99% of scam attempts."
--------------------------------------------------------------
It might be time to reexamine some of those 4,896 Facebook friends. Or are they "friends?"

SEE ALSO: More Sunday Comics
--------------------------------------------------------------
Musics biggest artists will take the stage for the 55th Grammy Awards on Sunday night at 8 p.m. ET on CBS. Held in the Staples Center in Los Angeles, the event is one of music industrys largest, featuring live performances from 21 different artists.

While the broadcast may only last a few hours, its the product of days and weeks of work from everyone from set designers to audio engineers  not to mention the artists themselves.

SEE ALSO: 3 Ways to Enjoy the Grammys Online

We went behind the scenes for one of the show's last days of rehearsals to get a glimpse at what goes into the epic live broadcast.

Not rehearsed in order, artists were each given between an hour and an hour and a half of rehearsal time between Thursday and Saturday to try their act out on stage. During the rehearsals, they set audio levels and determine blocking  that is, where they will be located on the stage as they perform. The first time the show will be run though in order will be from 10 a.m. - 2 p.m. PT on Sunday, just a few hours before the show goes live across the globe.

Check out the gallery above for our exclusive look at some of the people and equipment that go into the extravagant television production.

Are you excited about the Grammy Awards? Let us know in the comments your predictions for the show.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Grammy Awards broadcast (Sunday night at 8 p.m. ET on CBS) is arguably the largest musical event of the year, featuring live performances from some of the biggest names in music.

What you may not realize while youre watching the event at home Sunday evening is that each one of the 21 live performances during this years show were only rehearsed with the live crew just a few times.

SEE ALSO: 3 Ways to Enjoy the Grammys Online

Every Grammy performer was given between an hour to an hour and half Thursday through Saturday to rehearse in LAs Staples Center. Take away time spent on things like figuring out how to get gear on and off stage and selecting camera shots, and youre often left with just three passes of the song on stage for audio, certainly the most important part of the show.

During that rehearsal time a sound engineer is sitting in a truck outside the Staples Center listening and tweaking, attempting to find the optimal audio settings for that performer.

While the Grammys sound engineer is in the driver's seat, someone associated with the artist on stage  such as a producer, manager or sound professional  is sitting right behind him, making suggestions for improving the overall output.

This years show has two main audio engineers who split the responsibilities of the 21 acts.

Once the artists rehearsal is complete, everyone in the truck heads to an identical vehicle parked beside the original to spend a little more time tweaking the audio for the performance. Meanwhile, the other sound engineer moves into truck number one to start on the next groups rehearsal.

Called Horizon and Eclipse, the two trucks are identical down to their paint jobs, ensuring that what you hear in one truck will be exactly the same thing you hear in the other.

Redundancy is an ongoing theme at this years Grammy Awards. Almost every piece of equipment down to the guitars has a double nearby, ensuring that if something fails there will be another piece of equipment on hand to replace it. Most of the audio and video equipment is set up in such a way that the switch is automatic, so if a piece of equipment fails the backup will automatically take over.

The two-truck system for audio also makes rehearsals for the show go much faster, simply because they can move on to the next performer while an engineer is still working with another. Before the two-truck system, the process would often mean long nights preceding the Grammys, with engineers working until 2 a.m. or later.

When the performers take the stage on Sunday, the audio levels on all equipment will already be set, ensuring the quality you hear at home is outstanding. While there will definitely be adjustments made on the spot the day of the performance, the rehearsal time gives the audio team an idea of what to expect.

Microphones for vocals are all stored in numbered containers near the stage, with each number corresponding to a particular artist. The bins help prevent signals from microphones interfering with each other.

Microphones are all pre-placed on equipment, and instruments are all preset on risers that are moved on and off the stage in seconds. The only thing that needs to happen when the risers hit the stage is for them to be plugged in.

Audio is run from the Horizon and Eclipse trucks outside the Staples Center to another truck located under the arena called Denali. Denali is where you'll find the director for the show, and where the live broadcast is also being recorded for posterity, surprisingly on digital videotape. While the show will eventually be moved over to a tapeless digital format, videotape still remains the easiest way for the crew to capture the performance for posterity. Videotapes are also used to cut international versions of the broadcast later on.

In the Denali truck the audio and video for the show are combined, creating the final feed that is then sent to CBS in NYC using a giant satellite outside Staples Center to be broadcast.

Rehearsals are not done in order. A final dress rehearsal from 10 a.m. - 2 p.m. on Sunday, just hours before going live, will be the first time the show is done from top to bottom.

A unique advantage of shooting the show live in Los Angeles, when the live broadcast wraps up, the recording has just started to be shown on the west coast. Once the live broadcast is over, the team will often hit a local bar to watch the show, unwind, and prepare for their next big broadcast.

Check out the gallery below for a look at some of what goes on behind the scenes at the show.

Are you excited about this year's Grammys? Let us know what you're looking forward to in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------
While the musicians who are headlining the Grammy Awards often appear to lead glamorous lives, that hasnt always been the case for many of them, nor is it the case for the musician community as a whole.

SEE ALSO: 3 Ways to Enjoy the Grammys Online

In a profession that almost never comes with health insurance or a steady paycheck, musicians who fall upon hard times are often faced with losing everything. When that happens, the Musicares foundation is often there, providing musicians with resources and funding to overcome obstacles and get back to performing. It recently created a fund to help musicians affected by Hurricane Sandy with everything from getting new equipment to getting basic necessities like food, shelter and clothing.

To help raise money, MusiCares often holds fundraisers using signed guitars and memorabilia from popular artists. One place those items are collected is the Grammy Foundation. It starts collecting records, guitars and other memorabilia related to the artists performing as soon as the Grammy nominees are announced. It collects additional items on a table set up offstage during rehearsals for the Grammys broadcast, where artists can stop by to autograph them. The items are then auctioned off on eBay the day after the show.

One group that has benefited from MusiCares in the past is the Lumineers, a band thats up for the award for Best New Artist at this years Grammy Awards.

A little over a year ago, the Denver-based group was traveling in L.A. and had their van broken into. The second time the group had been robbed (the first is mentioned in the groups song Slow It Down), most of their instruments were stolen, which could have meant the end for the group.

MusiCares stepped in, and along with help from other sources such as PledgeMusic, the group was able to get new equipment, continue touring, and a little over a year later, make their way to another stage in L.A.: The Grammys.

After their rehearsal Thursday, the Lumineers enthusiastically stopped by the table and signed a record that will be auctioned off Monday, symbolically helping to pay back the organization that helped play a role in their success.

A MusiCares rep told us that most musicians make a point to stop by, and are happy to take a few minutes to do something that could mean a lot for another musician in need.

In addition to individual items, MusiCares has also had artists sign a Greenroom book for the Grammys. Ultimately a leather-bound book that will include most of not all of the famous names that attend the show Sunday, MusiCares expected to raise close to $10k with the books sale.

Check out the gallery below for a look at some of the items MusiCares will be auctioning off Monday. You can check out the full auction on Monday here.
--------------------------------------------------------------
What if Grammys were given out based on popularity on social media? This infographic examines which nominees are dominating Facebook, Instagram, Twitter and YouTube.

Going into Sunday's 55th Grammy Awards, for example, Carly Rae Jepsen's viral hit "Call Me Maybe" has the most YouTube views out of fellow Song of the Year contenders: Fun's "We Are Young," Ed Sheeran's "The A Team," Kelly Clarkson's "Stronger" and Miguel's "Adorn." The Grammy Awards will air Feb. 10 at 8 p.m. ET on CBS.

If Music Streams Swayed Grammys, These Nominees Would Win SEE ALSO: 3 Ways to Enjoy the Grammys Online

Meanwhile, Taylor Swift has the most subscribers, beating out every nominee in the Best New Artist, Song of the Year, Record of the Year and Album of the Year categories, according to the data from creative marketing agency Activ8Social. Swift also has the largest Facebook fanbase, by a long shot, versus her competition for Record of the Year.

BONUS: Behind the Scenes at the Grammy Awards Broadcast
--------------------------------------------------------------
Whether a high-speed rail system ever gets built in the United States is still up in the air, but if it is, artist and activist Alfred Twu has figured out exactly where those speedy rail lines should go.

Twu started working on this map in 2009, when President Obama's plan to build high-speed rail was unveiled. "There were many such maps being made by various designers," says Twu, but since then he's updated the map with labels and put it on Facebook, and it struck a chord. It's gone viral.

"With the huge response it's generated, I created a petition to the White House to fund such a system," he told Mashable. After just a week, that White House petition already has 27,528 signatures.

Twu's not just guessing where those routes should be, either. "The routes are based on various studies by government agencies and advocacy groups," he explains.

We like the map's colors and its overall design, into which Twu put a lot of thought. "Some artistic license was applied to make it more elegant and have it be a series of distinct lines like a subway map," he says. "Colors were selected to convey the idea of the U.S. being made up of several interwoven regional cultures that come together at major cities  like an internal melting pot."

Trains zipping across the continent at 220mph might sound like a far-fetched futuristic concept, but Twu thinks this project could be built out much like the Interstate Highway System was built in the 50s, he says. "I've seen 2030 and 2050 as potential dates from various advocacy groups," Twu added.

As you look at the map, you'll see that Twu included unshaded routes, which he says were "purposely left open to interpretation." He says the general idea of adding those routes would be that they would handle "lower-speed trains, as well as potential future high-speed routes."

But certainly there's not enough money to do something like this, given the economic situation in the United States at the moment, right? Tsu says cost estimates for a high-speed rail system like this range from $1-$2 trillion. Geez, that's a lot of money. He responded, "Sounds like a lot, but divided over four decades, that is around $25-$50 billion a year or 80-160 dollars a year per person. That's one tank's worth of gas money."

To get a closer look at the map, view or download this .PDF file.

What do you think, readers? Will this speedy rail system be going near your house? Should the United States catch up with the rest of the developed world and build the system, or should budget constraints keep us from spending money on this futuristic conveyance?

Bonus gallery: Here's a design concept showing how those high-speed trains might work:
--------------------------------------------------------------
As you've probably discovered, there are people lurking all over the web who find great joy in humiliating and attacking others. This insightful infographic describes the inner workings of Internet trolls, explaining why they decide to spend their online time in attack mode. Tapping the expertise of psychologists and experts, it offers solid reasons why this scourge of the Internet continues.

We all like to think that most people mean well, and are inherently good. Even if that's true, the infographic shows us instances where even some good people can quickly turn bad, all because of a variety of situations related to mob behavior.

When people think they're anonymous, they do things they otherwise wouldn't. When conversations aren't happening in real time, some people feel like they can quickly dash off a negative comment and then immediately escape altogether. And when people get all wrapped up in their narcissism and rebelliousness, they might be more likely to pick on others they don't even know.

This infographic, presented by bestpsychologyschoolsonline.com, concludes with University of Central Lancashire lecturer Claire Hardaker offering ways to prevail over Internet trolls. She combed through nine years' worth of unmoderated comments on an Internet forum, and suggests ways to frustrate  and even thwart  trolls.

Why do you think trolls are doing this? Is there any way to stop trolling without infringing on the free speech of the innocent?
--------------------------------------------------------------
The CBS-imposed dress code made the Grammy Awards a PG-rated affair. Thankfully for everyone who tuned in for possible wardrobe malfunctions, Jennifer Lopez's leg showed up to walk the red carpet.

Twitter  and Drake  couldn't help but react to J-Lo's free-wheeling limb.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Josh Tolan is the CEO of Spark Hire, a video-powered hiring network that connects job seekers and employers through video resumes and online interviews. Connect with him and Spark Hire on Facebook and Twitter.

Youve researched the company and practiced your interview answers. What else is there to worry about? Unfortunately, many candidates flub their interview attire and make themselves undesirable hires in the process. Here are some of the worst fashion horror stories and what you can learn before you suit up for your next job interview:

Companies come in all different shapes and sizes  and all different levels of formality. One of the biggest mistakes job seekers make is to show up for the interview dressed like an employee instead of a candidate.

Since we're a casual work environment with no dress code, we occasionally get the candidate that matches our attire and it comes off as overly presumptuous, overconfident or just plain sloppy, said August Nielsen, HR Manager of Veterans United Home Loans.

Instead, you should dress for a job at least one rung on the career ladder above the one for which youre applying. This will be highly impressive to your interviewer and show just how seriously youre taking this opportunity. Plus, it will convey the message to your potential employer that youre interested in moving up and bettering yourself.

I also interviewed a guy that wore old tennis shoes with a suit. What was that all about? Nielsen wondered. They weren't even new tennis shoes.

Remember, the interview is not the right moment to try out a quirky new style. Youre not Mark Zuckerberg, and hoodies or old tennis shoes wont make an impressive interview statement.



A recent survey showed six out of ten companies use video interviews in the hiring process. So, chances are, youll have one  and you cant afford to think the video interview is somehow less formal than a face-to-face meeting  its not.

Just because the interviewer is looking directly at your top half doesnt mean you can ignore what you wear below the waist.

We had a candidate who was very impressive from the waist up, said Sandi Webster, Principal for Consultants 2 Go. However, he had to run to his printer for a sheet we had sent and he was wearing pajama bottoms.

Its important to dress exactly as you would for any in-person meeting. While video interviewing provides the luxury of interviewing from home, you should still present yourself as if youre going to the office. Not only does it help you avoid the pajama debacle, but also it helps give you a psychological edge. If youre dressed for the part, youll be more likely to act the part, as well.

Because your clothes tell a story about your candidacy, if you dont pay attention to the small details, employers will think youll miss the big picture on the job as well.

If you're interviewing at LL Bean, don't wear J. Crew. If you're interviewing at CNA Insurance, please don't carry a portfolio emblazoned with the Prudential logo, said Lida Citroen, branding specialist and founder of LIDA360. "These small missteps make the interviewer question your attention to detail and commitment to going the extra mile for the job."

Instead, keep things neutral. Its good practice to stay away from loud prints or company logos altogether, which might be a distraction anyway. So, swap your branded briefcase for a plain case to avoid any issues.

Job interviews make many candidates extremely nervous. If you live in a hot climate or your interview is during a hot summer day, this can be a recipe for a sweaty disaster.

Resume writer and career counselor Gaye Weintraub remembers a job candidate who showed up for the job interview with professional attire that was too tight, and he had giant sweat stains under his arms.

While he dressed appropriately for his interview, it was difficult to get past the sweat stains and his unbelievably red face. I felt sorry for him, which is not the type of reaction any job seeker wants from an interviewer, Weintraub said.

Its important not to forget you are only human, and the combination of nerves and raising temperatures can be lethal. Instead, Weintraub advises candidates to bring an extra shirt along if the temperatures rise and the candidate is prone to sweating. This way, job seekers can change in a nearby bathroom before the interview and appear fresh and ready for the actual meeting.

I tell my clients that it takes an interviewer only a few seconds to form an opinion of them. It is imperative that when they walk into the room, they are well-groomed, well-dressed, smell nice and have a smile, Weintraub said.

You want to dress for your interview, not for your next social engagement. Catherine Bell, former fashion designer and President of PRIME Impressions tells the story of how a man showed up for a mass interview for Sears wearing shorts and a sleeveless tank top. To top it all off, he was also holding an open can of beer in his hand.

He obviously had another agenda outside of landing a job that day, Bell said.

Carving out time in your hectic life for an interview can be tough, especially if you already have a job keeping you busy. Its important, however, to focus all your attention on the interview at hand, instead of what else you have going on for the rest of the day. Turn off your mobile devices so nothing will beep, vibrate or chirp during your interview. And if you're planning on tailgating after your interview, leave the drinks in the cooler.

If you can avoid some of these fashion pitfalls, youll be able to impress hiring managers with your appearance, so what you wear doesnt detract from what you say.

What are some of the worst job-interview fashion mistakes youve seen? Share in the comments.

The Mashable Job Board connects job seekers across the U.S. with unique career opportunities in the digital space. While we publish a wide range of job listings, we have selected a few job opportunities from the past two weeks to help get you started. Happy hunting!
--------------------------------------------------------------
In his second stint as guest host of Saturday Night Live, Justin Bieber showed even more acting prowess. Check him out in this weird Valentine's Day message, which seems perfectly romantic and sweet, well, until we find out about ... Taco?
--------------------------------------------------------------
Kai the hitchhiker left netizens wanting more after the drifter became a viral sensation. We knew this much: Kai saved lives. He used a hatchet. He was all kinds of awesome.

But viewers were thirsty for more. Who really is this surfer-turned-hero? What did he do before becoming a source of Internet inspiration? Where did he learn to wield a hatchet?

KMPH News, the same station that scored Kai's first interview, gained exclusive access to the hitchhiker's story. Check out the video, above, for more.

In an interview, Caleb "Kai" Lawrence tells a dark but inspiring story of overcoming a rough childhood. In true Kai fashion, he speaks of guarding and loving his inner child. His parents' divorce and instances of molestation made for a difficult upbringing and the newscast hints at more troubles as the anchor says, "Much of his past is darker and more gut-wrenching than you can imagine. Stuff that we can't put on air."

SEE ALSO: Shrouded in Viral Mystery, Kai the Hitchhiker Gains a Cult Following

Kai perseveres, saying his spirit and beliefs took him through tough times.

The interview is sure to draw more fans. Aside from praising the hitchhiker for his positive outlook and intelligence, some YouTube commenters are calling for a book deal and full-length Kai documentary. But his rise to fame isn't changing him any time soon.

"I'm just gonna be Kai any way it goes," he explains. "Obviously I was put in a situation for a reason. I would hope, I do hope, that people don't become obsessed with this because there's still so much more that we can do."

The 24-year-old speaks French in part of the interview and tells anchor Jessob Reisbeck about his fluency in three languages, along with showing off his tattoos and skateboarding.

And don't forget his musical skills. The Canada native plays an original song in another exclusive video from the station. Paired with his autotuned interview, we're crossing our fingers for a motivational album.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Kelly Clarkson's adorable photobomb of Portia de Rossi and Ellen DeGeneres won a relatively humdrum Grammys. With no stage rushing or accidental f-bombs, the original American Idol charmed her way to an Internet win with a big grin.

6 GIFs of Carrie Underwood's Animated Dress | Best GIFs | Grammys' Most Exciting Thing Is J-Lo's Leg
--------------------------------------------------------------
Geography: Undoubtedly an important subject, yet often overlooked by many. Except for your kids, that is. See which apps, in addition to those geography and math-related, are best suited this week for your kids.

SEE ALSO: Keeping One Step Ahead of Kids in a Mobile World

Children's Technology Review shared these 5 top apps for kids with us from their comprehensive monthly database of kid-tested reviews. The site covers everything from math and counting to reading and phonics.

Check back next week for more Top Kids Apps from Children's Technology Review.

Chris Crowell is a veteran kindergarten teacher and contributing editor to Children's Technology Review, a web-based archive of articles and reviews on apps, technology toys and video games. Download a free issue of CTR here.
--------------------------------------------------------------
The Microsoft Surface Pro, the new flagship Windows 8 device that launched on Saturday, is reportedly sold out in many retail locations across the country.

Great success, right? Not so fast. Apparently, as reported by ZDnet, that fact might be misleading. In general, of course, selling out on the day of a product launch is good thing. But not if it only sold out because there weren't enough Surface Pros available.

And that seems to be the problem here. Apparently, stores around the country only received a handful of Surface Pros, so they quickly sold out, leaving lots of angry customers with empty hands.

Microsoft seems to call it a win, though. "Customer response to the launch of Surface Pro has been amazing. Were working with our retail partners who are currently out of stock of the 128GB Surface Pro to replenish supplies as quickly as possible," Microsoft wrote on its official Surface Pro blog.

Critics have been quick to point out that this "amazing" response is not backed up by actual numbers, but just reports of stores selling out of Surface Pro models. But the real question is, how many did they actually have available in the first place?

To learn more about the controversy, watch the video above.
--------------------------------------------------------------
Going to the movies is often an expensive proposition. Depending on when and where you hit the theater, you may have already spent a decent amount of cash on a ticket even before you hit the concession stand. Go to more than a few movies a month, and you're probably spending more at the theater than you do on your monthly cellphone bill.

Enter MoviePass, a service that attempts to cut costs for movie buffs, allowing you to go to the theater and see a 2D movie every day for a single monthly price, ranging from $29.99 to $34.99 depending on your location. Available for iOS for a few months, the MoviePass app launched for Android this week.

According to MoviePass CEO Stacy Spikes, Android owners have been anxious to get access to the app. Spikes told Mashable that some Android owners claim to have even been considering switching to iPhone just to have access to the service.

"The feedback were seeing socially is really great," he says.

The way MoviePass works is simple. When you sign up, youre sent a credit card with the MoviePass logo on it. When you arrive at a theater, you simply check in to the flick youd like to see using the app, your credit card is temporarily activated, and you can head to the box office and buy your ticket.

Checking in requires you to be physically near the theater where you want to see a movie, and once you check i,n you only have 30 minutes to use your card to make a purchase before it's deactivated again.

The service works in theaters around the country, with no blackout dates or restrictions on what types of movies you can see. The only restriction: You can't use MoviePass for 3D movies.

We've been using the iOS version of the app, and overall have walked away pretty impressed. The service has worked seamlessly everywhere from huge theaters in San Francisco to smaller neighborhood spots in North Carolina. The only issues we've run into have been in places where there's poor cell reception. In those locales, checking in sometimes take a bit longer, or requires a few attempts before it finally goes through.

MoviePass is currently in invite-only beta, however Spikes tells us the company is currently turning around invitations within just a few days, and often the same day they receive a request.

You can request an invitation for yourself on the company's website.

Have you given MoviePass a try? What do you think about the idea of paying a flat rate to see all the movies you want in a month?
--------------------------------------------------------------
What happens when you combine a Batman onesie, DeLorean and some kibbles? Hipster dogs abound in "Pet Shop," a parody of hip-hop duo Macklemore and Ryan Lewis' hit single, "Thrift Shop."

The spoof from the Pet Collective, the same group that gave us Corgi Rae Jepsen, takes on the Billboard single with Barklemore and his pug partner. Cue the famous intro with a chorus of "meows" and Barklemore singing, "I'm gonna rock some tags, I'm so happy that I got adopted."

The video features adorable pooches in a shower of boas, bowties and costumes as well as their humans in thrift-shop garb. Dogs bathing in bubbles, frolicking in the grass and sitting at the piano  there's really little else you need.

Check out what happens behind the scenes with these trendy canines below. We wonder if these dogs prefer their collars from Goodwill or the Salvation Army?
--------------------------------------------------------------
This week brought with it some fantastic apps.

Both GetGlue and Stitcher Radio released significant updates this week, and EA brought The Simpsons to Android in the form of a SimCity-style game.

MoviePass, the app that lets you see a movie at the theater everyday for a single monthly price, finally launched for Android. And the BBC made it easier to keep up with all your favorite sports with a new app for iOS.

Curious what these new apps really look like? Check out the video above for a visual run-through of some of our favorite apps of the week.

Have you given any of this week's top apps a try? Tell us in the comments about your favorites.
--------------------------------------------------------------
It was a hot week for comments at Mashable, and we've found the best for you here in our weekly wrapup.

A recent study by a graduate student at the University of Colorado Denver Business School suggested that 40% of people say they would avoid someone who unfriended them on Facebook. Our readers generally argued that the close to 600-people sample size of the survey taken on Twitter wasn't large enough to be conclusive. As the conversation developed, however, many began arguing about the larger issue of who you decide to "friend" on Facebook in the first place.

An Applebee's waitress never suspected that a receipt she posted on Reddit would go viral. In our comments, some readers defended the waitress, while others argued that the customer got what she deserved for not tipping.

SEE ALSO: Pot Farm Activates Farmer Force, and Other Top Conversations

While many people couldn't stop talking about the First Lady's bangs or new twitter account, this Alabama teacher took to talking about her "fat butt" and "queers" in his classroom. A student was able to record the audio of the hate speech and expose the teacher for the inappropriate talk. You can hear the audio for yourself if you choose. Our readers weighed in on what they though the role of opinions should be in the classroom.

Today, startups are a hot place to work and are growing increasingly more popular. In What to Know Before You Apply to a Startup, we explored the benefits and the skills and references you need to land the job, and keep the job. Our readers contributed lessons from their own career experiences in both startup companies and larger corporations.

What was the most interesting or controversial story of the week for you? Let us know and you may see your voice in next week's top comments
--------------------------------------------------------------
This week's Viral Video Recap features the Internet's usual suspects, cats and kids. But there are some surprises, too.

In the classic cats viral videos department, there's a very relaxed cat sunbathing. Warning: You'll wish you were that cat if you watch the video. As for kids, there's a toddler who can make ridiculous trick shots, and a little girl, peacefully sleeping, until a certain viral song prompts her to dance.

SEE ALSO: MORE VIRAL VIDEO RECAPS

Oh, and there's also a crazy science experiment with a scorching hot ball of nickel and a video of the world's best magician-pickpocket in action.

What was your favorite video this week? Let us know in the comments.
--------------------------------------------------------------